BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
7.69.020 and 1993 c 350 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Crime" means an act, alleged or determined in superior court,
juvenile court, or any district or municipal court to have happened, and which
is punishable as a felony, gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor under the laws
of this state or equivalent federal or local law.

(2)
"Survivor" or "survivors" of a victim of crime means a
spouse, child, parent, legal guardian, sibling, or grandparent. If there is
more than one survivor of a victim of crime, one survivor shall be designated
by the prosecutor to represent all survivors for purposes of providing the
notice to survivors required by this chapter.

(3)
"Victim" means a person against whom a crime has been committed or
the representative of a person against whom a crime has been committed.

(4)
"Victim impact statement" means a statement submitted to the court by
the victim or a survivor, individually or with the assistance of the
prosecuting attorney if assistance is requested by the victim or survivor,
which may include but is not limited to information assessing the financial,
medical, social, and psychological impact of the offense upon the victim or
survivors.

(5)
"Witness" means a person who has been or is expected to be summoned
to testify for the prosecution in a criminal action, or who by reason of having
relevant information is subject to call or likely to be called as a witness for
the prosecution, whether or not an action or proceeding has been commenced.

(6)
"Crime victim/witness program" means any crime victim and witness
program of a county or local law enforcement agency or prosecutor's office, any
rape crisis center's sexual assault victim advocacy program as provided in
chapter 70.125 RCW, any domestic violence program's legal and community
advocate program for domestic violence victims as provided in chapter 70.123
RCW, or any other crime victim advocacy program which provides trained
advocates to assist crime victims during the investigation and prosecution of
the crime.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.40.010 and 1997 c 338 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter shall be known and cited as the Juvenile Justice Act ((of 1977)).

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature that a system capable of having primary
responsibility for, being accountable for, and responding to the needs of
youthful offenders, and their victims, as defined by this chapter, be
established. It is the further intent of the legislature that youth, in turn,
be held accountable for their offenses and that communities, families, and the
juvenile courts carry out their functions consistent with this intent. To
effectuate these policies, the legislature declares the following to be equally
important purposes of this chapter:

(a)
Protect the citizenry from criminal behavior;

(b)
Provide for determining whether accused juveniles have committed offenses as
defined by this chapter;

(c)
Make the juvenile offender accountable for his or her criminal behavior;

(d)
Provide for punishment commensurate with the age, crime, and criminal history
of the juvenile offender;

(e)
Provide due process for juveniles alleged to have committed an offense;

(f)
Provide necessary treatment, supervision, and custody for juvenile offenders;

(g)
Provide for the handling of juvenile offenders by communities whenever
consistent with public safety;

(h)
Provide for restitution to victims of crime;

(i)
Develop effective standards and goals for the operation, funding, and
evaluation of all components of the juvenile justice system and related
services at the state and local levels;

(j)
Provide for a clear policy to determine what types of offenders shall receive
punishment, treatment, or both, and to determine the jurisdictional limitations
of the courts, institutions, and community services; ((and))

(k)
Encourage the parents, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile to actively
participate in the juvenile justice process; and

(l)
Making each victim of a juvenile offender whole to the fullest extent possible
by addressing the violation against the victim; restoring a victim's sense of
safety; having the justice process acknowledge the impact the crime has had
upon the victim and considering how the system participants can include the
victim's position to the extent the victim is able or chooses to participate,
at important junctures of the case and at disposition; and addressing the
victim's needs and concerns.

Sec.
3. RCW
13.40.020 and 1997 c 338 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter:

(1)
"Community-based rehabilitation" means one or more of the following:
Employment; attendance of information classes; literacy classes; counseling,
outpatient substance abuse treatment programs, outpatient mental health
programs, anger management classes, education or outpatient treatment programs
to prevent animal cruelty, or other services; or attendance at school or other
educational programs appropriate for the juvenile as determined by the school
district. Placement in community-based rehabilitation programs is subject to
available funds;

(2)
Community-based sanctions may include one or more of the following:

(a)
A fine, not to exceed five hundred dollars;

(b)
Community service not to exceed one hundred fifty hours of service;

(3)
"Community service" means compulsory service, without compensation,
performed for the benefit of the community by the offender as punishment for
committing an offense. Community service may be performed through public or
private organizations or through work crews;

(4)
"Community supervision" means an order of disposition by the court of
an adjudicated youth not committed to the department or an order granting a
deferred disposition. A community supervision order for a single offense may
be for a period of up to two years for a sex offense as defined by RCW
9.94A.030 and up to one year for other offenses. As a mandatory condition of
any term of community supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to
refrain from committing new offenses. As a mandatory condition of community
supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to comply with the mandatory
school attendance provisions of chapter 28A.225 RCW and to inform the school of
the existence of this requirement. Community supervision is an individualized
program comprised of one or more of the following:

(a)
Community-based sanctions;

(b)
Community-based rehabilitation;

(c)
Monitoring and reporting requirements;

(d)
Posting of a probation bond;

(5)
"Confinement" means physical custody by the department of social and
health services in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the
state, or physical custody in a detention facility operated by or pursuant to a
contract with any county. The county may operate or contract with vendors to
operate county detention facilities. The department may operate or contract to
operate detention facilities for juveniles committed to the department.
Pretrial confinement or confinement of less than thirty-one days imposed as
part of a disposition or modification order may be served consecutively or
intermittently, in the discretion of the court;

(6)
"Court," when used without further qualification, means the juvenile
court judge(s) or commissioner(s);

(7)
"Criminal history" includes all criminal complaints against the
respondent for which, prior to the commission of a current offense:

(a)
The allegations were found correct by a court. If a respondent is convicted of
two or more charges arising out of the same course of conduct, only the highest
charge from among these shall count as an offense for the purposes of this
chapter; or

(b)
The criminal complaint was diverted by a prosecutor pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter on agreement of the respondent and after an advisement to the
respondent that the criminal complaint would be considered as part of the
respondent's criminal history. A successfully completed deferred adjudication
that was entered before July 1, 1998, or a deferred disposition shall not be
considered part of the respondent's criminal history;

(8)
"Department" means the department of social and health services;

(9)
"Detention facility" means a county facility, paid for by the county,
for the physical confinement of a juvenile alleged to have committed an offense
or an adjudicated offender subject to a disposition or modification order.
"Detention facility" includes county group homes, inpatient substance
abuse programs, juvenile basic training camps, and electronic monitoring;

(10)
"Diversion unit" means any probation counselor who enters into a
diversion agreement with an alleged youthful offender, or any other person,
community accountability board, or other entity except a law enforcement
official or entity, with whom the juvenile court administrator has contracted to
arrange and supervise such agreements pursuant to RCW 13.40.080, or any person,
community accountability board, or other entity specially funded by the
legislature to arrange and supervise diversion agreements in accordance with
the requirements of this chapter. For purposes of this subsection,
"community accountability board" means a board comprised of members
of the local community in which the juvenile offender resides. The superior
court shall appoint the members. The boards shall consist of at least three
and not more than seven members. If possible, the board should include a
variety of representatives from the community, such as a law enforcement
officer, teacher or school administrator, high school student, parent, and
business owner, and should represent the cultural diversity of the local
community;

(11)
"Foster care" means temporary physical care in a foster family home
or group care facility as defined in RCW 74.15.020 and licensed by the
department, or other legally authorized care;

(12)
"Institution" means a juvenile facility established pursuant to
chapters 72.05 and 72.16 through 72.20 RCW;

(13)
"Intensive supervision program" means a parole program that requires
intensive supervision and monitoring, offers an array of individualized treatment
and transitional services, and emphasizes community involvement and support in
order to reduce the likelihood a juvenile offender will commit further
offenses;

(14)
"Juvenile," "youth," and "child" mean any
individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years and who has not
been previously transferred to adult court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 or who is
otherwise under adult court jurisdiction;

(15)
"Juvenile offender" means any juvenile who has been found by the
juvenile court to have committed an offense, including a person eighteen years
of age or older over whom jurisdiction has been extended under RCW 13.40.300;

(16)
"Local sanctions" means one or more of the following: (a) 0‑30
days of confinement; (b) 0‑12 months of community supervision; (c) 0‑150
hours of community service; or (d) $0‑$500 fine;

(17)
"Manifest injustice" means a disposition that would either impose an
excessive penalty on the juvenile or would impose a serious, and clear danger
to society in light of the purposes of this chapter;

(18)
"Monitoring and reporting requirements" means one or more of the
following: Curfews; requirements to remain at home, school, work, or
court-ordered treatment programs during specified hours; restrictions from
leaving or entering specified geographical areas; requirements to report to the
probation officer as directed and to remain under the probation officer's
supervision; and other conditions or limitations as the court may require which
may not include confinement;

(19)
"Offense" means an act designated a violation or a crime if committed
by an adult under the law of this state, under any ordinance of any city or
county of this state, under any federal law, or under the law of another state
if the act occurred in that state;

(20)
"Probation bond" means a bond, posted with sufficient security by a
surety justified and approved by the court, to secure the offender's appearance
at required court proceedings and compliance with court-ordered community
supervision or conditions of release ordered pursuant to RCW 13.40.040 or
13.40.050. It also means a deposit of cash or posting of other collateral in
lieu of a bond if approved by the court;

(21)
"Respondent" means a juvenile who is alleged or proven to have
committed an offense;

(22)
"Restitution" means financial reimbursement by the offender to the
victim, and shall be limited to easily ascertainable damages for injury to or
loss of property, actual expenses incurred for medical treatment for physical
injury to persons, lost wages resulting from physical injury, and costs of the
victim's counseling reasonably related to the offense if the offense is a sex
offense. Restitution shall not include reimbursement for damages for mental
anguish, pain and suffering, or other intangible losses. Nothing in this
chapter shall limit or replace civil remedies or defenses available to the
victim or offender;

(23)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services. "Assistant secretary" means the assistant secretary
for juvenile rehabilitation for the department;

(24)
"Services" means services which provide alternatives to incarceration
for those juveniles who have pleaded or been adjudicated guilty of an offense
or have signed a diversion agreement pursuant to this chapter;

(25)
"Sex offense" means an offense defined as a sex offense in RCW
9.94A.030;

(26)
"Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the
respondent committed the offense was for the purpose of his or her sexual
gratification;

(27)
"Surety" means an entity licensed under state insurance laws or by
the state department of licensing, to write corporate, property, or probation
bonds within the state, and justified and approved by the superior court of the
county having jurisdiction of the case;

(28)
"Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a result
of the offense charged. "Victim" also means a parent or guardian of
a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or guardian is the perpetrator
of the offense charged.

(29)
"Violation" means an act or omission, which if committed by an adult,
must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt, and is punishable by sanctions which
do not include incarceration;

(((29)))
(30) "Violent offense" means a violent offense as defined in
RCW 9.94A.030.

Sec.
4. RCW
13.40.070 and 1997 c 338 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Complaints referred to the juvenile court alleging the commission of an offense
shall be referred directly to the prosecutor. The prosecutor, upon receipt of
a complaint, shall screen the complaint to determine whether:

(a)
The alleged facts bring the case within the jurisdiction of the court; and

(b)
On a basis of available evidence there is probable cause to believe that the
juvenile did commit the offense.

(2)
If the identical alleged acts constitute an offense under both the law of this
state and an ordinance of any city or county of this state, state law shall
govern the prosecutor's screening and charging decision for both filed and
diverted cases.

(3)
If the requirements of subsections (1)(a) and (b) of this section are met, the
prosecutor shall either file an information in juvenile court or divert the case,
as set forth in subsections (5), (6), and (7) of this section. If the
prosecutor finds that the requirements of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this
section are not met, the prosecutor shall maintain a record, for one year, of
such decision and the reasons therefor. In lieu of filing an information or
diverting an offense a prosecutor may file a motion to modify community
supervision where such offense constitutes a violation of community
supervision.

(4)
An information shall be a plain, concise, and definite written statement of the
essential facts constituting the offense charged. It shall be signed by the
prosecuting attorney and conform to chapter 10.37 RCW.

(5)
Where a case is legally sufficient, the prosecutor shall file an information
with the juvenile court if:

(a)
An alleged offender is accused of a class A felony, a class B felony, an
attempt to commit a class B felony, a class C felony listed in RCW 9.94A.440(2)
as a crime against persons or listed in RCW 9A.46.060 as a crime of harassment,
or a class C felony that is a violation of RCW 9.41.080 or 9.41.040(1)(b)(iii);
or

(b)
An alleged offender is accused of a felony and has a criminal history of any
felony, or at least two gross misdemeanors, or at least two misdemeanors; or

(c)
An alleged offender has previously been committed to the department; or

(d)
An alleged offender has been referred by a diversion unit for prosecution or
desires prosecution instead of diversion; or

(e)
An alleged offender has two or more diversion contracts on the alleged
offender's criminal history; or

(f)
A special allegation has been filed that the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm when the offense was committed.

(6)
Where a case is legally sufficient the prosecutor shall divert the case if the
alleged offense is a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor or violation and the
alleged offense is the offender's first offense or violation. If the alleged
offender is charged with a related offense that must or may be filed under
subsections (5) and (7) of this section, a case under this subsection may also
be filed.

(7)
Where a case is legally sufficient and falls into neither subsection (5) nor
(6) of this section, it may be filed or diverted. In deciding whether to file
or divert an offense under this section the prosecutor shall be guided only by
the length, seriousness, and recency of the alleged offender's criminal history
and the circumstances surrounding the commission of the alleged offense.

(8)
Whenever a juvenile is placed in custody or, where not placed in custody,
referred to a diversion interview, the parent or legal guardian of the juvenile
shall be notified as soon as possible concerning the allegation made against
the juvenile and the current status of the juvenile. ((Where a case
involves victims of crimes against persons or victims whose property has not
been recovered at the time a juvenile is referred to a diversion unit, the
victim shall be notified of the referral and informed how to contact the unit.))

(9)
If a prosecuting attorney files an information under subsection (5) of this
section, he or she shall notify the victim of the filing. The prosecuting
attorney responsible for making the decision whether to file an information or
divert the juvenile under subsection (7) of this section shall notify each
victim of the decision which is made. However, if the juvenile is
automatically diverted under subsection (6) of this section, the prosecuting
attorney may notify each victim of the diversion. If a decision is made to not
file an information or divert the juvenile, the prosecuting attorney shall
include a description of any appropriate procedures available to a victim to
initiate a criminal proceeding. Notice to a victim under this subsection shall
be made within five days of reaching the decision, and the prosecuting attorney
shall, upon request of any victim, provide information to the victim on the
status of the case.

(10)
The responsibilities of the prosecutor under subsections (1) through (8) of
this section may be performed by a juvenile court probation counselor for any
complaint referred to the court alleging the commission of an offense which
would not be a felony if committed by an adult, if the prosecutor has given
sufficient written notice to the juvenile court that the prosecutor will not
review such complaints.

(((10)))
(11) The prosecutor, juvenile court probation counselor, or diversion
unit may, in exercising their authority under this section or RCW 13.40.080,
refer juveniles to mediation or victim offender reconciliation programs. Such
mediation or victim offender reconciliation programs shall be voluntary for
victims.

Sec.
5. RCW
13.40.077 and 1997 c 338 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

RECOMMENDED PROSECUTING STANDARDS

FOR
CHARGING AND PLEA DISPOSITIONS

INTRODUCTION:
These standards are intended solely for the guidance of prosecutors in the
state of Washington. They are not intended to, do not, and may not be relied
upon to create a right or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at
law by a party in litigation with the state.

Evidentiary
sufficiency.

(1)
Decision not to prosecute.

STANDARD:
A prosecuting attorney may decline to prosecute, even though technically
sufficient evidence to prosecute exists, in situations where prosecution would
serve no public purpose, would defeat the underlying purpose of the law in
question, or would result in decreased respect for the law. The decision not
to prosecute or divert shall not be influenced by the race, gender, religion,
or creed of the suspect.

GUIDELINES/COMMENTARY:

Examples

The
following are examples of reasons not to prosecute which could satisfy the
standard.

(a)
Contrary to Legislative Intent - It may be proper to decline to charge where
the application of criminal sanctions would be clearly contrary to the intent
of the legislature in enacting the particular statute.

(b)
Antiquated Statute - It may be proper to decline to charge where the statute in
question is antiquated in that:

(i)
It has not been enforced for many years;

(ii)
Most members of society act as if it were no longer in existence;

(iii)
It serves no deterrent or protective purpose in today's society; and

(iv)
The statute has not been recently reconsidered by the legislature.

This
reason is not to be construed as the basis for declining cases because the law
in question is unpopular or because it is difficult to enforce.

(c)
De Minimis Violation - It may be proper to decline to charge where the
violation of law is only technical or insubstantial and where no public
interest or deterrent purpose would be served by prosecution.

(d)
Confinement on Other Charges - It may be proper to decline to charge because
the accused has been sentenced on another charge to a lengthy period of
confinement; and

(i)
Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional direct or
collateral punishment;

(ii)
The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly
aggravated; and

(iii)
Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant deterrent
purpose.

(e)
Pending Conviction on Another Charge - It may be proper to decline to charge
because the accused is facing a pending prosecution in the same or another
county; and

(i)
Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional direct or
collateral punishment;

(ii)
Conviction in the pending prosecution is imminent;

(iii)
The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly
aggravated; and

(iv)
Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant deterrent
purpose.

(f)
High Disproportionate Cost of Prosecution - It may be proper to decline to
charge where the cost of locating or transporting, or the burden on,
prosecution witnesses is highly disproportionate to the importance of
prosecuting the offense in question. The reason should be limited to minor
cases and should not be relied upon in serious cases.

(g)
Improper Motives of Complainant - It may be proper to decline charges because
the motives of the complainant are improper and prosecution would serve no
public purpose, would defeat the underlying purpose of the law in question, or
would result in decreased respect for the law.

(h)
Immunity - It may be proper to decline to charge where immunity is to be given
to an accused in order to prosecute another where the accused information or
testimony will reasonably lead to the conviction of others who are responsible
for more serious criminal conduct or who represent a greater danger to the
public interest.

(i)
Victim Request - It may be proper to decline to charge because the victim
requests that no criminal charges be filed and the case involves the following
crimes or situations:

(i)
Assault cases where the victim has suffered little or no injury;

(ii)
Crimes against property, not involving violence, where no major loss was
suffered;

(iii)
Where doing so would not jeopardize the safety of society.

Care
should be taken to insure that the victim's request is freely made and is not
the product of threats or pressure by the accused.

The
presence of these factors may also justify the decision to dismiss a
prosecution which has been commenced.

Notification

The
prosecutor is encouraged to notify the victim, when practical, and the law
enforcement personnel, of the decision not to prosecute.

(2)
Decision to prosecute.

STANDARD:

Crimes
against persons will be filed if sufficient admissible evidence exists, which,
when considered with the most plausible, reasonably foreseeable defense that
could be raised under the evidence, would justify conviction by a reasonable
and objective fact-finder. With regard to offenses prohibited by RCW
9A.44.040, 9A.44.050, 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086,
9A.44.089, and 9A.64.020 the prosecutor should avoid prefiling agreements or
diversions intended to place the accused in a program of treatment or
counseling, so that treatment, if determined to be beneficial, can be proved
under RCW 13.40.160(((4))) (3).

Crimes
against property/other crimes will be filed if the admissible evidence is of
such convincing force as to make it probable that a reasonable and objective
fact-finder would convict after hearing all the admissible evidence and the
most plausible defense that could be raised.

The
categorization of crimes for these charging standards shall be the same as
found in RCW 9.94A.440(2).

The
decision to prosecute or use diversion shall not be influenced by the race,
gender, religion, or creed of the respondent.

(3)
Selection of Charges/Degree of Charge

(a)
The prosecutor should file charges which adequately describe the nature of the
respondent's conduct. Other offenses may be charged only if they are necessary
to ensure that the charges:

(i)
Will significantly enhance the strength of the state's case at trial; or

(ii)
Will result in restitution to all victims.

(b)
The prosecutor should not overcharge to obtain a guilty plea. Overcharging
includes:

(i)
Charging a higher degree;

(ii)
Charging additional counts.

This
standard is intended to direct prosecutors to charge those crimes which
demonstrate the nature and seriousness of a respondent's criminal conduct, but
to decline to charge crimes which are not necessary to such an indication.
Crimes which do not merge as a matter of law, but which arise from the same
course of conduct, do not all have to be charged.

(4)
Police Investigation

A
prosecuting attorney is dependent upon law enforcement agencies to conduct the
necessary factual investigation which must precede the decision to prosecute.
The prosecuting attorney shall ensure that a thorough factual investigation has
been conducted before a decision to prosecute is made. In ordinary
circumstances the investigation should include the following:

(a)
The interviewing of all material witnesses, together with the obtaining of
written statements whenever possible;

(b)
The completion of necessary laboratory tests; and

(c)
The obtaining, in accordance with constitutional requirements, of the suspect's
version of the events.

If
the initial investigation is incomplete, a prosecuting attorney should insist
upon further investigation before a decision to prosecute is made, and specify
what the investigation needs to include.

(5)
Exceptions

In
certain situations, a prosecuting attorney may authorize filing of a criminal
complaint before the investigation is complete if:

(a)
Probable cause exists to believe the suspect is guilty; and

(b)
The suspect presents a danger to the community or is likely to flee if not
apprehended; or

(c)
The arrest of the suspect is necessary to complete the investigation of the
crime.

In
the event that the exception to the standard is applied, the prosecuting
attorney shall obtain a commitment from the law enforcement agency involved to
complete the investigation in a timely manner. If the subsequent investigation
does not produce sufficient evidence to meet the normal charging standard, the complaint
should be dismissed.

(6)
Investigation Techniques

The
prosecutor should be fully advised of the investigatory techniques that were
used in the case investigation including:

(a)
Polygraph testing;

(b)
Hypnosis;

(c)
Electronic surveillance;

(d)
Use of informants.

(7)
Prefiling Discussions with Defendant

Discussions
with the defendant or his or her representative regarding the selection or
disposition of charges may occur prior to the filing of charges, and potential
agreements can be reached.

(8)
Plea dispositions:

STANDARD

(a)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a respondent will
normally be expected to plead guilty to the charge or charges which adequately
describe the nature of his or her criminal conduct or go to trial.

(b)
In certain circumstances, a plea agreement with a respondent in exchange for a
plea of guilty to a charge or charges that may not fully describe the nature of
his or her criminal conduct may be necessary and in the public interest. Such
situations may include the following:

(i)
Evidentiary problems which make conviction of the original charges doubtful;

(ii)
The respondent's willingness to cooperate in the investigation or prosecution
of others whose criminal conduct is more serious or represents a greater public
threat;

(iii)
A request by the victim when it is not the result of pressure from the
respondent;

(iv)
The discovery of facts which mitigate the seriousness of the respondent's
conduct;

(v)
The correction of errors in the initial charging decision;

(vi)
The respondent's history with respect to criminal activity;

(vii)
The nature and seriousness of the offense or offenses charged;

(viii)
The probable effect of witnesses.

(c)
In a case involving a crime against a person, as set forth in RCW 9.94A.440,
the prosecuting attorney shall: (i) Make reasonable efforts to inform each
victim of the offense of the nature of, and any reasons for, any plea
agreement, including all offenses the prosecutor has agreed not to file; and
(ii) ascertain any objections or comments the victim has to the plea agreement.

(d)
No plea agreement shall be influenced by the race, gender, religion, or creed
of the respondent. This includes but is not limited to the prosecutor's
decision to utilize such disposition alternatives as the Special Sex Offender
Disposition Alternative, the Chemical Dependency Disposition Alternative, and
manifest injustice.

(9)
Disposition recommendations:

STANDARD

The
prosecutor may reach an agreement regarding disposition recommendations.

The
prosecutor shall not agree to withhold relevant information from the court
concerning the plea agreement.

Sec.
6. RCW
13.40.080 and 1999 c 91 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A diversion agreement shall be a contract between a juvenile accused of an
offense and a diversionary unit whereby the juvenile agrees to fulfill certain
conditions in lieu of prosecution. Such agreements may be entered into only
after the prosecutor, or probation counselor pursuant to this chapter, has
determined that probable cause exists to believe that a crime has been
committed and that the juvenile committed it. Such agreements shall be entered
into as expeditiously as possible.

(2)
A diversion agreement shall ((be limited to)) require restitution to
each victim in the amount of actual loss incurred by the victim and, in
addition, may include one or more of the following:

(a)
Community service not to exceed one hundred fifty hours, not to be performed
during school hours if the juvenile is attending school;

(b)
((Restitution limited to the amount of actual loss incurred by the victim;

(c)))
Attendance at up to ten hours of counseling and/or up to twenty hours of
educational or informational sessions at a community agency. The educational
or informational sessions may include sessions relating to respect for self,
others, and authority; victim awareness; accountability; self-worth;
responsibility; work ethics; good citizenship; literacy; and life skills. For
purposes of this section, "community agency" may also mean a
community-based nonprofit organization, if approved by the diversion unit. The
state shall not be liable for costs resulting from the diversionary unit
exercising the option to permit diversion agreements to mandate attendance at
up to ten hours of counseling and/or up to twenty hours of educational or
informational sessions;

(((d)))
(c) A fine, not to exceed one hundred dollars. In determining the
amount of the fine, the diversion unit shall consider only the juvenile's
financial resources and whether the juvenile has the means to pay the fine.
The diversion unit shall not consider the financial resources of the juvenile's
parents, guardian, or custodian in determining the fine to be imposed;

(((e)))
(d) Requirements to remain during specified hours at home, school, or
work, and restrictions on leaving or entering specified geographical areas; and

(((f)))
(e) Upon request of the victim or witness, requirements to refrain from
any contact with victims or witnesses of offenses committed by the juvenile.

(3)
In assessing periods of community service to be performed and restitution to be
paid by a juvenile who has entered into a diversion agreement, the court
officer to whom this task is assigned shall consult with the juvenile's
custodial parent or parents or guardian and victims who have contacted the
diversionary unit and, to the extent possible, involve members of the
community. Such members of the community shall meet with the juvenile and
advise the court officer as to the terms of the diversion agreement and shall
supervise the juvenile in carrying out its terms.

(4)(a)
A diversion agreement may not exceed a period of six months and may include a
period extending beyond the eighteenth birthday of the divertee.

(b)
If additional time is necessary for the juvenile to complete restitution to the
victim, the time period limitations of this subsection may be extended by an
additional six months.

(c)
If the juvenile has not paid the full amount of restitution by the end of the
additional six-month period, then the juvenile shall be referred to the
juvenile court for entry of an order establishing the amount of restitution
still owed to the victim. In this order, the court shall also determine the
terms and conditions of the restitution, including a payment plan extending up
to ten years if the court determines that the juvenile does not have the means
to make full restitution over a shorter period. For the purposes of this
subsection (4)(c), the juvenile shall remain under the court's jurisdiction for
a maximum term of ten years after the juvenile's eighteenth birthday. Prior to
the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the juvenile court may extend
the judgment for restitution an additional ten years. The court may not
require the juvenile to pay full or partial restitution if the juvenile
reasonably satisfies the court that he or she does not have the means to make
full or partial restitution and could not reasonably acquire the means to pay
the restitution over a ten-year period. The county clerk shall make
disbursements to victims named in the order. The restitution to victims named
in the order shall be paid prior to any payment for other penalties or monetary
assessments. ((A juvenile under obligation to pay restitution may petition
the court for modification of the restitution order.))

(5)
The juvenile shall retain the right to be referred to the court at any time
prior to the signing of the diversion agreement.

(6)
Divertees and potential divertees shall be afforded due process in all contacts
with a diversionary unit regardless of whether the juveniles are accepted for
diversion or whether the diversion program is successfully completed. Such due
process shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a)
A written diversion agreement shall be executed stating all conditions in
clearly understandable language;

(b)
Violation of the terms of the agreement shall be the only grounds for
termination;

(c)
No divertee may be terminated from a diversion program without being given a
court hearing, which hearing shall be preceded by:

(i)
Written notice of alleged violations of the conditions of the diversion
program; and

(ii)
Disclosure of all evidence to be offered against the divertee;

(d)
The hearing shall be conducted by the juvenile court and shall include:

(i)
Opportunity to be heard in person and to present evidence;

(ii)
The right to confront and cross-examine all adverse witnesses;

(iii)
A written statement by the court as to the evidence relied on and the reasons
for termination, should that be the decision; and

(iv)
Demonstration by evidence that the divertee has substantially violated the
terms of his or her diversion agreement.

(e)
The prosecutor may file an information on the offense for which the divertee
was diverted:

(i)
In juvenile court if the divertee is under eighteen years of age; or

(ii)
In superior court or the appropriate court of limited jurisdiction if the
divertee is eighteen years of age or older.

(7)
The diversion unit shall, subject to available funds, be responsible for
providing interpreters when juveniles need interpreters to effectively
communicate during diversion unit hearings or negotiations.

(8)
The diversion unit shall be responsible for advising a divertee of his or her
rights as provided in this chapter.

(9)
The diversion unit may refer a juvenile to community-based counseling or
treatment programs.

(10)
The right to counsel shall inure prior to the initial interview for purposes of
advising the juvenile as to whether he or she desires to participate in the
diversion process or to appear in the juvenile court. The juvenile may be
represented by counsel at any critical stage of the diversion process,
including intake interviews and termination hearings. The juvenile shall be
fully advised at the intake of his or her right to an attorney and of the
relevant services an attorney can provide. For the purpose of this section,
intake interviews mean all interviews regarding the diversion agreement
process.

The
juvenile shall be advised that a diversion agreement shall constitute a part of
the juvenile's criminal history as defined by RCW 13.40.020(7). A signed
acknowledgment of such advisement shall be obtained from the juvenile, and the
document shall be maintained by the diversionary unit together with the
diversion agreement, and a copy of both documents shall be delivered to the
prosecutor if requested by the prosecutor. The supreme court shall promulgate
rules setting forth the content of such advisement in simple language.

(11)
When a juvenile enters into a diversion agreement, the juvenile court may
receive only the following information for dispositional purposes:

(a)
The fact that a charge or charges were made;

(b)
The fact that a diversion agreement was entered into;

(c)
The juvenile's obligations under such agreement;

(d)
Whether the alleged offender performed his or her obligations under such
agreement; and

(e)
The facts of the alleged offense.

(12)
A diversionary unit may refuse to enter into a diversion agreement with a
juvenile. When a diversionary unit refuses to enter a diversion agreement with
a juvenile, it shall immediately refer such juvenile to the court for action
and shall forward to the court the criminal complaint and a detailed statement
of its reasons for refusing to enter into a diversion agreement. The
diversionary unit shall also immediately refer the case to the prosecuting
attorney for action if such juvenile violates the terms of the diversion
agreement.

(13)
A diversionary unit may, in instances where it determines that the act or
omission of an act for which a juvenile has been referred to it involved no
victim, or where it determines that the juvenile referred to it has no prior
criminal history and is alleged to have committed an illegal act involving no
threat of or instance of actual physical harm and involving not more than fifty
dollars in property loss or damage and that there is no loss outstanding to the
person or firm suffering such damage or loss, counsel and release or release such
a juvenile without entering into a diversion agreement. A diversion unit's
authority to counsel and release a juvenile under this subsection shall include
the authority to refer the juvenile to community-based counseling or treatment
programs. Any juvenile released under this subsection shall be advised that
the act or omission of any act for which he or she had been referred shall
constitute a part of the juvenile's criminal history as defined by RCW
13.40.020(7). A signed acknowledgment of such advisement shall be obtained
from the juvenile, and the document shall be maintained by the unit, and a copy
of the document shall be delivered to the prosecutor if requested by the
prosecutor. The supreme court shall promulgate rules setting forth the content
of such advisement in simple language. A juvenile determined to be eligible by
a diversionary unit for release as provided in this subsection shall retain the
same right to counsel and right to have his or her case referred to the court
for formal action as any other juvenile referred to the unit.

(14)
A diversion unit may supervise the fulfillment of a diversion agreement entered
into before the juvenile's eighteenth birthday and which includes a period
extending beyond the divertee's eighteenth birthday.

(15)
If a fine required by a diversion agreement cannot reasonably be paid due to a
change of circumstance, the diversion agreement may be modified at the request
of the divertee and with the concurrence of the diversion unit to convert an
unpaid fine into community service. The modification of the diversion
agreement shall be in writing and signed by the divertee and the diversion
unit. The number of hours of community service in lieu of a monetary penalty
shall be converted at the rate of the prevailing state minimum wage per hour.

(16)
Fines imposed under this section shall be collected and paid into the county
general fund in accordance with procedures established by the juvenile court
administrator under RCW 13.04.040 and may be used only for juvenile services.
In the expenditure of funds for juvenile services, there shall be a maintenance
of effort whereby counties exhaust existing resources before using amounts
collected under this section.

Sec.
7. RCW
13.40.160 and 1999 c 91 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The standard range disposition for a juvenile adjudicated of an offense is
determined according to RCW 13.40.0357.

(a)
When the court sentences an offender to a local sanction as provided in RCW 13.40.0357
option A, the court shall impose a determinate disposition within the standard
ranges, except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section.
The disposition may be comprised of one or more local sanctions.

(b)
When the court sentences an offender to a standard range as provided in RCW
13.40.0357 option A that includes a term of confinement exceeding thirty days,
commitment shall be to the department for the standard range of confinement,
except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section.

(2)
If the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion, that disposition
within the standard range would effectuate a manifest injustice the court shall
impose a disposition outside the standard range, as indicated in option C of
RCW 13.40.0357. The court's finding of manifest injustice shall be supported
by clear and convincing evidence.

A
disposition outside the standard range shall be determinate and shall be
comprised of confinement or community supervision, or a combination thereof.
When a judge finds a manifest injustice and imposes a sentence of confinement
exceeding thirty days, the court shall sentence the juvenile to a maximum term,
and the provisions of RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used to determine the range. A
disposition outside the standard range is appealable under RCW 13.40.230 by the
state or the respondent. A disposition within the standard range is not
appealable under RCW 13.40.230.

(3)
When a juvenile offender is found to have committed a sex offense, other than a
sex offense that is also a serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030,
and has no history of a prior sex offense, the court, on its own motion or the
motion of the state or the respondent, may order an examination to determine whether
the respondent is amenable to treatment.

The
report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The
respondent's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
respondent's offense history, an assessment of problems in addition to alleged
deviant behaviors, the respondent's social, educational, and employment
situation, and other evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the
sources of the evaluator's information.

The
examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's amenability to
treatment and relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall
be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(a)(i)
Frequency and type of contact between the offender and therapist;

(ii)
Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and description of planned
treatment modalities;

(iii)
Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions,
lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or
others;

(iv)
Anticipated length of treatment; and

(v)
Recommended crime-related prohibitions.

The
court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a
second examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The defendant
shall pay the cost of any second examination ordered unless the court finds the
defendant to be indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

After
receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall then consider whether
the offender and the community will benefit from use of this special sex
offender disposition alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the
offender should receive a treatment disposition under this section. If the
court determines that this special sex offender disposition alternative is appropriate,
then the court shall impose a determinate disposition within the standard range
for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters reasons for its
conclusions, that such disposition would cause a manifest injustice, the court
shall impose a disposition under option C, and the court may suspend the
execution of the disposition and place the offender on community supervision
for at least two years. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court
may impose the conditions of community supervision and other conditions,
including up to thirty days of confinement and requirements that the offender
do any one or more of the following:

(b)(i)
Devote time to a specific education, employment, or occupation;

(ii)
Undergo available outpatient sex offender treatment for up to two years, or
inpatient sex offender treatment not to exceed the standard range of
confinement for that offense. A community mental health center may not be used
for such treatment unless it has an appropriate program designed for sex
offender treatment. The respondent shall not change sex offender treatment
providers or treatment conditions without first notifying the prosecutor, the
probation counselor, and the court, and shall not change providers without
court approval after a hearing if the prosecutor or probation counselor object
to the change;

(iii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
probation counselor prior to any change in the offender's address, educational
program, or employment;

(iv)
Report to the prosecutor and the probation counselor prior to any change in a
sex offender treatment provider. This change shall have prior approval by the
court;

(v)
Report as directed to the court and a probation counselor;

(vi)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations, perform community service,
or any combination thereof;

(vii)
Make restitution to the victim for the cost of any counseling reasonably
related to the offense; or

(viii)
Comply with the conditions of any court-ordered probation bond((; or

(ix))).

The
court shall inquire of any victim whether the victim wishes the entry of an
order that the offender not attend the public or approved elementary, middle,
or high school of the victim or the victim's siblings. If the victim indicates
his or her desire to have such an order entered, or upon the motion of the
prosecutor, the court shall order that the offender ((may)) not
attend the public or approved private elementary, middle, or high school
attended by the victim or the victim's siblings. The parents or legal
guardians of the offender are responsible for transportation or other costs
associated with the offender's change of school that would otherwise be paid by
the school district. The court shall send notice of the disposition and
restriction on attending the same school as the victim or victim's siblings to
the public or approved private school the juvenile will attend, if known, or if
unknown, to the approved private schools and the public school district board
of directors of the district in which the juvenile resides or intends to
reside. This notice must be sent at the earliest possible date but not later
than ten calendar days after entry of the disposition.

The
sex offender treatment provider shall submit quarterly reports on the
respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The reports
shall reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following:
Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment activities,
the respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other material
specified by the court at the time of the disposition.

At
the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the
court considers appropriate.

Except
as provided in this subsection (3), after July 1, 1991, examinations and
treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be conducted by sex
offender treatment providers certified by the department of health pursuant to
chapter 18.155 RCW. A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a juvenile
sex offender pursuant to this subsection does not have to be certified by the
department of health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court finds that:
(A) The offender has already moved to another state or plans to move to another
state for reasons other than circumventing the certification requirements; (B)
no certified providers are available for treatment within a reasonable
geographical distance of the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation and
treatment plan comply with this subsection (4) [(3)] and the rules adopted by
the department of health.

If
the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that
the respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court
may revoke the suspension and order execution of the disposition or the court
may impose a penalty of up to thirty days' confinement for violating conditions
of the disposition. The court may order both execution of the disposition and
up to thirty days' confinement for the violation of the conditions of the
disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time previously
served if that confinement was for the offense for which the suspension is
being revoked.

For
purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property
as a direct result of the crime charged. "Victim" may also include a
known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or
guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

A
disposition entered under this subsection (3) is not appealable under RCW
13.40.230.

(4)
If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local
sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+
offense, the court may impose the disposition alternative under RCW 13.40.165.

(5)
RCW 13.40.193 shall govern the disposition of any juvenile adjudicated of
possessing a firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040(1)(b)(iii) or any crime in
which a special finding is entered that the juvenile was armed with a firearm.

(6)
Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time spent in detention
prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional order shall specifically
state the number of days of credit for time served.

(7)
Except as provided under subsection (3) or (4) of this section or RCW
13.40.127, the court shall not suspend or defer the imposition or the execution
of the disposition.

(8) In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by the court
at disposition exceed that to which an adult could be subjected for the same
offense.

---
END ---