BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to ensure that long-term care facilities are
safe.

(1)
The long-term care resident and employee immunization act is intended to:

(a)
Prevent and reduce the occurrence and severity of the influenza virus and
pneumococcal disease by increasing the use of immunizations licensed by the
food and drug administration;

(b)
Avoid pain, suffering, and deaths that may result from the influenza virus and
pneumococcal disease;

(c)
Improve the well-being and quality of life of residents and employees of
long-term care facilities; and

(d)
Reduce avoidable costs associated with treating the influenza virus and
pneumococcal disease.

(2)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
Recent studies show that it is important to immunize older citizens against the
influenza virus and pneumococcal disease;

(b)
The centers for disease control and prevention recommend individuals over age
sixty-five receive immunizations against the influenza virus and pneumococcal
disease;

(c)
The influenza virus and pneumococcal disease have been identified as leading
causes of death for citizens over age sixty-five;

(d)
Immunizations licensed by the food and drug administration are readily
available and effective in reducing and preventing the severity of the
influenza virus and pneumococcal disease in people over age sixty-five;

(e)
All types of long-term care facilities operating in the state are appropriate
locations to improve immunization rates among residents over age sixty-five;
and

(f)
Employees of long-term care facilities should be immunized against influenza
and pneumococcal disease to prevent the spread of these diseases to the frail
and elderly residents of long-term care facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Documentation" means evidence from a person's physician or health
care provider in written format indicating the date and place when the
individual received the influenza virus immunization and the pneumococcal
pneumonia immunization.

(2)
"Long-term care facility" includes nursing homes licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW, boarding homes license under chapter 18.20 RCW, and adult
family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW.

(3)
"Medically contraindicated" means either that the influenza or
pneumococcal immunizations should not be administered to an individual because
of a condition that individual has that will be detrimental to the individual's
health if the individual receives either of the immunizations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Long-term care facilities shall:

(1)
Require that all employees and residents, unless otherwise exempted, have
current documentation of influenza virus and pneumococcal disease
immunization. If an individual is unable to provide current documentation of
immunization, the long-term care facility must provide access to the
immunization within thirty days;

(2)
Require that each resident, or the resident's legal guardian, upon admission to
a long-term care facility, provide informed consent for annual influenza virus
and pneumococcal disease immunization; and

(3)
Require that all residents and employees of long-term care facilities update
their immunizations by November 30th of each year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. All
residents and employees of long-term care facilities must be immunized as
required by this chapter unless:

(1)
The immunization is medically contraindicated, as described in the product
labeling approved by the food and drug administration; or

(2)
Receiving an immunization is against the individual's religious beliefs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Long-term care facilities that fail to comply with the terms of this chapter
are subject to the provisions of RCW 18.20.060, 18.51.060, or 70.128.100.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act shall be known and may be cited as the long-term care resident and employee
immunization act of 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---