BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The high technology industry is a major contributor to the economic prosperity
of Washington state. The legislature finds that industry must play a key role
in assisting and supporting state government and institutions of higher
education as Washington strives to enhance its current competitive advantage.
Institutions of higher education contribute to the success of Washington's high
technology economy in many ways. Continuing to strengthen the working
relationship between the high technology industry and the higher education
community is essential to our state's future.

(2)
Beginning in April 2000, the higher education coordinating board, the state
board for community and technical colleges, a representative of the Washington
software alliance, the American electronics association, and the Washington
biotechnology and biomedical association shall convene a work group in
consultation with the council of presidents and its member institutions, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the work force training and
education coordinating board, the Washington federation of private career
schools and colleges, the Washington association of independent colleges and
universities, representatives from the high technology industry, and other
higher education providers.

(3)
The work group shall (a) review the various needs of the high technology
industry and the roles of the various institutions of higher education in
meeting these needs, (b) establish priorities including but not limited to an
inventory of higher education high technology programs and offerings, (c) develop
strategies to address high technology needs, including employment demand and
other needs, and (d) develop an implementation plan for action by the
institutions of higher education and industry to enhance opportunities for
action by the state, institutions of higher education, and industry to better
meet these needs.

(4)
The conveners shall report to the fiscal and higher education committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2000, on progress made by the work group and any
recommendations ready at the time for short and long-term strategies.

(5) This section expires December 31, 2001.

---
END ---