BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
67.08.015 and 1999 c 282 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the interest of ensuring the safety and welfare of the participants, the
department shall have power and it shall be its duty to direct, supervise, and
control all boxing, martial arts, and wrestling events conducted within this
state and an event may not be held in this state except in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter. The department may, in its discretion, issue and
for cause, which includes concern for the safety and welfare of the
participants, deny, revoke, or suspend a license to promote, conduct, or
hold boxing, kickboxing, martial arts, or wrestling events where an admission
fee is charged by any person, club, corporation, organization, association, or
fraternal society.

(2)
All boxing, kickboxing, martial arts, or wrestling events that:

(a)
Are conducted by any common school, college, or university, whether public or
private, or by the official student association thereof, whether on or off the
school, college, or university grounds, where all the participating contestants
are bona fide students enrolled in any common school, college, or university,
within or without this state; or

(b)
Are entirely amateur events promoted on a nonprofit basis or for charitable
purposes;

are not
subject to the licensing provisions of this chapter. A boxing, martial arts,
kickboxing, or wrestling event may not be conducted within the state except
under a license issued in accordance with this chapter and the rules of the
department except as provided in this section.

(3) The director shall prohibit events unless all of the
contestants are either licensed under this chapter or trained by an amateur or
professional sanctioning body recognized by the department.

---
END ---