BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
state patrol highway account is abolished and all funds in it are transferred
to the motor vehicle fund.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.43.115 and 1993 c 438 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
real property owned by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of
the Washington state patrol is no longer required, it may be sold at fair
market value. All proceeds received from the sale of real property, less any
real estate broker commissions, shall be deposited into the ((state patrol
highway account)) motor vehicle fund: PROVIDED, That if accounts or
funds other than the ((state patrol highway account)) motor vehicle
fund have contributed to the purchase or improvement of the real property,
the office of financial management shall determine the proportional equity of
each account or fund in the property and improvements, and shall direct the
proceeds to be deposited proportionally therein.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 9, 1999 c 309 s 929, 1999 c 268 s 5, and 1999 c 94 s
4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal ((account)) fund, the volunteer fire fighters' ((relief))
and ((pension)) reserve officers' administrative ((account))
fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account,
the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, ((the state patrol
highway account,)) the transportation equipment fund, the transportation
fund, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.01.140 and 1996 c 315 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The county auditor, if appointed by the director of licensing shall carry out
the provisions of this title relating to the licensing of vehicles and the
issuance of vehicle license number plates under the direction and supervision
of the director and may with the approval of the director appoint assistants as
special deputies and recommend subagents to accept applications and collect
fees for vehicle licenses and transfers and to deliver vehicle license number
plates.

(2)
A county auditor appointed by the director may request that the director
appoint subagencies within the county. Upon authorization of the director, the
auditor shall advertise a request for proposals and use the process for
soliciting vendors under RCW 39.04.190(2), except that the provision requiring
the contract to be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder shall not apply.
The auditor shall submit all proposals to the director, and shall recommend the
appointment of one or more subagents who have applied through the request for
proposal process. The director has final appointment authority.

(3)(a)
A county auditor who is appointed as an agent by the department shall enter
into a standard contract provided by the director, developed with the advice of
the title and registration advisory committee.

(b)
A subagent appointed under subsection (2) of this section shall enter into a
standard contract with the county auditor, developed with the advice of the
title and registration advisory committee. The director shall provide the
standard contract to county auditors.

(c)
The contracts provided for in (a) and (b) of this subsection must contain at a
minimum provisions that:

(i)
Describe the responsibilities, and where applicable, the liability, of each
party relating to the service expectations and levels, equipment to be supplied
by the department, and equipment maintenance;

(ii)
Require the specific type of insurance or bonds so that the state is protected
against any loss of collected motor vehicle tax revenues or loss of equipment;

(iii)
Specify the amount of training that will be provided by the state, the county
auditor, or subagents;

(iv)
Describe allowable costs that may be charged to vehicle licensing activities as
provided for in (d) of this subsection;

(v)
Describe the causes and procedures for termination of the contract, which may
include mediation and binding arbitration.

(d)
The department shall develop procedures that will standardize and prescribe
allowable costs that may be assigned to vehicle licensing and vessel
registration and title activities performed by county auditors.

(e)
The contracts may include any provision that the director deems necessary to
ensure acceptable service and the full collection of vehicle and vessel tax
revenues.

(f)
The director may waive any provisions of the contract deemed necessary in order
to ensure that readily accessible service is provided to the citizens of the
state.

(4)(a)
At any time any application is made to the director, the county auditor, or
other agent pursuant to any law dealing with licenses, registration, or the
right to operate any vehicle or vessel upon the public highways or waters of
this state, excluding applicants already paying such fee under RCW 46.16.070 or
46.16.085, the applicant shall pay to the director, county auditor, or other
agent a fee of three dollars for each application in addition to any other fees
required by law.

(b)
Counties that do not cover the expenses of vehicle licensing and vessel
registration and title activities may submit to the department a request for
cost-coverage moneys. The request must be submitted on a form developed by the
department. The department shall develop procedures to verify whether a
request is reasonable. Payment shall be made on requests found to be allowable
from the licensing services account.

(c)
Applicants for certificates of ownership, including applicants paying fees
under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085, shall pay to the director, county auditor, or
other agent a fee of four dollars in addition to any other fees required by
law.

(d)
The fees under (a) and (c) of this subsection, if paid to the county auditor as
agent of the director, or if paid to a subagent of the county auditor, shall be
paid to the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the
county auditor and credited to the county current expense fund. If the fee is
paid to another agent of the director, the fee shall be used by the agent to
defray his or her expenses in handling the application.

(5)
A subagent shall collect a service fee of (a) seven dollars and fifty cents for
changes in a certificate of ownership, with or without registration renewal, or
verification of record and preparation of an affidavit of lost title other than
at the time of the title application or transfer and (b) three dollars for
registration renewal only, issuing a transit permit, or any other service under
this section.

(6)
If the fee is collected by the state patrol as agent for the director, the fee
so collected shall be certified to the state treasurer and deposited to the
credit of the ((state patrol highway account)) motor vehicle fund.
If the fee is collected by the department of transportation as agent for the
director, the fee shall be certified to the state treasurer and deposited to
the credit of the motor vehicle fund. All such fees collected by the director
or branches of his office shall be certified to the state treasurer and
deposited to the credit of the highway safety fund.

(7)
Any county revenues that exceed the cost of providing vehicle licensing and
vessel registration and title activities in a county, calculated in accordance
with the procedures in subsection (3)(d) of this section, shall be expended as
determined by the county legislative authority during the process established
by law for adoption of county budgets.

(8)
The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec.
5. RCW
46.16.010 and 1999 c 277 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is a violation for a person to operate any vehicle over and along a public
highway of this state without first having obtained and having in full force
and effect a current and proper vehicle license and display vehicle license
number plates therefor as by this chapter provided.

(a)
Failure to make initial registration of a vehicle before operating it on the
highways of this state is a violation of this section. Anyone who violates
this section is liable for a penalty of three hundred fifty dollars for each
violation in addition to all other penalties provided by law. Persons
violating this subsection shall make payment as prescribed in subsection (2)(b)
of this section.

(b)
Failure to renew an expired registration before operation on the highways of
this state is a traffic infraction, which shall not be resolved through the
civil process instituted under this section.

(2)(a)
The licensing of a vehicle in another state by a resident of this state, as
defined in RCW 46.16.028, to avoid the payment of any tax or license fee
imposed in connection with registration, is a violation of this section, and
violators are liable for a monetary penalty not less than one thousand dollars
but not more than ten thousand dollars for each violation.

(b)
The penalty provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section and this subsection
is due and payable when the person incurring it receives a notice in writing
from the state patrol describing the violation and advising the person that the
penalty is due. The state patrol may, upon written application for review,
received within fifteen days, remit or mitigate a penalty provided for in this
section or discontinue an action to recover the penalty upon such terms it
deems proper and may ascertain the facts in a manner and under rules it deems
proper. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the state patrol within
fifteen days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty, or application
for remission or mitigation has not been made within fifteen days after the
violator has received notice of the disposition of the application, the
attorney general shall bring an action in the name of the state of Washington
in the superior court of Thurston county or of any other county in which the
violator resides or does business, to recover the penalty, administrative fees,
and attorneys' fees and costs incurred in recovering the penalties. All
penalties recovered under this section shall be paid into the state treasury
and credited to the ((state patrol highway account of the)) motor
vehicle fund ((for the license fraud task force)).

(c)
The avoided taxes and fees shall be deposited and distributed in the same
manner as if the taxes and fees were properly paid in a timely fashion.

(3)
These provisions shall not apply to the following vehicles:

(a)
Electric-assisted bicycles;

(b)
Farm vehicles if operated within a radius of fifteen miles of the farm where
principally used or garaged, farm tractors and farm implements including
trailers designed as cook or bunk houses used exclusively for animal herding
temporarily operating or drawn upon the public highways, and trailers used
exclusively to transport farm implements from one farm to another during the
daylight hours or at night when such equipment has lights that comply with the
law;

(c)
Spray or fertilizer applicator rigs designed and used exclusively for spraying
or fertilization in the conduct of agricultural operations and not primarily
for the purpose of transportation, and nurse rigs or equipment auxiliary to the
use of and designed or modified for the fueling, repairing, or loading of spray
and fertilizer applicator rigs and not used, designed, or modified primarily for
the purpose of transportation;

(d)
Fork lifts operated during daylight hours on public highways adjacent to and
within five hundred feet of the warehouses which they serve: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That these provisions shall not apply to vehicles used by the state parks and
recreation commission exclusively for park maintenance and operations upon
public highways within state parks;

(e)
"Special highway construction equipment" defined as follows: Any
vehicle which is designed and used primarily for grading of highways, paving of
highways, earth moving, and other construction work on highways and which is
not designed or used primarily for the transportation of persons or property on
a public highway and which is only incidentally operated or moved over the highway.
It includes, but is not limited to, road construction and maintenance machinery
so designed and used such as portable air compressors, air drills, asphalt
spreaders, bituminous mixers, bucket loaders, track laying tractors, ditchers,
leveling graders, finishing machines, motor graders, paving mixers, road
rollers, scarifiers, earth moving scrapers and carryalls, lighting plants,
welders, pumps, power shovels and draglines, self-propelled and tractor-drawn
earth moving equipment and machinery, including dump trucks and tractor-dump
trailer combinations which either (i) are in excess of the legal width, or (ii)
which, because of their length, height, or unladen weight, may not be moved on
a public highway without the permit specified in RCW 46.44.090 and which are
not operated laden except within the boundaries of the project limits as
defined by the contract, and other similar types of construction equipment, or
(iii) which are driven or moved upon a public highway only for the purpose of
crossing such highway from one property to another, provided such movement does
not exceed five hundred feet and the vehicle is equipped with wheels or pads
which will not damage the roadway surface.

Exclusions:

"Special
highway construction equipment" does not include any of the following:

Dump
trucks originally designed to comply with the legal size and weight provisions
of this code notwithstanding any subsequent modification which would require a
permit, as specified in RCW 46.44.090, to operate such vehicles on a public
highway, including trailers, truck-mounted transit mixers, cranes and shovels,
or other vehicles designed for the transportation of persons or property to
which machinery has been attached.

(4)
The following vehicles, whether operated solo or in combination, are exempt
from license registration and displaying license plates as required by this
chapter:

(a)
A converter gear used to convert a semitrailer into a trailer or a two-axle
truck or tractor into a three or more axle truck or tractor or used in any
other manner to increase the number of axles of a vehicle. Converter gear
includes an auxiliary axle, booster axle, dolly, and jeep axle.

(b)
A tow dolly that is used for towing a motor vehicle behind another motor
vehicle. The front or rear wheels of the towed vehicle are secured to and rest
on the tow dolly that is attached to the towing vehicle by a tow bar.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.32.090 and 1996 c 86 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall collect a fee of ten dollars, in addition to all other fees
and taxes, for each motor vehicle base plated in the state of Washington that
is subject to highway inspections and terminal audits under RCW 46.32.080, at
the time of registration and renewal of registration under chapter 46.16 or
46.87 RCW, or the International Registration Plan if based [base] plated in a
foreign jurisdiction. The ten-dollar fee must be apportioned for those
vehicles operating interstate and registered under the International
Registration Plan. This fee does not apply to nonmotor-powered vehicles,
including trailers. Refunds will not be provided for fees paid under this
section when the vehicle is no longer subject to RCW 46.32.080. The department
may deduct an amount equal to the cost of administering the program. All
remaining fees shall be deposited with the state treasurer and credited to the
((state patrol highway account of the)) motor vehicle fund.

Sec.
7. RCW
46.32.100 and 1998 c 172 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to all other penalties provided by law, a commercial motor vehicle
that is subject to terminal safety audits under this chapter and an officer,
agent, or employee of a company operating a commercial motor vehicle who
violates or who procures, aids, or abets in the violation of this title or any
order or rule of the state patrol is liable for a penalty of one hundred
dollars for each violation, except for each violation of 49 C.F.R. Pt. 382,
controlled substances and alcohol use and testing, 49 C.F.R. Sec. 391.15,
disqualification of drivers, and 49 C.F.R. Sec. 396.9(c)(2), moving a vehicle
placed out of service before the out of service defects have been satisfactorily
repaired, for which the person is liable for a penalty of five hundred
dollars. Each violation is a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a
continuing violation every day's continuance is a separate and distinct
violation.

The penalty provided in this section is due and payable when the
person incurring it receives a notice in writing from the patrol describing the
violation and advising the person that the penalty is due. The patrol may,
upon written application for review, received within fifteen days, remit or
mitigate a penalty provided for in this section or discontinue a prosecution to
recover the penalty upon such terms it deems proper and may ascertain the facts
upon all such applications in such manner and under such rules as it deems
proper. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the patrol within fifteen
days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty, or application for
remission or mitigation has not been made within fifteen days after the
violator has received notice of the disposition of the application, the
attorney general shall bring an action in the name of the state of Washington
in the superior court of Thurston county or of some other county in which the
violator does business, to recover the penalty. In all such actions the
procedure and rules of evidence are the same as an ordinary civil action except
as otherwise provided in this chapter. All penalties recovered under this
section shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the ((state
patrol highway account of the)) motor vehicle fund.

Sec.
8. RCW
46.61.5054 and 1995 c 398 s 15 and 1995 c 332 s 13 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
In addition to penalties set forth in ((RCW 46.61.5051 through 46.61.5053
until September 1, 1995, and)) RCW 46.61.5055 ((thereafter)), a one
hundred twenty-five dollar fee shall be assessed to a person who is either
convicted, sentenced to a lesser charge, or given deferred prosecution, as a
result of an arrest for violating RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.61.520, or
46.61.522. This fee is for the purpose of funding the Washington state
toxicology laboratory and the Washington state patrol for grants and activities
to increase the conviction rate and decrease the incidence of persons driving
under the influence of alcohol or drugs.

(b)
Upon a verified petition by the person assessed the fee, the court may suspend
payment of all or part of the fee if it finds that the person does not have the
ability to pay.

(c)
When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender for an offense which, if
committed by an adult, would constitute a violation of RCW 46.61.502,
46.61.504, 46.61.520, or 46.61.522, the court shall assess the one hundred
twenty-five dollar fee under (a) of this subsection. Upon a verified petition
by a minor assessed the fee, the court may suspend payment of all or part of
the fee if it finds that the minor does not have the ability to pay the fee.

(2)
The fee assessed under subsection (1) of this section shall be collected by the
clerk of the court and distributed as follows:

(a)
Forty percent shall be subject to distribution under RCW 3.46.120, 3.50.100,
35.20.220, 3.62.020, 3.62.040, or 10.82.070.

(b)
The remainder of the fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer who shall,
through June 30, 1997, deposit: Fifty percent in the death investigations'
account to be used solely for funding the state toxicology laboratory blood or
breath testing programs; and fifty percent in the ((state patrol highway
account)) motor vehicle fund to be used solely for funding
activities to increase the conviction rate and decrease the incidence of
persons driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs. Effective July 1,
1997, the remainder of the fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer who
shall deposit: Fifteen percent in the death investigations' account to be used
solely for funding the state toxicology laboratory blood or breath testing
programs; and eighty-five percent in the ((state patrol highway account))
motor vehicle fund to be used solely for funding activities to increase
the conviction rate and decrease the incidence of persons driving under the
influence of alcohol or drugs.

(3)
This section applies to any offense committed on or after July 1, 1993.

Sec.
9. RCW
46.68.030 and 1990 c 42 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
for proceeds from fees for vehicle licensing for vehicles paying such fees
under RCW 46.16.070 and 46.16.085, and as otherwise provided for in chapter
46.16 RCW, all fees received by the director for vehicle licenses under the
provisions of chapter 46.16 RCW shall be forwarded to the state treasurer,
accompanied by a proper identifying detailed report, and be deposited to the
credit of the motor vehicle fund, except that the proceeds from the vehicle
license fee and renewal license fee shall be deposited by the state treasurer
as hereinafter provided. After ((July 1, 1981, that portion)) January
1, 2000, $20.35 of each vehicle license fee ((in excess of $7.40 and
that portion)) and $20.35 of each renewal license fee ((in excess
of $3.40)) shall be deposited in the state patrol highway account in the
motor vehicle fund, hereby created. Vehicle license fees, renewal license
fees, and all other funds in the state patrol highway account shall be for the
sole use of the Washington state patrol for highway activities of the
Washington state patrol, subject to proper appropriations and reappropriations
therefor, for any fiscal biennium after June 30, 1981, and twenty-seven and
three-tenths percent of the proceeds from $7.40 of each vehicle license fee and
$3.40 of each renewal license fee shall be deposited each biennium in the Puget
Sound ferry operations account. Any remaining amounts of vehicle license fees
and renewal license fees that are not deposited in the Puget Sound ferry
operations account shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

Sec.
10. RCW
46.68.035 and 1993 c 102 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

All
proceeds from combined vehicle licensing fees received by the director for
vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 and 46.16.085 shall be forwarded to the
state treasurer to be distributed into accounts according to the following
method:

(1)
The sum of two dollars for each vehicle shall be deposited into the ((highway
safety)) multimodal fund, except that for each vehicle registered by
a county auditor or agent to a county auditor pursuant to RCW 46.01.140, the
sum of two dollars shall be credited to the current county expense fund.

(2)
The remainder shall be distributed as follows:

(a)
((23.677 percent shall be deposited into the state patrol highway account of
the motor vehicle fund;

(b)))
1.521 percent shall be deposited into the Puget Sound ferry operations account
of the motor vehicle fund; and

(((c)))
(b) The remaining proceeds shall be deposited into the motor vehicle
fund.

Sec.
11. RCW
47.68.255 and 1999 c 277 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person who is required to register an aircraft under this chapter and who
registers an aircraft in another state or foreign country avoiding the
Washington aircraft taxes, commits a violation of this section and is liable
for those unpaid taxes and for a monetary penalty not less than one thousand
dollars but not more than ten thousand dollars for each violation.

(2)
The penalty provided in this section is due and payable when the person
incurring it receives a notice in writing from the state patrol describing the
violation and advising the person that the penalty is due. The state patrol
may, upon written application for review, received within fifteen days, remit
or mitigate a penalty provided for in this section or discontinue an action to
recover the penalty upon such terms it deems proper and may ascertain the facts
in a manner and under rules it deems proper. If the amount of the penalty is
not paid to the state patrol within fifteen days after receipt of the notice
imposing the penalty, or application for remission or mitigation has not been
made within fifteen days after the violator has received notice of the
disposition of the application, the attorney general shall bring an action in
the name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston county or
of any other county in which the violator does business, to recover the
penalty, administrative fees, and attorneys' fees. All penalties recovered
under this section shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the ((state
patrol highway account of the)) motor vehicle fund ((for the license
fraud task force)). The department of revenue may assess and collect the
unpaid excise tax under chapter 82.32 RCW, including the penalties and interest
provided in chapter 82.32 RCW.

Sec.
12. RCW
63.35.040 and 1989 c 222 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
moneys arising from sales under the provisions of this chapter shall be first
applied to the payment of the costs and expenses of the sale and then to the
payment of lawful charges and expenses for the keep of said personal property
and the balance, if any, shall be forwarded to the state treasurer to be
deposited into the ((state patrol highway account)) motor vehicle
fund.

Sec.
13. RCW
63.35.050 and 1989 c 222 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the owner of said personal property so sold, or the owner's legal
representative, shall, at any time within three years after such money shall
have been deposited in the ((state patrol highway account)) motor
vehicle fund, furnish satisfactory evidence to the state treasurer of the
ownership of said personal property, the owner or the owner's legal
representative shall be entitled to receive from ((said state patrol highway
account)) the motor vehicle fund the amount so deposited therein
with interest.

Sec.
14. RCW
82.48.020 and 1999 c 277 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An annual excise tax is hereby imposed for the privilege of using any aircraft
in the state. A current certificate of air worthiness with a current inspection
date from the appropriate federal agency and/or the purchase of aviation fuel
shall constitute the necessary evidence of aircraft use or intended use. The
tax shall be collected annually or under a staggered collection schedule as
required by the secretary by rule. No additional tax shall be imposed under
this chapter upon any aircraft upon the transfer of ownership thereof, if the
tax imposed by this chapter with respect to such aircraft has already been paid
for the year in which transfer of ownership occurs. A violation of this
subsection is a misdemeanor punishable as provided under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2)(a)
Persons who are required to register aircraft under chapter 47.68 RCW and who
register aircraft in another state or foreign country and avoid the Washington
aircraft taxes, violate this section and are liable for a monetary penalty of
not less than one thousand dollars but not more than ten thousand dollars for
each violation.

(b)
The penalty provided in this section is due and payable when the person
incurring it receives a notice in writing from the state patrol describing the
violation and advising the person that the penalty is due. The state patrol
may, upon written application for review, received within fifteen days, remit
or mitigate a penalty provided for in this section or discontinue an action to
recover the penalty upon such terms it deems proper and may ascertain the facts
in a manner and under rules it deems proper. If the amount of the penalty is
not paid to the state patrol within fifteen days after receipt of the notice
imposing the penalty, or application for remission or mitigation has not been
made within fifteen days after the violator has received notice of the
disposition of the application, the attorney general shall bring an action in
the name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston county or
of any other county in which the violator resides or does business, to recover
the penalty, administrative fees, and attorneys' fees. In all such actions,
the procedure and rules of evidence are the same as an ordinary civil action
except as otherwise provided in this chapter. All penalties recovered under
this section shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the ((state
patrol highway account of the)) motor vehicle fund ((for the license
fraud task force)).

(3)
The department of revenue may assess and collect the unpaid excise tax under
chapter 82.32 RCW, including the penalties and interest provided in chapter
82.32 RCW.

(4)
Except as provided under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a violation
of this chapter is a misdemeanor punishable as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec.
15. RCW
82.49.010 and 1999 c 277 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An excise tax is imposed for the privilege of using a vessel upon the waters of
this state, except vessels exempt under RCW 82.49.020. The annual amount of
the excise tax is one-half of one percent of fair market value, as determined
under this chapter, or five dollars, whichever is greater. Violation of this
subsection is a misdemeanor.

(2)(a)
A person who is required under chapter 88.02 RCW to register a vessel in this
state and who registers the vessel in another state or foreign country and
avoids the Washington watercraft taxes, violates this section and is liable for
those taxes and a monetary penalty not less than one thousand dollars but not
more than ten thousand dollars for each violation.

(b)
The penalty provided in this section is due and payable when the person
incurring it receives a notice in writing from the state patrol describing the
violation and advising the person that the penalty is due. The state patrol
may, upon written application for review, received within fifteen days, remit or
mitigate a penalty provided for in this section or discontinue an action to
recover the penalty upon such terms it deems proper and may ascertain the facts
in a manner and under rules it deems proper. If the amount of the penalty is
not paid to the state patrol within fifteen days after receipt of the notice
imposing the penalty, or application for remission or mitigation has not been
made within fifteen days after the violator has received notice of the
disposition of the application, the attorney general shall bring an action in
the name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston county or
of any other county in which the violator resides or does business, to recover
the penalty, administrative fees, and attorneys' fees. All penalties recovered
under this section shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the ((state
patrol highway account of the)) motor vehicle fund ((for the license
fraud task force)).

(3)
The excise tax upon a vessel registered for the first time in this state shall
be imposed for a twelve-month period, including the month in which the vessel
is registered, unless the director of licensing extends or diminishes vessel
registration periods for the purpose of staggered renewal periods under RCW
88.02.050. A vessel is registered for the first time in this state when the
vessel was not registered in this state for the immediately preceding
registration year, or when the vessel was registered in another jurisdiction
for the immediately preceding year. The excise tax on vessels required to be
registered in this state on June 30, 1983, shall be paid by June 30, 1983.

Sec.
16. RCW
88.02.118 and 1999 c 277 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
It is a violation for any person owning a vessel subject to taxation under
chapter 82.49 RCW to register a vessel in another state to avoid Washington
state vessel taxes required under chapter 82.49 RCW or to obtain a vessel
dealer's registration for the purpose of avoiding taxes on vessels under
chapter 82.49 RCW.

(b)
The monetary penalty is not less than one thousand dollars but not more than
ten thousand dollars for each violation.

(2)
The penalty provided in this section is due and payable when the person
incurring it receives a notice in writing from the state patrol describing the
violation and advising the person that the penalty is due. The state patrol
may, upon written application for review, received within fifteen days, remit
or mitigate a penalty provided for in this section or discontinue an action to
recover the penalty upon such terms it deems proper and may ascertain the facts
in a manner and under rules it deems proper. If the amount of the penalty is
not paid to the state patrol within fifteen days after receipt of the notice
imposing the penalty, or application for remission or mitigation has not been
made within fifteen days after the violator has received notice of the
disposition of the application, the attorney general shall bring an action in
the name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston county or
of any other county in which the violator resides or does business, to recover
the penalty, administrative fees, and attorneys' fees. In all such actions,
the procedure and rules of evidence are the same as an ordinary civil action
except as otherwise provided in this chapter. All penalties recovered under
this section shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the ((state
patrol highway account of the)) motor vehicle fund ((for the license
fraud task force)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17.
Section 9 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, is remedial in nature, and takes effect retroactively as
of January 1, 2000. The remainder of this act takes effect July 1, 2001.

---
END ---