BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.68.030 and 1990 c 42 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
for proceeds from fees for vehicle licensing for vehicles paying such fees
under RCW 46.16.070 and 46.16.085, and as otherwise provided for in chapter
46.16 RCW, all fees received by the director for vehicle licenses under the
provisions of chapter 46.16 RCW shall be forwarded to the state treasurer,
accompanied by a proper identifying detailed report, and be deposited to the
credit of the motor vehicle fund, except that the proceeds from the vehicle
license fee and renewal license fee shall be deposited by the state treasurer
as hereinafter provided. After ((July 1, 1981, that portion)) January
1, 2000, $20.35 of each vehicle license fee ((in excess of $7.40 and
that portion)) and $20.35 of each renewal license fee ((in excess
of $3.40)) shall be deposited in the state patrol highway account in the
motor vehicle fund, hereby created. Vehicle license fees, renewal license
fees, and all other funds in the state patrol highway account shall be for the
sole use of the Washington state patrol for highway activities of the
Washington state patrol, subject to proper appropriations and reappropriations
therefor, for any fiscal biennium after June 30, 1981, and twenty-seven and
three-tenths percent of the proceeds from $7.40 of each vehicle license fee and
$3.40 of each renewal license fee shall be deposited each biennium in the Puget
Sound ferry operations account. Any remaining amounts of vehicle license fees
and renewal license fees that are not deposited in the Puget Sound ferry
operations account shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, is remedial in nature, and takes effect retroactively as of
January 1, 2000.

---
END ---