BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
multimodal fund is created in the state treasury.

Moneys
in the fund may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the fund
may be used only for transportation purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act is a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---