BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
67.70.040 and 1994 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall have the power, and it shall be its duty:

(1)
To promulgate such rules governing the establishment and operation of a state
lottery as it deems necessary and desirable in order that such a lottery be
initiated at the earliest feasible and practicable time, and in order that such
lottery produce the maximum amount of net revenues for the state consonant with
the dignity of the state and the general welfare of the people. Such rules
shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(a)
The type of lottery to be conducted which may include the selling of tickets or
shares. The use of electronic or mechanical devices or video terminals which
allow for individual play against such devices or terminals shall be
prohibited. Approval of the legislature shall be required before entering any
agreement with other state lotteries to conduct shared games;

(b)
The price, or prices, of tickets or shares in the lottery;

(c)
The numbers and sizes of the prizes on the winning tickets or shares;

(d)
The manner of selecting the winning tickets or shares;

(e)
The manner and time of payment of prizes to the holder of winning tickets or
shares which, at the director's option, may be paid in lump sum amounts or
installments over a period of years;

(f)
The frequency of the drawings or selections of winning tickets or shares.
Approval of the legislature is required before conducting any on-line game in
which the drawing or selection of winning tickets occurs more frequently than
once every twenty-four hours;

(g)
Without limit as to number, the type or types of locations at which tickets or
shares may be sold;

(h)
The method to be used in selling tickets or shares;

(i)
The licensing of agents to sell or distribute tickets or shares, except that a
person under the age of eighteen shall not be licensed as an agent;

(j)
The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid licensed sales agents
necessary to provide for the adequate availability of tickets or shares to
prospective buyers and for the convenience of the public;

(k)
The apportionment of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery
tickets or shares and from all other sources among: (i) The payment of prizes
to the holders of winning tickets or shares, which shall not be less than
forty-five percent of the gross annual revenue from such lottery, (ii)
transfers to the lottery administrative account created by RCW 67.70.260, and
(iii) transfer to the ((state's general fund)) common school
construction fund and the institutions of higher education construction
account. Of the amounts apportioned under this subsection (1)(k)(iii), seventy
percent shall be transferred to the common school construction fund and thirty
percent shall be transferred to the institutions of higher education
construction account. Transfers to the ((state general fund)) common
school construction fund and the institutions of higher education construction
account shall be made in compliance with RCW 43.01.050;

(l)
Such other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and economical
operation and administration of the lottery and for the convenience of the
purchasers of tickets or shares and the holders of winning tickets or shares.

(2)
To ensure that in each place authorized to sell lottery tickets or shares, on
the back of the ticket or share, and in any advertising or promotion there
shall be conspicuously displayed an estimate of the probability of purchasing a
winning ticket.

(3)
To amend, repeal, or supplement any such rules from time to time as it deems
necessary or desirable.

(4) To advise and make recommendations to the director for the
operation and administration of the lottery.

Sec.
2. RCW
67.70.240 and 1997 c 220 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

The
moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:

(1)
For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery tickets or shares;

(2)
For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account created by RCW
67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account created by RCW 67.70.260;

(3)
For purposes of making deposits into the ((state's general fund)) common
school construction fund and the institutions of higher education construction
account;

(4)
For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs. Three million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during calendar year 1996. During subsequent years, such
distributions shall equal the prior year's distributions increased by four
percent. Distributions under this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued
for the construction of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than
twenty years after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;

(5)
For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account, created in RCW
43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW 43.99N.070, six million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during the calendar year 1998.
During subsequent years, such distribution shall equal the prior year's
distributions increased by four percent. No distribution may be made under
this subsection after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of
the bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this subsection
shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than December 31, 2020;

(6)
For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and

(7)
For the payment of agent compensation.

The
office of financial management shall require the allotment of all expenses paid
from the account and shall report to the ways and means committees of the
senate and house of representatives any changes in the allotments.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

The
institutions of higher education construction account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from lottery revenues must be deposited in the account
as provided in RCW 67.70.040. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account shall be used exclusively for
financing the construction of facilities for the state institutions of higher
education.

Sec.
4. RCW
39.42.060 and 1999 c 273 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

No
bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness for borrowed money shall be
issued by the state which will cause the aggregate debt contracted by the state
to exceed that amount for which payments of principal and interest in any
fiscal year would require the state to expend more than seven percent of the
arithmetic mean of its general state revenues, as ((defined in section 1(c)
of Article VIII of the Washington state Constitution)) determined under
RCW 39.42.070 for the three immediately preceding fiscal years as certified
by the treasurer in accordance with RCW 39.42.070. It shall be the duty of the
state finance committee to compute annually the amount required to pay
principal of and interest on outstanding debt. In making such computation, the
state finance committee shall include all borrowed money represented by bonds,
notes, or other evidences of indebtedness which are secured by the full faith
and credit of the state or are required to be paid, directly or indirectly,
from general state revenues and which are incurred by the state, any
department, authority, public corporation or quasi public corporation of the
state, any state university or college, or any other public agency created by
the state but not by counties, cities, towns, school districts, or other
municipal corporations, and shall include debt incurred pursuant to section 3
of Article VIII of the Washington state Constitution, but shall exclude the
following:

(1)
Obligations for the payment of current expenses of state government;

(2)
Indebtedness incurred pursuant to RCW 39.42.080 or 39.42.090;

(3)
Principal of and interest on bond anticipation notes;

(4)
Any indebtedness which has been refunded;

(5)
Financing contracts entered into under chapter 39.94 RCW;

(6)
Indebtedness authorized or incurred before July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute
which requires that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the
principal of and the interest on such indebtedness, from money other than
general state revenues or from the special excise tax imposed pursuant to
chapter 67.40 RCW;

(7)
Indebtedness authorized and incurred after July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute
that requires that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the
principal of and the interest on such indebtedness, from (a) moneys outside the
state treasury, except higher education operating fees, (b) higher education
building fees, (c) indirect costs recovered from federal grants and contracts,
and (d) fees and charges associated with hospitals operated or managed by
institutions of higher education;

(8)
Any agreement, promissory note, or other instrument entered into by the state
finance committee under RCW 39.42.030 in connection with its acquisition of
bond insurance, letters of credit, or other credit support instruments for the
purpose of guaranteeing the payment or enhancing the marketability, or both, of
any state bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness;

(9)
Indebtedness incurred for the purposes identified in RCW 43.99N.020; and

(10)
Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of the school district bond guaranty
established by chapter 39.98 RCW.

To
the extent necessary because of the constitutional or statutory debt
limitation, priorities with respect to the issuance or guaranteeing of bonds,
notes, or other evidences of indebtedness by the state shall be determined by
the state finance committee.

Sec.
5. RCW
39.42.070 and 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

((On
or after the effective date of this act,)) The treasurer shall
compute general state revenues for the three fiscal years immediately preceding
such date and shall determine the arithmetic mean thereof. As soon as is
practicable after the close of each fiscal year thereafter, he shall do likewise.
In determining the amount of general state revenues, the treasurer shall
include all state money received in the treasury from each and every source
whatsoever except: (1) fees and revenues derived from the ownership or
operation of any undertaking, facility or project; (2) moneys received as
gifts, grants, donations, aid or assistance or otherwise from the United States
or any department, bureau or corporation thereof, or any person, firm or
corporation, public or private, when the terms and conditions of such gift,
grant, donation, aid or assistance require the application and disbursement of
such moneys otherwise than for the general purposes of the state of Washington;
(3) moneys to be paid into and received from retirement system funds, and performance
bonds and deposits; (4) moneys to be paid into and received from trust funds
including but not limited to moneys received from taxes levied for specific
purposes, under the lottery revenues, and the several permanent and
irreducible funds of the state and the moneys derived therefrom but excluding
bond redemption funds; (5) proceeds received from the sale of bonds or other
evidences of indebtedness. Upon computing general state revenues, the
treasurer shall make and file in the office of the secretary of state, a
certificate containing the results of such computations. Copies of said
certificate shall be sent to each elected official of the state and each member
of the legislature. The treasurer shall, at the same time, advise each elected
official and each member of the legislature of the current available debt
capacity of the state, and may make estimated projections for one or more years
concerning debt capacity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

RCW
43.135.035(4) does not apply to sections 1 and 2, chapter . . ., Laws
of 2000 (sections 1 and 2 of this act).

Sec.
7. RCW
39.12.020 and 1989 c 12 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics, upon all public
works and under all public building service maintenance contracts of the state
or any county, municipality or political subdivision created by its laws, shall
be not less than the prevailing rate of wage for an hour's work in the same
trade or occupation in the locality within the state where such labor is
performed. For a contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, a contractor
required to pay the prevailing rate of wage shall post in a location readily
visible to workers at the job site: PROVIDED, That on road construction, sewer
line, pipeline, transmission line, street, or alley improvement projects for
which no field office is needed or established, a contractor may post the
prevailing rate of wage statement at the contractor's local office, gravel
crushing, concrete, or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a
copy of the wage statement to any employee on request:

(1)
A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages approved by the
industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries under RCW
39.12.040; and

(2)
The address and telephone number of the industrial statistician of the
department of labor and industries where a complaint or inquiry concerning
prevailing wages may be made.

This
chapter shall not apply to workers or other persons regularly employed on
monthly or per diem salary by the state, or any county, municipality, or
political subdivision created by its laws. This chapter also shall not
apply to the renovation or construction of common schools in the state or state
higher education facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---