BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
51.28.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
any accident occurs to any worker, or an occupational disease is contracted
by a worker in the course of his or her employment that requires treatment by a
physician, it ((shall be)) is the duty of such worker or
someone in his or her behalf to forthwith report such accident or
occupational disease to his or her employer, superintendent, or
foreman or forewoman in charge of the work((, and of the employer to at once
report such accident and the injury resulting therefrom to the department
pursuant to RCW 51.28.025, as now or hereafter amended, where the worker has
received treatment from a physician, has been hospitalized, disabled from work,
or has died as the apparent result of such accident and injury.

Upon
receipt of such notice of accident, the department shall immediately forward to
the worker or his or her beneficiaries or dependents notification, in
nontechnical language, of their rights under this title)).

Sec.
2. RCW
51.28.020 and 1984 c 159 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

((Where))
(1)(a) A worker ((is entitled to compensation)) claiming
benefits under this title ((he or she shall)) must file a
written application for benefits with the department or ((his or her
self-insuring)) the employer((, as the case may be, his or her
application for such, together with the)). The application for benefits
must contain sufficient information to provide the department or employer with
notice that the worker sustained an industrial injury or contracted an
occupational disease, and that benefits are claimed under this title. The
department, by rule, may require the worker to sign or otherwise verify the
information provided in the application.

(b)
In addition to the application for benefits, the worker shall file with the
department or employer a certificate of the physician who attended him or
her((, and it shall be)). It is the duty of the physician to
inform the injured worker of his or her rights under this title and to lend all
necessary assistance in making this application for compensation and such proof
of other matters as required by the rules of the department without charge to
the worker. The department shall provide physicians with a manual which
outlines the procedures to be followed in applications for compensation
involving occupational diseases, and which describes claimants' rights and
responsibilities related to occupational disease claims.

(2)
An employer, except a self-insured employer, receiving an application for
benefits under subsection (1) of this section must forward the application to
the department within three business days following its receipt. An employer
in violation of this subsection may be subject to a penalty determined by the
director, or his or her designee. The penalty shall not exceed five thousand
dollars for each offense and shall be based on a graduated scale defined by
rule and taking into account the employer's claim frequency, number of
employees, history of compliance, and any other information as defined by the
department by rule. Any penalty received under this subsection must be paid to
the supplemental pension fund.

(3)
If application for compensation is made to a self-insuring employer, ((he or
she)) the employer shall forthwith send a copy ((thereof)) to
the department.

(4)
Upon receiving the application for benefits, the employer or department, as the
case may be, shall immediately provide written notice to the worker or the
worker's beneficiary, of his or her rights under this title in nontechnical
language as prescribed by the department.

(5)
If the employer has not already received a copy, the department shall ensure
that the employer is immediately provided with a copy of the worker's
application for benefits.

Sec.
3. RCW
51.28.025 and 1987 c 185 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever an employer has notice or knowledge of an injury or occupational
disease sustained by any worker in his or her employment who has received
treatment from a physician, has been hospitalized, disabled from work,
or has died as the apparent result of such injury or occupational disease, the
employer ((shall)) must immediately report the same to the
department on forms prescribed by it. The report ((shall)) must
include:

(a)
The name, address, and business of the employer;

(b)
The name, address, and occupation of the worker;

(c)
The date, time, cause, and nature of the injury or occupational disease;

(d)
Whether the injury or occupational disease arose in the course of the injured
worker's employment;

(e)
All available information pertaining to the nature of the injury or
occupational disease including but not limited to any visible signs, any
complaints of the worker, any time lost from work, the wages paid to the
worker including the reasonable value of board, housing, fuel, or other
consideration of like nature, and the observable effect on the worker's
bodily functions, so far as is known; and

(f)
Such other pertinent information as the department may prescribe by ((regulation))
rule.

(2)
An employer that has notice or knowledge that an industrial injury has
occurred to a worker, or that an occupational disease has been contracted by a
worker, shall immediately provide the worker or the worker's beneficiary with
written notice, in nontechnical language as prescribed by the department, of
the worker's rights under this title. The notice shall also inform the worker
or the worker's beneficiary how to apply for benefits under this title.

(3)
The employer shall prominently display and disseminate to all employees, in
nontechnical language as prescribed by the department, procedures clearly
describing how a worker should report injuries or occupational diseases to the
employer. The procedures must be consistent with those procedures established
by the department.

(4)
Failure or refusal to file the report required by subsection (1) of this
section shall subject the offending employer to a penalty determined by the
director ((but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars for each offense, to
be collected in a civil action in the name of the department and)) or
his or her designee. The penalty shall not exceed five hundred dollars for
each offense. Any penalty received under this subsection shall be paid
into the supplemental pension fund.

(5)
The employer report required by this section shall not in any way relieve the
worker of his or her obligation to timely file an application for benefits as
required by RCW 51.28.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 51.28 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall adopt rules that are necessary to implement this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department of labor and industries shall report to the house of representatives
commerce and labor committee and the senate labor and workforce development
committee by September 15, 2000, on the plan to implement sections 1 through 3
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act take effect July 1, 2001.

---
END ---