BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this
act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Buyer" means a person who, in the ordinary course of business, buys
farm products from a person engaged in farming operations who is in the
business of selling farm products.

(2)
"Central filing system" means a system for filing effective financing
statements on a state-wide basis that is operated by the department of
licensing and has been certified by the secretary of the United States
department of agriculture.

(3)
"Commission merchant" means any person engaged in the business of
receiving any farm product for sale, on commission, or for or on behalf of
another person.

(4)
"Effective financing statement" means a document filed with the
department of licensing to register and describe farm products subject to a
security interest created by a debtor or seller of farm products that is an
effective financing statement under the provisions of section 1324 of the food
security act of 1985, (7 U.S.C. 1631). An effective financing statement does
not create or perfect a security interest.

(5)
"Farm product" means an agricultural commodity including but not
limited to wheat, corn, soybeans, or a species of fish or livestock such as
cattle, hogs, sheep, horses, or poultry used or produced in farming operations,
or a product of such crop, fish, or livestock in its unmanufactured state,
including but not limited to wool clip, milk, and eggs, that is in the
possession of a person engaged in farming operations.

(6)
"Knows" or "knowledge" means actual knowledge.

(7)
"Security interest" means an interest in farm products that secures payment
or performance of an obligation.

(8)
"Selling agent" means any person, other than a commission merchant,
who is engaged in the business of negotiating the sale and purchase of any farm
product on behalf of a person engaged in farming operations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
ESTABLISHMENT OF CENTRAL FILING SYSTEM FOR FARM PRODUCTS. The department of
licensing shall establish, implement, and operate the central filing system for
farm products. The department of licensing shall ensure that the central
filing system for farm products described in sections 1 through 10 of this act
complies with the requirements for a central filing system as defined by 7
U.S.C. 1631 as that statute read on December 24, 1986. The department of licensing
shall prescribe the rules, fees, and forms to implement and operate the central
filing system. The fees prescribed by the department of licensing shall not
exceed the cost of administering the central filing system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
PROTECTION OF BUYERS OF FARM PRODUCTS, COMMISSION MERCHANTS, AND SELLING AGENTS‑-EXCEPTION.
Except as provided in section 4 of this act, a buyer who in the ordinary course
of business buys farm products from a seller engaged in farming operations
shall take free of a security interest created by the seller, and a commission
merchant or selling agent who sells in the ordinary course of business farm
products for others shall not be subject to a security interest created by the
seller in such products, even though the security interest is perfected and the
buyer or commission merchant or selling agent knows of the existence of such
interest.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. WHEN
BUYER OF FARM PRODUCT, COMMISSION MERCHANT, AND SELLING AGENT SUBJECT TO
SECURITY INTEREST IN FARM PRODUCT CREATED BY SELLER. Under the central filing
system for farm products, a buyer of farm products or commission merchant or
selling agent who sells farm products for others shall be subject to a security
interest in such farm products created by the seller if:

(1)
The buyer or commission merchant or selling agent has failed to register with
the department of licensing prior to the purchase of farm products and the
secured party has filed an effective financing statement that covers the farm
products being sold;

(2)
The buyer or commission merchant or selling agent has received from the
department of licensing a copy of the master list of farm products or written
notice, under section 6 or 7 of this act, that names the seller and specifies
the farm products being sold by such seller as being subject to an effective
financing statement and the buyer or commission merchant or selling agent does
not secure a waiver or release of the security interest specified in such
effective financing statement from the secured party by performing any payment
obligation or otherwise; or

(3)
The buyer or commission merchant or selling agent participates in the
department of licensing's computer access program that names the seller and
specifies the farm products being sold by such seller as being subject to an
effective financing statement and the buyer or commission merchant or selling
agent does not secure a waiver or release of the security interest specified in
such effective financing statement from the secured party by performing any
payment obligation or otherwise.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
FORMAL REQUISITES OF EFFECTIVE FINANCING STATEMENT‑-AMENDMENT‑-DURATION
OF FILING‑-LAPSE OF FILING‑-FEE. (1) An effective financing
statement for farm products is sufficient to register a security interest in a
farm product if it:

(a)
Contains the name and address of the secured party;

(b)
Contains the name and address of the person indebted to the secured party;

(c)
Contains the social security number of the debtor or, in the case of a debtor
doing business other than as an individual, the internal revenue service
taxpayer identification number of such debtor;

(d)
Describes the farm products subject to the security interest created by the
debtor, including the amount of such products where applicable, and describes
the real property concerned, including the name of the county in this state in
which the property is located;

(e)
Is signed by the secured party;

(f)
Is signed by the debtor;

(g)
Is an original or reproduced copy thereof; and

(h)
Is accompanied by the required filing fee.

(2)
An effective financing statement must be amended in writing within three
months, similarly signed and filed, to reflect material changes.

(3)
An effective financing statement for farm products remains effective for a
period of five years from the date of filing, subject to extensions for
additional periods of five years each by refiling or filing a continuation
statement within six months before the expiration of the five-year period.

(4)
An effective financing statement for farm products lapses on either the
expiration of the effective period of the statement or the filing of a notice
signed by secured party that the statement has lapsed, whichever occurs first.
Unless otherwise provided in writing between the secured party and the debtor,
a statement that the effective financing statement has lapsed shall be filed
within thirty days after there is no outstanding secured obligation and no
commitment to make advances, incur obligations, or otherwise give value under
the security interest.

(5)
The department of licensing shall, by rule, prescribe the filing fee for each
effective financing statement for farm products or change thereto and
continuation thereof, and the filing fee for the notice that the effective
financing statement has lapsed. Each effective financing statement may reflect
more than one type of farm product. The filing fee shall be per debtor name.

(6)
An effective financing statement is sufficient if it complies with this section
even though it contains minor errors that are not seriously misleading.

(7)
If financing statements under the uniform commercial code may be filed
electronically without the signature of the debtor, then an effective financing
statement may be filed electronically, or it may be a paper document. An
electronically filed effective financing statement need not be a paper document
and need not be signed. If an original or reproduced paper document of an
effective financing statement is filed, it must be signed by both the secured
party and the debtor and must be filed by the secured party.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
OPERATION OF CENTRAL FILING SYSTEM‑-MASTER LIST OF FARM PRODUCTS‑-LIST
OF BUYERS, COMMISSION MERCHANTS, AND SELLING AGENTS‑-DISTRIBUTION OF
MASTER LIST. (1) Under the central filing system for farm products, the
department of licensing shall record the date and time of filing of effective
financing statements or changes thereto, and compile this information into a
master list organized according to farm products. The department of licensing
shall by rule determine the categories of farm products.

(2)
Within each category of farm products, the department of licensing shall
arrange the master list:

(a)
In alphabetical order by last name of the debtor or in the case of a debtor
doing business other than as an individual, by the first word in the name of
such debtor;

(b)
In numerical order according to social security number of the individual debtor
or internal revenue service taxpayer identification number of debtors doing
business other than as individuals;

(c)
Geographically by county; and

(d)
By crop year.

(3)
The master list shall contain all the information on all the effective
financing statements filed in the system that have not lapsed. The master list
shall be arranged to provide delivery to any registrant of any information
relating to any product, produced in any county for any crop year covered by
the system, and shall be available in a form that is readable by humans without
special equipment.

(4)
The department of licensing shall maintain a list of all buyers of farm
products, commission merchants, and selling agents who register with the
department of licensing on a form indicating:

(a)
The name and address of each buyer, commission merchant, and selling agent;

(b)
The interest of each buyer, commission merchant, or selling agent in receiving
the master list on farm products; and

(c)
The farm products in which each buyer, commission merchant, and selling agent
has an interest.

(5)
The department of licensing shall distribute monthly to each buyer, commission
merchant, and selling agent registered under this section a printed or
micrographic copy of those portions of the master list that the buyer,
commission merchant, or selling agent has registered an interest in receiving.
The department of licensing shall by rule prescribe the yearly subscription fee
for each type of the monthly master list.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. ORAL
CONFIRMATION OF THE EXISTENCE OF ANY EFFECTIVE FINANCING STATEMENT. (1) On
request, the department of licensing shall furnish to persons not registered
under section 6 of this act oral confirmation within twenty-four hours of the
existence of any effective financing statement followed by written confirmation
to any buyer of farm products buying from a debtor or commission merchant or
selling agent selling for a seller covered by such statement.

(2)
The request for oral confirmation shall be in writing and shall be presented to
the department of licensing during normal business hours.

(3)
Information on an effective financing statement may be furnished by telephone
to the requestor of an oral confirmation.

(4)
Oral confirmation shall be followed by written confirmation from the department
of licensing within forty-eight hours after the oral confirmation.

(5)
The department of licensing shall by rule prescribe the service fees for
processing oral and written confirmation requests on effective financing
statements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
COURTESY NOTICE. Nothing in sections 1 through 10 of this act shall
prevent a secured party from providing a courtesy notice to any person
regarding the secured party's security interests in farm products. The rights
or obligations of the secured party or any other person shall not be affected
by the failure of a secured party to give a courtesy notice or by the accuracy
or completeness of the information given in such a notice.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. PLACE
OF FILING EFFECTIVE FINANCING STATEMENT. The proper place to file an effective
financing statement on farm products is in the office of the department of
licensing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. PLACE
OF REGISTRATION AS BUYER OF FARM PRODUCT, COMMISSION MERCHANT, OR SELLING AGENT‑-DURATION
OF REGISTRATION--FEE. The proper place to register under section 6 of this act
as a buyer of farm products or a commission merchant or selling agent of farm
products is in the office of the department of licensing. The registration is
effective for one year following the date of registration. Registration may be
amended by filing a new registration. The department of licensing shall, by
rule, prescribe the registration fee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
LIABILITY OF DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING FOR ADMINISTRATION. The department of
licensing and the department's officers and employees shall not be liable to
debtors, secured parties, or any other person in administering this chapter.

Sec.
12. RCW
62A.9-307 and 1987 c 393 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in sections 3 and 4 of this act with respect to certain
buyers of farm products, a buyer in ordinary course of business (subsection
(9) of RCW 62A.1-201) ((other than a person buying farm products from a
person engaged in farming operations)) takes free of a security interest
created by his seller even though the security interest is perfected and even
though the buyer knows of its existence.

(2)
In the case of consumer goods, a buyer takes free of a security interest even
though perfected if he buys without knowledge of the security interest, for
value and for his own personal, family or household purposes unless prior to
the purchase the secured party has filed a financing statement covering such
goods.

(3)
A buyer other than a buyer in ordinary course of business (subsection (1) of
this section) takes free of a security interest to the extent that it secures
future advances made after the secured party acquires knowledge of the
purchase, unless made pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge
of the purchase.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14.
Sections 1 through 11 of this act are each added to Title 62A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. This
act takes effect July 1, 2001.

---
END ---