BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW to read as follows:

In
determining an appropriation for a transit system, the legislature shall
consider:

(1)
The cash reserves of the transit system; and

(2) The number of passenger trips per hour made by the transit
system.

---
END ---