BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28B.50.841 and 1991 c 238 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The faculty awards are the property of the institution and may be named in
honor of a donor, benefactor, or honoree of the institution, at the option of
the institution. The institution shall designate the use of the award to
individuals, groups, or for the improvement of faculty as a whole. The
designation shall be made or renewed annually.

(2)
The institution is responsible for soliciting private donations, investing and
maintaining its endowment funds, administering the faculty awards, and reporting
on the program to the governor, the college board, and the legislature, upon
request. The institution may augment its endowment fund with additional
unrestricted private donations. The principal of the invested endowment fund
shall not be invaded.

(3) The proceeds from the endowment fund shall be used to pay
expenses for faculty awards, which may include faculty development
activities, in-service training, temporary substitute or replacement costs
directly associated with faculty development programs, conferences, travel,
publication and dissemination of exemplary projects; to supplement the salary
of the holder or holders of a faculty award; or to pay expenses associated with
the holder's program area. Funds from this program shall not be used to supplant
existing faculty development funds.

---
END ---