BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The
superintendent of public instruction shall provide each school district with
information on programs operating in the state that provide assistance to
parents in home-based instruction. The information shall include programs
operated by school districts, educational service districts, institutions of
higher education, and private entities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

School districts must provide information furnished by the
superintendent of public instruction under section 1 of this act to any parent
or member of the general public who requests information regarding programs
that provide assistance to parents in providing home-based instruction.

---
END ---