BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.77.065 and 1980 c 40 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board may cause any county road to be constructed or improved by day labor as
provided in this section.

(1)
As used in this section, "county road construction budget" means the
aggregate total of those costs as defined by the budgeting, accounting, and
reporting system for counties and cities and other local governments authorized
under RCW 43.09.200 and 43.09.230 as prescribed in the state auditor's budget,
accounting, and reporting manual's (BARS) road and street construction accounts
541.00 through 541.90 in effect April 1, 1975: PROVIDED, That such costs shall
not include those costs assigned to the preliminary engineering account 541.11,
right of way accounts 541.20 through 541.25, ancillary operations account
541.80, and ferries account 541.81 in the budget, accounting, and reporting
manual.

(2)
For counties with a population density that equals or exceeds one hundred
persons per square mile, except for those counties composed entirely of
islands, the total amount of day labor construction programs one county may
perform annually shall total no more than the amounts determined in the
following manner:

(a)
Any county with a total annual county road construction budget of four million
dollars or more may accumulate a day labor road construction budget equal to no
more than eight hundred thousand dollars or fifteen percent of the county's
total annual county road construction budget, whichever is greater.

(b)
Any county with a total annual county road construction budget ((over)) of
one million five hundred thousand dollars or more and less than four
million dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction budget equal to
not more than five hundred twenty-five thousand dollars or twenty percent of
the county's total annual county road construction budget, whichever is
greater.

(c)
Any county with a total annual county road construction budget ((over)) of
five hundred thousand dollars or more and less than one million five
hundred thousand dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction budget
equal to two hundred fifty thousand dollars or thirty-five percent of the
county's total annual county road construction budget, whichever is greater.

(d)
Any county with a total annual county road construction budget less than five
hundred thousand dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction budget
equal to two hundred fifty thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That any county with a
total annual road construction budget of less than five hundred thousand
dollars may, by resolution of the board at the time the county road
construction budget is adopted, elect to construct or improve county roads by
day labor in an amount not to exceed thirty-five thousand dollars on any one
project, including labor, equipment, and materials; such election to be in lieu
of the two hundred fifty thousand dollar limit provided for in this section,
except that any project means a complete project and the division of any
project into units of work or classes of work so as to permit construction by
day labor is not authorized.

(3)
For counties with a population density of less than one hundred persons per
square mile and those counties composed entirely of islands, the total amount
of day labor construction programs one county may perform annually shall total
no more than the amounts determined in the following manner:

(a)
Any county with a total annual county road construction budget of four million
dollars or more may accumulate a day labor road construction budget equal to
not more than eight hundred eighty thousand dollars or twenty-five percent of
the county's total annual county road construction budget, whichever is
greater;

(b)
Any county with a total annual county road construction budget of one million
five hundred thousand dollars or more and less than four million dollars may
accumulate a day labor road construction budget equal to not more than five
hundred seventy-seven thousand dollars or thirty percent of the county's total
annual county road construction budget, whichever is greater;

(c)
Any county with a total annual county road construction budget of five hundred
thousand dollars or more and less than one million five hundred thousand
dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction budget equal to two
hundred seventy-five thousand dollars or forty-five percent of the county's
total annual county road construction budget, whichever is greater;

(d)
Any county with a total annual county road construction budget less than five
hundred thousand dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction budget
equal to two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That any county
with a total annual road construction budget of less than five hundred thousand
dollars may, by resolution of the board at the time the county road
construction budget is adopted, elect to construct or improve county roads by
day labor in an amount not to exceed thirty-eight thousand five hundred dollars
on any one project, including labor, equipment, and materials; such election to
be in lieu of the two hundred seventy-five thousand dollar limit provided for
in this section, except that any project means a complete project and the
division of any project into units of work or classes of work so as to permit
construction by day labor is not authorized.

(4)
Any county that adopts a county road construction budget unreasonably exceeding
that county's actual road construction expenditures for the same budget year
which has the effect of permitting the county to exceed the day labor amounts
established in this section is in violation of the county road administration
board's standards of good practice under RCW 36.78.020 and is in violation of
this section. Any county, whose expenditure for day labor for road
construction projects unreasonably exceeds the limits specified in this section,
is in violation of the county road administration board's standards of good
practice under RCW 36.78.020 and is in violation of this section.

(((3)))
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, whenever the
construction work or improvement is the installation of electrical traffic
control devices, highway illumination equipment, electrical equipment, wires,
or equipment to convey electrical current, in an amount exceeding ten thousand
dollars for any one project including labor, equipment, and materials, such
work shall be performed by contract as in this chapter provided. This section
means a complete project and does not permit the construction of any project by
day labor by division of the project into units of work or classes of work.

---
END ---