BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.58.080 and 1995 c 347 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Local governments shall develop or amend((, within twenty-four months after
the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060,)) a master program
for regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state consistent with the
required elements of the guidelines adopted by the department within
thirty-six months of receiving full funding from the legislature for such
purpose.

(2) For guidelines adopted by the department before December 31,
2000, consistent with the priority salmon recovery regions and water resource
inventory areas map, as defined in the state-wide strategy to recover salmon,
volume 1, page V.95, and population growth data provided by the office of
financial management, King, Snohomish, Pierce, Clark, and Kitsap counties and
the cities and towns therein with shorelines of the state, shall review master
programs for compliance with the guidelines and adopt or amend as necessary
within thirty-six months. The requirements of this subsection (2) do not apply
unless the legislature has appropriated funds for the purpose of updating local
shoreline master programs and the counties and cities and towns therein have
accepted grants from the state for such purpose. Ten percent of any funds
appropriated to the department for the purpose of updating local shoreline
master programs shall be made available by grant to other counties, cities, and
towns with shorelines of the state who wish to revise master programs at the
same time.

---
END ---