BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.30.020 and 1991 sp.s. c 25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
No person may operate a motor vehicle subject to registration under chapter
46.16 RCW in this state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle
liability policy with liability limits of at least the amounts provided in RCW
46.29.090, is self-insured as provided in RCW 46.29.630, is covered by a certificate
of deposit in conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a liability bond
of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090. Written proof of financial
responsibility for motor vehicle operation must be provided on the request of a
law enforcement officer in the format specified under RCW 46.30.030.

(b)
A person who drives a motor vehicle that is required to be registered in
another state that requires drivers and owners of vehicles in that state to
maintain insurance or financial responsibility shall, when requested by a law
enforcement officer, provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance
as is required by the laws of the state in which the vehicle is registered.

(c)
When asked to do so by a law enforcement officer, failure to display an
insurance identification card as specified under RCW 46.30.030 creates a
presumption that the person does not have motor vehicle insurance.

(d)
Failure to provide proof of motor vehicle insurance is a traffic infraction and
is subject to penalties as set by the supreme court under RCW 46.63.110 or
community service and the vehicle impoundment provisions of chapter 46.55
RCW.

(2)
If a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this section appears in
person before the court and provides written evidence that at the time the
person was cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the citation shall be
dismissed. In lieu of personal appearance, a person cited for a violation of
subsection (1) of this section may, before the date scheduled for the person's
appearance before the court, submit by mail to the court written evidence that
at the time the person was cited, he or she was in compliance with the
financial responsibility requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in
which case the citation shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court
may assess court administrative costs of twenty-five dollars at the time of
dismissal.

(3)
The provisions of this chapter shall not govern:

(a)
The operation of a motor vehicle registered under RCW 46.16.305(1), governed by
RCW 46.16.020, or registered with the Washington utilities and transportation
commission as common or contract carriers; or

(b)
The operation of a motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330, a motor-driven cycle
as defined in RCW 46.04.332, or a moped as defined in RCW 46.04.304.

(4) RCW 46.29.490 shall not be deemed to govern all motor vehicle
liability policies required by this chapter but only those certified for the
purposes stated in chapter 46.29 RCW.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.55.010 and 1999 c 398 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter:

(1)
"Abandoned vehicle" means a vehicle that a registered tow truck
operator has impounded and held in the operator's possession for one hundred
twenty consecutive hours.

(2)
"Abandoned vehicle report" means the document prescribed by the state
that the towing operator forwards to the department after a vehicle has become
abandoned.

(3)
"Impound" means to take and hold a vehicle in legal custody. There
are two types of impounds‑-public and private.

(a)
"Public impound" means that the vehicle has been impounded at the
direction of a law enforcement officer or by a public official having
jurisdiction over the public property upon which the vehicle was located.

(b)
"Private impound" means that the vehicle has been impounded at the
direction of a person having control or possession of the private property upon
which the vehicle was located.

(4)
"Junk vehicle" means a vehicle certified under RCW 46.55.230 as
meeting at least three of the following requirements:

(a)
Is three years old or older;

(b)
Is extensively damaged, such damage including but not limited to any of the
following: A broken window or windshield, or missing wheels, tires, motor, or
transmission;

(c)
Is apparently inoperable;

(d)
Has an approximate fair market value equal only to the approximate value of the
scrap in it.

(5)
"Mandatory insurance impound" means an impound ordered under RCW
46.55.113 because the operator was arrested for a violation of RCW 46.30.020.

(6)
"Master log" means the document or an electronic facsimile prescribed
by the department and the Washington state patrol in which an operator records
transactions involving impounded vehicles.

(((6)))
(7) "Registered tow truck operator" or "operator"
means any person who engages in the impounding, transporting, or storage of
unauthorized vehicles or the disposal of abandoned vehicles.

(((7)))
(8) "Residential property" means property that has no more
than four living units located on it.

(((8)))
(9) "Suspended license impound" means an impound ordered under
RCW 46.55.113 because the operator was arrested for a violation of RCW
46.20.342 or ((46.20.420)) 46.20.345.

(((9)))
(10) "Tow truck" means a motor vehicle that is equipped for
and used in the business of towing vehicles with equipment as approved by the
state patrol.

(((10)))
(11) "Tow truck number" means the number issued by the
department to tow trucks used by a registered tow truck operator in the state
of Washington.

(((11)))
(12) "Tow truck permit" means the permit issued annually by
the department that has the classification of service the tow truck may provide
stamped upon it.

(((12)))
(13) "Tow truck service" means the transporting upon the
public streets and highways of this state of vehicles, together with personal
effects and cargo, by a tow truck of a registered operator.

(((13)))
(14) "Unauthorized vehicle" means a vehicle that is subject to
impoundment after being left unattended in one of the following public or
private locations for the indicated period of time:

Subject to removal after:

(a)Public
locations:

(i)Constituting an accident or a
traffic hazard as defined in RCW 46.55.113 Immediately

(ii)On a highway and tagged as
described in RCW 46.55.085.................... 24 hours

(iii)In a publicly owned or
controlled parking facility, properly posted under RCW

46.55.070................. Immediately

(b)Private locations:

(i)On residential property... Immediately

(ii)On private, nonresidential
property, properly posted under RCW 46.55.070.......................... Immediately

(iii)On private, nonresidential
property, not

posted....................... 24 hours

Sec.
3. RCW
46.55.080 and 1999 c 398 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a vehicle is in violation of the time restrictions of RCW 46.55.010(((13))),
it may be impounded by a registered tow truck operator at the direction of a
law enforcement officer or other public official with jurisdiction if the
vehicle is on public property, or at the direction of the property owner or an
agent if it is on private property. A law enforcement officer may also direct
the impoundment of a vehicle pursuant to a writ or court order.

(2)
The person requesting a private impound or a law enforcement officer or public
official requesting a public impound shall provide a signed authorization for
the impound at the time and place of the impound to the registered tow truck
operator before the operator may proceed with the impound. A registered tow
truck operator, employee, or his or her agent may not serve as an agent of a
property owner for the purposes of signing an impound authorization or,
independent of the property owner, identify a vehicle for impound.

(3)
In the case of a private impound, the impound authorization shall include the
following statement: "A person authorizing this impound, if the impound
is found in violation of chapter 46.55 RCW, may be held liable for the costs
incurred by the vehicle owner."

(4)
A registered tow truck operator shall record and keep in the operator's files
the date and time that a vehicle is put in the operator's custody and
released. The operator shall make an entry into a master log regarding
transactions relating to impounded vehicles. The operator shall make this
master log available, upon request, to representatives of the department or the
state patrol.

(5)
A person who engages in or offers to engage in the activities of a registered
tow truck operator may not be associated in any way with a person or business
whose main activity is authorizing the impounding of vehicles.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.55.100 and 1999 c 398 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
At the time of impoundment the registered tow truck operator providing the
towing service shall give immediate notification, by telephone or radio, to a
law enforcement agency having jurisdiction who shall maintain a log of such
reports. A law enforcement agency, or a private communication center acting on
behalf of a law enforcement agency, shall within six to twelve hours of the
impoundment, provide to a requesting operator the name and address of the legal
and registered owners of the vehicle, and the registered owner of any personal
property registered or titled with the department that is attached to or
contained in or on the impounded vehicle, the vehicle identification number,
and any other necessary, pertinent information. The initial notice of
impoundment shall be followed by a written or electronic facsimile notice
within twenty-four hours. In the case of a vehicle from another state, time
requirements of this subsection do not apply until the requesting law
enforcement agency in this state receives the information.

(2)
The operator shall immediately send an abandoned vehicle report to the
department for any vehicle, and for any items of personal property registered
or titled with the department, that are in the operator's possession after the
one hundred twenty hour abandonment period. Such report need not be sent when
the impoundment is pursuant to a writ, court order, or police hold that is not
a suspended license impound. The owner notification and abandonment process
shall be initiated by the registered tow truck operator immediately following
notification by a court or law enforcement officer that the writ, court order,
or police hold that is not a suspended license impound or a mandatory
insurance impound is no longer in effect.

(3)
Following the submittal of an abandoned vehicle report, the department shall
provide the registered tow truck operator with owner information within
seventy-two hours.

(4)
Within fourteen days of the sale of an abandoned vehicle at public auction, the
towing operator shall send a copy of the abandoned vehicle report showing the
disposition of the abandoned vehicle and any other items of personal property
registered or titled with the department to the crime information center of the
Washington state patrol.

(5)
If the operator sends an abandoned vehicle report to the department and the
department finds no owner information, an operator may proceed with an
inspection of the vehicle and any other items of personal property registered
or titled with the department to determine whether owner identification is
within the vehicle.

(6) If the operator finds no owner identification, the operator
shall immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement agency, which shall
search the vehicle and any other items of personal property registered or
titled with the department for the vehicle identification number or other
appropriate identification numbers and check the necessary records to determine
the vehicle's or other property's owners.

Sec.
5. RCW
46.55.110 and 1999 c 398 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When an unauthorized vehicle is impounded, the impounding towing operator shall
notify the legal and registered owners of the impoundment of the unauthorized
vehicle and the owners of any other items of personal property registered or
titled with the department. The notification shall be sent by first-class mail
within twenty-four hours after the impoundment to the last known registered and
legal owners of the vehicle, and the owners of any other items of personal
property registered or titled with the department, as provided by the law
enforcement agency, and shall inform the owners of the identity of the person
or agency authorizing the impound. The notification shall include the name of
the impounding tow firm, its address, and telephone number. The notice shall
also include the location, time of the impound, and by whose authority the
vehicle was impounded. The notice shall also include the written notice of the
right of redemption and opportunity for a hearing to contest the validity of
the impoundment pursuant to RCW 46.55.120.

(2)
In addition, if a suspended license impound or a mandatory insurance impound
has been ordered, the notice must state the length of the impound, the
requirement of the posting of a security deposit to ensure payment of the costs
of removal, towing, and storage, notification that if the security deposit is
not posted the vehicle will immediately be processed and sold at auction as an
abandoned vehicle, and the requirements set out in RCW 46.55.120(1)(b)
regarding the payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage as well as
providing proof of satisfaction of any penalties, fines, or forfeitures before
redemption. The notice must also state that the registered owner is ineligible
to purchase the vehicle at the abandoned vehicle auction, if held.

(3)
In the case of an abandoned vehicle, or other item of personal property
registered or titled with the department, within twenty-four hours after
receiving information on the owners from the department through the abandoned
vehicle report, the tow truck operator shall send by certified mail, with
return receipt requested, a notice of custody and sale to the legal and
registered owners.

(4)
If the date on which a notice required by subsection (3) of this section is to
be mailed falls upon a Saturday, Sunday, or a postal holiday, the notice may be
mailed on the next day that is neither a Saturday, Sunday, nor a postal
holiday.

(5) No notices need be sent to the legal or registered owners of an
impounded vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, if the vehicle or personal property has been redeemed.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.55.113 and 1998 c 203 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
the driver of a vehicle is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 ((or)),
46.61.504 ((or of RCW)), 46.20.342 ((or 46.20.420)), 46.20.345,
or 46.30.020 the vehicle is subject to impoundment, pursuant to applicable
local ordinance or state agency rule at the direction of a law enforcement
officer. In addition, a police officer may take custody of a vehicle and
provide for its prompt removal to a place of safety under any of the following
circumstances:

(1)
Whenever a police officer finds a vehicle standing upon the roadway in
violation of any of the provisions of RCW 46.61.560, the officer may provide
for the removal of the vehicle or require the driver or other person in charge
of the vehicle to move the vehicle to a position off the roadway;

(2)
Whenever a police officer finds a vehicle unattended upon a highway where the
vehicle constitutes an obstruction to traffic or jeopardizes public safety;

(3)
Whenever a police officer finds an unattended vehicle at the scene of an
accident or when the driver of a vehicle involved in an accident is physically
or mentally incapable of deciding upon steps to be taken to protect his or her
property;

(4)
Whenever the driver of a vehicle is arrested and taken into custody by a police
officer;

(5)
Whenever a police officer discovers a vehicle that the officer determines to be
a stolen vehicle;

(6)
Whenever a vehicle without a special license plate, card, or decal indicating
that the vehicle is being used to transport a disabled person under RCW
46.16.381 is parked in a stall or space clearly and conspicuously marked under
RCW 46.61.581 which space is provided on private property without charge or on
public property;

(7)
Upon determining that a person is operating a motor vehicle without a valid
driver's license in violation of RCW 46.20.005 or with a license that has been
expired for ninety days or more;

(8)
Upon determining that a person is operating a motor vehicle without valid
mandatory liability insurance in violation of RCW 46.30.020.

Nothing
in this section may derogate from the powers of police officers under the
common law. For the purposes of this section, a place of safety may include
the business location of a registered tow truck operator.

Sec.
7. RCW
46.55.120 and 1999 c 398 s 7 and 1999 c 327 s 5 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Vehicles or other items of personal property registered or titled with the
department that are impounded by registered tow truck operators pursuant to RCW
46.55.080, 46.55.085, 46.55.113, or 9A.88.140 may be redeemed only under the
following circumstances:

(a)
Only the legal owner, the registered owner, a person authorized in writing by
the registered owner or the vehicle's insurer, a person who is determined and
verified by the operator to have the permission of the registered owner of the
vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with the
department, or one who has purchased a vehicle or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department from the registered owner who produces
proof of ownership or written authorization and signs a receipt therefor, may
redeem an impounded vehicle or items of personal property registered or titled
with the department. In addition, a vehicle impounded because the operator is
in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c) or 46.30.020 shall not be released
until a person eligible to redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the
requirements of (e) of this subsection, including paying all towing, removal,
and storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a
government agency. If the department's records show that the operator has been
convicted of a violation of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.30.020 or a similar
local ordinance within the past five years, the vehicle may be held for up to
thirty days at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded. A vehicle impounded because the operator is arrested for a
violation of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.30.020 may be released only pursuant to
a written order from the agency that ordered the vehicle impounded or from the
court having jurisdiction. An agency may issue a written order to release
pursuant to a provision of an applicable state agency rule or local ordinance authorizing
release on the basis of economic or personal hardship to the spouse of the
operator, taking into consideration public safety factors, including the
operator's criminal history and driving record.

If
a vehicle is impounded because the operator is in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)
(a) or (b) or 46.30.020, the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days
at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded.
However, if the department's records show that the operator has been convicted of
a violation of RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b) or 46.30.020 or a similar
local ordinance within the past five years, the vehicle may be held at the
written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded for up to sixty
days, and for up to ninety days if the operator has two or more such prior
offenses. If a vehicle is impounded because the operator is arrested for a
violation of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.30.020, the vehicle may not be released
until a person eligible to redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the
requirements of (e) of this subsection, including paying all towing, removal,
and storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a
government agency.

(b)
If the vehicle is directed to be held for a suspended license impound or a
mandatory insurance impound, a person who desires to redeem the vehicle at
the end of the period of impound shall within five days of the impound at the
request of the tow truck operator pay a security deposit to the tow truck
operator of not more than one-half of the applicable impound storage rate for
each day of the proposed suspended license impound. The tow truck operator
shall credit this amount against the final bill for removal, towing, and
storage upon redemption. The tow truck operator may accept other sufficient
security in lieu of the security deposit. If the person desiring to redeem the
vehicle does not pay the security deposit or provide other security acceptable
to the tow truck operator, the tow truck operator may process and sell at
auction the vehicle as an abandoned vehicle within the normal time limits set
out in RCW 46.55.130(1). The security deposit required by this section may be
paid and must be accepted at any time up to twenty-four hours before the
beginning of the auction to sell the vehicle as abandoned. The registered
owner is not eligible to purchase the vehicle at the auction, and the tow truck
operator shall sell the vehicle to the highest bidder who is not the registered
owner.

(c)
Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a rental car business may immediately
redeem a rental vehicle it owns by payment of the costs of removal, towing, and
storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held for a suspended license
impound.

(d)
Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a motor vehicle dealer or lender with a
perfected security interest in the vehicle may redeem or lawfully repossess a
vehicle immediately by payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage,
whereupon the vehicle will not be held for a suspended license impound. A
motor vehicle dealer or lender with a perfected security interest in the
vehicle may not knowingly and intentionally engage in collusion with a
registered owner to repossess and then return or resell a vehicle to the
registered owner in an attempt to avoid a suspended license impound. However,
this provision does not preclude a vehicle dealer or a lender with a perfected
security interest in the vehicle from repossessing the vehicle and then
selling, leasing, or otherwise disposing of it in accordance with chapter 62A.9
RCW, including providing redemption rights to the debtor under RCW 62A.9-506.
If the debtor is the registered owner of the vehicle, the debtor's right to
redeem the vehicle under chapter 62A.9 RCW is conditioned upon the debtor
obtaining and providing proof from the impounding authority or court having
jurisdiction that any fines, penalties, and forfeitures owed by the registered
owner, as a result of the suspended license impound, have been paid, and proof
of the payment must be tendered to the vehicle dealer or lender at the time the
debtor tenders all other obligations required to redeem the vehicle. Vehicle
dealers or lenders are not liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an
order from the impounding agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a
suspended license impound.

(e)
The vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with the
department shall be released upon the presentation to any person having custody
of the vehicle of commercially reasonable tender sufficient to cover the costs
of towing, storage, or other services rendered during the course of towing,
removing, impounding, or storing any such vehicle, with credit being given for
the amount of any security deposit paid under (b) of this subsection. In
addition, if a vehicle is impounded because the operator was arrested for a
violation of RCW 46.20.342 ((or 46.20.420)), 46.20.345, or 46.30.020
and was being operated by the registered owner when it was impounded under
local ordinance or agency rule, it must not be released to any person until the
registered owner establishes with the agency that ordered the vehicle impounded
or the court having jurisdiction that any penalties, fines, or forfeitures owed
by him or her have been satisfied. Registered tow truck operators are not
liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an order from the impounding
agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a suspended license
impound. Commercially reasonable tender shall include, without limitation,
cash, major bank credit cards, or personal checks drawn on in-state banks if
accompanied by two pieces of valid identification, one of which may be required
by the operator to have a photograph. If the towing firm can determine through
the customer's bank or a check verification service that the presented check
would not be paid by the bank or guaranteed by the service, the towing firm may
refuse to accept the check. Any person who stops payment on a personal check
or credit card, or does not make restitution within ten days from the date a
check becomes insufficient due to lack of funds, to a towing firm that has
provided a service pursuant to this section or in any other manner defrauds the
towing firm in connection with services rendered pursuant to this section shall
be liable for damages in the amount of twice the towing and storage fees, plus
costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

(2)(a)
The registered tow truck operator shall give to each person who seeks to redeem
an impounded vehicle, or item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, written notice of the right of redemption and opportunity for a
hearing, which notice shall be accompanied by a form to be used for requesting
a hearing, the name of the person or agency authorizing the impound, and a copy
of the towing and storage invoice. The registered tow truck operator shall
maintain a record evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that such
notification was provided.

(b)
Any person seeking to redeem an impounded vehicle under this section has a
right to a hearing in the district or municipal court for the jurisdiction in
which the vehicle was impounded to contest the validity of the impoundment or
the amount of towing and storage charges. The district court has jurisdiction
to determine the issues involving all impoundments including those authorized
by the state or its agents. The municipal court has jurisdiction to determine
the issues involving impoundments authorized by agents of the municipality.
Any request for a hearing shall be made in writing on the form provided for
that purpose and must be received by the appropriate court within ten days of
the date the opportunity was provided for in subsection (2)(a) of this section
and more than five days before the date of the auction. At the time of the
filing of the hearing request, the petitioner shall pay to the court clerk a
filing fee in the same amount required for the filing of a suit in district
court. If the hearing request is not received by the court within the ten-day
period, the right to a hearing is waived and the registered owner is liable for
any towing, storage, or other impoundment charges permitted under this
chapter. Upon receipt of a timely hearing request, the court shall proceed to
hear and determine the validity of the impoundment.

(3)(a)
The court, within five days after the request for a hearing, shall notify the
registered tow truck operator, the person requesting the hearing if not the
owner, the registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, and the person or agency
authorizing the impound in writing of the hearing date and time.

(b)
At the hearing, the person or persons requesting the hearing may produce any
relevant evidence to show that the impoundment, towing, or storage fees charged
were not proper. The court may consider a written report made under oath by
the officer who authorized the impoundment in lieu of the officer's personal
appearance at the hearing.

(c)
At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine whether the
impoundment was proper, whether the towing or storage fees charged were in
compliance with the posted rates, and who is responsible for payment of the
fees. The court may not adjust fees or charges that are in compliance with the
posted or contracted rates.

(d)
If the impoundment is found proper, the impoundment, towing, and storage fees
as permitted under this chapter together with court costs shall be assessed against
the person or persons requesting the hearing, unless the operator did not have
a signed and valid impoundment authorization from a private property owner or
an authorized agent.

(e)
If the impoundment is determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the
registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other item of personal property
registered or titled with the department shall bear no impoundment, towing, or
storage fees, and any security shall be returned or discharged as appropriate,
and the person or agency who authorized the impoundment shall be liable for any
towing, storage, or other impoundment fees permitted under this chapter. The
court shall enter judgment in favor of the registered tow truck operator
against the person or agency authorizing the impound for the impoundment,
towing, and storage fees paid. In addition, the court shall enter judgment in
favor of the registered and legal owners of the vehicle, or other item of
personal property registered or titled with the department, for the amount of
the filing fee required by law for the impound hearing petition as well as
reasonable damages for loss of the use of the vehicle during the time the same
was impounded, for not less than fifty dollars per day, against the person or
agency authorizing the impound. However, if an impoundment arising from an
alleged violation of RCW 46.20.342 or ((46.20.420)) 46.20.345 is
determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the law enforcement officer
directing the impoundment and the government employing the officer are not
liable for damages if the officer relied in good faith and without gross
negligence on the records of the department in ascertaining that the operator
of the vehicle had a suspended or revoked driver's license. If any judgment
entered is not paid within fifteen days of notice in writing of its entry, the
court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs against the defendant in
any action to enforce the judgment. Notice of entry of judgment may be made by
registered or certified mail, and proof of mailing may be made by affidavit of
the party mailing the notice. Notice of the entry of the judgment shall read
essentially as follows:

TO:
. . . . . .

YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED JUDGMENT was entered against you
in the . . . . . . Court located at
. . . . . . in the sum of
$. . . . . ., in an action entitled
. . . . . ., Case No. . . . . YOU ARE
FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys fees and costs will be awarded against you
under RCW . . . if the judgment is not paid within 15 days of the
date of this notice.

DATED this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., (year) . . .

Signature ..................

Typed name and address

of
party mailing notice

(4) Any impounded abandoned vehicle or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department that is not redeemed within fifteen
days of mailing of the notice of custody and sale as required by RCW
46.55.110(3) shall be sold at public auction in accordance with all the
provisions and subject to all the conditions of RCW 46.55.130. A vehicle or
item of personal property registered or titled with the department may be
redeemed at any time before the start of the auction upon payment of the applicable
towing and storage fees.

---
END ---