BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
57.12.015 and 1996 c 230 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the event a three-member board of commissioners of any district with any
number of customers determines by resolution that it would be in the best
interest of the district to increase the number of commissioners from three to
five, or if the board of a district with any number of customers is presented
with a petition signed by ten percent of the registered voters resident within
the district who voted in the last general municipal election calling for an
increase in the number of commissioners of the district, the board shall submit
a resolution to the county auditor requesting that an election be held. Upon
receipt of the resolution, the county auditor shall call a special election to
be held within the district, at which election a proposition in substantially
the following language shall be submitted to the voters:

Shall the Board of Commissioners of (name
and/or number of district) be
increased from three to five members?

Yes . . . . .

No . . . . .

If the
proposition receives a majority approval at the election the board of
commissioners of the district shall be increased to five members.

(2)(a)
In any district with more than ten thousand customers, if a three-member board
of commissioners determines by resolution that it would be in the best interest
of the district to increase the number of commissioners from three to five, the
number of commissioners shall be so increased without an election, unless
within ninety days of adoption of that resolution a petition requesting an
election and signed by at least ten percent of the registered voters who voted
in the last municipal general election is filed with the board. If such a
petition is received, the board shall submit the resolution and the petition to
the county auditor, who shall call a special election in the manner described
in this section.

(b)
In any district with more than twenty-five thousand customers, if a
three-member or five-member board of commissioners determines by resolution
that it would be in the best interest of the district to increase the number of
commissioners from five to seven, the number of commissioners shall be so increased
without an election, unless within ninety days of adoption of that resolution a
petition requesting an election and signed by at least ten percent of the
registered voters who voted in the last municipal general election is filed
with the board. If such a petition is received, the board shall submit the
resolution and the petition to the county auditor, who shall call a special
election in the manner described in this section.

(3)
The two additional positions created on boards of commissioners by this section
shall be filled initially as for a vacancy, except that the appointees shall
draw lots, one appointee to serve until the next district general election
after the appointment, at which two commissioners shall be elected for six-year
terms, and the other appointee to serve until the second district general
election after the appointment, at which two commissioners shall be elected for
six-year terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
57.08.110 (Association of commissioners‑-Purposes‑-Powers‑-Expenses)
and 1999 c 153 s 13, 1996 c 230 s 318, 1995 c 301 s 76, 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s
68, 1970 ex.s. c 47 s 5, & 1961 c 242 s 1 are each repealed.

---
END ---