BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Approval" of a project that impacts wetlands includes the issuance
by any state agency of any regulatory permit, water quality certification, or
other regulatory action approving or conditioning the project.

(2)
"Compensatory mitigation" means the restoration, creation, or
enhancement of wetlands for the purpose of compensating for unavoidable adverse
impacts that remain after all appropriate and practicable avoidance and
minimization has been achieved.

(3)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(4)
"Off-site compensatory mitigation" and "off-site
mitigation" means compensatory mitigation undertaken at a location other
than the project site.

(5)
"Project site" means all contiguous real property used or proposed to
be used for the project and compensatory mitigation of wetland or other
impacts.

(6)
"Watershed" means an area identified as a water resource inventory
area under WAC 173-500-040 as it exists on the effective date of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. DOCUMENTING
SEQUENCING OF ALTERNATIVES. The administrative record developed by a state
agency approving off-site compensatory mitigation shall document and explain
the agency's determination that adverse impacts to wetlands are unavoidable and
that all appropriate and practicable avoidance and minimization of impacts has
been achieved.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
OPERATIONAL STANDARDS FOR OFF-SITE MITIGATION. (1) A state agency approving
off-site compensatory mitigation shall:

(a)
Require the project proponent to demonstrate financial assurance to fund the
cost of monitoring and maintenance of the mitigation site for the operational
life of the mitigation site;

(b)
Require the project proponent to award the contract for monitoring and site
maintenance no later than the date upon which the agency determines the
mitigation site construction work to be complete;

(c)
Require the project proponent or the proponent's authorized contractor to
submit periodic monitoring reports regarding the mitigation site's progress
toward meeting mitigation objectives; and

(d)
Develop a schedule for the state agency or lead state agency to periodically
review monitoring reports, make independent site inspections, and independently
assess the mitigation site's progress toward meeting mitigation objectives.

(2)
When more than one state agency has regulatory jurisdiction over the approval
of a project involving off-site compensatory mitigation, the agencies shall
coordinate their responsibilities under this chapter and may designate a lead
agency in applying this chapter to a project.

(3)
The department may adopt policies to provide further guidance to state agencies
in implementing this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
ASSESSMENT. The department of natural resources shall conduct an assessment of
off-site compensatory mitigation projects and submit a report on its findings
and recommendations to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature
no later than December 31, 2000. The assessment shall include a review of
existing studies on the performance of off-site compensatory mitigation in
meeting mitigation objectives established in project approvals, and the
processes and standards typically used in the state in approving and monitoring
such mitigation. The assessment shall also include a review of a
representative selection of individual mitigation sites in a variety of
ecological settings and geographical areas of the state. State agencies having
wetland regulatory responsibilities shall assist the department in the review
by providing information on currently operating mitigation sites approved by
the agencies. The department shall consult with stakeholder interests, as well
as local, state, and federal wetland regulatory agencies in conducting the
report.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 90.74 RCW to read as follows:

The
departments of ecology and fish and wildlife shall implement this chapter
consistent with sections 1 through 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act apply to any state agency approval of a
project that impacts wetlands where the approval is made on or after January 1,
2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Captions used in this act constitute no part of the law.

---
END ---