BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Children with physical, mental, or behavioral needs present complex challenges
to child care providers. To assure that the child care system has capable
providers willing to serve children with special needs, the legislature finds
that training and technical assistance opportunities for child care providers
require expansion to include an emphasis on serving children with special
needs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

A
scholarship program is created for child care providers seeking training to
enable them to competently serve children with special needs. Child care
providers are eligible for the scholarship program if they: (1) Currently
serve children with special needs; or (2) are seeking to enhance their skills
so that they may serve children with special needs in the future. The
scholarship program shall be coordinated with, and is intended to supplement,
training funds available to the state training and registration system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

The
local child care resource and referral agencies are authorized to coordinate
outreach and recruitment services, training, technical assistance, and
consultation services, including access to mental health consultations for:
(1) Child care providers currently serving children with special needs; and (2)
child care providers seeking to enhance their skills so that they may serve
children with special needs in the future.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 70.05 RCW to read as follows:

Each local health department shall have available one full-time
nurse consultant to provide assessment and consultation to parents of children
with special needs and to child care providers serving children with special
needs.

---
END ---