BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.48.020 and 1995 c 255 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

((Whenever
the word)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Person" ((is used in this chapter, it shall be construed
to)) includes any political subdivision, government agency,
municipality, industry, public or private corporation, copartnership,
association, firm, individuals or any other entity whatsoever.

((Wherever
the words)) (2) "Waters of the state" ((shall be
used in this chapter, they shall be construed to)) includes lakes,
rivers, ponds, streams, inland waters, underground waters, salt waters,
and all other surface waters and watercourses within the jurisdiction of the
state of Washington.

((Whenever
the word)) (3) "Pollution" ((is used in this
chapter, it shall be construed to)) means such contamination, or
other alteration of the physical, chemical, or biological properties, of
any waters of the state, including change in temperature, taste, color,
turbidity, or odor of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid, gaseous,
solid, radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the state as will or
is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters harmful, detrimental,
or injurious to the public health, safety, or welfare, or to domestic,
commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or other legitimate
beneficial uses, or to livestock, wild animals, birds, fish or other aquatic
life.

((Wherever
the word)) (4) "Department" ((is used in this
chapter it shall)) means the department of ecology.

((Whenever
the word)) (5) "Director" ((is used in this
chapter it shall)) means the director of ecology.

((Whenever
the words)) (6) "Aquatic noxious weed" ((are
used in this chapter, they have)) has the same meaning as
prescribed under RCW 17.26.020.

(7)
"Dairy farm" means any farm licensed to produce milk under chapter
15.36 RCW.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.48.390 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

The
coastal protection fund is established to be used by the department as a
revolving fund for carrying out the purposes of restoration of natural
resources under this chapter and chapter 90.56 RCW. To this fund there shall
be credited penalties, fees, damages, charges received pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter and chapter 90.56 RCW, compensation for damages
received under this chapter and chapter 90.56 RCW, and an amount equivalent to
one cent per gallon from each marine use refund claim under RCW 82.36.330. However,
notwithstanding any other provision of law, dairy farm-related penalties
received under the provisions of this chapter shall be credited to the dairy
nutrient management account as provided in RCW 90.64.150.

Moneys
in the fund not needed currently to meet the obligations of the department in
the exercise of its powers, duties, and functions under RCW 90.48.142,
90.48.366, 90.48.367, and 90.48.368 shall be deposited with the state treasurer
to the credit of the fund.

Sec.
3. RCW
90.64.150 and 1998 c 262 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The
dairy ((waste)) nutrient management account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from monetary penalties levied
pursuant to violations of this chapter and from dairy farm-related
violations of chapter 90.48 RCW must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the commission to provide
grants to local conservation districts for the sole purpose of assisting dairy
producers to develop and fully implement dairy nutrient management plans. Only
the ((chairman)) chair of the commission or the ((chairman's))
chair's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
Complying with the laws regarding dairy nutrient management is a burdensome yet
laudable task that the dairy farmers of this state have undertaken;

(2)
The dairy nutrient management standards and specifications of the natural
resources conservation service were the most rigorous in the nation when the
dairy nutrient management act was enacted in 1998;

(3)
Those standards, as they existed in 1998, continue to be appropriate standards
for proper management of dairy nutrients, despite modification by the natural
resources conservation service since 1998;

(4)
Dairy farmers cannot comply with constantly changing requirements. The
uncertainty constant change creates is an unnecessary drain on limited
resources; and

(5)
If management standards change substantively, there should be a method for all
parties concerned with proper dairy nutrient management to consider and
implement changes without causing disruption, uncertainty, or an unnecessary
drain on resources.

Sec.
5. RCW
90.64.026 and 1998 c 262 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except for those producers who already have a certified dairy nutrient
management plan as required under the terms and conditions of an individual or
general national pollutant discharge elimination system permit, all dairy
producers licensed under chapter 15.36 RCW, regardless of size, shall prepare a
dairy nutrient management plan. If at any time a dairy nutrient management
plan fails to prevent the discharge of pollutants to waters of the state, it
shall be required to be updated.

(2)
By November 1, 1998, the conservation commission, in conjunction with the
advisory and oversight committee established under section 8 of this act shall
develop a document clearly describing the elements that a dairy nutrient
management plan must contain to gain local conservation district approval.

(3)
In developing the elements that an approved dairy nutrient management plan must
contain, the commission may authorize the use of other methods and technologies
than those developed by the natural resources conservation service when such
alternatives have been evaluated by the advisory and oversight committee.
Alternative methods and technologies shall meet the standards and
specifications of:

(a)
The natural resources conservation service, as those standards and
specifications existed on July 1, 1998, and as modified by the
geographically based standards developed under RCW 90.64.140; or

(b)
A professional engineer with expertise in the area of dairy nutrient
management.

(4)
In evaluating alternative technologies and methods, the principal objectives of
the committee's evaluation shall be determining:

(a)
Whether there is a substantial likelihood that, once implemented, the
alternative technologies and methods would not violate water quality
requirements;

(b)
Whether more cost-effective methods can be successfully implemented in some or
all categories of dairy operations; and

(c)
Whether the technologies and methods approved or provided by the natural
resources conservation service for use by confined animal feeding operations
are necessarily required for other categories of dairy operations.

In
addition, the committee shall encourage the conservation commission and the
conservation districts to apply in dairy nutrient management plans technologies
and methods that are appropriate to the needs of the specific type of operation
and the specific farm site and to avoid imposing requirements that are not
necessary for the specific dairy producer to achieve compliance with water
quality requirements.

(5)
Such plans shall be submitted for approval to the local conservation district
where the dairy farm is located, and shall be approved by conservation
districts no later than by July 1, 2002. The conservation commission, in
conjunction with conservation districts, shall develop a state-wide schedule of
plan development and approval to ensure adequate resources are available to
have all plans approved by July 1, 2002.

(6)
If a dairy producer leases land for dairy production from an owner who has
prohibited the development of capital improvements, such as storage lagoons, on
the leased property, the dairy producer shall indicate in his or her dairy
nutrient management plan that such improvements are prohibited by the landowner
and shall describe other methods, such as land application, that will be
employed by the dairy producer to manage dairy nutrients.

(7)
Notwithstanding the timelines in this section, any dairy farm licensed after
September 1, 1998, shall have six months from the date of licensing to develop
a dairy nutrient management plan and another eighteen months to fully implement
that plan.

(8)
If a plan contains the elements identified in subsection (2) of this section, a
conservation district shall approve the plan no later than ninety days after
receiving the plan. If the plan does not contain the elements identified in
subsection (2) of this section, the local conservation district shall notify
the dairy producer in writing of modifications needed in the plan no later than
ninety days after receiving the plan. The dairy producer shall provide a
revised plan that includes the needed modifications within ninety days of the
date of the local conservation district notification. If the dairy producer
does not agree with, or otherwise takes exception to, the modifications
requested by the local conservation district, the dairy producer may initiate
the appeals process described in RCW 90.64.028 within thirty days of receiving
the letter of notification.

(9)
An approved plan shall be certified by a conservation district and a dairy
producer when the elements necessary to implement the plan have been
constructed or otherwise put in place, and are being used as designed and
intended. A certification form shall be developed by the conservation
commission for use state-wide and shall provide for a signature by both a
conservation district representative and a dairy producer. Certification forms
shall be signed by December 31, 2003, and a copy provided to the department for
recording in the data base established in RCW 90.64.130.

(10)
The ability of dairy producers to comply with the planning requirements of this
chapter depends, in many cases, on the availability of federal and state
funding to support technical assistance provided by local conservation
districts. Dairy producers shall not be held responsible for noncompliance
with the planning requirements of this chapter if conservation districts are
unable to perform their duties under this chapter because of insufficient
funding.

(11)
The conservation commission may, after public hearing and due consideration,
including comment from the department of ecology, adopt standards and
specifications of the natural resources conservation service that were not in
existence on July 1, 1998. Producers affected by new standards and
specifications have five years from the date the commission adopts the new
standards and specifications to comply with the new standards and specifications.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
In consultation with the state conservation commission and local conservation
districts, the office of financial management shall develop recommendations to
provide adequate funding for the dairy nutrient management program established
pursuant to chapter 90.64 RCW. The recommendations shall include an
identification of need, if any, for additional funding for each of the
following purposes: (a) To perform functions required by conservation
districts and the state conservation commission; (b) to provide technical
assistance for development of plans; and (c) for cost-share moneys for
implementation of the plans based on fifty percent of the eligible costs to be
derived from public sources. The recommendations shall be for the amount of
funding required each fiscal year for these purposes assuming that the
deadlines established in chapter 262, Laws of 1998 will be met.

(2)
The office of financial management shall submit its written recommendations to
the co-chief clerks of the house of representatives and the secretary of the
senate before December 20, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
Dairy nutrient management involves the knowledge of many areas and the
possession of many skills besides engineering;

(2)
While engineering is important to a correctly designed system, it is only part
of the necessary skills, specialized knowledge, and considerations required to
create proper dairy nutrient management; and

(3)
Trained technicians, with the help of established technical manuals and
guidelines, and working in consultation with a professional engineer when
appropriate, can design and implement proper dairy nutrient management systems.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 90.64 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Work carried out by technical assistance teams in order to comply with this
chapter meets the requirements of chapter 18.43 RCW. Professional engineers
may work in conjunction with technicians and need not have direct supervision
over technicians in implementing this chapter.

(2)
The provisions of this section apply to all dairy nutrient management plans
developed under this chapter, whether developed prior to or after the effective
date of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The
legislature finds that substantial progress has been made in implementing the
dairy nutrient management act since its enactment in 1998. Though the involved
agencies and interest groups are cooperatively working to meet the deadlines
established in that legislation, insufficiency of funding or unexpected
obstacles, if not quickly remedied, will cause a delay in the implementation of
the legislation and noncompliance with established deadlines.

The
purpose of section 10 of this act is to combine, for a limited duration, the
advisory and oversight committee with the dairy nutrient management task force
that includes legislative participation to provide continuity to monitoring and
problem-solving efforts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1) A
dairy nutrient management task force is reestablished. The task force shall be
comprised of up to fourteen members, appointed as follows:

(a)
Two members of the house of representatives, one from each major caucus, who
were appointed by the co-speakers of the house of representatives in accordance
with chapter 262, Laws of 1999, and who served on the original task force;

(b)
Two members of the senate, one from each major caucus, who were appointed by
the president of the senate in accordance with chapter 262, Laws of 1999, and
who served on the original task force;

(c)
A representative of the department of ecology, appointed by the director of
ecology;

(d)
A representative of the state conservation commission, appointed by its
executive secretary;

(e)
A representative of local conservation districts, appointed by the president of
a state-wide association of conservation districts;

(f)
Three active dairy farmers or representatives of dairy farmers, appointed by a
state-wide organization representing dairy farmers in the state, who shall
represent the different regions and different sizes of dairy operations;

(g)
A representative of an environmental organization with familiarity and
expertise in water quality issues who was appointed to the dairy nutrient
management task force by the co-speakers of the house of representatives and
the president of the senate in accordance with chapter 262, Laws of 1999;

(h)
A representative of shellfish growers, appointed by the president of an
association of coastal shellfish growers; and

(i)
In addition to other members appointed under this subsection (1) the following
shall be invited to participate as nonvoting members:

(i)
A representative of the federal natural resource conservation service appointed
by the state conservationist;

(ii)
A representative of the federal environmental protection agency appointed by
the regional director of the environmental protection agency;

(iii)
A representative of local health districts appointed by the president of a state-wide
association of local health districts; and

(iv)
A representative of the office of financial management.

(2)
The entity that originally appointed members to the task force may change the
appointment or appoint a successor.

(3)
The task force shall meet two times per year, or more if necessary, to monitor
the progress and provide oversight of the dairy nutrient management program
administered by the department of ecology, the conservation commission, and
local conservation districts. The task force shall include but not be limited
to examination of the following topics:

(a)
Determining whether the necessary progress is being attained so that deadlines
established in chapter 262, Laws of 1998, for the development, approval, implementation,
and final certification of dairy nutrient management plans will be achieved;

(b)
Better assurance of consistency in interpretations between staff that conduct
inspections, and between inspectors and staff that design and approve dairy
nutrient management plans;

(c)
What constitutes waters of the state for purposes of the dairy nutrient
management program;

(d)
Clarification of what constitutes a violation, including a review of the
federal environmental protection agency guidance manual, and whether there must
be an actual discharge and/or exceedance of state water quality standards;

(e)
Clarification as to the circumstances under which dairy operations are
responsible to control flood waters arising from outside of the dairy operation
to prevent mixing with dairy nutrients including flood waters that arise during
major flood events;

(f)
A review of materials provided by state agencies to dairy farmers regarding
dairy nutrient management inspections;

(g)
Reviewing changes in any standards used in the development and approval of
dairy nutrient management plans;

(h)
Monitoring the development of and reviewing recommendations for adequate
funding for the various components of the program; and

(i)
Resolution of the conflict between the state public records laws and federal
privacy laws in regards to processing of requests for dairy nutrient management
plans when requests are submitted to staff that operate under different
directives but share common office space.

(4)
By December 10th of each year, the task force shall:

(a)
Provide recommendations to the department of ecology, to the conservation
commission, and to local conservation districts for improvements in the
implementation of the dairy nutrient management program; and

(b)
Provide recommendations and proposed legislation to the legislature containing
statutory changes to clarify and improve the operations of various facets of
the program.

(5)
The task force shall convene as soon as possible upon appointment of its
members. The task force shall elect a chair or co-chairs from among the
legislative members and adopt rules for conducting the business of the task
force. Staff support for the task force shall be provided by the department of
ecology.

(6)
This section expires June 30, 2004.

Sec.
11. RCW
90.64.050 and 1998 c 262 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department has the following duties:

(a)
Identify existing or substantial potential water quality problems
resulting from dairy farms through implementation of the inspection program in
RCW 90.64.023;

(b)
Inspect a dairy farm upon the request of a dairy producer;

(c)
Receive, process, and verify complaints concerning discharge of pollutants from
all dairy farms;

(d)
Determine if a dairy-related water quality problem requires immediate
corrective action under the Washington state water pollution control laws,
chapter 90.48 RCW, or the Washington state water quality standards adopted
under chapter 90.48 RCW. The department shall maintain the lead enforcement
responsibility;

(e)
Administer and enforce national pollutant discharge elimination system permits
for operators of concentrated dairy animal feeding operations, where required
by federal regulations and state laws or upon request of a dairy producer;

(f)
Participate on the advisory and oversight committee;

(g)
Encourage communication and cooperation between local department personnel and
the appropriate conservation district personnel;

(h)
Require the use of dairy nutrient management plans as required under this
chapter for entities required to plan under this chapter; and

(i)
Provide to the commission and the advisory and oversight committee an annual
report of dairy farm inspection and enforcement activities.

(2)
The department may not delegate its responsibilities in enforcement.

Sec.
12. RCW
90.64.005 and 1998 c 262 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that there is a need to establish a clear and understandable
process that provides for the proper and effective management of dairy
nutrients that affect the quality of surface or ground waters in the state of
Washington. The legislature finds that there is a need for a program that will
provide a stable and predictable business climate upon which dairy farms may
base future investment decisions.

The
legislature finds that federal regulations require a permit program for dairies
with over seven hundred head of mature cows and, other specified dairy farms
that directly discharge into waters or are otherwise significant contributors
of pollution. The legislature finds that significant work has been ongoing
over a period of time and that the intent of this chapter is to take the consensus
that has been developed and place it into statutory form.

It
is also the intent of this chapter to establish an inspection and technical
assistance program for dairy farms to address the discharge of pollution to
surface and ground waters of the state that will lead to water quality
compliance by the industry. A further purpose is to create a balanced program
involving technical assistance, regulation, and enforcement with coordination
and oversight of the program by a committee composed of industry, agency, and
other representatives. Furthermore, it is the objective of this chapter to
maintain the administration of the water quality program as it relates to dairy
operations at the state level.

It
is also the intent of this chapter to recognize the existing working
relationships between conservation districts, the conservation commission, and
the department of ecology in protecting water quality of the state. A further
purpose of this chapter is to provide statutory recognition of the coordination
of the functions of conservation districts, the conservation commission, and
the department of ecology pertaining to development of dairy ((waste)) nutrient
management plans for the protection of water quality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---