BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.36.383 and 1999 c 358 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, except where the context clearly
indicates a different meaning:

(1)
The term "residence" means a single family dwelling unit whether such
unit be separate or part of a multiunit dwelling, including the land on which
such dwelling stands not to exceed one acre, except that a residence
includes any additional property up to a total of five acres that comprises the
residential parcel if this larger parcel size is required under land use
regulations. The term shall also include a share ownership in a
cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership if the person
claiming exemption can establish that his or her share represents the specific
unit or portion of such structure in which he or she resides. The term shall
also include a single family dwelling situated upon lands the fee of which is
vested in the United States or any instrumentality thereof including an Indian
tribe or in the state of Washington, and notwithstanding the provisions of RCW
84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a residence shall be deemed real property.

(2)
The term "real property" shall also include a mobile home which has
substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being fixed
in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile home and
placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe, connections with
sewer, water, or other utilities. A mobile home located on land leased by the
owner of the mobile home is subject, for tax billing, payment, and collection
purposes, only to the personal property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW
84.60.040.

(3)
"Department" means the state department of revenue.

(4)
"Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the
person claiming the exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her spouse,
and the disposable income of each cotenant occupying the residence for the
assessment year, less amounts paid by the person claiming the exemption or his
or her spouse during the assessment year for:

(a)
Drugs supplied by prescription of a medical practitioner authorized by the laws
of this state or another jurisdiction to issue prescriptions; and

(b)
The treatment or care of either person received in the home or in a nursing
home.

(5)
"Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in the
federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989, or such
subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose
of this section, plus all of the following items to the extent they are not
included in or have been deducted from adjusted gross income:

(a)
Capital gains, other than gain excluded from income under section 121 of the
federal internal revenue code to the extent it is reinvested in a new principal
residence;

(b)
Amounts deducted for loss;

(c)
Amounts deducted for depreciation;

(d)
Pension and annuity receipts;

(e)
Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(f)
Veterans benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(g)
Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;

(h)
Dividend receipts; and

(i)
Interest received on state and municipal bonds.

(6)
"Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming the
exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.38.020 and 1997 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and
phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall have the following meanings:

(1)
"Claimant" means a person who either elects or is required under RCW
84.64.050 to defer payment of the special assessments and/or real property
taxes accrued on the claimant's residence by filing a declaration to defer as
provided by this chapter.

When
two or more individuals of a household file or seek to file a declaration to
defer, they may determine between them as to who the claimant shall be.

(2)
"Department" means the state department of revenue.

(3)
"Equity value" means the amount by which the fair market value of a
residence as determined from the records of the county assessor exceeds the
total amount of any liens or other obligations against the property.

(4)
"Local government" means any city, town, county, water-sewer
district, public utility district, port district, irrigation district, flood
control district, or any other municipal corporation, quasi-municipal
corporation, or other political subdivision authorized to levy special
assessments.

(5)
"Real property taxes" means ad valorem property taxes levied on a
residence in this state in the preceding calendar year.

(6)
"Residence" has the meaning given in RCW 84.36.383((, except that
a residence includes any additional property up to a total of five acres that
comprises the residential parcel if this larger parcel size is required under
land use regulations)).

(7)
"Special assessment" means the charge or obligation imposed by a
local government upon property specially benefited.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act
applies to taxes levied for collection in 2001 and thereafter.

---
END ---