BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW to read as follows:

Any marina in the state which leases permanent moorage to vessels
must require proof of vessel registration or proof of intent to register a
vessel as a condition of leasing moorage space. The marina must inform the
moorage applicant of the state law requiring vessel registration and direct the
moorage applicant to the appropriate vessel registration forms. After this, it
is the moorage applicant's responsibility to register the vessel. The marina
shall report to the department of licensing at the end of each month the names,
addresses, and vessel identification information of any unregistered vessels
leasing moorage space.

---
END ---