BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature intends to relieve the courts of this state from unnecessary
congestion resulting from claims involving products which are lawful, used as
intended, and not inherently unsafe. The legislature also intends to provide
reasonable predictability in commercial production and transactions and
mitigate unnecessary costs of insurance. Nothing in this act is intended, and
shall not be construed as, restricting in any way recovery for damages
resulting from products which are defectively designed or manufactured or which
are inherently unsafe.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There shall be no cause of action for damages in any superior, district, or municipal
court in Washington against the manufacturer, distributor, or seller of any
product when:

(a)
The product is a lawful product; and

(b)
The product is used as intended and is not inherently unsafe.

(2)
For purposes of this section, "not inherently unsafe" means a lawful
product which, when used in the manner intended by the manufacturer,
distributor, or seller, does not result in injury, disease, or death.

(3)
Nothing in this section prevents the use of any lawful product to prevent
unlawful harm to an individual. Such use shall not be the basis for any cause
of action against the manufacturer, distributor, or seller of the product.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---