BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.391 and 1999 c 274 s 4 and 1999 c 272 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Any person licensed under this chapter who is convicted of an offense relating
to motor vehicles for which suspension or revocation of the driver's license is
mandatory, other than vehicular homicide or vehicular assault, or who has had
his or her license suspended under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), may submit
to the department an application for an occupational driver's license. The
department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee and upon determining that the
petitioner is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential that
the petitioner operate a motor vehicle, may issue an occupational driver's license
and may set definite restrictions as provided in RCW 46.20.394. No person may
petition for, and the department shall not issue, an occupational driver's
license that is effective during the first thirty days of any suspension or
revocation imposed either for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or
under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), or for both a violation of RCW 46.61.502
or 46.61.504 and under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a) where the action arises
from the same incident. A person aggrieved by the decision of the department
on the application for an occupational driver's license may request a hearing
as provided by rule of the department.

(2)(a)
A person licensed under this chapter whose driver's license is suspended
administratively due to failure to appear or pay a traffic ticket under RCW
46.20.289; a violation of the financial responsibility laws under chapter 46.29
RCW; or for multiple violations within a specified period of time under RCW
46.20.291, may apply to the department for an occupational driver's license if
the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that one of
the following additional conditions are met:

(i)
The applicant is in an apprenticeship program or an on-the-job training program
for which a driver's license is required;

(ii)
The applicant presents evidence that he or she has applied for a position in an
apprenticeship or on-the-job training program and the program has certified
that a driver's license is required to begin the program, provided that a
license granted under this provision shall be in effect no longer than fourteen
days;

(iii)
The applicant is in a program that assists persons who are enrolled in a
WorkFirst program pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to become gainfully employed
and the program requires a driver's license; or

(iv)
The applicant is undergoing substance abuse treatment or is participating in
meetings of a twelve-step group such as alcoholics anonymous.

(b)
If the suspension is for failure to respond, pay, or comply with a notice of
traffic infraction or conviction, the applicant must enter into a payment plan
with the court.

(c)
An occupational driver's license issued to an applicant described in (a) of
this subsection shall be valid for the period of the suspension or revocation
but not more than two years.

(d)
Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an occupational driver's license
granted under this subsection is no longer enrolled in an apprenticeship or
on-the-job training program, the director shall give written notice by first
class mail to the driver that the occupational driver's license shall be
canceled. The effective date of cancellation shall be fifteen days from the
date of mailing the notice. If at any time before the cancellation goes into
effect the driver submits evidence of continued enrollment in the program, the
cancellation shall be stayed. If the cancellation becomes effective, the
driver may obtain, at no additional charge, a new occupational driver's license
upon submittal of evidence of enrollment in another program that meets the
criteria set forth in this subsection.

(e)
The department shall not issue an occupational driver's license under (a)(iv)
of this subsection if the applicant is able to receive transit services
sufficient to allow for the applicant's participation in the programs
referenced under (a)(iv) of this subsection.

(3)
An applicant for an occupational driver's license is eligible to receive such
license only if:

(a)
Within one year immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise to
the present conviction, the applicant has not committed any offense relating to
motor vehicles for which suspension or revocation of a driver's license is
mandatory; and

(b)
Within seven years immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise
to the present conviction or incident, the applicant has not committed any of
the following offenses: (i) Driving or being in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor; (ii) vehicular
homicide under RCW 46.61.520; or (iii) vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522;
and

(c)
The applicant is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential that
he or she operate a motor vehicle, except as allowed under subsection (2)(a) of
this section; and

(d)
The applicant files satisfactory proof of financial responsibility under
chapter 46.29 RCW; and

(e)
The applicant, where subject to suspension or revocation under RCW 46.61.502,
46.61.504, 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), provides to the department proof of
installation of an ignition interlock or other biological or technical device
on his or her vehicle from a provider certified by the Washington state
patrol. The Washington state patrol shall revoke the certification of a
provider that issues any false or inaccurate form of proof of installation of
an ignition interlock or other biological or technical device.

(4)
The director shall cancel an occupational driver's license upon receipt of
notice that the holder thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle
in violation of its restrictions, or of a separate offense that under chapter
46.20 RCW would warrant suspension or revocation of a regular driver's
license. The cancellation is effective as of the date of the conviction, and continues
with the same force and effect as any suspension or revocation under this
title.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.720 and 1999 c 331 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The court may order that after a period of suspension, revocation, or denial of
driving privileges, and for up to as long as the court has jurisdiction, any
person convicted of any offense involving the use, consumption, or possession
of alcohol while operating a motor vehicle may drive only a motor vehicle equipped
with a functioning ignition interlock or other biological or technical device.

(2)
If a person is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an
equivalent local ordinance and it is((: (a))) the person's first
or subsequent conviction or a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05
RCW ((and his or her alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or by reason
of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there
is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration; or (b) the
person's second or subsequent conviction; or (c) the person's first conviction
and the person has a previous deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW or
it is a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW and the person has a
previous conviction)), the court shall order that after any applicable
period of suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges, the person
may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock
or other biological or technical device. The court may waive the requirement
for the use of such a device if the court makes a specific finding in writing
that such devices are not reasonably available in the local area. Nothing in
this section may be interpreted as entitling a person to more than one deferred
prosecution.

(3)
The court shall establish a specific calibration setting at which the ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device will prevent the motor
vehicle from being started and the period of time that the person shall be
subject to the restriction. In the case of a person under subsection (2) of
this section, the period of time of the restriction will be as follows:

(a)
For a person (i) who is subject to RCW 46.61.5055 (1)(((b))), (2), or
(3), or who is subject to a deferred prosecution program under chapter 10.05
RCW, and (ii) who has not previously been restricted under this section, a
period of not less than one year;

(b)
For a person who has previously been restricted under (a) of this subsection, a
period of not less than five years;

(c)
For a person who has previously been restricted under (b) of this subsection, a
period of not less than ten years.

For
purposes of this section, "convicted" means being found guilty of an
offense or being placed on a deferred prosecution program under chapter 10.05
RCW.

(4)
Any person whose license is restricted to operating only a motor vehicle with
an ignition interlock device installed may operate an employer's vehicle
without an ignition interlock device installed during normal business
activities, provided that the person does not partly or entirely own or control
the employer's vehicle or business.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.61.5055 and 1999 c 324 s 5, 1999 c 274 s 6, and 1999 c 5 s 1 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who
has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than one year. Twenty-four
consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would
impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court
shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and
the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(a)(i),
the court may order not less than fifteen days of electronic home monitoring.
The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or
municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost.
The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to
include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the
amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended
or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than one year. Two
consecutive days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would
impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court
shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and
the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection
(1)(b)(i), the court may order not less than thirty days of electronic home
monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring.
The county or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall
determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court
may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the
offender is on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(2)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who
has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than one year and sixty
days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer,
and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and
sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than one year and
ninety days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost
of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is
being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer,
and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of imprisonment
and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended
or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(3)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who
has two or more prior offenses within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than one year and one
hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for
the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the
penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require
the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Ninety days of
imprisonment and one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring may not
be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this
mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended
or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is
based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor more than one year
and one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall
pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality
where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may
also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an
alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred fifty days
of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the
mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon
which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(4)
In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the limits allowed by
this section, the court shall particularly consider the following:

(a)
Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was responsible for
injury or damage to another or another's property; and

(b)
Whether the person was driving or in physical control of a vehicle with one or
more passengers at the time of the offense.

(5)
An offender punishable under this section is subject to the alcohol assessment
and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.

(6)
The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person convicted of driving
or being in physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs must:

(a)
If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308
there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i)
Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be suspended or
denied by the department for ninety days;

(ii)
Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied
by the department for two years; or

(iii)
Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked
or denied by the department for three years;

(b)
If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or if by reason of the
person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test
result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i)
Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied
by the department for one year: PROVIDED, That in the case of a person
whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, the person may make application
for a new license after the expiration of six months from the date the license
or privilege to drive was revoked if the applicant provides the department with
proof of installation of an ignition interlock or other biological or technical
device on his or her vehicle. The applicant must agree to operate no other
vehicle for a period of one year from the date of issuance of a new license
except as allowed in RCW 46.20.720(4);

(ii)
Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied
by the department for nine hundred days; or

(iii)
Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked
or denied by the department for four years.

For
purposes of this subsection, the department shall refer to the driver's record
maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the existence of prior
offenses.

(7)
After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or denial of the
offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive required by this section, the
department shall place the offender's driving privilege in probationary status
pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.

(8)(a)
In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence required by
this section, whenever the court imposes less than one year in jail, the court
shall also suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not
exceeding five years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that
include: (i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this state without a valid
license to drive and proof of financial responsibility for the future; (ii) not
driving a motor vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration
of 0.08 or more within two hours after driving; and (iii) not refusing to
submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol
concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who has reasonable
grounds to believe the person was driving or was in actual physical control of
a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor. The court may impose conditions of probation that include
nonrepetition, installation of an ignition interlock or other biological or
technical device on the probationer's motor vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment,
supervised probation, or other conditions that may be appropriate. The
sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of
probation during the suspension period.

(b)
For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i) and (ii)
or (a)(i) and (iii) of this subsection, the court shall order the convicted
person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be suspended or
deferred.

(c)
For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory condition of probation
imposed under this subsection, the license, permit, or privilege to drive of
the person shall be suspended by the court for thirty days or, if such license,
permit, or privilege to drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the
time the finding of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or
denial then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall notify
the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any extension of a
suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection.

(9)
A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements of this chapter
when:

(a)
The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or any other
necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system;

(b)
The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or

(c)
The court determines that there is reason to believe that the offender would
violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring penalty.

Whenever
the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring is waived, the court
shall state in writing the reason for granting the waiver and the facts upon
which the waiver is based, and shall impose an alternative sentence with similar
punitive consequences. The alternative sentence may include, but is not
limited to, additional jail time, work crew, or work camp.

Whenever
the combination of jail time and electronic home monitoring or alternative
sentence would exceed three hundred sixty-five days, the offender shall serve
the jail portion of the sentence first, and the electronic home monitoring or
alternative portion of the sentence shall be reduced so that the combination
does not exceed three hundred sixty-five days.

(10)
An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or not a mandatory
minimum term has expired, may be granted an extraordinary medical placement by
the jail administrator subject to the standards and limitations set forth in
RCW 9.94A.150(4).

(11)
For purposes of this section:

(a)
A "prior offense" means any of the following:

(i)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ii)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(iii)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(iv)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(v)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050 or an
equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the result of a charge that
was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an
equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

(vi)
An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of
(a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this subsection if committed in this
state;

(vii)
A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a
violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance; or

(viii)
A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a
violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge
under which the deferred prosecution was granted was originally filed as a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or
of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522; and

(b)
"Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years of the arrest for the current offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the transportation budget,
this act is null and void.

---
END ---