BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.44.105 and 1999 c 23 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter is a traffic infraction, and
upon the first finding thereof shall be assessed a basic penalty of not less
than fifty dollars; and upon a second finding thereof shall be assessed a basic
penalty of not less than seventy-five dollars; and upon a third or subsequent
finding shall be assessed a basic penalty of not less than one hundred dollars.

(2)
In addition to the penalties imposed in subsection (1) of this section, any
person violating RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.090, 46.44.091, or
46.44.095 shall be assessed a penalty for each pound overweight, as follows:

(a)
One pound through four thousand pounds overweight is three cents for each
pound;

(b)
Four thousand one pounds through ten thousand pounds overweight is one hundred
twenty dollars plus twelve cents per pound for each additional pound over four
thousand pounds overweight;

(c)
Ten thousand one pounds through fifteen thousand pounds overweight is eight
hundred forty dollars plus sixteen cents per pound for each additional pound
over ten thousand pounds overweight;

(d)
Fifteen thousand one pounds through twenty thousand pounds overweight is one
thousand six hundred forty dollars plus twenty cents per pound for each
additional pound over fifteen thousand pounds overweight;

(e)
Twenty thousand one pounds and more is two thousand six hundred forty dollars
plus thirty cents per pound for each additional pound over twenty thousand
pounds overweight.

Upon
a first violation in any calendar year, the court may suspend the penalty for
five hundred pounds of excess weight for each axle on any vehicle or
combination of vehicles, not to exceed a two thousand pound suspension. In no
case may the basic penalty assessed in subsection (1) of this section or the
additional penalty assessed in subsection (2) of this section, except as
provided for the first violation, be suspended.

The
penalties provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section will be remitted
as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW or RCW 10.82.070.

(3)
A person who violates RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.090,
46.44.091, or 46.44.095, and the vehicle in question was fifteen percent or
more overweight, will also be assessed an additional penalty in the amount of
thirty percent of the penalties imposed by subsections (1) and (2) of this
section. All penalties collected under this subsection will be deposited with
the state treasurer and credited to the motor vehicle fund.

(4)
A person who violates RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.090,
46.44.091, or 46.44.095 must obtain the necessary special permits as required
by this chapter. As an additional penalty for operating without the proper
permit, the court may impose an additional penalty in an amount equal to the
cost of the proper permit. This additional penalty will be deposited with the
state treasurer and credited to the motor vehicle fund.

(5)
Whenever any vehicle or combination of vehicles is involved in two violations
of RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.090, 46.44.091, or 46.44.095
during any twelve-month period, the court may suspend the certificate of
license registration of the vehicle or combination of vehicles for not less
than thirty days. Upon a third or succeeding violation in any twelve-month
period, the court shall suspend the certificate of license registration for not
less than thirty days. Whenever the certificate of license registration is
suspended, the court shall secure such certificate and immediately forward the
same to the director with information concerning the suspension.

(((4)))
(6) Any person found to have violated any posted limitations of a
highway or section of highway shall be assessed a monetary penalty of not less
than one hundred and fifty dollars, and the court shall in addition thereto
upon second violation within a twelve-month period involving the same power
unit, suspend the certificate of license registration for not less than thirty
days.

(((5)))
(7) It is unlawful for the driver of a vehicle to fail or refuse to stop
and submit the vehicle and load to a weighing, or to fail or refuse, when
directed by an officer upon a weighing of the vehicle to stop the vehicle and
otherwise comply with the provisions of this section. It is unlawful for a
driver of a commercial motor vehicle as defined in RCW 46.32.005, other than
the driver of a bus as defined in RCW 46.32.005(2) or a vehicle with a gross
vehicle or combination weight not over sixteen thousand pounds and not transporting
hazardous materials in accordance with RCW 46.32.005(3), to fail or refuse to
stop at a weighing station when proper traffic control signs indicate scales
are open.

Any
police officer is authorized to require the driver of any vehicle or
combination of vehicles to stop and submit to a weighing either by means of a
portable or stationary scale and may require that the vehicle be driven to the
nearest public scale. Whenever a police officer, upon weighing a vehicle and
load, determines that the weight is unlawful, the officer may require the
driver to stop the vehicle in a suitable location and remain standing until
such portion of the load is removed as may be necessary to reduce the gross
weight of the vehicle to the limit permitted by law. If the vehicle is loaded
with grain or other perishable commodities, the driver shall be permitted to
proceed without removing any of the load, unless the gross weight of the
vehicle and load exceeds by more than ten percent the limit permitted by this
chapter. The owner or operator of the vehicle shall care for all materials
unloaded at the risk of the owner or operator.

Any
vehicle whose driver or owner represents that the vehicle is disabled or
otherwise unable to proceed to a weighing location shall have its load sealed
or otherwise marked by any police officer. The owner or driver shall be
directed that upon completion of repairs, the vehicle shall submit to weighing
with the load and markings and/or seal intact and undisturbed. Failure to
report for weighing, appearing for weighing with the seal broken or the
markings disturbed, or removal of any cargo prior to weighing is unlawful. Any
person so convicted shall be fined one thousand dollars, and in addition the
certificate of license registration shall be suspended for not less than thirty
days.

(((6)))
(8) Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, district
courts having venue have concurrent jurisdiction with the superior courts for
the imposition of any penalties authorized under this section.

(((7)))
(9) For the purpose of determining additional penalties as provided by
subsection (2) of this section, "overweight" means the poundage in
excess of the maximum allowable gross weight or axle/axle grouping weight
prescribed by RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.091, and 46.44.095.

(((8)
The penalties provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be
remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW or RCW 10.82.070.)) (10)
For the purpose of computing the basic penalties and additional penalties to be
imposed under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the convictions shall be
on the same vehicle or combination of vehicles within a twelve-month period
under the same ownership.

(((9)))
(11) Any state patrol officer or any weight control officer who finds
any person operating a vehicle or a combination of vehicles in violation of the
conditions of a permit issued under RCW 46.44.047, 46.44.090, and 46.44.095 may
confiscate the permit and forward it to the state department of transportation
which may return it to the permittee or revoke, cancel, or suspend it without
refund. The department of transportation shall keep a record of all action
taken upon permits so confiscated, and if a permit is returned to the permittee
the action taken by the department of transportation shall be endorsed
thereon. Any permittee whose permit is suspended or revoked may upon request
receive a hearing before the department of transportation or person designated
by that department. After the hearing the department of transportation may
reinstate any permit or revise its previous action.

Every
permit issued as provided for in this chapter shall be carried in the vehicle
or combination of vehicles to which it refers and shall be open to inspection
by any law enforcement officer or authorized agent of any authority granting
such a permit.

Upon
the third finding within a calendar year of a violation of the requirements and
conditions of a permit issued under RCW 46.44.095, the permit shall be
canceled, and the canceled permit shall be immediately transmitted by the court
or the arresting officer to the department of transportation. The vehicle
covered by the canceled permit is not eligible for a new permit for a period of
thirty days.

(((10)))
(12) For the purposes of determining gross weights the actual scale
weight taken by the arresting officer is prima facie evidence of the total
gross weight.

(((11)))
(13) It is a traffic infraction to direct the loading of a vehicle with
knowledge that it violates the requirements in RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042,
46.44.047, 46.44.090, 46.44.091, or 46.44.095 and that it is to be operated on
the public highways of this state.

(((12))) (14) The chief of the state patrol, with the
advice of the department, may adopt reasonable rules to aid in the enforcement
of this section.

---
END ---