BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.40.0305 and 1997 c 3 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Previous assessed value" means the assessed value for the year
immediately preceding the year for which a calculation is being made under this
section.

(b)
"Current appraised value" means the appraised value for the year for
which a calculation is being made under this section.

(c)
"Total value increase" means the current appraised value minus the
previous assessed value. Total value increase can never be less than zero.

(d)
"Improvement increase" means the portion of the total value increase
attributable to any physical improvements made to the property since the
previous assessment, other than improvements exempt under RCW 84.36.400 for the
year for which a calculation is being made under this section. Improvement
increase can never be less than zero.

(e)
"Market increase" means the total value increase minus the
improvement increase. Market increase can never be less than zero.

(2)
The assessed value of property is equal to the lesser of the current appraised
value or a limited value determined under this section. The limited value is equal
to the greater of the values determined as follows:

(a)
In any year in which the market increase is equal to or less than sixty
percent of the previous assessed value, the limited value is the
improvement increase plus one hundred fifteen percent of the previous assessed
value; or

(b)
In any year in which the market increase is more than sixty percent of the
previous assessed value, the limited value for the year of the increase and for
each of the three succeeding years is not less than the sum of:

(i)
The previous assessed value;

(ii)
The improvement increase; and

(iii)
Twenty-five percent of the market increase.

(3)
Upon loss of preferential tax treatment for property that qualifies for
preferential tax treatment under chapter 84.14, 84.26, 84.33, 84.34, or 84.36
RCW, the previous assessed value shall be the assessed value the property would
have had without the preferential tax treatment.

(4)
The assessed value of real property that has been subdivided or merged is the
current appraised value of the parcel or lot formed after the subdivision or
merger.

(5)
The assessed value of new construction and mobile homes under RCW 36.21.080 and
36.21.090 is determined without regard to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect for taxes levied in 2000 for collection in 2001 and thereafter
if the proposed amendment to Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution
providing for valuation increases to be phased in over a period of four years
is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next
general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this
act is void in its entirety.

---
END ---