BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.135.045 and 1994 c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The emergency reserve fund is established in the state treasury. During each
fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit in the emergency reserve fund
all general fund‑-state revenues in excess of the state expenditure limit
for that fiscal year. Deposits shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter
based on projections of state revenues and the state expenditure limit.

(2)
The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency reserve fund only
with approval of at least two-thirds of the members of each house of the
legislature, and then only if the appropriation does not cause total
expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit under this chapter.

(3)
The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five percent of ((biennial))
annual general fund‑-state revenues as projected by the official
state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent shall be
transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer, half to the
education construction fund hereby created in the treasury, and half to the
tax reduction fund hereby created in the treasury.

(4)(a)
Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund exclusively for
common school construction or higher education construction.

(b)
Funds in the tax reduction fund shall be used exclusively for the tax
exemption for individuals under sections 2 and 3 of this act. The state
treasurer shall transfer from the tax reduction fund to the general fund such
amounts as are necessary for the department of revenue to cover the remittance
under sections 2 and 3 of this act.

(c)
Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose from the funds only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if approved
by a vote of the people at the next general election. An appropriation
approved by the people under this subsection shall result in an adjustment to
the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal period for which the
appropriation is made and shall not affect any subsequent fiscal period.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The purpose of the exemption under this section is to share the state's
prosperity with individuals on a widespread basis, while at the same time keeping
state administrative costs down and not burdening retailers. Therefore:

(a)
The exemption is limited to those years in which the state has excess revenues
as indicated solely by the amount of funds in the tax reduction fund. During
any year in which the balance in the tax reduction fund exceeds two hundred
million dollars, an exemption in the form of a remittance shall be provided to
all qualifying individuals; and

(b)
For the purposes of determining eligibility under this section, the legislature
finds that based on economic information detailing consumer expenditures for
necessities and other goods and services, an individual is eligible for the
exemption regardless of that individual's ability to substantiate qualifying
transactions, except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(2)
An individual is eligible for a sales tax exemption in the form of a
remittance, subject to the conditions of this section. The exemption is for
the state share of sales tax only. The amount of the remittance is equal to
the state sales tax rate multiplied by an amount as determined in subsection
(3) of this section.

(3)
The department shall determine the amount of the exempted transactions for
which the exemption is allowed, not to exceed one thousand dollars. The amount
is the result of the following fraction: The numerator is the amount in the
tax reduction fund divided by the state population in the previous year. The
denominator is the state sales or use tax rate. The resulting quotient is the
amount of taxable transactions exempt from tax. The office of financial
management shall provide the department with the most recently published
population data.

(4)
A nonresident is eligible for the exemption in the form of a remittance under
this section if the individual can establish that he or she paid Washington
state sales and use tax the previous year equal to or greater than the amount
of the remittance. Nonresident eligibility shall be determined based on
information provided by the nonresident and through audit and other
administrative records.

(5)
The office of financial management and the department shall jointly administer
this section and section 3 of this act, using the services of a contractor to
identify eligible individuals.

(6)
For purposes of this section and section 3 of this act, "qualifying
individual" means a natural person who is either (a) a resident of the
state or (b) a nonresident who meets the requirements of subsection (4) of this
section.

(7)
The exemption in this section is in addition to any other exemption provided by
law. However, no person may receive a remittance under both this section and
section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An individual is eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance from the
tax imposed under this chapter, subject to the conditions of this section and
section 2 (2), (3), and (4) of this act. The amount of the remittance is equal
to the state use tax rate multiplied by the amount in section 2(3) of this act,
not to exceed one thousand dollars. The exemption is for the state share of
use tax only.

(2)
The exemption in this section is in addition to any other exemption provided by
law. However, no person may receive a remittance under both this section and
section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

The
exemptions in sections 2 and 3 of this act are for the state portion of the
sales and use tax and do not extend to the tax imposed in this chapter.

Sec.
5. RCW
81.104.170 and 1997 c 450 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Cities
that operate transit systems, county transportation authorities, metropolitan
municipal corporations, public transportation benefit areas, and regional
transit authorities may submit an authorizing proposition to the voters and if
approved by a majority of persons voting, fix and impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter, solely for the purpose of providing
high capacity transportation service.

The
tax authorized pursuant to this section shall be in addition to the tax
authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing district. The maximum rate
of such tax shall be approved by the voters and shall not exceed one percent of
the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in
the case of a use tax). The maximum rate of such tax that may be imposed shall
not exceed nine‑tenths of one percent in any county that imposes a tax
under RCW 82.14.340, or within a regional transit authority if any county
within the authority imposes a tax under RCW 82.14.340. The exemptions in RCW
82.08.820 ((and)), 82.12.820, and sections 2 and 3 of this act
are for the state portion of the sales and use tax and do not extend to the tax
authorized in this section.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.135.035 and 1994 c 2 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the legislature
that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts may be taken
only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each house, and then only if state
expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will not exceed the
state expenditure limits established under this chapter.

(2)(a)
If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this section will result in
expenditures in excess of the state expenditure limit, then the action of the
legislature shall not take effect until approved by a vote of the people at a
November general election. The office of financial management shall adjust the
state expenditure limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the
voters under this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of
revenue generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be adjusted
downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.

(b)
The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this section shall
be substantially as follows:

"Shall
taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to
allow a spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
inflation and population increases?"

(3)(a)
The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration of an emergency
for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law approved by a two-thirds
vote of each house of the legislature and signed by the governor. The law
shall set forth the nature of the emergency, which is limited to natural
disasters that require immediate government action to alleviate human suffering
and provide humanitarian assistance. The state expenditure limit may be
exceeded for no more than twenty-four months following the declaration of the
emergency and only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.

(b)
Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section may be imposed
only until thirty days following the next general election, unless an extension
is approved at that general election. The additional taxes shall expire upon
expiration of the declaration of emergency. The legislature shall not impose
additional taxes for emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in
the education construction fund and the tax reduction fund have been
exhausted.

(c)
The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not impose any tax on
intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that statute exists on January
1, 1993.

(4)
If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from the state general
fund on or after January 1, 1993, to another source of funding, or if moneys
are transferred from the state general fund to another fund or account, the
office of financial management shall lower the state expenditure limit to
reflect the shift.

Sec.
7. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 8, 1999 c 309 s 928, 1999 c 268 s 4, and 1999 c 94 s
2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated
with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement
act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of
interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of
interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement
act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office
of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural
resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account,
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
resource management cost account, the site closure account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the
state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the tax reduction fund, the teachers' retirement system plan 1
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 2 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal ((account)) fund, the volunteer fire fighters' ((relief
and pension)) and reserve officers' administrative ((account))
fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account,
the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for
the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account,
the county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the marine
operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education
account, the pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the
Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account,
the safety and education account, the special category C account, the state
patrol highway account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation
fund, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
8. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 8, 1999 c 309 s 928, 1999 c 268 s 4, 1999 c 94 s 3,
and 1999 c 94 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the tax reduction fund, the teachers' retirement system plan 1
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 2 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal ((account)) fund, the volunteer fire fighters' ((relief
and pension)) and reserve officers' administrative ((account))
fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account,
the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond
retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
9. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 9, 1999 c 309 s 929, 1999 c 268 s 5, and 1999 c 94 s
4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal
sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account,
the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system plan
2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost
account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the tax
reduction fund, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal ((account)) fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' ((relief and pension)) and reserve officers'
administrative ((account)) fund, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington
school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington
state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water
pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond
retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
Sections 1 through 8 of this act take effect July 1, 2000.

(2)
Section 9 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 7 and 8 of this act expire September 1, 2000.

---
END ---