BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that economic development, work force training, international
trade, tourism development, housing assistance, assistance to local
governments, and other programs and services provided by the department of
community, trade, and economic development are vital to all regions of the
state. The legislature further finds that program development and service
delivery to the eastern region of the state could be significantly enhanced by a
continuous, full-time physical staff presence in that region.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. For
the purposes of this act:

(1)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development, or its successor agency or agencies.

(2)
"Director" means the director of the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. In
order to more effectively respond to the needs of eastern Washington
communities, the department shall, as soon as practicable, establish a field
office and a full-time staff presence in eastern Washington. If practicable,
the office shall be colocated with one or more existing state agencies in the
Tri-Cities area to facilitate the urgent economic development needs of
southeastern Washington. This office shall be staffed by the director in the
most efficient manner that is likely to provide improved service to eastern
Washington communities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Program activities and priorities for this office serving eastern Washington
shall be determined by the director, in consultation with local government
officials, business, labor, and educational advisors from the region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---