BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the medical services provided to retirees of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 under chapter
41.26 RCW include nursing home care and catastrophic medical care, including
organ transplants.

The
legislature also finds that many years of high state appropriations to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 trust fund,
combined with years of high investment return and low inflation, have greatly
improved the funding status of the fund.

It
is reasonable, in light of the strong funding position of the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 fund, to provide partial
funding of law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
1 retiree extraordinary medical expenses, such as nursing home care, from the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 fund.

The
purpose of this act is to: (1) Declare legislative intent that not less than
fifty million dollars of surplus assets in the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 retirement fund be used,
if possible, for payment of extraordinary medical expenses for certain retirees
of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1;
and (2) provide for a review by the joint committee on pension policy, with
input from a law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
advisory workgroup, of possible long-term options for funding a portion of the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 medical
expenses from the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 1 trust fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. For the
purposes of this act, retiree expenses for nursing home services that qualify
as medical services under RCW 41.26.030(22), and expenses incurred in excess of
twenty-five thousand dollars in a twelve-month period for an individual
retiree's hospital care, shall qualify as extraordinary medical expenses.

It
is the intent of the legislature that statutory guidelines for the payment of
certain extraordinary medical expenses be adopted in the 2001 legislative
session, taking into consideration the recommendations of the report required
by section 3 of this act. It is also the intent of the legislature that such
expenditures be authorized only if the actuarial valuation study of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 assets and
liabilities as of December 31, 1999, indicates that the system has not less
than five hundred million dollars in surplus assets.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
joint committee on pension policy shall provide for a study, through the office
of the state actuary during the 2000 interim, of the options for providing
partial funding of law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 1 retiree medical expenses from the surplus assets of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 fund. The
study shall include a report by the office of the state actuary on local
government liabilities, as required by the 1999-2001 operating budget, and a
review of legal issues, federal tax compliance issues, variations in local
government benefits and funding mechanisms, and other relevant issues.

In
conducting the study the joint committee shall solicit information and advice
from a law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system employer
and member advisory workgroup which shall consist of not less than twelve
representatives of both the employers and members as follows: Two
representatives each for the association of Washington cities, the Washington
fire commissioners' association, and the Washington state association of
counties; and three representatives each for the Washington council of police
and sheriffs and the Washington state council of fire fighters. The joint
committee may make additional appointments to the workgroup. The office of the
state actuary may provide administrative support for the study.

The
joint committee shall submit its report and recommendations to the legislature
no later than December 15, 2000.

Sec.
4. RCW
41.26.080 and 1991 c 35 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as set forth under subsection (2) of this section, the total
liability of the plan 1 system shall be funded as follows:

(((1)))
(a) Every plan 1 member shall have deducted from each payroll a sum
equal to six percent of his or her basic salary for each pay period.

(((2)))
(b) Every employer shall contribute monthly a sum equal to six percent
of the basic salary of each plan 1 employee who is a member of this retirement
system. The employer shall transmit the employee and employer contributions
with a copy of the payroll to the retirement system monthly.

(((3)))
(c) The remaining liabilities of the plan 1 system shall be funded as
provided in chapter 41.45 RCW.

(((4)))
(d) Every member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the
contribution made and provided for herein, and shall receipt in full for his or
her salary or compensation. Payment less said contributions shall be a
complete discharge of all claims and demands whatsoever for the services
rendered by such person during the period covered by such payments, except his
or her claim to the benefits to which he or she may be entitled under the
provisions of this chapter.

(2) No employer or member contribution is required after June
30, 2000, unless the most recent valuation study for law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 indicates the plan has unfunded
liabilities.

---
END ---