BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.43.260 and 1994 c 197 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
retirement from service as provided in RCW 43.43.250, a member shall be granted
a retirement allowance which shall consist of:

(1)
A prior service allowance which shall be equal to two percent of the member's
average final salary multiplied by the number of years of prior service
rendered by the member.

(2)
A current service allowance which shall be equal to two percent of the member's
average final salary multiplied by the number of years of service rendered
while a member of the retirement system.

(3)
Any member with twenty-five years service in the Washington state patrol may
have the member's service in the armed forces credited as a member whether or
not the individual left the employ of the Washington state patrol to enter such
armed forces: PROVIDED, That in no instance shall military service in excess
of five years be credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance, a
member must restore all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which restoration
must be completed on the date of the member's retirement, or as provided under
RCW 43.43.130, whichever occurs first: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section
shall not apply to any individual, not a veteran within the meaning of RCW
41.06.150, as now or hereafter amended: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in no
instance shall military service be credited to any member who is receiving full
military retirement benefits pursuant to Title 10 United States Code, as now or
hereafter amended.

(4)
In no event shall the total retirement benefits from subsections (1), (2), and
(3) of this section, of any member exceed seventy-five percent of the member's
average final salary.

(5)
A yearly increase in retirement allowance ((which shall amount to two
percent of the retirement allowance computed at the time of retirement. This
yearly increase)) shall be added to the retirement allowance on July 1st of
each calendar year. Beginning July 1, 2000, and every year thereafter, the
department shall determine the following information for each retired member or
beneficiary whose retirement allowance has been in effect for at least one
year:

(a)(i)
The original dollar amount of the retirement allowance; or

(ii)
For a retired member or beneficiary whose retirement allowance is in effect on
the effective date of this act, the dollar amount on July 1, 2000;

(b)
The index for the calendar year prior to the effective date of the retirement
allowance, to be known as "index A";

(c)
The index for the calendar year prior to the date of determination, to be known
as "index B"; and

(d)
The ratio obtained when index B is divided by index A.

The
value of the ratio obtained shall be the annual adjustment to the original
retirement allowance and shall be applied beginning with the July payment. In
no event, however, shall the annual adjustment:

(i)
Produce a retirement allowance which is lower than the original retirement
allowance;

(ii)
Exceed three percent in the initial annual adjustment; or

(iii)
Differ from the previous year's annual adjustment by more than three percent.

For
the purposes of this section, "index" means, for any calendar year,
that year's average consumer price index‑-Seattle, Washington area for
urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor statistics, United States department of labor.

The
provisions of this section shall apply to all members presently retired and to
all members who shall retire in the future.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.43.300 and 1965 c 8 s 43.43.300 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning
on ((July 1, 1963)) the effective date of this act, every
Washington state patrol employee who is a member of the retirement fund shall
contribute ((seven percent)) a percentage of his or her
monthly salary that is the same percentage contributed by the employer as
determined under chapter 41.45 RCW, with a maximum of seven percent, which
shall be deducted from the compensation of each member on each and every
payroll.

In event a member severs his or her connection with the
Washington state patrol or is dismissed, the amount paid by the state of
Washington shall remain in the retirement fund.

---
END ---