BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. For
each state resident who served in the uniformed armed services during the
Second World War, as determined by the office of financial management, the
state shall contribute one dollar for the benefit of the national World War II
memorial.

---
END ---