BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds and declares that the December 20, 1993, Washington state
conveyance of the Mt. St. Helens recovery program, the CR601F site, to the city
of Castle Rock, should be amended to enable the city of Castle Rock to use
dredge spoil revenues for recreational purposes adjacent to the Cowlitz river
in the city limits of Castle Rock, and also those other properties owned by the
city of Castle Rock that are adjacent to the Cowlitz river.

The
legislature further declares that the department of transportation shall
execute sufficient legal release to accomplish the following:

(1)
Dredge spoil revenues from the CR601F site must be dedicated for recreational
facilities and recreational administration cost throughout the defined area
listed above;

(2)
Any mining excavation must meet the requirements of the shoreline management
act of 1971 as identified in chapter 90.58 RCW;

(3)
All other requirements in the December 20, 1993, conveyance between the state
of Washington and the city of Castle Rock will remain in effect; and

(4) The CR601F site remains subject to any agreements with the
United States army corps of engineers and other agencies of the federal
government.

---
END ---