BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.26 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The transportation improvement board, in cooperation with the association of
Washington cities, the department of transportation's highways and local
programs, and the county road administration board, shall develop a pavement
management system and grant program to address the maintenance of roadways in
cities with a population less than two thousand five hundred. The program
shall address, but is not limited to the following objectives: (a) Lower the
cost of road maintenance by providing accurate, easy-to-use information for
planning field operations; (b) maintain an accurate inventory of small city
streets; (c) record pavement deterioration and diagnose the cause of the
deterioration; and (d) evaluate design solutions. This system shall provide
objective determination of pavement maintenance and rehabilitation strategies
to be used to maintain and, in some instances, even improve and extend the
performance life of small city roadways.

(2) The board shall adopt rules and procedures to govern the
allocation of funds distributed to the small city pavement maintenance program.

---
END ---