BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.06B.015 and 1999 c 385 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In
order to increase efficiency, to reduce waste and duplication, to enable people
to access social and health services, to provide a basic level of mobility, and
to extend and improve transportation services to people with special
transportation needs, the state shall implement the Program for Agency
Coordinated Transportation. The program will improve transportation efficiency
and effectiveness to maximize the use of community resources so that more
people can be served within available funding levels.

The
Program for Agency Coordinated Transportation will facilitate a state-wide
approach to coordination and will support the development of community-based coordinated
transportation systems ((that exhibit)) with a goal for the
following characteristics:

(1)
Organizations serving persons with special transportation needs share
responsibility for ensuring that customers can access services.

(2)
There is a single entry process for customers to use to have trips arranged and
scheduled, so the customer does not have to contact different locations based
on which sponsoring agency or program is paying for the trip.

(3)
A process is in place so that when decisions are made by service organizations
on facility siting or program policy implementation, the costs of client
transportation and the potential effects on the client transportation costs of
other agencies or programs are considered. Affected agencies are given an
opportunity to influence the decision if the potential impact is negative.

(4)
Open local market mechanisms ((give all)) giving all transportation
brokers and providers who meet minimum standards an opportunity to
participate in the program((, and, in addition, allow for cost comparisons
so that purchasers can select)) through the bidding process allowing for
the selection of the least expensive trip most appropriate to the
customer's needs.

(5)
There is flexibility in using the available vehicles in a community so that the
ability to transport people is not restricted by categorical claims to
vehicles.

(6)
There is maximum sharing of operating facilities and administrative services,
to avoid duplication of costly program elements.

(7)
Trip sponsors and service providers have agreed on a process for allocating
costs and billing when they share use of vehicles.

(8)
Minimum standards exist for at least safety, driver training, maintenance,
vehicles, and technology to eliminate barriers that may prevent sponsors from
using each other's vehicles or serving each other's clients.

(9)
The system is user friendly. The fact that the system is supported by a
multitude of programs and agencies with different eligibility, contracting,
service delivery, payment, and funding structures does not negatively affect
the customer's ability to access service.

(10)
Support is provided for research, technology improvements, and sharing of best
practices from other communities, so that the system can be continually improved.

(11)
There are performance goals and an evaluation process that leads to continuous
system improvement.

Sec.
2. RCW
47.06B.030 and 1999 c 385 s 5 and 1999 c 372 s 13 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

To
assure implementation of the Program for Agency Coordinated Transportation, the
council, in coordination with stakeholders, shall:

(1)
Develop guidelines for local planning of coordinated transportation in
accordance with this chapter;

(2)
Initiate local planning processes by contacting the board of commissioners and
county councils in each county and encouraging them to convene local ((planning))
community forums for the purpose of planning and implementing
special needs coordinated transportation programs at the community level;

(3)
Work with local community forums to designate a local lead organization that
shall cooperate and coordinate with private and nonprofit transportation
brokers and providers, local public transportation agencies, local governments,
and user groups;

(4)
Provide a forum at the state level in which state agencies will discuss and
resolve coordination issues and program policy issues that may impact
transportation coordination and costs;

(5)
Provide guidelines for state agencies to use in creating policies, rules, or
procedures to encourage the participation of their constituents in
community-based planning and coordination, in accordance with this chapter;

(6)
Facilitate state-level discussion and action on problems and barriers
identified by the local forums that can only be resolved at either the state or
federal level;

(7)
Develop and test models for determining the impacts of facility siting and
program policy decisions on transportation costs;

(8)
Develop methodologies and provide support to local and state agencies in
identifying transportation costs;

(9)
Develop guidelines for setting performance measures and evaluating performance;

(10)
Develop monitoring reporting criteria and processes to assess state and local
level of participation with this chapter;

(11)
Administer and manage grant funds to develop, test, and facilitate the
implementation of coordinated systems;

(12)
Develop minimum standards for safety, driver training, and vehicles, and
provide models for processes and technology to support coordinated service
delivery systems;

(13)
Provide a clearinghouse for sharing information about transportation
coordination best practices and experiences;

(14)
Promote research and development of methods and tools to improve the
performance of transportation coordination in the state;

(15)
Provide technical assistance and support to communities;

(16)
Facilitate, monitor, provide funding as available, and give technical support
to local planning processes;

(17)
Form, convene, and give staff support to stakeholder work groups as needed to
continue work on removing barriers to coordinated transportation;

(18)
Advocate for the coordination of transportation for people with special
transportation needs at the federal, state, and local levels;

(19)
Recommend to the legislature changes in laws to assist coordination of
transportation services;

(20)
Petition the office of financial management to make whatever changes are deemed
necessary to identify transportation costs in all executive agency budgets;

(21)
Report to the legislature by December 1, 2000, on council activities including,
but not limited to, the progress of community planning processes, what
demonstration projects have been undertaken, how coordination affected service
levels, and whether these efforts produced savings that allowed expansion of
services. Reports must be made once every two years thereafter, and other
times as the council deems necessary.

Sec.
3. RCW
47.06B.040 and 1999 c 385 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
council may request, and may require as a condition of receiving coordination
grants, selected county governments to convene local ((planning)) community
forums and invite participation of all entities, including tribal governments,
that serve or transport persons with special transportation needs. Counties
are encouraged to coordinate and combine their forums and planning processes
with other counties, as they find it appropriate. The local community forums
must:

(1)
Designate a lead organization to facilitate the community planning process on
an ongoing basis;

(2)
Identify functional boundaries for the local coordinated transportation system;

(3)
Clarify roles and responsibilities of the various participants;

(4)
Identify community resources and needs;

(5)
Prepare a plan for developing a coordinated transportation system that meets
the intent of this chapter, addresses community needs, and efficiently uses
community resources to address unmet needs;

(6)
Implement the community coordinated transportation plan;

(7)
Develop performance measures consistent with council guidelines;

(8)
Develop a reporting process consistent with council guidelines;

(9)
Raise issues and barriers to the council when resolution is needed at either
the state or federal level;

(10)
Develop a process for open discussion and input on local policy and facility
siting decisions that may have an impact on the special needs transportation
costs and service delivery of other programs and agencies in the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire June 30, 2008.

---
END ---