BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.01.041 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 53 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

The executive head of the department of transportation shall be the
secretary of transportation((, who)). The secretary shall be
appointed by the transportation commission to serve a four-year term, which
may be renewed upon expiration by appointment by the commission for an
additional four-year term in accordance with this section, and shall be
paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 43.03.040. The secretary shall be an ex officio member of the commission
without a vote. The secretary shall be the chief executive officer of the
commission and be responsible to it, and shall be guided by policies
established by it. The secretary shall serve until expiration of his or her
four-year term or until removed by the commission, but only for incapacity,
incompetence, neglect of duty, malfeasance in office, or failure to carry out
the commission's policies. Before a motion for dismissal shall be acted on by
the commission, the secretary shall be granted a hearing on formal written
charges before the full commission. An action by the commission to remove the
secretary shall be final.

---
END ---