BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the state of Washington is nationally recognized in the
areas of financial management, capital management, human resources, and
managing for results and information technology; that the executive branch of
state government has undertaken regulatory reform efforts, performance-based
budgeting efforts, and programs to improve quality, efficiency, and effectiveness;
and that the roles performed by the legislative auditor and the state auditor
are valued.

It
is the intent of the legislature that public confidence in government at all
levels is essential and must be promoted by all possible means, that the
state's stewardship over public funds is a fundamental responsibility, and that
this chapter is designed to help strengthen state management of public
resources and the systems that provide citizens the information they need to
assess accountability and to make informed decisions.

The
purposes of this chapter are to:

(1)
Establish a permanent means of bringing citizens, public employees,
policymakers, executives, businesses, labor organizations, and management
experts together for the continuous enhancement of state government and agency
performance and accountability and to make our Washington state government and
its agencies the most effective and efficient in the nation;

(2)
Assess the quality and integration of state agency strategic and quality plans,
performance measurement, and performance assessment in planning, budgeting, and
managing the state's resources;

(3)
Evaluate whether state government and its agencies make strategic and
consistent efforts to engage citizens in dialogue, planning, and determining
accountability for programs and services;

(4)
Determine whether citizens have the information they need to assess
accountability and adequate opportunities to participate in their government;

(5)
Assess the success of state agencies implementing and using new technologies to
improve services, facilitate citizen access, and measure and enhance the
satisfaction of state agency customers;

(6)
Evaluate the effectiveness of state agencies publicizing performance results
and successes; and

(7)
Use independent and comprehensive reviews to affirm the effectiveness and
efficiency of state government agency management and use of public resources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
citizens' alliance for government accountability is established as a panel
composed of nineteen members as follows: (1) The governor or the governor's
designee who chairs the panel; (2) the state auditor or the state auditor's
designee; (3) two members of the house of representatives, one from each caucus,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; (4) two members of
the senate, one from each of the major political caucuses, appointed by the
president of the senate; (5) a private sector, for-profit, corporate chief
executive officer appointed by the governor; and (6) the following additional
citizen members who are appointed by the joint action of the governor, state
auditor, and the corporate chief executive officer who was appointed by the
governor to reflect the state's economic, social, ethnic, and political
diversity: (a) Two additional private sector, for-profit, corporate chief
executive officers; (b) a private sector, nonprofit organization chief
executive; (c) two state employees; (d) a representative of a labor
organization; (e) a management expert; (f) a manager or administrator from
county or city government; and (g) four general citizens. The appointed
members shall have management and organizational experience and be selected
based on letters of interest that are solicited state-wide.

Administrative
costs and staff support for the alliance shall be provided by the office of
financial management, with the full cooperation and participation by personnel
loaned by other executive agencies and legislative agencies. Volunteers shall
be sought to participate. The alliance may create subcommittees and advisory
panels to assist in its deliberations and may contract for specialized
expertise.

The
alliance may solicit charitable gifts, grants, and donations that are placed
into the citizens' alliance for government accountability account and used to
offset general fund moneys appropriated for such purposes.

State
employees and officials who serve on the alliance shall serve without
additional compensation but shall receive normal reimbursement for travel
expenses incurred in the performance of duties of the alliance under RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060, or other authority, as if engaged in their normal
duties. All other members of the alliance shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses incurred in the performance of duties of the alliance in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
alliance shall make reports and recommendations to increase and improve state
government efficiency, effectiveness, organization, operations, and
accountability and to achieve costs savings. By December 31, 2000, the
alliance shall present the legislature and governor with a strategic work plan
to accomplish its purposes and at least three reports making recommendations.
By August 15, 2001, and each August 15th thereafter, the alliance shall submit
more detailed reports and recommendations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
citizens' alliance for government accountability account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may only be
expended to finance the activities of the alliance and all expenditures must be
authorized by the director of the office of financial management or the
director's designee. Moneys in the account are not subject to appropriation
and are not subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
alliance shall convene summit conferences as needed throughout the state and
shall actively solicit participation by state employees, management experts,
and the general citizenry. The alliance shall benchmark the best practices of
government at all levels in organizing, managing, and conducting the annual,
independent reviews, and shall consider and use the work performed by the
legislative auditor, state auditor, and executive branch staff.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act expire December 31, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 and 9 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
sum of two hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the state general fund
to the citizens' alliance for government accountability account for the
purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---