BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

The
state building code council shall study the feasibility of adopting rules
requiring all existing congregate residences owned or operated by any
institution of higher education to be provided with complete and approved
automatic fire extinguishing sprinkler protection.

(1)
The study shall include the following:

(a)
A survey of all structures requiring retrofitting; and

(b)
The estimated retrofitting cost per structure.

(2)
The state building code council may form an advisory group of affected institutions
and interested parties.

(3)
The state building code council shall report its findings to the legislature by
December 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---