BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
50.44.050 and 1998 c 233 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as otherwise provided in subsections (1) through (4) of this section, benefits
based on services in employment covered by or pursuant to this chapter shall be
payable on the same terms and subject to the same conditions as compensation
payable on the basis of other service subject to this title.

(1)
Benefits based on service in an instructional, research, or principal
administrative capacity for ((an)) any educational institution
shall not be paid to an individual for any week of unemployment which commences
during the period between two successive academic years or between two
successive academic terms within an academic year (or, when an agreement
provides instead for a similar period between two regular but not successive
terms within an academic year, during such period) if such individual performs
such services in the first of such academic years or terms and if there is a
contract or reasonable assurance that such individual will perform services in
any such capacity for any educational institution in the second of such
academic years or terms. Any employee of a common school district who is
presumed to be reemployed pursuant to RCW 28A.405.210 shall be deemed to have a
contract for the ensuing term.

(2)
Benefits shall not be paid based on services in any other capacity for ((an))
any educational institution for any week of unemployment which commences
during the period between two successive academic years or between two
successive academic terms within an academic year, if such individual performs
such services in the first of such academic years or terms and there is a
reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the
second of such academic years or terms: PROVIDED, That if benefits are denied
to any individual under this subsection and that individual was not offered an
opportunity to perform such services for the educational institution for the second
of such academic years or terms, the individual is entitled to a retroactive
payment of benefits for each week for which the individual filed a timely claim
for benefits and for which benefits were denied solely by reason of this
subsection.

(3)
Benefits shall not be paid based on any services described in subsections (1)
and (2) of this section for any week of unemployment which commences during an
established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if such individual
performs such services in the period immediately before such vacation period or
holiday recess, and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will
perform such services in the period immediately following such vacation period
or holiday recess.

(4)
Benefits shall not be paid (as specified in subsections (1), (2), or (3) of
this section) based on any services described in subsections (1) or (2) of this
section to any individual who performed such services in an educational
institution while in the employ of an educational service district which is
established pursuant to chapter 28A.310 RCW and exists to provide services to
local school districts.

(5)
As used in this section, "academic year" means: Fall, winter,
spring, and summer quarters or comparable semesters unless, based upon
objective criteria including enrollment and staffing, the quarter or comparable
semester is not in fact a part of the academic year for the particular
institution.

Sec.
2. RCW
50.44.053 and 1998 c 233 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
term "reasonable assurance," as used in RCW 50.44.050, means a
written, verbal, or implied agreement that the employee will perform services
in the same capacity during the ensuing academic year or term as in the first
academic year or term. The term "reasonable assurance" does not
include an agreement that is contingent on enrollment, funding, or program
changes. A person shall not be deemed to be performing services "in
the same capacity" unless those services are rendered under the same terms
or conditions of employment in the ensuing year as in the first academic year
or term.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---