BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.14.400 and 1999 c 104 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon the joint request of a metropolitan park district and a city with a
population of more than one hundred fifty thousand, a county legislative
authority in a county with a population of more than five hundred thousand and
less than one million five hundred thousand may submit an authorizing
proposition to the county voters, fixing and imposing a sales and use tax in
accordance with this chapter for the purposes designated in subsection (((3)))
(4) of this section. Such proposition must be placed on a ballot for a
special or general election to be held no later than one year after the date of
the joint request.

(2)
The proposition is approved if it receives the votes of a majority of those
voting on the proposition.

(3)
The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other taxes authorized
by law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. The rate of tax shall equal no more than one-tenth of one
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the
article used, in the case of a use tax.

(4)
Moneys received from any tax imposed under this section shall be used solely
for the purpose of providing funds for:

(a)
Costs associated with financing, design, acquisition, construction,
equipping, operating, maintaining, remodeling, repairing, reequipping, or
improvement of zoo, aquarium, and wildlife preservation and display facilities
that are currently accredited by the American zoo and aquarium association;
or

(b)
Those costs associated with (a) of this subsection and costs related to
regional parks located within a county described in subsection (1) of this
section. Moneys allocated for costs related to regional parks must be
apportioned according to a formula agreed to between the district, city, and
county described in subsection (1) of this section. By December 31, 2005, the
contractual agreement containing the formula must require that a city or county
provide at least one dollar match for every two dollars to be received by the
city or county for regional parks under this section. The agreement
shall also include a definition of regional park to be included in the
authorizing proposition referred to in subsection (1) of this section.

(5)
The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf
of the county at no cost to the county.

(6)
For purposes of this chapter, "regional park" means a large active or
passive recreation area that:

(a)
Serves an entire region;

(b)
Has high user volumes;

(c)
Includes features normally not associated with neighborhood parks, such as
unique or multi-use recreational facilities, arboretums, shorelines, or
cultural attractions; and

(d)
May benefit residents of a number of jurisdictions and:

(i)
Is owned or operated by a county, city, or metropolitan park district described
in subsection (1) of this section; or

(ii)
Is owned or operated by any city or town located in a county described in
subsection (1) of this section.

(7) Funds shall be distributed annually by the county treasurer
to a county, city, or metropolitan park district for regional parks according
to the agreement described in subsection (4)(b) of this section. The agreement
must include provisions for establishment of a citizens advisory committee that
would determine annually those projects entitled to that portion of the
revenues raised by the tax authorized in this section allocated to the county
and any city or town with a population less than one hundred fifty thousand.

---
END ---