BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that, because of their public purpose, nonprofit or
not-for-profit entities operating as health care service contractors have
enjoyed certain benefits in the nature of reduced taxes. Those entities have
accomplished accumulations of surplus because of their reduced tax burden.
Those entities have enjoyed a competitive advantage because of the reduced tax
burden.

The
legislature declares that any competitive advantage or surplus accumulation
attributable, even in part, to nonprofit or not-for-profit status should not be
freely transferred to any entity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A health care service contractor operated as a nonprofit or not-for-profit
entity under any of the laws of this state may not convert its corporate status
to that of a for-profit entity, or transfer to any one or more persons or
groups more than ten percent of its assets or in-force contracts, unless it:

(a)
Files with the commissioner an application for approval of the conversion or
transfer that establishes by substantial evidence that the conversion or
transfer is in the best interest of the health care service contractor's
current subscribers; and

(b)
Establishes, subject to the approval of the commissioner, a trust for the
benefit of residents of this state, that will be used to fund health care
services for indigent residents of this state residing in the health care
service contractor's service area. The health care service contractor:

(i)
Will transfer the amount of the trust irrevocably to the trustees, who may not
be current or former officers or directors of the health care service contractor
or other persons with an intimate relationship to the health care service
contractor;

(ii)
Shall transfer the amount of the trust to the trustees as cash or securities
eligible for investment pursuant to chapter 48.13 RCW; and

(iii)
Shall calculate the amount of the trust as of the date of application to the
insurance commissioner for approval of the conversion or transfer. The health
care service contractor shall calculate the amount of the trust as all capital
and surplus of the health care service contractor at the date of application,
less:

(A)
If the transferee is a for-profit entity, the minimum capital and surplus
requirements of the for-profit entity, at the date of application, for the
in-force contracts to be transferred; or

(B)
If the transferee is a nonprofit entity, the minimum capital and surplus
requirements for the in-force contracts transferred.

(2)
With prior notice to the applicant, the commissioner shall within sixty days of
receipt of the application required by subsection (1) of this section, either
approve the application or deny it if the applicant has not presented
substantial evidence that the conversion or transfer is in the best interest of
the current subscribers of the applicant.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, all transfers of assets or in-force contracts
within twenty-four months before and twelve months after the date of approval
of an application to the insurance commissioner for approval of the conversion
to for-profit status or transfer of contracts, will be aggregated to determine
whether the health care service contractor has transferred ten percent of its
assets or in-force contracts. If it files no application with the
commissioner, for the purposes of this section, the commissioner will assume
that the health care service contractor has filed an application on the date
that a transfer of assets or in-force contracts, when aggregated with all prior
transfers within the last five years, equals or exceeds ten percent of the
health care service contractor's assets or in-force contracts at the time of
the transfer.

(4)
For the purposes of this section, the commissioner may retain at the health
care service contractor's expense such attorneys, actuaries, accountants, and
other experts not otherwise part of the commissioner's staff as are reasonably
necessary to assist in the evaluation of the health care service contractor's
application for conversion or transfer. Persons so retained are under the
direction and control of the commissioner and shall act in a purely advisory
capacity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that, because of their public purpose, nonprofit or
not-for-profit entities operating as health care service contractors have
enjoyed certain benefits in the nature of reduced taxes. Those entities have
accomplished accumulations of surplus because of their reduced tax burden.
Those entities have enjoyed a competitive advantage because of the reduced tax
burden.

The
legislature declares that any competitive advantage or surplus accumulation
attributable, even in part, to nonprofit or not-for-profit status should not be
freely transferred to any entity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A health maintenance organization operated as a nonprofit or not-for-profit
entity under any of the laws of this state may not convert its corporate status
to that of a for-profit entity, or transfer to any one or more persons or
groups more than ten percent of its assets or in-force agreements, unless it:

(a)
Files with the commissioner an application for approval of the conversion or
transfer that establishes by substantial evidence that the conversion or
transfer is in the best interest of the health maintenance organization's
current subscribers; and

(b)
Establishes, subject to the approval of the commissioner, a trust for the
benefit of residents of this state, that will be used to fund health care
services for indigent residents of this state residing in the health
maintenance organization's service area. The health maintenance organization:

(i)
Will transfer the amount of the trust irrevocably to the trustees, who may not
be current or former officers or directors of the health maintenance
organization or other persons with an intimate relationship to the health
maintenance organization;

(ii)
Shall transfer the amount of the trust to the trustees as cash or securities
eligible for investment pursuant to chapter 48.13 RCW; and

(iii)
Shall calculate the amount of the trust as of the date of application to the
insurance commissioner for approval of the conversion or transfer. The health
maintenance organization shall calculate the amount of the trust as all capital
and surplus of the health maintenance organization at the date of application,
less:

(A)
If the transferee is a for-profit entity, the minimum capital and surplus
requirements of the for-profit entity, at the date of application, for the
in-force agreements to be transferred; or

(B)
If the transferee is a nonprofit entity, the minimum capital and surplus
requirements for the in-force agreements transferred.

(2)
With prior notice to the applicant, the commissioner shall within sixty days of
receipt of the application required by subsection (1) of this section, either
approve the application or deny it if the applicant has not presented
substantial evidence that the conversion or transfer is in the best interest of
the current subscribers of the applicant.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, all transfers of assets or in-force
agreements within twenty-four months before and twelve months after the date of
approval of an application to the insurance commissioner for approval of the
conversion to for-profit status or transfer, will be aggregated to determine
whether the health maintenance organization has transferred ten percent of its
assets or in-force agreements. If they file no application with the
commissioner, for the purposes of this section, the commissioner will assume
that the health maintenance organization has filed an application on the date
that a transfer of assets or in-force agreements, when aggregated with all
prior transfers within the last five years equals or exceeds ten percent of the
health maintenance organization's assets or in-force agreements at the time of
the transfer.

(4) For the purposes of this section, the commissioner may retain
at the health maintenance organization's expense such attorneys, actuaries,
accountants, and other experts not otherwise part of the commissioner's staff
as are reasonably necessary to assist in the evaluation of the health
maintenance organization's application for conversion or transfer. Persons so
retained are under the direction and control of the commissioner and shall act
in a purely advisory capacity.

---
END ---