BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a study of the
types of residential services provided to certain children in the care of the
department of social and health services. The review shall include residential
services provided to children served by the children's administration of the
department of social and health services.

(2)
The study shall determine, for the total children served in residential
settings through the children's administration: The numbers and percentages of
children served in each type of residential setting and the expenditures and
unit cost for each type of residential setting.

(3)
The study shall describe: The established criteria and process for placement
decisions and the actual process for these decisions, including the extent to
which the best interests of the child are considered.

(4)
The study shall include a review of best practices in other states for
residential placement decision making, including total expenditures and unit
costs, and distribution data as described in subsection (2) of this section.
The study also shall review best practices promoted by national organizations
with expertise in this area of public policy.

(5)
The study shall recommend changes to the current established criteria and
actual processes of residential decision making as described in subsection (3)
of this section, based on the review of best practices in other states, and
practices promoted by national organizations with expertise in this area of
public policy.

(6)
The study shall determine the total expenditures and unit costs of prevention
services and residential placement services and the percentage distribution for
each in Washington state as compared to the states selected for their best
practices.

(7)
The study shall review current funding methodologies for prevention and
residential placement services and make recommendations for changes if
appropriate.

(8)
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall report the results of
the study to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature by December
1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the joint legislative audit
and review committee for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, to carry out
the purposes of this act.

---
END ---