BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
67.28.080 and 1997 c 452 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Acquisition" includes, but is not limited to, siting, acquisition,
design, construction, refurbishing, expansion, repair, and improvement,
including paying or securing the payment of all or any portion of general
obligation bonds, leases, revenue bonds, or other obligations issued or
incurred for such purpose or purposes under this chapter.

(2)
"Municipality" means any county, city or town of the state of
Washington.

(3)
"Operation" includes, but is not limited to, operation, management,
and marketing.

(4)
"Person" means the federal government or any agency thereof, the
state or any agency, subdivision, taxing district or municipal corporation
thereof other than county, city or town, any private corporation, partnership,
association, or individual.

(5)
"Tourism" means economic activity resulting from tourists, which may
include sales of overnight lodging, meals, tours, gifts, or souvenirs.

(6)
"Tourism promotion" means activities and expenditures designed to
increase tourism, including but not limited to advertising, publicizing, or
otherwise distributing information for the purpose of attracting and welcoming
tourists; developing strategies to expand tourism; operating tourism promotion
agencies; and funding marketing of special events and festivals designed to
attract tourists.

(7)
"Tourism-related facility" means real or tangible personal property
with a usable life of three or more years, or constructed with volunteer labor,
and used to support tourism, performing arts, or to accommodate tourist
activities. Tourism-related facility includes a public library.

(8) "Tourist" means a person who travels from a place of
residence to a different town, city, county, state, or country, for purposes of
business, pleasure, recreation, education, arts, heritage, or culture.

---
END ---