BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Part-time academic employees of community and technical colleges shall receive
sick leave to be used for the same illnesses, injuries, bereavement, and
emergencies as full-time academic employees at the college in proportion to the
individual's teaching commitment at the college.

(2)
The provisions of RCW 41.04.665 shall apply to leave sharing for part-time
academic employees who accrue sick leave under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
The provisions of RCW 28B.50.553 shall apply to remuneration for unused sick
leave for part-time academic employees who accrue sick leave under subsection
(1) of this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.50.489 and 1996 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of determining eligibility of state-mandated insurance ((and)),
retirement benefits under RCW 28B.10.400, and sick leave for part-time
academic employees in community and technical colleges, the following
definitions shall be used:

(1)
"Full-time academic workload" means the number of in-class teaching
hours that a full-time instructor must teach to fulfill his or her employment
obligations in a given discipline in a given college. If full-time academic
workload is defined in a contract adopted through the collective bargaining
process, that definition shall prevail. If the full-time workload bargained in
a contract includes more than in-class teaching hours, only that portion that
is in-class teaching hours may be considered academic workload.

(2)
"In-class teaching hours" means contact classroom and lab hours in
which full or part-time academic employees are performing contractually
assigned teaching duties. The in-class teaching hours shall not include any
duties performed in support of, or in addition to, those contractually assigned
in-class teaching hours.

(3)
"Academic employee" in a community or technical college means any
teacher, counselor, librarian, or department head who is employed by a college
district, whether full or part-time, with the exception of the chief
administrative officer of, and any administrator in, each college district.

(4)
"Part-time academic workload" means any percentage of a full-time
academic workload for which the part-time academic employee is not paid on the
full-time academic salary schedule.

Sec.
3. RCW
28B.50.551 and 1995 c 119 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board of trustees of each college district shall adopt for each community and
technical college under its jurisdiction written policies on granting leaves to
employees of the district and those colleges, including but not limited to
leaves for attendance at official or private institutions and conferences;
professional leaves for personnel consistent with the provisions of RCW 28B.10.650;
leaves for illness, injury, bereavement, and emergencies, consistent
with section 1 of this act, and except as otherwise in this section
provided, all with such compensation as the board of trustees may prescribe,
except that the board shall grant to all such persons leave with full
compensation for illness, injury, bereavement and emergencies as follows:

(1)
For persons under contract to be employed, or otherwise employed, for at least
three quarters, not more than twelve days per year, commencing with the first
day on which work is to be performed; provisions of any contract in force on
June 12, 1980, which conflict with requirements of this subsection shall
continue in effect until contract expiration; after expiration, any new
contract executed between the parties shall be consistent with this subsection;

(2)
Such leave entitlement may be accumulated after the first three-quarter period
of employment for full-time employees and for part-time academic
employees may accumulate after the first quarter of employment by a college
district, and may be taken at any time;

(3)
Leave for illness, injury, bereavement and emergencies heretofore accumulated
pursuant to law, rule, regulation or policy by persons presently employed by
college districts and community and technical colleges shall be added to such
leave accumulated under this section;

(4)
Except as otherwise provided in this section or other law, accumulated leave
under this section not taken at the time such person retires or ceases to be
employed by college districts or community and technical colleges shall not be
compensable;

(5)
Accumulated leave for illness, injury, bereavement and emergencies shall be
transferred from one college district to another or between a college district
and the following: Any state agency, any educational service district, any
school district, or any other institution of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016;

(6)
Leave accumulated by a person in a college district or community and technical
college prior to leaving that district or college may, under the policy of the
board of trustees, be granted to such person when he or she returns to the
employment of that district or college; and

(7)
Employees of the Seattle Vocational Institute are exempt from this section
until July 1, 1993.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.52 RCW to read as follows:

With
respect to the community and technical colleges part-time academic employees,
the permissible scope of collective bargaining under this chapter shall be
governed by section 1 of this act and RCW 28B.50.489.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Nothing contained in this act may be construed to alter any existing collective
bargaining unit of the provisions of any existing collective bargaining
agreement.

---
END ---