BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
66.28.180 and 1997 c 321 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is unlawful for a person, firm, or corporation holding a certificate of
approval issued under RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a beer distributor's license,
a domestic brewer's license, a microbrewer's license, a beer importer's
license, a beer distributor's license, a domestic winery license, a wine
importer's license, or a wine distributor's license within the state of
Washington to modify any prices without prior notification to and approval of
the board.

(1)
Intent. This section is enacted, pursuant to the authority of this state under
the twenty-first amendment to the United States Constitution, to promote the
public's interest in fostering the orderly and responsible distribution of malt
beverages and wine towards effective control of consumption; to promote the
fair and efficient three-tier system of distribution of such beverages; and to
confirm existing board rules as the clear expression of state policy to
regulate the manner of selling and pricing of wine and malt beverages by
licensed suppliers and distributors.

(2)
Beer and wine distributor price posting.

(a)
Every beer or wine distributor shall file with the board at its office in
Olympia a price posting showing the wholesale prices at which any and all
brands of beer and wine sold by such beer and/or wine distributor shall be sold
to retailers within the state.

(b)
Each price posting shall be made on a form prepared and furnished by the board,
or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and shall set forth:

(i)
All brands, types, packages, and containers of beer offered for sale by such
beer and/or wine distributor;

(ii)
The wholesale prices thereof to retail licensees, including allowances, if any,
for returned empty containers.

(c)
No beer and/or wine distributor may sell or offer to sell any package or
container of beer or wine to any retail licensee at a price differing from the
price for such package or container as shown in the price posting filed by the
beer and/or wine distributor and then in effect, according to rules adopted by
the board.

(d)
Quantity discounts are prohibited. No price may be posted that is below
acquisition cost plus ten percent of acquisition cost. However, the board is
empowered to review periodically, as it may deem appropriate, the amount of the
percentage of acquisition cost as a minimum mark-up over cost and to modify
such percentage by rule of the board, except such percentage shall be not less
than ten percent.

(e)
Distributor prices on a "close-out" item shall be accepted by the
board if the item to be discontinued has been listed on the state market for a
period of at least six months, and upon the further condition that the
distributor who posts such a close-out price shall not restock the item for a
period of one year following the first effective date of such close-out price.

(f)
The board may reject any price posting that it deems to be in violation of this
section or any rule, or portion thereof, or that would tend to disrupt the
orderly sale and distribution of beer and wine. Whenever the board rejects any
posting, the licensee submitting the posting may be heard by the board and
shall have the burden of showing that the posting is not in violation of this
section or a rule or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution
of beer and wine. If the posting is accepted, it shall become effective at the
time fixed by the board. If the posting is rejected, the last effective
posting shall remain in effect until such time as an amended posting is filed
and approved, in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(g)
All price postings filed as required by this section shall at all times be open
to inspection to all trade buyers within the state of Washington and shall not
in any sense be considered confidential.

(h)
Any beer and/or wine distributor or employee authorized by the
distributor-employer may sell beer and/or wine at the distributor's posted
prices to any annual or special occasion retail licensee upon presentation to
the distributor or employee at the time of purchase of a special permit issued
by the board to such licensee.

(i)
Every annual or special occasion retail licensee, upon purchasing any beer
and/or wine from a distributor, shall immediately cause such beer or wine to be
delivered to the licensed premises, and the licensee shall not thereafter
permit such beer to be disposed of in any manner except as authorized by the
license.

(ii)
Beer and wine sold as provided in this section shall be delivered by the
distributor or an authorized employee either to the retailer's licensed
premises or directly to the retailer at the distributor's licensed premises. A
distributor's prices to retail licensees shall be the same at both such places
of delivery.

(3)
Beer and wine suppliers' price filings, contracts, and memoranda.

(a)
Every brewery and winery offering beer and/or wine for sale within the state
shall file with the board at its office in Olympia a copy of every written
contract and a memorandum of every oral agreement which such brewery or winery
may have with any beer or wine distributor, which contracts or memoranda shall
contain a schedule of prices charged to distributors for all items and all
terms of sale, including all regular and special discounts; all advertising,
sales and trade allowances, and incentive programs; and all commissions,
bonuses or gifts, and any and all other discounts or allowances. Whenever
changed or modified, such revised contracts or memoranda shall forthwith be
filed with the board as provided for by rule. The provisions of this section
also apply to certificate of approval holders, beer and/or wine importers, and
beer and/or wine distributors who sell to other beer and/or wine distributors.
However, this section does not apply to domestic breweries with respect to
contract manufacturing arrangements with beer distributors that: (i) Are also
breweries or manufacturers of beer located outside the state of Washington; and
(ii) in the state of Washington sell only to other beer distributors.

Each
price schedule shall be made on a form prepared and furnished by the board, or
a reasonable facsimile thereof, and shall set forth all brands, types,
packages, and containers of beer or wine offered for sale by such licensed
brewery or winery; all additional information required may be filed as a
supplement to the price schedule forms.

(b)
Prices filed by a brewery or winery shall be uniform prices to all distributors
on a state-wide basis less bona fide allowances for freight differentials.
Quantity discounts are prohibited. No price shall be filed that is below
acquisition/production cost plus ten percent of that cost, except that
acquisition cost plus ten percent of acquisition cost does not apply to sales
of beer or wine between a beer or wine importer who sells beer or wine to
another beer or wine importer or to a beer or wine distributor, or to a beer or
wine distributor who sells beer or wine to another beer or wine distributor.
However, the board is empowered to review periodically, as it may deem
appropriate, the amount of the percentage of acquisition/production cost as a
minimum mark-up over cost and to modify such percentage by rule of the board,
except such percentage shall be not less than ten percent.

(c)
No brewery, winery, certificate of approval holder, beer or wine importer, or
beer or wine distributor may sell or offer to sell any beer or wine to any
persons whatsoever in this state until copies of such written contracts or
memoranda of such oral agreements are on file with the board.

(d)
No brewery or winery may sell or offer to sell any package or container of beer
or wine to any distributor at a price differing from the price for such package
or container as shown in the schedule of prices filed by the brewery or winery
and then in effect, according to rules adopted by the board.

(e)
The board may reject any supplier's price filing, contract, or memorandum of
oral agreement, or portion thereof that it deems to be in violation of this
section or any rule or that would tend to disrupt the orderly sale and
distribution of beer or wine. Whenever the board rejects any such price
filing, contract, or memorandum, the licensee submitting the price filing,
contract, or memorandum may be heard by the board and shall have the burden of
showing that the price filing, contract, or memorandum is not in violation of
this section or a rule or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and
distribution of beer or wine. If the price filing, contract, or memorandum is
accepted, it shall become effective at a time fixed by the board. If the price
filing, contract, or memorandum, or portion thereof, is rejected, the last
effective price filing, contract, or memorandum shall remain in effect until
such time as an amended price filing, contract, or memorandum is filed and
approved, in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(f) All prices, contracts, and memoranda filed as required by this
section shall at all times be open to inspection to all trade buyers within the
state of Washington and shall not in any sense be considered confidential.

---
END ---