BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that many persons who were employed as part-time community
college faculty members prior to 1990 were not aware of their ability to apply
for membership and service credit in the Washington state teachers' retirement
system plan 2 for their part-time service. In the period between 1977 and
1990, many part-time faculty who would have been eligible to establish service
credit in plan 2 missed their deadline for applying for the optional service
credit. Under current law these former faculty members can purchase credit for
their past service, but only by paying an amount equal to the full actuarial
value of the service credit.

The
legislature finds it appropriate to provide an open window period for certain
former part-time community and technical college faculty to establish
membership and service credit in the teachers' retirement system plan 2 for
periods of such employment between 1977 and 1990. The legislature also finds
it appropriate that the department of retirement systems apply its 1997
administrative rule change regarding the calculation of hours worked by
part-time faculty in a retroactive manner for the part-time faculty covered by
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW under the subchapter heading
"plan 2" to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who was employed as a part-time faculty member by a community or
technical college between October 1, 1977, and August 31, 1990, may establish
membership and service credit in the retirement system for such periods of
service subject to the conditions of this section.

(2)
A former part-time faculty member shall be able to establish membership and
service credit in plan 2 of the retirement system only if the person: (a)
Makes application to the department no later than June 30, 2005; (b) provides
evidence satisfactory to the department that he or she was employed at a level
sufficient to qualify for membership and service credit under the statutes in
effect during the period of the part-time faculty employment; (c) would have
otherwise been eligible for membership or service credit; and (d) pays the
member contributions that would have been required pursuant to this chapter,
plus interest as determined by the department from the date of service to the
date of payment. The payment of member contributions must be made at the time
the person makes application for the service credit.

(3)
In determining the number of hours of service rendered by a former part-time
faculty member, for the purposes of this section, the department shall apply
its current administrative rules, for the periods of service between October 1,
1977, and June 30, 1990.

(4) The benefits provided by this section are not provided as a
contractual right and may be amended by the legislature, except with regard to
any service credit which is purchased prior to the effective date of a
legislative amendment.

---
END ---