BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that contamination from mixed wastes improperly disposed in
the soil at the federal Hanford nuclear reservation, or from mixed wastes
stored at that facility in tanks that are out of compliance with the provisions
of chapter 70.105 RCW and the federal resource conservation and recovery Act,
42 U.S.C. Sec. 6921 et seq., are contaminating the state's ground water and are
moving towards the Columbia river. Leaks from the high-level nuclear waste
tank systems pose unprecedented threats to our state's natural resources as
well as the threat of catastrophic release of wastes and threat to human
health.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.105 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
No mixed wastes may be added to any storage tank or systems of storage tanks
that have been found by the department not to be in compliance with this
chapter, or that are the subject of any order, decree, or consent agreement for
closure, characterization, monitoring, or remediation under this chapter or
chapter 70.105D RCW, until the terms of such order, decree, or consent
agreement have been fully complied with and the director certifies that the
tanks or tank systems have been closed or are in full compliance with the
requirements of this chapter for tanks storing dangerous waste.

(2)
The director may by administrative order exempt from the prohibition in
subsection (1) of this section mixed wastes that are generated as the result of
remediation or closure activities pursuant to a consent agreement, order, or
decree issued or entered into under this chapter or chapter 70.105D RCW.

(3)
As used in this section and sections 3 and 4 of this act, "mixed
waste" means a dangerous waste that contains both a nonradioactive
hazardous component and source, spent nuclear, or by-product material subject
to the federal atomic energy act of 1954, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 2014 et seq.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 70.105 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department by administrative order shall prohibit the disposal of any solid
or dangerous waste or hazardous substances to a facility that the department
has information leading to a reasonable belief may contain mixed wastes, where
the facility does not meet the requirements of this chapter for the
construction, operation, and permitting of dangerous waste disposal facilities,
or that has not been fully characterized and is subject to monitoring for
releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances under this chapter.

(2)
The department shall not issue any permit for the construction and operation of
a land disposal facility containing mixed wastes where the facility is
contiguous to, in near proximity to, or that the department has identified
plumes of contaminants in the soil or ground water beneath the facility from a
hazardous substance release.

(3)
No land disposal facility for wastes may be operated or constructed that is
contiguous to, in near proximity to, or for which the department has identified
plumes of contaminants in the soil or ground water beneath the facility from another
facility containing mixed wastes, or where a hazardous substance release from
such a land disposal facility has the potential for a release of hazardous
substances that may reasonably be projected as having the potential to
contaminate the ground water or soil under or in the immediate vicinity of a
landfill containing mixed wastes.

(4)
The director shall not segregate land disposal facility units contiguous to
landfills containing mixed wastes in any permit issued under this chapter.

(5)
The director may by administrative order exempt from the prohibition of this
section against adding wastes to a landfill or solid waste management unit
containing mixed wastes, those wastes that are generated as the result of
remediation or closure activities pursuant to a consent agreement, order, or
decree issued or entered into under this chapter or chapter 70.105D RCW if the
director finds there is no reasonable alternative for disposal.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 70.105 RCW to read as follows:

No
person may dispose of radioactive mixed waste in any landfill or land disposal
unit at any location in the state unless such disposal is for wastes generated,
released from, or stored at the facility as of the effective date of this
section, and disposal is conducted pursuant to an order of the department, a
decree entered into by the department for the remediation or closure of the
facility, or an order of, or federal facility agreement entered into by, the United
States environmental protection agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---