BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.31B.005 and 1993 c 462 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings set forth in this
section, unless the context requires otherwise.

(1)
An "affiliate" of, or person "affiliated" with, a specific
person, is a person who directly, or indirectly through one or more
intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with,
the person specified.

(2)
The term "control," including the terms "controlling,"
"controlled by," and "under common control with," means the
possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction
of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of
voting securities, by contract other than a commercial contract for goods or
nonmanagement services, or otherwise, unless the power is the result of an
official position with or corporate office held by the person. Control is
presumed to exist if a person, directly or indirectly, owns, controls, holds
with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing, ten percent or more of
the voting securities of any other person. This presumption may be rebutted by
a showing made in a manner similar to that provided by RCW 48.31B.025(11) that
control does not exist in fact. The commissioner may determine, after
furnishing all persons in interest notice and opportunity to be heard and
making specific findings of fact to support such determination, that control
exists in fact, notwithstanding the absence of a presumption to that effect.

(3)
An "insurance holding company system" consists of two or more
affiliated persons, one or more of which is an insurer.

(4)
The term "insurer" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW
48.01.050((; it)). "Insurer" also means a certified health
plan registered under chapter 48.43 RCW, a health care service contractor
registered under chapter 48.44 RCW, and a health maintenance organization registered
under chapter 48.46 RCW. "Insurer" does not include agencies,
authorities, or instrumentalities of the United States, its possessions and
territories, the commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, or a
state or political subdivision of a state.

(5)
A "person" is an individual, a corporation, a partnership, an
association, a joint stock company, a trust, an unincorporated organization, a
similar entity, or any combination of the foregoing acting in concert, but does
not include a joint venture partnership exclusively engaged in owning,
managing, leasing, or developing real or tangible personal property.

(6)
A "securityholder" of a specified person is one who owns a security
of that person, including common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, and
any other security convertible into or evidencing the right to acquire any of
the foregoing.

(7)
A "subsidiary" of a specified person is an affiliate controlled by
that person directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries.

(8)
The term "voting security" includes a security convertible into or
evidencing a right to acquire a voting security.

(9)
"Surplus" and "surplus as regards policyholders" as applied
to a certified health plan, health care service contractor, and health maintenance
organization mean net worth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---