BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.88.020 and 1996 c 288 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Budget" means a proposed plan of expenditures for a given period or
purpose and the proposed means for financing these expenditures.

(2)
"Budget document" means a formal statement, either written or
provided on any electronic media or both, offered by the governor to the
legislature, as provided in RCW 43.88.030.

(3)
"Director of financial management" means the official appointed by
the governor to serve at the governor's pleasure and to whom the governor may
delegate necessary authority to carry out the governor's duties as provided in
this chapter. The director of financial management shall be head of the office
of financial management which shall be in the office of the governor.

(4)
"Agency" means and includes every state office, officer, each
institution, whether educational, correctional, or other, and every department,
division, board, and commission, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(5)
"Public funds", for purposes of this chapter, means all moneys,
including cash, checks, bills, notes, drafts, stocks, and bonds, whether held
in trust, for operating purposes, or for capital purposes, and collected or
disbursed under law, whether or not such funds are otherwise subject to
legislative appropriation, including funds maintained outside the state
treasury.

(6)
"Regulations" means the policies, standards, and requirements, stated
in writing, designed to carry out the purposes of this chapter, as issued by
the governor or the governor's designated agent, and which shall have the force
and effect of law.

(7)
"Ensuing biennium" means the fiscal biennium beginning on July 1st of
the same year in which a regular session of the legislature is held during an
odd-numbered year pursuant to Article II, section 12 of the Constitution and
which biennium next succeeds the current biennium.

(8)
"Dedicated fund" means a fund in the state treasury, or a separate
account or fund in the general fund in the state treasury, that by law is dedicated,
appropriated, or set aside for a limited object or purpose; but "dedicated
fund" does not include a revolving fund or a trust fund.

(9)
"Revolving fund" means a fund in the state treasury, established by
law, from which is paid the cost of goods or services furnished to or by a
state agency, and which is replenished through charges made for such goods or
services or through transfers from other accounts or funds.

(10)
"Trust fund" means a fund in the state treasury in which designated
persons or classes of persons have a vested beneficial interest or equitable
ownership, or which was created or established by a gift, grant, contribution,
devise, or bequest that limits the use of the fund to designated objects or
purposes.

(11)
"Administrative expenses" means expenditures for: (a) Salaries,
wages, and related costs of personnel and (b) operations and maintenance
including but not limited to costs of supplies, materials, services, and
equipment.

(12)
"Fiscal year" means the year beginning July 1st and ending the
following June 30th.

(13)
"Lapse" means the termination of authority to expend an
appropriation.

(14)
"Legislative fiscal committees" means the joint legislative audit and
review committee, the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, the ways and means committees of the senate and house of
representatives, and, where appropriate, the ((legislative))
transportation committees of the senate and the house of representatives.

(15)
"Fiscal period" means the period for which an appropriation is made
as specified within the act making the appropriation.

(16)
"Primary budget driver" means the primary determinant of a budget
level, other than a price variable, which causes or is associated with the
major expenditure of an agency or budget unit within an agency, such as a
caseload, enrollment, workload, or population statistic.

(17)
"State tax revenue limit" means the limitation created by chapter
43.135 RCW.

(18)
"General state revenues" means the revenues defined by Article VIII,
section 1(c) of the state Constitution.

(19)
"Annual growth rate in real personal income" means the estimated
percentage growth in personal income for the state during the current fiscal
year, expressed in constant value dollars, as published by the office of
financial management or its successor agency.

(20)
"Estimated revenues" means estimates of revenue in the most recent
official economic and revenue forecast prepared under RCW 82.33.020, and
prepared by the office of financial management for those funds, accounts, and
sources for which the office of the economic and revenue forecast council does
not prepare an official forecast including estimates of revenues to support
financial plans under RCW 44.40.070, that are prepared by the office of
financial management in consultation with the ((interagency)) transportation
revenue task force.

(21)
"Estimated receipts" means the estimated receipt of cash in the most
recent official economic and revenue forecast prepared under RCW 82.33.020, and
prepared by the office of financial management for those funds, accounts, and
sources for which the office of the economic and revenue forecast council does
not prepare an official forecast.

(22)
"State budgeting, accounting, and reporting system" means a system
that gathers, maintains, and communicates fiscal information. The system links
fiscal information beginning with development of agency budget requests through
adoption of legislative appropriations to tracking actual receipts and
expenditures against approved plans.

(23)
"Allotment of appropriation" means the agency's statement of proposed
expenditures, the director of financial management's review of that statement,
and the placement of the approved statement into the state budgeting,
accounting, and reporting system.

(24)
"Statement of proposed expenditures" means a plan prepared by each
agency that breaks each appropriation out into monthly detail representing the
best estimate of how the appropriation will be expended.

(25)
"Undesignated fund balance (or deficit)" means unreserved and
undesignated current assets or other resources available for expenditure over
and above any current liabilities which are expected to be incurred by the
close of the fiscal period.

(26)
"Internal audit" means an independent appraisal activity within an
agency for the review of operations as a service to management, including a
systematic examination of accounting and fiscal controls to assure that human
and material resources are guarded against waste, loss, or misuse; and that
reliable data are gathered, maintained, and fairly disclosed in a written
report of the audit findings.

(27)
"Performance verification" means an analysis that (a) verifies the
accuracy of data used by state agencies in quantifying intended results and
measuring performance toward those results, and (b) verifies whether or not the
reported results were achieved.

(28)
"Performance audit" has the same meaning as it is defined in RCW
44.28.005.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.88.030 and 1998 c 346 s 910 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director of financial management shall provide all agencies with a complete
set of instructions for submitting biennial budget requests to the director at
least three months before agency budget documents are due into the office of
financial management. The director shall provide agencies that are required
under RCW 44.40.070 to develop comprehensive six-year program and financial
plans with a complete set of instructions for submitting these program and
financial plans at the same time that instructions for submitting other budget
requests are provided. The budget document or documents shall consist of the
governor's budget message which shall be explanatory of the budget and shall
contain an outline of the proposed financial policies of the state for the
ensuing fiscal period, as well as an outline of the proposed six-year financial
policies where applicable, and shall describe in connection therewith the
important features of the budget. The message shall set forth the reasons for
salient changes from the previous fiscal period in expenditure and revenue
items and shall explain any major changes in financial policy. Attached to the
budget message shall be such supporting schedules, exhibits and other
explanatory material in respect to both current operations and capital
improvements as the governor shall deem to be useful to the legislature. The
budget document or documents shall set forth a proposal for expenditures in the
ensuing fiscal period, or six-year period where applicable, based upon the
estimated revenues and caseloads as approved by the economic and revenue
forecast council and caseload forecast council or upon the estimated revenues
and caseloads of the office of financial management for those funds, accounts,
sources, and programs for which the forecast councils do not prepare an
official forecast, including those revenues anticipated to support the six-year
programs and financial plans under RCW 44.40.070. In estimating revenues to
support financial plans under RCW 44.40.070, the office of financial management
shall rely on information and advice from the ((interagency)) transportation
revenue task force. Revenues shall be estimated for such fiscal period from
the source and at the rates existing by law at the time of submission of the
budget document, including the supplemental budgets submitted in the
even-numbered years of a biennium. However, the estimated revenues and
caseloads for use in the governor's budget document may be adjusted to reflect
budgetary revenue transfers and revenue and caseload estimates dependent upon
budgetary assumptions of enrollments, workloads, and caseloads. All
adjustments to the approved estimated revenues and caseloads must be set forth
in the budget document. The governor may additionally submit, as an appendix
to each supplemental, biennial, or six-year agency budget or to the budget
document or documents, a proposal for expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period
from revenue sources derived from proposed changes in existing statutes.

Supplemental
and biennial documents shall reflect a six-year expenditure plan consistent
with estimated revenues from existing sources and at existing rates for those
agencies required to submit six-year program and financial plans under RCW
44.40.070. Any additional revenue resulting from proposed changes to existing
statutes shall be separately identified within the document as well as related
expenditures for the six-year period.

The
budget document or documents shall also contain:

(a)
Revenues classified by fund and source for the immediately past fiscal period,
those received or anticipated for the current fiscal period, those anticipated
for the ensuing biennium, and those anticipated for the ensuing six-year period
to support the six-year programs and financial plans required under RCW
44.40.070;

(b)
The undesignated fund balance or deficit, by fund;

(c)
Such additional information dealing with expenditures, revenues, workload,
performance, and personnel as the legislature may direct by law or concurrent
resolution;

(d)
Such additional information dealing with revenues and expenditures as the
governor shall deem pertinent and useful to the legislature;

(e)
Tabulations showing expenditures classified by fund, function, activity, and
agency;

(f)
A delineation of each agency's activities, including those activities funded
from nonbudgeted, nonappropriated sources, including funds maintained outside
the state treasury;

(g)
Identification of all proposed direct expenditures to implement the Puget Sound
water quality plan under chapter 90.71 RCW, shown by agency and in total; and

(h)
Tabulations showing each postretirement adjustment by retirement system
established after fiscal year 1991, to include, but not be limited to,
estimated total payments made to the end of the previous biennial period,
estimated payments for the present biennium, and estimated payments for the
ensuing biennium.

(2)
The budget document or documents shall include detailed estimates of all
anticipated revenues applicable to proposed operating or capital expenditures
and shall also include all proposed operating or capital expenditures. The
total of beginning undesignated fund balance and estimated revenues less
working capital and other reserves shall equal or exceed the total of proposed
applicable expenditures. The budget document or documents shall further
include:

(a)
Interest, amortization and redemption charges on the state debt;

(b)
Payments of all reliefs, judgments, and claims;

(c)
Other statutory expenditures;

(d)
Expenditures incident to the operation for each agency;

(e)
Revenues derived from agency operations;

(f)
Expenditures and revenues shall be given in comparative form showing those
incurred or received for the immediately past fiscal period and those
anticipated for the current biennium and next ensuing biennium, as well as
those required to support the six-year programs and financial plans required
under RCW 44.40.070;

(g)
A showing and explanation of amounts of general fund and other funds obligations
for debt service and any transfers of moneys that otherwise would have been
available for appropriation;

(h)
Common school expenditures on a fiscal-year basis;

(i)
A showing, by agency, of the value and purpose of financing contracts for the
lease/purchase or acquisition of personal or real property for the current and
ensuing fiscal periods; and

(j)
A showing and explanation of anticipated amounts of general fund and other
funds required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of the retirement
system specified under chapter 41.45 RCW, and the contributions to meet such
amortization, stated in total dollars and as a level percentage of total
compensation.

(3)
A separate capital budget document or schedule shall be submitted that will contain
the following:

(a)
A statement setting forth a long-range facilities plan for the state that
identifies and includes the highest priority needs within affordable spending
levels;

(b)
A capital program consisting of proposed capital projects for the next biennium
and the two biennia succeeding the next biennium consistent with the long-range
facilities plan. Insomuch as is practical, and recognizing emergent needs, the
capital program shall reflect the priorities, projects, and spending levels proposed
in previously submitted capital budget documents in order to provide a reliable
long-range planning tool for the legislature and state agencies;

(c)
A capital plan consisting of proposed capital spending for at least four
biennia succeeding the next biennium;

(d)
A strategic plan for reducing backlogs of maintenance and repair projects. The
plan shall include a prioritized list of specific facility deficiencies and
capital projects to address the deficiencies for each agency, cost estimates
for each project, a schedule for completing projects over a reasonable period
of time, and identification of normal maintenance activities to reduce future
backlogs;

(e)
A statement of the reason or purpose for a project;

(f)
Verification that a project is consistent with the provisions set forth in
chapter 36.70A RCW;

(g)
A statement about the proposed site, size, and estimated life of the project,
if applicable;

(h)
Estimated total project cost;

(i)
For major projects valued over five million dollars, estimated costs for the
following project components: Acquisition, consultant services, construction,
equipment, project management, and other costs included as part of the
project. Project component costs shall be displayed in a standard format
defined by the office of financial management to allow comparisons between
projects;

(j)
Estimated total project cost for each phase of the project as defined by the
office of financial management;

(k)
Estimated ensuing biennium costs;

(l)
Estimated costs beyond the ensuing biennium;

(m)
Estimated construction start and completion dates;

(n)
Source and type of funds proposed;

(o)
Estimated ongoing operating budget costs or savings resulting from the project,
including staffing and maintenance costs;

(p)
For any capital appropriation requested for a state agency for the acquisition
of land or the capital improvement of land in which the primary purpose of the
acquisition or improvement is recreation or wildlife habitat conservation, the
capital budget document, or an omnibus list of recreation and habitat
acquisitions provided with the governor's budget document, shall identify the
projected costs of operation and maintenance for at least the two biennia
succeeding the next biennium. Omnibus lists of habitat and recreation land
acquisitions shall include individual project cost estimates for operation and
maintenance as well as a total for all state projects included in the list.
The document shall identify the source of funds from which the operation and
maintenance costs are proposed to be funded;

(q)
Such other information bearing upon capital projects as the governor deems to
be useful;

(r)
Standard terms, including a standard and uniform definition of normal
maintenance, for all capital projects;

(s)
Such other information as the legislature may direct by law or concurrent
resolution.

For
purposes of this subsection (3), the term "capital project" shall be
defined subsequent to the analysis, findings, and recommendations of a joint
committee comprised of representatives from the house capital appropriations
committee, senate ways and means committee, ((legislative)) senate
transportation committee, house transportation committee, legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee, and office of financial
management.

(4)
No change affecting the comparability of agency or program information relating
to expenditures, revenues, workload, performance and personnel shall be made in
the format of any budget document or report presented to the legislature under
this section or RCW 43.88.160(1) relative to the format of the budget document
or report which was presented to the previous regular session of the
legislature during an odd-numbered year without prior legislative concurrence.
Prior legislative concurrence shall consist of (a) a favorable majority vote on
the proposal by the standing committees on ways and means of both houses if the
legislature is in session or (b) a favorable majority vote on the proposal by
members of the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee if
the legislature is not in session.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.88.120 and 1991 c 358 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
agency engaged in the collection of revenues shall prepare estimated revenues
and estimated receipts for the current and ensuing biennium and shall submit
the estimates to the director of financial management and the director of
revenue at times and in the form specified by the directors, along with any other
information which the directors may request. For those agencies required to
develop six-year programs and financial plans under RCW 44.40.070, six-year
revenue estimates shall be submitted to the director of financial management
and the ((legislative)) transportation committees of the senate and
the house of representatives unless the responsibility for reporting these
revenue estimates is assumed elsewhere.

A
copy of such revenue estimates shall be simultaneously submitted to the
economic and revenue forecast work group when required by the office of the
economic and revenue forecast council.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.88.122 and 1991 c 358 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Where there are variances of revenue forecasts between the office
of financial management and the ((interagency)) transportation
revenue task force, for those transportation agencies that are required to
develop plans under RCW 44.40.070, the office of financial management shall
submit (1) a reconciliation of the differences between the revenue forecasts
and (2) the assumptions used by the office of financial management to the ((legislative))
transportation committees of the senate and the house of representatives.

Sec.
5. RCW 44.40.070
and 1998 c 245 s 87 are each amended to read as follows:

Prior
to October 1st of each even-numbered year the transportation revenue task
force, consisting of all state agencies whose major programs consist of
transportation activities, including the department of transportation, the
transportation improvement board, the Washington state patrol, the department
of licensing, the traffic safety commission, the county road administration
board, and the board of pilotage commissioners, shall adopt or revise, after
consultation with the ((legislative)) transportation committees of
the senate and the house of representatives, a comprehensive six-year
program and financial plan for all transportation activities under each
agency's jurisdiction.

The comprehensive six-year program and financial plan shall state
the general objectives and needs of each agency's major transportation
programs, including workload and performance estimates.

---
END ---