BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.16.006 and 1992 c 222 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The term "registration ((year)) period" for the
purposes of chapter((s)) 46.16((, 82.44, and 82.50)) RCW means
the effective period of a vehicle license issued by the department. ((Such
year)) The period commences at 12:01 a.m. on the date of the calendar
year designated by the department and ends at 12:01 a.m. on the same date of
the ((next)) second succeeding calendar year. If a vehicle
license previously issued in this state has expired and is renewed with a
different registered owner, a new registration ((year)) period is
deemed to commence upon the date the expired license is renewed in order that
the renewed license be useable for a full ((twelve-month)) twenty-four-month
period.

(2)
Each registration ((year)) period may be divided into ((twelve))
twenty-four registration months. Each registration month commences on
the day numerically corresponding to the day of the calendar month on which the
registration ((year)) period begins, and terminates on the
numerically corresponding day of the next succeeding calendar month.

(3)
Where the term "last day of the month" is used in chapter((s))
46.16((, 82.44, and 82.50)) RCW in lieu of a specified day of any
calendar month it means the last day of such calendar month or months
irrespective of the numerical designation of that day.

(4)
If the final day of a registration ((year)) period or month falls
on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, such period extends through the end of
the next business day.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.16.063 and 1996 c 237 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to other fees for the licensing of vehicles there shall be paid and
collected ((annually)) every two years for each camper, travel
trailer, and motor home ((as the same are defined in RCW 82.50.010)) a
fee of ((three)) six dollars to be deposited in the RV account of
the motor vehicle fund. Under RCW 43.135.055, the department of transportation
may increase RV account fees by a percentage that exceeds the fiscal growth
factor. After consultation with citizen representatives of the recreational
vehicle user community, the department of transportation may implement RV
account fee adjustments no more than once every four years. RV account fee
adjustments must be preceded by evaluation of the following factors:
Maintenance of a self-supporting program, levels of service at existing RV
sanitary disposal facilities, identified needs for improved RV service at
safety rest areas state-wide, sewage treatment costs, and inflation. If the
department chooses to adjust the RV account fee, it shall notify the department
of licensing six months before implementation of the fee increase. Adjustments
in the RV account fee must be in increments of no more than fifty cents per
biennium.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.16.065 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 118 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In
lieu of the fees provided in RCW ((46.16.060)) 46.16.062, private
passenger car one or two-wheel trailers of two thousand pounds gross weight or
less, may be licensed upon the payment of a license fee in the sum of ((four))
nine dollars ((and fifty cents)) or, if the vehicle was
previously licensed in this state and has not been registered in another
jurisdiction in the intervening period, a renewal license fee in the sum of ((three))
six dollars and ((twenty-five)) fifty cents, but only if
such trailers are to be operated upon the public highway by the owners
thereof. It is the intention of the legislature that this reduced license
shall be issued only as to trailers operated for personal use of the owners and
not trailers held for rental to the public.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.16.070 and 1994 c 262 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In lieu of all other vehicle licensing fees, unless specifically exempt, and in
addition to ((the excise tax prescribed in chapter 82.44 RCW and)) the
mileage fees prescribed for buses and stages in RCW 46.16.125, there shall be
paid and collected ((annually)) every two years for each truck,
motor truck, truck tractor, road tractor, tractor, bus, auto stage, or for hire
vehicle with seating capacity of more than six, based upon the declared
combined gross weight or declared gross weight thereof pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 46.44 RCW, the following licensing fees by such gross
weight:

DECLARED GROSS WEIGHT SCHEDULE
A SCHEDULE B

4,000 lbs. $ ((37.00)) 74 $ ((37.00))
74

6,000 lbs. $ ((44.00)) 88 $ ((44.00))
88

8,000 lbs. $ ((55.00)) 110 $ ((55.00)) 110

10,000 lbs. $ ((62.00)) 124 $ ((62.00))
124

12,000 lbs. $ ((72.00)) 144 $ ((72.00))
144

14,000 lbs. $ ((82.00)) 164 $ ((82.00))
164

16,000 lbs. $ ((92.00)) 184 $ ((92.00))
184

18,000 lbs. $ ((137.00)) 274 $ ((137.00))
274

20,000 lbs. $ ((152.00)) 304 $ ((152.00))
304

22,000 lbs. $ ((164.00)) 328 $ ((164.00))
328

24,000 lbs. $ ((177.00)) 354 $ ((177.00))
354

26,000 lbs. $ ((187.00)) 374 $ ((187.00))
374

28,000 lbs. $ ((220.00)) 440 $ ((220.00))
440

30,000 lbs. $ ((253.00)) 506 $ ((253.00))
506

32,000 lbs. $ ((304.00)) 608 $ ((304.00))
608

34,000 lbs. $ ((323.00)) 646 $ ((323.00))
646

36,000 lbs. $ ((350.00)) 700 $ ((350.00))
700

38,000 lbs. $ ((384.00)) 768 $ ((384.00))
768

40,000 lbs. $ ((439.00)) 878 $ ((439.00))
878

42,000 lbs. $ ((456.00)) 912 $ ((546.00))
1,092

44,000 lbs. $ ((466.00)) 932 $ ((556.00))
1,112

46,000 lbs. $ ((501.00)) 1,002 $ ((591.00))
1,182

48,000 lbs. $ ((522.00)) 1,044 $ ((612.00))
1,224

50,000 lbs. $ ((566.00)) 1,132 $ ((656.00))
1,312

52,000 lbs. $ ((595.00)) 1,190 $ ((685.00))
1,370

54,000 lbs. $ ((642.00)) 1,284 $ ((732.00))
1,464

56,000 lbs. $ ((677.00)) 1,354 $ ((767.00))
1,534

58,000 lbs. $ ((704.00)) 1,408 $ ((794.00))
1,588

60,000 lbs. $ ((750.00)) 1,500 $ ((840.00))
1,680

62,000 lbs. $ ((804.00)) 1,608 $ ((894.00))
1,788

64,000 lbs. $ ((822.00)) 1,644 $ ((912.00))
1,824

66,000 lbs. $ ((915.00)) 1,830 $ ((1,005.00))
2,010

68,000 lbs. $ ((954.00)) 1,908 $ ((1,044.00))
2,088

70,000 lbs. $ ((1,027.00)) 2,054 $ ((1,117.00))
2,234

72,000 lbs. $ ((1,098.00)) 2,196 $ ((1,188.00))
2,376

74,000 lbs. $ ((1,193.00)) 2,386 $ ((1,283.00))
2,566

76,000 lbs. $ ((1,289.00)) 2,578 $ ((1,379.00))
2,758

78,000 lbs. $ ((1,407.00)) 2,814 $ ((1,497.00))
2,994

80,000 lbs. $ ((1,518.00)) 3,036 $ ((1,608.00))
3,216

82,000 lbs. $ ((1,623.00)) 3,246 $ ((1,713.00))
3,426

84,000 lbs. $ ((1,728.00)) 3,456 $ ((1,818.00))
3,636

86,000 lbs. $ ((1,833.00)) 3,666 $ ((1,923.00))
3,846

88,000 lbs. $ ((1,938.00)) 3,876 $ ((2,028.00))
4,056

90,000 lbs. $ ((2,043.00)) 4,086 $ ((2,133.00))
4,266

92,000 lbs. $ ((2,148.00)) 4,296 $ ((2,238.00))
4,476

94,000 lbs. $ ((2,253.00)) 4,506 $ ((2,343.00))
4,686

96,000 lbs. $ ((2,358.00)) 4,716 $ ((2,448.00))
4,896

98,000 lbs. $ ((2,463.00)) 4,926 $ ((2,553.00))
5,106

100,000 lbs. $ ((2,568.00)) 5,136 $ ((2,658.00))
5,316

102,000 lbs. $ ((2,673.00)) 5,346 $ ((2,763.00))
5,526

104,000 lbs. $ ((2,778.00))
5,556 $ ((2,868.00)) 5,736

105,500 lbs. $ ((2,883.00)) 5,766 $ ((2,973.00))
5,946

Schedule
A applies to vehicles either used exclusively for hauling logs or that do not
tow trailers. Schedule B applies to vehicles that tow trailers and are not
covered under Schedule A.

Every
truck, motor truck, truck tractor, and tractor exceeding 6,000 pounds empty
scale weight registered under chapter 46.16, 46.87, or 46.88 RCW shall be
licensed for not less than one hundred fifty percent of its empty weight unless
the amount would be in excess of the legal limits prescribed for such a vehicle
in RCW 46.44.041 or 46.44.042, in which event the vehicle shall be licensed for
the maximum weight authorized for such a vehicle or unless the vehicle is used
only for the purpose of transporting any well drilling machine, air compressor,
rock crusher, conveyor, hoist, donkey engine, cook house, tool house, bunk
house, or similar machine or structure attached to or made a part of such
vehicle.

The
following provisions apply when increasing gross or combined gross weight for a
vehicle licensed under this section:

(a)
The new license fee will be ((one-twelfth)) one twenty-fourth of
the fee listed above for the new gross weight, multiplied by the number of
months remaining in the period for which licensing fees have been paid,
including the month in which the new gross weight is effective.

(b)
Upon surrender of the current certificate of registration or cab card, the new
licensing fees due shall be reduced by the amount of the licensing fees
previously paid for the same period for which new fees are being charged.

(2)
The proceeds from the fees collected under subsection (1) of this section shall
be distributed in accordance with RCW 46.68.035.

Sec.
5. RCW
46.16.071 and 1996 c 315 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to the fees set forth in RCW 46.16.070, there shall be paid and
collected ((annually)) every two years upon registration, a fee
of ((one)) two dollars for each truck, motor truck, truck
tractor, road tractor, tractor, bus, auto stage, or for hire vehicle with
seating capacity of more than six, notwithstanding the provisions of RCW
46.16.070.

(2)
In addition to the fees set forth in RCW 46.16.085, there shall be paid and
collected ((annually)) every two years upon registration, a fee
of ((one)) two dollars for each trailer, semitrailer, and
pole trailer, notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 46.16.085.

(3)
The proceeds from the fees collected under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section shall be deposited into the highway safety fund, except that for each
vehicle registered by a county auditor or agent to a county auditor under RCW
46.01.140, the proceeds shall be credited to the current county expense fund.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.16.079 and 1986 c 18 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The licensee of any fixed load motor vehicle equipped for lifting
or towing any disabled, impounded, or abandoned vehicle or part thereof, may
pay a capacity fee of ((twenty-five)) fifty dollars in addition
to all other fees required for the ((annual)) licensing of motor
vehicles in lieu of the licensing fees provided in RCW 46.16.070.

Sec.
7. RCW
46.16.085 and 1991 c 163 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In
lieu of all other licensing fees, ((an annual)) a license fee of
((thirty-six)) seventy-two dollars shall be collected ((in
addition to the excise tax prescribed in chapter 82.44 RCW)) for: (1) Each
trailer and semitrailer not subject to the license fee under RCW 46.16.065 or
the capacity fees under RCW ((46.16.080)) 46.16.079; (2) every
pole trailer. The proceeds from this fee shall be distributed in accordance
with RCW 46.68.035. This section does not pertain to travel trailers or
personal use trailers that are not used for commercial purposes or owned by
commercial enterprises.

Sec.
8. RCW
46.16.121 and 1967 ex.s. c 83 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to other fees for the licensing of vehicles, there shall be paid and
collected ((annually)) every two years, for each auto stage and
for hire vehicle, except taxicabs, with a seating capacity of six or less the
sum of ((fifteen)) thirty dollars.

Sec.
9. RCW
46.16.135 and 1986 c 18 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((annual)) vehicle licensing fees as provided in RCW 46.16.070 for any
motor vehicle or combination of vehicles having a declared gross weight in
excess of twelve thousand pounds may be paid for any full registration month or
months at ((one-twelfth)) one twenty-fourth of the usual ((annual))
biennial fee plus two dollars, this sum to be multiplied by the number
of full months for which the fees are paid if for less than a full year. An
additional fee of two dollars shall be collected each time a license fee is
paid.

Operation
of a vehicle licensed under the provisions of this section by any person upon
the public highways after the expiration of the monthly license is a traffic
infraction, and in addition the person shall be required to pay a license fee
for the vehicle involved covering an entire registration ((year's)) period's
operation, less the fees for any registration month or months of the
registration ((year)) period already paid. If, within five days,
no license fee for a full registration ((year)) period has been
paid as required aforesaid, the Washington state patrol, county sheriff, or
city police shall impound such vehicle in such manner as may be directed for
such cases by the chief of the Washington state patrol, until such requirement
is met.

Sec.
10. RCW
46.16.160 and 1999 c 270 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The owner of a vehicle which under reciprocal relations with another
jurisdiction would be required to obtain a license registration in this state
or an unlicensed vehicle which would be required to obtain a license
registration for operation on public highways of this state may, as an
alternative to such license registration, secure and operate such vehicle under
authority of a trip permit issued by this state in lieu of a Washington certificate
of license registration, and licensed gross weight if applicable. The licensed
gross weight may not exceed eighty thousand pounds for a combination of
vehicles nor forty thousand pounds for a single unit vehicle with three or more
axles. Trip permits may also be issued for movement of mobile homes pursuant
to RCW 46.44.170. For the purpose of this section, a vehicle is considered
unlicensed if the licensed gross weight currently in effect for the vehicle or
combination of vehicles is not adequate for the load being carried. Vehicles
registered under RCW 46.16.135 shall not be operated under authority of trip
permits in lieu of further registration within the same registration ((year))
period.

(2)
Each trip permit shall authorize the operation of a single vehicle at the
maximum legal weight limit for such vehicle for a period of three consecutive
days commencing with the day of first use. No more than three such permits may
be used for any one vehicle in any period of thirty consecutive days, except
that in the case of a recreational vehicle as defined in RCW 43.22.335, no more
than two trip permits may be used for any one vehicle in a one-year period.
Every permit shall identify, as the department may require, the vehicle for
which it is issued and shall be completed in its entirety and signed by the
operator before operation of the vehicle on the public highways of this state.
Correction of data on the permit such as dates, license number, or vehicle
identification number invalidates the permit. The trip permit shall be
displayed on the vehicle to which it is issued as prescribed by the department.

(3)
Vehicles operating under authority of trip permits are subject to all laws,
rules, and regulations affecting the operation of like vehicles in this state.

(4)
Prorate operators operating commercial vehicles on trip permits in Washington
shall retain the customer copy of such permit for four years.

(5)
Trip permits may be obtained from field offices of the department of
transportation, Washington state patrol, department of licensing, or other
agents appointed by the department. For each permit issued, there shall be
collected a filing fee as provided by RCW 46.01.140, an administrative fee of
eight dollars, and an excise tax of one dollar. If the filing fee amount of
one dollar prescribed by RCW 46.01.140 is increased or decreased after January
1, 1981, the administrative fee shall be adjusted to compensate for such change
to insure that the total amount collected for the filing fee, administrative
fee, and excise tax remain at ten dollars. These fees and taxes are in lieu of
all other vehicle license fees and taxes. No exchange, credits, or refunds may
be given for trip permits after they have been purchased.

(6)
The department may appoint county auditors or businesses as agents for the
purpose of selling trip permits to the public. County auditors or businesses
so appointed may retain the filing fee collected for each trip permit to defray
expenses incurred in handling and selling the permits.

(7)
A violation of or a failure to comply with any provision of this section is a
gross misdemeanor.

(8)
The department of licensing may adopt rules as it deems necessary to administer
this section.

(9)
A surcharge of five dollars is imposed on the issuance of trip permits. The
portion of the surcharge paid by motor carriers must be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund for the purpose of supporting vehicle weigh stations,
weigh-in-motion programs, and the commercial vehicle information systems and
networks program. The remaining portion of the surcharge must be deposited in
the motor vehicle fund for the purpose of supporting congestion relief
programs. All other administrative fees and excise taxes collected under the
provisions of this chapter shall be forwarded by the department with proper
identifying detailed report to the state treasurer who shall deposit the
administrative fees to the credit of the motor vehicle fund and the excise
taxes to the credit of the general fund. Filing fees will be forwarded and
reported to the state treasurer by the department as prescribed in RCW
46.01.140.

Sec.
11. RCW
46.16.210 and 1997 c 241 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon receipt of the application and proper fee for original vehicle license,
the director shall make a recheck of the application and in the event that
there is any error in the application it may be returned to the county auditor
or other agent to effectively secure the correction of such error, who shall
return the same corrected to the director.

(2)
Application for the renewal of a vehicle license shall be made to the director
or his agents, including county auditors, by the registered owner on a form
prescribed by the director. The application must be accompanied by the
certificate of registration for the last registration period in which the
vehicle was registered in Washington unless the applicant submits a preprinted
application mailed from Olympia, and the payment of such license fees and
excise tax as may be required by law. Such application shall be handled in the
same manner and the fees transmitted to the state treasurer in the same manner
as in the case of an original application. Any such application which upon
validation becomes a renewal certificate need not have entered upon it the name
of the lien holder, if any, of the vehicle concerned.

(3)
Persons expecting to be out of the state during the normal renewal period of a
vehicle license may secure renewal of such vehicle license and have license
plates or tabs preissued by making application to the director or his agents
upon forms prescribed by the director. The application must be accompanied by
the certificate of registration for the last registration period in which the
vehicle was registered in Washington and be accompanied by such license fees,
and excise tax as may be required by law.

(4)
Application for the ((annual)) renewal of a vehicle license number plate
to the director or the director's agents shall not be required for those
vehicles owned, rented, or leased by the state of Washington, or by any county,
city, town, school district, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington or a governing body of an Indian tribe located within this state and
recognized as a governmental entity by the United States department of the
interior.

Sec.
12. RCW
46.16.220 and 1997 c 241 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Vehicle
licenses and vehicle license number plates may be renewed for the subsequent
registration ((year)) period up to eighteen months before the
current expiration date and must be used and displayed from the date of issue
or from the day of the expiration of the preceding registration ((year))
period, whichever date is later.

Sec.
13. RCW
46.16.280 and 1987 c 244 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

In
case of loss, destruction, sale, or transfer of any motor vehicle with a
registered gross weight in excess of twelve thousand pounds and subject to the
license fees under RCW 46.16.070, the registered owner thereof may, under the
following conditions, obtain credit for the unused portion of the licensing fee
paid for the vehicle or may transfer such credit to the new owner if desired:

(1)
The licensing fee paid for the motor vehicle will be reduced by ((one-twelfth))
one twenty-fourth for each calendar month and fraction thereof elapsing
between the first month of the current registration ((year)) period
in which the motor vehicle was registered and the month the registrant
surrenders the vehicle's registration certificate for the registration ((year))
period to the department or an authorized agent of the department.

(2)
If any such credit is less than fifteen dollars, no credit may be given.

(3)
The credit may only be applied against the licensing fee liability due under
RCW 46.16.070 for the replacement motor vehicle or if such credit was
transferred to the new owner, it shall remain with the vehicle. The credit may
only be used during the registration ((year)) period from which
it was obtained.

(4)
In no event is such credit subject to refund.

Whenever
any vehicle has been so altered as to change its license classification in such
a manner that the vehicle license number plates are rendered improper, the
current license plates shall be surrendered to the department. New license
plates shall be issued upon application accompanied by a one dollar fee in
addition to any other or different charge by reason of licensing under a new
classification. Such application shall be on forms prescribed by the
department and forwarded with the proper fee to the department or the office of
a duly authorized agent of the department.

Sec.
14. RCW
46.16.313 and 1997 c 291 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department may establish a fee for each type of special license plates
issued under RCW 46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by
section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the
cost of production of the special license plates and the administration of this
program. Until December 31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed thirty-five
dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to no more than forty
dollars. This fee is in addition to all other fees required to register and
license the vehicle for which the plates have been requested. All such additional
special license plate fees collected by the department shall be deposited in
the state treasury and credited to the motor vehicle fund.

(2)
Until December 31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application, registration, and renewal registration of a motor vehicle,
the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production,
shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(3)
Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 1998,
in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall
pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not
to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds
shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(4)
Effective with ((annual)) renewals due or to become due on January 1,
1999, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a
motor vehicle registration, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay
a fee of ((thirty)) sixty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed ((two)) four dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the
state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The state treasurer
shall credit the funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as
provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(5)
In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a special baseball stadium
license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The
remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds
issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW
82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary preconstruction costs, while the
taxes are being collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this date, the state
treasurer shall credit the funds to the state general fund.

(6)
Effective with ((annual)) renewals due or to become due on January 1,
1999, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a
motor vehicle registration, the holder of a special baseball stadium license
plate shall pay a fee of ((thirty)) sixty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed ((two)) four dollars
of each fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be distributed to a
county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds
issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW
82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary preconstruction costs, while the
taxes are being collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this date, the state
treasurer shall credit the funds to the state general fund.

Sec.
15. RCW
46.16.505 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 118 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be unlawful for a person to operate any vehicle equipped with a camper
over and along a public highway of this state without first having obtained and
having in full force and effect a current and proper camper license and
displaying a camper license number plate therefor as required by law:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if a camper is part of the inventory of a manufacturer
or dealer and is unoccupied at all times, and a dated demonstration permit,
valid for no more than seventy-two hours is carried in the motor vehicle at all
times it is operated by any such individual, such camper may be demonstrated if
carried upon an appropriately licensed vehicle.

Application
for an original camper license shall be made on a form furnished for the
purpose by the director. Such application shall be made by the owner of the
camper or his duly authorized agent over the signature of such owner or agent,
and he shall certify that the statements therein are true and to the best of
his knowledge. The application must show:

(1)
Name and address of the owner of the camper;

(2)
Trade name of the camper, model, year, and the serial number thereof;

(3)
Such other information as the director requires.

There
shall be paid and collected ((annually for each registration)) every
two years or fractional part thereof and upon each camper a license
fee or, if the camper was previously licensed in this state and has not been
registered in another jurisdiction in the intervening period, a renewal license
fee. Such license fee shall be in the sum of ((four)) nine
dollars and ((ninety)) eighty cents, and such renewal license fee
shall be in the sum of ((three)) seven dollars ((and fifty
cents)).

Except
as otherwise provided for in this section, the provisions of chapter 46.16 RCW
shall apply to campers in the same manner as they apply to vehicles.

Sec.
16. RCW
46.16.585 and 1979 ex.s. c 136 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to the regular registration fee, and any other fees and taxes required
to be paid upon registration, the applicant shall be charged a fee of ((thirty))
sixty dollars. In addition to the regular renewal fee, and in addition
to any other fees and taxes required to be paid, the applicant for a renewal of
such plates shall be charged an additional fee of ((twenty)) forty
dollars: PROVIDED, That any person who purchased personalized license plates
containing three letters and three digits on or between the dates of August 9,
1971, and November 6, 1973, shall not be required to pay the additional ((annual))
renewal fee of ((twenty)) forty dollars commencing with the year
1976. All personalized license plates must be renewed ((on an annual basis))
every two years, regardless of whether a vehicle on which they are
displayed will not be driven on public highways or may also be eligible to
display permanent license plates valid for the life of such vehicle without ((annual))
periodic renewal. Personalized license plates that are not renewed must
be surrendered to the department, and failure to do so is a traffic infraction.

Sec.
17. RCW
46.16.670 and 1991 c 302 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to any other fee required under this chapter, boat trailers shall ((annually))
pay a fee of ((three)) six dollars. The proceeds of this fee
shall be deposited in the freshwater aquatic weeds account under RCW
43.21A.650.

Sec.
18. RCW
81.104.160 and 1998 c 321 s 35 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to
read as follows:

(1)
Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation authorities,
metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation benefit areas, and
regional transit authorities may submit an authorizing proposition to the
voters, and if approved, may levy and collect an excise tax, at a rate approved
by the voters, but not exceeding eighty one-hundredths of one percent on the
value, ((under chapter 82.44 RCW,)) of every motor vehicle owned by a
resident of the taxing district, solely for the purpose of providing high-capacity
transportation service. In any county imposing a motor vehicle excise tax
surcharge pursuant to RCW 81.100.060, the maximum tax rate under this section
shall be reduced to a rate equal to eighty one-hundredths of one percent on the
value less the equivalent motor vehicle excise tax rate of the surcharge
imposed pursuant to RCW 81.100.060. This rate shall not apply to vehicles licensed
under RCW 46.16.070 except vehicles with an unladen weight of six thousand
pounds or less, RCW 46.16.079, 46.16.085, or 46.16.090.

(2)
An agency imposing a tax under subsection (1) of this section may also impose a
sales and use tax solely for the purpose of providing high-capacity
transportation service, in addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030,
upon retail car rentals within the agency's jurisdiction that are taxable by
the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of tax shall not exceed
2.172 percent. The rate of tax imposed under this subsection shall bear the
same ratio to the 2.172 percent rate authorized that the rate imposed under
subsection (1) of this section bears to the rate authorized under subsection
(1) of this section. The base of the tax shall be the selling price in the
case of a sales tax or the rental value of the vehicle used in the case of a
use tax. The revenue collected under this subsection shall be used in the same
manner as excise taxes under subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. This
act takes effect January 1, 2001.

---
END ---