BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.36.025 and 1999 c 269 s 16 and 1999 c 94 s 29 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

A state
and local motor vehicle fuel tax rate of twenty-three cents per gallon
shall apply to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.36 RCW to read as follows:

The department of agriculture shall place a sticker on all retail
motor vehicle fuel pumps that indicates where the state portion of the motor
vehicle fuel tax is being appropriated.

---
END ---