BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the incidence of identity theft is rapidly growing, and
that victims of identity theft need further assistance in obtaining the
information necessary to the prosecution of their cases. The legislature finds
that requiring additional information sharing by merchants with victims will
result in greater protections for consumers and deter potential perpetrators.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9.35 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
As used in this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a)
"Victim of identity theft" or "victim" means a person who
has had his or her means of identification taken or personal information or
sensitive information used without authorization when the person's means of
identification or personal information or sensitive information has been used
with the intent to commit, or to aid or abet, an unlawful activity harming or
intending to harm the person whose identity is used, or for committing a
felony;

(b)
"Personal information" means information that is provided by the
consumer in a commercial context, and is identifiable to the individual
consumer, that concerns the amount or condition of the consumer's assets,
liabilities, financial transactions, purchasing history, buying preferences,
business relationships, account existence, customer status, demographic
information, name, address, telephone number, or electronic mail address;

(c)
"Sensitive information" means information maintained in a commercial
context that is held for the purpose of transaction initiation, account access
or identity verification, or that reflects current or historical balances or
purchase amounts, and includes account numbers, access codes or passwords, tax
identification numbers, driver's license or permit numbers, state identicard
numbers issued by the department of licensing, and credit card numbers or
expiration dates.

(2)
A person, information repository, corporation, trust, partnership, or
unincorporated association possessing information relating to an actual or
potential violation of this chapter, and who may have entered into a
transaction, provided credit, products, or services, accepted payment, or
otherwise done business with a person who has used the victim's means of
identification, must, upon request of the victim, provide copies of all
information relevant to the potential or actual violation of this chapter.

(3)
In providing the information required under subsection (2) of this section, the
provider may require the victim of identity theft to provide a copy of a police
report evidencing the victim's claim. The provider may also seek reasonable
compensation for the actual cost of providing the information requested, and may
also require the victim to provide positive identification before providing the
information.

(4)
No person, information repository, corporation, trust, partnership, or
unincorporated association may be held liable for an action voluntarily taken
in good faith to provide information regarding potential or actual violations
of this chapter to other information repositories, merchants, law enforcement
authorities, or to the victim of identity theft, for the purpose of
identification and prosecution of violators of this chapter.

Sec.
3. RCW
19.16.250 and 1983 c 107 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No
licensee or employee of a licensee shall:

(1)
Directly or indirectly aid or abet any unlicensed person to engage in business
as a collection agency in this state or receive compensation from such
unlicensed person: PROVIDED, That nothing in this chapter shall prevent a
licensee from accepting, as forwardee, claims for collection from a collection
agency or attorney whose place of business is outside the state.

(2)
Collect or attempt to collect a claim by the use of any means contrary to the
postal laws and regulations of the United States postal department.

(3)
Publish or post or cause to be published or posted, any list of debtors
commonly known as "bad debt lists" or threaten to do so. For
purposes of this chapter, a "bad debt list" means any list of natural
persons alleged to fail to honor their lawful debts. However, nothing herein
shall be construed to prohibit a licensee from communicating to its customers
or clients by means of a coded list, the existence of a check dishonored
because of insufficient funds, not sufficient funds or closed account by the
financial institution servicing the debtor's checking account: PROVIDED, That
the debtor's identity is not readily apparent: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
licensee complies with the requirements of subsection (9)(e) of this section.

(4)
Have in his possession or make use of any badge, use a uniform of any law
enforcement agency or any simulation thereof, or make any statements which
might be construed as indicating an official connection with any federal,
state, county, or city law enforcement agency, or any other governmental
agency, while engaged in collection agency business.

(5)
Perform any act or acts, either directly or indirectly, constituting the
practice of law.

(6)
Advertise for sale or threaten to advertise for sale any claim as a means of
endeavoring to enforce payment thereof or agreeing to do so for the purpose of
soliciting claims, except where the licensee has acquired claims as an assignee
for the benefit of creditors or where the licensee is acting under court order.

(7)
Use any name while engaged in the making of a demand for any claim other than
the name set forth on his or its current license issued hereunder.

(8)
Give or send to any debtor or cause to be given or sent to any debtor, any
notice, letter, message, or form which represents or implies that a claim
exists unless it shall indicate in clear and legible type:

(a)
The name of the licensee and the city, street, and number at which he is
licensed to do business;

(b)
The name of the original creditor to whom the debtor owed the claim if such
name is known to the licensee or employee: PROVIDED, That upon written request
of the debtor, the licensee shall make a reasonable effort to obtain the name
of such person and provide this name to the debtor;

(c)
If the notice, letter, message, or form is the first notice to the debtor or if
the licensee is attempting to collect a different amount than indicated in his
or its first notice to the debtor, an itemization of the claim asserted must be
made including:

(i)
Amount owing on the original obligation at the time it was received by the
licensee for collection or by assignment;

(ii)
Interest or service charge, collection costs, or late payment charges, if any,
added to the original obligation by the original creditor, customer or assignor
before it was received by the licensee for collection, if such information is
known by the licensee or employee: PROVIDED, That upon written request of the
debtor, the licensee shall make a reasonable effort to obtain information on
such items and provide this information to the debtor;

(iii)
Interest or service charge, if any, added by the licensee or customer or
assignor after the obligation was received by the licensee for collection;

(iv)
Collection costs, if any, that the licensee is attempting to collect;

(v)
Attorneys' fees, if any, that the licensee is attempting to collect on his or
its behalf or on the behalf of a customer or assignor;

(vi)
Any other charge or fee that the licensee is attempting to collect on his or
its own behalf or on the behalf of a customer or assignor.

(9)
Communicate or threaten to communicate, the existence of a claim to a person
other than one who might be reasonably expected to be liable on the claim in
any manner other than through proper legal action, process, or proceedings
except under the following conditions:

(a)
A licensee or employee of a licensee may inform a credit reporting bureau of
the existence of a claim: PROVIDED, That if the licensee or employee of a
licensee reports a claim to a credit reporting bureau, the licensee shall upon
receipt of written notice from the debtor that any part of the claim is
disputed, forward a copy of such written notice to the credit reporting bureau;

(b)
A licensee or employee in collecting or attempting to collect a claim may
communicate the existence of a claim to a debtor's employer if the claim has
been reduced to a judgment;

(c)
A licensee or employee in collecting or attempting to collect a claim that has
not been reduced to judgment, may communicate the existence of a claim to a
debtor's employer if:

(i)
The licensee or employee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in
writing at his last known address or place of employment concerning the claim
and the debtor after a reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or has
failed to agree to make payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the
licensee, and

(ii)
The debtor has not in writing to the licensee disputed any part of the claim:
PROVIDED, That the licensee or employee may only communicate the existence of a
claim which has not been reduced to judgment to the debtor's employer once
unless the debtor's employer has agreed to additional communications.

(d)
A licensee may for the purpose of locating the debtor or locating assets of the
debtor communicate the existence of a claim to any person who might reasonably
be expected to have knowledge of the whereabouts of a debtor or the location of
assets of the debtor if the claim is reduced to judgment, or if not reduced to
judgment, when:

(i)
The licensee or employee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in
writing at his last known address or last known place of employment concerning
the claim and the debtor after a reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or
has failed to agree to make payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the
licensee, and

(ii)
The debtor has not in writing disputed any part of the claim.

(e)
A licensee may communicate the existence of a claim to its customers or clients
if the claim is reduced to judgment, or if not reduced to judgment, when:

(i)
The licensee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in writing at his
last known address or last known place of employment concerning the claim and
the debtor after a reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or has failed to
agree to make payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and

(ii)
The debtor has not in writing disputed any part of the claim.

(10)
Threaten the debtor with impairment of his credit rating if a claim is not
paid.

(11)
Communicate with the debtor after notification in writing from an attorney
representing such debtor that all further communications relative to a claim
should be addressed to the attorney: PROVIDED, That if a licensee requests in
writing information from an attorney regarding such claim and the attorney does
not respond within a reasonable time, the licensee may communicate directly
with the debtor until he or it again receives notification in writing that an
attorney is representing the debtor.

(12)
Communicate with a debtor or anyone else in such a manner as to harass,
intimidate, threaten, or embarrass a debtor, including but not limited to
communication at an unreasonable hour, with unreasonable frequency, by threats
of force or violence, by threats of criminal prosecution, and by use of
offensive language. A communication shall be presumed to have been made for
the purposes of harassment if:

(a)
It is made with a debtor or spouse in any form, manner, or place, more than
three times in a single week;

(b)
It is made with a debtor at his or her place of employment more than one time
in a single week;

(c)
It is made with the debtor or spouse at his or her place of residence between
the hours of 9:00 p.m. and 7:30 a.m.

(13)
Communicate with the debtor through use of forms or instruments that simulate
the form or appearance of judicial process, the form or appearance of
government documents, or the simulation of a form or appearance of a
telegraphic or emergency message.

(14)
Communicate with the debtor and represent or imply that the existing obligation
of the debtor may be or has been increased by the addition of attorney fees,
investigation fees, service fees, or any other fees or charges when in fact
such fees or charges may not legally be added to the existing obligation of
such debtor.

(15)
Threaten to take any action against the debtor which the licensee cannot
legally take at the time the threat is made.

(16)
Send any telegram or make any telephone calls to a debtor or concerning a debt
or for the purpose of demanding payment of a claim or seeking information about
a debtor, for which the charges are payable by the addressee or by the person
to whom the call is made.

(17)
In any manner convey the impression that the licensee is vouched for, bonded to
or by, or is an instrumentality of the state of Washington or any agency or
department thereof.

(18)
Collect or attempt to collect in addition to the principal amount of a claim
any sum other than allowable interest, collection costs or handling fees
expressly authorized by statute, and, in the case of suit, attorney's fees and
taxable court costs.

(19)
Procure from a debtor or collect or attempt to collect on any written note,
contract, stipulation, promise or acknowledgment under which a debtor may be
required to pay any sum other than principal, allowable interest, and, in the
case of suit, attorney's fees and taxable court costs.

(20) Upon notification by a victim of identity theft that a
police report has been filed regarding the identity theft, and upon receipt of
a copy of the report indicating that the victim's checkbook or other series of
preprinted written instruments has been stolen, fail to accept one single
writing from the victim that identifies the numbers of the checks, the bank,
and account number and that disputes creditors' claims for the identified
checks or written instruments. If more than one collection agency is
attempting collection on individual checks or written instruments that are part
of the series, each collection agency may request a single writing from the
victim that disputes creditors' claims for the entire checkbook or series.
Once a single writing has been received, the collection agency must not require
additional proof, explanation, or evidence except in a court of law from the
victim disputing creditors' claims regarding the checks or other written
instruments in the same series or lot and must consider the single writing as a
dispute to all creditors' claims arising from use of the checkbook or other
series of instruments. Once a single writing has been received, the collection
agency may not forward consumer reports to any consumer reporting agency
regarding collection activity or claims relating to the use of the checkbook or
other series of instruments. The terms "consumer report" and
"consumer reporting agency" have the same meaning as provided in the
federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681a.

---
END ---