BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
INTENT. (1) The legislature finds that every entity has an
affirmative and continuing obligation to respect the privacy of its consumers
and to protect the security and confidentiality of consumers. The legislature
finds that Washington's citizens have a right to privacy and a reasonable
expectation that the personal information that they provide in commercial
transactions with financial institutions and others who maintain and transfer
information will be kept private and confidential. The legislature finds that
there is no existing uniform law that creates an appropriate standard of
conduct for disclosure of consumers' personal information and that Washington's
citizens need additional statutory protection from fraud, deception, nuisance,
invasion of privacy, and breach of confidentiality related to the disclosure of
personal information. The legislature intends to ensure that entities and
consumers work cooperatively to protect consumer information and enforce
sanctions when violations occur.

(2)
The legislature finds that the disclosure of personal information has caused
specific significant harms to Washington consumers, including the appearance of
unauthorized charges or debits on consumers' accounts, misappropriation of
sensitive information for the purpose of assuming a consumer's identity, the
unwanted and unintended dissemination of personal and sensitive information,
and the invasion of privacy.

(3)
The legislature finds that the dissemination of certain sensitive information
causes a great risk of harm to the consumer, that it should be given a greater
level of protection under the law, and that requiring consumer authorization to
disseminate such sensitive information best balances the benefits and harms of
disclosure.

(4)
The legislature finds that the flow of less sensitive personal information has
resulted in a number of increased market efficiencies that are beneficial to
consumers. These include more rapid credit transactions and check
verifications, as well as an increased number of choices for products and
services. The legislature finds that these benefits can be maintained by
giving consumers the opportunity to choose whether their less sensitive
information will be shared. The legislature finds that giving consumers this
choice best balances the benefits and harms of disclosure of such information.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Affiliate" means an entity that controls, is controlled by, or is
under common control or common ownership with another entity.

(2)
"Consumer" or "customer" means a natural person who
purchases, leases, or otherwise contracts for goods or services that are
primarily used for personal, family, or household purposes.

(3)
"Consumer-requested purpose" means that the consumer has requested
the information custodian to establish or maintain a business relationship,
complete a transaction, or provide a product or service.

(4)
"Information custodian" means a nonpublic, commercial entity other
than a financial institution that maintains data containing personal
information or sensitive information about consumers it knows reside in
Washington and that sells, shares, or otherwise transfers the information to
others, including affiliates or nonaffiliates, for purposes other than
customer-requested purposes. An "information custodian" does not
include a consumer reporting agency, as defined in the federal Fair Credit
Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.), to the extent its activities are
directly related to assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or
other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer reports
to third parties, and to the extent that the activities are regulated by the
federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).

(5)
"Marketer" means a nonpublic, commercial entity that maintains data
containing personal information or sensitive information about consumers it knows
reside in Washington, that does not sell, share, or otherwise transfer the
information to others, either affiliates or nonaffiliates, but that uses the
information to engage in marketing.

(6)
"Marketing" or "marketing information" means a promotion,
solicitation, or advertisement made by a commercial entity through written,
telephonic, electronic, or other means, offering goods or services, that is
directed to a specific named individual, and that is separate from a billing,
or a promotion, solicitation, or advertisement directed to the general public
for sale of the marketer's own goods or services.

(7)
"Personal information" means information that is provided by the
consumer in a commercial context, and is identifiable to the individual
consumer, that concerns the amount or condition of the consumer's assets,
liabilities, financial transactions, purchasing history, buying preferences,
business relationships, account existence or status, customer status,
demographic information, name, address, telephone number, or electronic mail
address or that reflects current or historical balances or purchase amounts.

(8)
"Sensitive information" means information maintained in a commercial
context that is held for the purpose of transaction initiation, account access,
or identity verification, and includes account numbers, access codes or
passwords, tax identification numbers, driver's license or permit numbers,
state identicard numbers issued by the department of licensing, and credit card
numbers or expiration dates.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
RESTRICTION ON CONSUMER INFORMATION. Information custodians and marketers
shall, in performing a transaction with a consumer, providing a service for a
consumer, or establishing a business relationship with a consumer, require only
that the consumer provide information reasonably necessary to perform the
transaction, establish the relationship, or administer or maintain the business
relationship. Any optional information must be specified as such, and the
consumer must be given the option not to provide it.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
CONSUMER PRIVACY POLICIES. (1) An information custodian must have a consumer
privacy policy that discloses to existing and prospective consumers the
policies and practices of the information custodian regarding the use of
consumer personal information and sensitive information acquired or possessed
by the information custodian. Entities that maintain data containing personal
information or sensitive information but do not sell, share, or otherwise
transfer the data, are not required to have a privacy policy.

(2)
The consumer privacy policy, at a minimum, must summarize the information
custodian's responsibilities under this chapter and describe the consumer's
rights and remedies under it, and generally describe with whom the consumer's
personal and sensitive information will be shared or to whom it will be sold or
transferred.

(3)
The consumer privacy policy must also provide a reasonable means for consumers
to access their personal and sensitive information that the information
custodian shares, sells, or transfers or uses for marketing purposes. The
policy must also provide a reasonable process to correct inaccurate or incomplete
information.

(4)
An information custodian must disclose its consumer privacy policy at least
once to each consumer no later than:

(a)
For existing customers on the effective date of this act about whom the
information custodian has maintained personal information that includes the
consumer's name and address or other means of contact or identification, within
sixty days after the effective date of this act or when the consumer's name and
address or other means of contact or identification is obtained and maintained
by the information custodian;

(b)
For prospective customers after the effective date of this act, within thirty
days after the consumer's initial request for the policy; and

(c)
For all new customers after the effective date of this act, at the time the
customer enters into a business relationship with the information custodian
that involves recording and maintaining of personal or sensitive information.

(5)
An information custodian must disclose its consumer privacy policy on an annual
basis to existing customers about whom the information custodian has maintained
personal or sensitive information after the initial disclosure described in
subsection (4) of this section, and, when material changes are made to the
policy, the information custodian must notify the consumer, clearly and
conspicuously in writing, in plain language, of the material changes and
describe the consumer's rights under sections 5(1) and 7 (1) and (2) of this
act.

(6)
The disclosure of the consumer privacy policy must be clearly and conspicuously
made in writing, in a document separate from all other documents or pages that
are provided to the consumer by the information custodian.

(7)
The consumer privacy policy must be clearly and conspicuously posted on the
information custodian's website, if a website exists, and must be readily
available for review at the information custodian's place of business.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
PERSONAL INFORMATION‑-CONSUMER CONTROL. (1) An information custodian may
share, sell, or otherwise transfer personal information for purposes other than
consumer-requested purposes, only if it has clearly and conspicuously disclosed
to the consumer the following information in plain language:

(a)
That the consumer has the right to choose not to have his or her personal
information shared, sold, or otherwise transferred for purposes other than
consumer-requested purposes. The disclosure must be made at the time the consumer
privacy policy is provided to the customer under section 4 of this act.

(b)
That the consumer may choose not to receive marketing information or have his
or her personal information shared, sold, or transferred for other than
consumer-requested purposes, by exercising his or her choice through a
cost-free method provided by the information custodian. Disclosure of the
existence of the cost-free method must be made at the time the consumer privacy
policy is provided to the customer under section 4 of this act. The
information custodian shall maintain adequate and reasonable access for
consumers to the cost-free method it has established.

(2)
If, under this section, a consumer chooses not to have his or her personal
information shared, sold, or otherwise transferred under subsection (1) of this
section, the information custodian must stop sharing, selling, or otherwise
transferring the consumer's personal information for purposes other than
consumer-requested purposes, within ninety days of receiving the consumer's
notice. Once a consumer has chosen not to have his or her personal information
shared, sold, or otherwise transferred, an information custodian may not share,
sell, or otherwise transfer the information for purposes other than consumer-requested
purposes until the consumer notifies the entity that he or she has chosen to
have his or her personal information shared, sold, or otherwise transferred
under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
This section does not apply to disclosure of personal information under the
following circumstances:

(a)
Disclosure to the consumer upon his or her request and upon presentation of
proper identification;

(b)
Disclosure required by federal, state, or local law or regulation;

(c)
Disclosure made under a search warrant, court order, or subpoena, including an
administrative subpoena;

(d)
Use or disclosure of personal information by an information custodian to
perform services or functions on behalf of the information custodian as part of
the information custodian's provision of services or products to a consumer in
connection with a consumer-requested purpose;

(e)
Disclosure to a third party in the business of debt collection where necessary
to collect a debt or check returned for insufficient funds;

(f)
Disclosure to protect against or prevent actual or potential fraud or
unauthorized transactions;

(g)
Disclosure by or to a consumer reporting agency as defined by the federal Fair
Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) and as specifically permitted
by that act;

(h)
Disclosure of credit report information between affiliates as defined in the
federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) and as
specifically permitted by that act;

(i)
Disclosure for purposes of a proposed or actual securitization, secondary
market sale (including sales of service rights), or similar transaction related
to a consumer-requested purpose;

(j)
Disclosure to persons holding a legal or beneficial interest relating to the
consumer;

(k)
Disclosure to persons acting in a fiduciary or lawful representative capacity
on behalf of the consumer; or

(l)
Disclosure in order to provide information to insurance rate advisory
organizations, guaranty funds or agencies, applicable rating agencies of an
information custodian, persons assessing the information custodian's compliance
with industry standards, and the information custodian's attorneys,
accountants, and auditors.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
MARKETING‑‑CONSUMER CONTROL. (1) A marketer may use personal or
sensitive information for marketing purposes only if it has clearly and
conspicuously disclosed in plain language to the consumer:

(a)
That the consumer has the right to choose not to receive marketing
information. This disclosure must be made in all marketing information, in
whatever medium the marketing information is sent or, if the marketer is an
information custodian, in the privacy policy provided to the customer under
section 4 of this act.

(b)
That the consumer may choose not to receive marketing information by exercising
his or her choice through a cost-free method provided by the marketer. This
disclosure must be made in all marketing information in whatever medium the
marketing information is sent in, or, if the marketer is an information
custodian, in the privacy policy provided to the customer under section 4 of
this act. The marketer shall maintain adequate and reasonable access for
consumers to the cost-free method it has established.

(2)
If, under this section, a consumer chooses not to receive marketing
information, the marketer must stop marketing to the consumer within ninety
days of receiving the consumer's notice. Once a consumer has chosen not to
receive marketing information, a marketer may not market to the consumer until
the consumer notifies the marketer that he or she has chosen to receive
marketing information.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
SENSITIVE INFORMATION‑-CONSUMER CONTROL. (1) An information custodian
may not disclose sensitive information to a third party or affiliate for
purposes other than consumer-requested purposes unless the consumer has
received written notification of the following:

(a)
The information to be disclosed;

(b)
The entity or entities authorized to receive the disclosure of information;

(c)
A specific description of the purpose for which the disclosure of information
will be made;

(d)
The expiration date for authorization for use of the information, which date is
no more than one year from the date of execution.

(2)
An information custodian may not disclose sensitive information to a third
party or affiliate for purposes other than consumer-requested purposes unless
the consumer, upon notice as provided in this section and affirmative consent,
authorizes the disclosure of the sensitive information sought to be disclosed,
in a written statement dated and accepted by the consumer that is separate and
distinct from any other document, and that contains a description of the
information sought to be disclosed and the purpose for which the information
will be disclosed.

(3)
This section does not apply to disclosure of sensitive information under the
following circumstances:

(a)
Disclosure to the consumer upon his or her request and upon proper
identification;

(b)
Disclosure required by federal, state, or local law or regulation;

(c)
Disclosure made under a search warrant, court order, or subpoena, including an
administrative subpoena;

(d)
Use or disclosure of sensitive information by an information custodian to
perform services or functions on behalf of the information custodian as part of
the information custodian's provision of services or products to a consumer in
connection with a consumer-requested purpose;

(e)
Disclosure to a third party in the business of debt collection where necessary
to collect a debt or check returned for insufficient funds;

(f)
Disclosure to protect against or prevent actual or potential fraud or
unauthorized transactions;

(g)
Disclosure by or to a consumer reporting agency as defined by the federal Fair
Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) and as specifically
permitted by that act;

(h)
Disclosure of credit report information between affiliates as defined in the
federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) and as
specifically permitted by that act;

(i)
Disclosure of sensitive information that is prohibited from disclosure by
section 502(d) of Public Law 106-103 (the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999);

(j)
Disclosure for purposes of a proposed or actual securitization, secondary
market sale (including sales service rights), or similar transactions related
to a consumer-requested purpose;

(k)
Disclosure to persons holding a legal or beneficial interest relating to the
consumer;

(l)
Disclosure to persons acting in a fiduciary or lawful representative capacity
on behalf of the consumer; and

(m)
Disclosure in order to provide information to insurance rate advisory
organizations, guaranty funds or agencies, applicable rating agencies of the
information custodian, persons assessing the information custodian's compliance
with industry standards, and the information custodian's attorneys,
accountants, and auditors.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. CONFIDENTIALITY
AND SECURITY OF INFORMATION. (1) Third parties or affiliates that obtain
personal information or sensitive information from information custodians may
not sell, share, or otherwise transfer the information for any reason other
than the original purpose for which the information was sold, shared, or
transferred to the third party or affiliate.

(2)
An information custodian, before sharing, selling, or otherwise transferring
personal information or sensitive information, must obtain a written agreement
from the third party or affiliate providing for the following:

(a)
To keep the information confidential;

(b)
To use the information only for the original purpose for which it has been
shared, sold, or provided; and

(c)
To safeguard the information from loss, misuse, theft, unauthorized access,
disclosure, defacement, or alteration.

(3)
Every information custodian must establish reasonable safeguards to ensure the
confidentiality and safety of personal information and sensitive information
and to protect them from loss, misuse, theft, unauthorized access, disclosure,
defacement, or alteration.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
VIOLATION AN UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE ACT. (1) Unfair and deceptive invasion of
privacy rights is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business. The legislature finds that the practices covered by
this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose
of applying the Consumer Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of
this chapter is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce for the purpose
of applying the Consumer Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

(2)
A person may not bring an action against a marketer for a violation of section
6(2) of this act unless he or she has notified the marketer of a violation of
the section, in writing at an address provided by the marketer upon the
consumer's request, and the information custodian has again violated section
6(2) of this act more than ninety days after having received the notification.

(3)
Damages to a person who has been the victim of a violation of this chapter are
five hundred dollars, or actual damages, whichever is greater. A court may
increase the award of damages in an amount not more than three times the actual
damages sustained, or one thousand five hundred dollars, whichever is greater,
upon a demonstration that a violation of the chapter was willful.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
Section captions used in sections 1 through 9 of this act are not part of the
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. This
act takes effect December 1, 2000.

---
END ---