BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of dry cleaning
services.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "dry cleaning services" means the activity
of providing customers with clean apparel, linen, towels, uniforms, gowns,
protective apparel, mats, rugs, and similar items. The term includes services
that operate their own cleaning establishments as well as those contracting
with other laundry or dry cleaning businesses.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of dry
cleaning services.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "dry cleaning
services" means the activity of providing customers with clean apparel,
linen, towels, uniforms, gowns, protective apparel, mats, rugs, and similar
items. The term includes services that operate their own cleaning establishments
as well as those contracting with other laundry or dry cleaning businesses.

---
END ---