BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 79.01 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of social and health services shall transfer the approximately five
hundred seventy-five acres of the greater Western state hospital campus not a
part of the central institutional campus to the corpus of the charitable,
educational, penal, and reformatory institution account. Any income from the property
transferred pursuant to this section must be used for the benefit of the
mentally ill as specified in the original federal grant. The transferred
property shall be managed pursuant to the principles specified in RCW 79.01.006
and 79.01.007 except that it may never be sold or exchanged without specific
approval contained in an act of law. The department shall renegotiate any
lease provisions that conflict with the transfer or trust land management
principles, to the extent not otherwise prohibited by law.

Sec.
2. RCW
79.01.006 and 1996 c 288 s 51 and 1996 c 261 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Every five years the department of social and health services and other state
agencies that operate institutions shall conduct an inventory of all real
property subject to the charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory
institution account and other real property acquired for institutional purposes
or for the benefit of the blind, deaf, mentally ill, developmentally disabled,
or otherwise disabled. The inventory shall identify which of those real
properties are not needed for state-provided residential care, custody, or
treatment. By December 1, 1992, and every five years thereafter the department
shall report the results of the inventory to the house of representatives
committee on capital facilities and financing, the senate health and
long-term care committee, the senate committee on ways and means, and the
joint legislative audit and review committee.

(2)
Real property identified as not needed for state-provided residential care,
custody, or treatment shall be transferred to the corpus of the charitable,
educational, penal, and reformatory institution account. This subsection shall
not apply to leases of real property to a consortium of three or more counties
in order for the counties to construct or otherwise acquire correctional
facilities for juveniles or adults ((or to real property subject to binding
conditions that conflict with the other provisions of this subsection)). Under
no circumstance may the department of natural resources fail to accept land
designated for transfer under this section within one hundred eighty days
without specific authority to do so in an act of law.

(3)
The department of natural resources shall manage all property subject to the
charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institution account and, in
consultation with the department of social and health services and other
affected agencies, shall adopt a plan for the management of real property
subject to the account and other real property acquired for institutional
purposes or for the benefit of the blind, deaf, mentally ill, developmentally
disabled, or otherwise disabled.

(a)
The plan shall be consistent with state trust land policies and shall be
compatible with the needs of institutions adjacent to real property subject to
the plan.

(b)
The plan may be modified as necessary to ensure the quality of future
management and to address the acquisition of additional real property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---