BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28B.10.802 and 1989 c 254 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in RCW 28B.10.800 through 28B.10.824:

(1)
"Institutions of higher education" shall mean (1) any public
university, college, community college, or vocational-technical institute
operated by the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof or (2)
any other university, college, school, or institute in the state of Washington
offering instruction beyond the high school level which is a member institution
of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the board for the purposes
of this section: PROVIDED, That any institution, branch, extension or facility
operating within the state of Washington which is affiliated with an
institution operating in another state must be a separately accredited member
institution of any such accrediting association, or a branch of a member
institution of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the board for
purposes of this section, that is eligible for federal student financial aid
assistance and has operated as a nonprofit entity for a minimum of ten
consecutive years within the state of Washington: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
no institution of higher education shall be eligible to participate in a
student financial aid program unless it agrees to and complies with program
rules and regulations adopted pursuant to RCW 28B.10.822.

(2)
The term "financial aid" shall mean loans and/or grants to needy
students enrolled or accepted for enrollment as a student at institutions of
higher education.

(3)
The term "needy student" shall mean a post high school student of an
institution of higher learning as defined in subsection (1) of this section who
demonstrates to the board the financial inability, either through the student's
parents, family and/or personally, to meet the total cost of board, room,
books, and tuition and incidental fees for any semester or quarter.

(4)
The term "disadvantaged student" shall mean a post high school
student who by reason of adverse cultural, educational, environmental,
experiential, familial or other circumstances is unable to qualify for
enrollment as a full time student in an institution of higher learning, who
would otherwise qualify as a needy student, and who is attending an institution
of higher learning under an established program designed to qualify the student
for enrollment as a full time student.

(5)
"Commission" or "board" shall mean the higher education
coordinating board.

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.12.030 and 1994 c 130 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following
meanings, unless the context shall clearly indicate another or different
meaning or intent:

(1)
The term "needy student" shall mean a student enrolled or accepted
for enrollment at a post-secondary institution who, according to a system of
need analysis approved by the higher education coordinating board, demonstrates
a financial inability, either parental, familial, or personal, to bear the
total cost of education for any semester or quarter.

(2) The term "eligible institution" shall mean any
post-secondary institution in this state accredited by the Northwest
Association of Schools and Colleges, or a branch of a member institution of
an accrediting association recognized by rule of the board for purposes of this
section, that is eligible for federal student financial aid assistance and has
operated as a nonprofit entity for a minimum of ten consecutive years within
the state of Washington, or any public technical college in the state.

---
END ---