BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 50.20 RCW to read as follows:

An individual is disqualified from benefits with respect to any
month in which he or she is receiving, has received, or will receive severance
pay in excess of five hundred dollars.

---
END ---