BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature intends to further the government-to-government relationship
between the state of Washington and the federally recognized Indian tribes in
the state of Washington by authorizing the governor to enter into cooperative
agreements with federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of Washington
concerning the taxation of liquor. The legislature finds that these agreements
will provide a means to address issues of alcohol on reservations, maintain
revenue for essential government services, maintain jobs in local communities,
and strengthen the relationship between Indian tribes and the state of
Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The governor may enter into cooperative agreements with any federally
recognized Indian tribe in the state of Washington concerning the taxation of
liquor within that tribe's reservation boundaries or upon trust land. All
cooperative agreements shall meet the requirements for cooperative agreements
under this section.

(2)
A cooperative agreement shall provide that the tribal liquor tax is credited
against the state taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.

(3)
An agreement under this section must include provisions for:

(a)
Collection procedures for the taxes. The department of revenue, at no cost to
the tribe, shall collect the tribal tax for distribution to the tribe;

(b)
Details of the tribal tax, including agreement regarding the measure and base
of the tax. This subsection (3)(b) is intended to make the state and tribal
tax systems uniform for simplification purposes in order to reduce collection
costs and minimize the burden on businesses;

(c)
The tribal tax rate, such that the tribe will maintain its tax at a rate equal
to or lower than an amount that produces no more than an amount equivalent to
the state distribution from the taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
regarding liquor as defined in RCW 66.04.010;

(d)
Dedicated use of tribal liquor tax revenue for substance abuse programs,
alcohol-related law enforcement activities, and other public health purposes;
and

(e)
Agreement that the tribal tax is in lieu of all other fees and taxes on liquor
and that the tribe agrees to not license or tax liquor in any other manner
except as prescribed in the agreement under this section.

(4)
Cooperative agreements will provide for the submission of disputes to an
arbitrator or mediator and may provide for submission of disputes regarding the
interpretation and administration of their provisions for judicial resolution,
but a limited waiver of sovereign immunity and consent by the state for the
resolution shall be conditioned upon a similar limited waiver of sovereign
immunity by the Indian tribe, which waiver shall be approved or otherwise
confirmed by the United States as may be required by law and to the extent
permitted by law.

(5)
The governor may delegate the power to negotiate cooperative agreements under
this section to the department of revenue and the liquor control board jointly.

(6)
For purposes of this section "federally recognized Indian tribe or
nation" or "tribe" means an Indian tribal entity that is
recognized as an Indian tribe by the United States secretary of the interior.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

Subject
to section 2 of this act, a tax enacted by a federally recognized Indian tribe
applicable to liquor that is also subject to tax under this chapter shall be
credited against the tax imposed under this chapter. The tax shall be credited
against the state share of the distribution and shall not reduce the proceeds
for distribution to local governments.

Sec.
4. RCW
66.08.050 and 1997 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board, subject to the provisions of this title and the rules, shall:

(1)
Determine the localities within which state liquor stores shall be established
throughout the state, and the number and situation of the stores within each
locality;

(2)
Appoint in cities and towns and other communities, in which no state liquor
store is located, liquor vendors. In addition, the board may appoint, in its
discretion, a manufacturer that also manufactures liquor products other than
wine under a license under this title, as a vendor for the purpose of sale of
liquor products of its own manufacture on the licensed premises only. Such
liquor vendors shall be agents of the board and be authorized to sell liquor to
such persons, firms or corporations as provided for the sale of liquor from a
state liquor store, and such vendors shall be subject to such additional rules
and regulations consistent with this title as the board may require;

(3)
Establish all necessary warehouses for the storing and bottling, diluting and
rectifying of stocks of liquors for the purposes of this title;

(4)
Provide for the leasing for periods not to exceed ten years of all premises
required for the conduct of the business; and for remodeling the same, and the
procuring of their furnishings, fixtures, and supplies; and for obtaining
options of renewal of such leases by the lessee. The terms of such leases in
all other respects shall be subject to the direction of the board;

(5)
Determine the nature, form and capacity of all packages to be used for
containing liquor kept for sale under this title;

(6)
Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and documents in the
name of the board, under such regulations as the board may fix;

(7)
Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations whatsoever relating
to the business of the board;

(8)
Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the board, and to
determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such employee;

(9)
Perform services for the state lottery commission to such extent, and for such
compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon between the board and the
commission;

(10)
Accept and deposit into the general fund-local account and disburse, subject to
appropriation, federal grants or other funds or donations from any source for
the purpose of improving public awareness of the health risks associated with
alcohol consumption by youth and the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington
state. The board's alcohol awareness program shall cooperate with federal and
state agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an active public
beverage alcohol awareness program;

(11)
Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the foregoing or not,
to carry out the provisions of this title, and shall have full power to do each
and every act necessary to the conduct of its business, including all buying,
selling, preparation and approval of forms, and every other function of the
business whatsoever, subject only to audit by the state auditor: PROVIDED,
That the board shall have no authority to regulate the content of spoken language
on licensed premises where wine and other liquors are served and where there is
not a clear and present danger of disorderly conduct being provoked by such
language;

(12)
Enter into cooperative agreements, jointly with the department of revenue, on
behalf of the governor under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---