BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that in order to comply with the community mental health
services act, chapter 71.24 RCW, and the medicaid managed care mental health
waiver, and to effectively assist persons with mental illness and consumers of
mental health services in the assertion of their civil and human rights, an
independent mental health ombudsman program should be instituted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. As
used in this chapter, "mental health provider or facility" means any
of the following:

(1)
An agency, individual, or facility that is part of the community mental health
service delivery system, as defined in RCW 71.24.025;

(2)
A long-term care facility, as defined in RCW 43.190.020, in which adults or
children with mental illness reside;

(3)
A state hospital, as defined in RCW 72.23.010; and

(4)
A facility or agency that receives funds from the state of Washington to
provide residential or treatment services to adults or children with mental
illness.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall contract
with a private nonprofit organization to be the office of mental health
ombudsman and to provide mental health ombudsman services as specified under,
and consistent with, the medicaid managed care mental health waiver, state law,
the goals of the state, and the needs of its citizens. The department of
community, trade, and economic development shall ensure that all program and
staff support necessary to enable the ombudsman to effectively protect the
interests of persons with mental illness is provided by the nonprofit
organization that contracts to be the office of mental health ombudsman and to
provide independent mental health ombudsman services. The department shall designate
the organization to be the office of mental health ombudsman and to provide
mental health ombudsman services by a competitive bidding process and shall
ensure that the designated agency has demonstrated financial stability and
meets the qualifications for ombudsman identified in section 4 of this act.
The department shall not redesignate the agency serving as the office of mental
health ombudsman except upon a showing of good cause for redesignation, and
after notice and opportunity for agency and public comment have been made and
there has been an opportunity to appeal the redesignation to the director.

(2)
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall adopt rules
to carry out this chapter.

(3)
The office of mental health ombudsman shall have the following powers and
duties:

(a)
Provide services for coordinating the activities of mental health ombudsmen
throughout the state;

(b)
Carry out such other activities as the department of community, trade, and
economic development deems appropriate;

(c)
Establish procedures consistent with section 9 of this act for appropriate
access by mental health ombudsmen to mental health providers and facilities and
the records of their patients, residents, and clients, including procedures to
protect the confidentiality of the records and ensure that the identity of any
complainant or resident will not be disclosed without the written consent of
the complainant or resident, or upon court order;

(d)
Establish a state‑wide uniform reporting system to collect and analyze
data relating to complaints, conditions, and service quality provided by mental
health providers and facilities for the purpose of identifying and resolving
significant problems, with provision for submission of such data to the
department of social and health services and to the federal department of
health and human services, or its successor agency, on a regular basis;

(e)
Establish procedures to assure that any files maintained by ombudsman programs shall
be disclosed only at the discretion of the ombudsman having authority over the
disposition of such files, except that the identity of a complainant or
patient, resident, or client of a mental health provider or facility may not be
disclosed by the ombudsman unless:

(i)
The complainant or resident, or the complainant or resident's legal
representative, consents in writing to such disclosure; or

(ii)
Such disclosure is required by court order; and

(f)
Establish ombudsman services that are available state-wide, and at eastern
state and western state hospitals.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The agency designated by the department of community, trade, and economic
development as the office of mental health ombudsman and any mental health
ombudsman authorized by this chapter or a local governmental authority must
have training or experience in all of the following areas:

(a)
Mental health and other related social services programs;

(b)
The legal system;

(c)
Advocacy and supporting self-advocacy; and

(d)
Dispute or problem resolution techniques, including investigation, mediation,
and negotiation.

(2)
A mental health ombudsman must not have been employed by any mental health
provider or facility within the past three years, except where prior to the
adoption of this chapter he or she has been employed by a regional support
network or subcontractor thereof to provide mental health ombudsman services
pursuant to the requirements of the federal medicaid managed care mental health
waiver.

(3)
No mental health ombudsman or any member of his or her immediate family may
have, or have had within the past three years, any pecuniary interest in the
provision of mental health services.

(4)
The office of mental health ombudsman shall maintain a toll-free telephone
number.

(5)
Mental health ombudsmen shall assist and advocate on behalf of patients,
residents, and clients of mental health providers and facilities and shall
attempt to resolve complaints informally, using grievance processes and, if
applicable, the fair hearing process. Mental health ombudsmen shall attempt to
resolve all disputes at the lowest possible level.

(6)
The office of mental health ombudsman shall ensure that there are quality
review teams established to evaluate quality and service recipient satisfaction
and provide recommendations for service improvements, as required by the
medicaid managed care waiver.

(7)
Where consented to by the patient, resident, or client, ombudsmen shall involve
family members and friends in the process of resolving complaints.

(8)
The office of mental health ombudsman shall support mental health service
recipient participation in treatment planning and delivery, both on an
individual basis and system-wide, and shall actively recruit and support the
participation of service recipients as mental health ombudsmen.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Every
mental health provider and facility shall post in a conspicuous location a
notice providing the office of mental health ombudsman's toll‑free
number, and the name, address, and phone number of the office of the
appropriate local mental health ombudsman and a brief description of the
services provided by the office. The form of the notice must be approved by
the office of mental health ombudsman. This information must also be
distributed to the patients, residents, and clients, and their family members
and legal guardians, upon application for mental health provider services, and
upon admission to a mental health facility.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
office of mental health ombudsman shall:

(1)
Identify, investigate, and resolve complaints made by or on behalf of patients,
residents, and clients of mental health providers and facilities relating to administrative
action, inaction, or decisions that may adversely affect the health, safety,
welfare, and rights of these individuals;

(2)
Monitor the development and implementation of federal, state, and local laws,
rules, regulations, and policies with respect to mental health service
provision in this state;

(3)
Provide information as appropriate to patients, residents, clients, family
members, guardians, resident representatives, employees of mental health
providers and facilities, and others regarding the rights of residents, and to
public agencies regarding the quality of service, complaints, and problems of
individuals receiving services from mental health providers and facilities; and

(4)
Provide for training volunteers and promoting the development of citizen
organizations to participate in the ombudsman program. A trained and certified
mental health ombudsman, in accordance with the policies and procedures
established by the office of mental health ombudsman, shall inform residents,
their representatives, and others about the rights of residents, and may
identify, investigate, and resolve complaints and monitor the quality of
services provided to patients, residents, and clients of mental health
providers and facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
The office of mental health ombudsman shall develop referral procedures for all
mental health ombudsmen to refer any complaint to an appropriate state or local
government agency. The department of social and health services shall act as
quickly as possible on any complaint referred to them by a mental health
ombudsman.

(2)
The department of social and health services shall respond to any complaint
against a mental health provider or facility that was referred to it by a
mental health ombudsman and shall forward to that ombudsman a summary of the
results of the investigation and action proposed or taken.

(3)
The office of mental health ombudsman, and all local and volunteer mental
health ombudsmen, shall work in cooperation with the state designated
protection and advocacy agency, the long-term care ombudsman, and the children
and family ombudsman. The office of mental health ombudsman shall develop and
implement a working agreement with the protection and advocacy agency, the
long-term care ombudsman, and the children and family ombudsman, to ensure
efficient, coordinated service.

(4)
The office of mental health ombudsman shall develop working agreements with each
regional support network, the state psychiatric hospitals, the mental health
division, and such other entities as necessary to accomplish the goals of the
program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
The office of mental health ombudsman shall develop procedures governing the
right of entry of all mental health ombudsmen to mental health providers and
facilities, jails, and correctional facilities. Mental health ombudsmen shall
have access to patients, residents, and clients of mental health providers and
facilities, and inmates at jails and correctional facilities, with provisions
made for privacy, for the purpose of hearing, investigating, and resolving
complaints and monitoring the quality of services, at any time deemed necessary
and reasonable by the office of mental health ombudsman to effectively carry
out the provisions of this chapter.

(2)
Nothing in this chapter restricts, limits, or increases any existing right of
an organization or individual not described in subsection (1) of this section
to enter or provide assistance to patients, residents, or clients of mental
health providers or facilities.

(3)
Nothing in this chapter restricts any right or privilege of a patient,
resident, or client of a mental health provider or facility to receive visitors
of his or her choice.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
No mental health ombudsman is liable for good faith performance of
responsibilities under this chapter.

(2)
No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be taken against an
employee of a mental health provider or facility, or a patient, resident, or
client of a mental health provider or facility, or a volunteer, for any
communication made, or information given or disclosed, to aid the mental health
ombudsman in carrying out duties and responsibilities under this chapter,
unless the same was done maliciously or without good faith. This subsection is
not intended to infringe on the rights of the employer to supervise,
discipline, or terminate an employee for other reasons.

(3)
All communications by a mental health ombudsman, if reasonably related to the
requirements of that individual's responsibilities under this chapter and done
in good faith, are privileged and that privilege shall serve as a defense to
any action in libel or slander.

(4)
A representative of the office of mental health ombudsman is exempt from being
required to testify in court as to any confidential matters except as the court
may deem necessary to enforce this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. All
records and files of mental health ombudsmen relating to any complaint or
investigation made pursuant to carrying out their duties and the identities of
complainants, witnesses, patients, or residents shall remain confidential
unless disclosure is authorized by the client or his or her guardian or legal
representative. No disclosures may be made outside the office without the
consent of any named witnesses, resident, patient, client, or complainant
unless the disclosure is made without the identity of any of these individuals
being disclosed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. It is
the intent of the legislature that federal medicaid requirements be complied
with and the department of community, trade, and economic development annually
expend at least the amount currently expended on mental health ombudsman
services and quality review team services by regional support networks and
their subcontractors, pursuant to contracts with the department of social and
health services, to establish the mental health ombudsman program established
by this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13.
Sections 1 through 12 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 71 RCW.

---
END ---