BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.04.213 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Agricultural product" means any product of plant cultivation or
animal husbandry including, but not limited to: A product of horticulture,
grain cultivation, vermiculture, viticulture, or aquaculture as defined in RCW
15.85.020; plantation Christmas trees; turf; or any animal including but not
limited to an animal that is a private sector cultured aquatic product as
defined in RCW 15.85.020, or a bird, or insect, or the substances obtained from
such an animal. "Agricultural product" does not include animals
intended to be pets.

(2) "Farmer" means any person engaged in the business of
growing or producing, upon the person's own lands or upon the lands in which
the person has a present right of possession, any agricultural product
whatsoever for sale. "Farmer" does not include a person using such
products as ingredients in a manufacturing process, ((or)) but does
include a person using raspberries, strawberries, or blueberries that are grown
or produced upon the person's own lands or upon the lands in which the person
has a present right of possession in a manufacturing process.
"Farmer" does not include a person growing or producing such
products for the person's own consumption. "Farmer" does not include
a person selling any animal or substance obtained therefrom in connection with
the person's business of operating a stockyard or a slaughter or packing
house. "Farmer" does not include any person in respect to the
business of taking, cultivating, or raising timber.

---
END ---