BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28B.15.110 and 1977 ex.s. c 126 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Where
students at any of the four year state colleges or universities participate in
a joint program undertaken by two or more of such institutions, and which leads
to a degree, the tuition and fees assessed each student participating in such
joint program shall be equal.

The
governing board at each state four year institution shall, where the tuition
and fees which it charges resident students participating in a joint program
falling within the scope of this section would be less than those charged to
any such students from any other state four year institution who participates
in such joint program, impose a supplemental fee upon its resident students so
participating in order to make the tuition and fees charged to them equal to
the highest amount charged to any other resident student from a state four year
institution who participates in the program. Such governing board shall, where
the tuition and fees which it charges nonresident students participating in a
joint program falling within the scope of this section would be less than those
charged to any such students participating from any other state four year
institution who participates in such joint program, impose a supplemental fee
upon its nonresident students so participating in order to make the tuition and
fees charged to them equal to the highest amount charged to any other
nonresident student from a state four year institution who participates in the
program.

The tuition charged students enrolled in the cooperative
computer engineering program offered jointly by Washington State University,
Gonzaga University, and the University of Idaho shall be equal for all students
in the program from each of the institutions, as negotiated by the
participating institutions. The board of regents of Washington State
University shall charge its students who participate in the cooperative
computer engineering program offered by Gonzaga University, the University of
Idaho, and Washington State University a supplemental fee so that the tuition
and fees charged them are equal to the tuition charged by Gonzaga University
for its students enrolled in the program.

---
END ---