BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(b)
"Medical entity" means a hospital, organ bank, organ donation
organization, coroner, medical examiner, or other entity specified by the
department by rule.

(2)
The organ donor data base program is created in the department. The purpose of
the program is to create and maintain a secure data base that lists volunteer
organ donors in the state. The goal of the program is to increase the
availability of donated organs, and to make the process of donating and
receiving organs more timely and efficient.

(3)
The department must create an on-line data base containing information about
all eligible individuals who have volunteered as organ donors in the state.
The data base must be in a format that will allow the department to enter and
update information easily and cost effectively, and allow authorized medical
entities to access the data base twenty-four hours a day. The data base must
be private, and accessible only to those medical entities authorized by the
department by rule.

(4)
Information for the data base may come from existing public and private organ
donor lists or data bases. Information may also come from a volunteer organ
donor form created by the department. The department must adopt by rule the
content of the form to be filled out by a volunteer organ donor. At a minimum,
the form must include the following:

(a)
The name, address, telephone number, and date of birth of the volunteer organ
donor; and

(b)
A space on the form that requires the volunteer organ donor to communicate his
or her wish to be an organ donor to another person over age eighteen. The
witness shall also provide his or her name, address, and phone number, and sign
the form signifying his or her understanding of the volunteer organ donor's
intent.

(5)
The department must adopt by rule procedures for the broad dissemination and
timely retrieval of volunteer organ donation forms, as well as the method and
timing of entering new or updated organ donor information into the data base.

(6)
The department is authorized to adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of . . . . . dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the department of social and health services for the purposes
of this act.

---
END ---