BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.113 and 1993 c 228 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of licensing shall provide a statement whereby the licensee may
certify his or her willingness to make an anatomical gift under RCW 68.50.540,
as now or hereafter amended. The department shall provide the statement in at
least one of the following ways:

(((1)))
(a) On each driver's license; or

(((2)))
(b) With each driver's license; or

(((3)))
(c) With each in-person driver's license application.

(2) The department of licensing shall provide, on the statement
under subsection (1) of this section, a space for a witness to certify that the
licensee has discussed his or her willingness to make an anatomical gift with
the witness, and that the licensee's desire to make an anatomical gift is known
to the witness.

---
END ---