BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. Every
seller of goods or services who accepts the use of a debit card as a means of
payment must post in a conspicuous manner at the place the debit card is used a
notice stating the amount of the hold that will be placed on the debit card
user's account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---