BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
85.16.020 and 1949 c 26 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

On
or before the first Monday in September in each year the supervisors of each
diking, drainage, or sewerage improvement district shall make and file
with the board of the county containing such district, a statement and estimate
in writing of the amount required for the maintenance of the system of
improvements of said district for the ensuing two, three, or four fiscal
years. The board shall, on or before the first Monday in October next
ensuing, levy assessments for the corresponding number of years for the
amount of said estimate, or such number of years and amount as it shall
deem advisable, upon the property within the district and against the state,
the county containing such district, and the cities, towns, and other
municipal corporations within such district in respect of all highways, roads,
and streets and other lands, improvements, and facilities chargeable therewith
owned by them respectively within such district. Said assessments shall be
levied in the same proportion as the assessments to pay the original cost of
construction of said system of improvements: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That when a
determination or redetermination of benefits accruing to the properties within
the district from the maintenance of the district's system of improvements or
from the maintenance of the district's diking system and drainage system
separately shall have been made, as hereinafter in this chapter provided, then
the assessments for maintenance shall be levied in proportion to the benefits
accruing to each piece or parcel of property and improvements benefited
according to the latest determination of such benefits. Each such levy as made
shall be certified by the auditor to the treasurer, who shall extend the same
upon the district assessment roll.

Sec.
2. RCW
85.08.410 and 1983 c 3 s 230 are each amended to read as follows:

At
such hearing, which may be adjourned from time to time and from place to place,
until finally completed, the board of county commissioners shall carefully
examine and consider said schedule and any objections filed or made thereto and
shall correct, revise, raise, lower, change, or modify such schedule or
any part thereof, or strike therefrom any property not benefited, or set aside
such schedule and order that such apportionment be made de novo, as to such
body shall appear equitable and just. The board shall cause the clerk of the
board to enter on such schedule all such additions, cancellations, changes,
modifications, and reapportionments, all credits for damages allowed or
awarded to the owner of any piece of property benefited, but not paid, as
provided in RCW 85.08.200; also a credit in favor of the county on any
apportionment against the county, of all sums paid on account of said
improvement, as provided in RCW 85.08.210; and all sums allowed the county on
account of services rendered by the county engineer or prosecuting attorney, as
provided in RCW 85.08.360; and all credits allowed to property owners
constructing crossings as provided in RCW 85.08.340. When the board of county
commissioners shall have finally determined that the apportionment as filed or
as changed and modified by the board is a fair, just and equitable apportionment,
and that the proper credits have been entered thereon, the members of the board
approving the same shall sign the schedule and cause the clerk of the board to
attest their signature under his seal, and shall enter an order on the journal
approving the final apportionment and all proceedings leading thereto and in
connection therewith, and shall levy the amounts so apportioned against the
property benefited, and the determination by the board of county commissioners
in fixing and approving such apportionment and making such levy shall be final
and conclusive.

The board of county commissioners shall also at said hearing, levy,
in the manner hereinafter provided for the levy of maintenance assessments,
such assessment as they shall deem necessary to provide funds for the
maintenance of the system of improvement until the first ((annual))
assessment for maintenance shall fall due.

---
END ---