BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.135.045 and 1994 c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The emergency reserve fund is established in the state treasury. During each
fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit in the emergency reserve fund
all general fund‑-state revenues in excess of the state expenditure limit
for that fiscal year. Deposits shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter
based on projections of state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The
treasurer shall make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile
actual annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 1999 and
thereafter.

(2)
The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency reserve fund only
with approval of at least two-thirds of the members of each house of the
legislature, and then only if the appropriation does not cause total
expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit under this chapter.

(3)
The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five percent of ((biennial))
annual general fund‑-state revenues as projected by the official
state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent shall be
transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer to the education
construction fund hereby created in the treasury.

(4)(a)
Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund exclusively for
common school construction or higher education construction.

(b)
Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if approved by a
two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if approved by a vote of
the people at the next general election. An appropriation approved by the
people under this subsection shall result in an adjustment to the state
expenditure limit only for the fiscal period for which the appropriation is made
and shall not affect any subsequent fiscal period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---