BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. This
act may be known and cited as the education and transportation funding act of
2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

Any
department, agency, or institution of higher education may purchase services,
including services that have been customarily and historically provided by
employees in the classified service under this chapter, by contracting with
individuals, nonprofit organizations, businesses, employee business units, or
other entities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW to read as follows:

The
office of financial management shall establish a process for identifying the
savings achieved by state agencies and institutions of higher education as a
result of contracting for services under the authority granted in section 2 of
this act. It is the intent of the legislature that, of the initial seven
hundred million dollars in identified savings, fifty percent be directed to
providing increased state funding for common school basic education programs
and fifty percent be directed to providing increased state funding for
transportation projects and programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
41.06.380 (Purchasing services by contract not
prohibited--Limitations) and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 2; and

(2) RCW
41.06.382 (Purchasing services by contract not
prohibited--Limitations) and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 1.

---
END ---