BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that the people of the state rank traffic congestion as
one of their greatest concerns and rightfully expect the state to seek
realistic, implementable solutions. Recent studies for Puget Sound have
indicated that the annual cost of congestion exceeds two billion dollars a year
with a national study ranking the region as third worst in the nation.
Congestion symptoms are becoming evident in parts of eastern Washington and
southwest Washington as well. As a result, the legislature declares that
reducing traffic congestion while increasing mobility is the primary objective
for state and local surface transportation programs.

Nevertheless,
the state's priority programming for highway development has arguably been
retarded by conflicting goals with the result that financial resources have
been allocated in a manner that has allowed congestion to reach unacceptable
levels. Congestion has raised not only the accident/injury potential but also
dramatically impacted freight movement and service vehicle accessibility.
While planners had hoped that concentrated alternatives such as transit would
have had a far greater impact, these solutions at best will have less than five
percent of total daily trips by 2010 in Puget Sound even with the sound transit
proposal.

The
legislature hereby refocuses the state-wide responsibilities under this chapter
to a unified goal of reducing congestion by keying on the nature of delay. The
plan devotes resources to reducing the index to a level that occurred circa
1980 for those noncompliance areas. For the Puget Sound area, this would
equate to a congestion reduction of twenty-five percent from current levels and
would reduce delay per person by approximately seventy percent. If measured by
the current Texas transportation institute's delay per capita statistic, this
act would require projects in Puget Sound that would reduce the fifty-four
annual hours of delay per person in 1997 to approximately seventeen hours of
delay per person.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Guidelines" means the criteria developed jointly by the respective
state agencies and the legislature to accomplish the goals of this chapter.

(2)
"Urban monitoring area" means every area in this state designated as
an urban monitoring area by the transportation commission, transportation
improvement board, county road administration board, freight mobility strategic
investment board, or other state or local agency having jurisdiction over
surface transportation projects.

(3)
"Freeway/expressway" means any state or county road so designated in
accordance with criteria established by state and federal agencies.

(4)
"Principal arterial" means any county road or city street so
designated in accordance with criteria established by state and federal
agencies.

(5)
"Congestion index" means measures of performance as developed by the
Texas transportation institute, or successor institution, using delay-based
measures of performance (delay per driver) as specified below:

(a)
Delay should be limited to automobiles and trucks on the system of freeways,
expressways, and principal arterial; transit delay should be excluded since
such measurement represents only a difference between scheduled times and
actual times;

(b)
Total delay should be a composite for all modes of travel using a base, for
comparison, of automobile trip times under free flow conditions, as defined by
the Texas transportation institute or successor institution;

(c)
Delay should include both the daily, recurring delay resulting from congestion
and incident delay resulting from accidents, temporary road closures, and other
events;

(d)
Delay should be measured on a per capita or per driver basis; and

(e)
Delay should consider whole twenty-four hour daily periods.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Prior
to the 2001 legislative session, the transportation commission, transportation
improvement board, county road administration board, and freight mobility
strategic investment board shall apply formulae using the congestion index on a
state-wide basis in respective transportation networks in order to determine
traffic delay. In the case of urban monitoring areas, the formulae will place
them in a noncompliance mode when the delay per driver reaches fifteen hours
per person per year. For all other areas, any highway/expressway/principal
arterial network carrying more than forty thousand vehicles per day would also
become a noncompliance area when the delay per driver reaches fifteen hours per
person per year. For succeeding biennia, state and local agencies shall
monitor and update the plan as necessary.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Upon
a determination of noncompliance, state and local agencies shall develop plans
to reduce the delay per driver to compliance levels. Such plans must be the
first priority of existing federal, state, and local revenue sources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. For
the purposes of this chapter, urban monitoring areas of the state are
classified as follows:

(1)
Puget Sound including areas within King, Pierce, Snohomish, and Kitsap
counties;

(2)
Olympic region including Clallam, Jefferson, Grays Harbor, Mason, and Thurston
counties;

(3)
Northwest region including Whatcom, Skagit, Island, and San Juan counties;

(4)
Southwest region including Clark, Cowlitz, Wahkiakum, Pacific, Lewis, Skamania,
and Klickitat counties;

(5)
North central region including Okanogan, Chelan, Douglas, Grant, and Ferry
counties;

(6)
South central region including Kittitas, Yakima, Benton, Franklin, Walla Walla,
Columbia, Garfield, and Asotin counties; and

(7)
Eastern region including Stevens, Pend Oreille, Lincoln, Spokane, Adams, and
Whitman counties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Funds
available for expenditure by state and local government pursuant to this
chapter and apportioned to the seven regions of the state must be budgeted and
expended, pursuant to proper appropriation, for specific highway/road
improvement projects within the urban monitoring areas of each region in accordance
with the guidelines. Such expenditures in urban monitoring areas may be
additional to expenditures from all other construction funds regularly
programmed prior to the effective date of this act for highway improvements
throughout the state pursuant to chapter 47.05 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Pursuant to the guidelines, funds available for expenditure must be apportioned
to the seven regions for expenditure upon highways/expressways, principal
arterial, and local roads in the seven regions in a manner that accomplishes
the overall objectives of this chapter. Necessary funds must be expended to
achieve congestion reduction under the congestion index approach as defined in
this chapter regardless of the overall distribution of projected expenditures
state-wide.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 47.05 RCW to read as follows:

The
transportation improvement board, county road administration board, and freight
mobility strategic investment board shall prepare plans of implementation and
remediation by reviewing local surface transportation plans where noncompliance
under section 3 of this act has occurred.

Sec.
9. RCW
47.01.071 and 1981 c 59 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
transportation commission shall have the following functions, powers, and
duties:

(1)
To propose policies to be adopted by the legislature designed to assure the
development and maintenance of a comprehensive and balanced state-wide
transportation system which will meet the needs of the people of this state for
safe and efficient transportation services. Wherever appropriate the policies
shall provide for the use of integrated, intermodal transportation systems to implement
the social, economic, and environmental policies, goals, and objectives of the
people of the state, and especially to conserve nonrenewable natural resources
including land and energy. To this end the commission shall:

(a)
Develop transportation policies which are based on the policies, goals, and
objectives expressed and inherent in existing state laws;

(b)
Inventory the adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the local and
area-wide governmental bodies of the state and define the role of the state,
regional, and local governments in determining transportation policies, in
transportation planning, and in implementing the state transportation plan;

(c)
Propose a transportation policy for the state, and after notice and public
hearings, submit the proposal to the legislative transportation committee and
the senate and house transportation committees by January 1, 1978, for
consideration in the next legislative session;

(d)
Establish a procedure for review and revision of the state transportation
policy and for submission of proposed changes to the legislature;

(e)
To integrate the state-wide transportation plan with the needs of the elderly
and handicapped, and to coordinate federal and state programs directed at
assisting local governments to answer such needs;

(2)
To establish the policy of the department to be followed by the secretary on
each of the following items:

(a)
To provide for the effective coordination of state transportation planning with
national transportation policy, state and local land use policies, and local
and regional transportation plans and programs;

(b)
To provide for public involvement in transportation designed to elicit the
public's views both with respect to adequate transportation services and
appropriate means of minimizing adverse social, economic, environmental, and
energy impact of transportation programs;

(c)
To provide for the administration of grants in aid and other financial
assistance to counties and municipal corporations for transportation purposes;

(d)
To provide for the management, sale, and lease of property or property rights
owned by the department which are not required for transportation purposes;

(3)
To direct the secretary to prepare and submit to the commission a comprehensive
and balanced state-wide transportation plan which shall comply with chapter
47.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7 of this act) and be based on the
transportation policy adopted by the legislature and applicable state and
federal laws. After public notice and hearings, the commission shall adopt the
plan and submit it to the legislative transportation committee and to the house
and senate standing committees on transportation before January 1, 1980, for
consideration in the 1980 regular legislative session. The plan shall be
reviewed and revised prior to each regular session of the legislature during an
even-numbered year thereafter. A preliminary plan shall be submitted to such
committees by January 1, 1979.

The
plan shall take into account federal law and regulations relating to the
planning, construction, and operation of transportation facilities;

(4)
To propose to the governor and the legislature prior to the convening of each
regular session held in an odd-numbered year a recommended budget for the
operations of the commission as required by RCW 47.01.061;

(5)
To approve and propose to the governor and to the legislature prior to the
convening of each regular session during an odd-numbered year a recommended
budget for the operation of the department and for carrying out the program of
the department for the ensuing biennium. The proposed budget shall separately
state the appropriations to be made from the motor vehicle fund for highway
purposes in accordance with constitutional limitations and appropriations and expenditures
to be made from the general fund, or accounts thereof, and other available
sources for other operations and programs of the department;

(6)
To review and authorize all departmental requests for legislation;

(7)
To approve the issuance and sale of all bonds authorized by the legislature for
capital construction of state highways, toll facilities, Columbia Basin county
roads (for which reimbursement to the motor vehicle fund has been provided),
urban arterial projects, and aviation facilities;

(8)
To adopt such rules, regulations, and policy directives as may be necessary to
carry out reasonably and properly those functions expressly vested in the
commission by statute;

(9)
To delegate any of its powers to the secretary of transportation whenever it
deems it desirable for the efficient administration of the department and
consistent with the purposes of this title;

(10)
To exercise such other specific powers and duties as may be vested in the
transportation commission by this or any other provision of law.

Sec.
10. RCW
47.05.010 and 1993 c 490 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that solutions to state highway deficiencies have become
increasingly complex and diverse and that anticipated transportation revenues
will fall substantially short of the amount required to satisfy all
transportation needs. Difficult investment trade-offs will be required.

It
is the intent of the legislature that investment of state transportation funds
to address deficiencies on the state highway system be based on a policy of
priority programming having as its basis the rational selection of projects and
services according to factual need and an evaluation of life cycle costs and
benefits and which are systematically scheduled to carry out defined objectives
within available revenue.

The
priority programming system shall comply with chapter 47.-- RCW (sections 1
through 7 of this act), ensure preservation of the existing state highway
system, provide mobility for people and goods, support the state's economy, and
promote environmental protection and energy conservation.

The
priority programming system shall implement the state-owned highway component
of the state-wide multimodal transportation plan, consistent with local and
regional transportation plans, by targeting state transportation investment to
appropriate multimodal solutions which address identified state highway system
deficiencies.

The
priority programming system for improvements shall incorporate a broad range of
solutions that are identified in the state-wide multimodal transportation plan
as appropriate to address state highway system deficiencies including but not
limited to highway expansion, efficiency improvements, nonmotorized
transportation facilities, high occupancy vehicle facilities, transit
facilities and services, rail facilities and services, and transportation
demand management programs.

Sec.
11. RCW
47.05.030 and 1998 c 171 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
transportation commission shall adopt a comprehensive six-year investment
program specifying program objectives and performance measures for the
preservation and improvement programs defined in this section. In the
specification of investment program objectives and performance measures, the
transportation commission, in consultation with the Washington state department
of transportation, shall define and adopt standards for effective programming
and prioritization practices including a needs analysis process. The needs
analysis process shall ensure compliance with chapter 47.-- RCW (sections 1
through 7 of this act), the identification of problems and deficiencies,
the evaluation of alternative solutions and trade-offs, and estimations of the
costs and benefits of prospective projects. The investment program shall be
revised biennially, effective on July 1st of odd-numbered years. The
investment program shall be based upon the needs identified in the state-owned
highway component of the state-wide multimodal transportation plan as defined
in RCW 47.01.071(3).

(1)
The preservation program shall consist of those investments necessary to
preserve the existing state highway system and to restore existing safety
features, giving consideration to lowest life cycle costing. The comprehensive
six-year investment program for preservation shall identify projects for two
years and an investment plan for the remaining four years.

(2)
The improvement program shall consist of investments needed to address identified
deficiencies on the state highway system to improve mobility, safety, support
for the economy, and protection of the environment. The six-year investment
program for improvements shall identify projects for two years and major
deficiencies proposed to be addressed in the six-year period giving
consideration to relative benefits and life cycle costing. The transportation
commission shall give higher priority for correcting identified deficiencies on
those facilities classified as facilities of state-wide significance as defined
in RCW 47.06.140.

The transportation commission shall approve and present the
comprehensive six-year investment program to the legislature in support of the
biennial budget request under RCW 44.40.070 and 44.40.080.

Sec.
12. RCW
47.05.051 and 1998 c 175 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
comprehensive six-year investment program shall be based upon the needs
identified in the state-owned highway component of the state-wide multimodal
transportation plan as defined in RCW 47.01.071(3) and priority selection
systems that incorporate the following criteria:

(1)
Priority programming for the preservation program shall take into account the
following, not necessarily in order of importance:

(a)
Extending the service life of the existing highway system;

(b)
Ensuring the structural ability to carry loads imposed upon highways and
bridges; and

(c)
Minimizing life cycle costs. The transportation commission in carrying out the
provisions of this section may delegate to the department of transportation the
authority to select preservation projects to be included in the six-year
program.

(2)
Priority programming for the improvement program shall take into account the
following:

(a)
Support for the state's economy, including job creation and job preservation;

(b)
The cost-effective movement of people and goods;

(c)
Accident and accident risk reduction;

(d)
Protection of the state's natural environment;

(e)
Continuity and systematic development of the highway transportation network;

(f)
Consistency with local comprehensive plans developed under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(g)
Consistency with regional transportation plans developed under chapter 47.80
RCW;

(h)
Public views concerning proposed improvements;

(i)
The conservation of energy resources;

(j)
Feasibility of financing the full proposed improvement;

(k)
Commitments established in previous legislative sessions;

(l)
Relative costs and benefits of candidate programs;

(m)
Major projects addressing capacity deficiencies which prioritize allowing for
preliminary engineering shall be reprioritized during the succeeding biennium,
based upon updated project data. Reprioritized projects may be delayed or canceled
by the transportation commission if higher priority projects are awaiting
funding; and

(n)
Major project approvals which significantly increase a project's scope or cost
from original prioritization estimates shall include a review of the project's
estimated revised priority rank and the level of funding provided. Projects
may be delayed or canceled by the transportation commission if higher priority
projects are awaiting funding.

(3)
The commission may depart from the priority programming established under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section: (a) To comply with chapter 47.--
RCW (sections 1 through 7 of this act); (b) to the extent that otherwise
funds cannot be utilized feasibly within the program; (((b))) (c)
as may be required by a court judgment, legally binding agreement, or state and
federal laws and regulations; (((c))) (d) as may be required to
coordinate with federal, local, or other state agency construction projects; (((d)))
(e) to take advantage of some substantial financial benefit that may be
available; (((e))) (f) for continuity of route development; or (((f)))
(g) because of changed financial or physical conditions of an unforeseen
or emergent nature. The commission or secretary of transportation shall
maintain in its files information sufficient to show the extent to which the
commission has departed from the established priority.

(4)
The commission shall identify those projects that yield freight mobility
benefits or that alleviate the impacts of freight mobility upon affected communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

---
END ---