BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

Before
a nonemergency rule adopted by an agency becomes effective, the agency must
present it to the governor. If the governor approves the rule, the governor
shall sign it and file it in the office of the code reviser. If the governor
does not approve the rule, the governor shall return it to the originating
agency with objections, and the rule will not take effect. If the governor
does not sign a rule within twenty days after its presentment by the agency,
Sundays excepted, the rule will not take effect.

Sec.
2. RCW
34.05.360 and 1988 c 288 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

The
order of adoption by which each rule is adopted by an agency ((shall)) must
contain all of the following:

(1)
The date the agency adopted the rule;

(2)
A concise statement of the purpose of the rule;

(3)
A reference to all rules repealed, amended, or suspended by the rule;

(4)
A reference to the specific statutory or other authority authorizing adoption
of the rule;

(5)
The governor's signature approving the adopted rule, if the rule is a
nonemergency rule;

(6)
Any findings required by any provision of law as a precondition to adoption or
effectiveness of the rule; and

(((6)))
(7) The effective date of the rule if other than that specified in RCW
34.05.380(((2))) (4).

Sec.
3. RCW
34.05.380 and 1989 c 175 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Each agency shall ((file in the office of the code reviser)) present
to the governor a certified copy of ((all rules)) each
nonemergency rule it adopts((, except for rules contained in tariffs
filed with or published by the Washington utilities and transportation
commission)). If the governor approves and signs the rule, the governor
shall file the rule in the office of the code reviser.

(b)
Each agency shall file with the office of the code reviser a certified copy of
all emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350.

(3)
The code reviser shall place upon each rule a notation of the time and date of
filing and shall keep a permanent register of filed rules open to public
inspection. In filing a rule, ((each)) the governor or the
agency shall use the standard form prescribed for this purpose by the code
reviser.

(((2)))
(4) Emergency rules ((adopted under RCW 34.05.350)) become
effective upon filing unless a later date is specified in the order of
adoption. All other rules become effective upon the expiration of thirty days
after the date ((of filing)) the governor signs the rule, unless
a later date is required by statute or specified in the order of adoption.

(((3)))
(5) A rule may become effective immediately upon its filing with the
code reviser or on any subsequent date earlier than that established by
subsection (((2))) (4) of this section, if the agency establishes
that effective date in the adopting order and finds that:

(a)
Such action is required by the state or federal Constitution, a statute, or
court order;

(b)
The rule only delays the effective date of another rule that is not yet
effective; or

(c)
The earlier effective date is necessary because of imminent peril to the public
health, safety, or welfare.

The
finding and a brief statement of the reasons therefor required by this
subsection shall be made a part of the order adopting the rule.

(((4))) (6) With respect to a rule made effective ((pursuant
to)) under subsection (((3))) (5) of this section, each
agency shall make reasonable efforts to make the effective date known to
persons who may be affected by it.

---
END ---