BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that juvenile offenders who have co-occurring mental and
chemical abuse disorders have a greater risk of committing additional offenses
than those who do not have co-occurring disorders. The legislature finds that
juveniles who receive more extensive postrelease discharge planning and
community mental health services are less likely to commit additional
offenses. The legislature intends that juveniles participating in the study
created by this act receive research-based, integrated, and highly
individualized mental health and chemical abuse treatment that emphasizes
family and community involvement, low caseloads, home or residence-based
services, is time-determinate to the extent appropriate, focuses on the
juvenile's peer and social structures, promotes reduction of factors associated
with reoffending, and emphasizes prosocial contacts and behaviors.

(2)
The legislature finds that juvenile offenders with co-occurring disorders are
likely to lack necessary skills or emotional stability to appropriately deal
with the consequences of their disorders or to even understand how or where to
seek assistance. The legislature also finds that juvenile offenders with
co-occurring disorders are more likely than not to lack the education necessary
to obtain full or meaningful employment opportunities.

(3)
It is the intent of the legislature to create a pilot program to provide for
postrelease planning for, and treatment of, juvenile offenders with
co-occurring disorders in order to determine the most effective treatment for
juveniles in this situation. The pilot program created by this act shall
include a rigorous and objective evaluation component.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary shall select and contract with a private or nonprofit provider to
provide a program of specialized access and integrated services to juvenile
offenders who are identified as having co-occurring disorders and selected for
participation in the pilot program created by this act prior to release from
total confinement within the juvenile rehabilitation administration. The
program shall enroll no more juvenile offenders than the number that can be
accommodated within the appropriated funding level and shall seek to fill any
vacancies that occur.

(2)
Juvenile offenders identified by the secretary and selected by the program as
having co-occurring disorders and a high risk of reoffending are eligible for
consideration for enrollment in the program. Criteria for admission into the
program shall include a determination by the secretary that the offender:

(a)
Has a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW, or is a severely
emotionally disturbed child or a seriously disturbed person as defined in
chapter 71.24 RCW and needs continued mental health treatment;

(b)
Has a chemical abuse disorder, as determined by the secretary;

(c)
Is less likely to reoffend if he or she receives integrated, highly
individualized treatment;

(d)
Is unable or unlikely to obtain appropriate treatment from other sources; and

(e)
Will remain under the supervision of the secretary for at least four months
following release from total confinement.

(3)
The program enrollment shall, to the extent possible, reflect the demographics
of juvenile offenders having co-occurring disorders and who are in total
confinement under the jurisdiction of the secretary.

(4)
The provider shall provide integrated and highly individualized mental health
and chemical abuse treatment to persons enrolled in the program. The services
shall be aimed at:

(a)
Lowering the risk of reoffending;

(b)
Improving the education level and vocational opportunities;

(c)
Connecting the offenders with appropriate community services;

(d)
Achieving abstinence from unlawful use of controlled substances and alcohol;

(e)
Improving the mental health status and stability of the juvenile; and

(f)
Increasing prosocial behavior.

(5)
The services offered in the program shall:

(a)
Include intensive, community-based case management and treatment with a
client-to-staff ratio not to exceed seven offenders to each case manager;

(b)
Be available at any time;

(c)
Be based on a collaboration with the appropriate department employees during
the preparation of a release plan for the offender, prior to discharge, and in
ongoing supervision of the offender by the secretary;

(d)
Include all appropriate medications, including the full range of psychotropic
medications, as well as monitoring and counseling to support offender
understanding, acceptance, and compliance with medication regimens;

(e)
Include a systematic effort to engage offenders and their families, where
possible, to continuously involve themselves in current and long-term treatment
and appropriate habilitative activities;

(f)
Include classes appropriate to the clinical and living needs of the offender
and to his or her level of understanding;

(g)
Provide assistance in applying for all appropriate federal, state, and private
support for which the offender or his or her family is eligible;

(h)
Include access to daily activities such as school, drop-in centers,
prevocational and vocational training and jobs, and volunteer activities.

(6)
The program provided for in this section must begin providing services to
selected juveniles by September 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

The
Washington state institute for public policy shall evaluate the implementation
and outcomes of the pilot program created under this act. The institute shall
submit an initial report to the legislature and governor not later than
December 1, 2000, and annually thereafter. The report shall include the
following:

(1)
An assessment of the implementation of the pilot program across the state;

(2)
A statistical analysis of the reoffense and reinstitutionalization rate by
participants in the program;

(3)
A qualitative description of the services provided in the program;

(4)
Recommendations for any modification of the services and funding levels to
increase the effectiveness of the program;

(5)
Whether the participants improve their education attendance and skills;

(6)
Improvements in employability;

(7)
Verifiable reductions in and abstinence from unlawful use of controlled
substances and alcohol;

(8)
Compliance with medication regimens;

(9)
Increase in prosocial contacts and behaviors, including peer interactions and
free-time activities and stability of appropriate living situations; and

(10)
Reductions in the incidents of inpatient psychatric placements and the use of
acute care services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect April 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections
1 through 3 of this act expire July 1, 2004.

---
END ---