BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
There are a growing number of scientific reports on increases in atmospheric
concentrations of gases such as carbon dioxide and their impact on the earth's
climate system;

(2)
Much of the research to date on climate change takes a global perspective, while
much less information is available on potential climate change impacts to
smaller regions such as Washington state and the Pacific Northwest;

(3)
Regional climate changes may have a number of major impacts on the economy and
the public health and safety of Washington and the Pacific Northwest; and

(4)
The citizens and businesses of Washington will be better able to plan for and
adjust to any such changes if the legislature undertakes an effort to determine
whether climate changes have occurred, to identify what the regional climate
changes are likely to be, and propose how citizens and businesses can plan for,
mitigate, or take advantage of these impending climate changes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
There is created a joint select committee on climate change. The committee
shall be comprised of twelve members of the house of representatives, six from
each caucus, selected by the co-speakers of the house of representatives, and
twelve members of the senate, six from each caucus, selected by the president
of the senate. In making appointments to this joint select committee, the
co-speakers shall select two members, one from each caucus, from the
technology, telecommunications and energy, agriculture and ecology, natural
resources, commerce and labor, and financial institutions and insurance
committees, and from the membership at large. The president shall select two
members, one from each caucus, from the energy, technology and
telecommunications, agriculture and rural economic development, natural
resources, parks and recreation, commerce, trade, housing, and financial
institutions, and the environmental quality and water resources committees, and
from the membership at large. Committee members shall select from among
themselves a committee chair and vice-chair.

(2)
The joint select committee shall survey the current state of the science
regarding global climate change and associated regional climate change. The
committee shall identify steps that the public and private sectors may make to
plan for, mitigate, or take advantage of the effects of climate change. The
committee shall also identify key areas of uncertainty and opportunities for
future research. The committee's efforts shall include, but not be limited to,
consideration of the following:

(a)
Possible alterations to the hydrologic cycle, including changes in the quantity
and the timing of snowfall and snowpack, rainfall, runoff, peak flows, low
flows, and flooding incidences;

(b)
Possible changes to energy supply should changes in the timing and quantity of
runoff lead to changes in hydropower production capabilities and to energy
demand in response to potentially warmer winters and hotter summers;

(c)
Possible changes to the state's capability to produce agricultural commodities
due to changes in temperature and precipitation patterns, growing seasons,
availability and timing of flows for irrigation, and crop response to increased
levels of carbon dioxide;

(d)
Possible alterations to the state's capability to produce forest products, due
to changes in temperature, precipitation, and increased carbon dioxide
availability, as well as to changes in species mix, and changes related to
seedling establishment and regeneration;

(e)
Possible impacts to the state's freshwater, marine, and salmonid fisheries,
including effects of changes in lake and stream temperatures, changes in the
quantity and timing of flows for fish, and changes in river and estuarine
habitat due to sea level rise and changes in flooding incidences;

(f)
Possible impacts to coastal areas and communities due to changes in sea level,
changes in frequency and intensity of storms and storm surges, changes in
flooding potential, and changes to coastal erosion rates and rates of saltwater
intrusion into freshwater aquifers;

(g)
Possible risks to human health and safety, including health effects associated
with air and water quality changes, changes in disease patterns, and changes to
drinking water availability and coastal communities associated with sea level
rise; and

(h)
An inventory of existing research efforts and funding sources, and an
identification of important research subjects not currently being addressed.

(3)
The committee shall also identify policies in place in the state that either
enhance or discourage economic development opportunities for Washington
companies engaged in energy efficiency and renewable energy resource industries
and shall make recommendations on any policy changes needed to encourage these
industries.

(4)
In accomplishing subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the committee shall
solicit input from higher education faculty members and other knowledgeable
parties in the public, private, and public-interest sectors.

(5)
Staffing for the committee shall be provided by senate committee services and
house of representatives office of program research.

(6)
The committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislature
by December 1, 2000.

(7) The committee expires June 1, 2001.

---
END ---