BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds and declares that:

(1)
Social anxiety disorder is the most common anxiety disorder affecting
approximately 7.9 percent of Americans annually with a lifetime prevalence of
13.3 percent.

(2)
Patients with social anxiety disorder are at a fourfold increased risk of
developing depression, and are three times more likely to develop panic, and
two times more likely to suffer from alcoholism, as persons without the
disorder.

(3)
Patients with social anxiety disorder are twice as likely to attempt suicide as
those persons without the disorder.

(4)
Social anxiety disorder has been scientifically linked to reduced quality of
life, lower education attainment, and impairment of professional advancement
and wage earning ability.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to Title 48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Every health care service plan contract that provides mental health benefit
coverage and that is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed on or after January
1, 2001, must include coverage for medically necessary treatment of social
anxiety disorder.

(2)
A provision in any plan contract issued, amended, delivered, or renewed on or
after January 1, 2001, that is in conflict with this section is of no force or
effect.

(3) As used in this section, "social anxiety disorder"
means a condition that meets the criteria for generalized social phobia set
forth in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fourth
Edition, of the American psychiatric association.

---
END ---