BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.08.020 and 1998 c 321 s 36 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this
state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price.

(2)
There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail
car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal
to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected
under this subsection shall be deposited ((and distributed in the same
manner as motor vehicle excise tax revenue collected under RCW 82.44.020(1)))
in the multimodal transportation account created in section 2 of this act.

(3)
The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive retail sales of
the same property.

(4)
The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12
RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 47.66 RCW to read as follows:

The
multimodal transportation account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for transportation purposes.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 8, 1999 c 309 s 928, 1999 c 268 s 4, and 1999 c 94 s
2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash
management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall
occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account,
the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use
tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system
plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system plan 2 account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust
fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement
system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system plan 2 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal ((account)) fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' ((relief)) and ((pension)) reserve officers'
administrative ((account)) fund, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington
state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account,
the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects
account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle
safety education account, the pilotage account, the public transportation
systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound
ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial
trust account, the safety and education account, the special category C account,
the state patrol highway account, the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the transportation
improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban arterial trust
account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.84.092 and 2000 c 79 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account,
the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use
tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system
plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system plan 2 account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust
fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement
system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system plan 2 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account,
the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University
building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University
capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent
common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university
permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
All earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for
the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account,
the county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.84.092 and 2000 c 79 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account,
the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use
tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system
plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system plan 2 account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust
fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement
system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan
3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement
account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system
plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health
insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement
account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.84.092 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c . . . s 5 (section 5 of this act) and 2000 c 247
s 702 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system
plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management
cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan
2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the
University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington
school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol
retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control
revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects
account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational
vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and education
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement
account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
7. RCW
43.89.010 and 1993 sp.s. c 23 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

The
chief of the Washington state patrol is hereby authorized to establish a ((teletypewriter))
communications network which will inter-connect the law enforcement agencies of
the state and its political subdivisions into a unified written communications
system. The chief of the Washington state patrol is authorized to lease or
purchase such facilities and equipment as may be necessary to establish and
maintain ((such teletypewriter)) the communications network.

(1)
The communications network shall be used exclusively for the official business
of the state, and the official business of any city, county, city and county,
or other public agency.

(2)
This section does not prohibit the occasional use of the state's communications
network by any other state or public agency thereof when the messages
transmitted relate to the enforcement of the criminal laws of the state.

(3)
The chief of the Washington state patrol shall fix the monthly operational
charge to be paid by any department or agency of state government, or any city,
county, city and county, or other public agency participating in the communications
network: PROVIDED, That in computing charges to be made against a city,
county, or city and county the state shall bear at least fifty percent of the
costs of such service as its share in providing a modern unified communications
network to the law enforcement agencies of the state. Of the fees collected
pursuant to this section, one-half shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund
and one-half shall be deposited in the ((transportation fund)) state
patrol highway account.

(4)
The chief of the Washington state patrol is authorized to arrange for the
connection of the communications network with the law enforcement
communications system of any adjacent state, or the Province of British
Columbia, Canada.

Sec.
8. RCW
46.68.035 and 1993 c 102 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

All
proceeds from combined vehicle licensing fees received by the director for
vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 and 46.16.085 shall be forwarded to the
state treasurer to be distributed into accounts according to the following
method:

(1)
The sum of two dollars for each vehicle shall be deposited into the ((highway
safety fund)) multimodal transportation account, except that for
each vehicle registered by a county auditor or agent to a county auditor
pursuant to RCW 46.01.140, the sum of two dollars shall be credited to the
current county expense fund.

(2)
The remainder shall be distributed as follows:

(a)
((23.677 percent shall be deposited into the state patrol highway account of
the motor vehicle fund;

(b)))
1.521 percent shall be deposited into the Puget Sound ferry operations account
of the motor vehicle fund; and

(((c)))
(b) The remaining proceeds shall be deposited into the motor vehicle
fund.

Sec.
9. RCW
82.36.380 and 1995 c 287 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for a person or corporation to evade a tax or fee imposed under
this chapter.

(2)
Evasion of taxes or fees under this chapter is a class C felony under chapter
9A.20 RCW. In addition to other penalties and remedies provided by law, the
court shall order a person or corporation found guilty of violating subsection
(1) of this section to:

(a)
Pay the tax or fee evaded plus interest, commencing at the date the tax or fee
was first due, at the rate of twelve percent per year, compounded monthly; and

(b)
Pay a penalty of one hundred percent of the tax evaded, to the multimodal
transportation ((fund)) account of the state.

Sec.
10. RCW
82.38.270 and 1995 c 287 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for a person or corporation to evade a tax or fee imposed under
this chapter.

(2)
Evasion of taxes or fees under this chapter is a class C felony under chapter
9A.20 RCW. In addition to other penalties and remedies provided by law, the
court shall order a person or corporation found guilty of violating subsection
(1) of this section to:

(a)
Pay the tax or fee evaded plus interest, commencing at the date the tax or fee
was first due, at the rate of twelve percent per year, compounded monthly; and

(b)
Pay a penalty of one hundred percent of the tax evaded, to the multimodal
transportation ((fund)) account of the state.

Sec.
11. RCW
43.88.020 and 1996 c 288 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Budget" means a proposed plan of expenditures for a given period or
purpose and the proposed means for financing these expenditures.

(2)
"Budget document" means a formal statement, either written or
provided on any electronic media or both, offered by the governor to the
legislature, as provided in RCW 43.88.030.

(3)
"Director of financial management" means the official appointed by
the governor to serve at the governor's pleasure and to whom the governor may
delegate necessary authority to carry out the governor's duties as provided in
this chapter. The director of financial management shall be head of the office
of financial management which shall be in the office of the governor.

(4)
"Agency" means and includes every state office, officer, each
institution, whether educational, correctional, or other, and every department,
division, board, and commission, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(5)
"Public funds", for purposes of this chapter, means all moneys,
including cash, checks, bills, notes, drafts, stocks, and bonds, whether held
in trust, for operating purposes, or for capital purposes, and collected or
disbursed under law, whether or not such funds are otherwise subject to
legislative appropriation, including funds maintained outside the state
treasury.

(6)
"Regulations" means the policies, standards, and requirements, stated
in writing, designed to carry out the purposes of this chapter, as issued by
the governor or the governor's designated agent, and which shall have the force
and effect of law.

(7)
"Ensuing biennium" means the fiscal biennium beginning on July 1st of
the same year in which a regular session of the legislature is held during an
odd-numbered year pursuant to Article II, section 12 of the Constitution and
which biennium next succeeds the current biennium.

(8)
"Dedicated fund" means a fund in the state treasury, or a separate
account or fund in the general fund in the state treasury, that by law is
dedicated, appropriated, or set aside for a limited object or purpose; but
"dedicated fund" does not include a revolving fund or a trust fund.

(9)
"Revolving fund" means a fund in the state treasury, established by
law, from which is paid the cost of goods or services furnished to or by a
state agency, and which is replenished through charges made for such goods or
services or through transfers from other accounts or funds.

(10)
"Trust fund" means a fund in the state treasury in which designated
persons or classes of persons have a vested beneficial interest or equitable
ownership, or which was created or established by a gift, grant, contribution,
devise, or bequest that limits the use of the fund to designated objects or
purposes.

(11)
"Administrative expenses" means expenditures for: (a) Salaries,
wages, and related costs of personnel and (b) operations and maintenance
including but not limited to costs of supplies, materials, services, and
equipment.

(12)
"Fiscal year" means the year beginning July 1st and ending the
following June 30th.

(13)
"Lapse" means the termination of authority to expend an
appropriation.

(14)
"Legislative fiscal committees" means the joint legislative audit and
review committee, the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, the ways and means and transportation committees of the
senate and house of representatives, and, where appropriate, the legislative
transportation committee.

(15)
"Fiscal period" means the period for which an appropriation is made
as specified within the act making the appropriation.

(16)
"Primary budget driver" means the primary determinant of a budget
level, other than a price variable, which causes or is associated with the
major expenditure of an agency or budget unit within an agency, such as a
caseload, enrollment, workload, or population statistic.

(17)
"State tax revenue limit" means the limitation created by chapter
43.135 RCW.

(18)
"General state revenues" means the revenues defined by Article VIII,
section 1(c) of the state Constitution.

(19)
"Annual growth rate in real personal income" means the estimated
percentage growth in personal income for the state during the current fiscal
year, expressed in constant value dollars, as published by the office of
financial management or its successor agency.

(20)
"Estimated revenues" means estimates of revenue in the most recent
official economic and revenue forecast prepared under RCW 82.33.020, and
prepared by the office of financial management for those funds, accounts, and
sources for which the office of the economic and revenue forecast council does
not prepare an official forecast including estimates of revenues to support
financial plans under RCW 44.40.070, that are prepared by the office of
financial management in consultation with the ((interagency task force))
transportation revenue forecast council.

(21)
"Estimated receipts" means the estimated receipt of cash in the most
recent official economic and revenue forecast prepared under RCW 82.33.020, and
prepared by the office of financial management for those funds, accounts, and
sources for which the office of the economic and revenue forecast council does
not prepare an official forecast.

(22)
"State budgeting, accounting, and reporting system" means a system
that gathers, maintains, and communicates fiscal information. The system links
fiscal information beginning with development of agency budget requests through
adoption of legislative appropriations to tracking actual receipts and
expenditures against approved plans.

(23)
"Allotment of appropriation" means the agency's statement of proposed
expenditures, the director of financial management's review of that statement,
and the placement of the approved statement into the state budgeting,
accounting, and reporting system.

(24)
"Statement of proposed expenditures" means a plan prepared by each
agency that breaks each appropriation out into monthly detail representing the
best estimate of how the appropriation will be expended.

(25)
"Undesignated fund balance (or deficit)" means unreserved and undesignated
current assets or other resources available for expenditure over and above any
current liabilities which are expected to be incurred by the close of the
fiscal period.

(26)
"Internal audit" means an independent appraisal activity within an
agency for the review of operations as a service to management, including a
systematic examination of accounting and fiscal controls to assure that human
and material resources are guarded against waste, loss, or misuse; and that
reliable data are gathered, maintained, and fairly disclosed in a written
report of the audit findings.

(27)
"Performance verification" means an analysis that (a) verifies the
accuracy of data used by state agencies in quantifying intended results and
measuring performance toward those results, and (b) verifies whether or not the
reported results were achieved.

(28)
"Performance audit" has the same meaning as it is defined in RCW
44.28.005.

Sec.
12. RCW
43.88.030 and 1998 c 346 s 910 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director of financial management shall provide all agencies with a complete
set of instructions for submitting biennial budget requests to the director at
least three months before agency budget documents are due into the office of
financial management. The director shall provide agencies and committees
that are required under RCW 44.40.070 to develop comprehensive six-year program
and financial plans with a complete set of instructions for submitting these
program and financial plans at the same time that instructions for submitting
other budget requests are provided. The budget document or documents shall
consist of the governor's budget message which shall be explanatory of the
budget and shall contain an outline of the proposed financial policies of the
state for the ensuing fiscal period, as well as an outline of the proposed
six-year financial policies where applicable, and shall describe in connection
therewith the important features of the budget. The message shall set forth
the reasons for salient changes from the previous fiscal period in expenditure
and revenue items and shall explain any major changes in financial policy.
Attached to the budget message shall be such supporting schedules, exhibits and
other explanatory material in respect to both current operations and capital
improvements as the governor shall deem to be useful to the legislature. The
budget document or documents shall set forth a proposal for expenditures in the
ensuing fiscal period, or six-year period where applicable, based upon the
estimated revenues and caseloads as approved by the economic and revenue
forecast council and caseload forecast council or upon the estimated revenues
and caseloads of the office of financial management for those funds, accounts,
sources, and programs for which the forecast councils do not prepare an
official forecast, including those revenues anticipated to support the six-year
programs and financial plans under RCW 44.40.070. In estimating revenues to
support financial plans under RCW 44.40.070, the office of financial management
shall rely on information and advice from the ((interagency)) transportation
revenue ((task force)) forecast council. Revenues shall be
estimated for such fiscal period from the source and at the rates existing by
law at the time of submission of the budget document, including the
supplemental budgets submitted in the even-numbered years of a biennium.
However, the estimated revenues and caseloads for use in the governor's budget
document may be adjusted to reflect budgetary revenue transfers and revenue and
caseload estimates dependent upon budgetary assumptions of enrollments,
workloads, and caseloads. All adjustments to the approved estimated revenues
and caseloads must be set forth in the budget document. The governor may
additionally submit, as an appendix to each supplemental, biennial, or six-year
agency budget or to the budget document or documents, a proposal for
expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period from revenue sources derived from
proposed changes in existing statutes.

Supplemental
and biennial documents shall reflect a six-year expenditure plan consistent
with estimated revenues from existing sources and at existing rates for those
agencies required to submit six-year program and financial plans under RCW
44.40.070. Any additional revenue resulting from proposed changes to existing
statutes shall be separately identified within the document as well as related
expenditures for the six-year period.

The
budget document or documents shall also contain:

(a)
Revenues classified by fund and source for the immediately past fiscal period,
those received or anticipated for the current fiscal period, those anticipated
for the ensuing biennium, and those anticipated for the ensuing six-year period
to support the six-year programs and financial plans required under RCW
44.40.070;

(b)
The undesignated fund balance or deficit, by fund;

(c)
Such additional information dealing with expenditures, revenues, workload,
performance, and personnel as the legislature may direct by law or concurrent
resolution;

(d)
Such additional information dealing with revenues and expenditures as the
governor shall deem pertinent and useful to the legislature;

(e)
Tabulations showing expenditures classified by fund, function, activity, and
agency;

(f)
A delineation of each agency's activities, including those activities funded
from nonbudgeted, nonappropriated sources, including funds maintained outside
the state treasury;

(g)
Identification of all proposed direct expenditures to implement the Puget Sound
water quality plan under chapter 90.71 RCW, shown by agency and in total; and

(h)
Tabulations showing each postretirement adjustment by retirement system
established after fiscal year 1991, to include, but not be limited to,
estimated total payments made to the end of the previous biennial period,
estimated payments for the present biennium, and estimated payments for the
ensuing biennium.

(2)
The budget document or documents shall include detailed estimates of all
anticipated revenues applicable to proposed operating or capital expenditures
and shall also include all proposed operating or capital expenditures. The
total of beginning undesignated fund balance and estimated revenues less
working capital and other reserves shall equal or exceed the total of proposed
applicable expenditures. The budget document or documents shall further
include:

(a)
Interest, amortization and redemption charges on the state debt;

(b)
Payments of all reliefs, judgments, and claims;

(c)
Other statutory expenditures;

(d)
Expenditures incident to the operation for each agency;

(e)
Revenues derived from agency operations;

(f)
Expenditures and revenues shall be given in comparative form showing those
incurred or received for the immediately past fiscal period and those
anticipated for the current biennium and next ensuing biennium, as well as
those required to support the six-year programs and financial plans required
under RCW 44.40.070;

(g)
A showing and explanation of amounts of general fund and other funds
obligations for debt service and any transfers of moneys that otherwise would
have been available for appropriation;

(h)
Common school expenditures on a fiscal-year basis;

(i)
A showing, by agency, of the value and purpose of financing contracts for the
lease/purchase or acquisition of personal or real property for the current and
ensuing fiscal periods; and

(j)
A showing and explanation of anticipated amounts of general fund and other
funds required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of the
retirement system specified under chapter 41.45 RCW, and the contributions to
meet such amortization, stated in total dollars and as a level percentage of
total compensation.

(3)
A separate capital budget document or schedule shall be submitted that will
contain the following:

(a)
A statement setting forth a long-range facilities plan for the state that
identifies and includes the highest priority needs within affordable spending
levels;

(b)
A capital program consisting of proposed capital projects for the next biennium
and the two biennia succeeding the next biennium consistent with the long-range
facilities plan. Insomuch as is practical, and recognizing emergent needs, the
capital program shall reflect the priorities, projects, and spending levels
proposed in previously submitted capital budget documents in order to provide a
reliable long-range planning tool for the legislature and state agencies;

(c)
A capital plan consisting of proposed capital spending for at least four
biennia succeeding the next biennium;

(d)
A strategic plan for reducing backlogs of maintenance and repair projects. The
plan shall include a prioritized list of specific facility deficiencies and
capital projects to address the deficiencies for each agency, cost estimates
for each project, a schedule for completing projects over a reasonable period
of time, and identification of normal maintenance activities to reduce future
backlogs;

(e)
A statement of the reason or purpose for a project;

(f)
Verification that a project is consistent with the provisions set forth in
chapter 36.70A RCW;

(g)
A statement about the proposed site, size, and estimated life of the project,
if applicable;

(h)
Estimated total project cost;

(i)
For major projects valued over five million dollars, estimated costs for the
following project components: Acquisition, consultant services, construction,
equipment, project management, and other costs included as part of the
project. Project component costs shall be displayed in a standard format
defined by the office of financial management to allow comparisons between
projects;

(j)
Estimated total project cost for each phase of the project as defined by the
office of financial management;

(k)
Estimated ensuing biennium costs;

(l)
Estimated costs beyond the ensuing biennium;

(m)
Estimated construction start and completion dates;

(n)
Source and type of funds proposed;

(o)
Estimated ongoing operating budget costs or savings resulting from the project,
including staffing and maintenance costs;

(p)
For any capital appropriation requested for a state agency for the acquisition
of land or the capital improvement of land in which the primary purpose of the
acquisition or improvement is recreation or wildlife habitat conservation, the
capital budget document, or an omnibus list of recreation and habitat
acquisitions provided with the governor's budget document, shall identify the
projected costs of operation and maintenance for at least the two biennia
succeeding the next biennium. Omnibus lists of habitat and recreation land
acquisitions shall include individual project cost estimates for operation and
maintenance as well as a total for all state projects included in the list.
The document shall identify the source of funds from which the operation and
maintenance costs are proposed to be funded;

(q)
Such other information bearing upon capital projects as the governor deems to
be useful;

(r)
Standard terms, including a standard and uniform definition of normal
maintenance, for all capital projects;

(s)
Such other information as the legislature may direct by law or concurrent
resolution.

For
purposes of this subsection (3), the term "capital project" shall be
defined subsequent to the analysis, findings, and recommendations of a joint
committee comprised of representatives from the house capital appropriations
committee, senate ways and means committee, legislative transportation committee,
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, and office of
financial management.

(4)
No change affecting the comparability of agency or program information relating
to expenditures, revenues, workload, performance and personnel shall be made in
the format of any budget document or report presented to the legislature under
this section or RCW 43.88.160(1) relative to the format of the budget document
or report which was presented to the previous regular session of the
legislature during an odd-numbered year without prior legislative concurrence.
Prior legislative concurrence shall consist of (a) a favorable majority vote on
the proposal by the standing committees on ways and means of both houses if the
legislature is in session or (b) a favorable majority vote on the proposal by
members of the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee if
the legislature is not in session.

Sec.
13. RCW
43.88.120 and 1991 c 358 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
agency engaged in the collection of revenues shall prepare estimated revenues
and estimated receipts for the current and ensuing biennium and shall submit
the estimates to the director of financial management and the director of
revenue at times and in the form specified by the directors, along with any
other information which the directors may request. For those agencies required
to develop six-year programs and financial plans under RCW 44.40.070, six-year
revenue estimates shall be submitted to the director of financial management
and the ((legislative)) transportation committees of the senate and
the house of representatives unless the responsibility for reporting these
revenue estimates is assumed elsewhere.

A
copy of such revenue estimates shall be simultaneously submitted to the
economic and revenue forecast work group when required by the office of the
economic and revenue forecast council.

Sec.
14. RCW
43.88.122 and 1991 c 358 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Where there are variances of revenue forecasts between the office
of financial management and the ((interagency)) transportation
revenue ((task force)) forecast council, for those transportation
agencies that are required to develop plans under RCW 44.40.070, the office of
financial management shall submit (1) a reconciliation of the differences
between the revenue forecasts and (2) the assumptions used by the office of
financial management to the ((legislative)) transportation committees
of the senate and the house of representatives.

Sec.
15. RCW
44.40.070 and 1998 c 245 s 87 are each amended to read as follows:

Prior
to October 1st of each even-numbered year the transportation revenue
forecast council, consisting of all state agencies whose major programs
consist of transportation activities, including the department of
transportation, the transportation improvement board, the Washington state
patrol, the department of licensing, the traffic safety commission, the county
road administration board, and the board of pilotage commissioners, shall adopt
or revise, after consultation with the ((legislative)) transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives, a comprehensive
six-year program and financial plan for all transportation activities under
each agency's jurisdiction.

The
comprehensive six-year program and financial plan shall state the general
objectives and needs of each agency's major transportation programs, including
workload and performance estimates.

Sec.
16. RCW
82.14.045 and 1998 c 321 s 7 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
The legislative body of any city pursuant to RCW 35.92.060, of any county which
has created an unincorporated transportation benefit area pursuant to RCW
36.57.100 and 36.57.110, of any public transportation benefit area pursuant to
RCW 36.57A.080 and 36.57A.090, of any county transportation authority
established pursuant to chapter 36.57 RCW, and of any metropolitan municipal
corporation within a county with a population of one million or more pursuant
to chapter 35.58 RCW, may, by resolution or ordinance for the sole purpose of
providing funds for the operation, maintenance, or capital needs of public
transportation systems and in lieu of the excise taxes authorized by RCW
35.95.040, submit an authorizing proposition to the voters or include such authorization
in a proposition to perform the function of public transportation and if
approved by a majority of persons voting thereon, fix and impose a sales and
use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter: PROVIDED, That no such
legislative body shall impose such a sales and use tax without submitting such
an authorizing proposition to the voters and obtaining the approval of a
majority of persons voting thereon: PROVIDED FURTHER, That where such a
proposition is submitted by a county on behalf of an unincorporated
transportation benefit area, it shall be voted upon by the voters residing
within the boundaries of such unincorporated transportation benefit area and,
if approved, the sales and use tax shall be imposed only within such area.
Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, any county in
which a county public transportation plan has been adopted pursuant to RCW
36.57.070 and the voters of such county have authorized the imposition of a
sales and use tax pursuant to the provisions of section 10, chapter 167, Laws
of 1974 ex. sess., prior to July 1, 1975, shall be authorized to fix and impose
a sales and use tax as provided in this section at not to exceed the rate so
authorized without additional approval of the voters of such county as
otherwise required by this section.

The
tax authorized pursuant to this section shall be in addition to the tax
authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within such city, public transportation benefit
area, county, or metropolitan municipal corporation as the case may be. The
rate of such tax shall be one-tenth, two-tenths, three-tenths, four-tenths, five-tenths,
((or)) six-tenths, seven-tenths, eight-tenths, or nine-tenths of
one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the
article used (in the case of a use tax). The rate of such tax shall not exceed
the rate authorized by the voters unless such increase shall be similarly
approved.

(2)(a)
In the event a metropolitan municipal corporation shall impose a sales and use
tax pursuant to this chapter no city, county which has created an
unincorporated transportation benefit area, public transportation benefit area
authority, or county transportation authority wholly within such metropolitan
municipal corporation shall be empowered to levy and/or collect taxes pursuant
to RCW 35.58.273, 35.95.040, and/or 82.14.045, but nothing herein shall prevent
such city or county from imposing sales and use taxes pursuant to any other
authorization.

(b)
In the event a county transportation authority shall impose a sales and use tax
pursuant to this section, no city, county which has created an unincorporated
transportation benefit area, public transportation benefit area, or
metropolitan municipal corporation, located within the territory of the
authority, shall be empowered to levy or collect taxes pursuant to RCW
35.58.273, 35.95.040, or 82.14.045.

(c)
In the event a public transportation benefit area shall impose a sales and use
tax pursuant to this section, no city, county which has created an
unincorporated transportation benefit area, or metropolitan municipal
corporation, located wholly or partly within the territory of the public
transportation benefit area, shall be empowered to levy or collect taxes
pursuant to RCW 35.58.273, 35.95.040, or 82.14.045.

(3)
Any local sales and use tax revenue collected pursuant to this section by any
city or by any county for transportation purposes pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and
36.57.110 shall not be counted as locally generated tax revenues for the
purposes of apportionment and distribution, in the manner prescribed by chapter
82.44 RCW, of the proceeds of the motor vehicle excise tax authorized pursuant
to RCW 35.58.273, except that the local sales and use tax revenue collected
under this section by a city with a population greater than sixty thousand that
as of January 1, 1998, owns and operates a municipal public transportation
system shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for the purposes of
apportionment and distribution, in the manner prescribed by chapter 82.44 RCW,
of the proceeds of the motor vehicle excise tax authorized under RCW 35.58.273
as follows:

(a)
For fiscal year 2000, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as
locally generated tax revenues for up to 25 percent of the tax collected under
RCW 35.58.273;

(b)
For fiscal year 2001, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as
locally generated tax revenues for up to 50 percent of the tax collected under
RCW 35.58.273;

(c)
For fiscal year 2002, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as
locally generated tax revenues for up to 75 percent of the tax collected under
RCW 35.58.273; and

(d)
For fiscal year 2003 and thereafter, revenues collected under this section
shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for up to 100 percent of the
tax collected under RCW 35.58.273.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. The
legislature finds that additional funds or other benefits can be made available
to Washington regional transit authorities by facilitating their entry into
sale and leaseback, leaseout and leaseback, and similar transactions that
provide to private parties, in consideration for the funds or other benefits
obtained by the regional transit authorities, tax benefits that are not
otherwise available to regional transit authorities. The legislature further
finds that such transactions have been encouraged by agencies of the federal
government as ways to provide additional funds for public facilities. To
facilitate such transactions for regional transit authorities, the legislature
has determined that while regional transit authorities may currently have the
necessary statutory authority and may currently enjoy exemptions from
Washington state taxes for such transactions, an explicit statement of
statutory authority and exemption from Washington state taxes is necessary and
helpful for the parties to such transactions. In recognition of the complexity
of such transactions, the legislature desires that the authority and exemptions
provided by sections 18 through 30 of this act be subject to certain
limitations and be granted for a period as specified in section 30 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. A
new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In order to enable regional transit authorities to acquire or finance equipment
or facilities, or reduce the cost of equipment or facilities, regional transit
authorities may enter into sale and leaseback, leaseout and leaseback, and
other similar transactions with respect to equipment, facilities, and other
real and personal property. In connection with any such transaction, a
regional transit authority may execute, as it considers appropriate, contracts,
agreements, notes, security agreements, conveyances, bills of sale, deeds,
leases as lessee or lessor, and currency hedges, defeasance arrangements,
interest rate, currency or other swap transactions, one or more payment
undertaking agreements, and agreements relating to foreign and domestic
currency. These agreements or instruments must have terms, maturities,
durations, provisions as to governing laws, grants of security interests, and
other provisions that are approved by the board of the regional transit
authority.

(2)
"Payment undertaking agreement" means one or more agreements,
undertakings or arrangements under which all or a portion of the funds
generated by a sale and leaseback, leaseout and leaseback, or other similar
transaction are directed or paid over to a financial institution, insurance
company, or other entity that agrees to meet or fulfill, in consideration for
the funds, some or all of the obligations of the regional transit authority, or
any public corporation or other entity created under section 20 of this act, to
make future rent, debt service, or purchase price installment payments in
connection with the transaction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. A
new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

Transactions
undertaken under section 18 of this act are subject to the following
conditions:

(1)
The financial institution, insurance company, or other entity that enters into
a payment undertaking agreement with the regional transit authority or public
development corporation or entity created under section 20 of this act as a
counterparty must have a rating from at least two nationally recognized credit
rating agencies, as of the date of execution of the payment undertaking
agreement, that is within the two highest long-term investment grade rating
categories, without regard to subcategories, or the obligations of the
counterparty must be guaranteed by a financial institution, insurance company,
or other entity with that credit rating. The payment undertaking agreement
must require that the obligations of the counterparty or the guarantor, as the
case may be, must be collateralized by collateral of a type and in an amount
specified by the governing body of the regional transit authority if the credit
ratings of the counterparty or its guarantor fall below the level required by
this subsection.

(2)
The amount to be paid by the counterparties under payment undertaking
agreements for a transaction under the terms of the agreements, when combined
with the amount of securities, deposits, and investments set aside by the
regional transit authority for payment in respect of the transactions, together
with interest or other earnings on the securities, deposits, or investments,
must be sufficient to pay when due all amounts required to be paid by the
regional transit authority, or public corporation or entity created under
section 20 of this act, as rent, debt service, or installments of purchase
price, as the case may be, over the full term of the transaction plus any
optional purchase price due under the transaction. A certification by an
independent financial expert, banker, or certified public accountant, who is
not an employee of the regional transit authority or public corporation or
entity created under section 20 of this act, certifying compliance with this
requirement is conclusive evidence that the arrangements, by their terms,
comply with the requirement under this subsection on the sufficiency of the
amount.

(3)
The payment undertaking agreements, and all other basic and material agreements
entered into in connection with the transactions, must specify that the parties
to the agreements consent to the jurisdiction of state courts of Washington for
disputes arising out of the agreements and agree not to contest venue before
such courts. Regardless of the choice of law specified in the foregoing
agreements, the agreements must acknowledge that the regional transit authority
or public development corporation or entity created under section 20 of this
act that is a party to the agreements is an entity created under the laws of
the state of Washington whose power and authority and limitations and
restrictions on the power and authority are governed by the laws of the state
of Washington.

Payment
undertaking agreements that meet the foregoing requirement must be treated for
all relevant purposes as agreements under which future services are performed
for a present payment and shall not be treated as payment agreements within the
meaning of chapter 39.96 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. A
new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

To
accomplish any of the activities under section 18 of this act, a regional
transit authority may create a public corporation, commission, or authority
under RCW 35.21.730 through 35.21.755, and authorize the corporation,
commission, or authority to provide any of the facilities and services that a
regional transit authority may provide including any activities under section
18 of this act. A regional transit authority has all the powers, authorities,
and rights granted to any city, town, or county or their agents under RCW
35.21.730 through 35.21.755 for the purposes of entering into and implementing
transactions under section 18 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to lease amounts paid by a
seller/lessee to a lessor under a sale/leaseback agreement under section 18 of
this act in respect to tangible personal property, used by the seller/lessee,
or to the purchase amount paid by the lessee pursuant to an option to purchase
at the end of the lease term, but only if the seller/lessee previously paid any
tax otherwise due under this chapter or chapter 82.12 RCW at the time of
acquisition of the tangible personal property.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter does not apply to the use of tangible personal property by a
seller/lessee to a lessor under a sale/leaseback agreement under section 18 of
this act in respect to tangible personal property used by the seller/lessee, or
to the purchase amount paid by the lessee under an option to purchase at the
end of the lease term, but only if the seller/lessee previously paid any tax
otherwise due under this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW at the time of
acquisition of the tangible personal property.

Sec.
23. RCW
82.04.050 and 1998 c 332 s 2, 1998 c 315 s 1, 1998 c 308 s 1, and 1998 c 275 s
1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of
tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business and
including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who
install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal
property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person who presents a
resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:

(a)
Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the
regular course of business without intervening use by such person, but a
purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional transit authority under
section 18 of this act is not a sale for resale; or

(b)
Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates
real or personal property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal
property becomes an ingredient or component of such real or personal property
without intervening use by such person; or

(c)
Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for
sale a new article of tangible personal property or substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or is a chemical used in
processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical
reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being
produced for sale; or

(d)
Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing
ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the
primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(e)
Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of
competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065. The term shall
include every sale of tangible personal property which is used or consumed or
to be used or consumed in the performance of any activity classified as a
"sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property
is resold or utilized as provided in (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this
subsection following such use. The term also means every sale of tangible
personal property to persons engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW
82.04.280 (2) and (7) and 82.04.290.

(2)
The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include
the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for
labor and services rendered in respect to the following:

(a)
The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of
tangible personal property of or for consumers, including charges made for the
mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the
use of coin-operated laundry facilities when such facilities are situated in an
apartment house, rooming house, or mobile home park for the exclusive use of
the tenants thereof, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit
health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live
animals, birds and insects;

(b)
The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for
consumers, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible
personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property
becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, and shall also include
the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of
earth excepting the mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or
agriculture;

(c)
The charge for labor and services rendered in respect to constructing,
repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or under any real property
owned by an owner who conveys the property by title, possession, or any other
means to the person performing such construction, repair, or improvement for
the purpose of performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the
property is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the
original owner;

(d)
The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the
cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing buildings or structures, but
shall not include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of
this section the term "janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning
and caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service
businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor
cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;

(e)
The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to
automobile towing and similar automotive transportation services, but not in
respect to those required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f)
The sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging and all other
services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the
granting of any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the
renting or leasing of real property, and it shall be presumed that the
occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more
constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to use or
enjoy the same;

(g)
The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property, labor and services
to persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this subsection
when such sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used
or consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any
activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale"
even though such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or
consumption. Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to modify
subsection (1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this
section shall be construed to modify this subsection.

(3)
The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include
the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other
service emoluments however designated, received by persons engaging in the
following business activities:

(a)
Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to golf, pool,
billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips for sightseeing
purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;

(b)
Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;

(c)
Credit bureau services;

(d)
Automobile parking and storage garage services;

(e)
Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i)
horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming,
repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission
or distribution lines or equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an
electric utility;

(f)
Service charges associated with tickets to professional sporting events; and

(g)
The following personal services: Physical fitness services, tanning salon
services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services,
escort services, and dating services.

(4)
The term shall also include the renting or leasing of tangible personal
property to consumers and the rental of equipment with an operator.

(5)
The term shall also include the providing of telephone service, as defined in
RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.

(6)
The term shall also include the sale of canned software other than a sale to a
person who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the
method of delivery to the end user, but shall not include custom software or
the customization of canned software.

(7)
The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services
rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or improving of any street,
place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation
terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a
municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United
States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic
including mass transportation vehicles of any kind.

(8)
The term shall also not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons
for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald,
fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings,
fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and
spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation
reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture; (b)
farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; and (c)
farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with
an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)
or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve
wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.

(9)
The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services
rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of
new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county
or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein
or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty
by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term include the sale of services or
charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority. Nor shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste
and other byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and
development.

(10)
Until July 1, 2003, the term shall not include the sale of or charge made for
labor and services rendered for environmental remedial action as defined in RCW
82.04.2635(2).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter does not apply to amounts received as lease payments paid by a
seller/lessee to a lessor under a sale/leaseback agreement under section 18 of
this act in respect to tangible personal property used by the seller/lessee, or
to the purchase amount paid by the lessee under an option to purchase at the
end of the lease term.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. A
new section is added to chapter 82.29A RCW to read as follows:

All
leasehold interests in property of a regional transit authority or public
corporation created under section 20 of this act under an agreement under section
18 of this act are exempt from tax under this chapter.

Sec.
26. RCW
82.45.010 and 1999 c 209 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As used in this chapter, the term "sale" shall have its ordinary
meaning and shall include any conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or
transfer of the ownership of or title to real property, including standing
timber, or any estate or interest therein for a valuable consideration, and any
contract for such conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and
any lease with an option to purchase real property, including standing timber,
or any estate or interest therein or other contract under which possession of
the property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the purchaser's
direction, and title to the property is retained by the vendor as security for
the payment of the purchase price. The term also includes the grant,
assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of improvements constructed upon
leased land.

(2)
The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition within any
twelve-month period of a controlling interest in any entity with an interest in
real property located in this state for a valuable consideration. For purposes
of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons acting in concert shall be
aggregated for purposes of determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a
controlling interest has taken place. The department of revenue shall adopt
standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting
a rule for this purpose, the department shall consider the following:

(a)
Persons shall be treated as acting in concert when they have a relationship
with each other such that one person influences or controls the actions of
another through common ownership; and

(b)
When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they shall be treated as
acting in concert only when the unity with which the purchasers have negotiated
and will consummate the transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that
they are acting as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely
independent, with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the
other purchasers, then the acquisitions shall be considered separate
acquisitions.

(3)
The term "sale" shall not include:

(a)
A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.

(b)
A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type mentioned above.

(c)
A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a contract for the sale
of real property, whether or not such contract contains a forfeiture clause, or
deed in lieu of foreclosure of a mortgage.

(d)
The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or as the result of
a court decree.

(e)
The assignment of property or interest in property from one spouse to the other
in accordance with the terms of a decree of divorce or in fulfillment of a
property settlement agreement.

(f)
The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a contract for the
sale of real property, even though accompanied by a conveyance of the vendor's
interest in the real property involved.

(g)
Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation proceedings brought by the
United States, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal
corporation.

(h)
A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property merely to secure a
debt, or the assignment thereof.

(i)
Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or an order of sale
by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien foreclosure proceeding or
upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu of foreclosure to satisfy a
mortgage or deed of trust.

(j)
A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans administration
by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract of insurance or guaranty
with the federal housing administration or veterans administration.

(k)
A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or contract upon which the
tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or where the lease or contract was
entered into prior to the date this tax was first imposed.

(l)
The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.

(m)
A sale by the United States, this state or any political subdivision thereof,
or a municipal corporation of this state.

(n)
A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation under section
20 of this act under a sale/leaseback agreement under section 18 of this act.

(o)
A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists of a mere change
in identity or form of ownership of an entity where there is no change in the
beneficial ownership. These include transfers to a corporation or partnership
which is wholly owned by the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or
children: PROVIDED, That if thereafter such transferee corporation or
partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such transferor,
spouse, or children voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or
interest in the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other
than (1) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or children, (2) a trust
having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or children as the only
beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (3) a corporation or
partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the transferor's
spouse or children, within three years of the original transfer to which this
exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid
within sixty days of becoming due, excise taxes shall become due and payable on
the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.

(((o)))
(p)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not involve
the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation, liquidation or
dissolution, and reorganization, including but not limited to nonrecognition of
gain or loss because of application of section 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721,
or 731 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

(ii)
However, the transfer described in (((o))) (p)(i) of this
subsection cannot be preceded or followed within a twelve-month period by
another transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise
exempt transfer or transfers described in (((o))) (p)(i) of this
subsection, results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for
valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously holding a
controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property in exchange for any
interest the person or persons acting in concert hold in the entity. This
subsection (3)(((o))) (p)(ii) does not apply to that part of the
transfer involving property received that is the real property interest that
the person or persons originally contributed to the entity or when one or more
persons who did not contribute real property or belong to the entity at a time
when real property was purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange
for that person or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax
under this subsection (3)(((o))) (p)(ii) is imposed upon the
person or persons who previously held a controlling interest in the entity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 27. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

All
real and personal property subject to a sale/leaseback agreement under section
18 of this act is exempt from taxation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 28. A
new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

A
city or town may not impose taxes on amounts received as lease payments paid by
a seller/lessee to a lessor under a sale/leaseback agreement under section 18
of this act in respect to tangible personal property used by the seller/lessee,
or to the purchase amount paid by the lessee under an option to purchase at the
end of the lease term.

Sec.
29. RCW
35.21.755 and 1999 c 266 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A public corporation, commission, or authority created pursuant to RCW
35.21.730 ((or)), 35.21.660, or section 20 of this act
shall receive the same immunity or exemption from taxation as that of the city,
town, or county creating the same: PROVIDED, That, except for (a) any property
within a special review district established by ordinance prior to January 1,
1976, or listed on or which is within a district listed on any federal or state
register of historical sites or (b) any property owned, operated, or controlled
by a public corporation that is used primarily for low-income housing, or that
is used as a convention center, performing arts center, public assembly hall,
public meeting place, public esplanade, street, public way, public open space,
park, public utility corridor, or view corridor for the general public or (c)
any blighted property owned, operated, or controlled by a public corporation
that was acquired for the purpose of remediation and redevelopment of the
property in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the city, town, or
county in which the property is located, or (d) any property owned,
operated, or controlled by a public corporation created under section 20 of
this act, any such public corporation, commission, or authority shall pay
to the county treasurer an annual excise tax equal to the amounts which would
be paid upon real property and personal property devoted to the purposes of
such public corporation, commission, or authority were it in private ownership,
and such real property and personal property is acquired and/or operated under
RCW 35.21.730 through 35.21.755, and the proceeds of such excise tax shall be
allocated by the county treasurer to the various taxing authorities in which
such property is situated, in the same manner as though the property were in
private ownership: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the provisions of chapter 82.29A RCW
shall not apply to property within a special review district established by
ordinance prior to January 1, 1976, or listed on or which is within a district
listed on any federal or state register of historical sites and which is
controlled by a public corporation, commission, or authority created pursuant
to RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660, which was in existence prior to January 1,
1987: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That property within a special review district
established by ordinance prior to January 1, 1976, or property which is listed
on any federal or state register of historical sites and controlled by a public
corporation, commission, or authority created pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 or
35.21.660, which was in existence prior to January 1, 1976, shall receive the
same immunity or exemption from taxation as if such property had been within a
district listed on any such federal or state register of historical sites as of
January 1, 1976, and controlled by a public corporation, commission, or
authority created pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660 which was in existence
prior to January 1, 1976.

(2)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Low-income" means a total annual income, adjusted for family size,
not exceeding fifty percent of the area median income.

(b)
"Area median income" means:

(i)
For an area within a standard metropolitan statistical area, the area median
income reported by the United States department of housing and urban
development for that standard metropolitan statistical area; or

(ii)
For an area not within a standard metropolitan statistical area, the county
median income reported by the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(c)
"Blighted property" means property that is contaminated with
hazardous substances as defined under RCW 70.105D.020(7).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 30. A
new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no regional transit
authority may initiate a transaction authorized under section 18 of this act
after June 30, 2007.

(2)
The termination of authority to enter into transactions after June 30, 2007,
does not affect the validity of any transactions entered into under section 18
of this act.

(3)
A regional transit authority may enter into a transaction in accordance with
section 18 of this act after June 30, 2007, to replace or refinance a
transaction that relates to specific obligations entered into on or before that
date and that has terminated, or is, under the terms of the replacement or
refinance, to terminate, before the final stated term of that transaction. The
exemptions from taxes provided by sections 21, 22, 24, 25, 27, and 28 of this
act and RCW 82.04.050, 82.45.010, and 35.21.755 apply to the replacement or
refinance transactions.

(4)
A regional transit authority, or public corporation or entity created under
section 20 of this act, that undertakes a transaction authorized by
section 18 of this act, shall provide to the state finance committee, or its
financial advisor, at the state finance committee's discretion, a copy of all
material agreements executed in connection with the transaction within three
months of the closing of the transaction and shall make a report to the state
finance committee, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of
representatives on transactions authorized by section 18 of this act. The
report must include the amount of the transactions, the expected savings or
losses resulting from the transactions, the transaction costs, including fees
and detailed pricing information, the risks associated with the transaction,
and any other information the regional transit authority determines relevant.
The report must be submitted within six months of the closing of each
transaction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 31. The
authority granted by sections 18 through 30 of this act is in addition and
supplemental to any authority previously granted and does not limit nor is
limited by any other powers or authority previously granted to regional transit
authorities or any public corporation, or restrictions on such powers or
authority. Nothing in sections 18 through 30 of this act limits other
statutory authority previously granted to regional transit authorities or
public corporations or other tax exemptions granted to regional transit
authorities or public corporations. Nothing in sections 18 through 30 of this
act limits the authority of the state, any political subdivision thereof, or
any other public or municipal corporation to undertake the activities described
in sections 18 through 30 of this act as expressly or impliedly authorized by
other provisions of law. Nothing in sections 18 through 30 of this act is an
authorization to provide indemnification to the extent the indemnification is
prohibited or restricted by other provisions of law or the Constitution of the
state of Washington.

Sec.
32. RCW
81.112.060 and 1992 c 101 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

An
authority shall have the following powers:

(1)
To establish offices, departments, boards, and commissions that are necessary
to carry out the purposes of the authority, and to prescribe the functions,
powers, and duties thereof.

(2)
To appoint or provide for the appointment of, and to remove or to provide for
the removal of, all officers and employees of the authority.

(3)
To fix the salaries, wages, and other compensation of all officers and
employees of the authority.

(4)
To employ such engineering, legal, financial, or other specialized personnel as
may be necessary to accomplish the purposes of the authority.

(5)
To determine risks, hazards, and liabilities in order to obtain insurance
consistent with these determinations. This insurance may include any types of
insurance covering, and for the benefit of, one or more parties with whom the
authority contracts for any purpose, and insurance for the benefit of its board
members, authority officers, and employees to insure against liability for acts
or omissions while performing or in good faith purporting to perform their
official duties. All insurance obtained for construction of authority projects
with a total project cost exceeding one hundred million dollars may be acquired
by bid or by negotiation through December 31, 2006. In order to allow the
authority flexibility to secure appropriate insurance by negotiation, the
authority is exempt from RCW 48.30.270.

Sec.
33. RCW
48.30.270 and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No officer or employee of this state, or of any public agency, public authority
or public corporation except a public corporation or public authority created
pursuant to agreement or compact with another state, and no person acting or
purporting to act on behalf of such officer or employee, or public agency or
public authority or public corporation, shall, with respect to any public
building or construction contract which is about to be, or which has been
competitively bid, require the bidder to make application to, or to furnish financial
data to, or to obtain or procure, any of the surety bonds or contracts of
insurance specified in connection with such contract, or specified by any law,
general, special or local, from a particular insurer or agent or broker.

(2)
No such officer or employee or any person, acting or purporting to act on
behalf of such officer or employee shall negotiate, make application for,
obtain or procure any of such surety bonds or contracts of insurance, except
contracts of insurance for builder's risk or owner's protective liability,
which can be obtained or procured by the bidder, contractor or subcontractor.

(3)
This section shall not be construed to prevent the exercise by such officer or
employee on behalf of the state or such public agency, public authority, or
public corporation of its right to approve the form, sufficiency or manner or
execution of the surety bonds or contracts of insurance furnished by the
insurer selected by the bidder to underwrite such bonds, or contracts of
insurance.

(4)
Any provisions in any invitation for bids, or in any of the contract documents,
in conflict with this section are declared to be contrary to the public policy
of this state.

(5)
A violation of this section shall be subject to the penalties provided by RCW
48.01.080.

(6)
This section shall not apply to:

(a)
The public nonprofit corporation authorized under RCW 67.40.020; or

(b)
A regional transit authority authorized under RCW 81.112.030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 34.
Section 1 of this act applies to taxes collected on and after December 31,
1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 35.
Sections 1 through 3 and 20 of this act are necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 36. (1)
Sections 4 and 7 through 10 of this act are necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2000.

(2)
Section 5 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

(3)
Section 6 of this act takes effect March 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37.
Sections 3 and 4 of this act expire September 1, 2000.

---
END ---