BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.38.111 and 1997 c 210 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall not require a certificate of need for the offering of an
inpatient tertiary health service by:

(a)
A health maintenance organization or a combination of health maintenance
organizations if (i) the organization or combination of organizations has, in
the service area of the organization or the service areas of the organizations
in the combination, an enrollment of at least fifty thousand individuals, (ii)
the facility in which the service will be provided is or will be geographically
located so that the service will be reasonably accessible to such enrolled
individuals, and (iii) at least seventy-five percent of the patients who can
reasonably be expected to receive the tertiary health service will be
individuals enrolled with such organization or organizations in the
combination;

(b)
A health care facility if (i) the facility primarily provides or will provide
inpatient health services, (ii) the facility is or will be controlled, directly
or indirectly, by a health maintenance organization or a combination of health
maintenance organizations which has, in the service area of the organization or
service areas of the organizations in the combination, an enrollment of at
least fifty thousand individuals, (iii) the facility is or will be
geographically located so that the service will be reasonably accessible to
such enrolled individuals, and (iv) at least seventy-five percent of the
patients who can reasonably be expected to receive the tertiary health service
will be individuals enrolled with such organization or organizations in the
combination; or

(c)
A health care facility (or portion thereof) if (i) the facility is or will be
leased by a health maintenance organization or combination of health
maintenance organizations which has, in the service area of the organization or
the service areas of the organizations in the combination, an enrollment of at
least fifty thousand individuals and, on the date the application is submitted
under subsection (2) of this section, at least fifteen years remain in the term
of the lease, (ii) the facility is or will be geographically located so that
the service will be reasonably accessible to such enrolled individuals, and
(iii) at least seventy-five percent of the patients who can reasonably be
expected to receive the tertiary health service will be individuals enrolled
with such organization;

if,
with respect to such offering or obligation by a nursing home, the department
has, upon application under subsection (2) of this section, granted an
exemption from such requirement to the organization, combination of
organizations, or facility.

(2)
A health maintenance organization, combination of health maintenance
organizations, or health care facility shall not be exempt under subsection (1)
of this section from obtaining a certificate of need before offering a tertiary
health service unless:

(a)
It has submitted at least thirty days prior to the offering of services
reviewable under RCW 70.38.105(4)(d) an application for such exemption; and

(b)
The application contains such information respecting the organization,
combination, or facility and the proposed offering or obligation by a nursing
home as the department may require to determine if the organization or
combination meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section or the
facility meets or will meet such requirements; and

(c)
The department approves such application. The department shall approve or
disapprove an application for exemption within thirty days of receipt of a
completed application. In the case of a proposed health care facility (or
portion thereof) which has not begun to provide tertiary health services on the
date an application is submitted under this subsection with respect to such
facility (or portion), the facility (or portion) shall meet the applicable
requirements of subsection (1) of this section when the facility first provides
such services. The department shall approve an application submitted under
this subsection if it determines that the applicable requirements of subsection
(1) of this section are met.

(3)
A health care facility (or any part thereof) with respect to which an exemption
was granted under subsection (1) of this section may not be sold or leased and
a controlling interest in such facility or in a lease of such facility may not
be acquired and a health care facility described in (1)(c) which was granted an
exemption under subsection (1) of this section may not be used by any person
other than the lessee described in (1)(c) unless:

(a)
The department issues a certificate of need approving the sale, lease,
acquisition, or use; or

(b)
The department determines, upon application, that (i) the entity to which the
facility is proposed to be sold or leased, which intends to acquire the
controlling interest, or which intends to use the facility is a health
maintenance organization or a combination of health maintenance organizations
which meets the requirements of (1)(a)(i), and (ii) with respect to such
facility, meets the requirements of (1)(a)(ii) or (iii) or the requirements of
(1)(b)(i) and (ii).

(4)
In the case of a health maintenance organization, an ambulatory care facility,
or a health care facility, which ambulatory or health care facility is
controlled, directly or indirectly, by a health maintenance organization or a
combination of health maintenance organizations, the department may under the
program apply its certificate of need requirements only to the offering of
inpatient tertiary health services and then only to the extent that such
offering is not exempt under the provisions of this section.

(5)(a)
The department shall not require a certificate of need for the construction,
development, or other establishment of a nursing home, or the addition of beds
to an existing nursing home, that is owned and operated by a continuing care
retirement community that:

(i)
Offers services only to contractual members;

(ii)
Provides its members a contractually guaranteed range of services from
independent living through skilled nursing, including some assistance with
daily living activities;

(iii)
Contractually assumes responsibility for the cost of services exceeding the
member's financial responsibility under the contract, so that no third party,
with the exception of insurance purchased by the retirement community or its
members, but including the medicaid program, is liable for costs of care even
if the member depletes his or her personal resources;

(iv)
Has offered continuing care contracts and operated a nursing home continuously
since January 1, 1988, or has obtained a certificate of need to establish a
nursing home;

(v)
Maintains a binding agreement with the state assuring that financial liability
for services to members, including nursing home services, will not fall upon
the state;

(vi)
Does not operate, and has not undertaken a project that would result in a
number of nursing home beds in excess of one for every four living units
operated by the continuing care retirement community, exclusive of nursing home
beds; and

(vii)
Has obtained a professional review of pricing and long-term solvency within the
prior five years which was fully disclosed to members.

(b)
A continuing care retirement community shall not be exempt under this
subsection from obtaining a certificate of need unless:

(i)
It has submitted an application for exemption at least thirty days prior to
commencing construction of, is submitting an application for the licensure of,
or is commencing operation of a nursing home, whichever comes first; and

(ii)
The application documents to the department that the continuing care retirement
community qualifies for exemption.

(c)
The sale, lease, acquisition, or use of part or all of a continuing care
retirement community nursing home that qualifies for exemption under this
subsection shall require prior certificate of need approval to qualify for
licensure as a nursing home unless the department determines such sale, lease,
acquisition, or use is by a continuing care retirement community that meets the
conditions of (a) of this subsection.

(6)
A rural hospital, as defined by the department, reducing the number of licensed
beds to become a rural primary care hospital under the provisions of Part A
Title XVIII of the Social Security Act Section 1820, 42 U.S.C., 1395c et seq.
may, within three years of the reduction of beds licensed under chapter 70.41
RCW, increase the number of licensed beds to no more than the previously
licensed number without being subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(7)
A rural health care facility licensed under RCW 70.175.100 formerly licensed as
a hospital under chapter 70.41 RCW may, within three years of the effective
date of the rural health care facility license, apply to the department for a
hospital license and not be subject to the requirements of RCW 70.38.105(4)(a)
as the construction, development, or other establishment of a new hospital, provided
there is no increase in the number of beds previously licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW and there is no redistribution in the number of beds used for acute
care or long-term care, the rural health care facility has been in continuous
operation, and the rural health care facility has not been purchased or leased.

(8)(a)
A nursing home that voluntarily reduces the number of its licensed beds to
provide assisted living, licensed boarding home care, adult day care, adult day
health, respite care, hospice, outpatient therapy services, congregate meals,
home health, or senior wellness clinic, or to reduce to one or two the number
of beds per room or to otherwise enhance the quality of life for residents in
the nursing home, may convert the original facility or portion of the facility
back, and thereby increase the number of nursing home beds to no more than the
previously licensed number of nursing home beds without obtaining a certificate
of need under this chapter, provided the facility has been in continuous
operation and has not been purchased or leased. Any conversion to the original
licensed bed capacity, or to any portion thereof, shall comply with the same
life and safety code requirements as existed at the time the nursing home
voluntarily reduced its licensed beds; unless waivers from such requirements
were issued, in which case the converted beds shall reflect the conditions or
standards that then existed pursuant to the approved waivers.

(b)
To convert beds back to nursing home beds under this subsection, the nursing
home must:

(i)
Give notice of its intent to preserve conversion options to the department of
health no later than thirty days after the effective date of the license
reduction; and

(ii)
Give notice to the department of health and to the department of social and
health services of the intent to convert beds back. If construction is
required for the conversion of beds back, the notice of intent to convert beds
back must be given, at a minimum, one year prior to the effective date of
license modification reflecting the restored beds; otherwise, the notice must
be given a minimum of ninety days prior to the effective date of license
modification reflecting the restored beds. Prior to any license modification
to convert beds back to nursing home beds under this section, the licensee must
demonstrate that the nursing home meets the certificate of need exemption
requirements of this section.

The
term "construction," as used in (b)(ii) of this subsection, is
limited to those projects that are expected to equal or exceed the expenditure
minimum amount, as determined under this chapter.

(c)
((Conversion of beds back under this subsection must be completed no later
than four years after the effective date of the license reduction. However, for
good cause shown, the four-year period for conversion may be extended by the
department of health for one additional four-year period.

(d)))
Nursing home beds that have been voluntarily reduced under this section shall
be counted as available nursing home beds for the purpose of evaluating need
under RCW 70.38.115(2) (a) and (k) so long as the facility retains the ability
to convert them back to nursing home use under the terms of this section.

(((e)))
(d) When a building owner has secured an interest in the nursing home
beds, which are intended to be voluntarily reduced by the licensee under (a) of
this subsection, the applicant shall provide the department with a written
statement indicating the building owner's approval of the bed reduction.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.38.115 and 1996 c 178 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Certificates of need shall be issued, denied, suspended, or revoked by the
designee of the secretary in accord with the provisions of this chapter and
rules of the department which establish review procedures and criteria for the
certificate of need program.

(2)
Criteria for the review of certificate of need applications, except as provided
in subsection (3) of this section for health maintenance organizations, shall
include but not be limited to consideration of the following:

(a)
The need that the population served or to be served by such services has for
such services;

(b)
The availability of less costly or more effective alternative methods of providing
such services;

(c)
The financial feasibility and the probable impact of the proposal on the cost
of and charges for providing health services in the community to be served;

(d)
In the case of health services to be provided, (i) the availability of
alternative uses of project resources for the provision of other health
services, (ii) the extent to which such proposed services will be accessible to
all residents of the area to be served, and (iii) the need for and the
availability in the community of services and facilities for osteopathic
physicians and surgeons and allopathic physicians and their patients. The
department shall consider the application in terms of its impact on existing
and proposed institutional training programs for doctors of osteopathic
medicine and surgery and medicine at the student, internship, and residency
training levels;

(e)
In the case of a construction project, the costs and methods of the proposed
construction, including the cost and methods of energy provision, and the
probable impact of the construction project reviewed (i) on the cost of
providing health services by the person proposing such construction project and
(ii) on the cost and charges to the public of providing health services by
other persons;

(f)
The special needs and circumstances of osteopathic hospitals, nonallopathic
services and children's hospitals;

(g)
Improvements or innovations in the financing and delivery of health services
which foster cost containment and serve to promote quality assurance and
cost-effectiveness;

(h)
In the case of health services proposed to be provided, the efficiency and
appropriateness of the use of existing services and facilities similar to those
proposed;

(i)
In the case of existing services or facilities, the quality of care provided by
such services or facilities in the past;

(j)
In the case of hospital certificate of need applications, whether the hospital
meets or exceeds the regional average level of charity care, as determined by
the secretary; and

(k)
In the case of nursing home applications:

(i)
The availability of other nursing home beds in the planning area to be served;
and

(ii)
The availability of other services in the community to be served. Data used to
determine the availability of other services will include but not be limited to
data provided by the department of social and health services.

(3)
A certificate of need application of a health maintenance organization or a
health care facility which is controlled, directly or indirectly, by a health
maintenance organization, shall be approved by the department if the department
finds:

(a)
Approval of such application is required to meet the needs of the members of
the health maintenance organization and of the new members which such organization
can reasonably be expected to enroll; and

(b)
The health maintenance organization is unable to provide, through services or
facilities which can reasonably be expected to be available to the
organization, its health services in a reasonable and cost-effective manner
which is consistent with the basic method of operation of the organization and
which makes such services available on a long-term basis through physicians and
other health professionals associated with it.

A
health care facility, or any part thereof, with respect to which a certificate
of need was issued under this subsection may not be sold or leased and a
controlling interest in such facility or in a lease of such facility may not be
acquired unless the department issues a certificate of need approving the sale,
acquisition, or lease.

(4)
Until the final expiration of the state health plan as provided under RCW
70.38.919, the decision of the department on a certificate of need application
shall be consistent with the state health plan in effect, except in emergency
circumstances which pose a threat to the public health. The department in
making its final decision may issue a conditional certificate of need if it
finds that the project is justified only under specific circumstances. The
conditions shall directly relate to the project being reviewed. The conditions
may be released if it can be substantiated that the conditions are no longer
valid and the release of such conditions would be consistent with the purposes
of this chapter.

(5)
Criteria adopted for review in accordance with subsection (2) of this section
may vary according to the purpose for which the particular review is being
conducted or the type of health service reviewed.

(6)
The department shall specify information to be required for certificate of need
applications. Within fifteen days of receipt of the application, the
department shall request additional information considered necessary to the
application or start the review process. Applicants may decline to submit requested
information through written notice to the department, in which case review
starts on the date of receipt of the notice. Applications may be denied or
limited because of failure to submit required and necessary information.

(7)
Concurrent review is for the purpose of comparative analysis and evaluation of
competing or similar projects in order to determine which of the projects may
best meet identified needs. Categories of projects subject to concurrent
review include at least new health care facilities, new services, and expansion
of existing health care facilities. The department shall specify time periods
for the submission of applications for certificates of need subject to
concurrent review, which shall not exceed ninety days. Review of concurrent
applications shall start fifteen days after the conclusion of the time period
for submission of applications subject to concurrent review. Concurrent review
periods shall be limited to one hundred fifty days, except as provided for in
rules adopted by the department authorizing and limiting amendment during the
course of the review, or for an unresolved pivotal issue declared by the
department.

(8)
Review periods for certificate of need applications other than those subject to
concurrent review shall be limited to ninety days. Review periods may be
extended up to thirty days if needed by a review agency, and for unresolved
pivotal issues the department may extend up to an additional thirty days. A
review may be extended in any case if the applicant agrees to the extension.

(9)
The department or its designee, shall conduct a public hearing on a certificate
of need application if requested unless the review is expedited or subject to
emergency review. The department by rule shall specify the period of time
within which a public hearing must be requested and requirements related to
public notice of the hearing, procedures, recordkeeping and related matters.

(10)(a)
Any applicant denied a certificate of need or whose certificate of need has
been suspended or revoked has the right to an adjudicative proceeding. The
proceeding is governed by chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act.

(b)
Any health care facility or health maintenance organization that: (i) Provides
services similar to the services provided by the applicant and under review
pursuant to this subsection; (ii) is located within the applicant's health
service area; and (iii) testified or submitted evidence at a public hearing
held pursuant to subsection (9) of this section, shall be provided an
opportunity to present oral or written testimony and argument in a proceeding
under this subsection: PROVIDED, That the health care facility or health
maintenance organization had, in writing, requested to be informed of the
department's decisions.

(c)
If the department desires to settle with the applicant prior to the conclusion
of the adjudicative proceeding, the department shall so inform the health care
facility or health maintenance organization and afford them an opportunity to
comment, in advance, on the proposed settlement.

(11)
An amended certificate of need shall be required for the following
modifications of an approved project:

(a)
A new service requiring review under this chapter;

(b)
An expansion of a service subject to review beyond that originally approved;

(c)
An increase in bed capacity;

(d)
A significant reduction in the scope of a nursing home project without a
commensurate reduction in the cost of the nursing home project, or a cost
increase (as represented in bids on a nursing home construction project or
final cost estimates acceptable to the person to whom the certificate of need
was issued) if the total of such increases exceeds twelve percent or fifty
thousand dollars, whichever is greater, over the maximum capital expenditure
approved. The review of reductions or cost increases shall be restricted to
the continued conformance of the nursing home project with the review criteria
pertaining to financial feasibility and cost containment.

(12)
An application for a certificate of need for a nursing home capital expenditure
which is determined by the department to be required to eliminate or prevent
imminent safety hazards or correct violations of applicable licensure and
accreditation standards shall be approved.

(13)(a)
Replacement of existing nursing home beds in the same planning area by an
existing licensee who has operated the beds for at least one year shall not
require a certificate of need under this chapter. The licensee shall give
written notice of its intent to replace the existing nursing home beds to the
department and shall provide the department with information as may be required
pursuant to rule. Replacement of the beds by a party other than the licensee
is subject to certificate of need review under this chapter, except as
otherwise permitted by subsection (14) of this section.

(b)
When an entire nursing home ceases operation, the licensee or any other party
who has secured an interest in the beds may reserve his or her interest in the
beds for eight years or until a certificate of need to replace them is issued,
whichever occurs first. However, the nursing home, licensee, or any other
party who has secured an interest in the beds must give notice of its intent to
retain the beds to the department of health no later than thirty days after the
effective date of the facility's closure. Certificate of need review shall be
required for any party who has reserved the nursing home beds except that the
need criteria shall be deemed met when the applicant is the licensee who had
operated the beds for at least one year, who has operated the beds for at least
one year immediately preceding the reservation of the beds, and who is
replacing the beds in the same planning area.

(14) In the event that a licensee, who has provided the department
with notice of his or her intent to replace nursing home beds under subsection
(13)(a) of this section, engages in unprofessional conduct or becomes unable to
practice with reasonable skill and safety by reason of mental or physical
condition, pursuant to chapter 18.130 RCW, ((or)) dies, or files for
or otherwise declares bankruptcy, the building owner shall be permitted to
complete the nursing home bed replacement project, provided the building owner
has secured an interest in the beds.

---
END ---