BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The director may adopt rules pursuant to RCW 49.17.040 to provide safety and
health standards for musculoskeletal disorders caused by awkward postures, high
hand force, repetitive motion, repeated impacts, awkward lifting, vibration, or
similar physical tasks. However, the rules adopted by the department under
this section only apply to the following state agencies:

(a)
Department of labor and industries;

(b)
Department of general administration;

(c)
Department of ecology;

(d)
Department of transportation;

(e)
Employment security department;

(f)
Department of corrections; and

(g)
Department of revenue.

(2)
By December 31, 2003, the directors of each of the state agencies listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall report to the legislature regarding:

(a)
Ease of understanding and compliance with rules;

(b)
Identification of ambiguities and difficulties encountered during
implementation of rules;

(c)
Injury reduction, including comparison to injury rates for years prior to the
adoption of rules;

(d)
Costs of compliance with rules, including direct and indirect costs.

(3)
In order to more accurately reflect private sector circumstances, agencies
shall use current appropriations to implement rules.

(4) This section expires three years from the date of final
adoption of a rule.

---
END ---