BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that providing meaningful access to appropriate assistive
technology for senior citizens and children and adults with disabilities is a
matter of public interest. Access to such technology can play a vital role in
maximizing individual potential. Investments in assistive technology also are
cost-effective because they reduce the risk of secondary injuries, make it
possible for people to live at home rather than in long-term care, and provide
a foundation for success in education and employment, thereby reducing the high
levels of unemployment experienced by people with disabilities. The
legislature further finds that current public and private funding sources are
inadequate, or not suited to meet the assistive technology needs of many
sectors of the population, or both, and that it is necessary for the state to
establish a program that will facilitate the development of alternative
financing arrangements to help individuals with disabilities acquire the
assistive technology they need for education, employment, health care,
independent living, transportation, and recreation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Assistive technology" means any item, piece of equipment, or device
that enables an individual with a disability to improve his or her functional
capabilities, independence, or quality of life, and any service that directly
assists an individual with a disability in the selection, acquisition, or use
of an assistive technology device.

(2)
"Fund" means the Washington assistive technology access fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
Washington assistive technology access fund is hereby established. The fund
shall consist of such moneys as may be appropriated by the legislature, gifts,
bequests, endowments, or grants from the United States government, its
agencies, and instrumentalities, receipts by the fund associated with loans
made by it, all income from the investment of moneys held in the fund, and any
other available source of funds, public or private. Unexpended moneys
contained in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be carried forward
from year to year. Interest and income earned from the investment of such
funds shall remain in the fund and be credited to it.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
fund shall be administered by the state treasurer. Programs and activities
sponsored through the fund shall be administered by the Washington assistive
technology alliance within the division of vocational rehabilitation. The
Washington assistive technology alliance is authorized and directed to solicit
matching federal and private sector dollars, to contract with other public and
private entities, to establish policies and regulations concerning program
eligibility and procedures, and to undertake all other activities necessary to
carry out the purposes of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The fund may be used for the following purposes:

(a)
The creation of a loan guarantee and interest buy-down program to assist
qualified borrowers in financing purchases of assistive technology devices and
services through loans from private lending institutions; and

(b)
Resources permitting, the creation of other alternative assistive technology
financing arrangements including, without limitation, grant programs for
low-income individuals and families who do not qualify for loans or other
public and private sources of assistive technology funding and assistive
technology equipment loan programs to serve individuals who need access to such
equipment on a short-term basis, and whose needs cannot be met through other
means.

(2)
Income from the fund also may be used for related support and administrative
activities including, without limitation, program development and
administration, assistance to individuals in identifying and applying for
private bank loans and other public assistive technology funding sources such
as vocational rehabilitation, public education, private insurance, medicaid,
and medicare, and public and private sector fund development activities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
The director of the division of vocational rehabilitation shall appoint an
assistive technology access fund committee, to be composed of at least seven
members as follows:

(a)
One or more representatives of the banking industry experienced with consumer
lending;

(b)
One or more professionals with assistive technology expertise;

(c)
An individual familiar with consumer credit counseling; and

(d)
Four public members with a knowledge of assistive technology representing a
range of disabilities.

(2)
Members of the assistive technology access fund committee shall serve without
compensation but may be reimbursed for actual expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The director of the Washington assistive technology
alliance, or the director's designee, shall serve as an ex officio member of
the assistive technology access fund committee.

(3)
The assistive technology access fund committee shall:

(a)
Advise the Washington assistive technology alliance on the development and
implementation of alternative assistive technology financing programs under
this chapter; and

(b)
Make annual reports and recommendations to the legislature on the operation of
programs established under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This
chapter may be known and cited as the Washington assistive technology access
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 74 RCW.

---
END ---