BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.52.185 and 1997 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
During the twelve-month period beginning on December 1st of the year before a
general election for a state legislator's election to office and continuing
through November 30th immediately after the general election, the legislator
may not mail, either by regular mail or electronic mail, to a constituent at
public expense a letter, newsletter, brochure, or other piece of literature,
except as follows:

(a)
The legislator may mail two mailings of newsletters to constituents. All
newsletters within each mailing of newsletters must be identical as to their
content but not as to the constituent name or address. One such mailing may be
mailed no later than thirty days after the start of a regular legislative
session, except that a legislator appointed during a regular legislative
session to fill a vacant seat may have up to thirty days from the date of
appointment to send out the first mailing. The other mailing may be mailed no
later than sixty days after the end of a regular legislative session.

(b)
The legislator may mail an individual letter to (i) an individual constituent
who has contacted the legislator regarding the subject matter of the letter
during the legislator's current term of office; (ii) an individual constituent
who holds a governmental office with jurisdiction over the subject matter of
the letter; or (iii) an individual constituent who has received an award or
honor or accomplished something of ((extraordinary)) uncommon
distinction ((of a type that is sufficiently infrequent to be noteworthy to
a reasonable person)), including, but not limited to: (A) ((An
international or national award such as the Nobel prize or the Pulitzer prize))
Scholastic or athletic achievement by a student; (B) ((a state award
such as Washington scholar)) public service to the state or the person's
community; (C) an Eagle Scout award; and (D) ((a Medal of Honor)) significant
personal or professional milestones.

(2)
For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, "legislator" means a
legislator who is a "candidate," as defined by RCW 42.17.020, for any
public office.

(3)
A violation of this section constitutes use of the facilities of a public
office for the purpose of assisting a campaign under RCW 42.52.180.

(4)
The house of representatives and senate shall specifically limit expenditures
per member for the total cost of mailings. Those costs include, but are not
limited to, production costs, printing costs, and postage costs. The limits
imposed under this subsection apply only to the total expenditures on mailings
per member and not to any categorical cost within the total.

(5) For purposes of this section, persons residing outside the
legislative district represented by the legislator are not considered to be
constituents, but students, military personnel, or others temporarily employed
outside of the district who normally reside in the district are considered to
be constituents.

---
END ---