BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
License tab fees shall be thirty dollars per year for motor vehicles,
regardless of year, value, make, or model, beginning January 1, 2000.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "license tab fees" are defined as
the general fees paid annually for licensing motor vehicles, including cars,
sport utility vehicles, motorcycles, and motor homes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
46.16.060 (License fee, general‑-Distribution of proceeds‑-House-moving
dollies) and 1992 c 216 s 4, 1987 1st ex.s. c 9 s 3, 1985 c 380 s 13, 1981 c
342 s 8, 1975 1st ex.s. c 118 s 3, 1969 ex.s. c 170 s 3, 1969 c 99 s 5, 1965 c
25 s 1, 1961 ex.s. c 7 s 9, & 1961 c 12 s 46.16.060;

(2) RCW
46.16.061 (Additional fees to help defray costs of studies) and
1985 c 380 s 14, 1984 c 7 s 49, & 1963 ex.s. c 3 s 40;

(3) RCW
46.16.650 (License plates‑-Additional fee) and 1997 c 291 s
12 & 1987 c 178 s 1;

(4) RCW
82.44.020 (Basic and clean air excise tax
imposed--Exceptions--Liability of residents for out-of-state licensing) and
1998 c 321 s 3, 1993 sp.s. c 23 s 61, 1993 c 123 s 2, 1991 c 199 s 220, 1990 c
42 s 302, & 1988 c 191 s 1;

(5) RCW 82.44.030 (Tax
on motor vehicle dealers) and 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 51 & 1961 c 15 s
82.44.030;

(6) RCW
82.50.400 (Tax imposed--Collection--Transfer of ownership‑-Out-of-state
registration to avoid tax, liability--Penalties) and 1999 c 277 s 9, 1993 c 238
s 7, 1992 c 154 s 5, 1990 c 42 s 320, 1979 c 123 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 118 s
15, & 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 55;

(7) RCW
82.50.405 (Additional annual clean air excise tax) and 1991 c 199
s 226; and

(8) RCW
82.50.410 (Rate--Minimum payable--Dealer tax) and 1998 c 321 s
23, 1991 c 199 s 225, 1990 c 42 s 321, 1979 c 123 s 2, 1975 1st ex.s. c 118 s
16, 1972 ex.s. c 144 s 2, & 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 56.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act applies retroactively to January 1, 2000.

---
END ---