BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A political subdivision of the state shall not expend from its general expense
budget during any fiscal year moneys in excess of the local expenditure limit
established under this section and section 2 of this act.

(2)
A political subdivision shall not issue or redeem any check, warrant, or
voucher that will result in an expenditure for any fiscal year in excess of the
local expenditure limit established under this section and section 2 of this
act.

(3)
The political subdivision's expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the
previous fiscal year's expenditure limit increased by a percentage rate that
equals the previous year's local fiscal growth factor.

(4)
For purposes of computing the local expenditure limit for the fiscal year
beginning January 1, 2001, the phrase "the previous fiscal year's local
expenditure limit" means the total expenditures from the general expense
budget, not including federal funds, for the fiscal year beginning January 1,
2000, plus the local fiscal growth factor for fiscal year beginning January 1,
1999.

(5)
Each November, the political subdivision shall adjust the local expenditure
limit by the local fiscal growth factor for the preceding fiscal year and then
project an expenditure limit for the next two fiscal years.

(6)
"Local fiscal growth factor" means the sum of inflation and a
percentage equal to the ratio that the increase in the assessed value in the
taxing district resulting from new construction and improvements to property
under chapter 84.55 RCW bears to the total assessed value for the political
subdivision for the previous year.

(7)
"Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for the United States as published by the federal bureau of labor
statistics.

(8)
"Political subdivision" means every county, city, town, and special
purpose district of the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
After January 1, 2001, a political subdivision may exceed the local expenditure
limit if:

(a)
The expenditure has been approved by a majority of the voters of the political
subdivision; or

(b)
The legislative authority of the political subdivision has declared an
emergency by a two-thirds vote of the legislative authority. The authority to
expend in excess of the local expenditure limit under this subsection (1)(b)
expires sixty days following the next general election unless the authority has
been approved under (a) of this subsection.

(2)
Any ballot measure submitted to the voters under subsection (1) of this section
shall state the proposed percentage increase in expenditures and the duration
of the authority.

(3) If the cost of any local program or function is shifted from
the general expense budget on or after January 1, 2000, to another source of
funding, or if moneys are transferred from the general expense budget to
another fund or account, the political subdivision shall lower the local
expenditure limit to reflect the shift.

---
END ---