BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
intent of this act is to provide property tax relief by setting base years for
property tax valuation computation, limiting property tax valuation increases
to two percent per year over the base year until ownership of the property
changes, and limiting the tax assessed on owner-occupied property claimed as a
principal place of residence.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this section and sections 3 and 4 of this act.

(1)
"Base value" means (a) the assessed value of real property for taxes
levied for collection in 1998; or (b) the assessed value of real property for
the first year taxes are levied after a change of ownership.

(2)
"Adjusted value" means the lesser of the following:

(a)
The assessed value of real property, as determined under chapter 84.40 RCW; or

(b)
The base value of the real property increased on January 1st of each year by a
maximum of two percent, compounded annually, plus the portion of the assessed
value attributable to any construction or alteration not included in the most
recent assessment, other than improvements exempt under RCW 84.36.400 for the
assessment year.

(3)(a)
"Change of ownership" means a transfer of a present interest in real
property, including a transfer of the beneficial use of real property.

(b)
"Change of ownership" includes, except as provided in (c) of this
subsection:

(i)
Contracting to convey the title to or ownership of real property upon the
fulfillment of one or more stated conditions if the right to possession of the
property is transferred currently;

(ii)
The creation, transfer, or termination of a joint tenancy interest;

(iii)
The creation, transfer, or termination of a tenancy-in-common interest;

(iv)
The vesting of a right of possession or enjoyment of a remainder or
reversionary interest that occurs upon the termination of a life estate or
other similar precedent property interest;

(v)
An interest that vests in persons other than the trustor if a revocable trust
becomes irrevocable; and

(vi)
The transfer of stock of a cooperative housing corporation, vested with legal
title to real property, that conveys to the transferee the exclusive right to
occupancy and possession of the property or a portion of the property.

(c)
"Change of ownership" does not include:

(i)
A transfer between co‑owners that results in a change in the method of
holding title to the real property transferred without changing the proportional
interests of the co‑owners in the real property, such as a partition of a
tenancy in common;

(ii)
A transfer for the purpose of merely perfecting title to the real property;

(iii)
The creation, assignment, termination, or reconveyance of a security interest
in real property, or the substitution of a trustee under a security instrument;

(iv)
A transfer of real property by the trustor, or by the trustor's spouse, or by
both, into a trust for so long as the transferor is the sole present beneficiary
of the trust, or the trust is revocable, or any transfer of real property by a
trustee of such trust back to the trustor;

(v)
A transfer of real property by an instrument whose terms reserve to the
transferor an estate for years or an estate for life. However, the termination
of such an estate for years or life estate shall constitute a change of
ownership;

(vi)
A transfer of real property between or among the same parties for the purpose
of correcting or reforming a deed to express the true intention of the parties,
if the original relationship between the grantor and grantee is not changed; or

(vii)
An interspousal transfer of real property, including, but not limited to:

(A)
Transfers to a trustee for the beneficial use of a spouse, or the surviving
spouse of a deceased transferor, or by a trustee of the trust to the spouse of
the trustor;

(B)
Transfers that take effect upon the death of a spouse;

(C)
Transfers to a spouse or former spouse in connection with a property settlement
agreement or decree of dissolution of marriage or legal separation; and

(D)
The creation, transfer, or termination, solely between spouses, of any co‑owner's
interest.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An owner-occupied principal residence is exempt from regular property taxes on
the value of the property exceeding one-half percent of the property's adjusted
value, as determined under section 2 of this act.

(2)
The following specific conditions, as appropriate, must be satisfied by an
owner-occupant claiming exemption for an owner-occupied principal residence
under this section:

(a)
The residence must have been used by the person claiming exemption under this
section as a principal place of residence in the tax year in which the
exemption is to apply;

(b)
The claimant must notify the assessor in writing of the claimant's request for
exemption under this section for a claim of exemption to be considered valid.
The exemption is effective for taxes levied the following year; and

(c)
The person claiming exemption must have owned the property in fee, as a life
estate, or by contract a share in a cooperative housing association,
corporation, or partnership. A share in the ownership of the property in fee,
as a life estate, or by contract in a cooperative housing association,
corporation, or partnership representing a marital community or owned by
cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each spouse or cotenant, and any lease
for life shall be deemed a life estate.

(3)
Confinement of the claimant to a hospital or nursing home does not disqualify
the claim of exemption if:

(a)
The residence is temporarily unoccupied;

(b)
The residence is occupied by a person who is a spouse or a person financially
dependent on the claimant for support; or

(c)
The residence is rented for the specific purpose of paying nursing home or
hospital costs.

(4)
A person who is displaced from a principal residence may transfer a claimed
exemption status to a similar replacement residence.

(5)
A claimed exemption continues annually until a change of ownership of the
affected property, or until rescinded by the claimant.

(6)
A claimant may not receive more than one active owner-occupant exemption at any
time. A new claim for an exemption invalidates any prior exemption.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 84.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The assessed value of real property equals its adjusted value.

(2)
The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act applies to taxes levied for collection in 2001 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Funds
accumulated due to implementation of chapter 2, Laws of 1994 may be used to
offset the effects of implementation of this act.

---
END ---