BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.13.010 and 1994 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All state, county, city, town, and district general elections for the election
of federal, state, legislative, judicial, county, city, town, district, and
precinct officers, and for the submission to the voters of the state, county,
city, town, or district of any measure for their adoption and approval or
rejection, shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of
November, in the year in which they may be called. A state-wide general
election shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November
of each year: PROVIDED, That the state-wide general election held in
odd-numbered years shall be limited to (a) city, town, and district general
elections as provided for in RCW 29.13.020, or as otherwise provided by law;
(b) the election of federal officers for the remainder of any unexpired terms
in the membership of either branch of the congress of the United States; (c)
the election of state and county officers for the remainder of any unexpired
terms of offices created by or whose duties are described in Article II,
section 15, Article III, sections 16, 17, 19, 20, 21, 22, and 23, and Article
IV, sections 3 and 5 of the state Constitution and RCW 2.06.080; (d) the
election of county officers in any county governed by a charter containing
provisions calling for general county elections at this time; and (e) the
approval or rejection of state measures, including proposed constitutional
amendments, matters pertaining to any proposed constitutional convention,
initiative measures and referendum measures proposed by the electorate,
referendum bills, and any other matter provided by the legislature for
submission to the electorate.

(2)
A county legislative authority may, if it deems an emergency to exist, call a
special county election by presenting a resolution to the county auditor at
least forty-five days prior to the proposed election date. Except as provided
in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, a special election
called by the county legislative authority shall be held on one of the
following dates as decided by such governing body:

(a)
The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;

(b)
The second Tuesday in March;

(c)
The fourth Tuesday in April;

(d)
The third Tuesday in May;

(e)
The day of the primary as specified by RCW 29.13.070; or

(f)
The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.

(3)
In addition to the dates set forth in subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this
section, a special election to validate an excess levy or bond issue may be
called at any time to meet the needs resulting from fire, flood, earthquake, or
other act of God. Such county special election shall be noticed and conducted
in the manner provided by law.

(4)
If a special election is conducted in February, March, April, or May under
this chapter, the date on which any other special election may be called by the
county legislative authority under subsection (2) of this section during the
month of that special election including the two weeks before or the three
weeks after the month of that special election is the date of that special
election.

(5)
In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference primary is
conducted in February, March, April, or May under chapter 29.19 RCW, the date
on which a special election may be called by the county legislative authority
under subsection (2) of this section during the month of that primary including
the two weeks before or the three weeks after the month of that primary is
the date of the presidential primary.

(((5))) (6) This section shall supersede the
provisions of any and all other statutes, whether general or special in nature,
having different dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose
of this section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections except
for those elections held pursuant to a home-rule charter adopted under Article
XI, section 4 of the state Constitution. This section shall not be construed
as fixing the time for holding primary elections, or elections for the recall
of any elective public officer.

---
END ---