BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds there has been a sizeable increase in the number of stocks
of salmonids originating in Washington waters that have recently been declared
as threatened or endangered by federal agencies under the federal endangered
species act. Unlike most species that have been placed on the federal
endangered species act, salmonids continue to be allowed to be harvested as a
sport, for commercial purposes, and for tribal commercial, ceremonial, and
subsistence purposes. Such harvests occur throughout the waters of many
different governmental jurisdictions, each of whom has an interest in
maintaining its share of the catch. The legislature finds that there is
tension between preserving and restoring listed stocks and the ability to
maintain acceptable levels of harvest in a mixed stock fishery, which results
in direct and incidental harvest of these listed stocks of fish.

The
legislature finds that generally fish reared in hatcheries can sustain a higher
rate of harvest than fish that rely on natural spawning. Fish hatcheries have
been used, for nearly a century in some regions, as a way to augment the number
of salmonids available for harvest. Hatcheries have been used for increasing
production when there is insufficient escapement to natural spawning grounds
and for mitigation for loss of natural habitat. Because of the extensive use
of hatcheries by numerous entities throughout the state for decades, it is
frequently difficult to distinguish on a scientific basis between aboriginal
native stocks, current natural reproducing stocks, and hatchery stocks some of
which are native and other that have been introduced from other areas. Information
derived from fish marking programs indicate the amount of straying and
intermixing of fish from one watershed with fish in another has been occurring
for decades. The extent to which these various fish stocks may have
intermixed, as compared to remaining separate and distinct stocks, is not well
understood by the various interests that are affected by the consequences of
various recovery strategies for listed stocks.

The
legislature finds that several hundreds of millions of public and private moneys
have been spent and likely more will be expended to restore listed stocks of
anadromous salmonids. Mechanisms that assure adequate protection of listed
stocks from the impacts of harvest need to be established to assure that
restoration efforts will be productive and long lasting. Further, that
establishment of such mechanisms are needed to enhance public confidence that
these public and private expenditures will not go forward without close
monitoring and periodic reporting of verifiable progress.

The
purpose of this act is to establish policies and strategies necessary to assure
that stocks that have been listed under the federal endangered species act will
be protected from overharvest and restored, while maintaining to the extent
possible, the continued harvest of stocks from watersheds with abundant
populations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Each year the department shall identify each anadromous salmonid stock that has
been listed as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species
act. For each of these identified stocks, the department shall report the
best available estimates of the following:

(a)
The run size of adult fish available for harvest within the stock's migratory
range and for spawning escapement;

(b)
The rate of harvest-induced mortality in the waters of each state and province
through which the fish migrate and a delineation of the rate by sports,
nontribal commercial, and tribal harvest. Harvest induced mortality shall
include such sources as by-catch and hook mortality;

(c)
The total cumulative rate and number of harvest-induced mortality for each
listed stock;

(d)
The minimum escapement goal that would be necessary to remove the stock from
its endangered or threatened status;

(e)
The optimal escapement goal that would provide sufficient spawners to use the
available spawning and rearing habitat fully; and

(f)
The number of fish that escaped harvest and continue to migrate through state
waterways for spawning.

(2)
By December 1st of each year, the report shall be compiled. Reports for
ensuing years shall have a consistent and well-summarized format to allow for
comparability between years to determine the rate of change and whether success
is being attained. The report shall be transmitted to the governor, the
secretary of the senate, and to the chief clerk of the house of
representatives. Copies of the report shall be available to the public upon
request at no charge.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The legislature finds that the methods by which salmonids are currently
propagated in waters of the state evolved over many decades are too complex to
be instantly replaced without also placing the fisheries resource, dependent
and affected communities, and the state's economy at unnecessary risk. The
state, and public and private entities approved by the state, have made
considerable investments in facilities to propagate salmonids and have been done
voluntarily or to fulfill mitigation requirements. The legislature finds that
federal fishery agencies are mandating that major modifications be implemented
immediately without a thorough analysis of the impacts, an evaluation of less
impacting alternatives, or documentation of the anticipated impacts. The
legislature finds there are questions as to whether federal agencies have based
their policies on only one of a number of possible interpretations of federal
law. The legislature finds that the state's fishery resource, dependent and
affected communities, and the state's economy could be unnecessarily and
permanently harmed by overly precipitous federal action.

(2)
Until June 30, 2002, to the extent not inconsistent with federal law, there
shall be a moratorium placed on implementation of orders issued by federal
fishery agencies that do not comply with the provisions of section 4 of this
act. During the period the moratorium is in effect, representatives of the
executive and the legislative branches of the state of Washington shall consult
with their counterparts in the states of Oregon, Idaho, and Montana and
involved federal fishery agencies, to examine the basis for federal policies
that order destruction of significant populations of salmonids and their eggs
and sperm, and to evaluate alternatives that have less impact to the salmonid
resource, to dependent and affected communities, and to each state's economy.

(3)
By December 15, 2001, the department of fish and wildlife shall submit a report
that provides a list of the alternative policies that were considered together
with the estimated impact of each alternative to the fishery resource, to
dependent and affected communities, and to Washington's economy. The report
shall be submitted to the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the
secretary of the senate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

To
the extent not inconsistent with federal law, all fish reared in state-funded
hatcheries and fish reared in mitigation hatcheries approved by the department
under RCW 75.20.090 (as recodified by section 129, chapter 107, Laws of 2000),
surplus of the operational needs of the hatchery, shall be allowed to continue to
spawn under natural conditions and the eggs and sperm from those fish shall not
be destroyed pursuant to orders or other requirements of the federal government
unless:

(1)
The order from the federal agency is in writing and is signed by the
appropriate federal official;

(2)
The order has provided clear directions to assure that stocks of fish listed as
threatened or endangered will not be accidentally or intentionally directed to
be killed and that execution of such order will not constitute a violation of
the prohibition on take included in the federal endangered species act;

(3)
The federal agency order cites the specific federal regulation that contains
criteria as to how various stocks of fish are to be distinguished from one
another and that surplus hatchery fish, including their eggs and sperm must be
destroyed;

(4)
The basis for the order is genetic testing of scales or other parts of fish
that allows accurate placement of stocks of fish into distinct categories;

(5)
Surplus hatchery-reared fish have been verified to be genetically different
than the naturally spawning fish;

(6)
The stock differentiation is based on sound science and has been subjected to
peer review that includes at least three scientists with a high degree of
expertise in fish genetics chosen by the department chairs of two state
universities' fishery programs. The peer review panel shall write a written
report of the findings and conclusions;

(7)
The number of fish in the population is of an adequate number to adequately
restore the run without hatchery augmentation;

(8)
The evaluation of fish stocks includes an estimate of the extent that various
stocks have strayed and the number of years that said stocks have strayed; and

(9)
The extent that indigenous stocks have intermixed with other indigenous stocks
or with other hatchery stocks.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) A
study shall be conducted on ways to increase the returns of stocks of
anadromous fish listed as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered
species act. The goal of the study is to better manage fish harvesting
activities and to improve the selectivity of fishing methods to increase
returns of stocks with low numbers while allowing the continued harvest of
abundant stocks. The study shall consider all the various methods of allowing
improved harvest management and selective harvest strategies and associated
harvest gear that can serve as an alternative to a full conservation closure
that would restrict all fishing activity, including those that have a very
small impact on listed stocks.

(2)
In conducting the study, the department of fish and wildlife may form an
advisory committee that includes representatives of major fishing groups and
entities with expertise in the topics.

(3)
The results of the study shall be included in a report to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
state fish and wildlife commission shall establish escapement goals for each
stock of anadromous salmonids that has been listed as threatened or endangered
under the federal endangered species act. For each stock there shall be two
types of escapement goals: A minimum escapement goal that when reached would
qualify the particular stock of fish for removal from the federal listing; and
a optimal escapement goal that would allow sufficient fish to fully use the
habitat that is currently available.

For
each stock of fish that does not meet the minimum escapement goal, the
commission shall provide for the management of the harvest so that spawning
escapement levels are increased by equal amounts in each of the subsequent two
life cycles so that the minimum escapement goals are fully achieved and
maintained. Progress toward reaching these milestones shall be included in the
report required under section 2 of this act.

Sec.
7. RCW
75.08.012 (as recodified by 2000 c 107 s 126) and 2000 c 107 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:

Wildlife,
fish, and shellfish are the property of the state. The commission, director,
and the department shall preserve, protect, perpetuate, and manage the wildlife
and food fish, game fish, and shellfish in state waters and offshore waters.

The
department shall conserve the wildlife and food fish, game fish, and shellfish
resources in a manner that does not impair the resource. In a manner
consistent with this goal, the department shall seek to maintain the economic
well-being and stability of the fishing industry in the state. The department
shall promote orderly fisheries and shall enhance and improve recreational and
commercial fishing in this state. In carrying out this policy, the
department shall take action to assure that sufficient escapement of stocks of
anadromous salmonids listed under the federal endangered species act is
achieved consistent with section 6 of this act.

The
commission may authorize the taking of wildlife, food fish, game fish, and
shellfish only at times or places, or in manners or quantities, as in the
judgment of the commission does not impair the supply of these resources.

The
commission shall attempt to maximize the public recreational game fishing and
hunting opportunities of all citizens, including juvenile, disabled, and senior
citizens.

Recognizing
that the management of our state wildlife, food fish, game fish, and shellfish
resources depends heavily on the assistance of volunteers, the department shall
work cooperatively with volunteer groups and individuals to achieve the goals
of this title to the greatest extent possible.

Nothing
in this title shall be construed to infringe on the right of a private property
owner to control the owner's private property.

Sec.
8. RCW
77.04.055 and 2000 c 107 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In establishing policies to preserve, protect, and perpetuate wildlife, fish,
and wildlife and fish habitat, the commission shall meet annually with the
governor to:

(a)
Review and prescribe basic goals and objectives related to those policies; and

(b)
Review the performance of the department in implementing fish and wildlife
policies.

The
commission shall maximize fishing, hunting, and outdoor recreational opportunities
compatible with healthy and diverse fish and wildlife populations. In
carrying out this policy, the commission shall take action to assure that
sufficient escapement of stocks of anadromous salmonids listed under the
federal endangered species act is achieved consistent with section 6 of this
act.

(2)
The commission shall establish hunting, trapping, and fishing seasons and
prescribe the time, place, manner, and methods that may be used to harvest or
enjoy game fish and wildlife.

(3)
The commission shall establish provisions regulating food fish and shellfish as
provided in RCW 75.08.080 (as recodified by section 127, chapter 107, Laws
of 2000).

(4)
The commission shall have final approval authority for tribal, interstate,
international, and any other department agreements relating to fish and
wildlife.

(5)
The commission shall adopt rules to implement the state's fish and wildlife
laws.

(6)
The commission shall have final approval authority for the department's budget
proposals.

(7)
The commission shall select its own staff and shall appoint the director of the
department. The director and commission staff shall serve at the pleasure of
the commission.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
Sections 1, 2, and 5 through 8 of this act are necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions, and take effect June 8, 2000.

(2)
Sections 3 and 4 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of
the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---