BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the size of the current backlog of applications relating
to existing water rights should be reduced. By this act, the legislature
intends to allow pending applications relating to existing water rights to be
processed independently of pending applications for new water rights and
without regard to possible impairment of pending applications for new water
rights. The legislature intends, however, that timely processing of all water
rights applications for the same source of supply in the order in which they
were filed should occur to the extent allowed by funding appropriated to the
department of ecology.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.03.380 and 1997 c 442 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The right to the use of water which has been applied to a beneficial use in the
state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land or place upon which the same
is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the right may be transferred to another or to
others and become appurtenant to any other land or place of use without loss of
priority of right theretofore established if such change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for beneficial
use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in the place of use, point of
diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water right to enable irrigation of
additional acreage or the addition of new uses may be permitted if such change
results in no increase in the annual consumptive quantity of water used under
the water right. For purposes of this section, "annual consumptive
quantity" means the estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted
pursuant to the water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return
flows, averaged over the most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial
use of the water right. Before any transfer of such right to use water or change
of the point of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any
person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a written
application therefor with the department, and the application shall not be
granted until notice of the application is published as provided in RCW
90.03.280. If it shall appear that such transfer or such change may be made
without injury or detriment to existing rights, the department shall issue to
the applicant a certificate in duplicate granting the right for such transfer
or for such change of point of diversion or of use. The certificate so issued
shall be filed and be made a record with the department and the duplicate
certificate issued to the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in
like manner and with the same effect as provided in the original certificate or
permit to divert water.

(2)
If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights from one
irrigation district to another, the department shall, before publication of
notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such
transfer or change will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to
other landowners or impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(3)
A change in place of use by an individual water user or users of water provided
by an irrigation district need only receive approval for the change from the
board of directors of the district if the use of water continues within the
irrigation district, and when water is provided by an irrigation entity that is
a member of a board of joint control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval
need only be received from the board of joint control if the use of water
continues within the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights.

(4)
This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by the state
through the funding of water conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or
RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.

(5)
For purposes of this section, existing rights shall not include pending
applications for new water rights.

(6)
Applications relating to existing water rights may be processed and decisions
on them rendered independently of processing and rendering decisions on pending
applications for new water rights within the same source of supply without
regard to the date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.

(7)
Notwithstanding any other processing procedure for applications relating to
existing water rights, an application may be processed ahead of a previously
filed application, when sufficient information for a decision on the previously
filed application is not available and the applicant for the previously filed
application is sent written notice that explains what information is not
available and why and informs the applicant that processing of the next
application in order of filing will begin. No such previously filed
application shall lose its priority date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter authorizes the processing of applications relating to existing
water rights to stop the processing of applications for new water rights.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall report to the legislature in July and January of each year
regarding the numbers, types, and locations of applications for water rights
processed during the preceding six months. The report submitted each July
shall also address applications to be processed during the ensuing year. The
report shall include applications filed under chapter 90.80 RCW, shall note applications
with priority processing and the basis for priority, and shall note
applications relating to water rights issued under chapter 90.66 RCW. This
section expires February 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW to read as follows:

Sections
1 through 4 of this act apply to applications filed under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

The
existing water rights account is created in the state treasury. Moneys may be
placed in the account from legislative appropriations and transfers, federal
appropriations, or any other lawful source. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used solely to
process and render decisions on applications relating to existing water rights
filed under chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW, where the applications with
sufficient information for processing within the same source of supply are
processed in the order in which the applications were filed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
sum of 1.1 million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund to the existing water rights account for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, to carry out the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---