BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.04.055 and 1986 c 167 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

At
any ((election, general or)) special election((,)) or ((at
any)) primary, the county auditor may combine, unite, or divide precincts
and may combine or unite election boards for the purpose of holding such
election. At any general election, the county auditor may combine or unite
election boards for the purpose of holding such election, but shall report all
election returns by individual precinct.

Sec.
2. RCW
29.62.090 and 1999 c 298 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((Immediately after the official results of a state primary or general
election in a county are ascertained)) After the primary, the county
auditor or other election officer shall make an abstract of the number of
registered voters in each precinct and of all the votes cast in the county at
such ((state)) primary ((or general election)) for and against each
state ((measures)) measure and for each candidate or nominee
for federal, state, and legislative office ((or)), and for any
other office which the secretary of state is required by law to canvass. Absentee
ballot results may be incorporated into results from ballots cast at the polls
or may be reported separately. The abstract shall be entered on blanks
furnished by the secretary of state or on compatible computer printouts
approved by the secretary of state, and transmitted to the secretary of state
no later than the next business day following the certification by the county
canvassing board.

(2)
After each general election, the county auditor or other election officer shall
((provide to the secretary of state a report)) make an abstract
of the number of registered voters and all ((absentee ballots)) the
votes cast in each precinct at such general election for and against
each state ((measures)) measure and for each candidate or
nominee for federal, state, and legislative office ((or)), and
for any other office which the secretary of state is required by law to
canvass. ((The report may be included in the abstract required by this
section or may be transmitted to the secretary of state separately, but in no event
later than March 31 of the year following the election.)) Absentee ballot
results may be incorporated into ((votes)) results from ballots
cast at the polls for each precinct or may be reported separately on a
precinct-by-precinct basis. The abstract shall be entered on blanks
furnished by the secretary of state or on compatible computer printouts
approved by the secretary of state, and transmitted to the secretary of state
no later than the next business day following the certification by the county canvassing
board.

(3) ((If)) For absentee ballots ((results
are not incorporated into votes)) and for ballots cast at the polls,
the county auditor or other election official may aggregate results from more
than one precinct if the auditor, pursuant to rules adopted by the secretary of
state, finds that reporting a single precinct's ((absentee)) ballot
results would jeopardize the secrecy of a person's ballot. To the extent
practicable, precincts for which ((absentee)) results are aggregated
shall be contiguous.

---
END ---