BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW to read as follows:

The
joint legislative audit and review committee, the legislative transportation
committee, the joint committee on pension policy, the legislative evaluation
and accountability program committee, and the joint legislative systems
committee shall be subject to such operational policies, procedures, and
oversight as are deemed necessary by the facilities and operations committee of
the senate and the executive rules committee of the house of representatives to
ensure operational consistency among the agencies of the legislative branch.
As used in this section, "operational policies, procedures, and
oversight" includes the development of biennial budgets, personnel policies
and compensation plans, facilities, contracts, and expenditures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW to read as follows:

The
administration of the joint legislative audit and review committee shall be
subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec.
3. RCW
44.28.060 and 1996 c 288 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
members of the joint committee shall form an executive committee consisting of
one member from each of the four major political caucuses, which shall include
a chair and a vice-chair. The chair and vice-chair shall serve for a period
not to exceed two years. The chair and the vice-chair may not be members of
the same political party. The chair shall alternate between the members of the
majority parties in the senate and the house of representatives.

Subject
to section 1 of this act, the executive committee is responsible for
performing all general administrative and personnel duties assigned to it in
the rules and procedures adopted by the joint committee, as well as other
duties delegated to it by the joint committee. The executive committee shall recommend
applicants for the position of the legislative auditor to the membership of the
joint committee. The legislative auditor shall be hired with the approval of a
majority of the membership of the joint committee. Subject to section 1 of
this act, the executive committee shall set the salary of the legislative
auditor.

The
joint committee shall adopt rules and procedures for its orderly operation.
The joint committee may create subcommittees to perform duties under this
chapter.

Sec.
4. RCW
44.28.065 and 1996 c 288 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject
to section 1 of this act, the legislative auditor shall:

(1)
Establish and manage the office of the joint legislative audit and review
committee to carry out the functions of this chapter;

(2)
Direct the audit and review functions described in this chapter and ensure that
performance audits are performed in accordance with the "Government
Auditing Standards" published by the comptroller general of the United
States as applicable to the scope of the audit;

(3)
Make findings and recommendations to the joint committee and under its
direction to the committees of the state legislature concerning the
organization and operation of state agencies and the expenditure of state funds
by units of local government;

(4)
In consultation with and with the approval of the executive committee, hire
staff necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Employee salaries,
other than the legislative auditor, shall be set by the legislative auditor
with the approval of the executive committee;

(5)
Assist the several standing committees of the house and senate in consideration
of legislation affecting state departments and their efficiency; appear before
other legislative committees; and assist any other legislative committee upon
instruction by the joint legislative audit and review committee;

(6)
Provide the legislature with information obtained under the direction of the
joint legislative audit and review committee;

(7)
Maintain a record of all work performed by the legislative auditor under the
direction of the joint legislative audit and review committee and keep and make
available all documents, data, and reports submitted to the legislative auditor
by any legislative committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 44.40 RCW to read as follows:

The
administration of the legislative transportation committee shall be subject to
section 1 of this act.

Sec.
6. RCW
44.40.015 and 1999 sp.s. c 1 s 617 are each amended to read as follows:

The
members of the legislative transportation committee shall form an executive
committee consisting of two members from each of the four major political
caucuses, which will include the chair and vice-chair of the legislative
transportation committee. There will be four alternates to the executive
committee, one from each of the four major political caucuses. Each alternate
may represent a member from the same political caucus from which they were
chosen when that member is absent, and have voting privileges during that
absence.

Subject
to section 1 of this act, the executive committee is responsible for
performing all general administrative and personnel duties assigned to it in
the rules and procedures adopted by the committee, determining the number of
legislative transportation committee staff, and other duties delegated to it by
the committee. Except when those responsibilities are assumed by the
legislative transportation committee, the executive committee is responsible
for adopting interim work plans and meeting schedules, approving all contracts
signed on behalf of the committee, and setting policies for legislative
transportation ((commitee [committee])) committee staff
utilization.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 44.44 RCW to read as follows:

The
administration of the joint committee on pension policy shall be subject to
section 1 of this act.

Sec.
8. RCW
44.44.030 and 1987 c 25 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to section 1 of this act, the state actuary shall have the
authority to select and employ such research, technical, clerical personnel,
and consultants as the actuary deems necessary, whose salaries shall be fixed by
the actuary and approved by the joint committee on pension policy, and who
shall be exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law, chapter
41.06 RCW.

(2)
All actuarial valuations and experience studies performed by the office of the
state actuary shall be signed by a member of the American academy of
actuaries. If the state actuary is not such a member, the state actuary, after
approval by the committee, shall contract for a period not to exceed two years
with a member of the American academy of actuaries to assist in developing
actuarial valuations and experience studies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 44.48 RCW to read as follows:

The
administration of the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee shall be subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec.
10. RCW
44.48.010 and 1980 c 87 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby created a legislative evaluation and accountability program committee
which shall consist of four senators and four representatives from the
legislature and shall be chosen from among the chairs, vice-chairs, and
ranking minority members of the legislative fiscal committees. The senate
members of the committee shall be appointed by the president of the senate and
the house members of the committee shall be appointed by the speaker of the
house. Not more than two members from each house shall be from the same
political party. All members shall be appointed ((before the close of the
1977 session of the legislature and)) before the close of each regular
session during an odd-numbered year ((thereafter)). Members shall be
subject to confirmation, as to the senate members by the senate, and as to the
house members by the house.

Sec.
11. RCW
44.48.120 and 1977 ex.s. c 373 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
committee is hereby authorized and empowered to appoint an officer to be known
as the LEAP administrator who shall be the executive officer of the committee
and assist in its duties and shall compile information for the committee.

Subject
to section 1 of this act, the committee is hereby authorized and empowered
to select and employ temporary and permanent personnel and fix their salaries.

The
duties of the administrator shall be as follows:

(1)
To manage the LEAP operations.

(2)
To assist the several standing committees of the house and senate; to appear
before other legislative committees; and to assist any other legislative
committee upon instruction by the committee.

(3)
To provide the legislature with information obtained under the direction of the
committee.

(4)
To maintain a record of all work performed by the administrator under the
direction of the committee and to keep and make available all documents, data,
and reports submitted to the administrator by any legislative committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. A
new section is added to chapter 44.68 RCW to read as follows:

The
administration of the joint legislative systems committee shall be subject to
section 1 of this act.

Sec.
13. RCW
44.68.040 and 1986 c 61 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject
to section 1 of this act:

(1)
The systems committee, after consultation with the administrative committee,
shall employ a legislative systems coordinator. The coordinator shall serve at
the pleasure of the systems committee, which shall fix the coordinator's
salary.

(2)
The coordinator shall serve as the executive and administrative head of the
center, and shall assist the administrative committee in managing the
information processing and communications systems of the legislature as
directed by the administrative committee.

Sec.
14. RCW
44.68.050 and 1986 c 61 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
administrative committee shall, subject to the approval of the systems
committee and subject to section 1 of this act:

(1)
Adopt policies, procedures, and standards regarding the information processing
and communications systems of the legislature;

(2)
Establish appropriate charges for services, equipment, and publications
provided by the legislative information processing and communications systems,
applicable to legislative and nonlegislative users as determined by the
administrative committee;

(3)
Employ or engage and fix the compensation for personnel required to carry out
the purposes of this chapter;

(4)
Enter into contracts for (a) the sale, exchange, or acquisition of equipment,
supplies, services, and facilities required to carry out the purposes of this
chapter and (b) the distribution of legislative information;

(5) Generally assist the systems committee in carrying out its
responsibilities under this chapter, as directed by the systems committee.

---
END ---