BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 19.86 RCW to read as follows:

It is unlawful for a "seller," as defined in RCW
82.08.010, to label an amount as a "tip" or "gratuity" when
that amount is not a genuine voluntary payment by a buyer in connection with a
retail sale. For the purposes of this section, a payment of an amount by a
buyer is voluntary if the product or service that is the subject of the
transaction is made available by the seller to the buyer at the same price with
or without the payment of the amount labeled "tip" or
"gratuity." A written computation of a suggested or customary tip or
gratuity supplied by the seller as a convenience to the buyer does not by
itself convert an otherwise voluntary payment by the buyer to a required
payment. A violation of this section is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or
commerce and is a violation of this chapter.

---
END ---