BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature hereby establishes a pilot project for purposes of evaluating means
of reducing the current backlog of applications for changes, transfers, or
amendments of existing water rights. For the purposes of this pilot project,
the legislature intends to allow the processing of applications for such
changes, transfers, or amendments without regard to possible impairment of
pending applications for new water rights in specific watersheds. While the
legislature intends to assist the processing of such changes, transfers, and
amendments, it does not intend to divert the department of ecology's efforts or
in any other way deter the processing of applications for new water rights.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department may process and render decisions on an application for change
independently from processing and making decisions on pending applications for
new water rights from the same water source without regard to the dates on
which the applications for the new rights were filed.

(2)
Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled to protection from
impairment or given priority for any available water if the department or a
water conservancy board processes an application for change from the same water
source. New water rights issued after an application for change is approved
from the same water source are not entitled to protection from impairment or
priority for any available water in relation to the changed, transferred, or
amended water right regardless of the dates on which the applications were
filed with the department or the board.

(3)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Change of a water right" or "change" means a change or
transfer of a water right referred to in RCW 90.03.380 or 90.03.390 or an
amendment referred to in RCW 90.44.100 or 90.44.105;

(b)
"Water conservancy board" or "board" means a water
conservancy board created under chapter 90.80 RCW; and

(c)
"WRIA" means a water resource inventory area established in chapter
173-500 WAC as it existed on January 1, 2000.

(4)
This section applies only in WRIA's 13, 23, 45, 46, 48, and 49.

(5)
The department shall report to the legislature by January 1, 2001, and by June
30, 2001, on the results of the pilot project.

(6) This section expires June 30, 2001.

---
END ---