BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A health carrier offering a dental only plan may not deny coverage for treatment of emergency dental conditions that would otherwise be considered a covered service of an existing benefit contract on the basis that the services were provided on the same day the covered person was examined and diagnosed for the emergency dental condition.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Emergency dental condition" means a dental condition manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity, including severe pain or infection such that a prudent layperson, who possesses an average knowledge of health and dentistry, could reasonably expect the absence of immediate dental attention to result in:

(i) Placing the health of the individual, or with respect to a pregnant woman the health of the woman or her unborn child, in serious jeopardy;

(ii) Serious impairment to bodily functions; or

(iii) Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part.

(b) "Health carrier," in addition to the definition in RCW 48.43.005, also includes health care service contractors, limited health care service contractors, and disability insurers offering dental only coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each health carrier offering a dental only plan shall submit to the commissioner on or before April 1st of each year as part of the additional data statement or as a supplemental data statement the following information for the preceding year that is derived from the carrier's annual statement, including the exhibit of premiums, enrollments, and utilization for the company at an aggregate level and the additional data to the annual statement:

(a) The total number of dental members;

(b) The total amount of dental revenue;

(c) The total amount of dental payments;

(d) The dental loss ratio that is computed by dividing the total amount of dental payments by the total amount of dental revenues;

(e) The average amount of premiums per member per month; and

(f) The percentage change in the average premium per member per month, measured from the previous year.

(2) A carrier shall electronically submit the information described in subsection (1) of this section in a format and according to instructions prescribed by the commissioner.

(3) The commissioner shall make the information reported under this section available to the public in a format that allows comparison among carriers through a searchable public web site on the internet.

(4) For the purposes of licensed disability insurers and health care service contractors, the commissioner shall work collaboratively with insurers to develop an additional or supplemental data statement that utilizes to the maximum extent possible information from the annual statement forms that are currently filed by these entities.

(5) For purposes of this section, "health carrier," in addition to the definition in RCW 48.43.005, also includes health care service contractors, limited health care service contractors, and disability insurers offering dental only coverage.

(6) Nothing in this section is intended to establish a minimum dental loss ratio.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect January 1, 2017.

--- END ---