BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The Washington state school directors' association shall develop a model policy addressing restoration of the safe learning environment disrupted by natural disaster impacts to school district infrastructures.

(2) In developing the model policy, the school directors' association may consult with various stakeholders, including the appropriate resources within the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington emergency management division of the state military department, risk management entities that work with school districts, nonprofit experts in disaster recovery, educational service districts, and school districts affected by natural disasters.

(3) The model policy must:

(a) Take into consideration any guidance on infrastructure recovery developed by the federal emergency management agency and the Washington emergency management division;

(b) Include an infrastructure recovery checklist that a school impacted by a natural disaster can use to restore its essential physical and organizational structures, services, and facilities;

(c) List the offices or divisions of state agencies that school districts may contact for assistance with infrastructure recovery after a natural disaster; and

(d) List examples of state and federal emergency funding sources for which school districts impacted by a natural disaster have qualified.

(4) By August 31, 2017, the school directors' association shall distribute the model policy to the school districts, with encouragement to adopt the model policy locally and review the safe school plan.

(5) This section expires September 1, 2017.

--- END ---