BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.02.045 and 2014 c 223 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Third-party payors shall not release health care information disclosed under this chapter, except as required by chapter 43.371 RCW and to the extent that health care providers are authorized to do so under ((RCW 70.02.050))this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---