BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.94.544 and 2008 c 68 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The requirements of this section and RCW 19.94.540 and 19.94.542 shall not apply to the sale of a motor vehicle that contains engine coolant or antifreeze ((or to wholesale containers of fifty-five gallons or more of engine coolant or antifreeze)).

--- END ---