BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the legislature's intent to protect an individual acting as a guardian ad litem from harm. The nature of the situation that compels a court to appoint a guardian ad litem may pose a danger to the guardian ad litem and his or her family. This act represents a commitment to safeguard the personal information of a guardian ad litem to further ensure his or her safety and the safety of his or her family.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW to read as follows:

The following information regarding a guardian ad litem governed under chapter 11.88, 13.34, or 26.12 RCW is exempt from disclosure under this chapter and must be automatically withheld from public inspection and copying unless the guardian ad litem specifically requests the information be released:

(1) Current residential address;

(2) Current telephone number; and

(3) All other identifying information that may be used to harm a guardian ad litem.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Nothing in section 1 of this act creates any right or cause of action or adds to any existing right or cause of action nor may section 1 of this act be relied upon to compel the establishment of any program or special entitlement.

--- END ---