BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.15.624 and 2013 c 67 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in the 2013-14 academic year, institutions of higher education that offer an early course registration period for any segment of the student population must have a process in place to offer students who are eligible veterans or national guard members early course registration as follows:

(a) New students who are eligible veterans or national guard members and who have completed all of their admission processes must be offered an early course registration period; and

(b) Continuing and returning former students who are eligible veterans or national guard members and who have met current enrollment requirements must be offered early course registration among continuing students with the same level of class standing or credit as determined by the attending institution and according to institutional policies.

(2) ((For the purposes of this section)) Beginning in the 2015-16 academic year, the early course registration process available for eligible veterans or national guard members in subsection (1) of this section must be offered to spouses receiving veteran education benefits.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "eligible veterans or national guard members" has the definition in RCW 28B.15.621.

(((3))) (4) This section expires August 1, 2022.

--- END ---