BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.12.026 and 2003 c 363 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In establishing the prevailing rate of wage under RCW 39.12.010, 39.12.015, and 39.12.020, all data collected by the department may be used only in the county for which the work was performed.

(2) This section applies only to prevailing wage surveys initiated on or after August 1, 2003.

(3) The department shall keep track of the number of wage surveys the department sends and the number of responses the department receives, for each of the following categories:

(a) Individual contractors;

(b) Employers that directly employ and supervise workers as employees in building service maintenance, in shipbuilding or ship repair, in the manufacture of nonstandard items produced for public works projects, and in the production and delivery of gravel, concrete, asphalt, crushed rock, sand, and other similar materials;

(c) Labor unions submitting wage and hour data on behalf of contractors and employers who are signatory to the unions' collective bargaining agreements covering the surveyed trade or occupation; and

(d) Interested parties providing wage and hour data by trade and occupation from certified payroll records or from hours reported on affidavits of wages paid.

--- END ---