BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.12.026 and 2003 c 363 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In establishing the prevailing rate of wage under RCW 39.12.010, 39.12.015, and 39.12.020, all data collected by the department may be used only in the county for which the work was performed.

(2) ((This section applies only to prevailing wage surveys initiated on or after August 1, 2003.))When an interested party submits a wage survey form on behalf of a contractor or employer and the contractor or employer has not signed the survey form, the department shall send a copy of the form to the contractor or employer whose hours and wages are included in the survey form and notify the contractor or employer of the following:

(a) If the contractor or employer does not dispute the accuracy of the data on the form, the contractor or employer need not respond to the notification and no action is required on the part of the contractor or employer; and

(b) If the contractor or employer disputes the accuracy of the data on the form, the contractor or employer may notify the department of the dispute. If the contractor or employer intends to provide the department with certified payroll records, it must provide the records within thirty days of receiving the department's notice.

--- END ---