BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.600.290 and 2012 c 229 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the public baccalaureate institutions shall jointly develop and each adopt rules governing the college in the high school program. The association of Washington school principals shall be consulted during the rules development. The rules shall be written to encourage the maximum use of the program and may not narrow or limit the enrollment options.

(2) College in the high school programs shall each be governed by a local contract between the district and the institution of higher education, in compliance with the guidelines adopted by the superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the public baccalaureate institutions.

(3) The college in the high school program must include the provisions in this subsection.

(a) The high school and institution of higher education together shall define the criteria for student eligibility. The institution of higher education may charge tuition fees to participating students.

(b) School districts shall report no student for more than one full-time equivalent including college in the high school courses.

(c) The funds received by the institution of higher education may not be deemed tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the institution of higher education.

(d) Enrollment information on persons registered under this section must be maintained by the institution of higher education separately from other enrollment information and may not be included in official enrollment reports, nor may such persons be considered in any enrollment statistics that would affect higher education budgetary determinations.

(e) A school district must grant high school credit to a student enrolled in a program course if the student successfully completes the course. If no comparable course is offered by the school district, the school district superintendent shall determine how many credits to award for the course. The determination shall be made in writing before the student enrolls in the course. The credits shall be applied toward graduation requirements and subject area requirements. Evidence of successful completion of each program course shall be included in the student's secondary school records and transcript.

(f) An institution of higher education must grant college credit to a student enrolled in a program course if the student successfully completes the course. The college credit shall be applied toward general education requirements or major requirements. If no comparable course is offered by the college, the institution of higher education at which the teacher of the program course is employed shall determine how many credits to award for the course and whether the course fulfills general education or major requirements. Evidence of successful completion of each program course must be included in the student's college transcript.

(g) Tenth, eleventh, and twelfth grade students or students who have not yet received a high school diploma or its equivalent and are eligible to be in the tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade((s)) may participate in the college in the high school program.

(h) Participating school districts must provide general information about the college in the high school program to all students in grades ten, eleven, and twelve and to the parents and guardians of those students.

(i) Full-time and part-time faculty at institutions of higher education, including adjunct faculty, are eligible to teach program courses.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning in RCW 28B.10.016 and also includes a public tribal college located in Washington and accredited by the Northwest commission on colleges and universities or another accrediting association recognized by the United States department of education.

(b) "Program course" means a college course offered in a high school under the college in the high school program.

--- END ---