BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 86.15.055 and 2005 c 127 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In a zone with supervisors elected pursuant to RCW 86.15.050, the supervisors may, as adjusted in accordance with subsection (4) of this section, each receive up to ((seventy dollars for attendance at official meetings of the supervisors and for each day or major part thereof for all necessary services actually performed in connection with their duties as a supervisor))one hundred fourteen dollars per day or portion of a day spent in actual attendance at official meetings of the governing body or in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the zone. The compensation for supervisors in office on January 1, 2015, is fixed at one hundred fourteen dollars per day. The board of county commissioners shall fix any such compensation to be paid to the initial supervisors during their initial terms of office. The supervisors shall fix the compensation to be paid to the supervisors thereafter. Compensation for the supervisors shall not exceed ((six thousand seven hundred twenty))ten thousand nine hundred forty-four dollars in one calendar year.

(2) A supervisor is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection with performance of the duties of a supervisor, including subsistence and lodging, while away from the supervisor's place of residence, and mileage for use of a privately owned vehicle in accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW.

(3) Any supervisor may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the supervisors as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the member's election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

(4) The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning July 1, 2018, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state and including all items, must be used for the adjustments of inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

--- END ---