BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation. . . .$27,088,000

Disaster Response Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$59,764,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$86,852,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for disasters declared by the governor and may be spent only with the approval of the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$10,174,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .($2,459,000)

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$7,715,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount provided in this section is for increased costs of services for children and families, including supervised visitation and extended foster care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—MENTAL HEALTH DIVISION—COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$11,999,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The entire appropriation is provided solely to reimburse regional support networks for increased costs that are not covered under the Medicaid program and that are incurred in order to meet statutory obligations to provide individualized mental health treatment in appropriate settings to individuals who are detained or committed under the involuntary treatment act. Prior to distributing funds to a regional support network requesting reimbursement for costs relative to increased utilization, the department must receive adequate documentation of such increased utilization and costs.

(2) In addition to those authorized in section 204(1)(d), chapter 221, Laws of 2014, an additional 30 nonforensic beds per day are allocated for use by regional support networks at western state hospital.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—MENTAL HEALTH DIVISION—INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$8,621,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,425,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the startup and operation of a 30 bed civil ward at western state hospital.

(2) $450,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the startup and operation of a 15 bed forensic ward at western state hospital.

(3) $106,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to increase the number of staff providing competency evaluation services.

(4) $339,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the startup and operation of a psychiatric intensive care unit to provide specialized intensive care to assaultive patients from western and eastern state hospitals.

(5) $318,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to expand the use of psychiatric emergency response teams at western and eastern state hospitals.

(6) $459,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for assignment pay to improve recruitment and retention of psychiatrists at eastern and western state hospitals.

(7) $5,524,000 of the appropriation is provided for covering increased costs of operations at the state hospitals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—MENTAL HEALTH DIVISION—PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$535,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$115,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$650,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $335,000 of the general fund—state appropriation and the entire general fund—federal appropriation are provided solely for coordination of efforts to meet statutory obligations to provide individualized mental health treatment in appropriate settings to individuals who are detained or committed under the involuntary treatment act.

(2) $200,000 of the general fund—state appropriation is provided solely for increasing the number of community competency evaluations that can be done under chapter 284, Laws of 2013 (ESSB 5551).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Budget Stabilization Account Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . .$1,165,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$1,538,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,703,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely to protect water quality, prevent crop damage, and help landowners recover from losses sustained during the Carlton Complex fire.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Budget Stabilization Account Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . .$63,827,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$1,484,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$65,311,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for costs of emergency fire suppression. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Budget Stabilization Account Appropriation (FY 2015). . . .$771,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely to pay for emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation . . . .$14,298,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—FIRE CONTINGENCY

Budget Stabilization Account Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . .$14,298,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the disaster response account to be used for any Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT—DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT

Budget Stabilization Account Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . .$13,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the disaster response account for emergency disaster and fire suppression costs incurred by the military department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES DIVISION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . .$10,625,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$10,625,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$21,250,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely to fully satisfy the first amended supplemental judgment and order and second amended final judgment on jury verdict issued by the Thurston county superior court on September 5, 2014, in the case of Rekhter v. DSHS, cause no. 07-2-00895-8.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES—LONG-TERM CARE ADMINISTRATION

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . .$25,875,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation. . . .$25,875,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$51,750,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely to fully satisfy the first amended supplemental judgment and order and second amended final judgment on jury verdict issued by the Thurston county superior court on September 5, 2014, in the case of Rekhter v. DSHS, cause no. 07-2-00895-8.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL

In addition to the forecasts prepared and approved under RCW 82.33.010 and 82.33.020, no later than February 20, 2015, the supervisor of the economic and revenue forecast council must prepare and submit, and the council must approve, an official state economic and revenue forecast, along with optimistic and pessimistic unofficial forecasts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---