BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.04.050 and 2012 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The following named officers and persons, active or retired, are hereby authorized to solemnize marriages, to wit: Justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of the superior courts, supreme court commissioners, court of appeals commissioners, superior court commissioners, judges of courts of limited jurisdiction as defined in RCW 3.02.010, judges of tribal courts, and any regularly licensed or ordained minister or any priest, imam, rabbi, or similar official of any religious organization((, and judges of courts of limited jurisdiction as defined in RCW 3.02.010)). The solemnization of a marriage by a tribal court judge pursuant to authority under this section does not create tribal court jurisdiction and does not affect state court authority as otherwise provided by law to enter a judgment for purposes of any dissolution, legal separation, or other proceedingsrelated to the marriage that is binding on the parties and entitled to full faith and credit.

--- END ---