BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2017, out of the several funds specified in this act.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Fiscal year 2016" or "FY 2016" means the period beginning July 1, 2015, and ending June 30, 2016.

(b) "Fiscal year 2017" or "FY 2017" means the period beginning July 1, 2016, and ending June 30, 2017.

(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose.

(3) Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

(4) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2017-2019 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for the project or program in the future.

(5) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining on June 30, 2015, from the 2013-2015 biennial appropriations for each project.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

House of Representatives Interim Task Force on Washington Waters (91000002)

(1) The house of representatives finds that low water supply in portions of eastern Washington, catastrophic flood damage, and storm water runoff polluting state waterways have reached crisis levels, endangering the health and safety of our citizens and the environment.

(2) The house of representatives interim task force on Washington waters is established to build upon the foundation of Senate Bill No. 5628 that was introduced in the 2015 regular session and provided for storm water, flood control, and water supply infrastructure in the state. The objective of the task force is to prepare a report and draft legislation for consideration in the 2016 legislative session that:

(a) Quantifies the level of funding needed through fiscal year 2026 to address the three water priorities;

(b) Develops and recommends state funding options that address the three water priorities equally;

(c) Develops and recommends local funding options that generate revenues from municipal and agricultural beneficiaries;

(d) Develops and recommends criteria and mechanisms for managing, prioritizing and distributing the funding;

(e) Analyzes and reports on the metrics and variables associated with water market pricing, including the costs per acre-foot of water supply developed and delivered for irrigation; and

(f) Addresses other relevant issues as determined by the task force.

(3) The house of representatives interim task force on Washington waters must consist of ten members:

(a) Five members from the majority caucus appointed by the speaker of the house, including the chair of the capital budget committee; one member each from the appropriations, finance, and transportation committees; and one member at large; and

(b) Five members from the minority caucus appointed by the minority leader, including the ranking minority member of the capital budget committee; one member each from the appropriations, finance, and transportation committees; and one member at large.

(c) The chair and the ranking minority member of the capital budget committee shall cochair the task force.

(d) Appointments to the task force must be completed within fifteen days of the effective date of this section.

(4) Principal staff support for the task force must be provided by the house of representatives office of program research. The task force may:

(a) Request the participation of the office of financial management and other relevant executive branch agencies;

(b) Enter into contracts with persons who have specific technical expertise; and

(c) Solicit information and perspectives from representatives of public and private organizations.

(5) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the house of representatives executive rules committee, or its successor committee.

(6) The task force must report its findings and recommendations to appropriate legislative committees by November 15, 2015.

(7) The task force expires on June 30, 2016.

(8) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for any technical research and analysis required to carry out the task force objectives in subsection (2) of this section.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002. FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Library - Archives Building (30000033)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for a predesign to determine: (a) Necessary program space for the state library currently located in Tumwater, and additional archive space; (b) capital budget requirements, including the use of fees collected by the secretary of state that will support a certificate of participation for the financing of the construction of the facility, and future operating costs; and (c) projected efficiencies of electronic document storage in determining necessary space.

(2) The study must consider the use of the general administration building site as a possible location; and any benefits or consequences may be identified at this site or other sites considered; and lease options.

(3) The office of financial management shall determine the maximum use of the site and consider the consolidation of other state agencies, including separately elected officials.

(4) The building must be a high performance building as described in section 7008 of this act and the construction must be procured using a performance based method including design-build or design-build-operate-maintain.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$55,428,000

TOTAL. . . .$55,828,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003. FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Minor Works (91000007)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,007,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,007,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects (20064008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 131, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$434,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$45,458,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$45,892,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rural Washington Loan Fund (20064010)

Reappropriation:

Rural Washington Loan Account—State. . . .$2,383,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,744,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,127,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rural Washington Loan Fund (20074008)

Reappropriation:

Rural Washington Loan Account—State. . . .$1,822,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$205,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,027,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (20074009)

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State. . . .$1,405,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$86,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,491,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$198,509,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Job Development Fund Grants (20074010)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1032, chapter 520, Laws of 2007 and section 1005, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,987,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$44,943,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$48,930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects (20084001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department shall not expend the reappropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the reappropriation is released for design costs only.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$113,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$127,577,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$127,690,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Development Fund (20084850)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,213,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,703,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,916,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (30000013)

Reappropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$276,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$129,724,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$130,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2010 Local and Community Projects (30000082)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other requirements for community projects administered by the department.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,991,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,431,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000095)

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State. . . .$6,451,000

Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account—State. . . .$90,368,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$96,819,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,863,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$107,682,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000097)

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving Account—

State. . . .$2,104,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,896,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, Affordable Housing Trust Fund (30000098)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1026, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,907,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$43,093,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program (30000103)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$90,734,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$233,851,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$324,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building Communities Fund Grants (30000102)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1027, chapter 49, Laws of 2011, 1st sp. sess.

(2) $573,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for the University District food bank project.

(3) $815,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for the Village Green foundation project.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,388,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,830,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,218,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects (30000166)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1002, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,887,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,930,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,817,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Financing Energy/Water Efficiency (30000180)

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$4,886,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$114,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program 2013 Loan List (30000184)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1016, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$82,786,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$82,786,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building for the Arts Grants (30000186)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1063, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,301,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,903,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000189)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the public works board must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account—

State. . . .$200,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$204,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$680,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$884,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000190)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1070, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving Account—

State. . . .$8,882,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$118,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Weatherization (30000192)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1076, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,291,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,709,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2013-2015 Energy Efficiency Grants (30000193)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1075, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$21,714,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,286,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Renton Aerospace Training Center Construction (30000724)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3, chapter 1, Laws of 2013 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

ARRA SEP Revolving Loans (30000725)

Appropriation:

Energy Recovery Act Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions or otherwise increase energy independence for the state.

(2) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive bidding processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects;

(b) Require that all expenditures be used for projects that develop and acquire asset that have a useful life of at least thirteen years; and

(c) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(3)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require an applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed or on the firm's governing board during the past twenty-four months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employed by, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of a contract.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a contractor either in procuring or performing under the contract, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the contract by written notice. If the contract is terminated, the department must be entitled to pursue the same remedies against the contractor as it could pursue in the event of a breach of the contract by the contractor.

(4) The requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(5) The department may not obligate or expend any of the amounts provided in this section on new projects that involve the Snohomish county public utilities district or its subcontractors until the executive ethics board responds to the department's June 17, 2015, request for an advisory opinion on poststate employment.

(6)(a) $10,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account is provided solely to create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies now inhibited by lack of access to capital.

(b) The department shall provide grant funds to one or more competitively selected nonprofit lenders that will provide matching private capital and will administer the loan fund. The department must select the loan fund administrator or administrators through a competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts, applying criteria specified by the department.

(c) The department must establish guidelines that specify applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and selection criteria. The guidelines must be used by the nonprofit lenders.

(d) Loan applications must disclose all sources of public funds invested in the project. The nonprofit lender must make loans available to the following types of projects that include, but are not limited to: Residential, commercial, industrial, and agricultural energy retrofits, residential and community-scale solar installations, anaerobic digesters to treat dairy and organic waste, and combined heat and power projects using woody biomass as a fuel source.

(e) State funds may not exceed fifty percent of the estimated cost of a project, and funding preference must be provided to projects that offer a higher percentage of nonstate match funds.

(7) $6,600,000 of the state taxable building construction account is provided solely for credit enhancements of advanced solar and renewable energy manufacturing within Washington state. The department shall develop an application process to competitively select projects.

(8)(a) $13,000,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for grants to advance clean and renewable energy technologies and advance transmission and distribution control system improvements for increased reliability, resiliency, and enabling integration of distributed and renewable resources and technology by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible utilities may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding.

(b) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, allow smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding.

(c) The department shall convene an advisory panel of electric utility representatives to identify program objectives, near term priorities and long term goals.

(d) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(e) Grant funds must be used for research, development, or demonstration projects that integrate intermittent renewables through energy storage, information technology or other smart grid technologies, dispatch energy storage resources from utility control rooms, use demand response, transactive control, or the thermal properties and electric load of commercial buildings and district energy systems to store energy, reduce transmission congestion or otherwise improve system reliability and resiliency and enable integration of distributed and renewable energy sources.

(9)(a) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for grants to match federal funds or other nonstate funding sources used to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies.

(b) The department shall consult with the University of Washington, Washington State University, the Pacific Northwest national laboratory and other clean energy organizations to design the program. The program shall offer matching funds for competitively selected clean energy projects including, but not limited to: Advancing energy storage and solar technologies, advancing bioenergy, developing new lightweight materials, and advancing renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies.

(10) $400,000 of the state building construction account—state is provided solely for capital funding of competitively selected wood energy conversion projects at public facilities.

(11) The department must report on number and results of projects that receive grants or loans through the clean energy fund, including the number of job hours created and the number of jobs maintained and created, to the governor and the legislature, by November 1, 2016.

(12) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts and provide a report of the metrics, including at a minimum the current energy used by the building, the energy use after efficiencies are completed, and cost of energy saved, to the house of representatives technology & economic development committee and the senate energy, environment & telecommunications committee. The report must include these metrics from other states.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$17,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,400,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$40,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$240,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$280,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building for the Arts Program (30000731)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.750.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is released for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Spokane children's theatre. . . .$18,000

KEXP's new home at Seattle center. . . .$1,866,000

Admiral theatre renovation 2.0. . . .$100,000

Kirkland arts center - capital improvements project. . . .$48,000

Uniontown creativity center addition and site

improvements. . . .$123,000

San Juan islands museum of art. . . .$650,000

KidsQuest children's museum - good to grow capital

campaign. . . .$2,000,000

Cornish playhouse. . . .$232,000

ACT theatre eagles auditorium restoration and renovation. . . .$303,000

Music works northwest park 118 building renovation. . . .$64,000

New hands on children's museum. . . .$393,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,797,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,797,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,600,000

TOTAL. . . .$27,397,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Youth Recreational Facilities Program (30000792)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.135.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is released for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Youth activity wing at the Tom Taylor family YMCA. . . .$515,000

BGCB main club project. . . .$1,200,000

BGCB hidden valley fieldhouse project. . . .$1,200,000

Sultan boys & girls club. . . .$340,000

Stanwood-Camano family YMCA. . . .$1,200,000

YMCA camp Terry environmental recreation center. . . .$500,000

Mukilteo boys & girls club. . . .$1,200,000

Lummi youth wellness center renovation project. . . .$1,200,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,355,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,355,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$32,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$39,355,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building Communities Fund Program (30000803)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is released for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Rainier Beach urban farm and wetlands. . . .$307,000

Whatcom county emergency food hub. . . .$575,000

Hopelink Redmond integrated services center. . . .$2,400,000

Riverside drive building purchase. . . .$138,000

Centerforce. . . .$98,000

Eritrean association community kitchen. . . .$58,000

Tonasket food bank building acquisition. . . .$22,000

Building for the future. . . .$300,000

Entiat Valley community services resource center. . . .$100,000

Pike market neighborhood center. . . .$500,000

Opportunity council renovation project. . . .$170,000

FareStart facility expansion to the Pacific tower. . . .$438,000

Walla Walla community teen center. . . .$475,000

El Centro de la Raza community access & parking

improvements. . . .$600,000

Good ground capital campaign. . . .$300,000

Renewed hope capital campaign. . . .$66,000

International community health services (ICHS). . . .$3,500,000

Casa latina: A home for opportunity. . . .$150,000

Centerstone building renovation. . . .$1,500,000

PSRS office building conversion. . . .$212,000

Prairie oaks. . . .$200,000

Leschi center renovation. . . .$1,000,000

Everett family YMCA. . . .$2,000,000

Behavioral healthcare center for children, youth and

families. . . .$2,000,000

Phoenix rising. . . .$250,000

Gordon family YMCA (Sumner, WA). . . .$2,000,000

Community grief support and recovery center. . . .$1,000,000

Auburn youth resources campus expansion. . . .$500,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,859,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,859,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$120,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$140,859,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Trust Fund Appropriation (30000833)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to award loans and grants on a competitive basis to affordable housing projects statewide that will produce, at a minimum, a total of 1,900 homes and 500 seasonal beds, in the following categories and amounts:

(a) For people with chronic mental illness, 281 homes;

(b) For homeless families with children, 529 homes;

(c) For people with disabilities, developmental disabilities, veterans, and others, 400 homes; of that number, a minimum of 80 must be for veterans;

(d) For homeless youth, 200 homes;

(e) For farmworkers, 176 homes and 500 seasonal beds;

(f) For seniors, 200 homes;

(g) For homeownership, 100 homes.

(2) If upon review of completed applications, the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

(3) In evaluating projects for homes for homeless families with children specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section, consistent with Engrossed House Bill No. 1633, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in chapter 43.185.070(5), including projects involving collaborative partnerships between local school districts and either public housing authorities or nonprofit housing providers, that help children of low-income families succeed in school.

(4) $625,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for designing, engineering, constructing, installing, and other costs and fees associated with connecting existing and future farmworker housing in Skagit county to the city of Burlington sewer system.

(5)(a) $2,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely as a grant to the Puget Sound regional council for a revolving loan fund to support the development of affordable housing opportunities related to equitable transit-oriented development in accordance with Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5987 (transportation revenue). This amount must be provided in the form of a direct grant without a requirement that the grant be a reimbursement for local expenditures.

(b) Amounts provided in this section must be used to plan, predesign, design, provide technical assistance and financial services, and build low-income housing units in underserved communities of concern. "Underserved communities of concern" are persons and families who: (i) Have incomes at or below thirty percent of the median family income for the county or standard metropolitan statistical area where the project is located; (ii) experience chronic homelessness; and (iii) lack affordable housing. Underserved communities of concern include veterans, immigrants, and refugee communities.

(c) Amounts provided in this section must be matched by local government nonstate cash resources.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$75,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$220,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$295,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Ultra-Efficient Affordable Housing Demonstration (30000836)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for loans or grants to low-income housing developers to design and construct ultra-high energy efficient housing projects including single and multifamily units;

(2) By December 1, 2015, in consultation with professional building, energy efficiency and housing finance organizations, the office of financial management, and appropriate legislative staff, the department shall develop a process that is designed to solicit, evaluate, and fund ultra-high energy efficient housing projects as part of the housing trust fund competitive program.

(3) To receive funding, a project must demonstrate energy-saving and renewable energy systems designed to reach net-zero energy use after housing is fully occupied and must provide a life-cycle cost analysis report to the department.

(4) The department must consider, at a minimum and in any order, the following factors in assigning a numerical ranking to a project:

(a) Whether the proposed design has demonstrated that the project will achieve net-zero energy use when fully occupied;

(b) The life-cycle cost of the project;

(c) That the project demonstrates a design, use of materials, and construction process that can be replicated by the Washington building industry;

(d) The extent to which the project leverages nonstate funds;

(e) The extent to which the project is ready to proceed to construction;

(f) Whether the project promotes sustainable use of resources and environmental quality;

(g) Whether the project is being well-managed to fund maintenance and capital depreciation;

(h) Reduction of housing and utilities carbon footprint; and

(i) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(5) The department must monitor and track the results of the housing projects that receive ultra-high energy efficiency funding under this section. By December 1, 2018, the department must submit a report to appropriate legislative committees documenting:

(a) Project costs compared to the costs of traditional design and construction;

(b) Life-cycle costs;

(c) Use of sustainable resources;

(d) Energy savings and reduction of carbon footprint;

(e) Any lessons learned; and

(f) A data collection plan to monitor actual performance in order to validate projected savings.

Appropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2015-2017 Community Economic Revitalization Board Program (30000834)

Appropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving Account—

State. . . .$10,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$28,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$38,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000835)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $8,000,000 for fiscal year 2016 and $8,000,000 for fiscal year 2017 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, school districts, and state agencies for operational cost savings improvements to facilities and related projects that result in energy and operational cost savings.

(b) At least ten percent of each competitive grant round must be awarded to small cities or towns with a population of five thousand or fewer residents.

(c) In each competitive round, the higher the leverage ratio of nonstate funding sources to state grant and the higher the energy savings, the higher the project ranking.

(d) For school district applicants, priority consideration must be given to school districts that demonstrate improved health and safety through (i) reduced exposure to polychlorinated biphenyl; or (ii) replacing outdated heating systems that use oil or propane as fuel sources as identified by the Washington State University extension energy program; (iii) prior grant award: Priority consideration must be given to applicants that did not receive grant awards from appropriations provided in section 5023, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

(2) $5,775,000 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, school districts, and state agencies for projects that involve the purchase and installation of solar energy systems, including solar modules and inverters, with a preference for Washington-manufactured products.

(3) $3,000,000 is provided solely for energy efficiency improvements to minor works and stand-alone projects at state-owned facilities that repair or replace existing building systems including but not limited to HVAC, lighting, insulation, windows, and other mechanical systems. Eligibility for this funding is dependent on an analysis using the office of financial management's life-cycle cost tool that compares project design alternatives for initial and long-term cost-effectiveness. Assuming a reasonable return on investment, the cost to improve the project's energy efficiency compared to the original project request will be added to the project appropriation after construction bids are received. The department of commerce shall coordinate with the office of financial management to develop a process for project submittal, review, approval criteria, tracking project budget adjustments, and performance measures.

(4) $225,000 is provided solely for resource conservation managers in the department of enterprise services to coordinate with state agencies and school districts to assess and adjust existing building systems and operations to optimize the efficiency in use of energy and other resources in state-owned facilities. The department of commerce will oversee an interagency agreement with the department of enterprise services to fund the resource conservation managers.

(5) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts and provide a report of the metrics, including at a minimum the current energy used by the building, the energy use after efficiencies are completed, and cost of energy saved, to the house of representatives technology & economic development committee and the senate energy, environment & telecommunications committee. The report must include these metrics from other states.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$120,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$145,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Behavioral Health Bed - Acute & Residential (92000344)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department of commerce, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, to issue grants to hospitals or other entities to establish new community hospital inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, or crisis stabilization facilities with sixteen or fewer beds for the purpose of providing short-term detention services through the publicly funded mental health system. Funds may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the community hospital inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, or crisis stabilization facilities. These funds may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services. The department shall establish criteria for the issuance of grants and priority must be given to those proposals to establish new community hospital inpatient psychiatric beds or free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities. The criteria must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional support networks, as defined in RCW 71.24.025;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical access to short-term detention services under chapter 71.05 RCW in their region;

(c) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(d) A commitment by the applicant to maintain the beds or facility for at least a ten-year period;

(e) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(f) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;

(g) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW; and

(h) A lack of local resources, including nonmedicaid operating reserves, and regional fund balances that are not contractually encumbered.

(2) To accommodate the emergent need for inpatient psychiatric services, the department of health and the department of commerce, in collaboration with the department of social and health services shall establish a concurrent and expedited process for the purpose of grant applicants meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, or crisis stabilization facilities.

(3) The following list is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

Cascade mental health. . . .$3,000,000

Woodmont recovery center. . . .$5,000,000

Parkside conversion to behavioral health beds. . . .$3,000,000

Navos behavioral health center for children, youth &

families. . . .$2,000,000

Central Washington comprehensive mental health. . . .$2,000,000

Swedish Ballard psychiatric unit. . . .$3,000,000

Substance abuse & mental health facilities. . . .$2,000,000

Fairfax behavioral health - Providence health &

services facility. . . .$1,000

Daybreak Youth Services. . . .$1,500,000

(4) Multicare-Franciscan joint venture. . . .$5,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$32,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Weatherization Matchmaker Program (30000838)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts and provide a report of the metrics, including at a minimum the current energy used by the building, the energy use after efficiencies are completed, and cost of energy saved, to the house of representatives technology & economic development committee and the senate energy, environment & telecommunications committee. The report must include these metrics from other states.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$60,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2015-2017 Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000840)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,000,000 of the drinking water assistance account for fiscal year 2016 and $4,000,000 of the drinking water assistance account for fiscal year 2017 is provided as state match for federal safe drinking water funds.

(2) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the public works board must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

(3) The agency must encourage local government use of federally funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture - rural development.

Appropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State. . . .$135,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$480,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$615,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Energy Efficiency Program (30000845)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts and provide a report of the metrics, including at a minimum the current energy used by the building, the energy use after efficiencies are completed, and cost of energy saved, to the house of representatives technology & economic development committee and the senate energy, environment & telecommunications committee. The report must include these metrics from other states.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects 2016 (92000369)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is released for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) $2,209,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Fairchild air force base protection and community empowerment project, including the purchase of twenty acres of land for development of affordable housing and the county's purchase of mobile home parks in order to reduce the use of the accident potential zone for residential purposes. If the county subsequently rezones, develops, and leases the mobile home park property for commercial or industrial uses contrary to the allowed uses in the accident potential zone, the county must repay to the state the amount spent on the purchase of mobile home parks in its entirety within ten years.

(8) $850,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the White River restoration project. Design solutions for flooding reductions in the lower White River must include a floodplain habitat design that both reduces flood risks and restores salmon habitat by reconnecting the river with its floodplain and a sustainable riparian corridor. Project designs and plans must also identify lands for acquisition needed for floodplain reconnection where pending or existing development eliminates the potential for riparian and aquatic habitat restoration. The city shall work cooperatively with the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe and the Puyallup Tribe of Indians, and develop a plan collaboratively to achieve both flood reduction and habitat restoration.

(9) Up to $150,000 of the appropriation in this section for the veterans helping veterans: Emergency transition shelter project may be spent on preconstruction or pre-acquisition activities, including, but not limited to, building inspections, design of necessary renovations, cost estimation, and other activities necessary to identify and select a facility appropriate for the program. The remainder of the appropriation must be used for eventual acquisition and renovations of a facility.

(10) $2,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the mercy housing and health care center at Sand Point. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the center may not house any community health care training organization that has been investigated by and has paid settlement fees to the attorney general's office for alleged medicaid fraud.

(11) The Lake Chelan land use plan must be developed without adverse impacts on agricultural operations.

(12) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Algona senior center

$500,000

All-accessible destination playground

$750,000

Appleway trail

$1,000,000

Basin 3 sewer rehabilitation

$1,500,000

Bellevue downtown park inspiration playground and sensory garden

$1,000,000

Bender fields parking lot and restrooms

$1,000,000

Blackhills community soccer complex safety projects

$750,000

Bremerton children's dental clinic

$396,000

Brewster reservoir replacement

$1,250,000

Brookville gardens

$1,200,000

Camas-Washougal Babe Ruth youth baseball improve Louis Bloch park

$10,000

Cancer immunotherapy facility-Seattle children's research inst.

$7,000,000

Caribou trail apartments

$100,000

Carnegie library imprv for the rapid recidivism reduction program

$1,000,000

Cavelero park - regional park facility/skateboard park

$500,000

CDM caregiving services: Clark county aging resource center

$1,200,000

Centerville school heating upgrades

$46,000

Chambers Creek regional park pier extension and moorage

$1,750,000

City of LaCenter parks & rec community center

$1,500,000

City of Lynden pipeline

$2,000,000

City of Lynden-Riverview road construction

$850,000

City of Lynden-safe rtes to school and Kaemingk trail gap elim.

$300,000

City of Mt. Vernon downtown flood protect project & riverfront trail

$1,500,000

City of Olympia - Percival Landing renovation

$950,000

City of Pateros water system

$1,838,000

City of Stanwood police station/city hall relocation

$300,000

Classroom door barricade - nightlock

$45,000

Confluence area parks upgrade and restoration

$1,000,000

Corbin senior center elevator

$300,000

Covington community park

$5,000,000

Cross Kirkland corridor trail connection 52nd St.

$1,069,000

Dawson place child advocacy center building completion project

$161,000

Dekalb street pier

$500,000

DNR/City of Castle Rock exchange

$80,000

Dr. Sun Yat Sen memorial statue

$10,000

Drug abuse and prevention center - Castle Rock

$96,000

DuPont historical museum renovation

$46,000

East Tacoma community center

$1,000,000

Edmonds center for the arts: Gym climate control & roof repairs

$250,000

Edmonds senior & community center

$1,250,000

Emergency generator for kidney resource center

$226,000

Enumclaw expo center

$350,000

Fairchild air force base protection & comm empowerment project

$2,209,000

Federal Way PAC center

$2,000,000

Filipino community of Seattle village (innovative learning center)

$1,200,000

Franklin Pierce early learning center

$2,000,000

Gateway center project

$1,000,000

Gilda club repairs

$800,000

Granite Falls boys & girls club

$1,000,000

Gratzer park ball fields

$200,000

Grays Harbor navigation improvement project

$2,500,000

Green river gorge open space buffer, Kummer connection

$750,000

Guy Cole center revitalization

$450,000

Historic renovation Maryhill museum

$1,000,000

Hopelink at Ronald commons

$750,000

Irvine slough storm water separation

$500,000

Kahlotus highway sewer force main

$2,625,000

Kennewick boys and girls club

$500,000

Kent east hill YMCA

$500,000

Key Pen civics center

$50,000

KiBe high school parking

$125,000

Kitsap humane society - shelter renovation

$90,000

Lacey boys & girls club

$29,000

Lake Chelan land use plan

$75,000

LeMay car museum ADA access improvements

$500,000

Lyman city park renovation

$167,000

Lyon creek flood reduction project

$400,000

Main street revitalization project

$1,300,000

Marine terminal rail investments

$1,000,000

Martin Luther King Jr. family outreach center expansion project

$85,000

Mason county Belfair wastewater system rate relief

$1,500,000

McAllister museum

$660,000

Mercer arena energy savings & sustainability funding

$450,000

Mercy housing and health center at Sand Point

$2,500,000

Meridian center for health

$2,500,000

Minor Road water reservoir replacement

$1,500,000

Mountains to Sound Greenway Tiger Mountain access improvements

$300,000

Mt. Spokane guest services building & preservation/maintenance of existing facilities

$520,000

Mukilteo boys & girls club

$1,000,000

Mukilteo tank farm clean-up

$250,000

New Shoreline medical-dental clinic

$1,500,000

Nordic heritage museum

$2,000,000

North Kitsap fishline foodbank

$625,000

Northwest native canoe center project

$250,000

Oak Harbor clean water facility

$2,500,000

Okanogan emergency communications

$400,000

Onalaska community tennis and sports courts

$80,000

Opera house ADA elevator

$357,000

Orcas Island library expansion

$1,400,000

Pacific community center

$250,000

PCAF's building for the future

$350,000

Pe Ell second street

$197,000

Perry technical school

$1,000,000

Pike Place Market front project

$800,000

Police station security/hardening

$38,000

Port of Centralia - Centralia station

$500,000

Port of Sunnyside demolish the carnation building

$450,000

PROVAIL TBI residential facility

$450,000

Quincy water reuse

$1,500,000

Redmond downtown park

$3,000,000

Redondo boardwalk repairs

$1,500,000

Renovate senior center

$400,000

Rochester boys & girls club

$38,000

Rockford wastewater treatment

$1,200,000

Roslyn renaissance-NW improve company bldg renovation project

$900,000

Sammamish rowing association boathouse

$500,000

SE 240th St. watermain system improvement project

$700,000

SE Seattle financial & economic opportunity center

$1,500,000

SeaTac international marketplace & transit-oriented community

$1,250,000

Seattle theatre group

$131,000

Snohomish veterans memorial rebuild

$10,000

Snoqualmie riverfront project

$1,520,000

South 228th street inter-urban trail connector

$500,000

Splash pad/foundation: Centralia outdoor pool restoration project

$200,000

Spokane women's club

$300,000

Springbrook park neighborhood connection project

$300,000

SR 532 flood berm and bike/ped path

$85,000

St. Vincent food bank & community services construction project

$400,000

Stan & Joan cross park

$750,000

Steilacoom Sentinel Way repairs

$450,000

Stilly Valley youth project Arlington B&G club

$2,242,000

Sunset neighborhood park

$1,750,000

Support, advocacy & resource center for victims of violence

$750,000

The gathering house job training café

$14,000

The Salvation Army Clark County: Corps community center

$1,200,000

Thurston county food bank

$500,000

Tulalip water pipeline, (final of 8 segments)

$2,000,000

Twin Bridges museum rehab Lyle Wa

$64,000

Twisp civic building

$500,000

Vancouver, Columbia waterfront project

$2,500,000

Vantage point senior apartments

$2,000,000

Veterans center

$500,000

Veterans helping veterans: Emergency transition shelter

$600,000

Waitsburg Main Street bridge replacement

$1,700,000

Washington green schools

$105,000

Washougal roof repair

$350,000

Water meter and system improvement program

$500,000

Water reservoir and transmission main

$500,000

Wayne golf course land preservation

$500,000

White River restoration project

$850,000

Willapa behavioral health safety improvement project

$75,000

WSU LID frontage - local and economic benefits

$500,000

Yakima children's museum center

$50,000

Yakima SunDome

$2,000,000

Yelm community center

$500,000

Yelm senior center

$80,000

Youth wellness campus gymnasium renovation

$1,000,000

Total

$130,169,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$130,169,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$130,169,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (30000185)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1062, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. provided that the "New Life Community Development Agency" project may be combined with the "New Life CDA" project in project number 30000188.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,568,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,563,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,131,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building Communities Fund Grants (30000188)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1072, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. provided that the "New Life CDA" project may be combined with the "New Life Community Development Agency" project in project number 30000185.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,692,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,587,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,279,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency Grants for Local Governments (91000241)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 301, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,732,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,268,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency Grants for Higher Education (91000242)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 307, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,077,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,923,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Pre-Construction Loan Program (91000319)

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$767,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,233,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Families with Children (91000409)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 310, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,472,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,778,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Seniors and People with Physical Disabilities (91000411)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 311, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,316,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,666,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for People with Chronic Mental Illness (91000412)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1010, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$190,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$935,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for the Homeless (91000413)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1011, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,996,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,948,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Farmworkers (91000414)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1012, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,055,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,215,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for People At Risk of Homelessness (91000415)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 312, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$959,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,541,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Low-Income Households (91000416)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1013, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,689,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$293,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,982,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2012 Local and Community Projects (91000417)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 302, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,889,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,734,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,623,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects 2012 (91000437)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1003, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,035,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,835,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Pacific Medical Center (91000445)

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,405,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,818,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$12,223,000

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,777,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$26,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Sand Point Building 9 (91000446)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1068, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,802,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,198,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Mental Health Beds (91000447)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1071, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,644,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,356,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Homeless Veterans (91000455)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1065, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,001,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$366,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,367,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Farmworkers (91000457)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$19,723,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,327,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$27,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for People with Developmental Disabilities (91000458)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1067, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,392,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,627,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,019,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for People with Chronic Mental Illness (91000459)

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$329,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,064,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Project Backfill (91000581)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,263,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$154,737,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$158,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (91000582)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1074, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Energy Recovery Act Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,924,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$19,069,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$31,993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,007,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Innovation Partnership Zones - Facilities and Infrastructure (92000089)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 309, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,725,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,795,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board Administered Economic Development, Innovation, and Export Grants (92000096)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 304, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,267,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$14,595,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$18,862,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,736,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,598,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Main Street Improvement Grants (92000098)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 305, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$355,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,115,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$3,470,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,380,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Brownfield Redevelopment Grants (92000100)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for redevelopment of the Bellingham waterfront.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,194,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$306,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Port and Export Related Infrastructure (92000102)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 306, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$13,603,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,547,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects for Jobs and Economic Development (92000151)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1077, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$7,100,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$22,256,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$29,356,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,753,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Youth and Families (92000227)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1079, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,695,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,982,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,677,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Communities and Quality of Life (92000230)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1078, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp.s. and section 6006 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$395,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$22,372,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$22,767,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,361,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,128,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1072. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Appropriations to Public Works Assistance Account for Previously Authorized Loans (92000011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the public works assistance account—state. The office of financial management shall consult with the state treasurer's office to determine the timing of the expenditures into the public works assistance account to return it to a positive balance and accommodate authorized expenditures and transfers from the account.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1073. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$246,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,254,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1074. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Catastrophic Flood Relief (20084850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $26,800,000 of the appropriation is for advancing the long-term strategy for the Chehalis Basin projects to reduce flood damage and restore aquatic species including a programmatic environmental impact statement, data collection, engineering design of future construction projects, feasibility analysis, and engagement of state agencies, tribes, and other parties.

(2) Up to $23,200,000 of the appropriation is for construction of local priority flood protection and habitat restoration projects.

(3) Up to one percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the recreation and conservation office to administer contracts associated with the subprojects funded through this section. Contract administration includes, but is not limited to: Drafting and amending contracts, reviewing and approving invoices, tracking expenditures, and performing field inspections to assess project status when conducting similar assessments related to other agency contracts in the same geographic area.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,484,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$25,203,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$120,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$207,687,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1075. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Office of Financial Management Capital Budget Staff (30000045)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1076. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Oversight of State Facilities (30000046)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of financial management, with assistance from the department of enterprise services and other state agencies as needed, shall conduct space studies and make recommendations to the legislature on the state's space standards including alternative workplace strategies. State agencies shall provide space use data in a format prescribed by the office of financial management to support this effort. The office of financial management shall report the results and recommendations to the legislative fiscal committees by July 1, 2016.

(2) The office of financial management, with assistance from the department of enterprise services and other state agencies as needed, shall update the lease space requirements to reflect high performance building standards and any other components that may improve the conditions of leased space.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,040,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,120,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$2,160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,160,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1077. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Construction Contingency Pool (90000300)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for construction projects that confront emergent and unavoidable costs in excess of the construction contingency included in the project appropriation. For requests occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting contingency funds from the office of financial management. Eligible agencies that may apply to the pool include higher education institutions, the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, the department of enterprise services, the criminal justice training commission, the department of veterans affairs, the parks and recreation commission, and the department of fish and wildlife. Eligible construction projects are only projects that had cost reductions as kept on file with the office of financial management. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee as projects are approved for funding.

(2)(a) The legislature intends to use the 1063 Block building development project as a model of efficient space and energy use for both owned and leased state office buildings.

(b) To achieve this intent, the office of financial management must reconsider tenants for the building, including consideration of the utilities and transportation commission, all current tenants of the general administration building with operations compatible with a high density office building, and other possible tenants. The measure of achieving a higher space efficiency is measured by the average square feet per housed employee.

(c) The office of financial management must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the redesign and the increase space efficiency by October 15, 2015.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1078. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repairs (90000301)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected building or grounds failures that will impact public health and safety and the day-to-day operations of the facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, an emergency declaration signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The emergency declaration must include a description of the health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of other funding that may be applied to the project. For emergencies occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting emergency funds from the office of financial management. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee as emergency projects are approved for funding.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1079. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repair Pool for K-12 Public Schools (90000302)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at K-12 public schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day-to-day operations of the school facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, an emergency declaration must be signed by the school district board of directors and the superintendent of public instruction, and submitted to the office of financial management for consideration. The emergency declaration must include a description of the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of local funding to be applied to the project. Grants of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as emergency projects are approved for funding.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1080. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Chehalis River Basin Flood Relief Projects (91000398)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$206,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,794,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1081. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Higher Education Preservation Information (91000431)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely to refresh preservation information that reside in the state's comparable framework for higher education buildings including any necessary revisions or adjustments that will enable more direct translation of information, updates for last renewal or replacement or major systems, and quality assurance field sampling. In executing this continued capital study, the office of financial management shall consult the legislative fiscal committees about its workplan to ensure field sampling of facilities prioritized for renovation or replacement, and timely delivery of assembled facilities information and related capital models in an easy to understand format. Prior to submitting any higher education institution renovation or replacement building project for consideration for funding as part of a capital budget request, to the office of financial management or directly to the legislature, colleges and universities must have completed and submitted all necessary information as required by the state facility inventory and condition assessment systems. As a general condition, upon appropriations provided to higher education agencies in this act, the state board for community and technical colleges and each state baccalaureate institution shall provide requested facilities information in a timely manner to enable the office of financial management to complete the tasks and oversight assigned in this section.

Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$116,000

Washington State University Building

Account—State. . . .$85,000

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$21,000

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$17,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$12,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$19,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1082. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Construction Contingency Pool (91000428)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1091, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,875,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1083. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Equipment Benchmarks for Capital Projects Study (92000010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office of financial management shall submit a higher education and skill center capital project equipment cost study to the governor and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by December 1, 2015. The study must include benchmarks for standard ranges of fixed and nonfixed equipment expenditures in different types of facilities and an examination of alternatives for financing equipment costs where the equipment has a life expectancy that is less than the length of bond financing. The alternative analysis must include a life-cycle cost analysis of the competing alternatives to determine the most cost-effective options to the state bond and general fund budget.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1084. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Culverts in Three State Agencies (92000004)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,516,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,484,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1085. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

East Plaza - Water Infiltration and Elevator Repairs (30000548)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,603,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,103,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1086. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

NRB Garage Fire Suppression System Repairs (30000578)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,738,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,238,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1087. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation (30000635)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,477,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$501,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,978,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,050,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,028,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation (30000722)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: No minor works funds may be allotted until the action part of the plan is provided. Up to $300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided for the department to develop an implementation plan for a capitol campus parking strategy. The action part of the plan must include: (1) During the legislative sessions a reduction of agency reserve stalls from twenty-six percent to fifteen percent as recommended by the 2014 state of Washington parking and transportation study; (2) cost-benefit of incorporating parking attendants or parking arms to accept payment for campus parking during the legislative sessions; (3) installation of at least two electronic boards, or other methods of providing the available parking capacity in the east plaza garage. The department shall work in cooperation with the city of Olympia, and the city may provide a proposal to enforce parking on the capitol campus. The department shall report to all fiscal committees on its progress by November 1, 2015.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$850,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,608,000

State Vehicle Parking Account—State. . . .$900,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$7,358,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$19,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$26,358,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1089. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Old Capitol - Exterior and Interior Repairs (30000724)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1090. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

West Campus Historic Buildings Exterior Preservation (30000727)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1091. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Heating Systems Repairs - Phase 1 (30000730)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to competitively contract an energy audit on the capitol campus steam system. The audit must consider converting to centralized hot water boilers and using a heat recovery power system.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1092. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Expansion of Legislative Gift Center (92000014)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for building modifications and space improvements required for the purpose of expanding the retail space allocated to the legislative gift center created in chapter 44.73 RCW in the legislative building. The office of legislative support services, the house of representatives, and the senate shall cooperate to accomplish this expansion within the existing space allocations, up to and including the use of all or part of room 112, on the first floor of the legislative building, no later than October 30, 2015.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1093. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Critical Network Standardization and Connectivity (30000732)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for installing any remaining building meters as needed on the capitol campus, and providing building performance data electronically. Dashboard displays must be installed in the three legislative buildings.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1094. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Court Major Exterior and Building Systems Renewal (30000738)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for development of a plan that identifies the existing building deficiencies and recommended project specific improvements with cost estimates to be completed as funding becomes available. Urgent repairs to this building will be prioritized against the other projects in the department of enterprise services' minor works project list.

Appropriation:

Enterprise Services Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,220,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,370,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1095. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Lake Long-term Management Planning (30000740)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely to make tangible progress on reaching broad agreement on a long-term plan for the management of Capitol Lake/Deschutes Estuary/Lower Budd Inlet/Deschutes River watershed, building on the recommendations of the 2014 situation assessment for Capitol Lake management prepared by the Ruckleshaus center and prior related reports.

The department shall:

(a) Identify and summarize the findings of the best available science concerning water quality and habitat as they relate to conceptual options of retaining or removing the dam;

(b) Identify multiple hybrid options for future management of Capitol Lake, which options must include substantial improvement in fish and wildlife habitat and ecosystem functions, maintaining a historic reflecting pool at the north end of the lake/estuary, and adaptive management strategies;

(c) Identify general cost estimates for construction and maintenance of each conceptual option, in consultation with the office of financial management;

(d) Identify the range of public support for or concerns about each option;

(e) Identify conceptual options and degree of general support for shared funding by state, local, and federal governments and potentially other entities;

(f) Identify one or more conceptual options for long-term shared governance of a future management plan, including consideration of an option similar to state lake management districts, chapter 36.61 RCW or shellfish protection districts, chapter 90.72 RCW.

(g) Engage in other related activities which would contribute to reaching broad agreement on the long-term management plan.

The department shall conduct its information gathering and report preparation with a pro-active approach to public engagement, and may create such advisory entities as it determines would be helpful.

(2) The department may contract for facilitation, research, or other services to assist in the preparation of this report.

(3) The department shall make periodic reports to the state capitol committee, the office of financial management, and fiscal committees of the legislature, with a final report to be submitted no later than January 1, 2017. The reports must include visual representations of proposals to aid the public and decision-makers to understand and evaluate them.

Appropriation:

Enterprise Services Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1096. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (30000762)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for architectural and engineering services to manage public works contracting for all state facilities pursuant to RCW 43.19.450. The service charge is increased from 2.15 percent to 2.27 percent of total project costs to reduce the number of projects assigned to each manager. The intended results of the increased fee are improved accountability, reduced project delays, and reduced the number and cost of change orders. At the end of each fiscal year, the department must report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature on performance improvements resulting from the increased management fee, including the following:

(a) The number of projects managed by each manager compared to previous biennia;

(b) Projects that were not completed on schedule and the reasons for delays; and

(c) The number and cost of the change orders and the reason for each change order.

(2) The department shall convene a group of private sector architects and contractors with state agency facilities personnel, at a minimum of twice per year, to share at a minimum, information on high performance methods, ideas, operating and maintenance issues, and cost. The facility personnel must be from the community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher education, and any other state agencies that have recently completed a new building or are currently in the construction phase.

(3) The department, with assistance from the capital projects authority review board, shall provide recommendations to the governor, house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee, on ways to improve the project delivery methods. It must include, at a minimum, methods to incorporate more architectural and engineering firms and contractors to be eligible for design build projects, and methods for including high performance criteria with incentives for the architectural and engineering firm and contractor to meet the performance measures in design-bid-build project delivery methods.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,800,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$14,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1097. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus Steam System and Chiller Upgrades (91000014)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1106, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,074,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,802,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,876,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,121,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,997,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1098. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Exterior Lighting Upgrades (30000736)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department shall pursue energy services contracts as much as is feasible to provide funding.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1099. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Archives Building and Capitol Court HVAC Upgrades (91000015)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1107, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$70,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$930,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1100. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Predesign (91000436)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department shall develop a predesign that will include at a minimum, uses for the pritchard building and the pro arts site, the general administration building replacement or rehabilitation, and the newhouse building replacement. The predesign must include potential tenants, project costs, and schedules.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

State Capitol Master Plan (30000760)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to identify potential development sites, and any infrastructure that may be needed for further development.

(2) The department shall provide a list to all fiscal committees of designated parking areas with: (a) Capitol campus employees; (b) state agency reserve spaces; (c) state agency vehicles; (d) state agency motor pool vehicles; and (e) nonstate agency vehicles. The department shall also provide a prioritized list of parking spaces that ranks campus employees as the highest priority. Other parking locations in Thurston county may also be considered.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

1063 Block Replacement (91000016)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for design, redesign, demolition and other costs required for the project to replace the state building on the 1063 block. The building will be alternatively financed as authorized by and subject to the conditions of section 7002 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,017,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,983,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1103. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Dolliver - Critical Building Repairs (30000726)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for development of a plan that identifies the existing building deficiencies and recommended project specific improvements with cost estimates to be completed as funding becomes available. Urgent repairs to this building will be prioritized against the other projects in the department of enterprise services' minor works project list.

Appropriation:

Enterprise Services Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1104. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Feasibility Study for Restoring Skylights in Legislative Building (92000010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a study to determine the feasibility and requirements of replacing the materials covering the original skylight openings that are located above the house of representatives and senate chambers in the legislative building with safety glass to allow as much natural light as possible into the chambers as originally intended. The study must determine the cost, including the relocation of existing equipment; the impact upon the sound, HVAC system(s) and light levels within each chamber; any other requirements needed to replace the materials with safety glass; and an estimated schedule needed for the work. The replacement glass must be of a quality that will provide for a reasonable assurance of safety in the event of an earthquake.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1105. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Utility Renewal Plan (92000012)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for assessing the current condition of underground utilities on the Capitol campus and developing a plan of renewal that stages the work so that the systems and segments at highest risk of failure are replaced or repaired in a sequence of work that is the most cost effective. The plan must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2016.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1106. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capital Furnishings Preservation Committee Projects (92000013)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$68,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$68,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1107. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Pierce County Readiness Center (30000593)

Reappropriation:

Military Department Capital Account—State. . . .$2,758,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,269,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$24,876,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$30,903,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,698,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,601,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1108. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

The reappropriation and appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The legislature intends to support the transfer of the Olympia armory to the Thurston county boys and girls club. The military department must execute an agreement to transfer title of the property to the Thurston county boys and girls club if the club agrees to use the facility as a boys and girls club for a minimum of ten years. The transfer agreement must specify a mutually agreed transfer date following the completion of the Thurston county readiness center. The transfer agreement must require the club to cover any closing costs and must specify a purchase price of one dollar. The agreement must be reported to the house of representatives capital budget committee, senate ways and means committee, and the governor's office by January 1, 2016.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,750,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,883,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$34,207,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$42,090,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$44,890,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1109. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation - 2013-2015 Biennium (30000602)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$307,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,082,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,389,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,837,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,726,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1110. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program - 2013-2015 Biennium (30000605)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$8,893,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,032,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1111. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation - 2015-2017 Biennium (30000702)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,110,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$7,488,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$12,598,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,598,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1112. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program - 2015-2017 Biennium (30000744)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,663,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$15,953,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$21,616,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$21,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1113. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Montesano Readiness Center Roof Replacement and Tenant Improvements (30000805)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,750,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$5,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1114. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

National Parks Service Maritime Heritage Grants (91000008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $28,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the center for wooden boats' historic small craft project.

(2) $87,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Northwest seaport's preservation of the national historic landmark 1889 tugboat Arthur Foss.

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$105,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1115. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Historic County Courthouse Grants Program (30000010)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1116. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Historic Courthouse Preservation Grants (92000001)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,696,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$304,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1117. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Heritage Barn Preservation Program (92000002)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$256,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$244,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1118. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Acquisition/Rehabilitation of Historic Matsuda and Mukai Sites (91000006)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1119. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Heritage Barn Preservation Program (30000009)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,450,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Naselle Youth Camp - Three Cottages: Renovation (20081222)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,703,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$197,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building (20081319)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$29,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$828,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$29,828,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Medical Lake Campus - Laundry Building: New Construction (20082371)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,100,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide (91000037)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Up to $600,000 may be used for necessary renovations at the Maple Lane facility for the purpose of temporary forensic beds.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,645,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,645,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School Electrical Service Rehabilitation (30000415)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for electrical service rehabilitation and improvements on campus. The department of social and health services will also coordinate with the department of health to install a new and separate electrical service for the public health laboratory.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide (30001859)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$755,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,755,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide (30002235)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,155,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,155,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and Treatment Center - Orcas: Acute Treatment Addition (30002733)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - South Hall: Building Systems Replacement (30002735)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$4,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School: Campus Master Plan (30002738)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital - Westlake: Nurse Call System (30002739)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School: Campus Master Plan and Forest Management Plan (30002740)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Yakima Valley School - Main Building: Roofing Replacement (30002742)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School: New Acute Mental Health Unit (30002745)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - Forensic Services: Two Wards Addition (30002765)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,700,000

TOTAL. . . .$22,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - East Campus: Psychiatric Intensive Care Unit and Competency Restoration (30002773)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital - Water System: Improvements (30003215)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Yakima Valley School: Center for Excellence (30003236)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - South Hall: Wards Preservation and Renewal (30003240)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - East Campus: Wards Preservation and Renewal (30003241)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - East Campus: Building Systems Replacement (30003244)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital and Western State Hospital - All Wards: Patient Safety Improvements (91000019)

Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$2,569,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,180,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,549,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

ESH-15 Bed Addition for Substitute Senate Bill No. 5889 (92000016)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Newborn Screening Wing Addition (30000301)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,049,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,049,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Newborn Screening Lab Conversion (30000302)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,141,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,141,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Minor Works - Program (30000315)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$322,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$322,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000323)

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal. . . .$23,225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,575,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000328)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$277,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$277,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Preconstruction Loans (30000334)

Appropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account—State. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000336)

Appropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal. . . .$32,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$128,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$160,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Safe Reliable Drinking Water Grants (92000002)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,428,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,210,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,638,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Walla Walla Nursing Facility (20082008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$14,357,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$24,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$38,357,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,568,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$40,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000094)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$675,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$638,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,313,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Feasibility Study/Predesign for Washington Soldiers Home Skilled Nursing Replacement (30000090)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000174)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the restoration and preservation of the Washington soldiers home cemetery.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,095,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,690,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,785,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

South Central Washington State Veterans Cemetery Feasibility (30000151)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Eastern Washington Cemetery Upgrade (30000152)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$270,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,422,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$2,692,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,692,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Correctional Complex: Close Sewer Lagoon (20082022)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$214,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,177,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,391,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Transformers and Switches (30000143)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,699,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,849,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Roof and Equipment Replacement (30000195)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,658,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,658,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Clallam Bay Corrections Center: MSC and Rec Building Roofs (30000548)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,808,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,808,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Correctional Complex: WSR Replace Fire Alarm System (30000724)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,001,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$615,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Airway Heights Corrections Center: Replace Fire Alarm System (30000725)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,007,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,392,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,399,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Airway Heights Corrections Center: Security Electronics Renovations (30000726)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,217,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,047,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center for Women: Replace Fire Alarm System (30000727)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,699,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,649,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Correctional Complex: TRU Support Building Repair Fire Detection System (30000733)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$808,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,058,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Correctional Complex: TRU Security Video System (30000801)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,908,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$968,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,876,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Security Video System (30000791)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$972,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,972,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Correctional Complex: WSR Security Video System (30000795)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,033,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,233,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Minor Works Preservation (30000734)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Security Video System (30000800)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,038,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,038,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center for Women: Security Video System (30000802)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,917,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$504,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,421,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Correctional Complex: SOU IMU Security Video (30000803)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$640,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington State Penitentiary: Education Building Roof (30000820)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,525,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Correctional Complex: MSU Bathroom Renovation (30000975)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,720,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Statewide: Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30001013)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,396,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$65,095,000

TOTAL. . . .$76,491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Access Road Culvert Replacement and Road Resurfacing (30001078)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington State Penitentiary: Program and Support Building (30001101)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$15,014,000

TOTAL. . . .$16,914,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Prison Capacity Expansion (30001105)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall research best practices for treatment of mental illness for offenders, and design and construct the facility to provide this treatment. The department shall also include costs for continuing mental health supervision with community supervision in the predesign. The department may assign minimum security offenders for maintenance or other activities as needed.

(2) The department shall report to the senate ways and means committee, the house of representatives capital budget committee, and the governor's office options on methods of converting existing minimum security housing units to medium security housing units. The report must contain methods, construction cost estimates, length of time to complete, facility locations where this is feasible, and changes to capacity.

(3) The department, in cooperation with the department of social and health services, shall report to the senate ways and means committee, the house of representatives capital budget committee, and the governor's office, options for including juveniles diagnosed with a mental illness that are housed at a juvenile rehabilitation facility at the maple lane facility. The report must include cost benefits, added construction costs, and any changes required in state or federal law.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$184,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$188,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2060. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Omnibus Minor Works (30000017)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$456,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$456,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Supply Facilities (19742006)

Reappropriation:

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account (Water

Supply Facilities)—State. . . .$345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,205,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department of ecology and department of health shall work with the Yakama nation to engage a third party to evaluate the specific technical concerns the tribe has identified with respect to the timing of the phase 1 cover. Funds may not be expended to place a cover over the trenches which are releasing or are projected to release contaminants until the third party review is completed and collaboratively resolved. A report on the above referenced work, including recommendations and the means for meeting health and cancer risks, must be delivered to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.

Reappropriation:

Site Closure Account—State. . . .$10,917,000

Appropriation:

Site Closure Account—State. . . .$3,675,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,516,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,108,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (20042951)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$594,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Supply Facilities (20044006)

Reappropriation:

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account (Water

Supply Facilities)—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,468,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (20052852)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$421,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,179,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20062003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 136, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$317,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,483,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (20062950)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply

Development Account—State. . . .$1,770,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Account—

State. . . .$6,075,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$7,845,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$83,655,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$91,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Transfer of Water Rights for Cabin Owners (20081951)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$161,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$289,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (20084008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,754,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$81,121,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$92,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (20084010)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$221,000

Water Quality Capital Account—State. . . .$43,000

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$570,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$834,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$66,036,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$66,870,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Loan Program (20084011)

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State. . . .$14,581,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$125,419,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$140,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Storage Feasibility Study (20084026)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 3035, chapter 497, Laws of 2009.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$82,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,168,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20084029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 3054, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,456,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,544,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000007)

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal

ARRA. . . .$766,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State. . . .$3,970,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,736,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$173,964,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$178,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,838,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,162,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000028)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$715,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,285,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Kittitas Groundwater Study (30000029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 3001, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account (Water

Supply Facilities)—State. . . .$76,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$624,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,327,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$9,165,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$10,492,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$65,419,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,911,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000142)

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal. . . .$1,792,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State. . . .$21,050,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$22,842,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,158,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$1,959,000

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$3,666,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,625,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$35,573,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$41,198,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Settlement Funding to Clean Up Toxic Sites (30000145)

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$185,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,315,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000208)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3024, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$12,341,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,759,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000209)

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal. . . .$51,095,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State. . . .$85,631,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$136,726,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$55,418,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$192,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3030, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,254,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,746,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$32,216,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,618,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$63,834,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000217)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,117,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,883,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Safe Soils Remediation Program - Central Washington (30000263)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$682,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,029,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,711,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,896,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,504,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima Basin Integrated Water Management Plan Implementation (30000278)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$208,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,792,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO - Tacoma Smelter Plume and Mines (30000280)

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$6,841,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,806,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,647,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (30000282)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$791,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds Administration (30000283)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$10,695,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,505,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$23,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Statewide Storm Water Projects (30000294)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3041, chapter 4, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$14,411,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,589,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (30000322)

Reappropriation:

Waste Tire Removal Account—State. . . .$388,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$612,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Mercury Switch Removal (30000323)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$135,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (30000324)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,120,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Wood Stove Emissions (30000325)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,820,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000326)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$36,634,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,366,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000327)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3067, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal. . . .$50,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State. . . .$184,110,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$234,110,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,890,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000328)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$9,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000331)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,695,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,305,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000332)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,048,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Dungeness Water Supply and Mitigation (30000333)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 3082, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,003,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$47,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000334)

The appropriation and reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Up to $400,000 of the reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to contract, after a competitive bidding process, for the clean up and remediation of the former Ruston Way tunnel.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$717,000

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$26,672,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$27,389,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,271,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$36,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects - Programmatic (30000335)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000337)

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$19,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$31,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000351)

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$6,735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,565,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000372)

Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Account—

State. . . .$16,052,000

Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply

Development Account—State. . . .$28,113,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$44,165,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,335,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$74,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (20064008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,296,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$90,604,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$98,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000373)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,162,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,938,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000374)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$45,779,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,758,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$62,537,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000389)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3080, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,804,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$196,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coordinated Prevention Grants (CPG) (30000426)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$120,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$135,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000427)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the department of ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its centennial clean water program grant.

(2) The agency must encourage local government use of federally funded water pollution control infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture - rural development.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$160,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$180,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (30000428)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Woodstove Emissions (30000429)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (30000431)

Appropriation:

Waste Tire Removal Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000432)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$13,772,000

TOTAL. . . .$24,772,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$65,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$300,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$365,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000490)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000534)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $12,000,000 of the water pollution control revolving account—state is provided solely as state match for federal clean water funds.

(2) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the department of ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its water pollution control program loan.

(3) The agency must encourage local government use of federally funded water pollution control infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture - rural development.

Appropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal. . . .$50,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State. . . .$153,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$203,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$800,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,003,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Financial Assistance Program (30000535)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for the storm water financial assistance program.

(2) $981,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Washington State University LID frontage - water quality project.

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$33,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$53,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$280,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$333,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000536)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design (30000537)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$35,560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$92,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$127,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000538)

Appropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$12,146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$67,900,000

TOTAL. . . .$80,046,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Toxics Sites – Puget Sound (30000542)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$22,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$72,763,000

TOTAL. . . .$95,313,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000587)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance and grants to conservation districts for the purpose of implementing water conservation measures and irrigation efficiencies. The department of ecology and the state conservation commission shall give preference in order of priority to projects located in the 16 fish critical basins, other water short basins, and basins with significant water resource and instream flow problems. Projects that are not within basins as described in this subsection are also eligible to receive funding.

(2) Conservation districts statewide are eligible for grants listed in subsection (1) of this section. A conservation district receiving funds shall manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the water saved by the water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency will be placed as a purchase or a lease in the trust water rights program to enhance instream flows. The proportion of saved water placed in the trust water rights program must be equal to the percentage of the public investment in the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency. The percentage of the public investment may not exceed eighty-five percent of the total cost of the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency.

(3) Up to $300,000 of the appropriation in this section may be allocated for the purchase and installation of flow meters that are implemented in cooperation with the Washington State Department of Fish and Wildlife fish screening program authorized under RCW 77.57.070.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000588)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,000,000 of the Columbia River basin water supply development account—state is provided solely for the Sullivan Lake water supply project to replace funds that were diverted to fund repairs to the Moses Lake irrigation and reclamation district dam.

(2) The balance of the appropriations are provided solely for: Coordinated water conservation plan projects; Walla Walla integrated planning; Icicle Creek integrated planning; new water supply projects; the Methow Valley irrigation district instream flow improvement project; the port of Walla Walla water leasing project; the 2016 water supply and demand forecast; Columbia River off-channel storage feasibility project development; the HHH Switzler storage project environmental impact statement; water acquisitions; the Stemilt WRIA 40A storage study; office of Columbia River staffing costs; department of fish and wildlife support; a water service contract with the United States bureau of reclamation to provide water from Lake Roosevelt to end users; and other projects under the Columbia River water supply development program.

(3) In any future requests for project funding under the Columbia River water supply development program, the department must prepare and submit with the budget request an analysis that estimates the total costs of developing and delivering water through the project. For each project, the department must:

(a) Identify the project beneficiaries;

(b) Estimate the project timeline, from feasibility through water development and delivery;

(c) Delineate the total estimated public and private costs and fund sources for developing the water; and

(d) Delineate the total estimated public and private costs and fund sources for delivering the water.

(4) The department must prepare and submit the same analysis as required in subsection (3) of this section for existing water development projects, including those in the feasibility phase.

Appropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue Recovery

Account—State. . . .$2,200,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Account—

State. . . .$16,800,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$19,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$19,761,000

TOTAL. . . .$38,761,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000589)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,055,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$15,600,000

TOTAL. . . .$18,655,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000590)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for: Tributary/mainstem enhancement and watershed acquisitions; fish passage projects at the Cle Elum, Keechelus, Kachess, and Tieton reservoirs; the Keechelus to Kachess pipeline; the Cle Elum pool raise and Kachess reservoir drought relief pumping plant projects; selected aquifer storage and recovery projects; agricultural and municipal conservation projects; water bank and exchange programs; and other projects under the Yakima integrated plan.

(2)(a) The legislature finds that it is important to apportion financial responsibility for the substantial capital projects proposed under the Yakima River basin integrated plan consistent with RCW 90.38.120 which directs that "at least one-half of the total costs to finance the implementation of the [Yakima] integrated plan. . . be funded through federal, private, and other nonstate sources, including a significant contribution of funding from local project beneficiaries."

(b) By December 15, 2015, the department must prepare and submit a report to the legislature estimating the cost per acre of land and the cost per acre-foot of water to finance the construction of the Keechelus to Kachess pipeline project and the Kachess Reservoir drought relief pumping plant project. The primary objective is to inform the long-term financial planning of the project beneficiaries, the proratable irrigation districts and their ratepayers, who will bear the construction, maintenance and operation costs.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,800,000

State Taxable Building Construction

Account—State. . . .$20,200,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$32,100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$120,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$182,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000591)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,051,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,349,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (91000032)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$6,637,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,633,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

FY 2012 Statewide Stormwater Grant Program (91000053)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$14,789,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,284,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$24,073,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Stormwater Retrofit and LID Competitive Grants (91000054)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$6,952,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,511,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,463,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Skagit Mitigation (91000181)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,423,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$802,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Protect Communities from Flood and Drought (92000002)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$228,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,747,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Wastewater Treatment and Water Reclamation (92000041)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3016, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$151,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,279,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Flood Levee Improvements (92000057)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 503, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$301,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,510,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,811,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,689,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Ground Water Management Yakima Basin (92000061)

Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Account—

State. . . .$189,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$261,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Improvements (92000076)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3081, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$91,456,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,544,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplain Management and Control Grants (92000078)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3069, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$40,389,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,611,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lower Yakima GWMA Program Development (92000085)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,614,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Drought Response (92000142)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

State Drought Preparedness Account—State. . . .$14,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE AGENCY

Underground Storage Tank Capital Program Demonstration and Design (30000001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section must be used for projects that provide a benefit to the public through removal, replacement or upgrade of underground storage tank fuel systems, retrofit existing systems to disperse renewable or alternative fuels, and cleanup of contamination caused by legacy petroleum releases. All projects must develop and acquire assets that have a useful life of at least thirteen years. These requirements must be specified in funding agreements issued by the agency.

(2)(a) $1,800,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to design a capital financial assistance program to provide underground storage tank owners and operators with financial resources to remove, replace or upgrade underground storage tank fuel systems, retrofit existing systems to disperse renewable or alternative fuels, and to clean up contamination caused by legacy petroleum releases.

(b) The design must:

(i) Assess options for program structure and administration, and develop a recommended program design, financial management plan and staffing model;

(ii) Include data and legal analysis of statewide need, availability of existing fund sources for grants and loans, assessment of owner and operator willingness to participate and potential environmental and economic impacts of the loan program.

(iii) As part of the program design, the agency must conduct a pilot demonstration of a capital grant program that includes three study sites with aging tanks, demonstrated impact to either soil or groundwater, or both, and serious financial hardship, as defined in chapter 374-60 WAC. Each study site may not cost more than $600,000.

(3) The agency shall conduct the study in consultation with the office of financial management, and internal and external agency stakeholders.

(4) The agency must provide a final report of the program design, as well as any associated legislative and budget recommendations, to the governor and legislature by October 1, 2015.

Appropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust

Account—State. . . .$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Dosewallips Wastewater Treatment System (30000523)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$27,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,505,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,532,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lewis & Clark Replace Wastewater System (30000544)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$947,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$130,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,077,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Deception Pass - Kukutali Access and Interpretation (30000774)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$161,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$64,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Flaming Geyser State Park Infrastructure (30000810)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$848,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$477,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,325,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Millersylvania Replace Environmental Learning Center Cabins (30000821)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$608,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,089,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Facility and Infrastructure Preservation (30000845)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,797,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,203,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Wallace Falls Footbridge (91000047)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$336,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$486,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Spencer Spit Water System Replacement (30000140)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$695,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$288,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$983,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Housing Areas Exterior Improvements (30000287)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,858,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,358,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane Road Improvements, Stage 2D (30000693)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Camano Island Day Use Access and Facility Renovation (30000782)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$107,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,212,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,513,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Belfair Replace Failing Electrical Supply to Main Camp Loop (30000813)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,180,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler - Replace Failing Electrical Power Historic District (30000815)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,173,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,173,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Kopachuck Day Use Development (30000820)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$309,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$319,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Flaming Geyser Day Use Renovation (30000832)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$642,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$360,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,002,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Health and Safety (30000839)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,160,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden Maintenance Shop Relocation (30000960)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Twanoh State Park Stormwater Improvements (30000851)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$354,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Rocky Reach - Trail Development (30000853)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,220,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,755,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish State Park: Sunset Beach Bathhouse Replacement (30000653)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,439,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,489,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Revenue Generation (30000847)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$25,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,959,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,984,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fish Barrier Removal (30000854)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$767,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$281,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,048,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Clean Vessel Boating Pump-Out Grants (30000856)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Local Grant Authority (30000857)

Appropriation:

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—Private/Local. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$6,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Federal Grant Authority (30000858)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,750,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sequim Bay Address Failing Retaining Wall (30000861)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,122,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,122,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Nordic Area Improvements and Horse Camp Development (30000877)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$182,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$182,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Cabins, Yurts, and Associated Park Improvement (30000883)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,153,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,153,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fish Barrier Removal (Lawsuit) (30000944)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,034,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,034,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Facility and Infrastructure Backlog Reduction (30000946)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$18,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$24,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler - WWI Historic Facilities Preservation (30000100)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$430,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Riverside Fisk Property Lake Spokane (Long Lake) Initial Park Access (30000971)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,072,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,072,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Facilities and Infrastructures (30000947)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,117,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$250,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,367,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steamboat Rock - Replace Failing Sewage Lift Stations (30000948)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,229,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,229,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation from Harms Way (30000959)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$384,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$384,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Parkland Acquisition (30000976)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except for subsection (2) of this section, the appropriation is provided solely to acquire land that is adjacent or within existing state parks. For this purpose, adjacent means a parcel of real property that shares a border with a state park. The state parks and recreation commission may dispose of property that is surplus to the needs of the state parks and recreation commission by June 30, 2017. Disposal may include sale of the surplus property or long-term lease of the property if such a lease is negotiated and managed by the commercial lands portfolio management unit of the department of natural resources. The commission and the department must agree on an appropriate management fee for the department's land management services.

(2) $225,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the purchase of Young Island.

(3) In order to improve noxious weed control and achieve improved land stewardship and wild fire response, the parks and recreation commission must transfer property ownership of segments of unused trails, specified below, to adjacent property owners, who request such a transfer, in exchange for those adjacent property owners granting the parks and recreation commission a permanent easement for any future utilities the commission desires to place on the transferred property. No other compensation is required for the transfers. If the trail is ever developed upon legislative approval ownership will revert to the parks and recreation commission. The unused trail segments are those along the trail from Whitman county trailhead at Williams lake road up to Martin road trail head in Spokane county.

Appropriation:

Parkland Acquisition Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Backlog Repairs and Enhanced Amenities (92000007)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$794,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,610,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,404,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Goldendale Observatory - Phase 3 Expansion (30000709)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,649,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,650,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,299,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes State Park: Dry Falls Campground Renovation (30000305)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$402,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,951,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,353,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Chelan State Park Moorage Dock Pile Replacement (30000416)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$248,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,448,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,696,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cape Disappointment North Head Parking (30000522)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$925,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steamboat Rock Build Dunes Campground (30000729)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,499,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Dosewallips Replace Failing Electrical Supply (30000814)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Replace Failing Sewer Lines (30000860)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$234,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,406,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Iron Horse - Tunnel 46 and 47 Repairs (30000870)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,600,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,081,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Dock Grant Match (30000872)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Field Spring Replace Failed Sewage System and Non-ADA Comfort Station (30000951)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$101,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$959,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,060,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes - Dry Falls - Upgrade Failing Water Supply Systems (30000962)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$881,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,631,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Depression Era Structures Restoration Assessment (30000966)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$121,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,963,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,084,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Ocean City - Replace Noncompliant Comfort Stations (30000970)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$152,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,291,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,443,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3136. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Program (30000975)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$491,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3137. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Dash Point - Replace Bridge (Pedestrian) (30000972)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$165,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,443,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,608,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3138. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane Guest Services (91000429)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3139. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (20084011)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3146, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$291,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$2,523,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,814,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$95,678,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$98,492,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3140. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20084851)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$639,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$59,361,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3141. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000002)

Reappropriation:

Farmlands Preservation Account—State. . . .$257,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$307,000

Riparian Protection Account—State. . . .$911,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$3,672,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,147,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$64,298,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$69,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3142. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000080)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$366,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$32,634,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3143. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000138)

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$1,589,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,411,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3144. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000139)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3A, developed May 24, 2011.

Reappropriation:

Farmlands Preservation Account—State. . . .$195,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$3,694,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$3,985,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$7,874,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$34,126,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$42,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3145. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000140)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,497,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$23,169,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$26,666,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$43,396,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$70,062,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3146. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Land and Water Conservation Fund (30000142)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,313,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,687,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3147. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000143)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3B, revised April 10, 2013.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$845,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,616,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,461,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3148. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreational Trails Program (30000146)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,328,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,672,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3149. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Restoration (30000147)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation may not be expended on the acquisition of lands by state agencies.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,025,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3150. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000148)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation may not be expended on the acquisition of lands by state agencies.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,440,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3151. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000205)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3161, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Farmlands Preservation Account—State. . . .$3,218,000

Riparian Protection Account—State. . . .$4,973,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$14,918,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$14,918,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$38,027,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,973,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$65,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3152. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000206)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3162, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,886,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$37,278,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$45,164,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$29,836,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3153. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000207)

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$3,309,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,054,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,363,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3154. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000208)

Reappropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State. . . .$5,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3155. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000210)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2013-2B, developed April 10, 2013.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$3,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3156. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000211)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$44,058,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$25,942,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3157. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000212)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3158. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3168, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State. . . .$315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$485,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3159. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreational Trails Program (30000214)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3160. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Infrastructure Grants (30000215)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,320,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3161. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Land and Water Conservation (30000216)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3162. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000218)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$990,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,010,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3163. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000220)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-1, developed June 30, 2015.

(2)(a) $60,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state recreation and conservation office to convene and facilitate a stakeholder process to review and make recommendations for statutory revisions to the Washington wildlife and recreation program. The review must be conducted with consideration of the potential impacts to existing and future relationships with local governments, the federal government, and Tribal Nations. The review must include analysis of the program design, including criteria, information and coordination required for projects to proceed through the ranking and selection processes. Existing allocation categories and percentages must be evaluated to determine how well the system balances the many current statewide needs, including effectiveness in assessing and serving the needs of smaller and traditionally underserved populations, as well as communities with lower per-capita income levels. The ability of the general public to access program-funded projects must also be considered, as well as support for projects and landscapes with multiple values. The review must include examination of ways in which lands are acquired by state agencies through the program, such as gifts, mitigation, acquisition through direct negotiation with landowners, acquisition from land trusts and other nongovernmental organizations that are intermediaries or short-term owners for which long-term ownership and management by a public agency was the purpose of the nongovernmental organization's acquisition, easement acquisitions, and other pathways by which habitat lands are either acquired or managed, or both, by the state. Advantages and disadvantages of all approaches used by the program must be considered, including acquisition and stewardship costs, timing of land availability when compared to funding availability by the state, and other conservation alternatives that could be considered instead of state ownership, such as long-term management by a nongovernmental organization, another public agency, or conservation through less-than-fee approaches such as by easement or other landowner agreements.

(b) The recreation and conservation office may convene stakeholders and facilitate activities as needed. The agency must seek input and meaningfully involve a broad base of interested stakeholders that includes Tribal governments and those with specific subject-matter expertise relevant to the project categories of the Washington wildlife and recreation program. They shall seek broad and diverse legislative input and invite interested legislators to provide information and ideas, including, at a minimum, the majority and minority leadership of the capital committees in the senate and house of representatives. They shall coordinate with the appropriate standing committees of the legislature and may consult with other interested parties, as may be appropriate, for technical advice and assistance.

(c) The final report must include recommended statutory and policy changes to the appropriate committees of the legislature on or before December 1, 2015.

Appropriation:

Farmlands Preservation Account—State. . . .$4,379,000

Riparian Protection Account—State. . . .$5,548,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$22,699,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$22,697,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$55,323,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$300,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$355,323,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3164. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000221)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $500,000 of the state building construction account—state is provided solely for the city of Bothell to preserve the Wayne golf course land, situated along the Sammamish river and Burke-Gilman trail, for fish habitat.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$16,500,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$50,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$66,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$400,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$466,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3165. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000222)

Appropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$9,360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$37,800,000

TOTAL. . . .$47,160,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3166. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000223)

Appropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State. . . .$8,670,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$34,770,000

TOTAL. . . .$43,440,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3167. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000224)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for grants for acquisition, development or renovation of youth athletic fields. The recreation conservation office must require grant recipients of youth recreation field grants to have a fee waiver policy for youth athletic clubs who use the fields acquired, developed or renovation with funds from this appropriation. The fee waiver policy must discount or waive fees based on the youth athletic club's rates charged and scholarships provided to low-income athletes compared to other clubs using the fields. $7,000,000 of the appropriation is provided for grants awarded through the recreation conservation office's competitive grant program. $3,000,000 of the appropriation is provided for the following projects:

Marymoor park/Lake Washington youth soccer association. . . .$1,000,000

Northwest soccer park turf project. . . .$2,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$22,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3168. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000225)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-2, developed June 30, 2015.

Appropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$5,269,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$19,669,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3169. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000226)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $300,000 is provided solely to the Illahee forest preserve for the purchase of the twenty-five acre forested parcel adjacent to the southwest border of the Illahee preserve.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$37,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$160,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$197,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3170. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000227)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$48,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3171. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000228)

Appropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State. . . .$580,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,320,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3172. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreational Trails Program (30000229)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3173. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Infrastructure Grants (30000230)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,800,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3174. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Land and Water Conservation (30000231)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3175. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000233)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3176. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (91000097)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,118,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,882,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3177. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Coastal Restoration Grants (91000448)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Project

Authorized Amount

Black river watershed conservation and restoration

$650,000

Cathlamet selective fisheries

$300,000

Coal creek culvert to bridge

$162,000

Darlin creek conservation and restoration

$1,300,000

Ellsworth creek watershed restoration

$950,000

Greenhead slough barrier removal

$75,000

Improved gears for the lower Columbia fishery

$200,000

Lower Forks creek restoration

$2,150,000

Makah tribe salmon restoration

$174,000

Middle fork Hoquiam culvert correction

$76,000

Middle fork Satsop culvert correction

$97,000

Moses Prairie Restoration

$64,000

Pulling together: Jobs in restoration

$550,000

Quinault nearshore habitat restoration

$343,000

Restoration of Elochoman and Grays river basins

$535,000

Restoration of prairies and wetlands

$200,000

Rue Creek salmon restoration

$982,000

Satsop river watershed restoration

$150,000

Scammon creek barrier removal

$188,000

Sullivan ponds restoration

$43,000

Upper Quinault river restoration

$1,900,000

West fork Satsop culvert correction

$96,000

Total

$11,185,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,185,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,185,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3178. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Youth Recreation Grants (92000055)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3173, chapter 19, Laws of 2013, 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,942,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,688,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3179. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreation and Conservation Office Recreation Grants (92000131)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The recreation and conservation office may retain up to four percent of these appropriations to administer the grants.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$32,785,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$5,611,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$38,396,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$38,396,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3180. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Cost Share - State Match (30000009)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,790,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$16,590,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3181. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Natural Resources Investment for the Economy and Environment (30000010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for grants to complete natural resource enhancement projects necessary to improve water quality in nonshellfish growing areas.

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,250,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,250,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,750,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3182. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP PIP Loan Program (30000011)

Reappropriation:

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$400,000

TOTAL. . . .$580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3183. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Contract Funding (30000012)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,231,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,731,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,924,000

TOTAL. . . .$13,386,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3184. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program (30000017)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the five conservation projects in Washington state approved for grant awards as part of the United States department of agriculture regional conservation partnership program authorized under the 2014 farm bill:

(a) Palouse river watershed implementation partnership;

(b) Precision conservation for salmon and water quality in the Puget Sound;

(c) Upper Columbia irrigation enhancement project;

(d) Yakama nation on-reservation lower Yakima basin restoration project; and

(e) Confederated tribes of the Colville reservation water quality and habitat improvement project.

(2) The state building construction account—state is provided solely for state match to the United States department of agriculture regional conservation partnership program.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$23,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$28,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3185. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Improve Shellfish Growing Areas (30000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for grants to complete natural resource enhancement projects necessary to improve water quality in shellfish growing areas.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3186. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

R&D Grant - Deep Furrow Conservation Drill to Conserve Soil/Water (92000008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for a grant to support the continued development of a deep furrow conservation drill to conserve soil and water in areas of wheat farming susceptible to soil erosion.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3187. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Dairy Nutrient Demonstration Low Interest Loans (92000009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for low interest loans for two or more dairy nutrient management demonstration projects, with at least one located west of the cascades and one east of the cascades.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3188. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation Commission Ranch and Farmland Preservation Projects (92000004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of ranch land preservation projects:

Lust family farm and ranch preservation. . . .$1,619,000

Imrie ranches Rock creek agricultural easement. . . .$4,913,000

Kelley ranches agricultural easement. . . .$2,316,000

Dungeness watershed farmland protection phase 3. . . .$344,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,192,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,192,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3189. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Deschutes Watershed Center (20062008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3205, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,004,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,491,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,454,000

TOTAL. . . .$36,949,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3190. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Voights Creek Hatchery (20081003)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,398,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,899,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,297,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3191. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (20082045)

Appropriation:

State Wildlife Account—State. . . .$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,080,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3192. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3191, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Wildlife Account—State. . . .$500,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local. . . .$1,077,000

General Fund—Private/Local. . . .$1,866,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$27,008,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$30,451,000

Appropriation:

State Wildlife Account—State. . . .$500,000

General Fund—Private/Local. . . .$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal. . . .$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local. . . .$1,000,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$9,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$12,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$104,524,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$54,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$201,475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3193. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Lake Rufus Woods Fishing Access (91000151)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3194. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation (30000727)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,230,000

State Wildlife Account—State. . . .$300,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$9,530,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$89,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3195. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Kalama Falls Hatchery Renovate Adult Handling Facilities (30000480)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3196. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wooten Wildlife Area Improve Flood Plain (30000481)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3207, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$106,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,106,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,600,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$4,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,994,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,722,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3197. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Clarks Creek Hatchery Rebuild (92000038)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to substantially rebuild the Clarks creek (Puyallup) hatchery and fulfill Washington department of transportation mitigation requirements as agreed to with the Puyallup Indian nation for the widening of Interstate 5. The new hatchery must be devoted to salmon production. The department must relocate trout production to other hatcheries.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3198. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Spring Hatchery Renovation (30000214)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,722,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,222,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3199. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Samish Hatchery Intakes (30000276)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,221,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,921,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3200. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minter Hatchery Intakes (30000277)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$7,948,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,198,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3201. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hoodsport Hatchery Adult Pond Renovation (30000686)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,346,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,046,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3202. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Nasselle Hatchery Renovation (30000671)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$13,556,000

TOTAL. . . .$13,831,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3203. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Replace Fire Damaged Fencing (30000655)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$387,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,612,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3204. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Soos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,103,000

TOTAL. . . .$24,103,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3205. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Edmonds Pier Renovation (30000664)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3206. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Marblemount Hatchery - Renovating Jordan Creek Intake (30000666)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,293,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,293,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3207. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Lake Whatcom Hatchery - Replace Intake and Pipeline (30000667)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,354,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,354,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Fir Island Farm Estuary Restoration Project (30000673)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$15,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Programmatic (30000682)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $2,200,000 of the appropriations in this section are provided solely for the department to conduct research and study methods for the department to coordinate with private landowners in order to support the continued varied use of public land. Research may be contracted out and must aim to learn about successful methods being used in Washington and in other states to support the multiple uses of public land. The research must be done in consultation with landowners and other stakeholders.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3210. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Springs Production Shift (30000723)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,620,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,620,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitchell Act Federal Grant (91000021)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,014,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,986,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Fishway Improvements/Diversions (91000033)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,003,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$997,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3213. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hatchery Improvements (91000036)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$16,109,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$18,666,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3214. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Access Sites (91000044)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,518,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,888,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3215. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Fish Passage Barriers (Culverts) (91000045)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$980,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3216. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Leque Island Highway 532 Road Protection (92000019)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$390,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$290,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Beebe Springs Development (92000026)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$640,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,251,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,891,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3218. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Beebe Springs (92000034)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$497,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation (30000479)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,475,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3220. FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP

Community Partnership Restoration Grants (30000007)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,575,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,625,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Land Acquisition Grants (20052021)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,360,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$82,158,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$109,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Legacy (30000060)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$4,020,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,980,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$56,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$91,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3223. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Riparian Easement Program (30000198)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,999,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3224. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Transfer (30000200)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely to the department to transfer from trust status, or enter into fifty year leases for, certain trust lands of statewide significance deemed appropriate for state park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, natural resources conservation area, department of natural resources community forest open space, or recreation purposes. The approved list of properties for lease or transfer is identified in the LEAP capital document No. 2015-3, developed June 30, 2015.

(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and transferred at fair market value. By September 30, 2015, the department must deposit in the common school construction account the portion of the appropriation in this section that represents the estimated value of the timber on the transferred properties. This transfer must be made in the same manner as timber revenues from other common school trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The portion of the appropriation in this section that represents the value of the land transferred must be deposited in the natural resources real property replacement account.

(3) Property subject to lease agreements under this section must be appraised at fair market value. Lease terms must be fifty years with options to renew for an additional fifty years. Lease payments must be lump sum payments for the entire term of the lease at the beginning of the lease. The department shall calculate such lump sum payments using professional appraisal standards. These lease payments may not exceed the fee simple purchase price based on current fair market value and must be deposited by the department to the common school construction account in the same manner as lease revenues from other common school trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040.

(4) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement this section are authorized to be paid out of the appropriations. Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time, environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs and may not exceed one and nine-tenths percent of the appropriation.

(5) Intergrant exchanges between common school and other trust lands of equal value may occur if the exchange is in the interest of each trust, as determined by the board of natural resources.

(6) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department, with full cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section. Fee transfer agreements for properties identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that perpetually restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose. Lease agreements for properties identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that restrict use of the property to the intended purpose for the term of the lease. Transfer and lease agreements may include provisions for receiving agencies to request alternative uses of the property, provided the alternative uses are compatible with the originally intended public purpose and the department and legislature approves such uses.

(7) The department and receiving agencies shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this section. However, the department or receiving agencies may remove a property from the transfer list based on new, substantive information, if it is determined that transfer of the property is not in the statewide interest of either the common school trust or the receiving agency.

(8) By June 30, 2017, the state treasurer shall transfer to the common school construction account any unexpended balance of the appropriation in this section.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,784,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$115,735,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$240,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$365,519,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3225. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sustainable Recreation (30000207)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$18,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3226. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plans (RMAP) (30000211)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$138,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,862,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3227. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Rivers and Habitat Open Space Program (30000221)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3228. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Replacement (30000222)

Appropriation:

Comm/Tech College Forest Reserve Account—State. . . .$500,000

Nat Res Real Property Replacement—State. . . .$30,000,000

Resources Management Cost Account—State. . . .$30,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$60,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$242,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$353,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3229. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

State Forest Land Replacement (30000223)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to the department to transfer from state forest land status to natural resources conservation area status certain state forest lands in Skamania county.

(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and other valuable materials transferred must be distributed as provided in RCW 79.64.110. The value of the land transferred must be deposited in the park land trust revolving account and be used solely to buy replacement state forest land, consistent with RCW 79.22.060.

(3) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department shall execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.

(4) The department and Skamania county shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this section. The department shall identify eligible properties for transfer, consistent with subsection (1) of this section, in consultation with Skamania county, and may not execute any property transfers that are not in the statewide interest of either the state forest trust or the natural resources conservation area program.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3230. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Hazard Reduction (30000224)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $9,000,000 is provided solely for forest health hazard reduction treatments primarily on state lands, and within certain circumstances, on small nonindustrial private timber lands. The appropriation may be used for mechanical treatments, project planning, site preparation, permitting, or prescribed burning. Forest treatments to reduce insect, disease, and wildfire hazards on private lands, that protect state trust lands and mitigate the risk of large-scale damage, shall require a contract with the department of natural resources to provide at least a one-to-one nonstate or in-kind fund match, and to provide a fifteen-year landowner maintenance agreement. Satisfaction of the maintenance requirement at fifteen years is defined, at minimum, as returning the property's forest conditions to the original contract specifications for tree spacing and fuel loading. A landowner failing to meet the maintenance requirement is responsible for recompensing the full amount of state funding received.

(b) A minimum of $800,000 of this appropriation must be spent on restoration activities on department of fish and wildlife managed lands. The department of natural resources must work with the department of fish and wildlife to prioritize and conduct these forest hazard reduction treatments.

(2) $1,000,000 is provided solely for grants to local communities, counties, fire districts, and conservation districts to establish new firewise communities and complete near-term actions to increase public safety. The department must implement policies and procedures to follow by local communities, counties, fire districts, and conservation districts that seek to enroll in the firewise program.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$34,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3231. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Department of Natural Resources Olympic Region Shop Fire Recovery (30000225)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,053,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,053,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3232. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Blanchard Working Forest (30000231)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3233. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2015-2017 Minor Works Programmatic (30000237)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3234. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2015-2017 Minor Works Preservation (30000238)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,836,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,836,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3235. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Contaminated Sites Cleanup and Settlement (30000240)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $261,000 is provided solely for the state's share of liability under the model toxics control act for the cleanup of lead contamination at a rock pit now owned by plum creek timber company.

(2) $95,000 is provided solely for the contaminated soils cleanup at the Cedar creek correction center.

(3) $125,000 is provided solely for the webster nursery pesticides and groundwater cleanup.

(4) $375,000 is provided solely for the underground storage tank cleanup of contaminated soils of an old fueling station at the department of natural resources, SE region headquarters' parking lot that is within the city of Ellensburg new drinking water supply wellhead protection area.

Appropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$856,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$856,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3236. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000241)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3237. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (RMAP) (91000040)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,594,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,424,000

TOTAL. . . .$17,018,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3238. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Puget Sound Corps (91000046)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,200,000 of the state building construction account—state is provided solely for implementation of chapter 191, Laws of 2015 (concerning the management of forage fish resources).

(2) The remainder of the appropriation is provided solely for the Puget Sound corps projects. Portions of the appropriation may be used by the Puget Sound corps to install fishing line collection and recycling devices, provided that the department of fish and wildlife designs and supplies the devices, and specifies where they should be installed.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$200,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3239. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Barbeque Flats Road Access (91000081)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$480,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3240. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Quinault Coastal Forest and Watershed Restoration Grant (92000019)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3241. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Research on Transfer of Federal Lands to Washington State (91000085)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature intends to study the feasibility of acquiring certain federal lands for possible inclusion in the various trust lands managed by the department of natural resources. The appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the Washington state institute for public policy.

(2) The Washington state institute for public policy shall research the potential costs, revenues, and policy impacts of transferring certain federal lands to state ownership. The Washington state institute for public policy may contract with higher education institutions or private consultants as necessary, may consult as needed with legislative staff, and must work with the Washington economic and revenue forecast council for modeling consistency.

(3) The research shall focus primarily on federal forest and range lands. Federal lands to be excluded are: National parks; national historic areas or sites; national recreational areas; national volcanic areas; designated national wilderness preservation system lands; United States military or department of energy lands; and Indian tribal lands.

(4) By December 1, 2016, the Washington state institute for public policy must submit a report to appropriate legislative committees that presents its findings including:

(a) Potential costs to the state of: (i) Land management related to wildfires, forest health, invasive species management, and public access; (ii) addressing deferred forest health issues and ongoing maintenance; (iii) payments in lieu of taxes; (iv) state program development; and (v) other potential costs.

(b) Potential revenues to the state from: (i) Current and increased timber cut-rates; (ii) mineral lease revenues; (iii) recreation fees; (iv) grazing fees; (v) permanent common school account investment income; and (vi) other potential revenues.

(c) Policy research related to the endangered species act, the mining law of 1872, and other relevant federal-state impacts; and

(d) Estimated fiscal impacts, including impacts on trust revenues over a one hundred-year period, if the state were to sell all newly acquired federal lands and all existing state-owned public lands.

(5) By December 1, 2015, the Washington state institute for public policy must submit a preliminary report to appropriate legislative committees that (a) summarizes any initial findings; and (b) subject to legislative approval, outlines the remaining scope of work, timelines and approach.

Appropriation:

Resources Management Cost Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3242. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Animal Disease Traceability (91000004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to work with industry partners to continue and to enhance development of the in-state animal disease traceability system. The reappropriation shall be used to develop or enhance electronic cattle transaction reporting, electronic certificate of veterinary inspection, and, as resources permit, electronic livestock inspection systems.

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$249,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$632,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$881,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3243. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Grants to Improve Safety and Access at Fairs (91000005)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Access Road Reconstruction (30000059)

Appropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$950,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire Training Academy Burn Building Replacement (30000071)

Reappropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4003. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Campus Communication Infrastructure Improvement (30000101)

Appropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$400,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Pierce County Skills Center (20084856)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,432,000

School Construction and Skills Center Building

Account—State. . . .$30,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,462,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,083,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$35,545,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2007-09 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (20084200)

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$283,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$791,476,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$791,759,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Northeast King County Skills Center (20084855)

Reappropriation:

School Construction and Skill Centers Building Account

(Bonds)—State. . . .$41,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,561,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2009-11 School Construction Asst. Grant Program (30000031)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5004, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$7,968,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$389,161,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$397,129,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$60,935,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$497,839,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$558,774,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center (30000076)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,060,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,503,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$23,563,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

SEA-Tech Branch Campus of Tri-Tech Skills Center (30000078)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$338,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,181,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,519,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Grant County Branch Campus of Wenatchee Valley Skills Center (30000091)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,183,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$18,225,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,408,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Clark County Skills Center (30000093)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,801,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,901,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2013-15 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance (30000145)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5020, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. and section 6022 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$255,339,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$132,250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$387,589,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tri-Tech Skills Center East Growth (30000159)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding is provided solely as a grant to constitute local funding available to the Tri-tech skills center in order to be eligible for state funding assistance through the school construction assistance program pursuant to RCW 28A.525.166.

(2) Funds provided in this section may not be used for any project with total project costs per square foot that exceed the construction cost allocation for calculating state funding assistance in subsection (1) by more than thirty-five percent.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,702,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,702,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Capital Program Administration (30000165)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall publish to its web site and report to the office of financial management, the appropriate committees of the legislature, and the legislative evaluation and accountability program a list of local school district projects submitted for school construction assistance within seven business days of the grant program deadline. The report must be updated within seven days following the superintendent of public instruction's final grant award decisions. Prior versions of the report must be maintained on the web site in order to monitor changes in estimates as the grant process progresses. The report must include, but not be limited to:

(a) School district;

(b) Project name;

(c) Estimated square footage by proposed project type;

(d) Estimated total of all project costs and estimated total construction contract cost;

(e) Funding sources and election dates, if applicable; and

(f) Intent to front-fund the project.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide to the office of financial management and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee in electronic database form the following:

(a) Study and survey information beginning with grants awarded July 1, 2015, or later; and

(b) All available inventory and condition of schools data.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall contract with educational service district 112 construction services group to perform an analysis of school construction costs. The analysis must include a significant sample of new and modernization school construction projects completed over the past ten years, with costs adjusted for construction inflation. The analysis must determine the major sources of variation in total school construction costs among different kinds of projects, districts, and regions. The analysis must estimate the cost difference due to variations in:

(a) The size of the project including the size per expected enrollment;

(b) Whether it is a new school or modernization project;

(c) Whether it is an elementary school, middle school, high school, or skills center;

(d) The extent of specialized higher cost facilities such as laboratories, shops, performing arts and indoor athletic facilities;

(e) Delivering specialized programs at skill centers including but not limited to: Dental and medical assisting, mechanical and engineering programs, first responder training, culinary programs, cyber security, and others;

(f) Site requirements;

(g) Durability of construction materials, finishes, building system components, and general life expectancy of the building; and

(h) Other design and construction feature that may contribute to cost variations.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must prepare a report on the findings from subsection (3) of this section and submit the report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by September 1, 2016.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$2,924,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,244,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,168,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2015-17 School Construction Assistance Program (30000169)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $990,000 of the common school construction account—state is provided solely for the Spokane Valley technical skills center to construct five science classrooms.

(2) $675,000 of the common school construction account—state is provided solely for study and survey grants. In calculating study and survey grants, for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award no more than fifty percent of the dollar amount for the minimum grants and square footage allocations. School districts receiving these grants in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium must use data collected or validated by the Washington State University extension energy office for the inventory and condition of existing school facilities.

(3) School districts receiving funding through the 2015-17 school construction assistance program must map the design of new facilities and remap the design of facilities to be remodeled.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must weight and prioritize grant requests on the following criteria and in the following order: (a) Will provide facility capacity needs to reduce kindergarten through third grade class sizes at high poverty schools; (b) will provide facility capacity needs to reduce kindergarten through third grade class sizes in remaining schools.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must expedite allocation and distribution of any eligible funds under the school construction assistance grant program for the appropriations provided to the superintendent of public instruction in this act for distressed schools, STEM pilot projects, or skill centers. For purposes of determining state funding assistance, eligible area must be calculated as follows: (a) Eligible area for STEM pilot projects is 1,440 square feet per science lab or classroom combination, or both; and 1,040 square feet per science classroom. Total eligible area per STEM pilot project must not exceed 15,840 square feet; (b) eligible area for skill centers is gross square feet of the proposed project as submitted to the office of financial management as requested by the superintendent for consideration in the 2015-2017 capital budget. Eligible area for the Spokane Valley technical skills center must not exceed 5,400 square feet, and; (c) eligible area for replacement of the cafeteria at Marysville-Pilchuck high school is 13,500 square feet.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$302,121,000

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$305,978,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal. . . .$3,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$611,099,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,638,150,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,249,249,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids - Healthy Schools Grants (91000406)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts and the department of health, shall develop criteria for providing funding and outcomes for specific projects to stay within the appropriation level provided in this section consistent with the healthiest next generation priorities. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Districts or schools may apply for grants but no single district may receive more than $200,000 of the appropriation; (b) requiring any district receiving funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facilities' needs; and (c) prioritizing applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program.

(2) A maximum of $1,000,000 of the appropriation is for the purchase and installation of water bottle filling stations.

(3) The remainder of the appropriation may be used to purchase equipment or make repairs and renovations related to improving children's health and may include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Fitness playground equipment, covered play, physical education equipment or related structures or renovation; (b) garden related structures and greenhouses to provide students access to fresh produce; and (c) kitchen equipment or upgrades.

(4) The office of the state treasurer must manage the issuance of bonds associated with these grants so as to incur the lowest possible cost of funds in recognition of the short useful life of the equipment purchased with the bond proceeds.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Energy Efficiency Grants for K-12 Schools (91000017)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$415,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$39,585,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (91000024)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5021, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Energy Efficiency Grants for K-12 Schools (91000025)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,186,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,814,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

San Juan Island School District STEM Vocational Bldg Renovation (91000027)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$166,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$834,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Wenatchee Valley Skills Center (92000004)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,167,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,333,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

NEWTECH (Spokane Area Professional-Technical Skills Center) (92000005)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely to the NEWTECH (Spokane area professional-technical skills center) to modernize a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics building. The skill center may not be eligible for additional state funding assistance through the school construction assistance program pursuant to RCW 28A.525.166.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,786,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,493,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account. . . .$657,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$8,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,901,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$21,837,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Puget Sound Skills Center (92000007)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding is provided solely to the Puget Sound skills center to construct a health sciences building. The skill center may not be eligible for additional state funding assistance through the school construction assistance program pursuant to RCW 28A.525.166.

(2) The skill center must negotiate an agreement with the King county public health department to provide periodic monitoring of the dental clinic operations in the health sciences building.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$59,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$19,433,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,441,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (92000009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 602, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$510,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,890,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$27,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center Sunnyside Satellite (92000013)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$343,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,882,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

School Security Improvement Grants (92000015)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5025, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,756,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$900,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,656,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Delta High School (92000017)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,228,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,172,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

STEM Pilot Program (91000402)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The amounts in this section are provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to provide STEM pilot project grants to school districts. These grants constitute the districts' local funding for purposes of eligibility for the school construction assistance program under RCW 28A.525.166. Subject to the terms in this section, school districts are eligible to receive grants if they have a special housing burden due to lack of sufficient space for science classrooms and labs to enable students to meet statutory graduation requirements.

(2) The superintendent shall award grants to eligible school districts under the following conditions:

(a) A district must demonstrate a lack of sufficient space of science classrooms and labs to facilitate meeting statutory graduation requirements;

(b) The district has secured private donations of cash, like-kind, or equipment in a value of no less than $100,000. Before the superintendent may provide funding assistance through the school construction assistance program, the district must provide verification of the donation to the superintendent;

(c) At least one grant award is made to school districts located in southwest Washington;

(d) At least one grant award is made to school districts located in the Puget Sound region; and

(e) At least two grant awards are made to school districts located east of the Cascade mountains.

(3) The STEM pilot project grants program must be administered by the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the STEM education innovation alliance specified in RCW 28A.188.030 and the statewide STEM organization specified in RCW 28A.188.050. The superintendent of public instruction must develop grant application materials and criteria in consultation with the statewide STEM organization, must review applications for accuracy and financial reasonableness, and must administer awarded grants. With funds specifically appropriated for this purpose, the superintendent of public instruction must contract with the statewide STEM organization specified in RCW 28A.188.050 to evaluate applications against the criteria developed for the program and develop a single prioritized list. The superintendent of public instruction must award grants within the appropriated funding and may only depart from the recommended prioritized list after notifying the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature with an explanation of the reasons for departing from the list. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Priority for school districts that secure private donations of cash, like-kind, or equipment in value no less than $100,000 weighted by the ratio of school district enrollments to value of donation;

(b) A district's ability to raise funds through levies or bonds in the prior ten-year period;

(c) Priority for applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program;

(d) The extent that existing STEM facilities are inadequate including the lack of adequate STEM facilities to meet graduation requirements in RCW 28A.150.220;

(e) A demonstration that existing STEM faculty are in place and are qualified to deliver an interactive, project-based STEM curriculum in the proposed specialized STEM facilities, or a plan and budget are in place to recruit or train such STEM faculty;

(4) For purposes of grant applications made in the 2015-2017 biennium, additional square footage funded through this grant program is excluded from the school district's inventory of available educational space for determining eligibility for state assistance for new construction for (a) five years following acceptance of the project by the school district board of directors, or (b) the date of the final review of the latest study and survey of the affected school district following acceptance of the project by the school district board of directors; whichever date is earliest.

(5) Each school district is limited to one grant award of no more than $4,000,000.

(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may charge fees consistent with capital budget guidelines established by the office of financial management for administering the grants.

(7) The superintendent of public instruction must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on the timing and use of the funds by the end of each fiscal year, until the funds are fully expended.

(8) $200,000 of the appropriation is provided for the contract with the statewide STEM organization specified in RCW 28A.188.050.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (91000404)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for renovations of Magnolia elementary school and E.C. Hughes elementary school.

(2) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the Marysville Pilchuck high school cafeteria.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

K-3 Class-Size Reduction Grants (92000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $10,000,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for Seattle public schools to provide additional state assistance for public school facilities necessary to support all-day kindergarten and class size reduction in kindergarten through third grade.

(2) The remaining appropriation is for the K-3 class size reduction construction pilot grant program specified in section 201, chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6080), Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess. to provide additional state assistance for public school facilities necessary to support all-day kindergarten and class size reduction in kindergarten through third grade.

(3) Within the remaining appropriation, a maximum of $750,000 is provided for the office of superintendent of public instruction to administer the K-3 class size reduction construction grant pilot program. The office may not use these funds for indirect costs.

(4) Should Seattle public schools have received additional state funds, in excess of the block grant provided in subsection (1) of this section, through the K-3 class size reduction construction grant pilot program, Seattle public schools may receive the amount provided by the calculated grant in the pilot program in excess of the block grant.

(5) The funding provided in subsection (1) of this section may not constitute local funding available to the Seattle public schools in order to be eligible for state funding assistance through the school construction assistance program pursuant to RCW 28A.525.166.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Campus Preservation (30000033)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Campus Preservation (30000088)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$640,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,920,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

Minor Works - Preservation (30000025)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Denny Hall Renovation (20081002)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$27,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,590,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,890,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Lewis Hall Renovation (20081003)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,915,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,065,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Burke Museum (20082850)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$650,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$26,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,150,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,200,000

TOTAL. . . .$54,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Education Phase I - T-Wing Renovation/Addition (30000486)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$623,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$93,377,000

TOTAL. . . .$94,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

University of Washington Bothell (30000378)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for predesign, which may also serve as bridging documents, design, competition honoraria, project management, and other planning activities including permits. The building may be delivered using design build, as defined by chapter 39.10 RCW with a guarantee for energy, operations, and maintenance performance. The term for performance guarantee must not be less than one year. The state may use state employees for services not related to building performance. Criteria for selecting the design build contractor must include life cycle costs, energy costs, or energy use index. Contractors, and architectural and engineering firms may be eligible for additional points during the scoring process if they have experience with the state agency, or if they are considered a small business. The building must be built using sustainable building standards as defined in section 7008 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$57,600,000

TOTAL. . . .$58,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

University of Washington Minor Capital Repairs - Preservation (30000494)

Reappropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$4,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$42,554,000

TOTAL. . . .$46,754,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

School of Nursing Simulation Learning Lab (30000600)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Interprofessional Education Classroom Phase I (30000602)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,710,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Computer Science and Engineering Expansion (30000603)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$17,500,000

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$32,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

University of Washington Minor Capital Repairs - Preservation (30000604)

Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$28,175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$172,700,000

TOTAL. . . .$200,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000714)

Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$25,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$103,300,000

TOTAL. . . .$129,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

University of Washington Tacoma Classroom Building Renovation - Urban Solutions Center (91000014)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$17,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

University of Washington Tacoma Campus Soil Remediation (92000002)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Center for Advanced Materials and Clean Energy Research Test Beds (91000016)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Pullman - Troy Hall Renovation (20061030)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$850,000

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$400,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,250,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,682,000

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$9,600,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$30,282,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$771,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,303,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Clean Technology Laboratory (30000069)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$24,835,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,835,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

2013-15 Minor Works - Preservation, Safety, and Infrastructure (30000849)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$650,000

Washington State University Building

Account—State. . . .$1,720,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,370,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,564,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

2015-17 Minor Works - Preservation (30001188)

Appropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—

State. . . .$27,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$134,340,000

TOTAL. . . .$161,340,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Tri-Cities - Academic Building (30001190)

Appropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—

State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$68,600,000

TOTAL. . . .$69,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30001324)

Appropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—

State. . . .$10,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Everett University Center (91000026)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$54,563,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$64,563,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Joint Center for Deployment and Research in Earth Abundant Materials (91000029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding is provided solely for capital improvements, infrastructure, and equipment, to support: (a) A transformative program in earth-abundant materials to accelerate the development of next generation clean energy and transportation technologies in Washington; (b) a coordinated framework and resources that can facilitate and promote multi-institution collaborations to drive research, development, and deployment efforts in the use of earth-abundant materials for manufactured clean technologies or recycling of advanced materials used in clean technologies; and (c) environmentally responsible processes in the areas of manufacturing and recycling of advanced materials used in clean technologies.

(2) Administration of the appropriation is under the authority of the Washington State University in collaboration with the University of Washington. Washington State University and the University of Washington, in consultation with the regional universities, the Pacific Northwest national laboratory, and industry experts, shall develop criteria for providing grant funding for specific projects at public four-year institutions of higher education to stay within the appropriation level provided in this section. Funding for administrative offices may be provided for administrative offices west of the crest of the Cascade mountains only.

(3) The office of the state treasurer must manage the issuance of bonds associated with these grants so as to incur the lowest possible cost of funds in recognition of the short useful life of the equipment purchased with the bond proceeds.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Inventory and Condition of Schools Data Collection (91000033)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature intends to complete the data collection, input, and verification of the inventory and condition of public school facilities in order to make informed decisions about K-12 school facility data collection processes and classroom capacity needs to fulfill current educational graduation requirements and class-size ratios. These decisions are best made when based on accurate data collected in a thorough and consistent manner by professionals experienced in making such inventory and condition assessments for public institutions.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the Washington State University extension energy office to complete collection, input, and verification of selected data of public school facilities, including skill centers, in the inventory and condition of schools system administered and maintained by the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) The Washington State University extension energy office shall conduct on-site visits to assess inventory and condition of all facilities for school districts that have no current study and survey as defined in RCW 28A.525.050 on file with the superintendent of public instruction as of July 1, 2015, or no pending study and survey to be filed with the superintendent through an outstanding study and survey grant award. The data collected, sufficient to meet the study and survey requirements for school facilities space inventory and condition analysis, through on-site visits must be input into the inventory and condition of schools system.

(4) The Washington State University extension energy office shall input into the inventory and condition of schools system applicable data of inventory and condition of school facilities from all current studies and surveys on file with the superintendent of public instruction as of July 1, 2015. The data must be input into the system in a manner that captures older information and data first. As studies and surveys from outstanding grant awards are filed with the superintendent, the Washington State University extension energy office shall input data into the system once current study and survey data has been input. Activities conducted pursuant to this subsection must occur concurrently with activities in subsection (3) of this section.

(5) The Washington State University extension energy office shall conduct on-site verification of data for school districts whose current studies and surveys on file with the superintendent will expire by June 30, 2017. Data verification must be conducted to evaluate the study and survey process as a tool to collect accurate inventory and condition of schools data upon which policymakers can make informed decisions regarding school facility and capacity needs. Activities conducted pursuant to this subsection must occur concurrently with activities in subsection (3) of this section and once sufficient data has been input into the system per subsection (4) of this section to conduct on-site visits to verification.

(6)(a) The Washington State University extension energy office, concurrent with activities conducted in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section, must collect data to determine the information in (c)(i) through (vii) of this subsection. Additional on-site data collection for this task or collection of data from "as-built" documents or other valid sources must be accomplished to produce a valid sample for determining:

(b) The accuracy of reported number of classrooms in the most recent survey of classrooms and building data by the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and

(c) The variation in the size of schools and the allocation of space to the categories described in (c)(i) through (vii) of this subsection. The sample must be sufficient to determine this information for elementary, middle, high schools, and skills centers in districts of different sizes, growth rates, age, and relative property values.

(i) The square footage and number of classrooms. Classrooms are rooms that are used as classrooms or that could be used as classrooms under building code requirements and must include labs, shops, computer rooms used for instruction, art, and music classrooms. For this purpose, a music classroom is not a room designed to seat an audience;

(ii) The square footage of libraries;

(iii) The square footage of cafeteria and kitchen space;

(iv) The square footage of gymnasiums, locker rooms, and other indoor athletic facilities;

(v) The square footage of auditoriums and other performing arts space not counted as classrooms;

(vi) The square footage of administrative offices, and space used primarily by staff; and

(vii) The square footage of other space such as bathrooms, general circulation, mechanical rooms, and the balance of the total facility square footage not included in (c)(i) through (vi) of this subsection;

(d) The data included in (c)(i) through (vii) of this subsection must indicate whether the space is in a structure with a permanent foundation or not.

(7) As a general condition of appropriations provided to the superintendent of public instruction in this act, the superintendent of public instruction and each state school district shall provide requested facilities information and access to facilities in a timely manner to enable the Washington State University extension energy office to complete the tasks, oversight, and reporting requirements assigned in this section.

(8) The Washington State University extension energy office shall report progress of data collection, input, and verification to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2015. The Washington State University extension energy office must complete all work in this section and make a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2016.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$1,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Pullman - Plant Sciences Building (REC#5) (30000519)

Appropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$6,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$58,900,000

TOTAL. . . .$66,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

University Science Center - Science I (30000001)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,791,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$55,444,000

TOTAL. . . .$60,635,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Upgrade/Repair Campus Water System (30000422)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,683,000

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$1,770,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,453,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,825,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,278,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Eastern Washington University Minor Works Preservation (30000468)

Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$2,673,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,827,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Renewal I (30000506)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,949,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,949,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Renovate Science (30000507)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$52,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$52,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000513)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$7,667,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$11,667,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$56,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$67,667,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program (30000516)

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$17,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000547)

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$2,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,868,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,085,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Science Building (30000045)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$42,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,771,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$63,771,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Samuelson Communication and Technology Center (SCTC) (30000451)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$56,041,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$61,041,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Combined Utilities (30000448)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$430,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,780,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,210,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Nutrition Science (30000456)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$281,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$44,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$48,981,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation (30000615)

Reappropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation (30000684)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Central Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$1,935,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$5,935,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$18,640,000

TOTAL. . . .$24,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Bouillon Hall Renovation (30000711)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,977,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,977,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Program (30000723)

Appropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$3,777,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,768,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,545,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5072. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Lind Hall Renovation (30000738)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5073. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Combined Utilities (30000740)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$32,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5074. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Old Heat - Plant Annex (30000767)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5075. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000770)

Appropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$2,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5076. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Facility Preservation (30000084)

Reappropriation:

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5077. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Science Center - Lab II, 2nd Floor Renovation (30000117)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$575,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,119,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,694,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5078. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Science Center - Lab I Basement Renovation (30000118)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,525,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,240,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$280,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,045,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5079. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Seminar I Renovation (30000125)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$23,318,000

TOTAL. . . .$23,718,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5080. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Facilities Preservation (30000457)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,720,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$5,628,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$10,348,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,180,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,528,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5081. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works Program (30000487)

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$1,164,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,140,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,304,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5082. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Lecture Hall Remodel (30000493)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$16,310,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,251,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$17,861,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5083. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000612)

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$783,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,132,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5084. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Carver Academic Renovation (20081060)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$323,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$58,600,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$5,400,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$64,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,051,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$71,374,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5085. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

North Campus Utility Upgrade (30000426)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,982,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,582,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5086. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Performing Arts Exterior Renewal (30000428)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$387,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,560,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,947,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5087. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Classroom and Lab Upgrades Phase 2 (30000518)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,800,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$400,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,546,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,746,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5088. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000524)

Reappropriation:

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,750,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5089. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000615)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,572,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$4,886,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$8,458,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$64,422,000

TOTAL. . . .$72,880,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5090. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000757)

Appropriation:

Western Washington University Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$3,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,456,000

TOTAL. . . .$18,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5091. FOR THE WORKFORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

Central Area Community Opportunity Center (91000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $100,000 is provided solely for the purposes of predesign, development, and transition costs at the Seattle Vocational Institute to create the central area community opportunity center and clearinghouse. During predesign and development phase, community needs and input must be considered for project transition and completion. During this process, the board must work with the department of enterprise services to identify current available space within the Seattle Vocational Institute building, and shall prescribe methods of maximizing space efficiency for both current and potential tenants. The board and the department of enterprise services shall also identify costs associated with any renovation work needed to create additional usable space. The Seattle Central College shall work with the board on this effort. A report must be delivered to the legislature by December 1, 2015.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5092. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Grants (20074004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the project list in section 5137, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

(3) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 5044, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$340,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,565,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5093. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Project Capital Grants (30000011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 5120, chapter 497, Laws of 2009.

(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 5045, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,225,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5094. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Grants (30000117)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 622, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,782,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,082,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5095. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Facilities Preservation - Minor Works Projects (30000164)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,653,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,483,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5096. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grants Projects (30000170)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the project list in section 5093, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,131,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,831,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5097. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

History Museum Membrane System Replacement (30000220)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,805,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5098. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Facilities Preservation – Minor Works Projects (30000222)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,515,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5099. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Grants (30000237)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Project﻿ Authorized Amount

Pantages centennial: Façade restoration. . . .$685,000

Chong Wa parapet preservation. . . .$66,000

Rehabilitation of historic structures. . . .$750,000

Renovation heating of interior space of Balfour dock. . . .$1,000,000

Town hall historic restoration: Phase one of construction. . . .$1,000,000

Washington hall restoration. . . .$452,000

Rehabilitation of Ritzville library for ADA compliance. . . .$138,000

Quartermaster and dental surgery renovation project. . . .$309,000

Skagit city school restoration. . . .$91,000

Yamasaki courtyard restoration project. . . .$129,000

Prairie line trail historic interpretation project. . . .$400,000

Ancich netshed restoration. . . .$662,000

Chimney, gutter, and kitchen restoration. . . .$11,000

Federal building rehabilitation - phases II and III. . . .$920,000

Preservation of the Colville Indian agency cabin in Chewelah. . . .$33,000

Arthur Foss preservation and restoration phase II. . . .$166,000

Seaport landing development - renovation of building #8. . . .$1,000,000

Si view community center rehabilitation project phase II. . . .$130,000

Revitalization to historic wells house for community use. . . .$26,000

Chiyo's garden phase II. . . .$108,000

Historic community center, library, and city hall restoration. . . .$185,000

Sea mar latino history and cultural center. . . .$654,000

Olympia waldorf school - the next 100 years. . . .$20,000

Chinook school restoration - final phase. . . .$79,000

Phase III of Worthington park - Quilcene. . . .$244,000

El centro de la raza community access and security project. . . .$100,000

Steam locomotives changed everything. . . .$199,000

The artifact/exhibit environmental conservation project. . . .$8,000

F/V Shenandoah restoration project - phase three. . . .$41,000

Henderson house and Tumwater historic district interpretive. . . .$50,000

Carnegie library renovation phase II. . . .$344,000

Total. . . .$10,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5100. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Exhibit Hall/Cowles Center Renovation (30000036)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The eastern Washington state historical society shall conduct a predesign study for a renovation to the exhibit hall and the Cheney Cowles center that will include strategies to increase nonstate revenues for the operation of the museum and estimate the minimum amount of state funding necessary to preserve, maintain, and protect state-owned facilities and assets. The predesign study must be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2016.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5101. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000038)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$702,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$702,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5102. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls Community College: Campus Classrooms (20062696)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$417,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,199,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5103. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Puget Sound Community College: Learning Resource Center (20062698)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$953,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$32,708,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,661,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5104. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover Park Technical College: Allied Health Care Facility (20062699)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$944,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,389,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$22,333,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5105. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Community College: Technical Education Building (20081220)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,294,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,136,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$26,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5106. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett Community College: Index Hall Replacement (20081221)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,194,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$35,120,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$36,314,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5107. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Green River Community College: Trades and Industry Building (20081222)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,606,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,013,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,619,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5108. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Grays Harbor College: Science and Math Building (20081226)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$14,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$29,444,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$44,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5109. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Community College: Health Careers Center (20082701)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,639,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$33,534,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$41,173,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5110. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue Community College: Health Science Building (20082702)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,636,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,090,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$31,726,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5111. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates Technical College: Mohler Communications Technology Center (20082703)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,428,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,019,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$26,447,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5112. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia Basin College: Social Science Center (20082704)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$595,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$14,505,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$481,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,581,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5113. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark College: Health and Advanced Technologies Building (20082705)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$29,979,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,073,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,052,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5114. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Peninsula College: Fort Worden Building 202 (30000114)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,876,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$501,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,377,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5115. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Seattle Central Community College: Seattle Maritime Academy (30000120)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$14,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,238,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,828,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5116. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Community College: Palmer Martin Building (30000121)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,947,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,293,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5117. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic College: College Instruction Center (30000122)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,152,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$46,516,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,472,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5118. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Centralia Community College: Student Services (30000123)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$631,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$32,089,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,886,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,606,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5119. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Peninsula College: Allied Health and Early Childhood Development Center (30000126)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$903,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,790,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$907,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5120. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle Community College: Cascade Court (30000128)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$983,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$28,231,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,104,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,318,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5121. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Community College: Technology Building Renewal (30000129)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,922,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,497,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5122. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Renton Technical College: Automotive Complex Renovation (30000134)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$449,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,134,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,833,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5123. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds Community College: Science, Engineering, Technology Building (30000137)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,581,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,239,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5124. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Whatcom Community College: Learning Commons (30000138)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,029,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$793,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,822,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5125. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Program (30000723)

Reappropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$1,765,000

Community and Technical College Forest Reserve

Account—State. . . .$60,000

Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction

Account—State. . . .$115,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,940,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,852,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$18,792,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5126. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Preservation (30000779)

Reappropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$965,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,635,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$17,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5127. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof Repairs (30000844)

Reappropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$554,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,231,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,785,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5128. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Facility Repairs (30000897)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,905,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,229,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$22,134,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5129. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site Repairs (30000941)

Reappropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$71,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,503,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,574,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5130. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds Community College: Washington Aerospace Training and Research Center (30000979)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 4, chapter 1, Laws of 2013, 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$660,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5131. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Big Bend: Professional-Technical Education Center (30000981)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$34,490,000

TOTAL. . . .$36,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5132. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane: Main Building South Wing Renovation (30000982)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for predesign, which may also serve as bridging documents, design, competition honoraria, project management, and other planning activities including permits. The building may be delivered using design build, as defined by chapter 39.10 RCW with a guarantee for energy, operations, and maintenance performance. The term for performance guarantee must not be less than one year. The state may use state employees for services not related to building performance. Criteria for selecting the design build contractor must include life cycle costs, energy costs, or energy use index. Contractors, and architectural and engineering firms may be eligible for additional points during the scoring process if they have experience with the state agency, or if they are considered a small business. The building must be built using sustainable building standards as defined in section 7008 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,823,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,742,000

TOTAL. . . .$27,565,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5133. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline: Health and Life Sciences (30000983)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,932,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$23,850,000

TOTAL. . . .$26,782,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5134. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Program (30001038)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$22,456,000

Community/Technical College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$1,744,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$24,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$24,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5135. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Preservation (30001106)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$19,360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,360,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5136. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof Repairs (30001155)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$12,534,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,534,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5137. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Facility Repairs (30001182)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$20,733,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,733,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5138. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site Repairs (30001216)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$2,829,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,829,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5139. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Preventive Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30001286)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects Account—

State. . . .$22,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$91,200,000

TOTAL. . . .$114,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5140. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover Park: Center for Advanced Manufacturing Technologies (30000984)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for predesign, which may also serve as bridging documents, design, competition honoraria, project management, and other planning activities including permits. The building may be delivered using design build, as defined by chapter 39.10 RCW with a guarantee for energy, operations, and maintenance performance. The term for performance guarantee must not be less than one year. The state may use state employees for services not related to building performance. Criteria for selecting the design build contractor must include life cycle costs, energy costs, or energy use index. Contractors, and architectural and engineering firms may be eligible for additional points during the scoring process if they have experience with the state agency, or if they are considered a small business. The building must be built using sustainable building standards as defined in section 7008 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,144,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$33,497,000

TOTAL. . . .$36,641,000

(End of part)

PART 6

2015 SUPPLEMENTAL CAPITAL BUDGET

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6001. A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building for the Arts Grants (30000006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 1011, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

(2) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the Federal Way performing arts center.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$218,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,481,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,699,000

Sec. 6002. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1073 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000189)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($4,400,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $4,400,000)) $4,000,000 from the drinking water assistance account—state for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely as state match for federal safe drinking water funds.

(2) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the public works board must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

Appropriation:

((State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,800,000))

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account—

State. . . .$200,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($208,800,000))

﻿ $204,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$680,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($888,800,000))

﻿ $884,000,000

Sec. 6003. 2013 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Renton Aerospace Training Center Construction (((92000151))) (30000724)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for construction of the Renton aerospace training center.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $10,000,000

Sec. 6004. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1074 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (91000582)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) All expenditures from the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation in this section must be used for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions or otherwise increase energy independence for the state. All expenditures must be used for projects that develop and acquire assets that have a useful life of at least thirteen years. These requirements must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(2) For any project funded from the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation in this section, state funds must not exceed fifty percent of the estimated cost of a project, and funding preference must be provided to projects that offer a higher percentage of nonstate match funds.

(3)(a) $15,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely to create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven building energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies now inhibited by lack of access to capital.

(b) To create the loan fund, the department shall provide grant funds to a competitively selected nonprofit lender that will provide matching private capital and will administer the loan fund. The department must select the loan fund administrator through a competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts, applying criteria specified by the department.

(c) The department must establish guidelines for the lender related to applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and selection criteria. The criteria must include requiring evidence of support for the proposed project from the impacted community and consistency with economic growth strategies and plans of the affected local governments. Applications for loans from the revolving fund must disclose all sources of public funding to be provided for a project. The nonprofit lender must use the revolving loan fund to make affordable loans for projects including, but not limited to: Residential and commercial energy retrofits, residential and community-scale solar installations, anaerobic digesters to treat dairy and organic waste, and combined heat and power projects using woody biomass as a fuel source.

(d) The department must conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds, including oversight of the project selection process and project monitoring.

(e) Projects seeking financing of solar installations under this section must agree in contract to not participate in the cost-recovery program under RCW 82.16.120.

(4) $15,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to advance renewable energy technologies by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. The department shall work with utilities to offer matching grants for projects that demonstrate new smart grid technologies. The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funding to be provided for a project. The grant funds must be used to fund projects that demonstrate how to: Integrate intermittent renewables through energy storage and information technology, dispatch energy storage resources from utility control rooms, use the thermal properties and electric load of commercial buildings and district energy systems to store energy, or otherwise improve the reliability and reduce the costs of intermittent or distributed renewable energy.

(5) $6,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to match federal funds used to develop and demonstrate clean energy technologies. The department shall work with the University of Washington, Washington State University, and the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory to offer matching funds for projects including, but not limited to: Advancing energy storage and solar technologies, and federal manufacturing innovation centers related to use of light-weight carbon fiber components to advance energy efficiency in the aeronautical, automotive, and marine sectors.

(6) The department must report on number and results of projects funded through the clean energy fund, including the number of job hours created and the number of jobs maintained and created, to the governor and the legislature, by November 1, 2014.

(7) The energy recovery act account—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely for loans, loan guarantees, and grants that encourage the establishment of innovative and sustainable industries for renewable energy and energy efficiency technology, consistent with provisions of RCW 43.325.040 (energy freedom account).

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State. . . .$36,000,000

Energy Recovery Act Account—((Federal)) State. . . .$4,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000

Sec. 6005. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1077 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects for Jobs and Economic Development (92000151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriations are released for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriations are provided solely for the following list of projects:

Projects for Jobs & Economic Development

Authorized Amount

City of Bremerton Puget Sound Naval Safety Project

$1,300,000

Fairchild Airforce Base

$2,700,000

City of Lynnwood Main Street Improvements

$250,000

Port of Everett: Roll-On/Roll-Off Cargo Berth

$1,500,000

Kittitas County Infrastructure and Facilities

$5,000,000

City of Kennewick Industrial Land

$1,000,000

Perry Tech Institute Building

$1,000,000

City of Buckley Drinking Water Improvements

$350,000

((Coronado)) Carbonado Reservoir Replacement

$525,000

Hopelink Cleveland Street Project

$1,000,000

Redmond Connector

$1,300,000

Washougal ((Storm Water Decant Facility)) Wastewater Treatment Plant

$1,000,000

Roslyn Renaissance Northwest Improvement Company Building

$500,000

Everett/Tulalip Water Pipeline Construction

$1,000,000

((Renton Aerospace Training Center Construction

$5,000,000))

Renton Riverview Bridge Replacement

$1,100,000

Omak City Sewer, Collection System, and Treatment Plant

$2,000,000

Harper Pier Replacement

$800,000

University Place Main Street Redevelopment

$975,000

Sultan Alder Avenue Water/Sewer Line Replacement

$185,000

Quincy Industrial Water Reclamation & Reuse

$700,000

NW Medical School

$136,000

Ione - 8th St Lift Station Replacement

$165,000

Stevens PUD Projects

$532,000

Port Orchard Bay St. Pedestrian Path - Phase 2

$336,000

Dekalb Pier - Phase 2

$255,000

Kenmore Village

$300,000

South Kirkland TOD/Cross Kirkland Corridor

$1,300,000

Washington Agriculture Discovery Center

$100,000

Mountlake Terrace Mainstreet Grant

$2,000,000

Issaquah - North Roadway Network Improvement

$5,000,000

TRIDEC Development of Small Modular Reactor Proposal

$500,000

City of Shelton Wastewater

$1,500,000

Port of Moses Lake Firefighting System

$300,000

Seattle Chinatown/ID Development

$500,000

TOTAL

(($42,109,000)) $37,109,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($35,009,000))

﻿ $30,009,000

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$7,100,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($42,109,000))

﻿ $37,109,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($42,109,000))

﻿ $37,109,000

Sec. 6006. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1078 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects That Strengthen Communities and Quality of Life (92000230)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is released for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) $1,500,000 of the appropriation in this section from the state building construction account—state is provided solely for design development to align ongoing planning for the replacement of the Seattle multimodal terminal at Colman dock with the creation of a public park. The scope of work must provide a design plan that includes an elevated park and corresponding amenities above the terminal. Design development shall be delivered through the city of Seattle. The scope of this project does not preclude any current plans for Colman dock to replace or seismically upgrade the facility, nor does it reduce the amount of general and commercial traffic, high occupancy vehicles, transit, bicyclist and pedestrian movement.

(8) $500,000 of the appropriation from the environmental legacy stewardship account—state is provided solely for an investigation of possible contaminated soils around the Colman dock.

(9) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life

Authorized Amount

Ft. Vancouver - Mother Joseph Academy & Infantry Barracks

$1,000,000

LaConner Boardwalk

$1,600,000

Kent Interurban Trail Connector

$750,000

Town of Concrete Public Safety Building

$785,000

Complete Development of Ashford Park Facilities

$1,000,000

Jackson Park Renovation

$1,000,000

South Whatcom Library Construction

$90,000

Guemes Channel Trail Project

$700,000

Seabrook Trail

$437,000

Vashon Island Allied Arts

$2,000,000

Federal Way Performing Arts

$2,000,000

Japanese Gulch Land Acquisition

$1,000,000

Milton - Triangle Park ADA Upgrades

$225,000

Langston Hughes Performing Arts Center - Storage

$150,000

Wood Pellet Heat in Schools Pilot

$500,000

((Snohomish County Sheriff's Office South Precinct)) Young Island

$1,000,000

Ravensdale Park

$650,000

Worthington Park

$210,000

Eastside Tacoma Community Center

$400,000

((228th Street Trail

$500,000))

Institute for Community Leadership

$275,000

FISH of Vancouver/Nonprofit Community Service Center

$1,000,000

Yelm Community Center

$1,000,000

Ellensburg Depot

$500,000

Roslyn City Hall

$400,000

Northwest Carriage Museum

$375,000

People's Community Center and Pool

$500,000

((Town of Concrete Fire and Life Safety Facility

$500,000))

Chehalis Pool

$250,000

Mount Rainier Park Ranger Memorial

$60,000

McAllister Air Museum

$500,000

Repairs to Stevenson Grange

$50,000

Meydenbauer Park Improvements

$3,000,000

Sixty Acres Park Enhancements

$750,000

Covington Community Park Phase 2

$2,100,000

Johnson Farm Museum - Anderson Island

$250,000

Nikolai Project

$40,000

Ft. Steilacoom Building Preservation

$250,000

Plaza Roberto Maestas - Building the Beloved Community

$1,000,000

Seattle Multimodal Terminal at Colman Dock/Public Park

$2,000,000

Confluence Project

$747,000

Castle Rock Citywide Residential Street Project

$504,000

UWAVE

$30,000

Transit-Community Center

$800,000

Mt. Spokane Lodge

$250,000

TOTAL

(($33,128,000)) $32,128,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($32,628,000))

﻿ $31,628,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—

State. . . .$500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($33,128,000))

﻿ $32,128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($33,128,000))

﻿ $32,128,000

Sec. 6007. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1091 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Construction Contingency Pool (91000428)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for construction projects that confront emergent and unavoidable costs in excess of the construction contingency and management reserves included in the project appropriation. For requests occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting contingency funds from the office of financial management. Eligible agencies that may apply to the pool include higher education institutions, the state parks and recreation commission, the department of corrections, the department of enterprise services, and the department of health. Eligible construction projects are only projects that had project cost reductions. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee as projects are approved for funding.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($4,000,000))

﻿ $1,875,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($4,000,000))

﻿ $1,875,000

Sec. 6008. 2013 2nd sp.s c 19 s 1109 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

1063 Block Replacement (91000016)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for predesign and bridging documents, design, competition honoraria, project management, demolition, and other planning activities including permits. The predesign must specify the tenants of the building as directed by the office of financial management. The predesign must indicate the estimated annual cost increase for state agency tenants compared to the cost of their existing leases. The estimated cost increase may take into account estimated cost savings in staff costs and other costs that may result in more efficient building design and layout of office space. The director of the office of financial management must review these cost estimates and submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature indicating the budget increase that would be required sixty days prior to executing any construction contracts for the building. The lease for any prospective tenant may not be extended beyond the anticipated occupancy date of the building. ((The building will be alternatively financed as authorized in section 7014 of this act.))

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$13,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,000,000

Sec. 6009. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1093 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Natural Resource Building Roof Replacement/Exterior Foam Insulation Repairs (30000546)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($510,000))

﻿ $33,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($3,972,000))

﻿ $4,409,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($4,482,000))

﻿ $4,442,000

Sec. 6010. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1099 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Building Critical Hydronic Loop Repairs (30000584)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,075,000))

﻿ $1,013,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($851,000))

﻿ $410,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($104,000))

﻿ $166,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,030,000))

﻿ $1,589,000

Sec. 6011. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Building Exterior Repairs (30000604)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,000,000))

﻿ $1,075,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,000,000))

﻿ $1,075,000

Sec. 6012. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Underground Utility Repairs (30000687)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,983,000))

﻿ $2,613,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,827,000

TOTAL. . . .(($10,810,000))

﻿ $11,440,000

Sec. 6013. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Natural Resource Building Repairs Phase 1 (91000009)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The natural resource building repairs phase 1 project must include at a minimum the multipurpose room water infiltration project and the roof project. After this work is completed, the department may include work that was in the department's 2013-2015 capital budget request for other repairs to the building.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($4,161,000))

﻿ $4,041,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Construction

Account—State. . . .$940,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($5,101,000))

﻿ $4,981,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($5,101,000))

﻿ $4,981,000

Sec. 6014. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 2024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections Center: WSR Living Units Roofs (30000542)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,785,000))

﻿ $1,868,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,785,000))

﻿ $1,868,000

Sec. 6015. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 2028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center for Women: Replace Fire Alarm System (30000727)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,569,000))

﻿ $2,649,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,569,000))

﻿ $2,649,000

Sec. 6016. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3067 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000327)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($7,750,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $7,750,000)) $15,500,000 for fiscal year 2015 of the ((state building construction)) water pollution control revolving account—state is provided solely as state match for federal clean water funds.

(2) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the department of ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its water pollution control loan program ((loan)).

Appropriation:

((State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,500,000))

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

State. . . .(($184,500,000))

﻿ $200,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving

Account—Federal. . . .$50,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$250,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$510,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$760,000,000

Sec. 6017. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3058 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Skagit Mitigation (91000181)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to develop mitigation options and alternative water sources or tools to make water available for stream flows and for rural domestic permit-exempt uses within the ((Carpenter/Fisher, East Nookachamps, and Upper Nookachamps subbasins)) Skagit River watershed. Up to $500,000 of the amount specified shall be used to develop a rural domestic demonstration project to determine if surface or groundwater infiltration can mitigate for ground water use during low flow periods to meet the mitigation requirements of chapter 173-503 WAC.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$69,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,225,000

Sec. 6018. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Dosewallips: Wastewater Treatment System (30000523)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($4,079,000))

﻿ $4,532,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($4,079,000))

﻿ $4,532,000

Sec. 6019. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3190 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitchell Act Federal Grant (91000021)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,328,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$672,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($3,000,000))

﻿ $7,000,000

Sec. 6020. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP

Community Partnership Restoration Grants (30000007)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .(($1,155,000))

﻿ $1,575,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($445,000))

﻿ $50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,600,000))

﻿ $1,625,000

Sec. 6021. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5007 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center (30000076)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($12,962,000))

﻿ $11,082,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,481,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($25,443,000))

﻿ $23,563,000

Sec. 6022. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2013-2015 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance (30000145)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,340,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for all public school districts once every six years.

(2) $933,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for mapping the design of new facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled, for school construction projects funded through the school construction assistance program.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must improve web-based access by taxpayers to school capacity and actual enrollment in order to understand possible opportunities to increase efficiency through consolidation. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must post this capacity and enrollment information on its web site.

(4) Funds from this appropriation may be used to match federal dollars provided by the office of economic adjustment for school replacement facilities located on military bases.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must expedite allocation and distribution of any eligible funds under the school construction assistance grant program to the Evergreen (Clark County) School District to address the school construction emergency resulting from the fire that destroyed the Crestline School.

(6) The space allocations for state funding assistance purposes for districts with senior or four-year high schools with fewer than four hundred students, as outlined in WAC 392-343-035, must be computed in accordance with the following formula:

Number of Headcount Student-Grades 9-12

Maximum Space Allocation Per Facility

0-200

42,000 square feet

201-300

48,000 square feet

301-or more

52,000 square feet

(7) $775,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely as state funding assistance in addition to any previously awarded state funding assistance for the La Conner middle school replacement.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($285,355,000))

﻿ $382,563,000

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .(($208,232,000))

﻿ $1,526,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal. . . .(($1,500,000))

﻿ $3,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($495,087,000))

﻿ $387,589,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($3,099,310,000))

﻿ $3,099,270,000

TOTAL. . . .(($3,594,397,000))

﻿ $3,486,859,000

Sec. 6023. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

WA-NIC (Washington Network for Innovative Careers) Skills Center - Snoqualmie Valley School District/Bellevue Community College (92000006)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,715,000))

﻿ $31,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,715,000))

﻿ $31,000

Sec. 6024. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

School Security Improvement Grants (92000015)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for nonrecurring costs associated with school facility safety projects consistent with chapter 233, Laws of 2013 (Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5197).

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($10,000,000))

﻿ $6,656,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($10,000,000))

﻿ $6,656,000

Sec. 6025. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5055 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Pullman Pedestrian Bridge (91000028)

Appropriation:

Washington State University Building

Account—State. . . .(($1,500,000))

﻿ $0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,500,000))

﻿ $0

Sec. 6026. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates Technical College: Mohler Communications Technology Center (20082703)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$219,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($23,808,000))

﻿ $24,519,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,709,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($25,736,000))

﻿ $26,447,000

Sec. 6027. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5110 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark College: Health and Advanced Technologies Building (20082705)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,335,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($33,784,000))

﻿ $34,478,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,239,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($36,358,000))

﻿ $37,052,000

Sec. 6028. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7043 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

State Toxic Control Account: For transfer to the

Local Toxic Control Account. . . .$4,000,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account: For

transfer to the Local Toxic Control Account. . . .$12,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account: For

transfer to the drinking water assistance﻿

account, $4,000,000 for fiscal year 2015. . . .$4,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account: For﻿

transfer to the water pollution control﻿

revolving account, $15,500,000 for fiscal

year 2015. . . .$15,500,000

Sec. 6029. RCW 43.160.080 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6011 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a fund in the state treasury known as the public facilities construction loan revolving account, which shall consist of all moneys collected under this chapter and any moneys appropriated to it by law. Disbursements from the revolving account shall be on authorization of the board. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the public facilities construction loan revolving account shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW. ((During the 2009-2011 biennium, sums in the public facilities construction loan revolving account may be used for community economic revitalization board export assistance grants and loans in section 1018, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. and for matching funds for the federal energy regional innovation cluster in section 1017, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.)) During the 2013-2015 biennium, amounts in the public facilities construction loan revolving account may be used for the animal disease traceability project in section 3247, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., administered by the department of agriculture. During the 2013-2015 biennium, sums in the public facilities construction loan revolving account may be used for the clean energy partnership project in section 1038, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6030. A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:

To the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of state funds from the state building construction account, or from any other capital project account in the state treasury, for a capital project or program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from the sale of bonds, the legislature declares that any such expenditures for that project or program made prior to the issue date of the applicable bonds are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6031. 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 ss 1090 and 7013 (uncodified) are each repealed.

(End of part)

PART 7

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7001. RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are thirty-six million eight hundred thirteen thousand dollars for the 2015-2017 biennium, two hundred thirty-three million two hundred eighty-six thousand dollars for the 2017-2019 biennium, and three hundred twenty-seven million two hundred thirty-four thousand dollars for the 2019-2021 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7002. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. (1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of enterprise services and the state treasurer's office to develop requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include charges for services rendered.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Department of enterprise services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $69,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new office building at 1063 Capitol Way South, Olympia.

(4) Department of enterprise services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $8,077,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to repair the natural resources building parking garage fire suppression system.

(5) Department of ecology: Enter into a financing contract for up to $180,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for programmatic improvements to the headquarters building and the eastern regional office.

(6) Department of ecology: Enter into a financing contract for up to $760,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for preservation improvements to the headquarters building.

(7) Central Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $8,414,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a welcome center.

(8) The Evergreen State College: Enter into a financing contract for up to $12,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase a permanent location for the Tacoma program.

(9) Western Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $6,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the carver building renovation.

(10) Eastern Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $10,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the Washington street facility project. The university shall not use their building account or other appropriated account as a fund source for the certificate of participation.

(11) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Centralia Community College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the student services building.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Centralia Community College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct student housing.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark College for up to $8,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the culinary arts facility.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark College for up to $35,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to design and construct a student recreation center.

(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin College for up to $7,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to design and construct a health science center.

(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River College for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an aviation program center.

(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Highline College for up to $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the maintenance and grounds building.

(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the main building.

(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate and expand the Myklebust gymnasium.

(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Tacoma Community College for up to $12,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to expand a health and wellness center.

(k) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla Community College for up to $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a workforce and business development center.

(12) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for up to $13,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to replace the fire training academy burn building; however, local agencies that use the burn building must have indicated support for required fee increases to pay for the debt service for the financing contract. Indication of support means at least sixty percent of local agencies which have used the facility within the prior ten years support the fee increase.

(13) Department of corrections: Enter into a financing contract for up to $2,163,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves for the remodel of the correctional industry's food factory.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7003. (1) The legislature finds that use of life-cycle cost analysis will aid public entities, architects, engineers, and contractors in making design and construction decisions that positively impact both the initial construction cost and the ongoing operating and maintenance cost of a project. To ensure that the total cost of a project is accounted for and the most reasonable and cost efficient design is used, agencies shall develop life-cycle costs for any construction project over $10,000,000. The life-cycle costs must represent the present value sum of capital costs, installation costs, operating costs, and maintenance costs over the life expectancy of the project. The legislature further finds the most effective approach to the life-cycle cost analysis is to integrate it into the early part of the design process.

(2) Agencies shall develop a minimum of three project alternatives for use in the life-cycle cost analysis. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. The chosen alternative must be the most reasonable and cost-effective solution. A brief description of each project alternative and why it was chosen must be included in the life-cycle cost analysis section of the predesign.

(3) The office of financial management shall: (a) Make available a life-cycle cost model to be used for analysis; (b) in consultation with the department of enterprise services, provide assistance in using the life-cycle cost model; and (c) update the life-cycle cost model annually including assumptions for inflation rates, discount rates, and energy rates.

(4) Agencies shall consider architectural and engineering firms' and general contractors' experience using life-cycle costs, operating costs, and energy efficiency measures when selecting an architectural and engineering firm, or when selecting contractors using alternative contracting methods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7004. To ensure that major construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent, appropriations in this act in excess of $10,000,000 may not be expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign. The predesign document must include, but not be limited to, program, site, and cost analysis, including life-cycle cost, in accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management. The results of life-cycle cost analysis must be a primary consideration in the selection of a building design. Construction may proceed only upon providing to the office of financial management the life-cycle costs. To improve monitoring of major construction projects, progress reports must be submitted by the agency administering the project to the office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate. Reports must be submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a format to be developed by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7005. (1) Allotments for appropriations in this act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and RCW 43.88.110.

(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7006. (1) The office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the completion of such project to another capital project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or institution of higher education and only between capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that govern the grants.

(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in this act.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.

(4) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7007. (1) It is expected that projects be ready to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.

(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.

(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and shall use contracted design and construction services wherever necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008. (1) Any building project that receives over $10,000,000 in funding from the capital budget must be built to sustainable standards. "Sustainable building" means a building that integrates and optimizes all major high-performance building attributes, including energy efficiency, durability, life-cycle performance, and occupant productivity. The following design and construction attributes must be integrated into the building project:

(a) Employ integrated design principles: Use a collaborative, integrated planning and design process that initiates and maintains an integrated project team in all stages of a project's planning and delivery. Establish performance goals for siting, energy, water, materials, and indoor environmental quality along with other comprehensive design goals and ensures incorporation of these goals throughout the design and life-cycle of the building. Considers all stages of the building's life-cycle, including deconstruction.

(b) Commissioning: Employ commissioning practices tailored to the size and complexity of the building and its system components in order to verify performance of building components and systems and help ensure that design requirements are met. This should include an experienced commissioning provider, inclusion of commissioning requirements in construction documents, a commissioning plan, verification of the installation and performance of systems to be commissioned, and a commissioning report.

(c) Optimize energy performance: Establish a whole building performance target that takes into account the intended use, occupancy, operations, plug loads, other energy demands, and design to earn the ENERGY STAR targets for new construction and major renovation where applicable. For new construction target low energy use index. For major renovations, reduce the energy use by fifty percent below pre-renovations baseline.

(d) On-site renewable energy: Meet at least thirty percent of the hot water demand through the installation of solar hot water heaters, when life-cycle cost effective. Implement renewable energy generation projects on agency property for agency use, when life-cycle cost effective.

(e) Measurement and verification: Install building level electricity meters in new major construction and renovation projects to track and continuously optimize performance. Include equivalent meters for natural gas and steam, where natural gas and steam are used. Install dashboards inside buildings to display and incentivize occupants on energy use.

(f) Benchmarking: Compare actual performance data from the first year of operation with the energy design target. Verify that the building performance meets or exceeds the design target. For other building and space types, use an equivalent benchmarking tool for laboratory buildings. Web-based data collection and dashboards must also be provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7009. State agencies, including institutions of higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7010. Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005. Agencies and higher education institutions shall comply with the requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7011. PUGET SOUND PROTECTION AND RESTORATION. Consistent with RCW 90.71.340, when expending appropriations under this act that contribute to Puget Sound protection and recovery, agencies shall consult with the Puget Sound partnership to ensure that projects and expenditures are either in, or consistent with the 2020 action agenda. These consultations shall include the exchange of information on specific actions, projects, associated funding, performance measures, and other information necessary to track project implementation and ensure alignment with the action agenda. In situations where the Puget Sound partnership finds that a project is not in, or is not consistent with the action agenda, Puget Sound partnership shall document this finding and report back to the governor and legislative fiscal committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7012. FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION—ART WORK ALLOWANCE. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210.

(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding $200,000 by colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027.

(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any public building by a state agency identified in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200.

(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission during the 2015-2017 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely for direct acquisition of works of art. Art allocations not expended within the ensuing two biennia will lapse. The commission may use up to $100,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces in the state art collection pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210.

(5) The executive director of the arts commission shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the one-half of one percent for works of art purchased or commissioned as required by RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200. The findings of the review must be reported annually to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by August 15th. The review must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) Projects purchased or commissioned per biennium; (b) partner agencies; (c) funding sources by fiscal year; (d) artwork costs; (e) administrative costs; (f) collection care costs; and (g) project status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7013. It is confirmed that the director of the department of enterprise services is authorized under chapter 35A.14 RCW to petition for annexation of the former northern state hospital property to the city of Sedro-Woolley upon the director's determination that such annexation is appropriate and in furtherance of the interests of the state. The director shall consult with the office of financial management prior to making such determination.

Sec. 7014. RCW 27.34.330 and 2006 c 371 s 232 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state historical society shall establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize heritage capital projects for potential funding in the state capital budget. The society shall adopt rules governing project eligibility and evaluation criteria. Application for funding of specific projects may be made to the society by local governments, public development authorities, nonprofit corporations, tribal governments, and other entities, as determined by the society. The society, with the advice of leaders in the heritage field, including but not limited to representatives from the office of the secretary of state, the eastern Washington state historical society, and the department of archaeology and historic preservation, shall establish and submit a prioritized list of heritage capital projects to the governor and the legislature in the society's biennial capital budget request. The list shall include a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The total amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial project list shall not exceed ten million dollars. The prioritized list shall be developed through open and public meetings and the amount of state funding shall not exceed thirty-three and thirty-three one hundredths percent of the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions. The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects. In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the society shall include provisions requiring that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7015. To carry out the provisions of this act, the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design, construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7016. If any federal moneys appropriated by this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7017. (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW 43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended state share of total project costs.

(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

Sec. 7018. RCW 28A.525.166 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 514 are each amended to read as follows:

Allocations to school districts of state funds provided by RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180 shall be made by the superintendent of public instruction and the amount of state funding assistance to a school district in financing a school plant project shall be determined in the following manner:

(1) The boards of directors of the districts shall determine the total cost of the proposed project, which cost may include the cost of acquiring and preparing the site, the cost of constructing the building or of acquiring a building and preparing the same for school use, the cost of necessary equipment, taxes chargeable to the project, necessary architects' fees, and a reasonable amount for contingencies and for other necessary incidental expenses: PROVIDED, That the total cost of the project shall be subject to review and approval by the superintendent.

(2) The state funding assistance percentage for a school district shall be computed by the following formula:

The ratio of the school district's adjusted valuation per pupil divided by the ratio of the total state adjusted valuation per pupil shall be subtracted from three, and then the result of the foregoing shall be divided by three plus (the ratio of the school district's adjusted valuation per pupil divided by the ratio of the total state adjusted valuation per pupil).

District adjusted

Total state

3-valuation

÷

adjusted valuation

Computed

per pupil

per pupil

State

State

=

————

= - %

Funding

Ratio

District adjusted

Total state

Assistance

3+valuation

÷

adjusted valuation

per pupil

per pupil

PROVIDED, That in the event the state funding assistance percentage to any school district based on the above formula is less than twenty percent and such school district is otherwise eligible for state funding assistance under RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180, the superintendent may establish for such district a state funding assistance percentage not in excess of twenty percent of the approved cost of the project, if the superintendent finds that such additional assistance is necessary to provide minimum facilities for housing the pupils of the district.

(3) In addition to the computed state funding assistance percentage developed in subsection (2) of this section, a school district shall be entitled to additional percentage points determined by the average percentage of growth for the past three years. One percent shall be added to the computed state funding assistance percentage for each percent of growth, with a maximum of twenty percent.

(4) In computing the state funding assistance percentage in subsection (2) of this section and adjusting the percentage under subsection (3) of this section, students residing outside the school district who are enrolled in alternative learning experience courses under RCW 28A.232.010 shall be excluded from the count of total pupils. In lieu of the exclusion in this subsection, a district may submit an alternative calculation for excluding students enrolled in alternative learning experience courses. The alternative calculation must show the student headcount use of district classroom facilities on a regular basis for a reasonable duration by out-of-district alternative learning experience students subtracted by the headcount of in-district alternative learning experience students not using district classroom facilities on a regular basis for a reasonable duration. The alternative calculation must be submitted in a form approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must develop rules to define "regular basis" and "reasonable duration."

(5) The approved cost of the project determined in the manner prescribed in this section multiplied by the state funding assistance percentage derived as provided for in this section shall be the amount of state funding assistance to the district for the financing of the project: PROVIDED, That need therefor has been established to the satisfaction of the superintendent: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That additional state funding assistance may be allowed if it is found by the superintendent, considering policy recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel that such assistance is necessary in order to meet (a) a school housing emergency resulting from the destruction of a school building by fire, the condemnation of a school building by properly constituted authorities, a sudden excessive and clearly foreseeable future increase in school population, or other conditions similarly emergent in nature; or (b) a special school housing burden resulting from projects of statewide significance or imposed by virtue of the admission of nonresident students into educational programs established, maintained and operated in conformity with the requirements of law; or (c) a deficiency in the capital funds of the district resulting from financing, subsequent to April 1, 1969, and without benefit of the state funding assistance provided by prior state assistance programs, the construction of a needed school building project or projects approved in conformity with the requirements of such programs, after having first applied for and been denied state funding assistance because of the inadequacy of state funds available for the purpose, or (d) a condition created by the fact that an excessive number of students live in state owned housing, or (e) a need for the construction of a school building to provide for improved school district organization or racial balance, or (f) conditions similar to those defined under (a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this subsection, creating a like emergency.

(6) For the 2015-2017 biennium, schools determined to have a lack of sufficient space to provide science classrooms or labs, to meet the requirements of law, have a special housing burden condition similar to those defined under subsection (5)(b) of this section, creating a like emergency. For the 2015-2017 biennium, school districts are entitled to additional percentage points for school construction projects that have a special housing burden condition only and have received private donations in the form of cash, in-kind, or equipment of more than one hundred thousand dollars. The additional percentage points are determined by (a) school district student enrollments in the free and reduced-price meals program, (b) school district class as defined by RCW 28A.300.065, and (c) the funding assistance percentage as calculated in subsection (2) of this section. The additional percentage points under (a) of this subsection are twenty percent of the percent of student enrollments eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program. The additional percentage points under (b) of this subsection are ten for second class school districts. The additional percentage points under (c) of this subsection are ten for school districts with funding assistance percentages of more than fifty percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7019. STATE TREASURER REPORT ON SHORT-TERM BOND FINANCING. By December 1, 2015, the office of the state treasurer must prepare a report to the Legislature on all various purpose general obligation bond issuances for capital projects from 2005 through 2015. The report must:

(1) Categorize the bond issuances in terms of final maturities;

(2) Explain the current practice of repaying debt in equal debt service installments over a twenty-five-year period, regardless of the useful life of the specific projects or properties being financed; and

(3) Recommend a pilot approach to short-term bond financing that matches final maturities with the useful life of specific projects or properties being financed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7020. NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS. Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. Portions of the general obligation bond proceeds authorized by chapter . . ., Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. (Engrossed House Bill No. 1166, the general obligation bond bill) for deposit into the state taxable building construction account that are in excess of amounts required to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations shall be deposited into the state building construction account. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building construction account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the state taxable building construction account to the state building construction account may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7021. COLUMBIA RIVER BASIN NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS. Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the Columbia river basin water supply development account may be transferred to the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the Columbia river basin water supply development account and the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account to the Columbia river basin water supply development account may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7022. The office of financial management, in consultation with the fiscal committees of the legislature, may select capital projects that have completed predesign to undergo a budget evaluation study. The budget evaluation study team approach using value engineering techniques and life cycle cost analysis must be utilized by the office of financial management in conducting the studies. The office of financial management shall select the budget evaluation team members, contract for the study, and report the results to the legislature and agencies in a timely manner following the study. Funds from the project appropriation must be used by the office of financial management through an interagency agreement with the affected agencies to cover the cost of the study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7023. JLARC WWRP & STATE LAND ACQUISITION STUDY. (1) The joint legislative audit and review committee must conduct a review of state and local efforts to protect and conserve habitat and expand outdoor recreation since 1990.

(2) The review has two objectives:

(a) To determine what existing or potential objective outcome measures can be used to evaluate the success of major regulatory programs or state expenditures that are intended to protect and conserve habitat and expand outdoor recreation; and

(b) To compare the amount of habitat lands protected through acquisitions and easements with the amount of lands protected through the major regulatory programs within three counties west of the cascades and three counties east of the cascades.

(3) The review must include state expenditures and local and federal expenditures used to match state funding in the following programs:

(a) Salmon recovery funding board expenditures;

(b) Puget Sound acquisition and restoration;

(c) Puget Sound estuary and salmon restoration;

(d) The Washington wildlife and recreation program;

(e) State parks and recreation commission expenditures that expand recreational lands and facilities;

(f) Trust land transfer program and other expenditures by the department of natural resources that protect habitat or expand recreation; and

(g) Other state expenditures that expand recreational lands and facilities.

(3) The review must also include the following regulatory programs:

(a) Growth management regulations regarding critical areas;

(b) Wetland restrictions;

(c) Shoreline management rules;

(d) Forest practices regulation; and

(e) Hydraulic project approval program.

(4) The review must identify other objective benefits provided by each of the included programs, such as public safety, habitat protection, environmental quality, public health, protection of intrastructure, and economic development.

(5) The review must also examine a sample of recreation and habitat land acquisition by state agencies within the past ten years to determine whether the state agencies have a land stewardship program for the land parcels, what that program entails, and the extent of compliance with that program. Land stewardship includes, but is not limited to, restoring or developing the land to meet the objectives of the acquisition, suppressing invasive weeds, securing the property to prevent damage, and maintaining the land to prevent wildfires.

(6) In undertaking the review, the joint legislative audit and review committee may contract with experts in measuring the outcomes of regulatory and funding programs to protect and conserve habitat.

(7) By December 1, 2016, the joint legislative audit and review committee must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the senate and the house of representatives that presents information and findings from the study. The report is to include recommendations for accountability measures for determining the achievement of intended outcomes for protecting, acquiring, and improving habitat and recreation lands and facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7024. SCHOOL SITING TASK FORCE. (1) The legislature recognizes that school districts are responsible for siting, building, and maintaining school facilities that provide a learning environment supportive of student achievement, and that schools are integral to the communities they serve. The legislature intends to create the legislative task force on school siting, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to review school facility challenges created by enrollment increases and recent education reforms, including expansion of full-day kindergarten and smaller class sizes.

(2) A legislative task force on school siting is established, with members as provided in this subsection. All member appointments or selections must be made by August 1, 2015.

(a) The president of the senate shall appoint as members, the chairs and ranking members of the committees on government operations and security and the committee on early learning and K-12 education.

(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint as members, the chairs and ranking members of the committees on local government and education.

(c) The governor shall appoint one member who represents environmental concerns related to school siting, one member who represents active transportation concerns, and one member who represents the building industry.

(d) The task force must also include:

(i) A representative of the association of Washington cities;

(ii) A representative of the Washington state association of counties;

(iii) Two representatives of school districts, who represent school districts that serve students in urban areas and currently are experiencing difficulty finding suitable siting locations, selected by the Washington association of school administrators;

(iv) Two representatives of school districts, who represent school districts that serve students in rural areas and currently are experiencing difficulty finding suitable siting locations, selected by the Washington association of school administrators; and

(v) A representative of the Washington state association of county and regional planning directors.

(3) The task force shall choose its chair from among its legislative membership.

(4) The task force shall review the issue of siting schools inside and outside of urban growth areas. In reviewing this issue, the task force must achieve the planning goals and requirements set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW, the needs of school districts facing capacity issues, and the infrastructure needs of local governments. The task force shall also consider the following:

(a) A comparison of providing transportation to and from schools in urban and rural areas;

(b) The impacts of schools on local and regional plans for growth when they are constructed in urban and rural areas;

(c) The availability and cost of water, sewer, transportation, law enforcement, emergency response facilities and services, and other necessary public facilities and services in urban and rural areas; and

(d) Identify school locations that provide the most financially sustainable facilities and make the most efficient use of total tax dollars for each impacted jurisdiction, including school districts, cities, county unincorporated areas, sewer/water districts, fire districts, and the state;

(5) Staff from the office of the superintendent of public instruction and from affected school districts, counties, and cities must support the task force by providing local information as needed. Support provided by staff from the office of the superintendent of public instruction must be provided within existing resources.

(6) Staff support for the task force must be provided within existing resources by the association of Washington cities, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington association of school administrators, and the Washington state association of county and regional planning directors.

(7) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(8) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(9) The task force shall provide a summary of the task force's discussions and any recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.

(10) This section expires January 1, 2016.

Sec. 7025. RCW 28B.20.725 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7027 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the University of Washington building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the University of Washington building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. ((However, during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within one year of the date of transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.)) However, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 7026. RCW 28B.15.310 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7028 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees shall be paid and credited as follows: To the Washington State University bond retirement fund, one-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such bond retirement fund; and the remainder thereof to the Washington State University building account.

The sum so credited to the Washington State University building account shall be expended by the board of regents for buildings, equipment, or maintenance on the campus of Washington State University as may be deemed most advisable and for the best interests of the university, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized by law. ((During the 2011-2013 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.)) During the 2013-2015 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2015-2017 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. Expenditures so made shall be accounted for in accordance with existing law and shall not be expended until appropriated by the legislature.

The sum so credited to the Washington State University bond retirement fund shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on building bonds issued by the university, except for any sums which may be transferred out of such fund as authorized by law.

Sec. 7027. RCW 28B.15.210 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7026 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees at the University of Washington, including building fees to be charged students registering in the schools of medicine and dentistry, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited as follows:

One-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement fund to the "University of Washington bond retirement fund" and the remainder thereof to the "University of Washington building account." The sum so credited to the University of Washington building account shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting, altering, maintaining, equipping, or furnishing buildings, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(3). The sum so credited to the University of Washington bond retirement fund shall be used for the payment of principal of and interest on bonds outstanding as provided by chapter 28B.20 RCW except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(5). During the 2013-2015 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2015-2017 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.

Sec. 7028. RCW 28B.30.750 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7029 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the Washington State University building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the Washington State University building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. ((However, during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within one year of the date of transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.)) However, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 7029. RCW 28B.35.370 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7030 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof all building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be paid into the state treasury and these together with such normal school fund revenues as provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are received by the state treasury shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College, if issuing bonds payable out of its building fees and above described normal school fund revenues, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve months to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified by each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be a prior lien and charge against all building fees and above described normal school fund revenues of such institution. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The amounts deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by such regional universities and The Evergreen State College as authorized by law. If in any twelve month period it shall appear that the amount certified by any such board of trustees is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building and above described normal school fund revenue bonds of its institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of trustees and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751 shall be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and normal school revenue and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto except for any sums transferred therefrom as authorized by law. ((During the 2011-2013 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.)) However, during the 2013-2015 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. However, during the 2015-2017 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.

(3) Funds available in the respective capital projects accounts may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 7030. RCW 28B.50.360 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7031 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of start of each quarter all collected building fees of each such community and technical college shall be paid into the state treasury, and shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June 30th of each year the college board if issuing bonds payable out of building fees shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve-month period to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the community and technical college capital projects account. Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and technical college capital projects account as are necessary to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by the college board as authorized by this chapter shall be devoted to that purpose. If in any twelve-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by the college board is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall notify the college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) The community and technical college capital projects account is hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the capital projects account shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets owned by the state board for community and technical colleges in the name of the state of Washington, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto, engineering and architectural services provided by the department of enterprise services, and for the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds issued for such purposes. ((During the 2011-2013 biennium, sums in the capital projects account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.)) However, during the 2013-2015 biennium, sums in the capital projects account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs. However, during the 2015-2017 biennium, sums in the capital projects account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.

(3) Funds available in the community and technical college capital projects account may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 7031. RCW 43.19.501 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 943 are each amended to read as follows:

The Thurston county capital facilities account is created in the state treasury. The account is subject to the appropriation and allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. Moneys in the account may be expended for capital projects in facilities owned and managed by the department in Thurston county. For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account may be used for predesign identified in section 1037, chapter 328, Laws of 2008. For the 2015-2017 biennium, moneys in the account may be used for studies related to real estate.

During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the Thurston county capital facilities account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 7032. RCW 43.155.050 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 983 are each amended to read as follows:

The public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning loans. During the ((2011-2013 and 2013-2015)) 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the general fund, the water pollution control revolving account, and the drinking water assistance account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. ((During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for economic development, innovation, and export grants, including brownfields; main street improvement grants; and the loan program consolidation board.)) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account such amounts as specified by the legislature.

Sec. 7033. RCW 43.155.070 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7032 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To qualify for financial assistance under this chapter the board must determine that a local government meets all of the following conditions:

(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46 RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;

(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility plan; and

(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into consideration local employment and economic factors.

(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may not receive financial assistance under this chapter unless it has adopted a comprehensive plan, including a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or receiving financial assistance under this chapter if such request is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 may apply for and receive financial assistance under this chapter if the comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040 before executing a contractual agreement for financial assistance with the board.

(3) In considering awarding financial assistance for public facilities to special districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board must consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040.

(4) The board must develop a priority process for public works projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished with assistance under this chapter. The board must attempt to assure a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board must consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority to a project:

(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or emergency public works needs;

(b) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.110, whether the entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010;

(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;

(d) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the health and safety of a great number of citizens;

(e) Whether the applicant's permitting process has been certified as streamlined by the office of regulatory assistance;

(f) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines regarding its permitting process for those applying for development permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007;

(g) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local government and amount of loan money available;

(h) The number of communities served by or funding the project;

(i) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment, compared to the average state unemployment;

(j) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement, or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of extending existing service to such a system;

(k) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.120, and effective one calendar year following the development of model evergreen community management plans and ordinances under RCW 35.105.050, whether the entity receiving assistance has been recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the evergreen community recognition program created in RCW 35.105.030;

(l) The relative benefit of the project to the community, considering the present level of economic activity in the community and the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in communities that have low economic growth; and

(m) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.

(5) For the ((2013-2015)) 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, in place of the criteria, ranking, and submission processes for construction loan lists provided in subsections (4) and (7) of this section:

(a) The board must develop a process for numerically ranking applications for construction loans submitted by local governments. The board must consider, at a minimum and in any order, the following factors in assigning a numerical ranking to a project:

(i) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the health and safety of many people;

(ii) The extent to which the project leverages nonstate funds;

(iii) The extent to which the project is ready to proceed to construction;

(iv) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment, compared to the average state unemployment;

(v) Whether the project promotes the sustainable use of resources and environmental quality;

(vi) Whether the project consolidates or regionalizes systems;

(vii) Whether the project encourages economic development through mixed-use and mixed income development consistent with chapter 36.70A RCW;

(viii) Whether the system is being well-managed in the present and for long-term sustainability;

(ix) Achieving equitable distribution of funds by geography and population;

(x) The extent to which the project meets the following state policy objectives:

(A) Efficient use of state resources;

(B) Preservation and enhancement of health and safety;

(C) Abatement of pollution and protection of the environment;

(D) Creation of new, family wage jobs, and avoidance of shifting existing jobs from one Washington state community to another;

(E) Fostering economic development consistent with chapter 36.70A RCW;

(F) Efficiency in delivery of goods and services, public transit, and transportation;

(G) Avoidance of additional costs to state and local governments that adversely impact local residents and small businesses; and

(H) Reduction of the overall cost of public infrastructure; and

(xi) Other criteria that the board considers necessary to achieve the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Before November 1, ((2014)) 2016, the board must develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives a ranked list of qualified public works projects which have been evaluated by the board and are recommended for funding by the legislature. The maximum amount of funding that the board may recommend for any jurisdiction is ten million dollars per biennium. For each project on the ranked list, as well as for eligible projects not recommended for funding, the board must document the numerical ranking that was assigned.

(6) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments may not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government applicant must provide documentation of attempts to secure additional local or other sources of funding for each public works project for which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.

(7) Before November 1st of each even-numbered year, the board must develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives a description of the loans made under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (10) of this section during the preceding fiscal year and a prioritized list of projects which are recommended for funding by the legislature, including one copy to the staff of each of the committees. The list must include, but not be limited to, a description of each project and recommended financing, the terms and conditions of the loan or financial guarantee, the local government jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration of the jurisdiction's critical need for the project and documentation of local funds being used to finance the public works project. The list must also include measures of fiscal capacity for each jurisdiction recommended for financial assistance, compared to authorized limits and state averages, including local government sales taxes; real estate excise taxes; property taxes; and charges for or taxes on sewerage, water, garbage, and other utilities.

(8) The board may not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds from the public works assistance account before the legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of public works projects. The legislature may remove projects from the list recommended by the board. The legislature may not change the order of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.

(9) Subsection (8) of this section does not apply to loans made under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (10) of this section.

(10) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans are exempted from subsection (8) of this section.

(11) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or recycling facilities under this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent with and necessary to implement the comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.

(12) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may be funded under this section only if the project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

(13) During the ((2013-2015)) 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, for projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the public works board must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its public works assistance account program loan.

(14)(a) ((For public works assistance account application rounds conducted during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the board must implement policies and procedures designed to maximize local government use of federally funded drinking water and clean water state revolving funds operated by the state departments of health and ecology. The board, department of ecology, and department of health must jointly develop evaluation criteria and application procedures that will increase access of eligible drinking water and wastewater projects to the public works assistance account for short-term preconstruction financing and to the federally funded state revolving funds for construction financing. The procedures must also strengthen coordinated funding of preconstruction and construction projects.)) For public works assistance account application rounds conducted during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the board must implement policies and procedures designed to maximize local government use of federal funds to finance local infrastructure including, but not limited to, drinking water and clean water state revolving funds operated by the state departments of health and ecology. Projects that are eligible for the drinking water and clean water state revolving funds may receive public works board preconstruction loans. Projects that are eligible for the drinking water and clean water state revolving funds are not eligible for public works board construction loans. For purposes of this subsection "eligible for drinking water and clean water state revolving funds" means:

(i) Projects that have applied to the state revolving funds and are awaiting a funding decision;

(ii) Projects that have been rejected for funding solely due to not meeting readiness requirements; and

(iii) Projects that have not applied, but would likely be eligible if the project applied and met the project readiness requirements.

(b) For all construction loan projects proposed to the legislature for funding during the ((2013-2015)) 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the board must base interest rates on the average daily market interest rate for tax-exempt municipal bonds as published in the bond buyer's index for the period from sixty to thirty days before the start of the application cycle. For projects with a repayment period between five and twenty years, the rate must be sixty percent of the market rate. For projects with a repayment period under five years, the rate must be thirty percent of the market rate. The board must also provide reduced interest rates, extended repayment periods, or forgivable principal loans for projects that meet financial hardship criteria as measured by the affordability index or similar standard measure of financial hardship.

(((c) By December 1, 2013, the board must recommend to the appropriate committees of the legislature statutory language to make permanent these new criteria, procedures, and financing policies.))

Sec. 7034. RCW 43.160.080 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6011 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a fund in the state treasury known as the public facilities construction loan revolving account, which shall consist of all moneys collected under this chapter and any moneys appropriated to it by law. Disbursements from the revolving account shall be on authorization of the board. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the public facilities construction loan revolving account shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW. ((During the 2009-2011 biennium, sums in the public facilities construction loan revolving account may be used for community economic revitalization board export assistance grants and loans in section 1018, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. and for matching funds for the federal energy regional innovation cluster in section 1017, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.)) During the 2015-2017 biennium, sums in the public facilities construction loan revolving account may be used to continue and enhance the animal disease traceability project in section 3247, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., administered by the department of agriculture. During the 2015-2017 biennium, sums in the public facilities construction loan revolving account may be used for the clean energy partnership project in section 1038, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Sec. 7035. RCW 70.105D.070 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7033 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 992 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control account are hereby created in the state treasury.

(2)(a) Moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 must be deposited as follows: Fifty-six percent to the state toxics control account under subsection (3) of this section and forty-four percent to the local toxics control account under subsection (4) of this section. When the cumulative amount of deposits made to the state and local toxics control accounts under this section reaches the limit during a fiscal year as established in (b) of this subsection, the remainder of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 during that fiscal year must be deposited into the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170.

(b) The limit on distributions of moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 to the state and local toxics control accounts for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2013, is one hundred forty million dollars.

(c) In addition to the funds required under (a) of this subsection, the following moneys must be deposited into the state toxics control account: (i) The costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter 70.105A RCW; (ii) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter; and (iii) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by the legislature.

(3) Moneys in the state toxics control account must be used only to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the following activities:

(a) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;

(b) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;

(c) The hazardous waste clean-up program required under this chapter;

(d) State matching funds required under federal cleanup law;

(e) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(f) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or disposal of paint and hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and agriculture;

(g) Oil and hazardous materials spill prevention, preparedness, training, and response activities;

(h) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring programs;

(i) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;

(j) A public participation program;

(k) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will achieve both: (i) A substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur; and (ii) the prevention or mitigation of unfair economic hardship;

(l) Development and demonstration of alternative management technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management priorities of RCW 70.105.150;

(m) State agriculture and health programs for the safe use, reduction, recycling, or disposal of pesticides;

(n) Storm water pollution control projects and activities that protect or preserve existing remedial actions or prevent hazardous clean-up sites;

(o) Funding requirements to maintain receipt of federal funds under the federal solid waste disposal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.);

(p) Air quality programs and actions for reducing public exposure to toxic air pollution;

(q) Public funding to assist prospective purchasers to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) if:

(i) The facility is located within a redevelopment opportunity zone designated under RCW 70.105D.150;

(ii) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(5); and

(iii) The director has found the funding meets any additional criteria established in rule by the department, will achieve a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur, and will provide a public benefit in addition to cleanup commensurate with the scope of the public funding;

(r) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters;

(s) Appropriations to the local toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed available funds in those accounts;

(t) During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia, the department of ecology's water quality, shorelands, environmental assessment, administration, and air quality programs;

(u) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, actions at the state conservation commission to improve water quality for shellfish; ((and))

(v) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, actions at the University of Washington for reducing ocean acidification;

(w) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, for the University of Washington Tacoma soil remediation project;

(x) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics control account may be spent on projects in section ((3159)) 3160, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. and for transfer to the local toxics control account; and

(((x))) (y) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics control account may be transferred to the radioactive mixed waste account.

(4)(a) The department shall use moneys deposited in the local toxics control account for grants or loans to local governments for the following purposes in descending order of priority:

(i) Extended grant agreements entered into under (((c)[(e)])) (e)(i) of this subsection;

(ii) Remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of properties as provided for under (((c)[(e)])) (e)(iv) of this subsection. The department must prioritize funding of remedial actions at:

(A) Facilities on the department's hazardous sites list with a high hazard ranking for which there is an approved remedial action work plan or an equivalent document under federal cleanup law;

(B) Brownfield properties within a redevelopment opportunity zone if the local government is a prospective purchaser of the property and there is a department-approved remedial action work plan or equivalent document under the federal cleanup law;

(iii) Storm water pollution source projects that: (A) Work in conjunction with a remedial action; (B) protect completed remedial actions against recontamination; or (C) prevent hazardous clean-up sites;

(iv) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;

(v) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(vi) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters; and

(vii) Appropriations to the state toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed available funds in those accounts.

(b) Funds for plans and programs must be allocated consistent with the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW.

(c) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control account may also be used for local government storm water planning and implementation activities.

(d) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to the state general fund, such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

(e) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department may use the following strategies when providing grants to local governments under this subsection:

(i) Enter into an extended grant agreement with a local government conducting remedial actions at a facility where those actions extend over multiple biennia and the total eligible cost of those actions exceeds twenty million dollars. The agreement is subject to the following limitations:

(A) The initial duration of such an agreement may not exceed ten years. The department may extend the duration of such an agreement upon finding substantial progress has been made on remedial actions at the facility;

(B) Extended grant agreements may not exceed fifty percent of the total eligible remedial action costs at the facility; and

(C) The department may not allocate future funding to an extended grant agreement unless the local government has demonstrated to the department that funds awarded under the agreement during the previous biennium have been substantially expended or contracts have been entered into to substantially expend the funds;

(ii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government conducting a remedial action that provides for periodic reimbursement of remedial action costs as they are incurred as established in the agreement;

(iii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government prior to it acquiring a property or obtaining necessary access to conduct remedial actions, provided the agreement is conditioned upon the local government acquiring the property or obtaining the access in accordance with a schedule specified in the agreement;

(iv) Provide integrated planning grants to local governments to fund studies necessary to facilitate remedial actions at brownfield properties and adaptive reuse of properties following remediation. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to: Environmental site assessments; remedial investigations; health assessments; feasibility studies; site planning; community involvement; land use and regulatory analyses; building and infrastructure assessments; economic and fiscal analyses; and any environmental analyses under chapter 43.21C RCW;

(v) Provide grants to local governments for remedial actions related to area-wide groundwater contamination. To receive the funding, the local government does not need to be a potentially liable person or be required to seek reimbursement of grant funds from a potentially liable person;

(vi) The director may alter grant matching requirements to create incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the following conditions exists:

(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship imposed by the clean-up liability;

(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development, public recreational opportunities, or habitat restoration opportunities that would not otherwise occur; or

(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and redevelopment of brownfield property under RCW 70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;

(vii) When pending grant applications under (((c)[(e)])) (e)(iv) and (v) of this subsection (4) exceed the amount of funds available, designated redevelopment opportunity zones must receive priority for distribution of available funds.

(((d) [(f)])) (f) To expedite multiparty clean-up efforts, the department may purchase remedial action cost-cap insurance. For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the local toxics control account may be spent on projects in sections 3024, 3035, 3036, and 3059, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

(5) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be spent only after appropriation by statute.

(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics control account may be used for: Natural disasters where there is no hazardous substance contamination; high performance buildings; solid waste incinerator facility feasibility studies, construction, maintenance, or operation; or after January 1, 2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound, funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310. However, this subsection does not prevent an appropriation from the state toxics control account to the department of revenue to enforce compliance with the hazardous substance tax imposed in chapter 82.21 RCW.

(7) Except during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, one percent of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 shall be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management priorities. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation that are not expended at the close of any biennium revert to the state toxics control account.

(8) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and performance. To accelerate both remedial action and economic recovery, the department may expedite the adoption of rules necessary to implement chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. using the expedited procedures in RCW 34.05.353. The department shall initiate the award of financial assistance by August 1, 2013. To ensure the adoption of rules will not delay financial assistance, the department may administer the award of financial assistance through interpretive guidance pending the adoption of rules through July 1, 2014.

(9) Except as provided under subsection (3)(k) and (q) of this section, nothing in chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. ((effects [affects])) affects the ability of a potentially liable person to receive public funding.

(10) During the ((2013-2015)) 2015-2017 fiscal biennium the local toxics control account may also be used for the centennial clean water program ((and for storm water grants)) and for the storm water financial assistance program administered by the department of ecology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7036. (1) Funds appropriated in this act for minor works may not be allotted until final project lists are submitted to the office of financial management. Revisions to the project lists are allowed for projects not anticipated at the time of budget development but must be submitted to the office of financial management, the house of representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee for review and comment and must include an explanation of variances from the prior lists before funds may be expended on the revisions. Any project list revisions must be approved by the office of financial management before funds may be expended from the minor works appropriation.

(2)(a) Minor works project lists are single line appropriations that include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000. All projects must meet the criteria included in this subsection (2)(a) with the exception of minor works appropriations for the department of fish and wildlife for the 2015-2017 biennium. These projects should be completed within two years of the appropriation with the funding provided. Agencies are prohibited from including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time, would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works projects. Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the minor works categories.

(b) Minor works appropriations may not be used for the following: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; rolling stock; computers; or to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless expressly authorized. The office of financial management may make an exception to the limitations described in this subsection (2)(b) for exigent circumstances after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the legislature regarding the proposed exception.

(c) Minor works preservation projects may include program improvements of no more than twenty-five percent of the individual minor works preservation project cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7037. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Public works assistance account—state: For transfer

to the water pollution control revolving account,

$6,000,000 for fiscal year 2016 and $6,000,000 for

fiscal year 2017. . . .$12,000,000

Public works assistance account—state: For transfer

to the drinking water assistance account, $4,000,000

for fiscal year 2016 and $4,000,000 for fiscal

year 2017. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7038. STATE TREASURER TRANSFER AUTHORITY

State toxics control account: For transfer to the

environmental legacy trust account. . . .$24,000,000

Local toxics control account: For transfer to the

environmental legacy trust account. . . .$30,000,000

(1) As directed by the department of ecology in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer amounts among the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account as needed during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium to maintain positive account balances in all three accounts.

(2) As directed by the department of ecology in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer amounts from the cleanup settlement account established in RCW 70.105D.130 to the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account to maintain positive account balances up to an amount not to exceed $13,000,000 that must be considered an inter fund loan that must be repaid with interest to the cleanup settlement account in three equal repayments in fiscal years 2018, 2019, and 2020.

(3) If, after using the inter-fund transfer authority granted in this section, the department of ecology determines that further reductions are needed to maintain positive account balances in the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account, the department is authorized to delay the start of clean-up projects based on acuity of need, readiness to proceed, cost-efficiency, or need to ensure geographic distribution. If the department uses this authority, the department must submit a prioritized list of projects that may be delayed to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7039. To the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of state funds from the state building construction account, or from any other capital project account in the state treasury, for a capital project or program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from the sale of bonds, the legislature declares that any such expenditures for that project or program made prior to the issue date of the applicable bonds are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7040. Fiscal or related staff from the office of financial management shall form a four-year prioritized capital project list technical work group with staff from the office of program research, senate committee services, four-year institutions of higher education receiving appropriations in this act, and the council of presidents. The work group shall examine and determine key elements, data sources, process improvement, data needs by project category types, scoring and weighting alternatives, and how to better align to the process for budget decisions. The work group shall report options and alternatives to the appropriate legislative committees by December 15, 2015.

Sec. 7041. RCW 43.131.413 and 2010 c 245 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The alternative process for awarding contracts established in RCW 28B.20.744 terminates June 30, ((2015)) 2017, as provided in RCW 43.131.414.

Sec. 7042. RCW 43.131.414 and 2010 c 245 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW 28B.20.744, as now existing or hereafter amended, is repealed, effective June 30, ((2016)) 2018.

Sec. 7043. RCW 28B.20.744 and 2010 c 245 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section provides an alternative process for awarding contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, repair, or improvement of university buildings and facilities in which critical patient care or highly specialized medical research is located. These provisions may be used, in lieu of other procedures to award contracts for such work, when the estimated cost of the work is equal to or less than five million dollars and the project involves construction, renovation, remodeling, or alteration of improvements within a building that is used directly for critical patient care or highly specialized medical research.

(2) The university may create a single critical patient care or specialized medical research facilities roster or may create multiple critical patient care or specialized medical research facilities rosters for different trade specialties or categories of anticipated work. At least once a year, the university shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation a notice of the existence of the roster or rosters and solicit a statement of qualifications from contractors who wish to be on the roster or rosters of prime contractors. In addition, qualified contractors shall be added to the roster or rosters at any time they submit a written request, necessary records, and meet the qualifications established by the university. The university may require eligible contractors desiring to be placed on a roster to keep current records of any applicable licenses, certifications, registrations, bonding, insurance, or other appropriate matters on file with the university as a condition of being placed on a roster or rosters. Placement on a roster shall be on the basis of qualifications.

(3) The public solicitation of qualifications shall include but not be limited to:

(a) A description of the types of projects to be completed and where possible may include programmatic, performance, and technical requirements and specifications;

(b) The reasons for using the critical patient care and specialized medical research roster process;

(c) A description of the qualifications to be required of a contractor, including submission of an accident prevention program;

(d) A description of the process the university will use to evaluate qualifications, including evaluation factors and the relative weight of factors;

(e) The form of the contract to be awarded;

(f) A description of the administrative process by which the required qualifications, evaluation process, and project types may be appealed; and

(g) A description of the administrative process by which decisions of the university may be appealed.

(4) The university shall establish a committee to evaluate the contractors submitting qualifications. Evaluation criteria for selection of the contractor or contractors to be included on a roster shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) Ability of a contractor's professional personnel;

(b) A contractor's past performance on similar projects, including but not limited to medical facilities, and involving either negotiated work or other public works contracts;

(c) The contractor's ability to meet time and budget requirements;

(d) The contractor's ability to provide preconstruction services, as appropriate;

(e) The contractor's capacity to successfully complete the project;

(f) The contractor's approach to executing projects;

(g) The contractor's approach to safety and the contractor's safety history; and

(h) The contractor's record of performance, integrity, judgment, and skills.

(5) Contractors meeting the evaluation committee's criteria for selection must be placed on the applicable roster or rosters.

(6) When a project is selected for delivery through this roster process, the university must establish a procedure for securing written quotations from all contractors on a roster to assure that a competitive price is established. Invitations for quotations shall include an estimate of the scope and nature of the work to be performed as well as materials and equipment to be furnished. Plans and specifications must be included in the invitation but may not be detailed. Award of a project must be made to the responsible bidder submitting the lowest responsive bid.

(7) The university shall make an effort to solicit proposals from certified minority or certified woman-owned contractors to the extent permitted by the Washington state civil rights act, RCW 49.60.400.

(8) Beginning in September 2010 and every other ((year)) September thereafter, the university shall provide a report to the capital projects advisory review board which must, at a minimum, include a list of rosters used, contracts awarded, and a description of outreach to and participation by women and minority-owned businesses.

(9) Beginning in September 2015 and every September thereafter, the university shall report to the office of minority and women's business enterprises and to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees the number of qualified women and minority-owned business contractors on the roster or rosters and the number of contracts awarded to women and minority-owned businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7044. (1) The office of financial management shall develop a master plan for museums and research facilities to address the statewide need for providing storage, research, and display space for collections of art and artifacts, archaeological research materials, DNA tissue samples, tribal artifacts, and other related items of an historical nature.

(2) The office of financial management shall identify the following: (a) Types of space needed to store, research, and display items and collections depending on types of items; (b) an inventory of existing spaces that the state may utilize to fill storage, research, and display needs; (c) recommendations regarding the highest and best use of the capital museum in Olympia; (d) collections and other state assets that may be divested or transferred to more appropriate entities for storage, research, and display; (e) database systems used or needed to inventory collections of items of an historical nature and the ability to display those collections on the internet; and (f) other items related to the storage, research, and display of collections of an historical nature.

(3) The office of the financial management or its contractor must consult with the following agencies in developing the statewide master plan for museums and research centers: (a) The Washington state historical society; (b) state parks and recreation; (c) the burke museum; (d) the eastern Washington state historical society; and (e) other entities as necessary.

(4) The office of financial management must present the statewide museum master plan to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7045. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---