BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.04.010 and 2013 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In all competitive examinations, unless otherwise provided in this section, to determine the qualifications of applicants for public offices, positions, or employment, either the state, and all of its political subdivisions and all municipal corporations, or private companies or agencies contracted with by the state to give the competitive examinations ((shall))must give a scoring criteria status to all veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.007, by adding points to the passing mark, grade, or rating only, based upon a possible rating of one hundred points as perfect ((a percentage)) in accordance with the following:

(1) Ten ((percent))points to a veteran who served during a period of war or in an armed conflict as defined in RCW 41.04.005 and does not receive military retirement. The ((percentage shall))points must be added to the passing mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations until the veteran's first appointment. The ((percentage shall))points must not be utilized in promotional examinations;

(2) Five ((percent))points to a veteran who did not serve during a period of war or in an armed conflict as defined in RCW 41.04.005 or is receiving military retirement. The ((percentage shall))points must be added to the passing mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations until the veteran's first appointment. The ((percentage shall))points must not be utilized in promotional examinations;

(3) Five ((percent))points to a veteran who was called to active military service from employment with the state or any of its political subdivisions or municipal corporations. The ((percentage shall))points must be added to promotional examinations until the first promotion only;

(4) All veterans' scoring criteria may be claimed upon release from active military service or upon receipt of separation orders indicating an honorable discharge, issued by the respective military department.

--- END ---