BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.160 RCW to read as follows:

A school bus driver who has a valid commercial driver's license issued in accordance with chapter 46.25 RCW is immune from civil or criminal liability for acts that (1) the driver reasonably believes are necessary, (2) are taken in good faith, (3) are taken while the driver was acting within the scope of his or her employment or duties, and (4) are taken when coming to the aid of a student rider on the bus that the driver reasonably believes is in imminent danger of bodily injury or death or are taken to protect the driver when the driver reasonably believes himself or herself to be in imminent danger of bodily injury or death. Actions that may be granted immunity under this section include, but are not limited to, the use of reasonable force in self-defense, defense of another person, or protecting another from self-inflicted harm.

--- END ---