BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in RCW 66.24.170, 66.24.175, 66.24.363, and 66.24.371 any licensee authorized under this chapter to serve beer on tap or wine for consumption on the premises may provide samples of beer and wine free of charge for consumption on the premises.

(2) Each sample provided under this section must be two ounces or less. A licensee may provide a maximum of six ounces of samples per customer per day.

--- END ---