BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A work group is established to study the implementation of chapter 289, Laws of 2010 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6476) throughout the state and report its findings and recommendations.

(2) The work group is administered by the department of commerce and consists of the following members:

(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(c) The chief of the Washington state patrol or his or her designee;

(d) The executive director of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs or his or her designee;

(e) One member representing the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(f) One member representing the Washington defender's association or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers;

(g) The executive director of the Washington coalition of sexual assault programs or his or her designee;

(h) One member representing the department of commerce's office of crime victims advocacy;

(i) The secretary of the children's administration or his or her designee;

(j) One member representing the Washington office of the attorney general;

(k) The executive director of the Washington state criminal justice training commission or his or her designee;

(l) Representatives of community advocacy groups that work to address issues of human trafficking of youth, to be appointed by the department of commerce's office of crime victims advocacy;

(m) Representatives of community service providers that serve youth victims of human trafficking, to be appointed by the department of commerce's office of crime victims advocacy; and

(n) At least one member who is a survivor of human trafficking.

(3) Members of the work group shall select a chair or cochairs from among its membership.

(4) The duties of the work group include, but are not limited to:

(a) Reviewing the extent to which chapter 289, Laws of 2010 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6476) is understood and applied by enforcement authorities;

(b) Researching any barriers that exist to full implementation of chapter 289, Laws of 2010 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6476) throughout the state;

(c) Researching, reviewing, and making recommendations regarding the policy of eliminating prosecution of juveniles for prostitution and prostitution loitering; and

(d) Researching, reviewing, and making recommendations regarding the provision of services to juveniles suspected of prostitution and prostitution loitering in lieu of prosecution.

(5) The work group must meet no less than twice annually.

(6) The work group shall compile its findings and recommendations into a report and provide its report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and governor by June 30th of each year.

(7) The work group shall function within existing resources and no specific budget may be provided to complete the report.

(8) This section expires June 30, 2017.

--- END ---