BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By April 1, 2016, the authority shall establish a program to support primary care providers in the assessment and provision of the appropriate diagnosis and treatment of adults with behavioral health disorders through the provision of primary care psychiatric consultation services. The program must provide:

(a) Timely clinical psychiatric consultation to primary care providers serving adults with a behavioral health condition;

(b) Timely access to behavioral health care management through linkages to regional mental health and chemical dependency resources;

(c) Essential crisis and management services, including assistance establishing diagnoses, medication management recommendations, guidance on treatment strategies for both mental health and chemical dependency, and links and access to behavioral health treatment; and

(d) Linkages to additional treatment services, as indicated, and care coordination provided by behavioral health professionals.

(2) The program must be implemented in two phases.

(a) In the first phase, the authority shall select one urban county and one rural county for implementation of the program. In addition, each behavioral health organization that becomes an early adopter of fully integrated purchasing or medical and behavioral health services under RCW 71.24.380(6) shall participate in the first phase of the program.

(b) In the second phase, the authority shall expand the program to include all counties in the state.

(3) The authority shall pursue program financing options to supplement state funds with funds from other public or private sources and enter into agreements to support such arrangements and the goals of the program.

--- END ---