BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.48.095 and 2002 c 124 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Regional jails may be created and operated between two or more local governments, or one or more local governments and the state, and may be governed by representatives from multiple jurisdictions.

(2) A jurisdiction that confines persons prior to conviction in a regional jail in another county is responsible for providing private telephone, video-conferencing, or in-person contact between the defendant and his or her public defense counsel.

(3) The creation and operation of any regional jail must comply with the interlocal cooperation act described in chapter 39.34 RCW.

(4) Local governments that own or operate regional jails must adopt and enforce operational standards consistent with RCW 70.48.071. A regional jail located within a county with a county jail must have standards consistent with the county standards.

(5) Nothing in this section prevents counties and cities from contracting for jail services as described in RCW 70.48.090.

--- END ---