BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to address taxpayer confusion about school district authority to charge student parking fees. The legislature further intends to provide school districts the ability to deposit parking fees paid by students in the associated student body program fund as an additional revenue source to support student body activities.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.325.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 170 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board of directors of any common school district may establish and collect a fee from students and nonstudents as a condition to their attendance at any optional noncredit extracurricular event of the district which is of a cultural, social, recreational, or athletic nature((: PROVIDED, That)). However, in so establishing such fee or fees, the district ((shall))must adopt regulations for waiving and reducing such fees in the cases of those students whose families, by reason of their low income, would have difficulty in paying the entire amount of such fees and may likewise waive or reduce such fees for nonstudents of the age of sixty-five or over who, by reason of their low income, would have difficulty in paying the entire amount of such fees. An optional comprehensive fee may be established and collected for any combination or all of such events or, in the alternative, a fee may be established and collected as a condition to attendance at any single event. In addition, a school district board of directors may establish and collect a fee from students as a condition of parking an automobile or other vehicle on school property.

(2)(a) Except as provided under (b) of this subsection, fees collected pursuant to this section ((shall))must be deposited in the associated student body program fund of the school district, and may be expended to defray the costs of optional noncredit extracurricular events of such a cultural, social, recreational, or athletic nature, or to otherwise support the activities and programs of associated student bodies.

(b) All or a portion of the fees collected from students as a condition of parking an automobile or other vehicle may be deposited in the associated student body program fund of the school district. Any fees not deposited in the associated student body program fund must be deposited as otherwise provided under RCW 28A.335.060.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.335.060 and 2004 c 45 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each school district's board of directors ((shall))must deposit moneys derived from the lease, rental, or occasional use of surplus school property as follows:

(1) Moneys derived from real property ((shall))must be deposited into the district's debt service fund and/or capital projects fund, except for:

(a) Moneys required to be expended for general maintenance, utility, insurance costs, and any other costs associated with the lease or rental of such property, which moneys ((shall))must be deposited in the district's general fund; ((or))

(b) At the option of the board of directors, after evaluating the sufficiency of the school district's capital projects fund for purposes of meeting demands for new construction and improvements, moneys derived from the lease or rental of real property may be deposited into the district's general fund to be used exclusively for nonrecurring costs related to operating school facilities, including but not limited to expenses for maintenance; or

(c) Moneys collected from students as a condition of parking an automobile or other vehicle on school property may be deposited in the associated student body program fund as provided under RCW 28A.325.010;

(2) Moneys derived from pupil transportation vehicles ((shall))must be deposited in the district's transportation vehicle fund;

(3) Moneys derived from other personal property ((shall))must be deposited in the district's general fund.

--- END ---