BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that the right to vote is a fundamental right of citizens. The legislature also recognizes that voter turnout is statistically better in states that allow election day registration. In the 2008 presidential election, the average voter turnout for states with election day registration was sixty-nine percent, compared to sixty-two percent for all other states. In 2012 election day registration states had a turnout average of sixty-six percent compared to the national average of fifty-eight percent. Nine states have enacted election day registration. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to increase voter turnout by enacting election day registration.

Sec. 2. RCW 29A.08.140 and 2011 c 10 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to vote in any primary, special election, or general election, a person who is not registered to vote in Washington must:

(a) Submit a registration application no later than twenty-nine days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election; ((or))

(b) Register in person at the county auditor's office, or other location designated by the county auditor, in his or her county of residence no later than ((eight days before)) 5:00 p.m. on the day of the primary, special election, or general election; or

(c) Submit an online application no later than eight days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election.

(2) A person who is already registered to vote in Washington may update his or her registration no later than twenty-nine days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election to be in effect for that primary, special election, or general election. A registered voter who fails to transfer his or her residential address by this deadline may vote according to his or her previous registration address.

--- END ---