BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.32.080 and 1989 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county legislative authority of each county shall hold regular meetings at the county seat or at a location designated in accordance with subsection (2) of this section to transact any business required or permitted by law.

(2)(a) Any two or more county legislative authorities may hold a joint regular meeting solely in the county seat of a participating county if the agenda item or items relate to actions or considerations of mutual interest or concern to the participating legislative authorities.

(b) A legislative authority participating in a joint regular meeting held in accordance with this subsection (2) must, for purposes of the meeting, comply with notice requirements for special meetings provided in RCW 42.30.080. This subsection (2)(b) does not apply to the legislative authority of the county in which the meeting will be held.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.32.090 and 1989 c 16 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county legislative authority of each county may hold special meetings at the county seat or at a location designated in accordance with subsection (2) or (3) of this section to transact the business of the county. Notice of a special meeting shall be made as provided in RCW 42.30.080.

(2) A special meeting may be held outside of the county seat at any location within the county if the agenda item or items are of unique interest or concern to the citizens of the portion of the county in which the special meeting is to be held.

(3) Any two or more county legislative authorities may hold a joint special meeting at the county seat or other agreed upon location within the jurisdiction of a participating county if the agenda item or items relate to actions or considerations of mutual interest or concern to the participating legislative authorities.

--- END ---