BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The Washington state institute for public policy shall conduct a study of the transition to a three-track admission system for public institutions of higher education on a semester calendar and a four-track admission system for public institutions of higher education on a quarter calendar. The study must:

(a) Determine how Brigham Young University-Idaho made the transition to a three-track admission system;

(b) Determine how a transition to a three-track or four-track admission system would affect the public institutions of higher education in Washington;

(c) Determine the cost savings of a three-track or four-track admission system compared to the current system; and

(d) Determine how many additional students could be served by a three-track or four-track admission system.

(2) The institute shall issue a final report to appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2015.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2016.

--- END ---