BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No later than April 1, 2016, the department shall establish up to three pilot projects to offer respite services to primary caregivers of people with severe mental illness. The respite services must be provided by individuals qualified to meet the needs of the person receiving care, as determined by the department. Respite services may be provided on either a planned or emergent basis and may be provided in the home of the primary caregiver, the home of the person receiving care, or in the facility of a licensed service provider.

(2) The three participating counties must be selected from counties located in a behavioral health organization that becomes an early adopter of fully integrated purchasing of medical and behavioral health services under RCW 71.24.380(6).

(3) The department shall submit a report on the results of the pilot projects to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2017. The report must summarize findings and any recommendations related to the benefits of respite services to primary caregivers and to persons receiving care, the most appropriate use and cost-effectiveness of different care settings, and a summary of the cost of the program and any estimated savings and an estimate of the costs and savings associated with making the program available statewide.

(4) For the purposes of this section, the term "respite services" means services that provide observation, direct support, and monitoring to meet the physical, emotional, social, and mental health needs of a person receiving care by individuals providing temporary care other than the primary caregivers.

(5) This section expires June 30, 2018.

--- END ---