BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.010 and 2014 c 48 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or department rule, a recreational license issued by the director is required to hunt, fish, or take wildlife or seaweed. A recreational fishing or shellfish license is not required for carp((, smelt,)) and crawfish, and a hunting license is not required for bullfrogs.

(2) A pass or permit issued under RCW 79A.80.020, 79A.80.030, or 79A.80.040 is required to park or operate a motor vehicle on a recreation site or lands((,)) as defined in RCW 79A.80.010.

(3) The commission may, by rule, indicate that a fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville Tribes shall satisfy the license requirements in subsection (1) of this section on the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods, and that a Colville Tribes tribal member identification card shall satisfy the license requirements in subsection (1) of this section on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods.

--- END ---