BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.93.060 and 2003 c 337 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is a violation of this section to abandon a junk vehicle upon any property.

(2) In addition, no person shall throw, drop, deposit, discard, or otherwise dispose of litter upon any public property in the state or upon private property in this state not owned by him or her or in the waters of this state whether from a vehicle or otherwise including but not limited to any public highway, public park, beach, campground, forest land, recreational area, trailer park, highway, road, street, or alley except:

(a) When the property is designated by the state or its agencies or political subdivisions for the disposal of garbage and refuse, and the person is authorized to use such property for that purpose;

(b) Into a litter receptacle in a manner that will prevent litter from being carried away or deposited by the elements upon any part of the private or public property or waters.

(((2)))(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (((4)))(5) of this section, it is a class ((3))2 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120 for a person to litter in an amount less than or equal to one cubic foot. This penalty is in addition to any penalty imposed for a violation of RCW 46.61.645(1).

(b) It is a misdemeanor for a person to litter in an amount greater than one cubic foot but less than one cubic yard. The person shall also pay a litter cleanup restitution payment equal to twice the actual cost of cleanup, or fifty dollars per cubic foot of litter, whichever is greater. The court shall distribute one-half of the restitution payment to the landowner and one-half of the restitution payment to the law enforcement agency investigating the incident. The court may, in addition to or in lieu of part or all of the cleanup restitution payment, order the person to pick up and remove litter from the property, with prior permission of the legal owner or, in the case of public property, of the agency managing the property. The court may suspend or modify the litter cleanup restitution payment for a first-time offender under this section, if the person cleans up and properly disposes of the litter.

(c) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person to litter in an amount of one cubic yard or more. The person shall also pay a litter cleanup restitution payment equal to twice the actual cost of cleanup, or one hundred dollars per cubic foot of litter, whichever is greater. The court shall distribute one-half of the restitution payment to the landowner and one-half of the restitution payment to the law enforcement agency investigating the incident. The court may, in addition to or in lieu of part or all of the cleanup restitution payment, order the person to pick up and remove litter from the property, with prior permission of the legal owner or, in the case of public property, of the agency managing the property. The court may suspend or modify the litter cleanup restitution payment for a first-time offender under this section, if the person cleans up and properly disposes of the litter.

(d) If a junk vehicle is abandoned in violation of this section, RCW 46.55.230 governs the vehicle's removal, disposal, and sale, and the penalties that may be imposed against the person who abandoned the vehicle.

(((3)))(4) If the violation occurs in a state park, the court shall, in addition to any other penalties assessed, order the person to perform twenty-four hours of community restitution in the state park where the violation occurred if the state park has stated an intent to participate as provided in RCW 79A.05.050.

(((4)))(5) It is a class 1 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120 for a person to discard, in violation of this section, potentially dangerous litter in any amount.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.08.250 and 2009 c 479 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the money received by the state treasurer from fees, fines, forfeitures, penalties, reimbursements or assessments by any court organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, or chapter 2.08 RCW, shall be deposited in the state general fund.

(2) The money received by the state treasurer from the increase in fees imposed by sections 9, 10, 12, 13, 14, 17, and 19, chapter 457, Laws of 2005 shall be deposited in the state general fund. It is the intent of the legislature that fifty percent of such money be appropriated to the administrator for the courts for the purposes of contributing to district court judges' salaries and to eligible elected municipal court judges' salaries. It is further the intent of the legislature that the balance of such moneys be used to fund criminal indigent defense assistance and enhancement at the trial court level, representation of parents in dependency and termination proceedings, and civil legal representation of indigent persons.

(3) The money received by the state treasurer from the increase in penalties imposed by sections 1, 11, and 12, chapter ..., Laws of 2015 (sections 1, 11, and 12 of this act) must be deposited in the state parks renewal and stewardship account created under RCW 79A.05.215.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.93.180 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 15 s 6 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 989 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created an account within the state treasury to be known as the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account shall be used as follows:

(a) Fifty percent to the department of ecology, for use by the departments of ecology, natural resources, revenue, transportation, and corrections, and the parks and recreation commission, for use in litter collection programs, to be distributed under RCW 70.93.220. The amount to the department of ecology shall also be used for a central coordination function for litter control efforts statewide; for the ((biennial))periodic litter survey under RCW 70.93.200(8); for statewide public awareness programs under RCW 70.93.200(7); and during the 2013-2015 biennium, to support employment of youth in litter clean up as intended in RCW 70.93.020, and for litter pick up using other authorized agencies. The amount to the department shall also be used to defray the costs of administering the funding, coordination, and oversight of local government programs for waste reduction, litter control, and recycling, so that local governments can apply one hundred percent of their funding to achieving program goals. The amount to the department of revenue shall be used to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed in chapter 82.19 RCW;

(b) Twenty percent to the department: (i) For local government funding programs for waste reduction, litter control, and recycling activities by cities and counties under RCW 70.93.250, to be administered by the department of ecology; and (ii) during the 2013-2015 biennium, to create a matching fund competitive grant program to be used by local governments and nonprofit organizations for local or statewide education programs designed to help the public with litter reduction, and recycling of primarily the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW. Unspent funds from (a) and (c) of this subsection may be applied to the competitive grant program; and

(c) Thirty percent to the department of ecology for waste reduction and recycling efforts. During the 2013-2015 biennium, these funds are to be used to: (i) Implement activities under RCW 70.93.200 for waste reduction, recycling efforts; (ii) provide technical assistance to local governments for commercial business and residential recycling programs primarily for the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW designed to educate citizens about waste and litter reduction and recyclable products and programs; and (iii) increase access to recycling programs, particularly for food packaging and plastic bags and appropriate techniques of discarding products.

(2) All moneys directed to the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account under RCW 82.19.040 and fines and bail forfeitures collected or received pursuant to this chapter, except as provided in RCW 43.08.250(3), shall be deposited in the account and used for the programs under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Not less than five percent and no more than ten percent of the amount appropriated into the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account every biennium shall be reserved for capital needs, including the purchase of vehicles for transporting crews and for collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be distributed among state agencies and local governments according to the same criteria provided in RCW 70.93.220 for the remainder of the funds, so that the most effective waste reduction, litter control, and recycling programs receive the most funding. The intent of this subsection is to provide funds for the purchase of equipment that will enable the department to account for the greatest return on investment in terms of reaching a zero litter goal.

(((5) [(4)]))(4) During the 2013-2015 biennium, funds in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account, collected under chapter 82.19 RCW, must be prioritized for the products identified under RCW 82.19.020 solely for the purposes of recycling and litter collection, reduction, and control programs.

(((6) [(5)]))(5) During the 2013-2015 biennium, the legislature may appropriate funds from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account to the state parks and recreation commission for parks operation and maintenance.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.93.180 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 989 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created an account within the state treasury to be known as the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account shall be used as follows:

(a) Fifty percent to the department of ecology, for use by the departments of ecology, natural resources, revenue, transportation, and corrections, and the parks and recreation commission, for use in litter collection programs, to be distributed under RCW 70.93.220. The amount to the department of ecology shall also be used for a central coordination function for litter control efforts statewide; for the ((biennial))periodic litter survey under RCW 70.93.200(8); for statewide public awareness programs under RCW 70.93.200(7); and during the 2013-2015 biennium, to support employment of youth in litter clean up as intended in RCW 70.93.020, and for litter pick up using other authorized agencies. The amount to the department shall also be used to defray the costs of administering the funding, coordination, and oversight of local government programs for waste reduction, litter control, and recycling, so that local governments can apply one hundred percent of their funding to achieving program goals. The amount to the department of revenue shall be used to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed in chapter 82.19 RCW;

(b) Twenty percent to the department: (i) For local government funding programs for waste reduction, litter control, and recycling activities by cities and counties under RCW 70.93.250, to be administered by the department of ecology; and (ii) during the 2013-2015 biennium, to create a matching fund competitive grant program to be used by local governments and nonprofit organizations for local or statewide education programs designed to help the public with litter reduction, and recycling of primarily the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW. Unspent funds from (a) and (c) of this subsection may be applied to the competitive grant program; and

(c) Thirty percent to the department of ecology for waste reduction and recycling efforts. During the 2013-2015 biennium, these funds are to be used to: (i) Implement activities under RCW 70.93.200 for waste reduction, recycling efforts; (ii) provide technical assistance to local governments for commercial business and residential recycling programs primarily for the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW designed to educate citizens about waste and litter reduction and recyclable products and programs; and (iii) increase access to recycling programs, particularly for food packaging and plastic bags and appropriate techniques of discarding products.

(2) All taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 and fines and bail forfeitures collected or received pursuant to this chapter, except as provided in RCW 43.08.250(3), shall be deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account and used for the programs under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Not less than five percent and no more than ten percent of the amount appropriated into the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account every biennium shall be reserved for capital needs, including the purchase of vehicles for transporting crews and for collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be distributed among state agencies and local governments according to the same criteria provided in RCW 70.93.220 for the remainder of the funds, so that the most effective waste reduction, litter control, and recycling programs receive the most funding. The intent of this subsection is to provide funds for the purchase of equipment that will enable the department to account for the greatest return on investment in terms of reaching a zero litter goal.

(4) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. Additionally, during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section is suspended.

(5) During the 2013-2015 biennium, funds in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account, collected under chapter 82.19 RCW, must be prioritized for the products identified under RCW 82.19.020 solely for the purposes of recycling and litter collection, reduction, and control programs.

(6) During the 2013-2015 biennium, the legislature may appropriate funds from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account to the state parks and recreation commission for parks operation and maintenance.

Sec. 5. RCW 3.50.100 and 2012 c 136 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Costs in civil and criminal actions may be imposed as provided in district court. All fees, costs, fines, forfeitures and other money imposed by any municipal court for the violation of any municipal or town ordinances shall be collected by the court clerk and, together with any other noninterest revenues received by the clerk, shall be deposited with the city or town treasurer as a part of the general fund of the city or town, or deposited in such other fund of the city or town, or deposited in such other funds as may be designated by the laws of the state of Washington.

(2)(a) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120 and 10.99.080, and as provided in (b) of this subsection, the city treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest money received under this section, other than for parking infractions, and certain costs to the state treasurer. (("Certain costs"))

(b) The city treasurer shall remit the money received from the increase in penalties imposed by sections 1, 11, and 12, chapter ..., Laws of 2015 (sections 1, 11, and 12 of this act) to the state treasurer for deposit in the state parks renewal and stewardship account created under RCW 79A.05.215 as required by RCW 43.08.250(3).

(c) As used in this subsection (2), "certain costs" means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, money remitted under this subsection (2) to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the state general fund.

(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.

(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in collection status.

(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund, twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the city general fund, and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 6. RCW 35.20.220 and 2012 c 136 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The chief clerk, under the supervision and direction of the court administrator of the municipal court, shall have the custody and care of the books, papers and records of the court. The chief clerk or a deputy shall be present during the session of the court and has the power to swear all witnesses and jurors, administer oaths and affidavits, and take acknowledgments. The chief clerk shall keep the records of the court and shall issue all process under his or her hand and the seal of the court. The chief clerk shall do and perform all things and have the same powers pertaining to the office as the clerks of the superior courts have in their office. He or she shall receive all fines, penalties, and fees of every kind and keep a full, accurate, and detailed account of the same. The chief clerk shall on each day pay into the city treasury all money received for the city during the day previous, with a detailed account of the same, and taking the treasurer's receipt therefor.

(2)(a) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120 and 10.99.080, and as provided in (b) of this subsection, the city treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest money received under this section, other than for parking infractions and certain costs to the state treasurer. (("Certain costs"))

(b) The city treasurer shall remit the money received from the increase in penalties imposed by sections 1, 11, and 12, chapter ..., Laws of 2015 (sections 1, 11, and 12 of this act) to the state treasurer for deposit in the state parks renewal and stewardship account created under RCW 79A.05.215 as required by RCW 43.08.250(3).

(c) As used in this subsection (2), "certain costs" means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the state general fund.

(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.

(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in collection status.

(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund, twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the city general fund, and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 7. RCW 3.62.020 and 2012 c 262 s 1, 2012 c 136 s 4, and 2012 c 134 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all costs, fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected in whole or in part by district courts, except costs, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected, in whole or in part, because of the violation of city ordinances, shall be remitted by the clerk of the district court to the county treasurer at least monthly, together with a financial statement as required by the state auditor, noting the information necessary for crediting of such funds as required by law.

(2)(a) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120, 10.99.080, 7.84.100(4), and this section, the county treasurer shall remit thirty-two percent of the noninterest money received under subsection (1) of this section except certain costs to the state treasurer.

(b) The county treasurer shall remit the money received from the increase in penalties imposed by sections 1, 11, and 12, chapter ..., Laws of 2015 (sections 1, 11, and 12 of this act) to the state treasurer for deposit in the state parks renewal and stewardship account created in RCW 79A.05.215 as required by RCW 43.08.250(3).

(c) "Certain costs," as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state or county in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. With the exception of funds to be transferred to the judicial stabilization trust account under RCW 3.62.060(2) and as provided in (b) of this subsection, money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the state general fund.

(3) The balance of the noninterest money received by the county treasurer under subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in the county current expense fund. Funds deposited under this subsection that are attributable to the county's portion of a surcharge imposed under RCW 3.62.060(2) must be used to support local trial court and court-related functions.

(4) Except as provided in RCW 7.84.100(4), all money collected for county parking infractions shall be remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly, with the information required under subsection (1) of this section, to the county treasurer for deposit in the county current expense fund.

(5) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in collection status.

(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund, twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the county current expense fund, and twenty-five percent to the county current expense fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 8. RCW 79A.05.215 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 15 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The state parks renewal and stewardship account is created in the state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all receipts from user fees, concessions, leases, donations collected under RCW 46.16A.090(3), penalty money received by the state treasurer under RCW 43.08.250(3), and other state park-based activities shall be deposited into the account. The proceeds from the recreation access pass account created in RCW 79A.80.090 and amounts received under RCW 82.19.040 may only be used for the purpose of operating and maintaining state parks. Expenditures from the account may be used for operating state parks, developing and renovating park facilities, undertaking deferred maintenance, enhancing park stewardship, and other state park purposes. Expenditures from the account may be made only after appropriation by the legislature.

Sec. 9. RCW 79A.05.215 and 2011 c 320 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The state parks renewal and stewardship account is created in the state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all receipts from user fees, concessions, leases, donations collected under RCW 46.16A.090(3), penalty money received by the state treasurer under RCW 43.08.250(3), and other state park-based activities shall be deposited into the account. The proceeds from the recreation access pass account created in RCW 79A.80.090 must be used for the purpose of operating and maintaining state parks. Expenditures from the account may be used for operating state parks, developing and renovating park facilities, undertaking deferred maintenance, enhancing park stewardship, and other state park purposes. Expenditures from the account may be made only after appropriation by the legislature.

Sec. 10. RCW 79A.05.050 and 2002 c 175 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall establish a policy and procedures for supervising and evaluating community restitution activities that may be imposed under RCW 70.93.060(((3)))(4) including a description of what constitutes satisfactory completion of community restitution.

(2) The commission shall inform each state park of the policy and procedures regarding community restitution activities, and each state park shall then notify the commission as to whether or not the park elects to participate in the community restitution program. The commission shall transmit a list notifying the district courts of each state park that elects to participate.

Sec. 11. RCW 7.80.120 and 2013 c 278 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person found to have committed a civil infraction shall be assessed a monetary penalty.

(a) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 1 civil infraction shall be two hundred fifty dollars, not including statutory assessments, except for an infraction of state law involving (i) potentially dangerous litter as specified in RCW 70.93.060(((4)))(5) or violent video or computer games under RCW 9.91.180, in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is five hundred dollars; or (ii) a person's refusal to submit to a test or tests pursuant to RCW 79A.60.040 and 79A.60.700, in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is one thousand dollars;

(b) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 2 civil infraction shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars, not including statutory assessments, except for an infraction of state law involving littering in an amount less than or equal to one cubic foot as specified in RCW 70.93.060(3)(a), in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is two hundred dollars;

(c) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 3 civil infraction shall be fifty dollars, not including statutory assessments; and

(d) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 4 civil infraction shall be twenty-five dollars, not including statutory assessments.

(2) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule the conditions under which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines for civil infractions.

(3) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this chapter it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at that time the court may grant an extension of the period in which the penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the time established for payment, the court may proceed to collect the penalty in the same manner as other civil judgments and may notify the prosecuting authority of the failure to pay.

(4) The court may also order a person found to have committed a civil infraction to make restitution.

Sec. 12. RCW 46.63.110 and 2012 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or title.

(2)(a) The monetary penalty for a violation of (((a)))(i) RCW 46.55.105(2) is two hundred fifty dollars for each offense; (((b)))(ii) RCW 46.61.210(1) is five hundred dollars for each offense. No penalty assessed under this subsection (2)(a) may be reduced.

(b) The monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.61.645(1) is two hundred dollars for each offense.

(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this schedule every two years for inflation.

(4) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty set by the local legislative body.

(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.

(6) Whenever a monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other monetary obligation is imposed by a court under this chapter, it is immediately payable and is enforceable as a civil judgment under Title 6 RCW. If the court determines, in its discretion, that a person is not able to pay a monetary obligation in full, and not more than one year has passed since the later of July 1, 2005, or the date the monetary obligation initially became due and payable, the court shall enter into a payment plan with the person, unless the person has previously been granted a payment plan with respect to the same monetary obligation, or unless the person is in noncompliance of any existing or prior payment plan, in which case the court may, at its discretion, implement a payment plan. If the court has notified the department that the person has failed to pay or comply and the person has subsequently entered into a payment plan and made an initial payment, the court shall notify the department that the infraction has been adjudicated, and the department shall rescind any suspension of the person's driver's license or driver's privilege based on failure to respond to that infraction. "Payment plan," as used in this section, means a plan that requires reasonable payments based on the financial ability of the person to pay. The person may voluntarily pay an amount at any time in addition to the payments required under the payment plan.

(a) If a payment required to be made under the payment plan is delinquent or the person fails to complete a community restitution program on or before the time established under the payment plan, unless the court determines good cause therefor and adjusts the payment plan or the community restitution plan accordingly, the court may refer the unpaid monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other monetary obligation for civil enforcement until all monetary obligations, including those imposed under subsections (3) and (4) of this section, have been paid, and court authorized community restitution has been completed, or until the court has entered into a new time payment or community restitution agreement with the person. For those infractions subject to suspension under RCW 46.20.289, the court shall notify the department of the person's failure to meet the conditions of the plan, and the department shall suspend the person's driver's license or driving privileges.

(b) If a person has not entered into a payment plan with the court and has not paid the monetary obligation in full on or before the time established for payment, the court may refer the unpaid monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other monetary obligation to a collections agency until all monetary obligations have been paid, including those imposed under subsections (3) and (4) of this section, or until the person has entered into a payment plan under this section. For those infractions subject to suspension under RCW 46.20.289, the court shall notify the department of the person's delinquency, and the department shall suspend the person's driver's license or driving privileges.

(c) If the payment plan is to be administered by the court, the court may assess the person a reasonable administrative fee to be wholly retained by the city or county with jurisdiction. The administrative fee shall not exceed ten dollars per infraction or twenty-five dollars per payment plan, whichever is less.

(d) Nothing in this section precludes a court from contracting with outside entities to administer its payment plan system. When outside entities are used for the administration of a payment plan, the court may assess the person a reasonable fee for such administrative services, which fee may be calculated on a periodic, percentage, or other basis.

(e) If a court authorized community restitution program for offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court may allow conversion of all or part of the monetary obligations due under this section to court authorized community restitution in lieu of time payments if the person is unable to make reasonable time payments.

(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed:

(a) A fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040;

(b) A fee of ten dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the Washington auto theft prevention authority account; and

(c) A fee of two dollars per infraction. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the traumatic brain injury account established in RCW 74.31.060.

(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other than of RCW 46.61.527 or 46.61.212 shall be assessed an additional penalty of twenty dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend the additional penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If a court authorized community restitution program for offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court shall allow offenders to offset all or a part of the penalty due under this subsection (8) by participation in the court authorized community restitution program.

(b) Eight dollars and fifty cents of the additional penalty under (a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited in the state general fund. The balance of the revenue received by the county or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.

(9) If a legal proceeding, such as garnishment, has commenced to collect any delinquent amount owed by the person for any penalty imposed by the court under this section, the court may, at its discretion, enter into a payment plan.

(10) The monetary penalty for violating RCW 46.37.395 is: (a) Two hundred fifty dollars for the first violation; (b) five hundred dollars for the second violation; and (c) seven hundred fifty dollars for each violation thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. This act may be known and cited as the no litterbugs in Washington act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. Sections 3 and 8 of this act expire June 30, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. Sections 4 and 9 of this act take effect June 30, 2017.

--- END ---