BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The purpose of this chapter is to provide the requirements for maintaining a risk management framework and completing an own risk and solvency assessment and provide guidance and instructions for filing an ORSA summary report with the insurance commissioner of this state.

(2) The requirements of this chapter apply to all insurers domiciled in this state unless exempt pursuant to section 6 of this act.

(3) The legislature finds and declares that the ORSA summary report contains confidential and sensitive information related to an insurer or insurance group's identification of risks material and relevant to the insurer or insurance group filing the report. This information includes proprietary and trade secret information that has the potential for harm and competitive disadvantage to the insurer or insurance group if the information is made public. It is the intent of this legislature that the ORSA summary report is a confidential document filed with the commissioner, that the ORSA summary report may be shared only as stated in this chapter and to assist the commissioner in the performance of his or her duties, and that in no event may the ORSA summary report be subject to public disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Insurance group" means, for the purposes of conducting an ORSA, those insurers and affiliates included within an insurance holding company system as defined in RCW 48.31B.005.

(2) "Insurer" includes an insurer authorized under chapter 48.05 RCW, a fraternal mutual insurer or society holding a license under RCW 48.36A.290, a health care service contractor registered under chapter 48.44 RCW, a health maintenance organization registered under chapter 48.46 RCW, and a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement under chapter 48.125 RCW, as well as all persons engaged as, or purporting to be engaged as insurers, fraternal benefit societies, health care service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements in this state, and to persons in process of organization to become insurers, fraternal benefit societies, health care service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements, except that it does not include agencies, authorities, or instrumentalities of the United States, its possessions and territories, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, or a state or political subdivision of a state.

(3) "ORSA guidance manual" means the own risk and solvency assessment guidance manual developed and adopted by the national association of insurance commissioners.

(4) "ORSA summary report" means a confidential high-level ORSA summary of an insurer or insurance group.

(5) "Own risk and solvency assessment" or "ORSA" means a confidential internal assessment, appropriate to the nature, scale, and complexity of an insurer or insurance group, conducted by that insurer or insurance group of the material and relevant risks associated with the insurer or insurance group's current business plan, and the sufficiency of capital resources to support those risks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. An insurer must maintain a risk management framework to assist the insurer with identifying, assessing, monitoring, managing, and reporting on its material and relevant risks. This requirement is satisfied if the insurance group of which the insurer is a member maintains a risk management framework applicable to the operations of the insurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Subject to section 6 of this act, an insurer, or the insurance group of which the insurer is a member, must regularly conduct an ORSA consistent with a process comparable to the ORSA guidance manual. The ORSA must be conducted annually but also at any time when there are significant changes to the risk profile of the insurer or the insurance group of which the insurer is a member.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) Upon the commissioner's request, and no more than once each year, an insurer must submit to the commissioner an ORSA summary report or any combination of reports that together contain the information described in the ORSA guidance manual, applicable to the insurer or the insurance group of which it is a member. Notwithstanding any request from the commissioner, if the insurer is a member of an insurance group, the insurer must submit the report or set of reports required by this subsection if the commissioner is the lead state commissioner of the insurance group as determined by the procedures within the financial analysis handbook adopted by the national association of insurance commissioners.

(2) The report must include a signature of the insurer or insurance group's chief risk officer or other executive having responsibility for the oversight of the insurer's enterprise risk management process attesting to the best of his or her belief and knowledge that the insurer applies the enterprise risk management process described in the ORSA summary report and that a copy of the report has been provided to the insurer's board of directors or the appropriate governing committee.

(3) An insurer may comply with subsection (1) of this section by providing the most recent and substantially similar report or reports provided by the insurer or another member of an insurance group of which the insurer is a member to the commissioner of another state or to a supervisor or regulator of a foreign jurisdiction, if that report provides information that is comparable to the information described in the ORSA guidance manual. Any such report in a language other than English must be accompanied by a translation of that report into the English language.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) An insurer is exempt from the requirements of this chapter, if:

(a) The insurer has annual direct written and unaffiliated assumed premium including international direct and assumed premium, but excluding premium reinsured with the federal crop insurance corporation and federal flood program, less than five hundred million dollars; and

(b) The insurance group of which the insurer is a member has annual direct written and unaffiliated assumed premium including international direct and assumed premium, but excluding premium reinsured with the federal crop insurance corporation and federal flood program, less than one billion dollars.

(2) If an insurer qualifies for exemption pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, but the insurance group of which the insurer is a member does not qualify for exemption pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, then the ORSA summary report that may be required pursuant to section 5 of this act must include every insurer within the insurance group. This requirement is satisfied by the submission of more than one ORSA summary report for any combination of insurers, provided any combination of reports includes every insurer within the insurance group.

(3) If an insurer does not qualify for exemption pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, but the insurance group of which the insurer is a member does qualify for exemption pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, then the only ORSA summary report that may be required pursuant to section 5 of this act is the report applicable to that insurer.

(4) If an insurer does not qualify for exemption pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, the insurer may apply to the commissioner for a waiver from the requirements of this chapter based upon unique circumstances. In deciding whether to grant the insurer's request for waiver, the commissioner may consider the type and volume of business written, ownership and organizational structure, and any other factor the commissioner considers relevant to the insurer or insurance group of which the insurer is a member. If the insurer is a part of an insurance group with insurers domiciled in more than one state, the commissioner shall coordinate with the lead state commissioner and with the other domiciliary commissioners in considering whether to grant the insurer's request for a waiver.

(5) Notwithstanding the exemptions stated in this section, the commissioner may require that an insurer maintain a risk management framework, conduct an ORSA, and file an ORSA summary report (a) based on unique circumstances including, but not limited to, the type and volume of business written, ownership and organizational structure, federal agency requests, and international supervisor requests; and (b) if the insurer has risk-based capital at the company action level event as set forth in RCW 48.05.440 or 48.43.310, meets one or more of the standards of an insurer deemed to be in hazardous financial condition as defined in WAC 284-16-310, or otherwise exhibits qualities of a troubled insurer as determined by the commissioner.

(6) If an insurer that qualifies for exemption pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section subsequently no longer qualifies for that exemption due to changes in premium reflected in the insurer's most recent annual statement or in the most recent annual statements of the insurers within the insurance group of which the insurer is a member, the insurer has one year following the year the threshold is exceeded to comply with the requirement of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) The ORSA summary report shall be prepared consistent with the ORSA guidance manual, subject to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section. Documentation and supporting information must be maintained and made available upon examination or upon the request of the commissioner.

(2) The review of the ORSA summary report, and any additional requests for information, must be made using similar procedures currently used in the analysis and examination of multistate or global insurers and insurance groups.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. (1) Documents, materials, or other information, including the ORSA summary report, in the possession or control of the commissioner that are obtained by, created by, or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person under this chapter, is recognized by this state as being proprietary and to contain trade secrets. All such documents, materials, or other information is confidential by law and privileged, is not subject to chapter 42.56 RCW, is not subject to subpoena, and is not subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil action. However, the commissioner is authorized to use the documents, materials, or other information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as a part of the commissioner's official duties. The commissioner may not otherwise make the documents, materials, or other information public without the prior written consent of the insurer.

(2) Neither the commissioner nor any person who received documents, materials, or other ORSA-related information, through examination or otherwise, while acting under the authority of the commissioner or with whom such documents, materials, or other information are shared pursuant to this chapter, is permitted or required to testify in any private civil action concerning any confidential documents, materials, or information subject to subsection (1) of this section.

(3) In order to assist in the performance of the commissioner's regulatory duties, the commissioner:

(a) May share documents, materials, or other ORSA-related information, including the confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information subject to subsection (1) of this section, including proprietary and trade secret documents and materials with other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies, including members of any supervisory college recognized by the national association of insurance commissioners, with the national association of insurance commissioners, and with any third-party consultants designated by the commissioner, provided that the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the ORSA-related documents, materials, or other information and has verified in writing the legal authority to maintain confidentiality;

(b) May receive documents, materials, or ORSA-related information, including otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information, including proprietary and trade secret information or documents, from regulatory officials of other foreign or domestic jurisdictions, including members of any supervisory college recognized by the national association of insurance commissioners, from the national association of insurance commissioners, and must maintain as confidential or privileged any document, material, or information received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material, or information;

(c) Shall enter into written agreements with the national association of insurance commissioners or a third-party consultant governing sharing and use of information provided pursuant to this chapter, consistent with this subsection that shall:

(i) Specify procedures and protocols regarding the confidentiality and security of information shared with the national association of insurance commissioners or third-party consultant pursuant to this chapter, including procedures and protocols for sharing by the national association of insurance commissioners with other state regulators from states in which the insurance group has domiciled insurers. The agreement must provide that the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the ORSA-related documents, materials, or other information and has verified in writing the legal authority to maintain confidentiality;

(ii) Specify that ownership of information shared with the national association of insurance commissioners or third-party consultants pursuant to this chapter remains with the commissioner and the national association of insurance commissioners' or a third-party consultant's use of the information is subject to the direction of the commissioner;

(iii) Prohibit the national association of insurance commissioners or third-party consultant from storing the information shared pursuant to this chapter in a permanent database after the underlying analysis is completed;

(iv) Require prompt notice to be given to an insurer whose confidential information in the possession of the national association of insurance commissioners or a third-party consultant pursuant to this chapter is subject to a request or subpoena to the national association of insurance commissioners or a third-party consultant for disclosure or production;

(v) Require the national association of insurance commissioners or a third-party consultant to consent to intervention by an insurer in any judicial or administrative action in which the national association of insurance commissioners or a third-party consultant may be required to disclose confidential information about the insurer shared with the national association of insurance commissioners or a third-party consultant pursuant to this chapter; and

(vi) In the case of an agreement involving a third-party consultant, provide the insurer's written consent.

(4) The sharing of information by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter does not constitute a delegation of regulatory authority or rule making, and the commissioner is solely responsible for the administration, execution, and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

(5) A waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in the documents, materials, or information does not occur as a result of disclosure to the commissioner under this section or as a result of sharing as authorized in this chapter.

(6) Documents, materials, or other information in the possession or control of the national association of insurance commissioners or a third-party consultant pursuant to this chapter are confidential by law and privileged, are not subject to chapter 42.56 RCW, are not subject to subpoena, and are not subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. The commissioner must require any insurer failing, without just cause, to file the ORSA summary report as required in this chapter, after notice and hearing, to pay a fine of five hundred dollars for each day's delay, to be recovered by the commissioner and the fine collected must be transferred to the treasurer for deposit into the state general fund. The maximum fine under this section is one hundred thousand dollars. The commissioner may reduce the fine if the insurer demonstrates to the commissioner that the imposition of the fine would constitute a financial hardship to the insurer.

Sec. 10. RCW 42.56.400 and 2013 c 277 s 5 and 2013 c 65 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The following information relating to insurance and financial institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:

(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed with the board under RCW 7.68.110;

(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under chapter 41.05 RCW;

(3) The names and individual identification data of either all owners or all insureds, or both, received by the insurance commissioner under chapter 48.102 RCW;

(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;

(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535, 48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600 through 48.46.625;

(6) Examination reports and information obtained by the department of financial institutions from banks under RCW ((30.04.075))30A.04.075, from savings banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW 33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential and privileged information;

(7) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.110.040(3);

(8) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and privileged;

(9) Confidential proprietary and trade secret information provided to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050 and 48.31C.070;

(10) Data filed under RCW 48.140.020, 48.140.030, 48.140.050, and 7.70.140 that, alone or in combination with any other data, may reveal the identity of a claimant, health care provider, health care facility, insuring entity, or self-insurer involved in a particular claim or a collection of claims. For the purposes of this subsection:

(a) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).

(b) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(6).

(c) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(7).

(d) "Insuring entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(8).

(e) "Self-insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(11);

(11) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.135.060;

(12) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.37.060;

(13) Confidential and privileged documents obtained or produced by the insurance commissioner and identified in RCW 48.37.080;

(14) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.37.140;

(15) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.17.595;

(16) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.102.051(1) and 48.102.140 (3) and (7)(a)(ii);

(17) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner in the commissioner's capacity as receiver under RCW 48.31.025 and 48.99.017, which are records under the jurisdiction and control of the receivership court. The commissioner is not required to search for, log, produce, or otherwise comply with the public records act for any records that the commissioner obtains under chapters 48.31 and 48.99 RCW in the commissioner's capacity as a receiver, except as directed by the receivership court;

(18) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.13.151;

(19) Data, information, and documents provided by a carrier pursuant to section 1, chapter 172, Laws of 2010;

(20) Information in a filing of usage-based insurance about the usage-based component of the rate pursuant to RCW 48.19.040(5)(b);

(21) Data, information, and documents, other than those described in RCW 48.02.210(2), that are submitted to the office of the insurance commissioner by an entity providing health care coverage pursuant to RCW 28A.400.275 and 48.02.210; ((and))

(22) Data, information, and documents obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.29.017; ((and))

(23) Information not subject to public inspection or public disclosure under RCW 48.43.730(5); and

(23) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under chapter 48.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 13 of this act).

Sec. 11. RCW 42.56.400 and 2013 c 65 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The following information relating to insurance and financial institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:

(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed with the board under RCW 7.68.110;

(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under chapter 41.05 RCW;

(3) The names and individual identification data of either all owners or all insureds, or both, received by the insurance commissioner under chapter 48.102 RCW;

(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;

(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535, 48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600 through 48.46.625;

(6) Examination reports and information obtained by the department of financial institutions from banks under RCW ((30.04.075))30A.04.075, from savings banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW 33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential and privileged information;

(7) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.110.040(3);

(8) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and privileged;

(9) Confidential proprietary and trade secret information provided to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050 and 48.31C.070;

(10) Data filed under RCW 48.140.020, 48.140.030, 48.140.050, and 7.70.140 that, alone or in combination with any other data, may reveal the identity of a claimant, health care provider, health care facility, insuring entity, or self-insurer involved in a particular claim or a collection of claims. For the purposes of this subsection:

(a) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).

(b) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(6).

(c) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(7).

(d) "Insuring entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(8).

(e) "Self-insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(11);

(11) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.135.060;

(12) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.37.060;

(13) Confidential and privileged documents obtained or produced by the insurance commissioner and identified in RCW 48.37.080;

(14) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.37.140;

(15) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.17.595;

(16) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.102.051(1) and 48.102.140 (3) and (7)(a)(ii);

(17) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner in the commissioner's capacity as receiver under RCW 48.31.025 and 48.99.017, which are records under the jurisdiction and control of the receivership court. The commissioner is not required to search for, log, produce, or otherwise comply with the public records act for any records that the commissioner obtains under chapters 48.31 and 48.99 RCW in the commissioner's capacity as a receiver, except as directed by the receivership court;

(18) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.13.151;

(19) Data, information, and documents provided by a carrier pursuant to section 1, chapter 172, Laws of 2010;

(20) Information in a filing of usage-based insurance about the usage-based component of the rate pursuant to RCW 48.19.040(5)(b);

(21) Data, information, and documents, other than those described in RCW 48.02.210(2), that are submitted to the office of the insurance commissioner by an entity providing health care coverage pursuant to RCW 28A.400.275 and 48.02.210; ((and))

(22) Data, information, and documents obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.29.017; and

(23) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance commissioner under chapter 48.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 13 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 1 through 9 and 14 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. This chapter may be known and cited as the risk management and solvency assessment act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. Except for section 11 of this act, which takes effect July 1, 2017, this act takes effect January 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. Section 10 of this act expires July 1, 2017.

--- END ---