BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.92.025 and 2006 c 340 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the objectives stated in RCW 43.92.020, the geological survey must conduct and maintain an assessment of seismic, landslide, and tsunami hazards in Washington. This assessment must ((include the identification and mapping of))apply the best practicable technology, including light detection and ranging (lidar) mapping, to identify and map volcanic, seismic, landslide, and tsunami hazards, ((an estimation of))and estimate potential hazard consequences((,)) and the likelihood of ((occurrence))a hazard occurring.

(2) The ((maintenance of this assessment))geological survey must ((include)):

(a) Coordinate with state and local government agencies to compile existing data, including geological hazard maps and geotechnical reports, tending to inform geological hazard planning decisions;

(b) Acquire and process new data or update deficient data using the best practicable technology, including lidar;

(c) Create and maintain an efficient, publicly available database of lidar and geological hazard maps and geotechnical reports collected under (a) and (b) of this subsection; and

(d) Provide technical assistance to state and local government agencies on the proper interpretation and application of the results of ((this))the geological hazards assessment.

Sec. 2. RCW 58.24.060 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created in the state treasury the surveys and maps account which shall be a separate account consisting of funds received or collected under chapters 43.92, 58.22, and 58.24 RCW, moneys appropriated to it by law. This account shall be used exclusively by the department of natural resources for carrying out the purposes and provisions of chapters 43.92, 58.22, and 58.24 RCW. Appropriations from the account shall be expended for no other purposes.

--- END ---