BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 57.08.016 and 2011 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((There shall be no private sale of))Real property ((where the))with an estimated value ((exceeds the sum)) of five thousand dollars or more may be sold by public sale only. Estimated value shall be determined by the board of commissioners ((and)), based upon a written appraisal report by a state-licensed or state-certified real estate appraiser ((and broker advice as it considers appropriate)), as described and governed by chapter 18.140 RCW, or a written broker's price opinion, as defined in RCW 18.140.010 and described in RCW 18.140.020. The appraisal report or broker's price opinion must have been prepared less than six months prior to the date of sale. Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, no real property of the district shall be sold for less than ninety percent of the value thereof. ((Where the estimated value of the real property exceeds five thousand dollars, value shall be established by a written broker price opinion made not more than six months prior to the date of sale by three disinterested real estate brokers licensed under the laws of the state or by one professionally designated real estate appraiser as defined in chapter 18.140 RCW. A))The broker price opinion ((shall be signed by))or the ((broker and an)) appraisal report must be ((signed by the appraiser and)) filed with the secretary of the board of commissioners of the district, who shall keep it at the office of the district open to public inspection. ((Any))In addition to the requirements of RCW 57.08.015, the notice of intention to sell such real property ((of the district)) shall recite the estimated value ((or, if an appraisal has been made, the appraised value thereof))and refer to the appraisal report or the broker's price opinion, as applicable.

(2) If no purchasers can be obtained for the real property at ninety percent or more of its estimated ((or appraised)) value ((after))within one hundred twenty days of ((offering the property for sale))publication of the initial notice of intention to sell, the board of commissioners of the district may adopt a resolution stating that the district has been unable to sell the property at the ninety percent ((amount))or more of the estimated value. The district then may sell the property at the highest price it can obtain at public auction. A notice of intention to sell at public auction shall be published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the district. The notice shall describe the real property, state the time and place at which it will be offered for sale ((and))at public auction, state the minimum opening bid, if any, state the terms and conditions of sale((, and shall call for bids, fix the conditions thereof)), and reserve the right to reject any and all bids for good cause.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 57.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The board of commissioners of a district that had an annual operating budget of five million dollars or more in each of the preceding three years may by resolution adopt a policy to issue its own warrants for payment of claims or other obligations of the district. The board of commissioners, after auditing all payrolls and bills, may authorize the issuing of one general certificate to the county treasurer, to be signed by the president of the board of commissioners, authorizing the county treasurer to pay all the warrants specified by date, number, name, and amount, and the accounting funds on which the warrants are drawn. The district may then issue the warrants specified in the general certificate.

(2) The board of commissioners of a district that had an annual operating budget of greater than two hundred fifty thousand dollars and under five million dollars in each of the preceding three years may upon agreement between the county treasurer and the district commission, with approval of the district commission by resolution, adopt a policy to issue its own warrants for payment of claims or other obligations of the district. The board of commissioners, after auditing all payrolls and bills, may authorize the issuing of one general certificate to the county treasurer, to be signed by the president of the board of commissioners, authorizing the county treasurer to pay all the warrants specified by date, number, name, and amount, and the accounting funds on which the warrants are drawn. The district may then issue the warrants specified in the general certificate.

--- END ---