BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the governor by executive order or either house of the legislature by resolution declares any rule, as defined in RCW 34.05.010, to be abrogated, such a rule is null and void and of no force or effect.

(2) The abrogation takes effect immediately upon the issuance of the executive order or passage of the resolution in either house of the legislature, unless the executive order or resolution expressly states that it is to be effective retroactively to an earlier date.

--- END ---