BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that, as of November 2014, there were one hundred thirty state-owned bridges classified as structurally deficient. The legislature further finds that a span of the Skagit river bridge on Interstate 5, the Trooper Sean M. O'Connell Jr. Memorial bridge, recently collapsed when an oversized load struck the trusses that supported the bridge. Although the Skagit river bridge was not considered structurally deficient, this event underscores the importance of remedying bridge structural deficiencies as efficiently and expeditiously as possible. Thus, it is the intent of the legislature to provide for expedited permitting and contracting for state bridges identified as structurally deficient by the Washington state department of transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

The repair or replacement of a state bridge deemed structurally deficient, as defined in RCW 47.04.010, is exempt from compliance with this chapter as long as the action occurs within the existing right-of-way, except that the repair or replacement may occur outside the existing right-of-way as needed to meet current engineering standards or state or local environmental permit requirements for highway construction as long as the repair or replacement does not result in additional lanes for automobiles. The issuance of applicable state and local agency permits or approvals associated with the repair or replacement of such bridges is also included in this exemption from compliance with this chapter.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.04.010 and 2003 c 244 s 2 and 2003 c 141 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The following words and phrases, wherever used in this title, shall have the meaning as in this section ascribed to them, unless where used the context thereof shall clearly indicate to the contrary or unless otherwise defined in the chapter of which they are a part:

(1) "Alley." A highway within the ordinary meaning of alley not designated for general travel and primarily used as a means of access to the rear of residences and business establishments;

(2) "Arterial highway." Every highway, as herein defined, or portion thereof designated as such by proper authority;

(3) "Business district." The territory contiguous to and including a highway, as herein defined, when within any six hundred feet along such highway there are buildings in use for business or industrial purposes, including but not limited to hotels, banks, or office buildings, railroad stations, and public buildings which occupy at least three hundred feet of frontage on one side or three hundred feet collectively on both sides of the highway;

(4) "Center line." The line, marked or unmarked parallel to and equidistant from the sides of a two-way traffic roadway of a highway except where otherwise indicated by painted lines or markers;

(5) "Center of intersection." The point of intersection of the center lines of the roadways of intersecting highways;

(6) "City street." Every highway as herein defined, or part thereof located within the limits of incorporated cities and towns, except alleys;

(7) "Combination of vehicles." Every combination of motor vehicle and motor vehicle, motor vehicle and trailer, or motor vehicle and semitrailer;

(8) "Commercial vehicle." Any vehicle the principal use of which is the transportation of commodities, merchandise, produce, freight, animals, or passengers for hire;

(9) "County road." Every highway as herein defined, or part thereof, outside the limits of incorporated cities and towns and which has not been designated as a state highway, or branch thereof;

(10) "Crosswalk." The portion of the roadway between the intersection area and a prolongation or connection of the farthest sidewalk line or in the event there are no sidewalks then between the intersection area and a line ten feet therefrom, except as modified by a marked crosswalk;

(11) "Highway." Every way, lane, road, street, boulevard, and every way or place in the state of Washington open as a matter of right to public vehicular travel both inside and outside the limits of incorporated cities and towns;

(12) "Intersection area." (a) The area embraced within the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, then the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two or more highways which join one another at, or approximately at, right angles, or the area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways joining at any other angle may come in conflict;

(b) Where a highway includes two roadways thirty feet or more apart, then every crossing of each roadway of such divided highway by an intersecting highway shall be regarded as a separate intersection. In the event such intersecting highway also includes two roadways thirty feet or more apart, then every crossing of two roadways of such highways shall be regarded as a separate intersection;

(c) The junction of an alley with a street or highway shall not constitute an intersection;

(13) "Intersection control area." The intersection area as herein defined, together with such modification of the adjacent roadway area as results from the arc or curb corners and together with any marked or unmarked crosswalks adjacent to the intersection;

(14) "Laned highway." A highway the roadway of which is divided into clearly marked lanes for vehicular traffic;

(15) "Local authorities." Every county, municipal, or other local public board or body having authority to adopt local police regulations under the Constitution and laws of this state;

(16) "Marked crosswalk." Any portion of a roadway distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface thereof;

(17) "Metal tire." Every tire, the bearing surface of which in contact with the highway is wholly or partly of metal or other hard, nonresilient material;

(18) "Motor truck." Any motor vehicle, as herein defined, designed or used for the transportation of commodities, merchandise, produce, freight, or animals;

(19) "Motor vehicle." Every vehicle, as herein defined, which is in itself a self-propelled unit;

(20) "Multiple lane highway." Any highway the roadway of which is of sufficient width to reasonably accommodate two or more separate lanes of vehicular traffic in the same direction, each lane of which shall be not less than the maximum legal vehicle width, and whether or not such lanes are marked;

(21) "Operator." Every person who drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle as herein defined;

(22) "Peace officer." Any officer authorized by law to execute criminal process or to make arrests for the violation of the statutes generally or of any particular statute or statutes relative to the highways of this state;

(23) "Pedestrian." Any person afoot or who is using a wheelchair, power wheelchair as defined in RCW 46.04.415, or a means of conveyance propelled by human power other than a bicycle;

(24) "Person." Every natural person, firm, copartnership, corporation, association, or organization;

(25) "Personal wireless service." Any federally licensed personal wireless service;

(26) "Personal wireless service facilities." Unstaffed facilities that are used for the transmission or reception, or both, of personal wireless services including, but not necessarily limited to, antenna arrays, transmission cables, equipment shelters, and support structures;

(27) "Pneumatic tires." Every tire of rubber or other resilient material designed to be inflated with compressed air to support the load thereon;

(28) "Private road or driveway." Every way or place in private ownership and used for travel of vehicles by the owner or those having express or implied permission from the owner, but not by other persons;

(29) "Railroad." A carrier of persons or property upon vehicles, other than streetcars, operated upon stationary rails, the route of which is principally outside incorporated cities and towns;

(30) "Railroad sign or signal." Any sign, signal, or device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks or the approach of a railroad train;

(31) "Residence district." The territory contiguous to and including the highway, as herein defined, not comprising a business district, as herein defined, when the property on such highway for a continuous distance of three hundred feet or more on either side thereof is in the main improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business;

(32) "Roadway." The paved, improved, or proper driving portion of a highway designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel;

(33) "Safety zone." The area or space officially set apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and which is protected or is marked or indicated by painted marks, signs, buttons, standards, or otherwise so as to be plainly discernible;

(34) "Sidewalk." That property between the curb lines or the lateral lines of a roadway, as herein defined, and the adjacent property, set aside and intended for the use of pedestrians or such portion of private property parallel and in proximity to a highway and dedicated to use by pedestrians;

(35) "Solid tire." Every tire of rubber or other resilient material which does not depend upon inflation with compressed air for the support of the load thereon;

(36) "State highway." Every highway as herein defined, or part thereof, which has been designated as a state highway, or branch thereof, by legislative enactment;

(37) "Streetcar." A vehicle other than a train, as herein defined, for the transporting of persons or property and operated upon stationary rails principally within incorporated cities and towns;

(38) "Traffic." Pedestrians, ridden or herded animals, vehicles, streetcars, and other conveyances either singly or together while using any highways for purposes of travel;

(39) "Traffic control signal." Any traffic device, as herein defined, whether manually, electrically, or mechanically operated, by which traffic alternately is directed to stop or proceed or otherwise controlled;

(40) "Traffic devices." All signs, signals, markings, and devices not inconsistent with this title placed or erected by authority of a public body or official having jurisdiction, for the purpose of regulating, warning, or guiding traffic;

(41) "Train." A vehicle propelled by steam, electricity, or other motive power with or without cars coupled thereto, operated upon stationary rails, except street cars;

(42) "Vehicle." Every device capable of being moved upon a highway and in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a highway, excepting power wheelchairs, as defined in RCW 46.04.415, or devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks;(43) "Structurally deficient." A state bridge that is classified as in poor condition under the state bridge condition rating system and is reported by the state to the national bridge inventory as having a deck, superstructure, or substructure rating of four or below. Structurally deficient bridges are characterized by deteriorated conditions of significant bridge elements and potentially reduced load carrying capacity. Bridges deemed structurally deficient typically require significant maintenance and repair to remain in service, and require major rehabilitation or replacement to address the underlying deficiency.

Words and phrases used herein in the past, present, or future tense shall include the past, present, and future tenses; words and phrases used herein in the masculine, feminine, or neuter gender shall include the masculine, feminine, and neuter genders; and words and phrases used herein in the singular or plural shall include the singular and plural; unless the context thereof shall indicate to the contrary.

Sec. 4. RCW 47.28.170 and 2006 c 334 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the department finds that as a consequence of accident, natural disaster, or other emergency, an existing state highway is in jeopardy or is rendered impassible in one or both directions and the department further finds that prompt reconstruction, repair, or other work is needed to preserve or restore the highway for public travel, or when the department is preparing to conduct the repair or replacement of a state bridge deemed structurally deficient, as defined in RCW 47.04.010, by the department, the department may obtain at least three written bids for the work without publishing a call for bids, and the secretary of transportation may award a contract forthwith to the lowest responsible bidder.

The department shall notify any association or organization of contractors filing a request to regularly receive notification. Notification to an association or organization of contractors shall include: (a) The location of the work to be done; (b) the general anticipated nature of the work to be done; and (c) the date determined by the department as reasonable in view of the nature of the work and emergent nature of the problem after which the department will not receive bids.

(2) Whenever the department finds it necessary to protect a highway facility from imminent damage or to perform emergency work to reopen a highway facility, the department may contract for such work on a negotiated basis not to exceed force account rates for a period not to exceed thirty working days.

(3) The secretary shall review any contract exceeding seven hundred thousand dollars awarded under subsection (1) or (2) of this section with the office of financial management within thirty days of the contract award.

(4) Any person, firm, or corporation awarded a contract for work must be prequalified pursuant to RCW 47.28.070 and may be required to furnish a bid deposit or performance bond.

(5) This section does not prevent the department from notifying contractors, that are not otherwise notified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, of the availability of work that the department intends to contract for under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---