BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.12.015 and 1965 ex.s. c 133 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All determinations of the prevailing rate of wage shall be made by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries.

(2) The industrial statistician shall establish the prevailing rate of wage by adopting the hourly wage, usual benefits, and overtime pay established in collective bargaining agreements for those trades and occupations that have collective bargaining agreements. For trades and occupations in which there are no collective bargaining agreements, the industrial statistician shall establish the prevailing rate of wage by conducting wage and hour surveys. In instances when there are no collective bargaining agreements and conducting wage and hour surveys is not feasible, the industrial statistician may employ other appropriate methods to establish the prevailing rate of wage.

--- END ---