BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 77.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Upon termination of the employment relationship by an employee or by an employing person, firm, or business, the employee shall return to the person, firm, or business who purchased the license on the employee's behalf any license described in subsection (2) of this section that the employee possesses.

(2) This section applies to the following types of licenses if the following types of licenses are purchased by a person, firm, or business on behalf of an employee of that person, firm, or business:

(a) A food fish guide license issued under RCW 77.65.370; and

(b) A game fish guide license issued under RCW 77.65.480.

(3) Any license described in subsection (2) of this section that is returned to the person, firm, or business who purchased the license pursuant to this section is transferable to another employee of the person, firm, or business who qualifies for a license under RCW 77.65.050 and 77.65.560.

(4)(a) An employee who fails to return a license as provided in this section shall pay to the person, firm, or business who purchased the license on the employee's behalf an amount equal to the full amount of the license fee and any application fee paid.

(b) A license possessed by an employee who fails to return the license as provided in this section or to pay the person, firm, or business who purchased the license on the employee's behalf as provided in (a) of this subsection is invalidated.

(5) For the purposes of this section, "purchased" means the payment of the full amount of the license fee and any application fee applicable to the license.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.65.370 and 2013 c 314 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person shall not offer or perform the services of a food fish guide without a food fish guide license in the taking of food fish for personal use in freshwater rivers and streams, except that a charter boat license is required to operate a vessel from which a person may for a fee fish for food fish in state waters listed in RCW 77.65.150(4)(b).

(2) Only an individual at least sixteen years of age may hold a food fish guide license. No individual may hold more than one food fish guide license.

(3) An application for a food fish guide license must include the information required in RCW 77.65.560.

(4) A food fish guide license purchased by a person, firm, or business on behalf of an employee is subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3. RCW 77.65.480 and 2013 c 314 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A taxidermy license allows the holder to practice taxidermy for commercial purposes, as that term is defined in RCW 77.15.110. The fee for this license is one hundred eighty dollars. The application fee is seventy dollars.

(2) A fur dealer's license allows the holder to purchase, receive, or resell raw furs for commercial purposes, as that term is defined in RCW 77.15.110. The fee for this license is one hundred eighty dollars. The application fee is seventy dollars.

(3)(a) A game fish guide license allows the holder to offer or perform the services of a game fish guide in the taking of game fish. The fee for this license is one hundred eighty dollars for a resident and six hundred dollars for a nonresident. The application fee is seventy dollars. An application for a game fish guide license must include the information required in RCW 77.65.560.

(b) A game fish guide license purchased by a person, firm, or business on behalf of an employee is subject to section 1 of this act.

(4) A game farm license allows the holder to operate a game farm to acquire, breed, grow, keep, and sell wildlife under conditions prescribed by the rules adopted pursuant to this title. The fee for this license is seventy-two dollars for the first year and forty-eight dollars for each following year. The application fee is seventy dollars.

(5) A game fish stocking permit allows the holder to release game fish into the waters of the state as prescribed by rule of the commission. The fee for this permit is twenty-four dollars. The application fee is seventy dollars.

(6) A fishing or field trial permit allows the holder to promote, conduct, hold, or sponsor a fishing or field trial contest in accordance with rules of the commission. The fee for a fishing contest permit is twenty-four dollars. The fee for a field trial contest permit is twenty-four dollars. The application fee is seventy dollars.

(7)(a) An anadromous game fish buyer's license allows the holder to purchase or sell steelhead trout and other anadromous game fish harvested by Indian fishers lawfully exercising fishing rights reserved by federal statute, treaty, or executive order, under conditions prescribed by rule of the director. The fee for this license is one hundred eighty dollars. The application fee is one hundred five dollars.

(b) An anadromous game fish buyer's license is not required for those businesses that buy steelhead trout and other anadromous game fish from Washington licensed game fish dealers and sell solely at retail.

--- END ---