BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27.085 and 1989 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created the building code council account in the state treasury. Moneys deposited into the account shall be used by the building code council, after appropriation, to perform the purposes of the council.

(2) All moneys collected under subsection (3) of this section shall be deposited into the building code council account. Every four years the state treasurer shall report to the legislature on the balances in the account so that the legislature may adjust the charges imposed under subsection (3) of this section.

(3) There is imposed a fee of ((four)) five dollars and fifty cents on each residential building permit issued by a county or a city, plus an additional surcharge of two dollars for each residential unit, but not including the first unit, on each building containing more than one residential unit, and a fee of ten dollars for each nonresidential building permit issued. The department of enterprise services must increase the fees in this section on July 1, 2019, and every four years thereafter, by the amount of inflation in the previous four-year period as measured by the percentage change in the implicit price deflator published by the United States department of commerce. The fee must be rounded to the nearest quarter of a dollar. Quarterly each county and city shall remit moneys collected under this section to the state treasury; however, no remittance is required until a minimum of fifty dollars has accumulated pursuant to this subsection.

--- END ---