BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that, like other state and local public employees, educational employees do not have a legally protected right to strike. No such right existed at common law, and none has been granted by statute. The legislature finds that educational employees do not have, and have never had, a legally protected right to strike. The legislature further finds, as have numerous trial court decisions and the Washington state attorney general in AGO 2006 No. 3, that any argument that a right to strike is implied by the absence of a provision in chapter 41.59 RCW disavowing the right to strike is simply wrong. The legislature intends by this act to foreclose any such argument from being made in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing contained in this chapter shall permit or grant any educational employee the right to strike or refuse to perform his or her official duties.

--- END ---