BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 9.41.092 (Licensed dealer deliveries—Background checks) and 2015 c 1 s 4 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(2) RCW 9.41.113 (Firearm sales or transfers—Background checks—Requirements—Exceptions) and 2015 c 1 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(3) RCW 9.41.115 (Penalties—Violations of RCW 9.41.113) and 2015 c 1 s 9 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(4) RCW 9.41.137 (Department of licensing, authority to adopt rules—Reporting of violations—Authority to revoke licenses) and 2015 c 1 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(5) RCW 82.08.833 (Exemptions—Sales or transfers of firearms—Unlicensed persons—Background check requirements) and 2015 c 1 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(6) 2015 c 1 s 2 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(7) 2015 c 1 s 5 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(8) 2015 c 1 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(9) 2015 c 1 s 7 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(10) 2015 c 1 s 11 (Initiative Measure No. 594); and

(11) 2015 c 1 s 1 (uncodified) (Initiative Measure No. 594).

--- END ---