BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.19.200 and 1993 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of minority and women's business enterprises account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from RCW 39.19.090, 39.19.210, 39.19.220, and 39.19.230 shall be deposited in the account.

(2) Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of defraying all or part of the costs of the office in administering this chapter. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(3) Funds used from RCW 39.19.090 may not exceed the administrative and processing costs incurred by the office in imposing penalties. Any receipts in excess of administrative and processing costs must be remitted to the state general fund.

(4) The office must report biennially to the legislature beginning June 30, 2016. The report must include:

(a) The total amount of receipts received from penalties imposed under RCW 39.19.090;

(b) The total amount of expenditures from receipts received under RCW 39.19.090; and

(c) An itemized list of expenditures from receipts received under RCW 39.19.090.

--- END ---