BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.05.320 and 2013 c 289 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280 have been proven and that the best interests of the person or others will not be served by a less restrictive treatment which is an alternative to detention, the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the department or to a facility certified for ninety day treatment by the department for a further period of intensive treatment not to exceed ninety days from the date of judgment. If the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis of commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to but not exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment in a facility certified for one hundred eighty day treatment by the department.

(2) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280 have been proven, but finds that treatment less restrictive than detention will be in the best interest of the person or others, then the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the department or to a facility certified for ninety day treatment by the department or to a less restrictive alternative for a further period of less restrictive treatment not to exceed ninety days from the date of judgment. If the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis of commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to but not exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment.

(3) The person shall be released from involuntary treatment at the expiration of the period of commitment imposed under subsection (1) or (2) of this section unless the superintendent or professional person in charge of the facility in which he or she is confined, or in the event of a less restrictive alternative, the designated mental health professional, files a new petition for involuntary treatment on the grounds that the committed person:

(a) During the current period of court ordered treatment: (i) Has threatened, attempted, or inflicted physical harm upon the person of another, or substantial damage upon the property of another, and (ii) as a result of mental disorder or developmental disability presents a likelihood of serious harm; or

(b) Was taken into custody as a result of conduct in which he or she attempted or inflicted serious physical harm upon the person of another, and continues to present, as a result of mental disorder or developmental disability a likelihood of serious harm; or

(c)(i) Is in custody pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) and as a result of mental disorder or developmental disability continues to present a substantial likelihood of repeating acts similar to the charged criminal behavior, when considering the person's life history, progress in treatment, and the public safety.

(ii) In cases under this subsection where the court has made an affirmative special finding under RCW 71.05.280(3)(b), the commitment shall continue for up to an additional one hundred eighty day period whenever the petition presents prima facie evidence that the person continues to suffer from a mental disorder or developmental disability that results in a substantial likelihood of committing acts similar to the charged criminal behavior, unless the person presents proof through an admissible expert opinion that the person's condition has so changed such that the mental disorder or developmental disability no longer presents a substantial likelihood of the person committing acts similar to the charged criminal behavior. The initial or additional commitment period may include transfer to a specialized program of intensive support and treatment, which may be initiated prior to or after discharge from the state hospital; or

(d) Continues to be gravely disabled.

If the conduct required to be proven in (b) and (c) of this subsection was found by a judge or jury in a prior trial under this chapter, it shall not be necessary to prove such conduct again.

(4) For a person committed under subsection (2) of this section who has been remanded to a period of less restrictive treatment, in addition to the grounds specified in subsection (3) of this section, the designated mental health professional may file a new petition for continued less restrictive treatment if:

(a) The person was previously committed by a court to detention for involuntary mental health treatment during the thirty-six months that preceded the person's initial detention date during the current involuntary commitment cycle, excluding any time spent in a mental health facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;

(b) In view of the person's treatment history or current behavior, the person is unlikely to voluntarily participate in outpatient treatment without an order for less restrictive treatment; and

(c) Outpatient treatment that would be provided under a less restrictive treatment order is necessary to prevent a relapse, decompensation, or deterioration that is likely to result in the person presenting a likelihood of serious harm or the person becoming gravely disabled within a reasonably short period of time.

(5) A new petition for involuntary treatment filed under subsection (3) or (4) of this section shall be filed and heard in the superior court of the county of the facility which is filing the new petition for involuntary treatment unless good cause is shown for a change of venue. The cost of the proceedings shall be borne by the state.

(6) The hearing shall be held as provided in RCW 71.05.310, and if the court or jury finds that the grounds for additional confinement as set forth in this section are present, the court may order the committed person returned for an additional period of treatment not to exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment except as provided in subsection (7) of this section. At the end of the one hundred eighty day period of commitment, or one-year period of commitment if subsection (7) of this section applies, the committed person shall be released unless a petition for ((another))an additional one hundred eighty day period of continued treatment is filed and heard in the same manner as provided in this section. Successive one hundred eighty day commitments are permissible on the same grounds and pursuant to the same procedures as the original one hundred eighty day commitment. However, a commitment is not permissible under subsection (4) of this section if thirty-six months have passed since the last date of discharge from detention for inpatient treatment that preceded the current less restrictive alternative order, nor shall a commitment under subsection (4) of this section be permissible if the likelihood of serious harm in subsection (4)(c) of this section is based solely on harm to the property of others.

(7) An order for less restrictive treatment entered under subsection (6) of this section may be for up to one year when the person's previous commitment term was for intensive inpatient treatment in a state hospital.

(8) No person committed as provided in this section may be detained unless a valid order of commitment is in effect. No order of commitment can exceed one hundred eighty days in length except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.05.340 and 2009 c 322 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) When, in the opinion of the superintendent or the professional person in charge of the hospital or facility providing involuntary treatment, the committed person can be appropriately served by outpatient treatment prior to or at the expiration of the period of commitment, then such outpatient care may be required as a term of conditional release for a period which, when added to the inpatient treatment period, shall not exceed the period of commitment. If the hospital or facility designated to provide outpatient treatment is other than the facility providing involuntary treatment, the outpatient facility so designated must agree in writing to assume such responsibility. A copy of the terms of conditional release shall be given to the patient, the designated mental health professional in the county in which the patient is to receive outpatient treatment, and to the court of original commitment.

(b) Before a person committed under grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c) is conditionally released under (a) of this subsection, the superintendent or professional person in charge of the hospital or facility providing involuntary treatment shall in writing notify the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the criminal charges against the committed person were dismissed, of the decision to conditionally release the person. Notice and a copy of the terms of conditional release shall be provided at least thirty days before the person is released from inpatient care. Within twenty days after receiving notice, the prosecuting attorney may petition the court in the county that issued the commitment order to hold a hearing to determine whether the person may be conditionally released and the terms of the conditional release. The prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the petition to the superintendent or professional person in charge of the hospital or facility providing involuntary treatment, the attorney, if any, and guardian or conservator of the committed person, and the court of original commitment. If the county in which the committed person is to receive outpatient treatment is the same county in which the criminal charges against the committed person were dismissed, then the court shall, upon the motion of the prosecuting attorney, transfer the proceeding to the court in that county. The court shall conduct a hearing on the petition within ten days of the filing of the petition. The committed person shall have the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as for an involuntary treatment proceeding, except as set forth in this subsection and except that there shall be no right to jury trial. The issue to be determined at the hearing is whether or not the person may be conditionally released without substantial danger to other persons, or substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security. If the court disapproves of the conditional release, it may do so only on the basis of substantial evidence. Pursuant to the determination of the court upon the hearing, the conditional release of the person shall be approved by the court on the same or modified conditions or the person shall be returned for involuntary treatment on an inpatient basis subject to release at the end of the period for which he or she was committed, or otherwise in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(2) The hospital or facility designated to provide outpatient care or the secretary may modify the conditions for continued release when such modification is in the best interest of the person. Notification of such changes shall be sent to all persons receiving a copy of the original conditions.

(3)(a) If the hospital or facility designated to provide outpatient care, the designated mental health professional, or the secretary determines that:

(i) A conditionally released person is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of his or her release;

(ii) Substantial deterioration in a conditionally released person's functioning has occurred;

(iii) There is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further inpatient treatment; or

(iv) The person poses a likelihood of serious harm.

Upon notification by the hospital or facility designated to provide outpatient care, or on his or her own motion, the designated mental health professional or the secretary may order that the conditionally released person be apprehended and taken into custody and temporarily detained in an evaluation and treatment facility in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment.

(b) The hospital or facility designated to provide outpatient treatment shall notify the secretary or designated mental health professional when a conditionally released person fails to adhere to terms and conditions of his or her conditional release or experiences substantial deterioration in his or her condition and, as a result, presents an increased likelihood of serious harm. The designated mental health professional or secretary shall order the person apprehended and temporarily detained in an evaluation and treatment facility in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment.

(c) A person detained under this subsection (3) shall be held until such time, not exceeding five days, as a hearing can be scheduled to determine whether or not the person should be returned to the hospital or facility from which he or she had been conditionally released. The designated mental health professional or the secretary may modify or rescind such order at any time prior to commencement of the court hearing.

(d) The court that originally ordered commitment shall be notified within two judicial days of a person's detention under the provisions of this section, and the designated mental health professional or the secretary shall file his or her petition and order of apprehension and detention with the court that originally ordered commitment or with the court in the county in which the person is detained and serve them upon the person detained. His or her attorney, if any, and his or her guardian or conservator, if any, shall receive a copy of such papers as soon as possible. Such person shall have the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as for an involuntary treatment proceeding, except as specifically set forth in this section and except that there shall be no right to jury trial. The venue for proceedings regarding a petition for modification or revocation of an order for conditional release shall be in the county in which the petition was filed. The issues to be determined shall be: (i) Whether the conditionally released person did or did not adhere to the terms and conditions of his or her conditional release; (ii) that substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred; (iii) there is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further inpatient treatment; or (iv) there is a likelihood of serious harm; and, if any of the conditions listed in this subsection (3)(d) have occurred, whether the terms of conditional release should be modified or the person should be returned to the facility.

(e) In determining whether or not to modify the terms of conditional release or return the person to the facility:

(i) The court must consider the symptoms and behavior of the person in light of all available evidence concerning the person's historical behavior, which may include information provided by credible witnesses as defined in RCW 71.05.212(2); and

(ii) If the petition is based on the person's failure to adhere to the terms or conditions of his or her release, the court must give great weight to information regarding symptoms or behavior that: (A) Are closely associated with symptoms or behavior which preceded and led to a past incident of involuntary hospitalization, severe deterioration, or one or more violent acts; (B) represent a marked and concerning change in the baseline behavior of the person; and (C) indicate that without modified terms or return of the person to the facility, continued deterioration is probable.

(f) Pursuant to the determination of the court upon such hearing, the conditionally released person shall either continue to be conditionally released on the same or modified conditions or shall be returned for involuntary treatment on an inpatient basis subject to release at the end of the period for which he or she was committed for involuntary treatment, or otherwise in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Such hearing may be waived by the person and his or her counsel and his or her guardian or conservator, if any, but shall not be waivable unless all such persons agree to waive, and upon such waiver the person may be returned for involuntary treatment or continued on conditional release on the same or modified conditions.

(4) The proceedings set forth in subsection (3) of this section may be initiated by the designated mental health professional or the secretary on the same basis set forth therein without requiring or ordering the apprehension and detention of the conditionally released person, in which case the court hearing shall take place in not less than five days from the date of service of the petition upon the conditionally released person. The petition may be filed in the court that originally ordered commitment or with the court in the county in which the person is present. The venue for the proceedings regarding the petition for modification or revocation of an order for conditional release shall be in the county in which the petition was filed.

Upon expiration of the period of commitment, or when the person is released from outpatient care, notice in writing to the court which committed the person for treatment shall be provided.

(5) The grounds and procedures for revocation of less restrictive alternative treatment shall be the same as those set forth in this section for conditional releases.

(6) In the event of a revocation of a conditional release, the subsequent treatment period may be for no longer than the actual period authorized in the original court order.

--- END ---