BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The Washington state institute for public policy is directed to complete a study by December 1, 2015, regarding the implementation of certain aspects of the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW. The study must include, but not be limited to:

(a) An assessment of the nonemergent detention process provided under RCW 71.05.150, which examines:

(i) The number of nonemergent petitions filed in each county by year;

(ii) The reasons for variation in the use of nonemergent detentions based on feedback from judicial officers, prosecutors, public defenders, and mental health professionals; and

(iii) Models in other states for handling civil commitments when imminent danger is not present.

(b) An analysis of less restrictive alternative orders under the involuntary treatment act including:

(i) Differences across counties with respect to: (A) The use of less restrictive alternatives and reasons why least restrictive alternatives may or may not be utilized in different jurisdictions; (B) monitoring practices; and (C) rates of, grounds for, and outcomes of petitions for revocation or modification;

(ii) A systematic review of the research literature on the effectiveness of alternatives to involuntary hospitalizations in reducing violence and rehospitalizations; and

(iii) Approaches used in other states to monitor and enforce least restrictive orders, including associated costs.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2016.

--- END ---