BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.160.010 and 1990 c 177 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following words or terms shall have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(1) "Certificate of competency holder" means an individual who has satisfactorily met the qualifications and has received a certificate of competency from the state director of fire protection under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) "Fire protection sprinkler system contractor" means a person or organization that offers to undertake the execution of contracts for the design, installation, inspection, maintenance, or servicing of a fire protection sprinkler system or any part of such a system.

(3) "Fire protection sprinkler system" means an assembly of underground and/or overhead piping or conduit beginning at the connection to the primary water supply, whether public or private, that conveys water with or without other agents to dispersal openings or devices to extinguish, control, or contain fire and to provide protection from exposure to fire or other products of combustion.

(4) "Fire protection sprinkler system contractor's license" means the license issued by the state director of fire protection to a fire protection sprinkler system contractor upon an application being approved, the fee being paid, and the satisfactory completion of the requirements of this chapter. The license shall be issued in the name of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor with the name or names of the certificate of competency holder noted thereon.

(5) "NFPA 13-D" means whatever standard that is used by the national fire protection association for the installation of fire protection sprinkler systems in one or two-family residential dwellings or mobile homes.

(6) "NFPA 13-R" means whatever standard that is used by the national fire protection association for the installation of fire protection sprinkler systems in residential dwellings up to four stories in height.

(7) "Inspection" means a visual examination of a fire protection sprinkler system or portion of the system to verify that the system appears to be in operating condition and is free from physical damage and complies with the applicable statutes and regulations adopted by the state director of fire protection.

(8) "Installation" means the initial placement of fire protection sprinkler system equipment or the extension, modification, or alteration of equipment after the initial placement. Installation shall include the work from a street or main water access throughout the entire building.

(9) "Maintenance" means to maintain in the condition of repair that provides performance as originally planned.

(10) "Organization" means a corporation, partnership, firm, or other business association, governmental entity, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(11) "Person" means a natural person, including an owner, manager, partner, officer, employee, or occupant.

(12) "Service" means to repair or test.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.160.020 and 1990 c 177 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) A municipality or county may not enact an order, ordinance, rule, or regulation requiring a fire protection sprinkler system contractor to obtain a fire sprinkler contractor license from the municipality or county. However, a municipality or county may require a fire protection sprinkler system contractor to obtain a permit and pay a fee for the installation of a fire protection sprinkler system and require the installation of such systems to conform with the building code or other construction requirements of the municipality or county, but may not impose financial responsibility requirements other than proof of a valid license.

(((2) This chapter does not apply to:

(a) United States, state, and local government employees, building officials, fire marshals, fire inspectors, or insurance inspectors when acting in their official capacities;

(b) A person or organization acting under court order;

(c) A person or organization that sells or supplies products or materials to a licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractor;

(d) A registered professional engineer acting solely in a professional capacity;

(e) An employee of a licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractor performing duties for the registered fire protection sprinkler system contractor; and

(f) An owner/occupier of a single-family residence performing his or her own installation in that residence.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 18.160 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not apply to:

(1) United States, state, and local government employees, building officials, fire marshals, fire inspectors, or insurance inspectors when acting in their official capacities;

(2) A person or organization acting under court order;

(3) A person or organization that sells or supplies products or materials to a person or organization that: (a) Holds a license or certificate issued under this chapter; or (b) is exempt under this section;

(4) A registered professional engineer acting solely in a professional capacity;

(5) An employee of a licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractor performing duties for the licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractor;

(6) An owner/occupier of a single-family residence performing his or her own installation in that residence;

(7) A registered general or specialty contractor contracting for the installation of a residential fire sprinkler system that is connected to the building's potable water system;

(8) A certified journey level plumber, residential specialty plumber, or plumber trainee, employed by and performing duties for a registered contractor engaged in the installation of a residential fire protection sprinkler system that is connected to the building's potable water system; and

(9) A person or organization designing a residential fire protection sprinkler system that is connected to the building's potable water system and meets the performance standards and requirements under the state building code, chapter 19.27 RCW, for fire protection sprinkler systems for one and two-family dwellings and townhouses.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.160.030 and 2003 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter shall be administered by the state director of fire protection.

(2) The state director of fire protection shall have the authority, and it shall be his or her duty to:

(a) Issue such administrative regulations as necessary for the administration of this chapter;

(b)(i) Set reasonable fees for licenses, certificates, testing, and other aspects of the administration of this chapter. However, the license fee for fire protection sprinkler system contractors engaged solely in the installation, inspection, maintenance, or servicing of NFPA 13-D fire protection sprinkler systems shall not exceed one hundred dollars, and the license fee for fire protection sprinkler system contractors engaged solely in the installation, inspection, maintenance, or servicing of NFPA 13-R fire protection sprinkler systems shall not exceed three hundred dollars;

(ii) Adopt rules establishing a special category restricted to contractors registered under chapter 18.27 RCW who install underground systems that service fire protection sprinkler systems((. The rules shall be adopted within ninety days of March 31, 1992));

(iii) Subject to RCW 18.160.120, adopt rules defining infractions under this chapter and fines to be assessed for those infractions;

(c) Enforce the provisions of this chapter;

(d) Conduct investigations of complaints to determine if any infractions of this chapter or the regulations developed under this chapter have occurred;

(e) Assign a certificate number to each certificate of competency holder; and

(f) Adopt rules necessary to implement and administer a program which requires the affixation of a seal any time a fire protection sprinkler system is installed, which seal shall include the certificate number of any certificate of competency holder who installs, in whole or in part, the fire protection sprinkler system.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.160.040 and 2000 c 171 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To become a certificate of competency holder under this chapter, an applicant must have satisfactorily passed an examination administered by the state director of fire protection. A certificate of competency holder can satisfy this examination requirement by presenting a copy of a current certificate of competency from the national institute for certification in engineering technologies showing that the applicant has achieved the classification of engineering technician level 3 or senior engineering technician level 4 in the field of fire protection, automatic sprinkler system layout. The state director of fire protection may accept equivalent proof of qualification in lieu of examination. This examination requirement is mandatory except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(2) Every applicant for a certificate of competency shall fulfill the requirements established by the state director of fire protection under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) Every applicant for a certificate of competency shall make application to the state director of fire protection and pay the fees required.

(4) ((Provided the application for the certificate of competency is made prior to ninety days after May 1, 1991, the state director of fire protection, in lieu of the examination requirements of the applicant for a certificate of competency, may accept as satisfactory evidence of competency and qualification, affidavits attesting that the applicant has had a minimum of three years' experience.

(5))) The state director of fire protection may issue a temporary certificate of competency to an applicant who, in his or her judgment, will satisfactorily perform as a certificate of competency holder under the provisions of this chapter. The temporary certificate of competency shall remain in effect for a period of up to three years. The temporary certificate of competency holder shall, within the three-year period, complete the examination requirements specified in subsection (1) of this section. There shall be no examination exemption for an individual issued a temporary certificate of competency. Prior to the expiration of the three-year period, the temporary certificate of competency holder shall make application for a regular certificate of competency. The procedures and qualifications for issuance of a regular certificate of competency shall be applicable to the temporary certificate of competency holder. When a temporary certificate of competency expires, the holder shall cease all activities associated with the holding of a temporary certificate of competency, subject to the penalties contained in this chapter.

(((6)))(5) To become a licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractor under this chapter, a person or firm must comply with the following:

(a) Must be or have in his or her full-time employ a holder of a valid certificate of competency;

(b) Comply with the minimum insurance requirements of this chapter; and

(c) Make application to the state director of fire protection for a license and pay the fees required.

(((7)))(6) Each license and certificate of competency issued under this chapter must be posted in a conspicuous place in the fire protection sprinkler system contractor's place of business.

(((8)))(7) All bids, advertisements, proposals, offers, and installation drawings for fire protection sprinkler systems must prominently display the fire protection sprinkler system contractor's license number.

(((9)))(8) A certificate of competency or license issued under this chapter is not transferable.

(((10)))(9) In no case shall a certificate of competency holder be employed full time by more than one fire protection sprinkler system contractor at the same time.

(10) If the certificate of competency holder should leave the employment of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor, he or she must notify the state director of fire protection within thirty days.

(11) If the certificate of competency holder should leave the employment of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor, the contractor shall have six months or until the expiration of the current license, whichever occurs last, to submit a new application identifying another certificate of competency holder who is at the time of application an owner of the fire protection sprinkler system business or a full-time employee of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor, in order to be issued a new license. If such application is not received and a new license issued within the allotted time, the state director of fire protection shall revoke the license of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor.

--- END ---