BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

2015-2017 FISCAL BIENNIUM

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The transportation budget of the state is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and for other specified purposes, including the payment of any final judgments arising out of such activities, for the period ending June 30, 2017.

(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act.

(a) "Fiscal year 2016" or "FY 2016" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016.

(b) "Fiscal year 2017" or "FY 2017" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017.

(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.

(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

(f) "Reappropriation" means appropriation and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, is subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations.

(g) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES—OPERATING

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$476,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102. FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Grade Crossing Protective Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$504,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The utilities and transportation commission shall coordinate a state agency work group in 2016 that will identify issues, laws, and regulations relevant to consolidating rail employee safety and regulatory functions in the utilities and transportation commission, and report those findings to the joint transportation committee by December 31, 2016. State agencies in the work group must include the department of transportation, the department of labor and industries, the emergency management division of the state military department, and any other relevant agencies. The report must address: An inventory of state rail employee safety regulatory authority, including rail employee safety laws and regulations; issues pertaining to state rail safety inspectors, including enforcement authority, staffing, training, and retention; and information relating to the enhancement of rail employee safety, yard conditions, lighting, and appliance maintenance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,268,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$110,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,378,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for the office of financial management, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to counties per RCW 46.68.120(3), to evaluate the concept of exchanging some amount of federal funds received by counties for state funds in order to reduce the administrative burden on counties associated with using federal funds on relatively small, locally administered projects. The analysis and findings must be done in consultation with the Washington state association of counties and the department of transportation. Preliminary findings, including a feasibility analysis and an outline of one or more conceptual approaches, must be produced by December 1, 2015, and final recommendations, including implementation and timing details for any preferred approaches, must be submitted to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by September 1, 2016.

(2) $835,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial management, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to counties according to RCW 46.68.120(3), to contract with the Washington state association of counties to develop, implement, and report on transportation metrics associated with transportation system policy goals outlined in RCW 47.04.280. The Washington state association of counties, in cooperation with state agencies, must: Evaluate and implement opportunities to streamline reporting of county transportation financial data; expand reporting and collection of short-span bridge and culvert data; evaluate and report on the impact of increased freight and rail traffic on county roads; and to evaluate, implement, and report on the opportunities for improved capital project management and delivery.

(3) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial management, from funds set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to counties according to RCW 46.68.120(3), to contract with the Washington state association of counties to work with the department of fish and wildlife to develop voluntary programmatic agreements for the maintenance, preservation, rehabilitation, and replacement of water crossing structures. A report must be presented to the legislature by December 31, 2016, on the implementation of developed voluntary programmatic agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation . . . .$986,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation in this section is provided solely for road maintenance purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,212,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106. FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$563,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

The department must work with the Washington state association of counties to develop voluntary programmatic agreements for the maintenance, preservation, rehabilitation, and replacement of water crossing structures. Such programmatic agreements when agreed to by the department and participating counties are binding agreements for permitting, design, and mitigation of county water crossing structures.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—OPERATING

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$3,154,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$27,383,000

Highway Safety Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$118,000

School Zone Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$850,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$31,505,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The commission may continue to oversee pilot projects implementing the use of automated traffic safety cameras to detect speed violations within cities west of the Cascade mountains that have a population of more than one hundred ninety-five thousand and that are located in a county with a population of fewer than one million five hundred thousand. For the purposes of pilot projects in this subsection, no more than one automated traffic safety camera may be used to detect speed violations within any one jurisdiction.

(a) The commission shall comply with RCW 46.63.170 in administering the pilot projects.

(b) By January 1, 2017, any local authority that is operating an automated traffic safety camera to detect speed violations must provide a summary to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning the use of the cameras and data regarding infractions, revenues, and costs.

(2) $99,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5957), Laws of 2015 (pedestrian safety reviews). If chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5957), Laws of 2015 is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(3) $6,500,000 of the highway safety account—federal appropriation is provided solely for federal funds that may be obligated to the commission pursuant to 23 U.S.C. Sec. 164 during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

(4) Within current resources, the commission must examine the declining revenue going to the school zone safety account with the goal of identifying factors contributing to the decline. By December 31, 2015, the commission must provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature that summarizes its findings and provides recommendations designed to ensure that the account is receiving all amounts that should be deposited into the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202. FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .$969,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,283,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,481,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,733,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Transportation Improvement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204. FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,727,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for a consultant study of Washington state patrol recruitment and retention of troopers. The study must identify barriers to effective candidate recruitment, candidates' successful completion of training, and retention of trained troopers of various tenure. The study must provide:

(i) An overview of current attrition rates;

(ii) Options and strategies on reducing the average number of trooper positions that are vacant;

(iii) Identification of best practices for recruitment and retention of law enforcement officers;

(iv) Recommendations to improve existing recruitment and selection programs;

(v) Recommendations for where salary and benefit adjustments should be targeted to most effectively address recruitment and retention challenges;

(vi) Recommendations regarding changes to the training and education program; and

(vii) Other recommendations for cost-effective personnel strategies.

(b) The joint transportation committee shall issue a report of its findings to the house and senate transportation committees by December 14, 2015. The Washington state patrol shall work with the consultant to identify costs for each recommendation.

(2)(a) $125,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for a study of Washington state weigh station planning, placement, and operations by the Washington state patrol and department of transportation as they relate to roadway safety and preservation. The study must:

(i) Provide a high-level overview of commercial vehicle enforcement programs, with a focus on weigh stations, including both state and federal funding programs. This overview must include a description of how the Washington state patrol and department of transportation allocate these state and federal funds.

(ii) Review Washington state patrol and department of transportation planning related to weigh station location and operation, and the extent to which their efforts complement, coordinate with, or overlap each other;

(iii) Identify best practices in the funding, placement, and operation of weigh stations;

(iv) Review plans by the department of transportation and Washington state patrol to reopen a Federal Way area southbound weigh station;

(v) Recommend changes in state statutes, policy, or agency practices and rules to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of weigh station funding, placement, and operation, including potential savings to be achieved by adopting the changes; and

(vi) Review whether it is cost-effective or more efficient to place future weigh stations in the median of a highway instead of placing two individual weigh stations on either side of a highway.

(b) The joint transportation committee must issue a report of its findings and recommendations to the house of representatives and senate transportation committees by December 14, 2015.

(3) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, from the cities' statewide fuel tax distributions under RCW 46.68.110(2), is for a study to be conducted in 2016 to identify prominent road-rail conflicts, recommend a corridor-based prioritization process for addressing the impacts of projected increases in rail traffic, and identify areas of state public policy interest, such as the critical role of freight movement to the Washington economy and the state's competitiveness in world trade. The study must consider the results of the updated marine cargo forecast due to be delivered to the joint transportation committee on December 1, 2015. In conducting the study, the joint transportation committee must consult with the department of transportation, the freight mobility strategic investment board, the utilities and transportation commission, local governments, and other relevant stakeholders. The joint transportation committee must issue a report of its recommendations and findings by December 1, 2016.

(4) The legislature intends for the joint transportation committee to undertake a study during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium of consolidating rail employee safety and regulatory functions in the utilities and transportation commission. The joint transportation committee should review the information provided by the utilities and transportation commission as required under section 102 of this act and should provide recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature regarding such a consolidation of rail employee safety and regulatory functions.

(5) Within existing resources, during the interim periods between regular sessions of the legislature, the joint transportation committee shall include on its agendas work sessions on the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project. These work sessions must include a report on current progress of the project, timelines for completion, outstanding claims, the financial status of the project, and any other information necessary for the legislature to maintain appropriate oversight of the project. The parties invited to present may include the department of transportation, the Seattle tunnel partners, and other appropriate stakeholders. The joint transportation committee shall have at least two such work sessions before December 31, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,452,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$112,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,564,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to continue evaluating a road usage charge as an alternative to the motor vehicle fuel tax to fund investments in transportation. The evaluation must include monitoring and reviewing work that is underway in other states and nationally. The commission may coordinate with the department of transportation to jointly pursue any federal or other funds that are or might become available and eligible for road usage charge pilot projects. The commission must reconvene the road usage charge steering committee, with the same membership authorized in chapter 222, Laws of 2014, and report to the governor's office and the transportation committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December 15, 2015.

(2) $150,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to use an outside survey firm to conduct three transportation surveys during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. The commission must consult with the joint transportation committee when deciding on the survey topics and design to ensure the survey results will deliver the data, information, and analysis for future transportation policy and strategic planning decisions in a manner useful to the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206. FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation . . . .$979,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to conduct a study of freight infrastructure needs, including an update of the long-term marine cargo forecast. The board must work with the Washington public ports association to evaluate: (1) Forecasted cargo movement by commodity, type, and mode of land transport; and (2) current and projected freight infrastructure capacity needs. A report on the study must be delivered to the joint transportation committee by December 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$407,771,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$12,779,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,631,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,323,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$276,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$425,780,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed employment providing traffic control services to the department of transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol must be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.

(2) $510,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ignition interlock program at the Washington state patrol to provide funding for two staff to work and provide support for the program in working with manufacturers, service centers, technicians, and participants in the program.

(3) $23,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1276), Laws of 2015 (impaired driving). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1276), Laws of 2015 is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$34,000

License Plate Technology Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$3,200,000

Motorcycle Safety Education Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$4,442,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation. . . .$949,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$183,610,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,573,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$86,014,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$362,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,544,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$5,133,000

Department of Licensing Services Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$6,575,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$295,436,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $24,212,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation and $3,200,000 of the license plate technology account—state appropriation are provided solely for business and technology modernization. The department and the state chief information officer or his or her designee must provide a joint project status report to the transportation committees of the legislature on at least a calendar quarter basis. The report must include, but is not limited to: Detailed information about the planned and actual scope, schedule, and budget; status of key vendor and other project deliverables; and a description of significant changes to planned deliverables or system functions over the life of the project. Project staff will periodically brief the committees or the committees' staff on system security and data protection measures.

(2) $5,059,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacing prorate and fuel tax computer systems used to administer interstate licensing and the collection of fuel tax revenues.

(3) $3,714,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of an updated central issuance system.

(4) $3,082,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for exam and licensing activities, including the workload associated with providing driver record abstracts, and is subject to the following additional conditions and limitations:

(a) The department may furnish driving record abstracts only to those persons or entities expressly authorized to receive the abstracts under Title 46 RCW;

(b) The department may furnish driving record abstracts only for an amount that does not exceed the specified fee amounts in RCW 46.52.130 (2)(e)(v) and (4); and

(c) The department may not enter into a contract, or otherwise participate in any arrangement, with a third party or other state agency for any service that results in an additional cost, in excess of the fee amounts specified in RCW 46.52.130 (2)(e)(v) and (4), to statutorily authorized persons or entities purchasing a driving record abstract.

(5) The department when modernizing its computer systems must place personal and company data elements in separate data fields to allow the department to select discrete data elements when providing information or data to persons or entities outside the department. This requirement must be included as part of the systems design in the department's business and technology modernization. A person's photo, social security number, or medical information must not be made available through public disclosure or data being provided under RCW 46.12.630 or 46.12.635.

(6) Within existing resources and in consultation with the traffic safety commission, the Washington state patrol, and a representative of the insurance industry and the professional driving school association, the department must review options and make recommendations on strategies for addressing young and high-risk drivers. The recommendations must consider the findings of Washington state's strategic highway safety plan, Target Zero, and must include an analysis of expanding traffic safety education to eighteen to twenty-four year olds that have not taken a traffic safety course and drivers that have been convicted of high-risk behavior, such as driving under the influence of drugs and alcohol and reckless driving. An overview of the work conducted and the recommendations are due to the transportation committees of the legislature and the governor by December 31, 2015.

(7) $57,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1157), Laws of 2015 or chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5025), Laws of 2015 (quick title service fees). If both chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1157), Laws of 2015 and chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5025), Laws of 2015 are not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(8) $283,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation and $33,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account—state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1276), Laws of 2015 (impaired driving). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1276), Laws of 2015 is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(9) $63,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5656), Laws of 2015 (distracted driving). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5656), Laws of 2015 is not enacted by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM B

High Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,688,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$503,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$39,543,000

State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$6,703,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$25,660,000

Interstate 405 Express Toll Lanes Operations﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$9,931,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$85,028,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,300,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation and $8,157,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of addressing unforeseen operations and maintenance costs on the Tacoma Narrows bridge and the state route number 520 bridge, respectively. The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this section, which represent a portion of the required minimum fund balance under the policy of the state treasurer, in unallotted status. The office may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for operations and maintenance purposes have been exhausted.

(2) $4,778,000 of the state route number 520 civil penalties account—state appropriation and $2,065,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation are provided solely for expenditures related to the toll adjudication process. The department shall report on the civil penalty process to the office of financial management and the house of representatives and senate transportation committees by the end of each calendar quarter. The reports must include a summary table for each toll facility that includes: The number of notices of civil penalty issued; the number of recipients who pay before the notice becomes a penalty; the number of recipients who request a hearing and the number who do not respond; workload costs related to hearings; the cost and effectiveness of debt collection activities; and revenues generated from notices of civil penalty.

(3) The department shall make detailed quarterly expenditure reports available to the transportation commission and to the public on the department's web site using current department resources. The reports must include a summary of toll revenue by facility on all operating toll facilities and high occupancy toll lane systems, and an itemized depiction of the use of that revenue.

(4) $3,100,000 of the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account—state appropriation, $1,498,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, and $1,291,000 of the high occupancy toll lanes operations account—state appropriation are provided solely for the operation and maintenance of roadside toll collection systems.

(5) $6,831,000 of the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for operational costs related to the express toll lane facility, including the customer service center vendor, transponders, credit card fees, printing and postage, rent, office supplies, telephone and communications equipment, computers, and vehicle operations.

(6) $56,000 of the high occupancy toll lanes operations account—state appropriation, $1,124,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, and $596,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop a request for proposals for a new tolling customer service center. The department must address the replacement of the Wave2Go ferry ticketing system that is reaching the end of its useful life by developing functional and technical requirements that integrate Washington state ferries ticketing into the new tolling division customer service center toll collection system. The department shall continue to report quarterly to the governor, legislature, and state auditor on: (a) The department's effort to mitigate risk to the state, (b) the development of a request for proposals, and (c) the overall progress towards procuring a new tolling customer service center.

(7) The department shall make detailed quarterly reports to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature on the following:

(a) The use of consultants in the tolling program, including the name of the contractor, the scope of work, the type of contract, timelines, deliverables, any new task orders, and any extensions to existing consultant contracts;

(b) The nonvendor costs of administering toll operations, including the costs of staffing the division, consultants and other personal service contracts required for technical oversight and management assistance, insurance, payments related to credit card processing, transponder purchases and inventory management, facility operations and maintenance, and other miscellaneous nonvendor costs; and

(c) The vendor-related costs of operating tolled facilities, including the costs of the customer service center, cash collections on the Tacoma Narrows bridge, electronic payment processing, and toll collection equipment maintenance, renewal, and replacement.

(8) $5,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for membership dues for the alliance for toll interoperability.

(9) $1,925,000 of the state route number 520 civil penalties account—state appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5481), Laws of 2015 (tolling customer service reform) to improve integration between the Good to Go! electronic tolling system with the pay-by-mail system through increased communication with customers and improvements to the Good to Go! web site allowing customers to manage all of their toll accounts regardless of method of payment. Within the amounts provided, the department must include in the request for proposals for a new customer service center the requirement that the new tolling customer service center link to the vehicle records system of the department of licensing to enable vehicle record updates that relate to tolling customer accounts to occur between the two systems seamlessly. The department must work with the department of licensing to develop the appropriate specifications to include in the request for proposals to allow the new tolling customer service center to link to the vehicle records system without cost to the department of licensing and report to the transportation committees of the legislature when the appropriate specifications have been completed. By June 30, 2017, the department shall report how many people with Good to Go! accounts were issued civil penalties for each toll facility and whether the number was reduced each fiscal year in the biennium. The department shall also report on the number of customer contacts that occur, number of civil penalties reduced or waived, the amount of the total civil penalties that are waived, and the number of customers that are referred to the administrative law judge process during the biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY—PROGRAM C

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,460,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$67,458,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,883,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,460,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$263,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$73,524,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,460,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation and $1,460,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation are provided solely for maintaining the department's project management reporting system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM D—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$27,098,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$34,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$27,132,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—AVIATION—PROGRAM F

Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation. . . .$8,143,000

Aeronautics Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$4,100,000

Aeronautics Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$60,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$12,303,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $4,137,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for airport investment studies and the airport aid grant program, which provides competitive grants to public airports for pavement, safety, maintenance, planning, and security. Of this amount, $637,000 lapses if chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5324), Laws of 2015 (aircraft excise taxes) is not enacted by June 30, 2015, and an expenditure to the aeronautics account is not provided in the 2015-2017 omnibus appropriations act by June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM H

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$52,070,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$52,820,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The real estate services division of the department must recover the cost of its efforts from sale proceeds and fund additional future sales from those proceeds.

(2) The legislature recognizes that the trail known as the Rocky Reach Trail, and its extensions, serve to separate motor vehicle traffic from pedestrians and bicyclists, increasing motor vehicle safety on state route number 2 and the coincident section of state route number 97. Consistent with chapter 47.30 RCW and pursuant to RCW 47.12.080, the legislature declares that transferring portions of WSDOT Inventory Control (IC) No. 2-09-04686 containing the trail and associated buffer areas to the Washington state parks and recreation commission is consistent with the public interest. The legislature directs the department to transfer the property to the Washington state parks and recreation commission.

(a) The department must be paid fair market value for any portions of the transferred real property that is later abandoned, vacated, or ceases to be publicly maintained for trail purposes.

(b) Prior to completing the transfer in this subsection (2), the department must ensure that provisions are made to accommodate private and public utilities and any facilities that predate the department's acquisition of the property, at no cost to those entities. Prior to completing the transfer, the department shall also ensure that provisions, by fair market assessment, are made to accommodate other private and public utilities and any facilities that have been legally allowed by permit or other instrument.

(c) The department may sell any adjoining property that is not necessary to support the Rocky Reach Trail and adjacent buffer areas only after the transfer of trail-related property to the Washington state parks and recreation commission is complete. Adjoining property owners must be given the first opportunity to acquire such property that abuts their property, and applicable boundary line or other adjustments must be made to the legal descriptions for recording purposes.

(3) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, in instances on private property when naturally occurring beaver dams and the water contained behind the dams pose an imminent threat to Washington state highway infrastructure, personal property, and individual safety in the event of dam failure, the department shall: (a) Notify the private property owner or owners of the threat; (b) perform a risk assessment to the state highway infrastructure, personal property, and public safety or loss of life; (c) coordinate with the department of fish and wildlife to perform an environmental risk assessment and develop a suggested beaver management plan to reduce or eliminate the risk of failure; and (d) produce a joint agency management plan with the department of fish and wildlife for the site and involve local jurisdictions and nongovernmental organizations to help execute the recommendations as devised by the state agencies. Further, within that joint agency plan, the department and department of fish and wildlife shall identify and prioritize potential remedies to include culvert replacement, infrastructure upgrade, wildlife management tools, dam maintenance, water level controls, and any other identifiable solution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS—PROGRAM K

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$582,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The economic partnerships program must continue to explore retail partnerships at state-owned park and ride facilities, as authorized in RCW 47.04.295.

(2) Within the amounts provided in this section, the economic partnership program shall consult with the department's tolling division and participate in the division's ongoing efforts to reduce the costs associated with the Tacoma Narrows bridge. This participation must include examining opportunities for the state to contract with one or more private sector partners to collect tolls and provide services to drivers crossing the bridge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM M

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$397,329,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$7,000,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$1,768,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$4,448,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$410,545,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,605,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for utility fees assessed by local governments as authorized under RCW 90.03.525 for the mitigation of storm water runoff from state highways.

(2) $4,448,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the state route number 520 floating bridge. These funds must be used in accordance with RCW 47.56.830(3).

(3) $1,768,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the new Tacoma Narrows bridge. These funds must be used in accordance with RCW 47.56.830(3).

(4) When regional transit authority construction activities are visible from a state highway, the department shall allow the regional transit authority to place safe and appropriate signage informing the public of the purpose of the construction activity.

(5) The department must make signage for low-height bridges a high priority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$51,572,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,050,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$53,872,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or provide congestion relief. The department shall prioritize low-cost enhancement projects on a statewide rather than regional basis. By September 1st of each even-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all low-cost enhancement projects prioritized on a statewide rather than regional basis completed in the prior year.

(2) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the department shall continue a pilot program that expands private transportation providers' access to high occupancy vehicle lanes. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, the following vehicles must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway if the vehicle has the capacity to carry eight or more passengers, regardless of the number of passengers in the vehicle: (a) Auto transportation company vehicles regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; (b) passenger charter carrier vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; (c) private nonprofit transportation provider vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and (d) private employer transportation service vehicles. For purposes of this subsection, "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees. Nothing in this subsection is intended to authorize the conversion of public infrastructure to private, for-profit purposes or to otherwise create an entitlement or other claim by private users to public infrastructure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM S

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$27,842,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$280,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,131,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$29,253,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $288,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for enhanced disadvantaged business enterprise outreach to increase the pool of disadvantaged businesses available for department contracts and to collaborate with the department of labor and industries to recruit women and persons of color to participate in existing transportation apprenticeship programs. The department must submit a status report on disadvantaged business enterprise outreach and apprenticeship recruitment to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 15, 2015.

(2) $3,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the headquarters communications office. Within the amount provided in this subsection, the department shall complete the web content management system and upgrade the department's web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH—PROGRAM T

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$21,374,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$24,885,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$662,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,809,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$49,830,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $368,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the purchase of an economic impact model. The department shall work with appropriate local jurisdictions to improve consistency between existing and planned transportation demand models. The department shall report back to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 31, 2015, with any recommendations requiring legislative action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES—PROGRAM U

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$75,700,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,243,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$79,443,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department of enterprise services must provide a detailed accounting of the revenues and expenditures of the self-insurance fund to the transportation committees of the legislature on December 31st and June 30th of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM V

State Vehicle Parking Account—State Appropriation. . . .$754,000

Regional Mobility Grant Program Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$60,000,000

Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$17,000,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$50,546,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,242,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$131,542,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $35,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of transportation. Of this amount:

(a) $7,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers must be based on need, including the availability of other providers of service in the area, efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost effectiveness of trips provided.

(b) $27,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit agency must, to the greatest extent practicable, have a maintenance of effort for special needs transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies must be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response service and route deviated service in calendar year 2013 as reported in the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2013" published by the department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than thirty percent of these distributions.

(2) $17,000,000 of the rural mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to aid small cities in rural areas as prescribed in RCW 47.66.100.

(3)(a) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (i) Public transit agencies to add vanpools or replace vans; and (ii) incentives for employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; operating costs for public transit agencies are not eligible for funding under this grant program. Additional employees may not be hired from the funds provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and supplanting of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed. The department shall encourage grant applicants and recipients to leverage funds other than state funds.

(b) At least $1,600,000 of the amount provided in this subsection must be used for vanpool grants in congested corridors.

(c) $400,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is provided solely for the purchase of additional vans for use by vanpools serving or traveling through the Joint Base Lewis-McChord I-5 corridor between mile post 116 and 127.

(4) $10,000,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2015-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed May 26, 2015, Program - Public Transportation Program (V).

(5)(a) $50,000,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2015-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed May 26, 2015, Program - Public Transportation Program (V). The department shall review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within one year of the grant award, must be reviewed by the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and any remaining funds must be used only to fund projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection. The department shall provide annual status reports on December 15, 2015, and December 15, 2016, to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the projects receiving the grants. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate funds through the regional mobility grant program only for projects that will be completed on schedule. A grantee may not receive more than twenty-five percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection. The department shall not approve any increases or changes to the scope of a project for the purpose of a grantee expending remaining funds on an awarded grant.

(b) In order to be eligible to receive a grant under (a) of this subsection during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, a transit agency must establish a process for private transportation providers to apply for the use of park and ride facilities. For purposes of this subsection, (i) "private transportation provider" means: An auto transportation company regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; a passenger charter carrier regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; a private nonprofit transportation provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; or a private employer transportation service provider; and (ii) "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees.

(6) Funds provided for the commute trip reduction (CTR) program may also be used for the growth and transportation efficiency center program.

(7) $5,670,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $754,000 of the state vehicle parking account—state appropriation are provided solely for CTR grants and activities.

(8) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is contingent on the timely development of an annual report summarizing the status of public transportation systems as identified under RCW 35.58.2796.

(9)(a) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Everett connector service for Island and Skagit transit agencies. The amount provided in this subsection is contingent on Island Transit charging fares that achieve a farebox recovery ratio similar to comparable transit systems.

(b) The amount provided in (a) of this subsection must be held in unallotted status until the office of financial management determines that fares have been both adopted and implemented by Island Transit that achieve a farebox recovery ratio similar to comparable transit systems. Island Transit must notify the office of financial management when it has met the requirements of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—MARINE—PROGRAM X

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$483,637,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$121,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$483,758,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of financial management budget instructions require agencies to recast enacted budgets into activities. The Washington state ferries shall include a greater level of detail in its 2015-2017 supplemental and 2017-2019 omnibus transportation appropriations act requests, as determined jointly by the office of financial management, the Washington state ferries, and the transportation committees of the legislature. This level of detail must include the administrative functions in the operating as well as capital programs.

(2) Until a reservation system is operational on the San Juan islands inter-island route, the department shall provide the same priority loading benefits on the San Juan islands inter-island route to home health care workers as are currently provided to patients traveling for purposes of receiving medical treatment.

(3) For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the department may enter into a distributor controlled fuel hedging program and other methods of hedging approved by the fuel hedging committee.

(4) $87,036,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, which reflect cost savings from a reduced biodiesel fuel requirement and, therefore, is contingent upon the enactment of section 701 of this act. The amount provided in this subsection represents the fuel budget for the purposes of calculating any ferry fare fuel surcharge.

(5) When purchasing uniforms that are required by collective bargaining agreements, the department shall contract with the lowest cost provider.

(6) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the department shall not operate a winter sailing schedule for a time period longer than twelve weeks.

(7) $496,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for ferry terminal traffic control at the Fauntleroy ferry terminal. The department shall utilize existing contracts to provide a uniformed officer to assist with ferry terminal traffic control at the Fauntleroy ferry terminal.

(8) $1,151,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for improvements to the reservation system. The department shall actively encourage ferry reservation customers to use the online option for making and changing reservations.

(9) $30,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the marine division assistant secretary's designee to the board of pilotage commissioners, who serves as the board chair. As the agency chairing the board, the department shall direct the board chair, in his or her capacity as chair, to require that the report to the governor and chairs of the transportation committees required under RCW 88.16.035(1)(f) be filed by September 1, 2015, and annually thereafter, and that the report include the establishment of policies and procedures necessary to increase the diversity of pilots, trainees, and applicants, including a diversity action plan. The diversity action plan must articulate a comprehensive vision of the board's diversity goals and the steps it will take to reach those goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—OPERATING

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$58,744,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation. . . .$45,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$58,789,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$8,986,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,567,000

Multiuse Roadway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$131,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$11,684,000

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—CAPITAL

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Freight Mobility Investment Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$8,852,000

Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$9,937,000

Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,320,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,250,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation . . . .$83,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$3,250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$25,692,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,310,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for unforeseen emergency repairs on facilities.

(2) $560,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the roofs of the Shelton academy multipurpose building, Tacoma district office building, Kennewick detachment building, and Ridgefield and Plymouth weigh station buildings.

(3) $150,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for upgrades to scales at Goldendale required to meet current certification requirements.

(4) $2,350,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for funding to repair and replace the academy asphalt emergency vehicle operation course.

(5) $500,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of generators at Marysville, Baw Faw, Gardner, Pilot Rock, and Ridpath.

(6) $150,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for painting and caulking in several locations.

(7) $350,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for pavement preservation at the Wenatchee district office and the Spokane district office.

(8) $700,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for energy upgrades at two district offices and two detachments.

(9) $300,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for repair of the academy training tank.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303. FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$46,000,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$10,706,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$31,250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$87,956,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Small City Pavement and Sidewalk Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,931,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$10,000,000

Transportation Improvement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$179,452,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$193,383,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for:

(1) The arterial preservation program to help low tax-based, medium-sized cities preserve arterial pavements;

(2) The small city pavement program to help cities meet urgent preservation needs; and

(3) The small city low-energy street light retrofit demonstration program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITIES—PROGRAM D—(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)—CAPITAL

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$211,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$4,270,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,481,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $211,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation is provided solely for completion of a new traffic management center in Shoreline, Washington. By September 30, 2015, the department shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on the resulting vacancy rate of the existing regional headquarters building in Shoreline, plans to consolidate department staff into the building, and the schedule for terminating the current lease of the Goldsmith building in Seattle, and provide an update on future plans to consolidate agency staff within the region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—IMPROVEMENTS—PROGRAM I

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$21,388,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,075,309,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$64,991,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$251,313,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$167,259,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$104,366,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$367,792,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$104,801,000

State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties Account—

State Appropriation. . . .$15,000,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation. . . .$50,110,000

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation. . . .$6,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,228,329,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2015-1 as developed May 26, 2015, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 of this act.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2015-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed May 26, 2015, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, additional congressional action not related to a specific project or purpose, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities. However, no additional federal funds may be allocated to the I-5/Columbia River Crossing project (400506A).

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act.

(4) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation includes up to $104,366,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.861.

(5) The transportation partnership account—state appropriation includes up to $508,793,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(6) $3,700,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the I-5/JBLM Early Corridor Design project (300596S) to complete an environmental impact statement for a project that creates additional general purpose lanes on Interstate 5 in the Joint Base Lewis-McChord corridor. The design of this project must be high occupancy vehicle lane ready for a future connection to the Interstate 5 high occupancy vehicle lane system that currently terminates in Tacoma.

(7) $346,263,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, $15,300,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, $154,263,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, $69,479,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation, $50,110,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation, and $4,346,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z).

(8) $17,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for transit mitigation for the SR 99/Viaduct Project - Construction Mitigation project (809940B).

(9) Within existing resources, during the regular sessions of the legislature, the department of transportation shall participate in work sessions, before the transportation committees of the house of representatives and senate, on the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project. These work sessions must include a report on current progress of the project, timelines for completion, outstanding claims, the financial status of the project, and any other information necessary for the legislature to maintain appropriate oversight of the project. The parties invited to present may include the department of transportation, the Seattle tunnel partners, and other appropriate stakeholders.

(10) $13,881,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, $9,753,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation, $42,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, $6,000,000 of the special category C account—state appropriation, and $6,348,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the US 395/North Spokane Corridor project (600010A). Any future savings on the project must stay on the US 395/Interstate 90 corridor and be made available to the current phase of the North Spokane corridor project or any future phase of the project in 2015-2017.

(11) $46,894,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, $10,317,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation, and $1,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the I-405/Kirkland Vicinity Stage 2 - Widening project (8BI1002). This project must be completed as soon as practicable as a design-build project. Any future savings on this project or other Interstate 405 corridor projects must stay on the Interstate 405 corridor and be made available to either the I-405/SR 167 Interchange - Direct Connector project (140504C) or the I-405 Renton to Bellevue project in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

(12)(a) The SR 520 Bridge Replacement and HOV project (8BI1003) is supported over time from multiple sources, including a $300,000,000 TIFIA loan, $923,000,000 in Garvee bonds, toll revenues, state bonds, interest earnings, and other miscellaneous sources.

(b) The state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation includes up to $343,505,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.879 and 47.10.886.

(c) The state route number 520 corridor account—federal appropriation includes up to $104,801,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.879 and 47.10.886.

(d) $82,195,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, $104,801,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—federal appropriation, and $367,792,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 520 Bridge Replacement and HOV project (8BI1003). Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection (12)(d), $232,598,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation must be put into unallotted status and is subject to review by the office of financial management. The director of the office of financial management shall consult with the joint transportation committee prior to making a decision to allot these funds.

(e) When developing the financial plan for the project, the department shall assume that all maintenance and operation costs for the new facility are to be covered by tolls collected on the toll facility and not by the motor vehicle account.

(13) $15,000,000 of the state route number 520 civil penalties account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue to work with the Seattle department of transportation in their joint planning, design, right-of-way acquisition, outreach, and operation of the remaining west side elements including, but not limited to, the Montlake lid, the bicycle/pedestrian path, the effective network of transit connections, and the Portage Bay bridge of the SR 520 Bridge Replacement and HOV project.

(14) $548,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and $19,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the 31st Ave SW Overpass Widening and Improvement project (L1100048).

(15) The legislature finds that there are sixteen companies involved in wood preserving in the state that employ four hundred workers and have an annual payroll of fifteen million dollars. Prior to the department's switch to steel guardrails, ninety percent of the twenty-five hundred mile guardrail system was constructed of preserved wood and one hundred ten thousand wood guardrail posts were produced annually for state use. Moreover, the policy of using steel posts requires the state to use imported steel. Given these findings, where practicable, and until June 30, 2017, the department shall include the design option to use wood guardrail posts, in addition to steel posts, in new guardrail installations. The selection of posts must be consistent with the agency design manual policy that existed before December 2009.

(16) For urban corridors that are all or partially within a metropolitan planning organization boundary, for which the department has not initiated environmental review, and that require an environmental impact statement, at least one alternative must be consistent with the goals set out in RCW 47.01.440.

(17) The department shall itemize all future requests for the construction of buildings on a project list and submit them through the transportation executive information system as part of the department's 2016 budget submittal. It is the intent of the legislature that new facility construction must be transparent and not appropriated within larger highway construction projects.

(18) $59,438,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, $572,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, and $388,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for fish passage barrier and chronic deficiency improvements (0BI4001).

(19) Any new advisory group that the department convenes during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium must consider the interests of the entire state of Washington.

(20) Practical design offers targeted benefits to a state transportation system within available fiscal resources. This delivers value not just for individual projects, but for the entire system. Applying practical design standards will also preserve and enhance safety and mobility. The department shall implement a practical design strategy for transportation design standards. By June 30, 2016, the department shall report to the governor and the house of representatives and senate transportation committees on where practical design has been applied or is intended to be applied in the department and the cost savings resulting from the use of practical design. This subsection takes effect if chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2012), Laws of 2015 is not enacted by June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PRESERVATION—PROGRAM P

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$12,057,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$56,024,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$391,681,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$8,104,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$40,457,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$4,564,000

Recreational Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$1,509,000

High Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$800,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$720,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$515,916,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2015-1 as developed May 26, 2015, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 of this act.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2015-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed May 26, 2015, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, additional congressional action not related to a specific project or purpose, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities. However, no additional federal funds may be allocated to the I-5/Columbia River Crossing project (400506A).

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act.

(4) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation includes up to $38,492,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.861.

(5) The department shall examine the use of electric arc furnace slag for use as an aggregate for new roads and paving projects in high traffic areas and report back to the legislature by December 1, 2015, on its current use in other areas of the country and any characteristics that can provide greater wear resistance and skid resistance in new pavement construction.

(6) $39,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the preservation of structurally deficient bridges or bridges that are at risk of becoming structurally deficient. These funds must be used widely around the state of Washington. The department shall provide a report that identifies the scope, cost, and benefit of each project funded in this subsection as part of its 2016 agency budget request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$5,898,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$6,132,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$12,230,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $791,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for project 000005Q as state matching funds for federally selected competitive grants or congressional earmark projects. These moneys must be placed into reserve status until such time as federal funds are secured that require a state match.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM W

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$40,347,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$126,515,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$10,331,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,734,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$81,583,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$261,510,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2015-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed May 26, 2015, Program - Washington State Ferries Capital Program (W).

(2) $73,000,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation is provided solely for the acquisition of a 144-car vessel (L1000063). The department shall use as much already procured equipment as practicable on the 144-car vessels.

(3) $40,617,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—federal appropriation and $608,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Mukilteo ferry terminal (952515P).

(4) $4,000,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for emergency capital repair costs (999910K). Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.

(5) Consistent with RCW 47.60.662, which requires the Washington state ferry system to collaborate with passenger-only ferry and transit providers to provide service at existing terminals, the department shall ensure that multimodal access, including for passenger-only ferries and transit service providers, is not precluded by any future terminal modifications.

(6) If the department pursues a conversion of the existing diesel powered Issaquah class fleet to a different fuel source or engine technology or the construction of a new vessel powered by a fuel source or engine technology that is not diesel powered, the department must use a design-build procurement process.

(7) Funding is included in the future biennia of the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section for future vessel purchases. Given that the recent purchase of new vessels varies from the current long range plan, the department shall include in its updated long range plan revised estimates for new vessel costs, size, and purchase time frames.

(8) $325,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ferry system to participate in the development of one account-based system for customers of both the ferry system and tolling system. The current Wave2Go ferry ticketing system is reaching the end of its useful life and the department is expected to develop a replacement account-based system as part of the new tolling division customer service center toll collection system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—CAPITAL

Essential Rail Assistance Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$820,000

Transportation Infrastructure Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$7,033,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$12,759,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$363,318,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$383,930,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2015-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed May 26, 2015, Program - Rail Program (Y).

(2) $5,000,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation is provided solely for new low-interest loans approved by the department through the freight rail investment bank (FRIB) program. The department shall issue FRIB program loans with a repayment period of no more than ten years, and charge only so much interest as is necessary to recoup the department's costs to administer the loans. For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the department shall first award loans to 2015-2017 FRIB loan applicants in priority order, and then offer loans to 2015-2017 unsuccessful freight rail assistance program grant applicants, if eligible. If any funds remain in the FRIB program, the department may reopen the loan program and shall evaluate new applications in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 309, chapter 367, Laws of 2011. The department shall report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on all FRIB loans issued.

(3)(a) $4,514,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, $270,000 of the essential rail assistance account—state appropriation, and $455,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation are provided solely for new statewide emergent freight rail assistance projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $367,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation and $1,100,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely to reimburse Highline Grain, LLC for approved work completed on Palouse River and Coulee City (PCC) railroad track in Spokane county between the BNSF Railway Interchange at Cheney and Geiger Junction and must be administered in a manner consistent with freight rail assistance program projects. The value of the public benefit of this project is expected to meet or exceed the cost of this project in: Shipper savings on transportation costs; jobs saved in rail-dependent industries; and/or reduced future costs to repair wear and tear on state and local highways due to fewer annual truck trips (reduced vehicle miles traveled). The amounts provided in this subsection are not a commitment for future legislatures, but it is the legislature's intent that future legislatures will work to approve biennial appropriations until the full $7,337,000 cost of this project is reimbursed.

(4) $363,191,000 of the multimodal transportation account—federal appropriation and $5,740,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for expenditures related to passenger high-speed rail grants. Except for the Mount Vernon project (P01101A), the multimodal transportation account—state funds reflect no more than one and one-half percent of the total project funds, and are provided solely for expenditures that are not eligible for federal reimbursement.

(5)(a) $550,000 of the essential rail assistance account—state appropriation and $305,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of the rehabilitation and maintenance of the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad line (F01111B).

(b) Expenditures from the essential rail assistance account—state in this subsection may not exceed the combined total of:

(i) Revenues deposited into the essential rail assistance account from leases and sale of property pursuant to RCW 47.76.290; and

(ii) Revenues transferred from the miscellaneous program account to the essential rail assistance account, pursuant to RCW 47.76.360, for the purpose of sustaining the grain train program by maintaining the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—CAPITAL

Highway Infrastructure Account—State Appropriation. . . .$782,000

Highway Infrastructure Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$202,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,507,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$9,965,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$500,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$17,829,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$15,331,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$46,116,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2015-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed May 26, 2015, Program - Local Programs Program (Z).

(2) The amounts identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced under subsection (1) of this section for pedestrian safety/safe routes to school are as follows:

(a) $13,820,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $1,507,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation are provided solely for pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects.

(b) $6,100,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and $6,750,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation are provided solely for newly selected safe routes to school projects. $6,794,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, $1,133,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, and $3,215,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation are reappropriated for safe routes to school projects selected in the previous biennia.

(3) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015, and December 1, 2016, on the status of projects funded as part of the pedestrian safety/safe routes to school grant program (0LP600P). The report must include, but is not limited to, a list of projects selected and a brief description of each project's status.

(4) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Edmonds waterfront at-grade train crossings alternatives analysis project (L2000135). The department shall work with the city of Edmonds and provide a preliminary report of key findings to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312. ANNUAL REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR CAPITAL PROGRAM

(1) As part of its budget submittal for the 2016 supplemental budget, the department of transportation shall provide an update to the report provided to the legislature in 2015 that: (a) Compares the original project cost estimates approved in the 2003 and 2005 project lists to the completed cost of the project, or the most recent legislatively approved budget and total project costs for projects not yet completed; (b) identifies highway projects that may be reduced in scope and still achieve a functional benefit; (c) identifies highway projects that have experienced scope increases and that can be reduced in scope; (d) identifies highway projects that have lost significant local or regional contributions that were essential to completing the project; and (e) identifies contingency amounts allocated to projects.

(2) As part of its budget submittal for the 2016 supplemental budget, the department of transportation shall provide an annual report on the number of toll credits the department has accumulated and how the department has used the toll credits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313. QUARTERLY REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR CAPITAL PROGRAM

On a quarterly basis, the department of transportation shall provide to the office of financial management and the legislative transportation committees the following reports for all capital programs:

(1) For active projects, the report must include:

(a) A TEIS version containing actual capital expenditures for all projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted budget;

(b) Anticipated cost savings, cost increases, reappropriations, and schedule adjustments for all projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted budget;

(c) The award amount, the engineer's estimate, and the number of bidders for all active projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted budget;

(d) Projected costs and schedule for individual projects that are funded at a programmatic level for projects relating to bridge rail, guard rail, fish passage barrier removal, roadside safety projects, and seismic bridges. Projects within this programmatic level funding must be completed on a priority basis and scoped to be completed within the current programmatic budget;

(e) Highway projects that may be reduced in scope and still achieve a functional benefit;

(f) Highway projects that have experienced scope increases and that can be reduced in scope;

(g) Highway projects that have lost significant local or regional contributions that were essential to completing the project; and

(h) Contingency amounts for all projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted budget.

(2) For completed projects, the report must:

(a) Compare the costs and operationally complete date for projects with budgets of twenty million dollars or more that are funded with preexisting funds to the original project cost estimates and schedule; and

(b) Provide a list of nickel and TPA projects charging to the nickel/TPA environmental mitigation reserve (OBI4ENV) and the amount each project is charging.

(3) For prospective projects, the report must:

(a) Identify the estimated advertisement date for all projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted transportation budget that are going to advertisement during the current fiscal biennium;

(b) Identify the anticipated operationally complete date for all projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted transportation budget that are going to advertisement during the current fiscal biennium; and

(c) Identify the estimated cost of completion for all projects consistent with the structure of the most recently enacted transportation budget that are going to advertisement during the current fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 314. FEDERAL FUNDS RECEIVED FOR CAPITAL PROJECT EXPENDITURES

To the greatest extent practicable, the department of transportation shall expend federal funds received for capital project expenditures before state funds.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,559,000

Highway Bond Retirement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,169,927,000

Ferry Bond Retirement Account—State Appropriation. . . .$29,230,000

Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$16,129,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$25,837,000

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$62,885,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$719,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,307,286,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$512,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$143,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$655,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT TO BE PAID BY STATUTORILY PRESCRIBED REVENUE

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$200,637,000

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$12,455,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$213,092,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For

motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities

and counties. . . .$489,359,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For

motor vehicle fuel tax refunds and statutory

transfers. . . .$1,269,319,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For motor vehicle fuel tax refunds and transfers. . . .$143,664,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS

(1) Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound﻿

Ferry Operations Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

(2) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound

Capital Construction Account—State. . . .$12,000,000

(3) State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties﻿

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the﻿

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State. . . .$916,000

(4) Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation:﻿

For transfer to the State Patrol Highway﻿

Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

(5) Highway Safety Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry﻿

Operations Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

(6) Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle﻿

Account—State. . . .$950,000

(7) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction

Account—State. . . .$12,000,000

(8) Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Multimodal

Transportation Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

(9) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations

Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408. STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS

In addition to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenue for distribution, state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, and bond retirement and interest including ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for these purposes under any statutory formula or under any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409. The department of transportation is authorized to undertake federal advance construction projects under the provisions of 23 U.S.C. Sec. 115 in order to maintain progress in meeting approved highway construction and preservation objectives. The legislature recognizes that the use of state funds may be required to temporarily fund expenditures of the federal appropriations for the highway construction and preservation programs for federal advance construction projects prior to conversion to federal funding.

COMPENSATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. COMPENSATION

The appropriations for state agencies in this act are subject to the following conditions and limitations: State employee compensation adjustments for employees who are not represented or who bargain under statutory authority other than chapter 47.64 RCW or RCW 41.56.473 or 41.56.475 will be provided in accordance with funding adjustments provided in the 2015-2017 omnibus appropriations act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT IMPAIRED

Nothing in this act prohibits the expenditure of any funds by an agency or institution of the state for benefits guaranteed by any collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS

Sections 504 through 516 of this act represent the results of the 2015-2017 collective bargaining process required under chapters 47.64 and 41.56 RCW. Provisions of the collective bargaining agreements contained in sections 504 through 516 of this act are described in general terms. Only major economic terms are included in the descriptions. These descriptions do not contain the complete contents of the agreements. The collective bargaining agreements contained in sections 504 through 516 of this act may also be funded by expenditures from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—OPEIU

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the office and professional employees international union local eight (OPEIU) through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a two and one-half percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes and funding is provided to move the relief dispatcher classification to the next higher classification and increase in call back pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—FASPAA

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the ferry agents, supervisors, and project administrators association through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for an increase in the vacation accrual rate schedule for employees hired before June 30, 2011, effective July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—SEIU LOCAL 6

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the service employees international union local six pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the negotiated three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a one and eight-tenths percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for an increase in shift premium and foreman pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—CARPENTERS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Pacific Northwest regional council of carpenters through an interest arbitration award pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—METAL TRADES

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Puget Sound metal trades council through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a four percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MEBA-UL

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the marine engineers' beneficial association unlicensed engine room employees through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded four percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a two and three-quarters percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for an increase in holiday pay from eight hours to twelve hours per holiday, an increase in maintenance and cure payments to injured employees, and an increase in the contribution to the training school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MEBA-L

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the marine engineers' beneficial association licensed engineer officers through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded four percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a two and three-quarters percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for an increase holiday pay from eight hours to twelve hours per holiday, reimbursement for the cost of obtaining specified credentials, an increase in the contribution to temporary relief for employee's health care, an increase in maintenance and cure payments to injured employees, and an increase in the contribution to the training school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MM&P MATES

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the masters, mates, and pilots - mates through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for an increase in call back pay and an increase in the Friday Harbor stipend. The agreement also eliminates a two-tiered vacation accrual schedule, replacing it with one schedule that includes increased accrual rates, effective July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MM&P MASTERS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the masters, mates, and pilots - masters through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for increased vacation accrual rates for those employees hired before June 30, 2011, effective July 1, 2015, an increase in call back pay, an increase in assignment pay, and an increase in the Friday Harbor stipend.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—MM&P WATCH SUPERVISORS

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the masters, mates, and pilots - watch supervisors through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded five percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and five percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also includes and funding is provided for an increase in the basic shift premium, effective July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MARINE DIVISION COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—IBU

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the inlandboatmen's union of the Pacific through an interest arbitration decision pursuant to chapter 47.64 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded two and one-half percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a two and one-half percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. The agreement also eliminates the entry level rate schedule and moves those employees to the higher temporary rate schedule, for which funding is provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—WSP TROOPERS ASSOCIATION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol troopers association through an interest arbitration decision under chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded seven percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2015, and a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2016. Funding is also provided for a three percent specialty pay for breath alcohol concentration technicians.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS—WSP LIEUTENANTS ASSOCIATION

An agreement has been reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol lieutenants association through an interest arbitration decision under chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded five percent salary increase effective July 1, 2015, and a five percent salary increase effective July 1, 2016. Funding is also provided to increase the annual clothing allowance and increase accumulated holiday credits.

IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. FUND TRANSFERS

(1) The transportation 2003 projects or improvements and the 2005 transportation partnership projects or improvements are listed in the LEAP list titled 2015-1 as developed May 26, 2015, which consists of a list of specific projects by fund source and amount over a ten-year period. Current fiscal biennium funding for each project is a line-item appropriation, while the outer year funding allocations represent a ten-year plan. The department is expected to use the flexibility provided in this section to assist in the delivery and completion of all transportation partnership account and transportation 2003 account (nickel account) projects on the LEAP transportation documents referenced in this act. However, this section does not apply to the I-5/Columbia River Crossing project (400506A). For the 2015-2017 project appropriations, unless otherwise provided in this act, the director of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority between projects funded with transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriations, or transportation partnership account appropriations, in order to manage project spending and efficiently deliver all projects in the respective program under the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Transfers may only be made within each specific fund source referenced on the respective project list;

(b) Transfers from a project may not be made as a result of the reduction of the scope of a project or be made to support increases in the scope of a project;

(c) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the director of financial management finds that any resulting change will not hinder the completion of the projects as approved by the legislature. Until the legislature reconvenes to consider the 2016 supplemental omnibus transportation appropriations act, any unexpended 2013-2015 appropriation balance as approved by the office of financial management, in consultation with the legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees, may be considered when transferring funds between projects;

(d) Transfers from a project may be made if the funds appropriated to the project are in excess of the amount needed to complete the project;

(e) Transfers may not occur for projects not identified on the applicable project list;

(f) Transfers may not be made while the legislature is in session; and

(g) Transfers between projects may be made, without the approval of the director of the office of financial management, by the department of transportation until the transfer amount by project exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or ten percent of the total project, whichever is less. These transfers must be reported quarterly to the director of financial management and the chairs of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees.

(2) At the time the department submits a request to transfer funds under this section, a copy of the request must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature.

(3) The office of financial management shall work with legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees to review the requested transfers in a timely manner.

(4) The office of financial management shall document approved transfers and schedule changes in the transportation executive information system, compare changes to the legislative baseline funding and schedules identified by project identification number identified in the LEAP transportation documents referenced in this act, and transmit revised project lists to chairs of the transportation committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

As part of its 2016 supplemental budget submittal, the department shall provide a report to the legislature and the office of financial management that:

(1) Identifies, by capital project, the amount of state funding that has been reappropriated from the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium into the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium; and

(2) Identifies, for each project, the amount of cost savings or increases in funding that have been identified as compared to the 2013 enacted omnibus transportation appropriations act.

(3) As part of the agency request for capital programs, the department shall load reappropriations separately from funds that were assumed to be required for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium into budgeting systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

(1) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature detailing engineering errors on highway construction projects resulting in project cost increases in excess of five hundred thousand dollars. The department must submit a full report within ninety days of the negotiated change order resulting from the engineering error.

(2) The department's full report must include an assessment and review of:

(a) How the engineering error happened;

(b) The department of the employee or employees responsible for the engineering error, without disclosing the name of the employee or employees;

(c) What corrective action was taken;

(d) The estimated total cost of the engineering error and how the department plans to mitigate that cost;

(e) Whether the cost of the engineering error will impact the overall project financial plan; and

(f) What action the secretary has recommended to avoid similar engineering errors in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

The department of transportation may provide up to $3,000,000 in toll credits to Kitsap Transit for its role in passenger-only ferry service and ferry corridor-related projects. The number of toll credits provided must be equal to, but no more than, the number sufficient to meet federal match requirements for grant funding for passenger-only ferry service, but must not exceed the amount authorized in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605. To the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of state funds from the motor vehicle account, special category C account, Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, transportation 2003 account (nickel account), transportation partnership account, transportation improvement account, Puget Sound capital construction account, multimodal transportation account, state route number 520 corridor account, or other transportation capital project account in the state treasury for a state transportation program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in chapter 47.10 RCW, the legislature declares that any such expenditures made prior to the issue date of the applicable transportation bonds for that state transportation program are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those transportation bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—WEB SITE REPORTING REQUIREMENTS

(1) The department of transportation shall post on its web site every report that is due from the department to the legislature during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium on one web page. The department must post both completed reports and planned reports on a single web page.

(2) The department shall provide a web link for each change order that is more than five hundred thousand dollars on the affected project web page.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607. VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT AND SEPARATION INCENTIVES

As a management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of resources, while improving employee productivity and morale, agencies may implement a voluntary retirement and/or separation program that is cost neutral or results in cost savings, including costs to the state pension systems, over a two-year period following the commencement of the program, provided that the program is approved by the director of financial management. Agencies participating in this authorization may offer voluntary retirement and/or separation incentives and options according to procedures and guidelines established by the office of financial management, in consultation with the office of the state human resources director and the department of retirement systems. The options may include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for voluntary separation or retirement. An employee does not have any contractual right to a financial incentive offered pursuant to this section. Offers must be reviewed and monitored jointly by the office of the state human resources director and the department of retirement systems. Agencies must submit a report by June 30, 2017, to the legislature and the office of financial management on the outcome of their approved incentive program. The report should include information on the details of the program, including the incentive payment amount for each participant, the total cost to the state, and the projected or actual net dollar savings over the two-year period.

The department of retirement systems may collect from employers the actuarial cost of any incentive provided under this program, or any other incentive to retire provided by employers to members of the state's pension systems, for deposit in the appropriate pension account.

MISCELLANEOUS 2015-2017 FISCAL BIENNIUM

Sec. 701. RCW 43.19.642 and 2013 c 306 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Effective June 1, 2006, for agencies complying with the ultra-low sulfur diesel mandate of the United States environmental protection agency for on-highway diesel fuel, agencies shall use biodiesel as an additive to ultra-low sulfur diesel for lubricity, provided that the use of a lubricity additive is warranted and that the use of biodiesel is comparable in performance and cost with other available lubricity additives. The amount of biodiesel added to the ultra-low sulfur diesel fuel shall be not less than two percent.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, effective June 1, 2009, state agencies are required to use a minimum of twenty percent biodiesel as compared to total volume of all diesel purchases made by the agencies for the operation of the agencies' diesel-powered vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment.

(3) All state agencies using biodiesel fuel shall, beginning on July 1, 2006, file biannual reports with the department of enterprise services documenting the use of the fuel and a description of how any problems encountered were resolved.

(4) By December 1, 2009, the department of enterprise services shall:

(a) Report to the legislature on the average true price differential for biodiesel by blend and location; and

(b) Examine alternative fuel procurement methods that work to address potential market barriers for in-state biodiesel producers and report these findings to the legislature.

(5) During the 2011-2013 ((and)), 2013-2015, and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the Washington state ferries is required to use a minimum of five percent biodiesel as compared to total volume of all diesel purchases made by the Washington state ferries for the operation of the Washington state ferries diesel-powered vessels, as long as the price of a B5 biodiesel blend does not exceed the price of conventional diesel fuel by five percent or more.

Sec. 702. RCW 46.63.170 and 2013 c 306 s 711 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The use of automated traffic safety cameras for issuance of notices of infraction is subject to the following requirements:

(a) The appropriate local legislative authority must prepare an analysis of the locations within the jurisdiction where automated traffic safety cameras are proposed to be located: (i) Before enacting an ordinance allowing for the initial use of automated traffic safety cameras; and (ii) before adding additional cameras or relocating any existing camera to a new location within the jurisdiction. Automated traffic safety cameras may be used to detect one or more of the following: Stoplight, railroad crossing, or school speed zone violations. At a minimum, the local ordinance must contain the restrictions described in this section and provisions for public notice and signage. Cities and counties using automated traffic safety cameras before July 24, 2005, are subject to the restrictions described in this section, but are not required to enact an authorizing ordinance. Beginning one year after June 7, 2012, cities and counties using automated traffic safety cameras must post an annual report of the number of traffic accidents that occurred at each location where an automated traffic safety camera is located as well as the number of notices of infraction issued for each camera and any other relevant information about the automated traffic safety cameras that the city or county deems appropriate on the city's or county's web site.

(b) Use of automated traffic safety cameras is restricted to the following locations only: (i) Intersections of two arterials with traffic control signals that have yellow change interval durations in accordance with RCW 47.36.022, which interval durations may not be reduced after placement of the camera; (ii) railroad crossings; and (iii) school speed zones.

(c) During the ((2011-2013 and)) 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, automated traffic safety cameras may be used to detect speed violations for the purposes of ((section 201(2), chapter 367, Laws of 2011 and)) section 201(4), chapter 306, Laws of 2013 and section 201(1) of this act if the local legislative authority first enacts an ordinance authorizing the use of cameras to detect speed violations.

(d) Automated traffic safety cameras may only take pictures of the vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction is occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of passengers in the vehicle. The primary purpose of camera placement is to take pictures of the vehicle and vehicle license plate when an infraction is occurring. Cities and counties shall consider installing cameras in a manner that minimizes the impact of camera flash on drivers.

(e) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered owner of the vehicle within fourteen days of the violation, or to the renter of a vehicle within fourteen days of establishing the renter's name and address under subsection (3)(a) of this section. The law enforcement officer issuing the notice of infraction shall include with it a certificate or facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images produced by an automated traffic safety camera, stating the facts supporting the notice of infraction. This certificate or facsimile is prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding charging a violation under this chapter. The photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images evidencing the violation must be available for inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate the liability for the infraction. A person receiving a notice of infraction based on evidence detected by an automated traffic safety camera may respond to the notice by mail.

(f) The registered owner of a vehicle is responsible for an infraction under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d) unless the registered owner overcomes the presumption in RCW 46.63.075, or, in the case of a rental car business, satisfies the conditions under subsection (3) of this section. If appropriate under the circumstances, a renter identified under subsection (3)(a) of this section is responsible for an infraction.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images prepared under this section are for the exclusive use of law enforcement in the discharge of duties under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding relates to a violation under this section. No photograph, microphotograph, or electronic image may be used for any purpose other than enforcement of violations under this section nor retained longer than necessary to enforce this section.

(h) All locations where an automated traffic safety camera is used must be clearly marked at least thirty days prior to activation of the camera by placing signs in locations that clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone where traffic laws are enforced by an automated traffic safety camera. Signs placed in automated traffic safety camera locations after June 7, 2012, must follow the specifications and guidelines under the manual of uniform traffic control devices for streets and highways as adopted by the department of transportation under chapter 47.36 RCW.

(i) If a county or city has established an authorized automated traffic safety camera program under this section, the compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based only upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in support of the system, and may not be based upon a portion of the fine or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the equipment.

(2) Infractions detected through the use of automated traffic safety cameras are not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated by the use of automated traffic safety cameras under this section shall be processed in the same manner as parking infractions, including for the purposes of RCW 3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16A.120, and 46.20.270(((3))) (2). The amount of the fine issued for an infraction generated through the use of an automated traffic safety camera shall not exceed the amount of a fine issued for other parking infractions within the jurisdiction. However, the amount of the fine issued for a traffic control signal violation detected through the use of an automated traffic safety camera shall not exceed the monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.61.050 as provided under RCW 46.63.110, including all applicable statutory assessments.

(3) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of infraction being issued under this section, provide a written notice to the rental car business that a notice of infraction may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car business does not, within eighteen days of receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing agency by return mail:

(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the infraction occurred; or

(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction. A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft; or

(c) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car business may pay the applicable penalty.

Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this chapter for the notice of infraction.

(4) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a), (b), or (c).

(5) For the purposes of this section, "automated traffic safety camera" means a device that uses a vehicle sensor installed to work in conjunction with an intersection traffic control system, a railroad grade crossing control system, or a speed measuring device, and a camera synchronized to automatically record one or more sequenced photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images of the rear of a motor vehicle at the time the vehicle fails to stop when facing a steady red traffic control signal or an activated railroad grade crossing control signal, or exceeds a speed limit in a school speed zone as detected by a speed measuring device. During the ((2011-2013 and)) 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, an automated traffic safety camera includes a camera used to detect speed violations for the purposes of ((section 201(2), chapter 367, Laws of 2011 and)) section 201(4), chapter 306, Laws of 2013 and section 201(1) of this act.

(6) During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, this section does not apply to automated traffic safety cameras for the purposes of section 216(5), chapter 367, Laws of 2011 and section 216(6), chapter 306, Laws of 2013.

Sec. 703. RCW 46.68.325 and 2013 c 306 s 706 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The rural mobility grant program account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the grants provided under RCW 47.66.100.

(2) Beginning September 2011, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the rural mobility grant program account two million five hundred thousand dollars.

(3) During the ((2011-2013 and)) 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the rural mobility grant program account to the multimodal transportation account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the rural mobility grant program account.

Sec. 704. RCW 47.29.170 and 2013 c 306 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

Before accepting any unsolicited project proposals, the commission must adopt rules to facilitate the acceptance, review, evaluation, and selection of unsolicited project proposals. These rules must include the following:

(1) Provisions that specify unsolicited proposals must meet predetermined criteria;

(2) Provisions governing procedures for the cessation of negotiations and consideration;

(3) Provisions outlining that unsolicited proposals are subject to a two-step process that begins with concept proposals and would only advance to the second step, which are fully detailed proposals, if the commission so directed;

(4) Provisions that require concept proposals to include at least the following information: Proposers' qualifications and experience; description of the proposed project and impact; proposed project financing; and known public benefits and opposition; and

(5) Provisions that specify the process to be followed if the commission is interested in the concept proposal, which must include provisions:

(a) Requiring that information regarding the potential project would be published for a period of not less than thirty days, during which time entities could express interest in submitting a proposal;

(b) Specifying that if letters of interest were received during the thirty days, then an additional sixty days for submission of the fully detailed proposal would be allowed; and

(c) Procedures for what will happen if there are insufficient proposals submitted or if there are no letters of interest submitted in the appropriate time frame.

The commission may adopt other rules as necessary to avoid conflicts with existing laws, statutes, or contractual obligations of the state.

The commission may not accept or consider any unsolicited proposals before July 1, ((2015)) 2017.

Sec. 705. RCW 47.56.403 and 2013 c 306 s 709 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may provide for the establishment, construction, and operation of a pilot project of high occupancy toll lanes on state route 167 high occupancy vehicle lanes within King county. The department may issue, buy, and redeem bonds, and deposit and expend them; secure and remit financial and other assistance in the construction of high occupancy toll lanes, carry insurance, and handle any other matters pertaining to the high occupancy toll lane pilot project.

(2) Tolls for high occupancy toll lanes will be established as follows:

(a) The schedule of toll charges for high occupancy toll lanes must be established by the transportation commission and collected in a manner determined by the commission.

(b) Toll charges shall not be assessed on transit buses and vanpool vehicles owned or operated by any public agency.

(c) The department shall establish performance standards for the state route 167 high occupancy toll lane pilot project. The department must automatically adjust the toll charge, using dynamic tolling, to ensure that toll-paying single-occupant vehicle users are only permitted to enter the lane to the extent that average vehicle speeds in the lane remain above forty-five miles per hour at least ninety percent of the time during peak hours. The toll charge may vary in amount by time of day, level of traffic congestion within the highway facility, vehicle occupancy, or other criteria, as the commission may deem appropriate. The commission may also vary toll charges for single-occupant inherently low-emission vehicles such as those powered by electric batteries, natural gas, propane, or other clean burning fuels.

(d) The commission shall periodically review the toll charges to determine if the toll charges are effectively maintaining travel time, speed, and reliability on the highway facilities.

(3) The department shall monitor the state route 167 high occupancy toll lane pilot project and shall annually report to the transportation commission and the legislature on operations and findings. At a minimum, the department shall provide facility use data and review the impacts on:

(a) Freeway efficiency and safety;

(b) Effectiveness for transit;

(c) Person and vehicle movements by mode;

(d) Ability to finance improvements and transportation services through tolls; and

(e) The impacts on all highway users. The department shall analyze aggregate use data and conduct, as needed, separate surveys to assess usage of the facility in relation to geographic, socioeconomic, and demographic information within the corridor in order to ascertain actual and perceived questions of equitable use of the facility.

(4) The department shall modify the pilot project to address identified safety issues and mitigate negative impacts to high occupancy vehicle lane users.

(5) Authorization to impose high occupancy vehicle tolls for the state route 167 high occupancy toll pilot project expires if either of the following two conditions apply:

(a) If no contracts have been let by the department to begin construction of the toll facilities associated with this pilot project within four years of July 24, 2005; or

(b) If high occupancy vehicle tolls are being collected on June 30, ((2015)) 2017.

(6) The department of transportation shall adopt rules that allow automatic vehicle identification transponders used for electronic toll collection to be compatible with other electronic payment devices or transponders from the Washington state ferry system, other public transportation systems, or other toll collection systems to the extent that technology permits.

(7) The conversion of a single existing high occupancy vehicle lane to a high occupancy toll lane as proposed for SR-167 must be taken as the exception for this pilot project.

(8) A violation of the lane restrictions applicable to the high occupancy toll lanes established under this section is a traffic infraction.

(9) Procurement activity associated with this pilot project shall be open and competitive in accordance with chapter 39.29 RCW.

Sec. 706. RCW 47.56.876 and 2013 c 306 s 710 are each amended to read as follows:

A special account to be known as the state route number 520 civil penalties account is created in the state treasury. All state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV program civil penalties generated from the nonpayment of tolls on the state route number 520 corridor must be deposited into the account, as provided under RCW 47.56.870(4)(b)(vii). Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used to fund any project within the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV program, including mitigation. During the ((2011-2013 and)) 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the state route number 520 civil penalties account to the state route number 520 corridor account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the state route number 520 civil penalties account. Funds transferred must be used solely for capital expenditures for the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project (((8BI1003))).

Sec. 707. RCW 47.64.170 and 2013 c 306 s 521 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any ferry employee organization certified as the bargaining representative shall be the exclusive representative of all ferry employees in the bargaining unit and shall represent all such employees fairly.

(2) A ferry employee organization or organizations and the governor may each designate any individual as its representative to engage in collective bargaining negotiations.

(3) Negotiating sessions, including strategy meetings of the employer or employee organizations, mediation, and the deliberative process of arbitrators are exempt from the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW. Hearings conducted by arbitrators may be open to the public by mutual consent of the parties.

(4) Terms of any collective bargaining agreement may be enforced by civil action in Thurston county superior court upon the initiative of either party.

(5) Ferry system employees or any employee organization shall not negotiate or attempt to negotiate directly with anyone other than the person who has been appointed or authorized a bargaining representative for the purpose of bargaining with the ferry employees or their representative.

(6)(a) Within ten working days after the first Monday in September of every odd-numbered year, the parties shall attempt to agree on an interest arbitrator to be used if the parties are not successful in negotiating a comprehensive collective bargaining agreement. If the parties cannot agree on an arbitrator within the ten-day period, either party may request a list of seven arbitrators from the federal mediation and conciliation service. The parties shall select an interest arbitrator using the coin toss/alternate strike method within thirty calendar days of receipt of the list. Immediately upon selecting an interest arbitrator, the parties shall cooperate to reserve dates with the arbitrator for potential arbitration between August 1st and September 15th of the following even-numbered year. The parties shall also prepare a schedule of at least five negotiation dates for the following year, absent an agreement to the contrary. The parties shall execute a written agreement before November 1st of each odd-numbered year setting forth the name of the arbitrator and the dates reserved for bargaining and arbitration. This subsection (6)(a) imposes minimum obligations only and is not intended to define or limit a party's full, good faith bargaining obligation under other sections of this chapter.

(b) The negotiation of a proposed collective bargaining agreement by representatives of the employer and a ferry employee organization shall commence on or about February 1st of every even-numbered year.

(c) For negotiations covering the 2009-2011 biennium and subsequent biennia, the time periods specified in this section, and in RCW 47.64.210 and 47.64.300 through 47.64.320, must ensure conclusion of all agreements on or before October 1st of the even-numbered year next preceding the biennial budget period during which the agreement should take effect. These time periods may only be altered by mutual agreement of the parties in writing. Any such agreement and any impasse procedures agreed to by the parties under RCW 47.64.200 must include an agreement regarding the new time periods that will allow final resolution by negotiations or arbitration by October 1st of each even-numbered year.

(7) It is the intent of this section that the collective bargaining agreement or arbitrator's award shall commence on July 1st of each odd-numbered year and shall terminate on June 30th of the next odd-numbered year to coincide with the ensuing biennial budget year, as defined by RCW 43.88.020(7), to the extent practical. It is further the intent of this section that all collective bargaining agreements be concluded by October 1st of the even-numbered year before the commencement of the biennial budget year during which the agreements are to be in effect. After the expiration date of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter, except to the extent provided in subsection (11) of this section and RCW 47.64.270(4), all of the terms and conditions specified in the collective bargaining agreement remain in effect until the effective date of a subsequently negotiated agreement, not to exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement. Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement according to law.

(8) The office of financial management shall conduct a salary survey, for use in collective bargaining and arbitration, which must be conducted through a contract with a firm nationally recognized in the field of human resources management consulting except during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.

(9) Except as provided in subsection (11) of this section:

(a) The governor shall submit a request either for funds necessary to implement the collective bargaining agreements including, but not limited to, the compensation and fringe benefit provisions or for legislation necessary to implement the agreement, or both. Requests for funds necessary to implement the collective bargaining agreements shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless such requests:

(i) Have been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1st before the legislative session at which the requests are to be considered; and

(ii) Have been certified by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible financially for the state.

(b) The governor shall submit a request either for funds necessary to implement the arbitration awards or for legislation necessary to implement the arbitration awards, or both. Requests for funds necessary to implement the arbitration awards shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless such requests:

(i) Have been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1st before the legislative session at which the requests are to be considered; and

(ii) Have been certified by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible financially for the state.

(c) The legislature shall approve or reject the submission of the request for funds necessary to implement the collective bargaining agreements or arbitration awards as a whole for each agreement or award. The legislature shall not consider a request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement or arbitration award unless the request is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060. If the legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, either party may reopen all or part of the agreement and award or the exclusive bargaining representative may seek to implement the procedures provided for in RCW 47.64.210 and 47.64.300.

(10) If, after the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of an agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.

(11)(a) For the collective bargaining agreements negotiated for the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may consider a request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement even if the request for funds was not received by the office of financial management by October 1st and was not transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060.

(b) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, a collective bargaining agreement related to employee health care benefits negotiated between the employer and coalition pursuant to RCW 41.80.020(3) regarding the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee must be a separate agreement for which the governor may request funds necessary to implement the agreement. The legislature may act upon a 2013-2015 collective bargaining agreement related to employee health care benefits if an agreement is reached and submitted to the office of financial management and legislative budget committees before final legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating budget by the sitting legislature.

(c) For the collective bargaining agreements negotiated for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may consider a request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement reached after October 1st after a determination of financial infeasibility by the director of the office of financial management if the request for funds is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060.

Sec. 708. RCW 82.70.020 and 2014 c 222 s 704 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Employers in this state who are taxable under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW and provide financial incentives to their own or other employees for ride sharing, for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting before July 1, ((2015)) 2017, are allowed a credit against taxes payable under chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW for amounts paid to or on behalf of employees for ride sharing in vehicles carrying two or more persons, for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting, not to exceed sixty dollars per employee per fiscal year.

(2) Property managers who are taxable under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW and provide financial incentives to persons employed at a worksite in this state managed by the property manager for ride sharing, for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting before July 1, ((2015)) 2017, are allowed a credit against taxes payable under chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW for amounts paid to or on behalf of these persons for ride sharing in vehicles carrying two or more persons, for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting, not to exceed sixty dollars per person per fiscal year.

(3) The credit under this section is equal to the amount paid to or on behalf of each employee multiplied by fifty percent, but may not exceed sixty dollars per employee per fiscal year. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.

(4) A person may not receive credit under this section for amounts paid to or on behalf of the same employee under both chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW.

(5) A person may not take a credit under this section for amounts claimed for credit by other persons.

Sec. 709. RCW 82.70.040 and 2014 c 222 s 705 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) The department shall keep a running total of all credits allowed under RCW 82.70.020 during each fiscal year. The department shall not allow any credits that would cause the total amount allowed to exceed two million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars in any fiscal year. This limitation includes any deferred credits carried forward under subsection (2)(b)(i) of this section from prior years.

(ii) During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia, the department shall not allow any credits that would cause the total amount allowed to exceed one million five hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year. This limitation includes any deferred credits carried forward under subsection (2)(b)(i) of this section from prior years.

(b) If the total amount of credit applied for by all applicants in any year exceeds the limit in this subsection, the department shall ratably reduce the amount of credit allowed for all applicants so that the limit in this subsection is not exceeded. If a credit is reduced under this subsection, the amount of the reduction may not be carried forward and claimed in subsequent fiscal years.

(2)(a) Tax credits under RCW 82.70.020 may not be claimed in excess of the amount of tax otherwise due under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW.

(b)(i) Through June 30, 2005, a person with taxes equal to or in excess of the credit under RCW 82.70.020, and therefore not subject to the limitation in (a) of this subsection, may elect to defer tax credits for a period of not more than three years after the year in which the credits accrue. No credits deferred under this subsection (2)(b)(i) may be used after June 30, 2008. A person deferring tax credits under this subsection (2)(b)(i) must submit an application as provided in RCW 82.70.025 in the year in which the deferred tax credits will be used. This application is subject to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section for the year in which the tax credits will be applied. If a deferred credit is reduced under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the amount of deferred credit disallowed because of the reduction may be carried forward as long as the period of deferral does not exceed three years after the year in which the credit was earned.

(ii) For credits approved by the department after June 30, 2005, the approved credit may be carried forward to subsequent years until used. Credits carried forward as authorized by this subsection are subject to the limitation in subsection (1)(a) of this section for the fiscal year for which the credits were originally approved.

(3) No person shall be approved for tax credits under RCW 82.70.020 in excess of two hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year. This limitation does not apply to credits carried forward from prior years under subsection (2)(b) of this section.

(4) No person may claim tax credits after June 30, ((2015)) 2017.

(5) Credits may not be carried forward other than as authorized in subsection (2)(b) of this section.

(6) No person is eligible for tax credits under RCW 82.70.020 if the additional revenues for the multimodal transportation account created by Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2231 are terminated.

Sec. 710. RCW 82.70.050 and 2014 c 222 s 706 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia, the director shall on the 25th of February, May, August, and November of each year advise the state treasurer of the amount of credit taken under RCW 82.70.020 during the preceding calendar quarter ending on the last day of December, March, June, and September, respectively.

(2) On the last day of March, June, September, and December of each year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department, shall deposit to the general fund a sum equal to the dollar amount of the credit provided under RCW 82.70.020 from the multimodal transportation account.

Sec. 711. RCW 82.70.900 and 2014 c 222 s 707 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter expires June 30, ((2015)) 2017.

2013-2015 FISCAL BIENNIUM

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES—OPERATING

Sec. 801. 2014 c 222 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($433,000))

﻿ $432,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is provided solely for staffing costs to be dedicated to state transportation activities. Staff hired to support transportation activities must have practical experience with complex construction projects.

Sec. 802. 2014 c 222 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($1,636,000))

﻿ $1,635,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$176,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,812,000))

﻿ $1,811,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $932,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial management, from funds set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to counties according to RCW 46.68.120(3), to contract with the Washington state association of counties to identify, analyze, evaluate, and implement county transportation performance measures associated with transportation system policy goals outlined in RCW 47.04.280. The Washington state association of counties, in cooperation with state agencies, must: Identify, analyze, and report on county transportation system preservation; identify, evaluate, and report on opportunities to streamline reporting requirements for counties; and evaluate project management tools to help improve project delivery at the county level.

(2) $70,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state's share of the marine salary survey.

Sec. 803. 2014 c 222 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($1,203,000))

﻿ $1,201,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($351,000)) $349,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the motor fuel quality program.

(2) (($857,000)) $852,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to test the quality of biofuel. The department must test fuel quality at the biofuel manufacturer, distributor, and retailer.

Sec. 804. 2014 c 222 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($527,000))

﻿ $526,000

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—OPERATING

Sec. 901. 2014 c 222 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($3,027,000))

﻿ $3,026,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($40,780,000))

﻿ $40,772,000

Highway Safety Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$118,000

School Zone Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($1,700,000))

﻿ $1,600,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($45,625,000))

﻿ $45,516,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The commission shall develop and implement, in collaboration with the Washington state patrol, a target zero team pilot program in Yakima and Spokane counties. The pilot program must demonstrate the effectiveness of intense, high visibility driving under the influence enforcement in Washington state. The commission shall apply to the national highway traffic safety administration for federal highway safety grants to cover the cost of the pilot program.

(2) $20,000,000 of the highway safety account—federal appropriation is provided solely for federal funds that may be obligated to the commission pursuant to 23 U.S.C. Sec. 164 during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.

(3) The commission may continue to oversee pilot projects implementing the use of automated traffic safety cameras to detect speed violations within cities west of the Cascade mountains that have a population over one hundred ninety-five thousand. For the purposes of pilot projects in this subsection, no more than one automated traffic safety camera may be used to detect speed violations within any one jurisdiction.

(a) The commission shall comply with RCW 46.63.170 in administering the pilot projects.

(b) By January 1, 2015, any local authority that is operating an automated traffic safety camera to detect speed violations must provide a summary to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning the use of the cameras and data regarding infractions, revenues, and costs.

(4)(a) The commission shall coordinate with counties to implement and administer a statewide yellow dot program that will provide a yellow dot window decal and yellow dot folder during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.

(b) The commission may utilize available federal dollars and state dollars to implement and administer the program. The commission may accept donations and partnership funds through the state's existing donation process and deposit the funds to the highway safety account for the start-up and continued support of the program.

(c) The commission, in conjunction with counties, shall maintain a separate web page that allows a person to download the yellow dot form to be placed in the yellow dot folder and lists the locations in which a person may pick up the yellow dot window decal and folder. The commission and counties may not collect any personal information. A person using the program is responsible for maintaining the information in the yellow dot folder. Participation in the program does not create any new or distinct obligation for emergency medical responders or law enforcement personnel to determine if there is a yellow dot folder in the motor vehicle or use the information contained in the yellow dot folder.

(d) The commission may adopt rules necessary to implement this subsection.

Sec. 902. 2014 c 222 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($939,000))

﻿ $937,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($2,195,000))

﻿ $2,191,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($1,446,000))

﻿ $1,443,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,580,000))

﻿ $4,571,000

Sec. 903. 2014 c 222 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Transportation Improvement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($3,900,000))

﻿ $3,894,000

Sec. 904. 2014 c 222 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($1,575,000))

﻿ $1,574,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $325,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for a study of transportation cost drivers and potential efficiencies to contain project costs and gain more value from investments in Washington state's transportation system. The goal is to enable the department of transportation to construct bridge and highway projects more quickly and to build and operate them at a lower cost, while ensuring that appropriate environmental and regulatory protections are maintained and a quality project is delivered. The joint transportation committee must convene an advisory panel to provide study guidance and discuss potential efficiencies and recommendations. The scope of the study must be limited to state-level policies and practices relating to the planning, design, permitting, construction, financing, and operation of department of transportation roadway and bridge projects. The study must:

(i) Identify best practices;

(ii) Identify inefficiencies in state policy or agency practice where changes may save money;

(iii) Recommend changes to improve efficiency and save money; and

(iv) Identify potential savings to be achieved by adopting changes in practice or policy.

(b) The joint transportation committee shall issue a report of its findings to the house of representatives and senate transportation committees by December 31, 2013.

(2) The joint transportation committee shall coordinate a work group comprised of the department of licensing, the department of revenue, county auditors or other agents, and subagents to identify possible issues relating to the administration of, compliance with, and enforcement of the existing statutory requirement for a person to provide an unexpired driver's license when registering a vehicle. The work group shall provide recommendations on how administration and enforcement may be modified, as needed, to address any identified issues, including whether statutory changes may be needed. A report presenting the recommendations must be presented to the house of representatives and senate transportation committees by December 31, 2013.

(3) The joint transportation committee shall continue to convene a subcommittee for legislative oversight of the I-5/Columbia river crossing bridge replacement project. The Columbia river crossing legislative oversight subcommittee must be made up of six members: Two appointed by the cochairs of the senate transportation committee, two appointed by the chair and ranking member of the house of representatives transportation committee, one designee of the governor, and one citizen jointly appointed by the four members of the joint transportation executive committee. The citizen appointee must be a Washington state resident of the area served by the bridge. At least two of the legislative members must be from the legislative districts served by the bridge. In addition to reviewing project and financing information, the subcommittee must also coordinate with the Oregon legislative oversight committee for the Columbia river crossing bridge.

(4) The joint transportation committee shall convene a work group to identify and evaluate internal refinance opportunities for the Tacoma Narrows bridge. The study must include a staff work group, including staff from the office of financial management, the transportation commission, the department of transportation, the office of the state treasurer, and the legislative transportation committees. The joint transportation committee shall issue a report of its findings to the house of representatives and the senate transportation committees by December 31, 2013.

(5) The joint transportation committee shall study and review the use of surplus property proceeds to fund facility replacement projects, and the possibility of using the north central region as a pilot. The joint transportation committee shall consult with the department of transportation and the office of financial management regarding the department's current process for prioritizing and funding facility improvement and replacement projects.

(6) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to evaluate the current status of electric vehicle charging stations in Washington, and to make recommendations regarding potential business models for financially-sustainable electric vehicle charging networks and alternative roles for public and private sector participation in those business models. Public sector participation may include public financing, funding, facilitation, and other incentives to encourage installation of electric vehicle charging stations. In conducting the study, the committee must coordinate with the department of transportation and consult with local governments and stakeholders in the electric vehicle industry. The committee may also consult with users of electric vehicles and stakeholders representing manufacturers and operators of electric vehicle charging stations. The committee shall submit an interim report by December 31, 2014, and a final report by March 1, 2015.

(7) The joint transportation committee shall coordinate a work group to review the existing titling and registration processes along with policies that county auditors, subagents, and agents must comply with when conducting title and registration transactions. The goal and related outcomes of the work group review are to provide recommendations to streamline processes, modernize policies, and identify potential information technology opportunities. Members of the work group shall only include county auditors, subagents, agents, and the department of licensing. The work group shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature on or before December 1, 2014.

(8) The joint transportation committee shall coordinate a work group comprised of representatives from the department of licensing, the Washington state traffic safety commission, and other stakeholders as deemed necessary, along with interested legislators, to develop parameters for and make recommendations regarding a pilot program that would allow students to meet traffic safety education requirements online. Additionally, the work group shall make recommendations related to requiring driver training to individuals between the ages of eighteen and twenty-four who have not previously passed a driver training education program or other methods of enhancing the safety of this high-risk group. The joint transportation committee shall issue a report of its findings to the transportation committees of the house of representatives and senate by December 1, 2014.

Sec. 905. 2014 c 222 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($3,516,000))

﻿ $3,389,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$112,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,628,000))

﻿ $3,501,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Consistent with RCW 43.135.055, 47.60.290, and 47.60.315, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature authorizes the transportation commission to periodically review and, if necessary, adjust the schedule of fares for the Washington state ferry system only in amounts not greater than those sufficient to generate the amount of revenue required by the biennial transportation budget. When adjusting ferry fares, the commission must consider input from affected ferry users by public hearing and by review with the affected ferry advisory committees, in addition to the data gathered from the current ferry user survey.

(2) Consistent with RCW 43.135.055 and 47.46.100, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature authorizes the transportation commission to periodically review and, if necessary, adjust the schedule of toll charges applicable to the Tacoma Narrows bridge only in amounts not greater than those sufficient to support (a) any required costs for operating and maintaining the toll bridge, including the cost of insurance, (b) any amount required by law to meet the redemption of bonds and applicable interest payments, and (c) repayment of the motor vehicle fund.

(3) Consistent with RCW 43.135.055 and 47.56.880, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature authorizes the transportation commission to set, periodically review, and, if necessary, adjust the schedule of toll charges applicable to the Interstate 405 express toll lanes.

(4)(a) $400,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the development of the business case for the transition to a road usage charge system as the basis for funding the state transportation system, from the current motor fuel tax system. The funds are provided for fiscal year 2014 only.

(b) The legislature finds that the efforts started in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium regarding the transition to a road usage charge system represent an important first step in the policy and conceptual development of potential alternative systems to fund transportation projects, but that the governance for the development needs clarification. The legislature also finds that significant amounts of research and public education are occurring in similar efforts in several states and that these efforts can and should be leveraged to advance the evaluation in Washington. The legislature intends, therefore, that the commission and its staff lead the policy development of the business case for a road usage charge system, with the goal of providing the business case to the governor and the legislative committees of the legislature in time for inclusion in the 2014 supplemental omnibus transportation appropriations act. The legislature intends for additional oversight in the business case development, with guidance from a steering committee as provided in chapter 86, Laws of 2012, augmented with participation by the joint transportation committee. The legislature further intends that the department of transportation continue to address administrative, technical, and conceptual operational issues related to road usage charge systems, and that the department serve as a resource for information gleaned from other states on this topic for the commission's efforts.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection (4), the commission shall:

(i) Develop preliminary road usage charge policies that are necessary to develop the business case, as well as supporting research and data that will guide the potential application in Washington;

(ii) Develop the preferred operational concept or concepts that reflect the preliminary policies;

(iii) Evaluate the business case for the road usage charge system that would result from implementing the preliminary policies and preferred operational concept or concepts. The evaluation must assess likely financial outcomes if the system were to be implemented; and

(iv) Identify and document policy and other issues that are deemed important to further refine the preferred operational concept or concepts and to gain public acceptance. These identified issues should form the basis for continued work beyond this funding cycle.

(d) The commission shall convene a steering committee to guide the development of the business case. The membership must be the same as provided in chapter 86, Laws of 2012, except that the membership must also include the joint transportation committee executive members.

(e) The commission shall submit a report of the business case to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2013. The report must also include a proposed budget and work plan for fiscal year 2015. A progress report must be submitted to the governor and the joint transportation committee by November 1, 2013, including a presentation to the joint transportation committee.

(5) $174,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the voice of Washington survey program. The funding must be utilized for continued program maintenance and two transportation surveys for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.

(6)(a) $450,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a work plan to further develop the concept of a road usage charge system. The work plan must include: Refinement of initial policy analysis and development, a concept of operations that incorporates refined policy inputs, and a financial analysis evaluating the operational concept. The refinement of initial policy analysis and development funded under this subsection must be supplemented by the products of complementary policy refinement tasks delegated to the department of transportation in section 214 ((of this act)), chapter 222, Laws of 2014 and the office of the state treasurer in section 703 ((of this act)), chapter 222, Laws of 2014. It is the intent of the legislature that consideration for potential planning for a pilot project and any risk analysis occur in the 2015 legislative session.

(b)(i) For the purposes of the refinement of initial policy analysis and development, the work plan must consider phasing and staging of how a road usage charge would be implemented as it relates to the types of vehicles that would be subject to a road usage charge and the nature and manner of a transition period.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (6)(b), the legislature intends that the commission focus its analysis by assuming that the exemptions under a road usage charge would be the same as those under the motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes. In addition, the commission must engage the road usage charge steering committee, which was reauthorized in chapter 306, Laws of 2013 for fiscal year 2014 and is hereby reauthorized in this act with the same membership, to continue in its role and, at a minimum, to guide the work specified in (a) of this subsection, including the following: Assessing and recommending the type of vehicles that would be subject to the road usage charge, and assessing and recommending the options for the timing and duration of the transition period. The steering committee shall report its findings and guidance to the commission by December 1, 2014.

(c)(i) For the purposes of the development of the concept of operations, the development must incorporate the products of (b) of this subsection, and, to the extent practicable, the products of work conducted by the department of transportation in section 214 ((of this act)), chapter 222, Laws of 2014 and the office of the state treasurer in section 703 ((of this act)), chapter 222, Laws of 2014.

(ii) To reduce system development and operational costs, for road user charge options that rely on in-vehicle devices to record mileage, the work plan must recommend how the state can utilize the technology and back-office platforms that are scheduled to be provided by commercial account managers under the Oregon road usage charge program.

(iii) In addition to a time permit and an odometer charge, the concept of operations recommendation must be developed to include a means for periodic payments based on mileage reporting utilizing methods other than onboard diagnostic in-vehicle devices.

(d) The work plan and recommendations, along with a proposed work plan and budget for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, must be submitted by the commission to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 15, 2015.

(7) Within existing resources, the commission shall undertake a study of the urban and rural financial and equity implications of a potential road usage charge system in Washington. The commission shall work with the department of transportation and the department of licensing to conduct this analysis. For any survey work that is considered, the commission should utilize the existing voice of Washington survey panel and budget to inform the study. The results must be presented to the governor and the legislature by January 15, 2015.

Sec. 906. 2013 c 306 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation . . . .(($904,000))

﻿ $902,000

Sec. 907. 2014 c 222 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($366,805,000))

﻿ $364,954,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($11,067,000))

﻿ $11,049,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($3,572,000))

﻿ $3,567,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($19,265,000))

﻿ $19,257,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$272,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$569,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($401,550,000))

﻿ $399,668,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The Washington state patrol shall collaborate with the Washington traffic safety commission on the target zero team pilot program referenced in section 201 ((of this act)), chapter 306, Laws of 2013.

(2) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the Washington state patrol shall relocate its data center to the state data center in Olympia. The Washington state patrol shall work with the department of enterprise services to negotiate the lease termination agreement for the current data center site.

(3) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed employment providing traffic control services to the department of transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol must be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.

(4) $569,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account—state appropriation is provided solely for the ignition interlock program at the Washington state patrol to provide funding for two staff to work and provide support for the program in working with manufacturers, service centers, technicians, and participants in the program.

(5) $370,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the pilot program described under section 216(5) ((of this act)), chapter 222, Laws of 2014. The Washington state patrol may incur costs related only to the assignment of cadets and necessary computer equipment and to the reimbursement of the department of transportation for contract costs. The appropriation in this subsection must be funded from the portion of the automated traffic safety camera infraction fines deposited into the state patrol highway account; however, if the fines deposited into the state patrol highway account from automated traffic safety camera infractions do not reach three hundred seventy thousand dollars, the department of transportation shall remit funds necessary to the Washington state patrol to ensure the completion of the pilot program. The Washington state patrol may not incur overtime as a result of this pilot program. The Washington state patrol shall not assign troopers to operate or deploy the pilot program equipment used in roadway construction zones.

(6) The cost allocation for any costs incurred for the facilities at the Olympia, Washington airport used for the Washington state patrol aviation section must be split evenly between the state patrol highway account and the general fund.

(7) The Washington state patrol shall work with the state interoperability executive committee to compile a list of recent studies evaluating the potential savings and benefits of consolidating law enforcement and emergency dispatching centers and report to the joint transportation committee by December 1, 2014, on the findings and recommendations of those studies. As part of this study, the Washington state patrol must look for potential efficiencies within state government.

Sec. 908. 2014 c 222 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$34,000

Motorcycle Safety Education Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($4,396,000))

﻿ $4,392,000

State Wildlife Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($867,000))

﻿ $863,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($158,505,000))

﻿ $160,664,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($4,363,000))

﻿ $4,355,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($81,352,000))

﻿ $83,169,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$467,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($1,544,000))

﻿ $1,601,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($2,871,000))

﻿ $3,271,000

Department of Licensing Services Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($5,983,000))

﻿ $6,002,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($260,382,000))

﻿ $264,818,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,235,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1752), Laws of 2013 (requirements for the operation of commercial motor vehicles in compliance with federal regulations). If chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1752), Laws of 2013 is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(2) $1,000,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for information technology field system modernization.

(3) $5,286,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for business and technology modernization.

(4) $2,355,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacing prorate and fuel tax computer systems used to administer interstate licensing and the collection of fuel tax revenues.

(5) $1,491,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of an updated central issuance system.

(6) $201,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5152), Laws of 2013 (Sounders FC and Seahawks license plates). If chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5152), Laws of 2013 is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(7) $425,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5182), Laws of 2013 (vehicle owner information). If chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5182), Laws of 2013 is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(8) $289,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5785), Laws of 2014 (license plates). If chapter . . . (Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5785), Laws of 2014 is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(9) The appropriation in this section reflects the department charging an amount sufficient to cover the full cost of providing the data requested under RCW 46.12.630(1)(b).

(10)(a) The department must convene a work group to examine the use of parking placards and special license plates for persons with disabilities and develop a strategic plan for ending any abuse. In developing this plan, the department must work with the department of health, disabled citizen advocacy groups, and representatives from local government.

(b) The work group must be composed of no more than two representatives from each of the entities listed in (a) of this subsection. The work group may, when appropriate, consult with any other public or private entity in order to complete the strategic plan.

(c) The strategic plan must include:

(i) Oversight measures to ensure that parking placards and special license plates for persons with disabilities are being properly issued, including: (A) The entity responsible for coordinating a randomized review of applications for special parking privileges; (B) a volunteer panel of medical professionals to conduct such reviews; (C) a means to protect the anonymity of both the medical professional conducting a review and the medical professional under review; (D) a means to protect the privacy of applicants by removing any personally identifiable information; and (E) possible sanctions against a medical professional for repeated improper issuances of parking placards or special license plates for persons with disabilities, including those sanctions listed in chapter 18.130 RCW; and

(ii) The creation of a publicly accessible system in which the validity of parking placards and special license plates for persons with disabilities may be verified. This system must not allow the public to access any personally identifiable information or protected health information of a person who has been issued a parking placard or special license plate.

(d) The work group must convene by July 1, 2013, and terminate by December 1, 2013.

(e) By December 1, 2013, the work group must deliver to the legislature and the appropriate legislative committees the strategic plan required under this subsection, together with its findings, recommendations, and any necessary draft legislation in order to implement the strategic plan.

(11) $3,082,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for exam and licensing activities, including the workload associated with providing driver record abstracts, and is subject to the following additional conditions and limitations:

(a) The department may furnish driving record abstracts only to those persons or entities expressly authorized to receive the abstracts under Title 46 RCW;

(b) The department may furnish driving record abstracts only for an amount that does not exceed the specified fee amounts in RCW 46.52.130 (2)(e)(v) and (4); and

(c) The department may not enter into a contract, or otherwise participate in any arrangement, with a third party or other state agency for any service that results in an additional cost, in excess of the fee amounts specified in RCW 46.52.130 (2)(e)(v) and (4), to statutorily authorized persons or entities purchasing a driving record abstract.

(12) $229,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1129), Laws of 2014 (ferry vessel replacement). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1129), Laws of 2014 is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((14))) (13) $42,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2100), Laws of 2014 (Seattle University license plates). If chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2100), Laws of 2014 is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((15))) (14) $46,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2700), Laws of 2014 (breast cancer awareness license plates). If chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2700), Laws of 2014 is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((17))) (15) $32,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2741), Laws of 2014 (initial vehicle registration). If chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2741), Laws of 2014 is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((18))) (16) Within existing resources, the department must convene a work group that includes, at a minimum, representatives from the department of transportation, the trucking industry, manufacturers of compressed natural gas and liquefied natural gas, and any other stakeholders as deemed necessary, for the following purposes:

(a) To evaluate the annual license fee in lieu of fuel tax under RCW 82.38.075 to determine a fee that more closely represents the average consumption of vehicles by weight and to make recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2014, on an updated fee schedule; and

(b) To develop a transition plan to move vehicles powered by liquefied natural gas and compressed natural gas from the annual license fee in lieu of fuel tax to the fuel tax under RCW 82.38.030. The transition plan must incorporate stakeholder feedback and must include draft legislation and cost and revenue estimates. The transition plan must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.

(c) This subsection takes effect if both chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6440), Laws of 2014 (compressed natural gas and liquefied natural gas) and chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2753), Laws of 2014 (compressed natural gas and liquefied natural gas) are not enacted by June 30, 2014.

(((19))) (17) $36,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5467), Laws of 2014 (vehicle owner list furnishment requirements). If chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5467), Laws of 2014 is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((20))) (18) The department must convene a work group to study the issue of regulating tow truck operators that are not licensed as registered tow truck operators under chapter 46.55 RCW. The work group must examine the advisability of regulating such operators, including any potential benefits to public safety, and possible methodologies for accomplishing this regulation. The work group must include the department, representatives of the Washington state patrol, organized groups of registered tow truck operators, and automobile clubs. The work group may also include hulk haulers, wreckers, transporters, and other stakeholders relating to the issue of unregulated towing for monetary compensation. The work group shall convene as necessary and report its recommendations and draft legislation to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2014.

(((21))) (19) The department when modernizing its computer systems must place personal and company data elements in separate data fields to allow the department to select discrete data elements when providing information or data to persons or entities outside the department. This requirement must be included as part of the systems design in the department's business and technology modernization. A person's photo, social security number, or medical information must not be made available through public disclosure or data being provided under RCW 46.12.630 or 46.12.635.

(20) $50,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 30, Laws of 2014 (snowmobile license fees).

(21) $30,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 100, Laws of 2014 (DUI prior offenses).

Sec. 909. 2014 c 222 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM B

High((-))Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($1,942,000))

﻿ $1,884,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($514,000))

﻿ $513,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($34,267,000))

﻿ $33,133,000

State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($4,156,000))

﻿ $4,601,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($25,007,000))

﻿ $25,905,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$250,000

Interstate 405 Express Toll Lanes Operations﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,019,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($68,155,000))

﻿ $68,305,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The legislature finds that the department's tolling division has expanded greatly in recent years to address the demands of administering several newly tolled facilities using emerging toll collection technologies. The legislature intends for the department to continue its good work in administering the tolled facilities of the state, while at the same time implementing controls and processes to ensure the efficient and judicious administration of toll payer dollars.

(b) The legislature finds that the department has undertaken a cost-of-service study in the winter and spring of 2013 for the purposes of identifying in detail the costs of operating and administering tolling on state route number 520, state route number 167 high-occupancy toll lanes, and the Tacoma Narrows bridge. The purpose of the study is to provide results to establish a baseline by which future activity may be compared and opportunities identified for cost savings and operational efficiencies. In addition, the legislature finds that the state auditor has undertaken a performance audit of the department's contract for the customer service center and back office processing of tolling transactions. The audit findings, which are expected to include lessons learned, are due in late spring 2013.

(c) Using the results of the cost-of-service study and the state audit as a basis, the department shall conduct a review of operations using lean management principles in order to eliminate inefficiencies and redundancies, incorporate lessons learned, and identify opportunities to conduct operations more efficiently and effectively. Within current statutory and budgetary tolling policy, the department shall use the results of the review to improve operations in order to conduct toll operations within the appropriations provided in subsections (2) through (4) of this section. The department shall submit the review, along with the status of and plans for the implementation of review recommendations, to the office of financial management and the house of representatives and senate transportation committees by October 15, 2013.

(2) $10,343,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, $16,534,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, $1,217,000 of the high-occupancy toll lanes operations account—state appropriation, and $514,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for nonvendor costs of administering toll operations, including the costs of: Staffing the division, consultants and other personal service contracts required for technical oversight and management assistance, insurance, payments related to credit card processing, transponder purchases and inventory management, facility operations and maintenance, and other miscellaneous nonvendor costs.

(3) $11,265,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, $9,730,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, and $625,000 of the high-occupancy toll lanes operations account—state appropriation are provided solely for vendor-related costs of operating tolled facilities, including the costs of: The customer service center; cash collections on the Tacoma Narrows bridge; electronic payment processing; and toll collection equipment maintenance, renewal, and replacement.

(4) $1,300,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation and $6,000,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of addressing unforeseen operations and maintenance costs on the Tacoma Narrows bridge and the state route number 520 bridge, respectively. The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this section, which represent a portion of the required minimum fund balance under the policy of the state treasurer, in unallotted status. The office may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for operations and maintenance purposes have been exhausted.

(5) (($4,156,000)) $4,606,000 of the state route number 520 civil penalties account—state appropriation and (($1,039,000)) $2,539,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation are provided solely for expenditures related to the toll adjudication process. The department shall report on the civil penalty process to the office of financial management and the house of representatives and senate transportation committees by the end of each calendar quarter. The reports must include a summary table for each toll facility that includes: The number of notices of civil penalty issued; the number of recipients who pay before the notice becomes a penalty; the number of recipients who request a hearing and the number who do not respond; workload costs related to hearings; the cost and effectiveness of debt collection activities; and revenues generated from notices of civil penalty.

(6) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation in this section reflects reductions in management costs of $1,235,000.

(7) The department shall make detailed quarterly expenditure reports available to the transportation commission and to the public on the department's web site using current department resources. The reports must include a summary of toll revenue by facility on all operating toll facilities and high occupancy toll lane systems, and an itemized depiction of the use of that revenue.

(8) The department shall make detailed quarterly reports to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature on the use of consultants in the tolling program. The reports must include the name of the contractor, the scope of work, the type of contract, timelines, deliverables, any new task orders, and any extensions to existing consulting contracts.

(9)(a) $250,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the development of a plan to integrate and transition customer service, reservation, and payment systems currently provided by the marine division to ferry users into the statewide tolling customer service center.

(b)(i) The department shall develop a plan that addresses:

(A) A phased implementation approach, beginning with "Good To Go" as a payment option for ferry users;

(B) The feasibility, schedule, and cost of creating a single account-based system for toll road and ferry users;

(C) Transitioning customer service currently provided by the marine division to the statewide tolling customer service center; and

(D) Transitioning existing and planned ferry reservation system support from the marine division to the statewide tolling customer service center.

(ii) The plan must be provided to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by January 14, 2014.

(10)(a) $2,019,000 of the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for operating and maintenance costs of the Interstate 405 express toll lanes program, including staff costs related to operating an additional toll facility, consulting support for operations, purchase of transponders, costs related to adjudication, credit card fees, printing and postage, and customer service center support. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $519,000 of the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account—state appropriation must be placed in unallotted status by the office of financial management until a plan to begin tolling the Interstate 405 express toll lanes during the summer of 2015 is finalized and approved by the office of financial management, in consultation with the chairs and ranking member of the transportation committees of the legislature.

(b) The funds provided in (a) of this subsection are provided through a transfer from the motor vehicle account—state appropriation in section 407(19) ((of this act)), chapter 222, Laws of 2014. These funds are a loan to the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account—state appropriation, and the legislature assumes that these funds will be reimbursed to the motor vehicle account at a later date when the Interstate 405 express toll lanes are operational.

(11) $1,060,000 of the Tacoma narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, $2,003,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, and $99,000 of the high occupancy toll lanes operations account—state appropriation are provided solely in anticipation of, and to prepare for, the procurement of a new tolling customer service center. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $480,000 of the Tacoma narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, $906,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, and $45,000 of the high occupancy toll lanes operations account—state appropriation must be placed in unallotted status by the office of financial management until a procurement plan is finalized and approved by the office of financial management, in consultation with the chairs and ranking member of the transportation committees of the legislature. Beginning July 1, 2014, the department shall report quarterly to the governor, legislature, and state auditor on: (a) The department's effort to mitigate risk to the state, (b) the development of a request for proposals, and (c) the overall progress towards procuring a new tolling customer service center.

Sec. 910. 2014 c 222 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY—PROGRAM C

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,460,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($65,936,000))

﻿ $65,821,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,883,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,460,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$263,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($72,002,000))

﻿ $71,887,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $290,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's compliance with its national pollution discharge elimination system permit.

(2) $1,460,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation and $1,460,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation are provided solely for maintaining the department's project management reporting system.

Sec. 911. 2014 c 222 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM D—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($26,114,000))

﻿ $26,045,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $850,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's compliance with its national pollution discharge elimination system permit.

Sec. 912. 2014 c 222 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—AVIATION—PROGRAM F

Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($7,909,000))

﻿ $7,903,000

Aeronautics Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,150,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($10,059,000))

﻿ $10,053,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $4,065,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for airport investment studies and the airport aid grant program, which provides competitive grants to public airports for pavement, safety, maintenance, planning, and security.

Sec. 913. 2014 c 222 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM H

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($48,687,000))

﻿ $48,555,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($49,437,000))

﻿ $49,305,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,423,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's compliance with its national pollution discharge elimination system permit.

(2) The real estate services division of the department must recover the cost of its efforts from sale proceeds and fund additional future sales from those proceeds.

(3) The legislature recognizes that the Dryden pit site (WSDOT Inventory Control (IC) No. 2-04-00103) is unused state-owned real property under the jurisdiction of the department, and that the public would benefit significantly from the complete enjoyment of the natural scenic beauty and recreational opportunities available at the site. Therefore, pursuant to RCW 47.12.080, the legislature declares that transferring the property to the department of fish and wildlife for recreational use and fish and wildlife restoration efforts is consistent with the public interest in order to preserve the area for the use of the public and the betterment of the natural environment. The department shall work with the department of fish and wildlife and transfer and convey the Dryden pit site to the department of fish and wildlife as-is for an adjusted fair market value reflecting site conditions, the proceeds of which must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. The department is not responsible for any costs associated with the cleanup or transfer of this property. This subsection expires June 30, 2014.

(4) The legislature recognizes that the trail known as the Apple Capital Loop, and its extensions, serve to separate motor vehicle traffic from pedestrians and bicyclists, increasing motor vehicle safety on existing state route number 28. Consistent with chapter 47.30 RCW and pursuant to RCW 47.12.080, the legislature declares that transferring portions of WSDOT Inventory Control (IC) Nos. 2-09-04537 and 2-09-04569 to Douglas county and the city of East Wenatchee is consistent with the public interest. The legislature directs the department to transfer the property to Douglas county and the city of East Wenatchee. The department must be paid fair market value for any portions of the transferred real property that is later abandoned, vacated, or ceases to be publicly maintained for trail purposes. Douglas county and the city of East Wenatchee must agree to accept responsibility for trail segments within their respective jurisdictions and sign an agreement with the state that the transfer of these parcels to their respective jurisdictions extinguishes any state obligations to improve, maintain, or be in any way responsible for these assets. This subsection expires June 30, 2014.

(5) The legislature recognizes that the SR 20/Cook Road realignment and extension project in the city of Sedro-Woolley will enhance the state and local highway systems by providing a more direct route from state route number 20 and state route number 9 to Interstate 5, and will reduce traffic on state route number 20 and state route number 9, improving the capacity of each route. Furthermore, the legislature declares that certain portions of the department's property held for highway purposes located primarily to the north and west of state route number 20, between state route number 20 to the south and F and S Grade Road to the north, in the incorporated limits of Sedro-Woolley in Skagit county, can help facilitate completion of the project. Therefore, consistent with RCW 47.12.063, 47.12.080, and 47.12.120, it is the intent of the legislature that the department sell, transfer, or lease, as appropriate, to the city of Sedro-Woolley only those portions of the property necessary to construct the project, including necessary staging areas. However, any staging areas should revert to the department within three years of completion of the project.

(6) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department shall create a quality assurance position. This position must provide independent project quality assurance validation and ensure that quality assurance audit functions are accountable at the highest level of the organization.

(((8))) (7) $1,453,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to support increased departmental efforts to dispose of surplus property as directed in subsection (2) of this section. These additional funds are expected to result in up to $5,000,000 per fiscal biennium in additional revenues through increasing the sale of surplus property. By December 1, 2014, the department shall report to the governor and the chairs and ranking members of the senate and house of representatives transportation committees on the number of surplus property parcels sold and the amount of revenue generated from those sales during 2014.

Sec. 914. 2014 c 222 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS—PROGRAM K

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($589,000))

﻿ $588,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature finds that the efforts started in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium regarding the transition to a road usage charge system represent an important first step in the policy and conceptual development of potential alternative systems to fund transportation projects, but that the governance for the development needs clarification. The legislature also finds that significant amounts of research and public education are occurring in similar efforts in several states and that these efforts can and should be leveraged to advance the evaluation in Washington. The legislature intends, therefore, that the transportation commission and its staff lead the policy development of the business case for a road usage charge system, with the goal of providing the business case to the governor and the legislative committees of the legislature in time for inclusion in the 2014 supplemental omnibus transportation appropriations act. The legislature intends for additional oversight in the business case development, with guidance from a steering committee as provided in chapter 86, Laws of 2012 for the transportation commission, augmented with participation by the joint transportation committee. The legislature further intends that, through the economic partnerships program, the department continue to address administrative, technical, and conceptual operational issues related to road usage charge systems, and that the department serve as a resource for information gleaned from other states on this topic for the transportation commission's efforts.

(2) The economic partnerships program must continue to explore retail partnerships at state-owned park-and-ride facilities, as authorized in RCW 47.04.295.

(3) The department, in collaboration with the transportation commission, shall work with the office of the state treasurer and the state's bond counsel to explore legal approaches for ensuring that any reduction, refunding, crediting, or repeal of the motor vehicle fuel tax, in whole or in part, can be accomplished without unlawfully impairing the legal rights of motor vehicle fuel tax bond holders. The results of this work must be shared with the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by September 1, 2014.

(4) $21,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely as matching funds for the department to partner with other transportation agencies located in the western region of North America to develop strategies and methods for reporting, collecting, crediting, and remitting road usage charges resulting from inter-jurisdictional travel. At least one partnering jurisdiction must share a common border with Washington. The results of this work must be reported to the governor, the transportation commission, and the transportation committees of the legislature by September 1, 2014.

Sec. 915. 2014 c 222 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM M

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$10,000,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($391,358,000))

﻿ $390,394,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$7,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($408,358,000))

﻿ $407,394,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $10,910,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's compliance with its national pollution discharge elimination system permit.

(2) $2,605,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for utility fees assessed by local governments as authorized under RCW 90.03.525 for the mitigation of storm water runoff from state highways.

(3) The department shall submit a budget decision for the 2014 legislative session package that details all costs associated with utility fees assessed by local governments as authorized under RCW 90.03.525.

(4) $50,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for clearing and pruning dangerous trees along state route number 542 between mile markers 43 and 48 to prevent safety hazards and delays.

(5) $2,277,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to replace or rehabilitate critical equipment needed to perform snow and ice removal activities and roadway maintenance. These funds may not be used to purchase passenger cars as defined in RCW 46.04.382.

Sec. 916. 2014 c 222 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($50,055,000))

﻿ $49,879,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,050,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$250,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($52,355,000))

﻿ $52,179,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or provide congestion relief. The department shall prioritize low-cost enhancement projects on a statewide rather than regional basis. By September 1st of each even-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all low-cost enhancement projects prioritized on a statewide rather than regional basis completed in the prior year.

(2) $9,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's incident response program.

(3) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the department shall continue a pilot program that expands private transportation providers' access to high occupancy vehicle lanes. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, the following vehicles must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway if the vehicle has the capacity to carry eight or more passengers, regardless of the number of passengers in the vehicle: (a) Auto transportation company vehicles regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; (b) passenger charter carrier vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; (c) private nonprofit transportation provider vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and (d) private employer transportation service vehicles. For purposes of this subsection, "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees. Nothing in this subsection is intended to authorize the conversion of public infrastructure to private, for-profit purposes or to otherwise create an entitlement or other claim by private users to public infrastructure.

(4) The department shall work with the cities of Lynnwood and Edmonds to provide traffic light synchronization on state route number 524.

(5) The department, in consultation with the Washington state patrol, must continue a pilot program for the state patrol to issue infractions based on information from automated traffic safety cameras in roadway construction zones on state highways. For the purpose of this pilot program, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, a roadway construction zone includes areas where public employees or private contractors may be present or where a driving condition exists that would make it unsafe to drive at higher speeds, such as, when the department is redirecting or realigning lanes on any public roadway pursuant to ongoing construction. The department shall use the following guidelines to administer the program:

(a) Automated traffic safety cameras may only take pictures of the vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction is occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of passengers in the vehicle;

(b) The department shall plainly mark the locations where the automated traffic safety cameras are used by placing signs on locations that clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a roadway construction zone where traffic laws are enforced by an automated traffic safety camera;

(c) Notices of infractions must be mailed to the registered owner of a vehicle within fourteen days of the infraction occurring;

(d) The owner of the vehicle is not responsible for the violation if the owner of the vehicle, within fourteen days of receiving notification of the violation, mails to the patrol, a declaration under penalty of perjury, stating that the vehicle involved was, at the time, stolen or in the care, custody, or control of some person other than the registered owner, or any other extenuating circumstances;

(e) For purposes of the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium pilot program, infractions detected through the use of automated traffic safety cameras are not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated by the use of automated traffic safety cameras must be processed in the same manner as parking infractions for the purposes of RCW 3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16A.120, and 46.20.270(3). However, the amount of the fine issued under this subsection (5) for an infraction generated through the use of an automated traffic safety camera is one hundred thirty-seven dollars. The court shall remit thirty-two dollars of the fine to the state treasurer for deposit into the state patrol highway account; and

(f) If a notice of infraction is sent to the registered owner and the registered owner is a rental car business, the infraction must be dismissed against the business if it mails to the patrol, within fourteen days of receiving the notice, a declaration under penalty of perjury of the name and known mailing address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the infraction occurred. If the business is unable to determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction occurred, the business must sign a declaration under penalty of perjury to this effect. The declaration must be mailed to the patrol within fourteen days of receiving the notice of traffic infraction. Timely mailing of this declaration to the issuing agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this section for the notice of infraction. A declaration form suitable for this purpose must be included with each automated traffic safety camera infraction notice issued, along with instructions for its completion and use.

(6) $102,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to replace or rehabilitate critical equipment needed to perform traffic control. These funds may not be used to purchase passenger cars as defined in RCW 46.04.382.

Sec. 917. 2014 c 222 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM S

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($27,079,000))

﻿ $26,871,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$280,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,131,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($28,490,000))

﻿ $28,282,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($200,000)) $80,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for enhanced disadvantaged business enterprise outreach to increase the pool of disadvantaged businesses available for department contracts. The department must submit a status report on disadvantaged business enterprise outreach to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 15, 2014.

Sec. 918. 2014 c 222 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH—PROGRAM T

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($19,818,000))

﻿ $19,716,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$26,085,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$662,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,809,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($49,474,000))

﻿ $49,372,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within available resources, the department must collaborate with the affected metropolitan planning organizations, regional transportation planning organizations, transit agencies, and private transportation providers to develop a plan to reduce vehicle demand, increase public transportation options, and reduce vehicle miles traveled on corridors affected by growth at Joint Base Lewis-McChord.

Sec. 919. 2014 c 222 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES—PROGRAM U

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($74,198,000))

﻿ $73,941,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$400,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,068,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($77,666,000))

﻿ $77,409,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department of enterprise services must provide a detailed accounting of the revenues and expenditures of the self-insurance fund to the transportation committees of the legislature on December 31st and June 30th of each year.

Sec. 920. 2014 c 222 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM V

State Vehicle Parking Account—State Appropriation. . . .$754,000

Regional Mobility Grant Program Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($51,111,000))

﻿ $41,111,000

Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$17,000,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($39,325,000))

﻿ $39,313,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,280,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$160,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($111,630,000))

﻿ $101,618,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $25,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of transportation. Of this amount:

(a) $5,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers must be based on need, including the availability of other providers of service in the area, efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost effectiveness of trips provided.

(b) $19,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit agency must, to the greatest extent practicable, have a maintenance of effort for special needs transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies must be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response service and route deviated service in calendar year 2011 as reported in the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2011" published by the department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than thirty percent of these distributions.

(2) $17,000,000 of the rural mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to aid small cities in rural areas as prescribed in RCW 47.66.100.

(3)(a) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a) Public transit agencies to add vanpools or replace vans; and (b) incentives for employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; operating costs for public transit agencies are not eligible for funding under this grant program. Additional employees may not be hired from the funds provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and supplanting of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed. The department shall encourage grant applicants and recipients to leverage funds other than state funds.

(b) At least $1,600,000 of the amount provided in this subsection must be used for vanpool grants in congested corridors.

(c) $520,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is provided solely for the purchase of additional vans for use by vanpools serving or traveling through the Joint Base Lewis-McChord I-5 corridor between mile post 116 and 127. The department's public transportation division is authorized to purchase vans in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, on behalf of public transit agencies, exclusively for the purpose of compliance with the terms of this subsection (3)(c).

(4) (($11,111,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2014-2 ALL PROJECTS - Public Transportation - Program (V) as developed March 10, 2014.

(5)(a) $40,000,000)) (a) $41,111,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2014-2)) 2015-2 ALL PROJECTS ((- Public Transportation - Program (V))) as developed ((March 10, 2014)) May 26, 2015, Program - Public Transportation Program (V). The department shall review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within one year of the grant award, must be reviewed by the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and any remaining funds must be used only to fund projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection. The department shall provide annual status reports on December 15, 2013, and December 15, 2014, to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the projects receiving the grants. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate funds through the regional mobility grant program only for projects that will be completed on schedule. A grantee may not receive more than twenty-five percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection. The department shall not approve any increases or changes to the scope of a project for the purpose of a grantee expending remaining funds on an awarded grant.

(b) In order to be eligible to receive a grant under (a) of this subsection during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, a transit agency must establish a process for private transportation providers to apply for the use of park and ride facilities. For purposes of this subsection, (i) "private transportation provider" means: An auto transportation company regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; a passenger charter carrier regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; a private nonprofit transportation provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; or a private employer transportation service provider; and (ii) "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees.

(6) Funds provided for the commute trip reduction (CTR) program may also be used for the growth and transportation efficiency center program.

(7) $6,424,000 of the total appropriation in this section is provided solely for CTR grants and activities. Of this amount:

(a) $3,900,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to local jurisdictions, selected by the CTR board, for the purpose of assisting employers meet CTR goals;

(b) $1,770,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for state costs associated with CTR. The department shall develop more efficient methods of CTR assistance and survey procedures; and

(c) $754,000 of the state vehicle parking account—state appropriation is provided solely for CTR-related expenditures, including all expenditures related to the guaranteed ride home program and the STAR pass program.

(8) An affected urban growth area that has not previously implemented a commute trip reduction program as of the effective date of this section is exempt from the requirements in RCW 70.94.527.

(9) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is contingent on the timely development of an annual report summarizing the status of public transportation systems as identified under RCW 35.58.2796.

(10) $160,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for King county metro to study demand potential for a state route number 18 and Interstate 90 park and ride location, to size the facilities appropriately, to perform site analysis, and to develop preliminary design concepts. When studying potential park and ride locations pursuant to this subsection, King county metro must take into consideration the effect of the traffic using the weigh station at the Interstate 90 and state route number 18 interchange at exit 25 and, to the maximum extent practicable, choose a park and ride location that minimizes traffic impacts for the Interstate 90 and state route number 18 interchange and the weigh station.

Sec. 921. 2014 c 222 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—MARINE—PROGRAM X

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($483,404,000))

﻿ $475,915,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$121,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($483,525,000))

﻿ $476,036,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of financial management budget instructions require agencies to recast enacted budgets into activities. The Washington state ferries shall include a greater level of detail in its 2013-2015 supplemental and 2015-2017 omnibus transportation appropriations act requests, as determined jointly by the office of financial management, the Washington state ferries, and the transportation committees of the legislature. This level of detail must include the administrative functions in the operating as well as capital programs.

(2) Until a reservation system is operational on the San Juan islands inter-island route, the department shall provide the same priority loading benefits on the San Juan islands inter-island route to home health care workers as are currently provided to patients traveling for purposes of receiving medical treatment.

(3) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the department may enter into a distributor controlled fuel hedging program and other methods of hedging approved by the fuel hedging committee.

(4) (($113,157,000)) $106,497,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, which reflect cost savings from a reduced biodiesel fuel requirement and, therefore, are contingent upon the enactment of section 701, chapter 306, Laws of 2013. The amount provided in this subsection represent the fuel budget for the purposes of calculating any ferry fare fuel surcharge. The department shall develop a fuel reduction plan to be submitted as part of its 2014 supplemental budget proposal. The plan must include fuel saving proposals, such as vessel modifications, vessel speed reductions, and changes to operating procedures, along with anticipated fuel saving estimates.

(5) $100,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's compliance with its national pollution discharge elimination system permit.

(6) When purchasing uniforms that are required by collective bargaining agreements, the department shall contract with the lowest cost provider.

(7) $3,049,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the operating program share of the $7,259,000 in lease payments for the ferry division's headquarters building. Consistent with the 2012 facilities oversight plan, the department shall strive to consolidate office space in downtown Seattle by the end of 2015. The department shall consider renewing the lease for the ferry division's current headquarters building only if the lease rate is reduced at least ((fifty)) forty percent and analysis shows that this is the least cost and risk option for the department. Consolidation with other divisions or state agencies, or a reduction in leased space, must also be considered as part of any headquarters lease renewal analysis.

(8) $5,000,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the purchase of a 2013-2015 marine insurance policy. Within this amount, the department is expected to purchase a policy with the lowest deductible possible, while maintaining at least existing coverage levels for ferry vessels, and providing coverage for all terminals.

(9) Within existing resources, the department must evaluate the feasibility of using re-refined used motor oil processed in Washington state as a ferry fuel source. The evaluation must include, but is not limited to, research on existing entities currently using the process for re-refined fuel, any required combustible engine modifications, additional needed equipment on the vessels or fueling locations, cost analysis, compatibility with B-5 blended diesel, and meeting engine performance specifications. The department must establish an evaluation group that includes, but is not limited to, persons experienced in the re-refined motor oil industry. The department must deliver a report containing the results of the evaluation to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 1, 2014.

(10) $71,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for one traffic attendant for ferry terminal traffic control at the Fauntleroy ferry terminal.

Sec. 922. 2014 c 222 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—OPERATING

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($46,026,000))

﻿ $45,963,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$57,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$46,020,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $40,289,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for operating and maintaining state-supported passenger rail service. In recognition of the increased costs the state is expected to absorb due to changes in federal law, the department is directed to analyze the Amtrak contract proposal and find cost saving alternatives. The department shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature before the 2014 regular legislative session on its revisions to the Amtrak contract, including a review of the appropriate costs within the contract for concession services, policing, host railroad incentives, and station services and staffing needs. Within thirty days of each annual cost/revenue reconciliation under the Amtrak service contract, the department shall report any changes that would affect the state subsidy amount appropriated in this subsection. Through a competitive process, the department may contract with a private entity for services related to operations and maintenance of the Amtrak Cascades route, including, but not limited to, concession services.

(2) Amtrak Cascades runs may not be eliminated.

(3) The department shall continue a pilot program by partnering with the travel industry on the Amtrak Cascades service between Vancouver, British Columbia, and Seattle to test opportunities for increasing ridership, maximizing farebox recovery, and stimulating private investment. The pilot program must run from December 31, 2013, to December 31, 2014, and evaluate seasonal differences in the program and the effect of advertising. The department may offer to Washington universities an opportunity for business students to work as interns on the analysis of the pilot program process and results. The department shall report on the results of the pilot program to the office of financial management and the legislature by January 31, 2015.

(4) $150,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop an inventory of short line rail infrastructure that can be used to support a data-driven approach to identifying system needs. The department shall work with short line rail owners and operators within the state, provide status updates periodically to the joint transportation committee, submit a progress report of its findings to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 15, 2014, submit a preliminary report of key findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by March 1, 2015, and submit a final report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by June 30, 2015.

Sec. 923. 2014 c 222 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($8,672,000))

﻿ $8,647,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .$2,567,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($11,239,000))

﻿ $11,214,000

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—CAPITAL

Sec. 1001. 2014 c 222 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Freight Mobility Investment Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($11,930,000))

﻿ $6,270,000

Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($9,826,000))

﻿ $6,011,000

((Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,320,000))

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,606,000

((Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$84,000))

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($5,750,000))

﻿ $2,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($31,516,000))

﻿ $17,387,000

Sec. 1002. 2014 c 222 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($57,394,000))

﻿ $49,095,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$10,000,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$706,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$32,000,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($100,100,000))

﻿ $91,801,000

Sec. 1003. 2014 c 222 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Small City Pavement and Sidewalk Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$5,250,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .$10,000,000

Transportation Improvement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($231,851,000))

﻿ $230,851,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($247,101,000))

﻿ $246,101,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for:

(1) The arterial preservation program to help low tax-based, medium-sized cities preserve arterial pavements;

(2) The small city pavement program to help cities meet urgent preservation needs; and

(3) The small city low-energy street light retrofit demonstration program.

Sec. 1004. 2014 c 222 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITIES—PROGRAM D—(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)—CAPITAL

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($14,390,000))

﻿ $13,390,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$9,469,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($23,859,000))

﻿ $22,859,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature recognizes that the Marginal Way site (King county parcel numbers 3024049182 & 5367202525) is surplus state-owned real property under the jurisdiction of the department and that the public would benefit significantly if this site is used to provide important social services. Therefore, the legislature declares that committing the Marginal Way site to this use is consistent with the public interest.

Pursuant to RCW 47.12.063, the department shall work with the owner of King county parcel number 7643400010, which abuts both parcels of the Marginal Way site, and shall convey the Marginal Way site to that abutting property owner for the appraised fair market value of the parcels, the proceeds of which must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. The conveyance is conditional upon the purchaser's agreement to commit the use of the Marginal Way site to operations with the goal of ending hunger in western Washington. The department may not make this conveyance before September 1, 2013, and may not make this conveyance after September 1, 2014.

The Washington department of transportation is not responsible for any costs associated with the cleanup or transfer of the Marginal Way site.

(2) (($14,390,000)) $13,390,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation is provided solely for the construction of a new traffic management and emergency operations center on property owned by the department on Dayton Avenue in Shoreline (project 100010T). Consistent with the office of financial management's 2012 study, it is the intent of the legislature to appropriate no more than $15,000,000 for the total construction costs. The department shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by June 30, 2014, on the progress of the construction of the traffic management and emergency operations center, including a schedule for terminating the current lease of the Goldsmith building in Seattle.

Sec. 1005. 2014 c 222 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—IMPROVEMENTS—PROGRAM I

((Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$1,000,000))

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($1,313,555,000))

﻿ $935,899,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($69,478,000))

﻿ $58,888,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($516,181,000))

﻿ $508,032,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($166,357,000))

﻿ $157,553,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($325,778,000))

﻿ $261,599,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$880,111,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .$300,000,000

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation. . . .$124,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,572,584,000))

﻿ $3,102,206,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2014-1)) 2015-1 as developed ((March 10, 2014)) May 26, 2015, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section ((601 of this act)) 1201, chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1299), Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2014-2)) 2015-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 10, 2014)) May 26, 2015, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). The department shall apply any federal funds gained through efficiencies or the redistribution process in an amount up to $27,200,000 for cost overruns related to the pontoon design errors on the SR 520 Bridge Replacement and HOV project (8BI1003) as described in subsection (12)(f) of this section. Any federal funds gained through efficiencies or the redistribution process that are in excess of $27,200,000 must then be applied to the "Contingency (Unfunded) Highway Preservation Projects" as identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2014-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 10, 2014, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). However, no additional federal funds may be allocated to the I-5/Columbia River Crossing project (400506A).

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act.

(4) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation includes up to (($246,710,000)) $189,996,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.861.

(5) The transportation partnership account—state appropriation includes up to (($811,595,000)) $564,989,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(6) The motor vehicle account—state appropriation includes up to (($30,000,000)) $14,997,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.843.

(7)(a) (($6,174,000)) $1,514,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and (($269,000)) $21,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the I-90 Comprehensive Tolling Study and Environmental Review project (100067T). The department shall prepare a detailed environmental impact statement that complies with the national environmental policy act regarding tolling Interstate 90 between Interstate 5 and Interstate 405 for the purposes of both managing traffic and providing funding for the construction of the unfunded state route number 520 from Interstate 5 to Medina project. As part of the preparation of the statement, the department must review any impacts to the network of highways and roads surrounding Lake Washington. In developing this statement, the department must provide significant outreach to potential affected communities. The department may consider traffic management options that extend as far east as Issaquah.

(b)(i) As part of the project in this subsection (7), the department shall perform a study of all funding alternatives to tolling Interstate 90 to provide funding for construction of the unfunded state route number 520 and explore and evaluate options to mitigate the effect of tolling on affected residents and all other users of the network of highways and roads surrounding Lake Washington including, but not limited to:

(A) Allowing all Washington residents to traverse a portion of the tolled section of Interstate 90 without paying a toll. Residents may choose either (I) the portion of Interstate 90 between the easternmost landing west of Mercer Island and the westernmost landing on Mercer Island, or (II) the portion of Interstate 90 between the westernmost landing east of Mercer Island and the easternmost landing on Mercer Island;

(B) Assessing a toll only when a driver traverses, in either direction, the entire portion of Interstate 90 between the easternmost landing west of Mercer Island and the westernmost landing east of Mercer Island; and

(C) Allowing affected residents to choose one portion of the tolled section of Interstate 90 upon which they may travel without paying a toll. Residents may choose either (I) the portion of Interstate 90 between the easternmost landing west of Mercer Island and the westernmost landing on Mercer Island, or (II) the portion of Interstate 90 between the westernmost landing east of Mercer Island and the easternmost landing on Mercer Island.

(ii) The department may also consider any alternative mitigation options that conform to the purpose of this subsection (7).

(iii) For the purposes of this subsection (7), "affected resident" means anyone who must use a portion of Interstate 90 west of Interstate 405 upon which tolling is considered in order to access necessary medical services, such as a hospital.

(8) (($490,796,000)) $203,317,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, (($156,979,000)) $156,879,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, (($132,191,000)) $131,327,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, and (($123,305,000)) $86,401,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct - Replacement project (809936Z). Amounts appropriated in this subsection may not be spent for the purpose of public transportation mitigation, except pursuant to an agreement or agreements between the department and King county as that agreement or agreements existed on January 1, 2013.

(9) The department shall reconvene an expert review panel of no more than three members as described under RCW 47.01.400 for the purpose of updating the work that was previously completed by the panel on the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project and to ensure that an appropriate and viable financial plan is created and regularly reviewed. The expert review panel must be selected cooperatively by the chairs of the senate and house of representatives transportation committees, the secretary of transportation, and the governor. The expert review panel must report findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature, the governor's Alaskan Way viaduct project oversight committee, and the transportation commission annually until the project is operationally complete. This subsection takes effect if chapter ... (Substitute House Bill No. 1957), Laws of 2013 is not enacted by June 30, 2013.

(10) (($7,103,000)) $6,955,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, (($22,774,000)) $23,285,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation, (($1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation)) $3,776,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, $70,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, and (($51,712,000)) $45,688,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the US 395/North Spokane Corridor projects (600010A & 600003A). Any future savings on the projects must stay on the US 395/Interstate 90 corridor and be made available to the current phase of the North Spokane corridor projects or any future phase of the projects.

(11) (($129,952,000)) $115,807,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, $145,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, and (($58,583,000)) $48,227,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation are provided solely for the I-405/Kirkland Vicinity Stage 2 - Widening project (8BI1002). This project must be completed as soon as practicable as a design-build project. Any future savings on this project or other Interstate 405 corridor projects must stay on the Interstate 405 corridor and be made available to either the I-405/SR 167 Interchange - Direct Connector project (140504C) or the I-405 Renton to Bellevue project.

(12)(a) The SR 520 Bridge Replacement and HOV project (8BI1003) is supported over time from multiple sources, including a $300,000,000 TIFIA loan, $923,000,000 in Garvee bonds, toll revenues, state bonds, interest earnings, and other miscellaneous sources.

(b) The state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation includes up to $814,784,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.879 and 47.10.886.

(c) The state route number 520 corridor account—federal appropriation includes up to $300,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.879 and 47.10.886.

(d) $165,175,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, $300,000,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—federal appropriation, and $880,111,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 520 Bridge Replacement and HOV project (8BI1003). Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection (12)(d), $84,001,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—federal appropriation and $354,411,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation must be put into unallotted status and are subject to review by the office of financial management. The director of the office of financial management shall consult with the joint transportation committee prior to making a decision to allot these funds.

(e) When developing the financial plan for the project, the department shall assume that all maintenance and operation costs for the new facility are to be covered by tolls collected on the toll facility and not by the motor vehicle account.

(f) The legislature finds that the most appropriate way to pay for the cost overruns related to change orders, additional sales tax, and future risks associated with pontoon design errors is for the state to issue triple pledge bonds in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium resulting in $110,961,000 in proceeds, and use efficiencies, including the use of least cost planning or practical design, and favorable bids in the highway construction program to generate an additional $61,066,000 towards paying for the estimated project overruns. Of this additional $61,066,000, $33,866,000 should come from the transportation partnership account—state appropriation and $27,200,000 should come from federal funds. As the department identifies savings in federal funds during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the department shall prioritize the use of these funds towards the anticipated $27,200,000 in federal funds needed to address cost overruns before expending state funds during this fiscal biennium. The legislature assumes that issuing bonds to complete this project as listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2014-1 as developed March 10, 2014, does not require a comprehensive financial plan for a project that completes the state route number 520 corridor to Interstate 5.

(g) The department's 2014 supplemental budget allotment submittal must include a project-specific plan detailing how the department will achieve the mandatory budget savings in (f) of this subsection, including the use of least cost planning or practical design as a means to generate savings, as referenced in subsection (23) of this section. The use of least cost planning or practical design may result in a reduction of project cost, but not a reduction of functional scope. The director of financial management shall notify the transportation committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications under this subsection.

(13) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department must continue to work with the Seattle department of transportation in their joint planning, design, outreach, and operation of the remaining west side elements including, but not limited to, the Montlake lid, the bicycle/pedestrian path, the effective network of transit connections, and the Portage Bay bridge of the SR 520 Bridge Replacement and HOV project.

(14) (($1,062,000)) $514,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation ((is)) and $19,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the 31st Ave SW Overpass Widening and Improvement project (L1100048).

(15) (($25,243,000)) $18,016,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to advance the design, preliminary engineering, and rights-of-way acquisition for the priority projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2014-3 as developed March 10, 2014. Funds must be used to advance the emergent, initial development of these projects for the purpose of expediting delivery of the associated major investments when funding for such investments becomes available. Funding may be reallocated between projects to maximize the accomplishment of design and preliminary engineering work and rights-of-way acquisition, provided that all projects are addressed. It is the intent of the legislature that, while seeking to maximize the outcomes in this section, the department shall provide for continuity of both the state and consulting engineer workforce, while strategically utilizing private sector involvement to ensure consistency with the department's business plan for staffing in the highway construction program in the current fiscal biennium.

(16) If a planned roundabout in the vicinity of state route number 526 and 84th Street SW would divert commercial traffic onto neighborhood streets, the department may not proceed with improvements at state route number 526 and 84th Street SW until the traffic impacts in the vicinity of state route number 526 and 40th Avenue West are addressed.

(17) The legislature finds that there are sixteen companies involved in wood preserving in the state that employ four hundred workers and have an annual payroll of fifteen million dollars. Prior to the department's switch to steel guardrails, ninety percent of the twenty-five hundred mile guardrail system was constructed of preserved wood and one hundred ten thousand wood guardrail posts were produced annually for state use. Moreover, the policy of using steel posts requires the state to use imported steel. Given these findings, where practicable, and until June 30, 2015, the department shall include the design option to use wood guardrail posts, in addition to steel posts, in new guardrail installations. The selection of posts must be consistent with the agency design manual policy that existed before December 2009.

(18) The legislature finds that "right-sizing" is a lean, metric-based approach to determining project investments. This concept entails compromise between project cost and design, incorporating local community needs, desired outcomes, and available funding. Furthermore, the legislature finds that the concepts and principles the department has utilized in the safety analyst program have been effective tools to prioritize projects and reduce project costs. Therefore, the department shall establish a pilot project on the SR 3/Belfair Bypass - New Alignment (300344C) to begin implementing the concept of "right-sizing" in the highway construction program.

(19) For urban corridors that are all or partially within a metropolitan planning organization boundary, for which the department has not initiated environmental review, and that require an environmental impact statement, at least one alternative must be consistent with the goals set out in RCW 47.01.440.

(20) The department shall itemize all future requests for the construction of buildings on a project list and submit them through the transportation executive information system as part of the department's 2014 budget submittal. It is the intent of the legislature that new facility construction must be transparent and not appropriated within larger highway construction projects.

(21) $19,513,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $9,450,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for improvement program support activities (095901X). $18,000,000 of this amount must be held in unallotted status until the office of financial management certifies that the department's 2014 supplemental budget request conforms to the terms of subsection (20) of this section.

(22) Any new advisory group that the department convenes during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium must be representative of the interests of the entire state of Washington.

(23) Practical design offers targeted benefits to a state transportation system within available fiscal resources. This delivers value not just for individual projects, but for the entire system. Applying practical design standards will also preserve and enhance safety and mobility. The department shall implement a practical design strategy for transportation design standards. By June 30, 2015, the department shall report to the governor and the house of representatives and senate transportation committees on where practical design has been applied or is intended to be applied in the department and the cost savings resulting from the use of practical design.

Sec. 1006. 2014 c 222 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PRESERVATION—PROGRAM P

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($34,966,000))

﻿ $26,954,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($13,500,000))

﻿ $13,502,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($59,796,000))

﻿ $51,379,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($595,604,000))

﻿ $549,666,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .(($11,827,000))

﻿ $11,871,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($2,650,000))

﻿ $1,809,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation. . . .(($120,000))

﻿ $1,177,000

High Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($718,463,000))

﻿ $656,558,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2014-1)) 2015-1 as developed ((March 10, 2014)) May 26, 2015, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section ((601 of this act)) 1201, chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1299), Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2014-2)) 2015-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 10, 2014)) May 26, 2015, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). The department shall apply any federal funds gained through efficiencies or the redistribution process in an amount up to $27,200,000 for cost overruns related to the pontoon design errors on the SR 520 Bridge Replacement and HOV project (8BI1003) as described in section 306(12)(f) ((of this act)), chapter 222, Laws of 2014. Any federal funds gained through efficiencies or the redistribution process that are in excess of $27,200,000 must then be applied to the "Contingency (Unfunded) Highway Preservation Projects" as identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2014-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed March 10, 2014, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). However, no additional federal funds may be allocated to the I-5/Columbia River Crossing project (400506A).

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this act.

(4) (($26,610,000)) $25,480,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation((, $51,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation,)) and (($769,000)) $605,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 167/Puyallup River Bridge Replacement project (316725A). This project must be completed as a design-build project. The department must work with local jurisdictions and the community during the environmental review process to develop appropriate esthetic design elements, at no additional cost to the department, and traffic management plans pertaining to this project. The department must report to the transportation committees of the legislature on estimated cost and/or time savings realized as a result of using the design-build process.

(5) The department shall examine the use of electric arc furnace slag for use as an aggregate for new roads and paving projects in high traffic areas and report back to the legislature on its current use in other areas of the country and any characteristics that can provide greater wear resistance and skid resistance in new pavement construction.

Sec. 1007. 2014 c 222 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRAFFIC OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($4,915,000))

﻿ $4,648,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($9,152,000))

﻿ $7,191,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation. . . .$200,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($14,267,000))

﻿ $12,039,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($195,000)) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for project 000005Q as state matching funds for federally selected competitive grants or congressional earmark projects. These moneys must be placed into reserve status until such time as federal funds are secured that require a state match.

Sec. 1008. 2014 c 222 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM W

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($63,825,000))

﻿ $61,877,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($118,444,000))

﻿ $89,152,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($1,312,000))

﻿ $1,187,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($2,588,000))

﻿ $1,544,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($190,031,000))

﻿ $189,255,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$2,813,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($379,013,000))

﻿ $345,828,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2014-2)) 2015-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 10, 2014)) May 26, 2015, Program - Washington State Ferries Capital Program (W).

(2) The Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation includes up to $20,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.843.

(3) (($137,425,000)) $136,957,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation, $2,338,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, and (($300,000)) $768,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the acquisition of two 144-car vessels (((projects)) L2200038 and L2200039). The department shall use as much already procured equipment as practicable on the 144-car vessels.

(4) (($14,728,000)) $8,773,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—federal appropriation, (($4,038,000)) $1,600,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation, and (($1,535,000)) $490,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Mukilteo ferry terminal (((project)) 952515P). To the greatest extent practicable, the department shall seek additional federal funding for this project. Within the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation amount provided in this subsection, the department shall lease to the city in which the project is located a portion of the department's property associated with this project to provide safe, temporary public access from the easterly terminus of First Street to the vicinity of Front Street. The department shall provide the lease at no cost in recognition of the impacts of this project to the city and require appropriate liability and maintenance coverage in the terms of the lease. Public access must be installed and removed at no cost to the state prior to construction of the multimodal terminal project.

(5) (($4,935,000)) $7,000,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for emergency capital repair costs (((project)) 999910K). Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.

(6) Consistent with RCW 47.60.662, which requires the Washington state ferry system to collaborate with passenger-only ferry and transit providers to provide service at existing terminals, the department shall ensure that multimodal access, including for passenger-only ferries and transit service providers, is not precluded by any future modifications at the terminal.

(7) (($4,026,000)) $4,788,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the reservation and communications system projects (L200041 & L200042).

(8) $4,210,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the capital program share of $7,259,000 in lease payments for the ferry division's headquarters building. Consistent with the 2012 facilities oversight plan, the department shall strive to consolidate office space in downtown Seattle by the end of 2015. The department shall consider renewing the lease for the ferry division's current headquarters building only if the lease rate is reduced at least ((fifty)) forty percent and analysis shows that this is the least cost and risk option for the department. Consolidation with other divisions or state agencies, or a reduction in leased space, must also be considered as part of any headquarters lease renewal analysis.

(9) (($23,737,000 of the total appropriation is for preservation work on the Hyak super class vessel (project 944431D), including installation of a power management system and more efficient propulsion systems, that in combination are anticipated to save up to twenty percent in fuel and reduce maintenance costs. Upon completion of this project, the department shall provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature on the fuel and maintenance savings achieved for this vessel and the potential to save additional funds through other vessel conversions.

(10))) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation includes up to $50,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.861.

(((11))) (10) $50,000,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)—state appropriation is provided solely for the acquisition of one 144-car vessel (((project)) L1000063). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1129), Laws of 2014 (ferry vessel replacement) is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in the subsection lapses.

(((12))) (11) If the department pursues a conversion of the existing diesel powered Issaquah class fleet to a different fuel source or engine technology or the construction of a new vessel powered by a fuel source or engine technology that is not diesel powered, the department must use a design-build procurement process.

(((13))) (12) $350,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the issuance of a request for proposals to convert the Issaquah class vessels to use liquefied natural gas and to provide a one-time stipend to the entity awarded the conversion contract. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $100,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is for the department to issue a request for proposals for a design-build contract consistent with RCW 47.20.780 to convert six Issaquah class vessels to be powered by liquefied natural gas. Consistent with RCW 47.56.030(2)(c), the legislature finds that the performance needs of the department in converting to liquefied natural gas are for engines with the lowest life-cycle costs, and the department must weigh this criteria as a priority when evaluating the proposals. To encourage cost saving ideas, the department shall limit prescribing design elements in the proposal to those approved or required by the United States coast guard in the liquefied natural gas waterways suitability assessment or those otherwise essential to provide clear direction to bidders. The request for proposals must include a process for evaluating proposals that may include alternative financing arrangements that are in compliance with state private financing law. When evaluating the financial merits of any liquefied natural gas conversion request for proposals, the department shall give consideration to the inability of the state to fund a liquefied natural gas conversion using currently available public resources. The department shall issue the request for proposals within forty-five days of rejecting the liquefied natural gas request for proposals issued under section 308(11), chapter 86, Laws of 2012 or receiving final findings from the United States coast guard on the liquefied natural gas waterways suitability assessment, whichever is later.

(b) $250,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is for the entity awarded the contract pursuant to this subsection.

Sec. 1009. 2014 c 222 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—CAPITAL

Essential Rail Assistance Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($1,020,000))

﻿ $899,000

Transportation Infrastructure Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($9,190,000))

﻿ $7,369,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($44,085,000))

﻿ $40,395,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($430,193,000))

﻿ $388,418,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local﻿

Appropriation. . . .$409,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($484,897,000))

﻿ $437,490,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2014-2)) 2015-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 10, 2014)) May 26, 2015, Program - Rail Program (Y).

(b) Within the amounts provided in this section, $7,669,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation is for low-interest loans through the freight rail investment bank program identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in (a) of this subsection. The department shall issue freight rail investment bank program loans with a repayment period of no more than ten years, and only so much interest as is necessary to recoup the department's costs to administer the loans.

(c) Within the amounts provided in this section, $2,440,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, $1,250,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation, and $311,000 of the essential rail assistance account—state appropriation are for statewide emergent freight rail assistance projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in (a) of this subsection.

(2) Unsuccessful 2012 freight rail assistance program grant applicants may be awarded freight rail investment bank program loans, if eligible. The department shall issue a call for projects for the freight rail investment bank loan program and the freight rail assistance grant program, and shall evaluate the applications in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 309, chapter 367, Laws of 2011. By November 1, 2014, the department shall submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(3) (($424,400,000)) $382,625,000 of the multimodal transportation account—federal appropriation and (($10,658,000)) $10,084,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for expenditures related to passenger high-speed rail grants. Except for the Mount Vernon project (P01101A), the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation funds reflect one and one-half percent of the total project funds, and are provided solely for expenditures that are not eligible for federal reimbursement. ((Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $31,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the purchase of two new train sets for the state-supported intercity passenger rail service. The department must apply for any federal waivers required to purchase the new train sets, as allowable under existing competitive bidding practices, and seek federal funds in addition to those available from the high-speed rail grants.))

(4) As allowable under federal rail authority rules and existing competitive bidding practices, when purchasing new train sets, the department shall give preference to bidders that propose train sets with characteristics and maintenance requirements most similar to those currently owned by the department.

(5) The department shall provide quarterly reports to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature regarding applications that the department submits for federal funds and the status of such applications.

(6)(a) $709,000 of the essential rail assistance account—state appropriation, $241,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation, and $1,893,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of rehabilitation and maintenance of the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad line (project F01111B). The department shall complete an evaluation and assessment of future maintenance needs on the line to ensure appropriate levels of state investment.

(b) Expenditures from the essential rail assistance account—state appropriation in this section may not exceed the combined total of:

(i) Revenues deposited into the essential rail assistance account from leases and sale of property pursuant to RCW 47.76.290; and

(ii) Revenues transferred from the miscellaneous program account to the essential rail assistance account, pursuant to RCW 47.76.360, for the purpose of sustaining the grain train program by maintaining the Palouse river and Coulee City railroad line.

(((7)))

Sec. 1010. 2014 c 222 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—CAPITAL

((Highway Infrastructure Account—State Appropriation. . . .$207,000))

Highway Infrastructure Account—Federal﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($1,602,000))

﻿ $1,400,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($9,236,000))

﻿ $7,912,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($8,915,000))

﻿ $5,700,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .$2,201,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation. . . .(($34,581,000))

﻿ $23,141,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($18,740,000))

﻿ $11,419,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($75,482,000))

﻿ $51,773,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2014-2)) 2015-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((March 10, 2014)) May 26, 2015, Program - Local Programs Program (Z).

(2) With each department budget submittal, the department shall provide an update on the status of the repayment of the twenty million dollars of unobligated federal funds authority advanced by the department in September 2010 to the city of Tacoma for the Murray Morgan/11th Street bridge project. The department may negotiate with the city of Tacoma an agreement for repayment of the funds over a period of up to twenty-five years at terms agreed upon by the department and the city. The funds previously advanced by the department to the city are not to be considered a general obligation of the city but instead an obligation payable from identified revenues set aside for the repayment of the funds.

(3) The amounts identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced under subsection (1) of this section for pedestrian safety/safe routes to school are as follows:

(a) (($16,543,000)) $9,600,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, (($8,724,000)) $7,400,000 of the transportation partnership account—state appropriation, and (($62,000)) $60,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects.

(b) (($11,700,000)) $6,200,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and (($6,750,000)) $3,900,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation are provided solely for newly selected safe routes to school projects, and (($6,503,000)) $5,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation and (($2,165,000)) $1,800,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation are reappropriated for safe routes to school projects selected in the previous biennia. The amount provided for new projects is consistent with federal funding levels from the 2011-2013 omnibus transportation appropriations act and the intent of the fee increases in chapter 74, Laws of 2012 and chapter 80, Laws of 2012.

(4) The department may enter into contracts and make expenditures for projects on behalf of and selected by the freight mobility strategic investment board from the amounts provided in section 301 ((of this act)), chapter 306, Laws of 2013 and section 301, chapter 222, Laws of 2014.

(5) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2013, and December 1, 2014, on the status of projects funded as part of the pedestrian safety/safe routes to school grant program (0LP600P). The report must include, but is not limited to, a list of projects selected and a brief description of each project's status.

(6) $50,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the installation of a guard rail on Deer Harbor Road in San Juan county (L2220054).

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

Sec. 1101. 2014 c 222 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$3,099,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($187,000))

﻿ $229,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($3,866,000))

﻿ $866,000

Highway Bond Retirement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .(($1,086,801,000))

﻿ $1,068,801,000

Ferry Bond Retirement Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($31,824,000))

﻿ $30,824,000

Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement﻿

Account—State Appropriation. . . .$16,268,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—﻿

State Appropriation. . . .$25,825,000

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$52,050,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$682,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,220,602,000))

﻿ $1,198,644,000

Sec. 1102. 2014 c 222 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Transportation Partnership Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$588,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation. . . .(($32,000))

﻿ $43,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$531,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State﻿

Appropriation. . . .$123,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,274,000))

﻿ $1,285,000

Sec. 1103. 2014 c 222 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For

motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities

and counties. . . .(($478,598,000))

﻿ $480,931,994

Sec. 1104. 2014 c 222 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For

motor vehicle fuel tax refunds and statutory

transfers. . . .(($1,242,728,000))

﻿ $1,248,403,000

Sec. 1105. 2014 c 222 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For motor vehicle fuel tax refunds

and transfers. . . .(($138,494,000))

﻿ $137,953,014

Sec. 1106. 2014 c 222 s 407 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS

(1) Recreational Vehicle Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle﻿

Account—State. . . .$1,300,000

(2) Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound﻿

Ferry Operations Account—State. . . .$13,000,000

(3) Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Multimodal﻿

Transportation Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

(4) ((Motor Vehicle Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Special Category C﻿

Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

(5) Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Transportation﻿

2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State. . . .$7,571,000

(6))) Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Public﻿

Transportation Grant Program Account—State. . . .$26,000,000

(((7))) (5) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:﻿

For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations﻿

Account—State. . . .$28,000,000

(((8))) (6) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:﻿

For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction﻿

Account—State. . . .$28,000,000

(((9))) (7) State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties﻿

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the﻿

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State. . . .$886,000

(((10))) (8) Multimodal Transportation Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Highway Safety﻿

Account—State. . . .$14,000,000

(((11))) (9) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:﻿

For transfer to the State Patrol Highway﻿

Account—State. . . .$27,000,000

(((12))) (10) Highway Safety Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry﻿

Operations Account—State. . . .$42,000,000

(((13))) (11) Advanced Environmental Mitigation Revolving﻿

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the﻿

Motor Vehicle Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

(((14))) (12) Advanced Right-of-Way Revolving Fund—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle﻿

Account—State. . . .$6,000,000

(((15))) (13) Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle﻿

Account—State. . . .$950,000

(((16))) (14) License Plate Technology Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Highway Safety﻿

Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

(((17))) (15) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:﻿

For transfer to the Transportation Equipment﻿

Fund—State. . . .$3,915,000

(((18)(a) Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to Transportation 2003﻿

Account (Nickel Account)—State. . . .$11,128,000

(b) If chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1129), Laws of 2014 (ferry vessel replacement) is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount transferred in (a) of this subsection lapses.﻿

(19))) (16) Motor Vehicle Account—State﻿

Appropriation: For transfer to the Interstate 405﻿

Express Toll Lanes Operations Account—State. . . .$2,019,000

IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONS

Sec. 1201. 2014 c 222 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FUND TRANSFERS

(1) The transportation 2003 projects or improvements and the 2005 transportation partnership projects or improvements are listed in the LEAP list titled ((2014-1)) 2015-1 as developed ((March 10, 2014)) May 26, 2015, which consists of a list of specific projects by fund source and amount over a ten-year period. Current fiscal biennium funding for each project is a line-item appropriation, while the outer year funding allocations represent a ten-year plan. The department is expected to use the flexibility provided in this section to assist in the delivery and completion of all transportation partnership account and transportation 2003 account (nickel account) projects on the LEAP transportation documents referenced in this act. However, this section does not apply to the I-5/Columbia River Crossing project (400506A). For the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 project appropriations, unless otherwise provided in this act, the director of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority between projects funded with transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriations, or transportation partnership account appropriations, in order to manage project spending and efficiently deliver all projects in the respective program under the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Transfers may only be made within each specific fund source referenced on the respective project list;

(b) Transfers from a project may not be made as a result of the reduction of the scope of a project or be made to support increases in the scope of a project;

(c) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the director of financial management finds that any resulting change will not hinder the completion of the projects as approved by the legislature. Until the legislature reconvenes to consider the 2014 supplemental omnibus transportation appropriations act, any unexpended 2011-2013 appropriation balance as approved by the office of financial management, in consultation with the legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees, may be considered when transferring funds between projects;

(d) Transfers from a project may be made if the funds appropriated to the project are in excess of the amount needed to complete the project;

(e) Transfers may not occur for projects not identified on the applicable project list;

(f) Transfers may not be made while the legislature is in session; and

(g) Transfers between projects may be made, without the approval of the director of the office of financial management, by the department of transportation until the transfer amount by project exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or ten percent of the total project, whichever is less. These transfers must be reported quarterly to the director of financial management and the chairs of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees.

(2) At the time the department submits a request to transfer funds under this section, a copy of the request must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature.

(3) The office of financial management shall work with legislative staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees to review the requested transfers in a timely manner.

(4) The office of financial management shall document approved transfers and schedule changes in the transportation executive information system, compare changes to the legislative baseline funding and schedules identified by project identification number identified in the LEAP transportation documents referenced in this act, and transmit revised project lists to chairs of the transportation committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1202. A new section is added to 2013 c 306 (uncodified) to read as follows:

The appropriations to the department of transportation in chapter 222, Laws of 2014 and this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2015, unless specifically prohibited, the department may transfer state appropriations for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium among operating programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are provided solely for a specific purpose. The department shall not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds and not federal funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate transportation committees of the legislature no fewer than ten business days before approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this section. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by program and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1301. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1302. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---