BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 52.16.030 and 1989 c 63 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Annually after the county board or boards of equalization of the county or counties in which the district is located have equalized the assessments for general tax purposes in that year, the secretary of the district shall prepare and certify a budget of the requirements of each district fund, and deliver it to the county legislative authority or authorities of the county or counties in which the district is located in ample time for the tax levies to be made for district purposes.

(2) In lieu of adopting an annual budget, a fire protection district may adopt a biennial budget with a mid-biennium review and modification for the second year of the biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 52.26 RCW to read as follows:

A regional fire protection service authority may, in lieu of adopting an annual budget, adopt a biennial budget with a mid-biennium review and modification for the second year of the biennium.

--- END ---