BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.17.200 and 2005 c 36 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all state agencies, including all state departments, boards, councils, commissions, and quasi-public corporations, shall allocate, as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original construction of any public building, an amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state arts commission for the acquisition of works of art. The works of art may be placed on public lands, integral to or attached to a public building or structure, detached within or outside a public building or structure, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public facilities. In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of one percent of the appropriation as provided herein shall be used to provide for the administration of the visual arts program, including conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation of the works of art. For the purpose of this section, "building" shall not include highway construction sheds, warehouses, or other buildings of a temporary nature.

(2) Funds appropriated to a state transportation agency may not be expended to acquire works of art. State funds provided to other state agencies or local authorities by grants, contracts, or other means for transportation projects may not be expended to acquire works of art.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 47.08 RCW to read as follows:

Funds appropriated to a state transportation agency may not be expended with respect to transportation projects on decorative finishes or designs that are not integral to the function of a transportation structure. Structures to which this provision applies include, but are not limited to, noise walls, retaining walls, and bridges.

--- END ---