BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 3.66.020 and 2008 c 227 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If the value of the claim of each claimant or the amount at issue does not exceed ((seventy-five))one hundred thousand dollars, exclusive of interest, costs, and attorneys' fees, the district court shall have jurisdiction and cognizance of the following civil actions and proceedings:

(1) Actions arising on contract for the recovery of money;

(2) Actions for damages for injuries to the person, or for taking or detaining personal property, or for injuring personal property, or for an injury to real property when no issue raised by the answer involves the plaintiff's title to or possession of the same and actions to recover the possession of personal property;

(3) Actions for a penalty;

(4) Actions upon a bond conditioned for the payment of money, when the amount claimed does not exceed fifty thousand dollars, though the penalty of the bond exceeds that sum, the judgment to be given for the sum actually due, not exceeding the amount claimed in the complaint;

(5) Actions on an undertaking or surety bond taken by the court;

(6) Actions for damages for fraud in the sale, purchase, or exchange of personal property;

(7) Proceedings to take and enter judgment on confession of a defendant;

(8) Proceedings to issue writs of attachment, garnishment and replevin upon goods, chattels, moneys, and effects;

(9) Actions arising under the provisions of chapter 19.190 RCW;

(10) Proceedings to civilly enforce any money judgment entered in any municipal court or municipal department of a district court organized under the laws of this state; and

(11) All other actions and proceedings of which jurisdiction is specially conferred by statute, when the title to, or right of possession of, real property is not involved.

--- END ---