BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.56.020 and 2014 c 13 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county treasurer must be the receiver and collector of all taxes extended upon the tax rolls of the county, whether levied for state, county, school, bridge, road, municipal or other purposes, and also of all fines, forfeitures or penalties received by any person or officer for the use of his or her county. No treasurer may accept tax payments or issue receipts for the same until the treasurer has completed the tax roll for the current year's collection and provided notification of the completion of the roll. Notification may be accomplished electronically, by posting a notice in the office, or through other written communication as determined by the treasurer. All taxes upon real and personal property made payable by the provisions of this title are due and payable to the treasurer on or before the thirtieth day of April and, except as provided in this section, shall be delinquent after that date.

(2) Each tax statement must include a notice that checks for payment of taxes may be made payable to "Treasurer of . . . . . . County" or other appropriate office, but tax statements may not include any suggestion that checks may be made payable to the name of the individual holding the office of treasurer nor any other individual.

(3) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on personal property or on any lot, block or tract of real property payable by one person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax be paid on or before the thirtieth day of April, the remainder of such tax is due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October following and shall be delinquent after that date.

(4) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on any lot, block or tract of real property or on any mobile home payable by one person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax be paid after the thirtieth day of April but before the thirty-first day of October, together with the applicable interest and penalty on the full amount of tax payable for that year, the remainder of such tax is due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October following and is delinquent after that date.

(5) ((Except as provided in (c) of this subsection,))Delinquent taxes under this section are subject to interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum computed on a monthly basis on the amount of tax delinquent from the date of delinquency until paid. Interest must be calculated at the rate in effect at the time of payment of the tax, regardless of when the taxes were first delinquent. ((In addition, delinquent taxes under this section are subject to penalties as follows:

(a) A penalty of three percent of the amount of tax delinquent is assessed on the tax delinquent on June 1st of the year in which the tax is due.

(b) An additional penalty of eight percent is assessed on the amount of tax delinquent on December 1st of the year in which the tax is due.

(c) If a taxpayer is successfully participating in a payment agreement under subsection (11)(b) of this section, the county treasurer may not assess additional penalties on delinquent taxes that are included within the payment agreement. Interest and penalties that have been assessed prior to the payment agreement remain due and payable as provided in the payment agreement.))

(6)(a) When real property taxes become delinquent and prior to the filing of the certificate of delinquency, the treasurer is authorized to assess and collect tax foreclosure avoidance costs.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "tax foreclosure avoidance costs" means those costs that can be identified specifically with the administration of properties subject to and prior to foreclosure. Tax foreclosure avoidance costs include:

(i) Compensation of employees for the time devoted and identified specifically to administering the avoidance of property foreclosure; and

(ii) The cost of materials, services, or equipment acquired, consumed, or expended specifically for the purpose of administering tax foreclosure avoidance prior to the filing of a certificate of delinquency.

(c) When tax foreclosure avoidance costs are collected, the tax foreclosure avoidance costs must be credited to the county treasurer service fund account, except as otherwise directed.

(d) For purposes of chapter 84.64 RCW, any taxes((, interest, or penalties))and interest deemed delinquent under this section remain delinquent until such time as all taxes((, interest, and penalties))and interest for the tax year in which the taxes were first due and payable have been paid in full.

(7) Subsection (5) of this section notwithstanding, no interest ((or penalties)) may be assessed during any period of armed conflict on delinquent taxes imposed on the personal residences owned by active duty military personnel who are participating as part of one of the branches of the military involved in the conflict and assigned to a duty station outside the territorial boundaries of the United States.

(8) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the county treasurer, on his or her own motion or at the request of any taxpayer affected by the emergency, may grant extensions of the due date of any taxes payable under this section as the treasurer deems proper.

(9) ((For purposes of this chapter, "interest" means both interest and penalties.

(10))) All collections of interest on delinquent taxes must be credited to the county current expense fund; but the cost of foreclosure and sale of real property, and the fees and costs of distraint and sale of personal property, for delinquent taxes, must, when collected, be credited to the operation and maintenance fund of the county treasurer prosecuting the foreclosure or distraint or sale; and must be used by the county treasurer as a revolving fund to defray the cost of further foreclosure, distraint and sale for delinquent taxes without regard to budget limitations.

(((11)))(10)(a) For purposes of this chapter, and in accordance with this section and RCW 36.29.190, the treasurer may collect taxes, assessments, fees, rates, interest, and charges by electronic bill presentment and payment. Electronic bill presentment and payment may be utilized as an option by the taxpayer, but the treasurer may not require the use of electronic bill presentment and payment. Electronic bill presentment and payment may be on a monthly or other periodic basis as the treasurer deems proper for delinquent tax year payments only or for prepayments of current tax. All prepayments must be paid in full by the due date specified in (c) of this subsection. Payments on past due taxes must include collection of the oldest delinquent year, which includes interest and taxes within a twelve-month period, prior to filing a certificate of delinquency under chapter 84.64 RCW or distraint pursuant to RCW 84.56.070.

(b) The treasurer must provide, by electronic means or otherwise, a payment agreement that provides for payment of current year taxes, inclusive of prepayment collection charges. The treasurer may provide, by electronic means or otherwise, a payment agreement for payment of past due delinquencies, which must also require current year taxes to be paid timely. The payment agreement must be signed by the taxpayer and treasurer prior to the sending of an electronic or alternative bill, which includes a payment plan for current year taxes. The treasurer may accept partial payment of current and delinquent taxes including interest ((and penalties)) using electronic bill presentment and payments.

(c) All taxes upon real and personal property made payable by the provisions of this title are due and payable to the treasurer on or before the thirtieth day of April and are delinquent after that date. The remainder of the tax is due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October following and is delinquent after that date. All other assessments, fees, rates, and charges are delinquent after the due date.

(d) A county treasurer may authorize payment of past due property taxes((, penalties,)) and interest under this chapter by electronic funds transfer payments on a monthly basis. Delinquent taxes are subject to interest ((and penalties)), as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

(e) The treasurer must pay any collection costs, investment earnings, or both on past due payments or prepayments to the credit of a county treasurer service fund account to be created and used only for the payment of expenses incurred by the treasurer, without limitation, in administering the system for collecting prepayments.

(((12)))(11) For purposes of this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Electronic bill presentment and payment" means statements, invoices, or bills that are created, delivered, and paid using the internet. The term includes an automatic electronic payment from a person's checking account, debit account, or credit card.

(b) "Internet" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 19.270.010.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.56.025 and 2014 c 13 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The interest ((and penalties)) for delinquencies on property taxes must be waived by the county treasurer if the notice for these taxes due, as provided in RCW 84.56.050, was not sent to a taxpayer due to error by the county. Where waiver of interest ((and penalties)) has occurred, the full amount of interest and penalties must be reinstated if the taxpayer fails to pay the delinquent taxes within thirty days of receiving notice that the taxes are due. Each county treasurer must, subject to guidelines prepared by the department of revenue, establish administrative procedures to determine if taxpayers are eligible for this waiver.

(2) In addition to the waiver under subsection (1) of this section, the interest and penalties for delinquencies on property taxes must be waived by the county treasurer under the following circumstances:

(a) The taxpayer fails to make one payment under RCW 84.56.020 by the due date on the taxpayer's personal residence because of hardship caused by the death of the taxpayer's spouse if the taxpayer notifies the county treasurer of the hardship within sixty days of the tax due date; or

(b) The taxpayer fails to make one payment under RCW 84.56.020 by the due date on the taxpayer's parent's or stepparent's personal residence because of hardship caused by the death of the taxpayer's parent or stepparent if the taxpayer notifies the county treasurer of the hardship within sixty days of the tax due date.

(3) In addition to the waivers under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the county treasurer, at his or her discretion, may waive interest and penalties for delinquencies on property taxes where the taxpayer paid an erroneous amount due to apparent taxpayer error and the taxpayer pays the delinquent taxes within thirty days of receiving notice that the taxes are due.

(4) Before allowing a hardship waiver under subsection (2) of this section, the county treasurer may require a copy of the death certificate along with an affidavit signed by the taxpayer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act applies to taxes levies for collection in 2016 and thereafter.

--- END ---