BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 69.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, or an osteopathic physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW may prescribe, administer, or dispense long-term antibiotic therapy to a patient who has been diagnosed with Lyme disease. The long-term antibiotic therapy must be for a therapeutic purpose that eliminates infections or controls the patient's symptoms related to his or her diagnosis with Lyme disease.

(2) A health care provider acting in compliance with subsection (1) of this section is not subject to professional disciplinary action under chapter 18.130 RCW based solely upon the health care provider's prescribing, administering, or dispensing of long-term antibiotic therapy to a patient who has been diagnosed with Lyme disease.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the term "long-term antibiotic therapy" means the administration of oral, intramuscular, or intravenous antibiotics, singly or in combination, for periods of time in excess of four weeks.

--- END ---