BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall provide crisis intervention training to every new full-time law enforcement officer employed after July 1, 2017, by a state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency. The training shall consist of not less than eight hours and shall be incorporated into the basic training academy as provided in RCW 43.101.200.

(2) The commission must ensure that:

(a) All full-time law enforcement officers who are certified after July 1, 2017, complete a two-hour online crisis intervention course that is incorporated into the annual training required by the commission for all certified officers.

(b) Each full-time law enforcement officer certified before July 1, 2017, and employed by a state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency receives crisis intervention training by July 1, 2019. The training shall consist of not less than eight hours and shall be substantially similar in hours and content to the training offered through the basic training academy. Each attendee of the program shall be required to obtain written proof of completion of the program as provided by rules of the commission.

(3) The commission shall aim for at least twenty-five percent of all currently certified law enforcement officers assigned to patrol duties to have received enhanced crisis intervention training by December 1, 2019. The training shall be comprised of forty hours of commission-certified training. Any appropriated funds shall be used to train personnel who will implement the training on a geographically diverse basis.

(4) By July 1, 2017, the commission shall establish by rule:

(a) A program and standards to certify organizations, other than the commission, that may provide crisis intervention training as required under this section. Certified organizations must use a commission-certified training or curriculum to facilitate the training. The commission shall consider geographic training needs when considering programs and standards. The commission shall provide grants to law enforcement agencies with fewer than three hundred commissioned officers to assist with costs of sending officers to crisis intervention training;

(b) Standards for successful completion of the annual two hours of crisis intervention training as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The standards shall include, at a minimum, the requirement of successful completion of a written exam.

(5) For the purposes of this section, "crisis intervention training" means training designed to provide tools and resources to law enforcement officers in order to respond effectively to individuals who may be experiencing an emotional, mental, physical, behavioral, or chemical dependency crisis, distress, or problem and that are designed to increase the safety of both law enforcement and individuals in crisis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2015, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act may be known and cited as the Douglas M. Ostling act.

--- END ---