BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.04.071 and 1971 c 81 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

At the next general election, and at each biennial general election thereafter, there shall be elected three justices of the supreme court, one from each of the three supreme court judicial districts, to hold for the full term of six years, and until their successors are elected and qualified, commencing with the second Monday in January succeeding their election.

Sec. 2. RCW 2.04.100 and 1971 c 81 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

If a vacancy occurs in the office of a justice of the supreme court, the governor shall appoint a person who is a resident of the supreme court judicial district for which the vacancy occurs to hold the office until the election and qualification of a justice to fill the vacancy, which election shall take place at the next succeeding general election, and the justice so elected shall hold the office for the remainder of the unexpired term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 2.04 RCW to read as follows:

Prior to January 1, 2017, the secretary of state, in cooperation with the chief justice, shall assign by lot each supreme court judicial position to be filled in November 2018 to a judicial district, and in a similar manner shall also assign by lot each judicial position to be filled in November 2020 and in November 2022 to a supreme court judicial district, so that one justice from each supreme court judicial district is elected at each biennial general election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 and 2 of this act take effect January 1, 2018, if the proposed amendment to Article IV, section 3 of the state Constitution providing for the election of supreme court justices from judicial districts is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the votes at the next general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---