BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.445 and 2013 c 3 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful to open a package containing marijuana, useable marijuana, ((or a)) marijuana-infused products, or marijuana concentrate, or consume marijuana, useable marijuana, ((or a)) marijuana-infused products, or marijuana concentrate, in ((view of the general))a public place.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "public place" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 66.04.010.

(3) A person who violates this section is guilty of a class 3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW.

--- END ---