BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not prohibit a student from practicing pharmacy if:

(a) The student is enrolled in a college or school of pharmacy accredited by the commission and is registered as a pharmacy intern under RCW 18.64.080;

(b) The student performs services without compensation or the expectation of compensation as part of a volunteer activity;

(c) The student is under the direct supervision and control of a pharmacist licensed under this chapter, a physician licensed under chapter 18.71RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, or a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;

(d) The services the student performs are within the scope of practice of: (i) A pharmacist licensed under this chapter; and (ii) the person supervising the student;

(e) The student, supervisor, and organization for which the student is volunteering enter into a written agreement defining the time frame for the volunteer activity and the specific tasks the student is permitted to perform; and

(f) The college or school in which the student is enrolled verifies in writing that the student has demonstrated competency through his or her education and training to perform the tasks defined in the written agreement.

(2) The commission may adopt rules to implement the requirements of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.57.040 and 1991 c 160 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit:

(1) Service in the case of emergency;

(2) The domestic administration of family remedies;

(3) The practice of midwifery as permitted under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(4) The practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery by any commissioned medical officer in the United States government or military service or by any osteopathic physician and surgeon employed by a federal agency, in the discharge of his or her official duties;

(5) Practice by a dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW when engaged exclusively in the practice of dentistry;

(6) Practice by any osteopathic physician and surgeon from any other state or territory in which he or she resides: PROVIDED, That such practitioner shall not open an office or appoint a place of meeting patients or receive calls within the limits of this state;

(7) Practice by a person who is a student enrolled in an accredited school of osteopathic medicine and surgery approved by the board((: PROVIDED, That))if:

(a) The performance of such services ((be))is only pursuant to a course of instruction or assignments from his or her instructor or school, and such services are performed only under the supervision of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter or chapter 18.71 RCW; or

(b)(i) Such services are performed without compensation or expectation of compensation as part of a volunteer activity;

(ii) The student is under the direct supervision and control of a pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW, a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, or a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;

(iii) The services the student performs are within the scope of practice of: (A) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter; and (B) the person supervising the student;

(iv) The student, supervisor, and organization for which the student is volunteering enter into a written agreement defining the time frame for the volunteer activity and the specific tasks the student is permitted to perform; and

(v) The school in which the student is enrolled verifies in writing that the student has demonstrated competency through his or her education and training to perform the tasks defined in the written agreement;

(8) Practice by an osteopathic physician and surgeon serving a period of clinical postgraduate medical training in a postgraduate program approved by the board: PROVIDED, That the performance of such services be only pursuant to a course of instruction in said program, and said services are performed only under the supervision and control of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter or chapter 18.71 RCW; or

(9) Practice by a person who is enrolled in a physician assistant program approved by the board who is performing such services only pursuant to a course of instruction in said program: PROVIDED, That such services are performed only under the supervision and control of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter or chapter 18.71 RCW.

This chapter shall not be construed to apply in any manner to any other system or method of treating the sick or afflicted or to apply to or interfere in any way with the practice of religion or any kind of treatment by prayer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 18.57 RCW to read as follows:

The board may adopt rules to implement the requirements of RCW 18.57.040(7).

Sec. 4. RCW 18.71.030 and 1996 c 178 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to or interfere in any way with the practice of religion or any kind of treatment by prayer; nor shall anything in this chapter be construed to prohibit:

(1) The furnishing of medical assistance in cases of emergency requiring immediate attention;

(2) The domestic administration of family remedies;

(3) The administration of oral medication of any nature to students by public school district employees or private elementary or secondary school employees as provided for in chapter 28A.210 RCW;

(4) The practice of dentistry, osteopathic medicine and surgery, nursing, chiropractic, podiatric medicine and surgery, optometry, naturopathy, or any other healing art licensed under the methods or means permitted by such license;

(5) The practice of medicine in this state by any commissioned medical officer serving in the armed forces of the United States or public health service or any medical officer on duty with the United States veterans administration while such medical officer is engaged in the performance of the duties prescribed for him or her by the laws and regulations of the United States;

(6) The practice of medicine by any practitioner licensed by another state or territory in which he or she resides, provided that such practitioner shall not open an office or appoint a place of meeting patients or receiving calls within this state;

(7) The practice of medicine by a person who is a regular student in a school of medicine approved and accredited by the commission((, however,))if:

(a) The performance of such services ((be))is only pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments from his or her instructor((,)); or ((that))

(b) Such services are performed only under the supervision and control of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter; or

(c)(i) Such services are performed without compensation or expectation of compensation as part of a volunteer activity;

(ii) The student is under the direct supervision and control of a pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, or a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;

(iii) The services the student performs are within the scope of practice of: (A) A physician licensed under this chapter; and (B) the person supervising the student;

(iv) The student, supervisor, and organization for which the student is volunteering enter into a written agreement defining the time frame for the volunteer activity and the specific tasks the student is permitted to perform; and

(v) The school in which the student is enrolled verifies in writing that the student has demonstrated competency through his or her education and training to perform the tasks defined in the written agreement;

(8) The practice of medicine by a person serving a period of postgraduate medical training in a program of clinical medical training sponsored by a college or university in this state or by a hospital accredited in this state, however, the performance of such services shall be only pursuant to his or her duties as a trainee;

(9) The practice of medicine by a person who is regularly enrolled in a physician assistant program approved by the commission, however, the performance of such services shall be only pursuant to a regular course of instruction in said program and such services are performed only under the supervision and control of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter;

(10) The practice of medicine by a licensed physician assistant which practice is performed under the supervision and control of a physician licensed pursuant to this chapter;

(11) The practice of medicine, in any part of this state which shares a common border with Canada and which is surrounded on three sides by water, by a physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery in Canada or any province or territory thereof;

(12) The administration of nondental anesthesia by a dentist who has completed a residency in anesthesiology at a school of medicine approved by the commission, however, a dentist allowed to administer nondental anesthesia shall do so only under authorization of the patient's attending surgeon, obstetrician, or psychiatrist, and the commission has jurisdiction to discipline a dentist practicing under this exemption and enjoin or suspend such dentist from the practice of nondental anesthesia according to this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW;

(13) Emergency lifesaving service rendered by a physician's trained emergency medical service intermediate life support technician and paramedic, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, if the emergency lifesaving service is rendered under the responsible supervision and control of a licensed physician;

(14) The provision of clean, intermittent bladder catheterization for students by public school district employees or private school employees as provided for in RCW 18.79.290 and 28A.210.280.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:

The commission may adopt rules to implement the requirements of RCW 18.71.030(7).

Sec. 6. RCW 18.79.240 and 2005 c 28 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the context of the definition of registered nursing practice and advanced registered nursing practice, this chapter shall not be construed as:

(a) Prohibiting the incidental care of the sick by domestic servants or persons primarily employed as housekeepers, so long as they do not practice registered nursing within the meaning of this chapter;

(b) Preventing a person from the domestic administration of family remedies or the furnishing of nursing assistance in case of emergency;

(c) Prohibiting the practice of nursing by students enrolled in approved schools as may be incidental to their course of study or prohibiting the students from working as nursing technicians;

(d) Prohibiting the practice of registered nursing or advanced registered nursing by a student enrolled in an approved school if:

(i) The student performs services without compensation or expectation of compensation as part of a volunteer activity;

(ii) The student is under the direct supervision and control of a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under this chapter, a pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, or a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;

(iii) The services the student performs are within the scope of practice of: (A) The nursing profession for which the student is receiving training; and (B) the person supervising the student;

(iv) The student, supervisor, and organization for which the student is volunteering enter into a written agreement defining the time frame for the volunteer activity and the specific tasks the student is permitted to perform; and

(v) The school in which the student is enrolled verifies in writing that the student has demonstrated competency through his or her education and training to perform the tasks defined in the written agreement;

(e) Prohibiting auxiliary services provided by persons carrying out duties necessary for the support of nursing services, including those duties that involve minor nursing services for persons performed in hospitals, nursing homes, or elsewhere under the direction of licensed physicians or the supervision of licensed registered nurses;

(((e)))(f) Prohibiting the practice of nursing in this state by a legally qualified nurse of another state or territory whose engagement requires him or her to accompany and care for a patient temporarily residing in this state during the period of one such engagement, not to exceed six months in length, if the person does not represent or hold himself or herself out as a registered nurse licensed to practice in this state;

(((f)))(g) Prohibiting nursing or care of the sick, with or without compensation, when done in connection with the practice of the religious tenets of a church by adherents of the church so long as they do not engage in the practice of nursing as defined in this chapter;

(((g)))(h) Prohibiting the practice of a legally qualified nurse of another state who is employed by the United States government or a bureau, division, or agency thereof, while in the discharge of his or her official duties;

(((h)))(i) Permitting the measurement of the powers or range of human vision, or the determination of the accommodation and refractive state of the human eye or the scope of its functions in general, or the fitting or adaptation of lenses for the aid thereof;

(((i)))(j) Permitting the prescribing or directing the use of, or using, an optical device in connection with ocular exercises, visual training, vision training, or orthoptics;

(((j)))(k) Permitting the prescribing of contact lenses for, or the fitting and adaptation of contact lenses to, the human eye;

(((k)))(l) Prohibiting the performance of routine visual screening;

(((l)))(m) Permitting the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene as defined in chapters 18.32 and 18.29 RCW, respectively;

(((m)))(n) Permitting the practice of chiropractic as defined in chapter 18.25 RCW including the adjustment or manipulation of the articulation of the spine;

(((n)))(o) Permitting the practice of podiatric medicine and surgery as defined in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(((o)))(p) Permitting the performance of major surgery, except such minor surgery as the commission may have specifically authorized by rule adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW;

(((p)))(q) Permitting the prescribing of controlled substances as defined in Schedule I of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW;

(((q)))(r) Prohibiting the determination and pronouncement of death;

(((r)))(s) Prohibiting advanced registered nurse practitioners, approved by the commission as certified registered nurse anesthetists from selecting, ordering, or administering controlled substances as defined in Schedules II through IV of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW, consistent with their commission-recognized scope of practice; subject to facility-specific protocols, and subject to a request for certified registered nurse anesthetist anesthesia services issued by a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, a dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW, or a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW; the authority to select, order, or administer Schedule II through IV controlled substances being limited to those drugs that are to be directly administered to patients who require anesthesia for diagnostic, operative, obstetrical, or therapeutic procedures in a hospital, clinic, ambulatory surgical facility, or the office of a practitioner licensed under chapter 18.71, 18.22, 18.36, 18.36A, 18.57, 18.57A, or 18.32 RCW; "select" meaning the decision-making process of choosing a drug, dosage, route, and time of administration; and "order" meaning the process of directing licensed individuals pursuant to their statutory authority to directly administer a drug or to dispense, deliver, or distribute a drug for the purpose of direct administration to a patient, under instructions of the certified registered nurse anesthetist. "Protocol" means a statement regarding practice and documentation concerning such items as categories of patients, categories of medications, or categories of procedures rather than detailed case-specific formulas for the practice of nurse anesthesia;

(((s)))(t) Prohibiting advanced registered nurse practitioners from ordering or prescribing controlled substances as defined in Schedules II through IV of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW, if and to the extent that doing so is permitted by their scope of practice.

(2) In the context of the definition of licensed practical nursing practice, this chapter shall not be construed as:

(a) Prohibiting the incidental care of the sick by domestic servants or persons primarily employed as housekeepers, so long as they do not practice practical nursing within the meaning of this chapter;

(b) Preventing a person from the domestic administration of family remedies or the furnishing of nursing assistance in case of emergency;

(c) Prohibiting the practice of practical nursing by students enrolled in approved schools as may be incidental to their course of study or prohibiting the students from working as nursing assistants;

(d) Prohibiting auxiliary services provided by persons carrying out duties necessary for the support of nursing services, including those duties that involve minor nursing services for persons performed in hospitals, nursing homes, or elsewhere under the direction of licensed physicians or the supervision of licensed registered nurses;

(e) Prohibiting or preventing the practice of nursing in this state by a legally qualified nurse of another state or territory whose engagement requires him or her to accompany and care for a patient temporarily residing in this state during the period of one such engagement, not to exceed six months in length, if the person does not represent or hold himself or herself out as a licensed practical nurse licensed to practice in this state;

(f) Prohibiting nursing or care of the sick, with or without compensation, when done in connection with the practice of the religious tenets of a church by adherents of the church so long as they do not engage in licensed practical nurse practice as defined in this chapter;

(g) Prohibiting the practice of a legally qualified nurse of another state who is employed by the United States government or any bureau, division, or agency thereof, while in the discharge of his or her official duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:

The commission may adopt rules to implement the requirements of RCW 18.79.240(1)(d).

--- END ---