BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any clause in a contract between state or local agencies and private vendors, including software and data storage vendors, that prohibits or otherwise prevents disclosure of the existence of the contract to the public or the purpose of the contract is against public policy and is void and unenforceable.

(2) Regarding software and data storage contracts, the contract may not prohibit or otherwise prevent disclosure of the extent of any databases held by the vendor of the software or data storage or the number of private individuals and entities about whom information is contained in the database.

(3) Nothing in this section requires disclosure of any information exempted from disclosure by RCW 42.56.270.

--- END ---