BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the terms "family engagement coordinator," "parent and family engagement coordinator," and "parent involvement coordinator" are used interchangeably in various statutes in Title 28A RCW, as well as in the omnibus appropriations act. The legislature further finds that this staff position is included in the prototypical school model and received funding in the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act. Despite this appropriate recognition of the critical importance of family engagement and the need for such a designated school staff position, there is no single definition of the term, nor is there a model or framework for the staff position. The legislature intends to task the office of the education ombuds and the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee with developing a definition for the term and a model or framework for the position and recommending these to the legislature.

(2) By December 1, 2016, the office of the education ombuds, together with the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, shall develop and recommend to the education committees of the legislature a definition for the term that is variously referred to as "family engagement coordinator," "parent and family engagement coordinator," and "parent involvement coordinator" and a model or framework for such a staff position. In developing the model or framework for the staff position, the office and the committee shall collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington education association, the public school employees of Washington, the Washington school counselors' association, the association of Washington school principals, and the Washington state school directors' association.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2017.

--- END ---