BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.160.030 and 1999 c 156 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

No person engaged in the selling, delivery, or solicitation of cut flowers, flower arrangements, or floral products may misrepresent his, her, or its geographic location by:

(1) Listing a local telephone number in a local telephone directory or on an internet web site if:

(a) Calls to the telephone number are routinely forwarded or otherwise transferred to a business location that is outside the calling area covered by the local telephone directory or outside the local calling area for the local telephone number listed on an internet web site; and

(b) The listing fails to conspicuously disclose the locality and state in which the business is located; or

(2) Listing a business name in a local telephone directory or on an internet web site if:

(a) The name misrepresents the business's geographic location; and

(b) The listing fails to disclose the locality and state in which the business is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 19.160 RCW to read as follows:

A person engaged in the selling, delivery, or solicitation of cut flowers, flower arrangements, or floral products must conspicuously display on the business web site and all advertising:

(1) The number of the business license issued to it by the state or a local government; or

(2) The state unified business identifier account number.

--- END ---