BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.08.140 and 2011 c 10 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to vote in any primary, special election, or general election, a person who is not registered to vote in Washington must:

(a) Submit a registration application no later than ((twenty-nine)) twenty-eight days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election; or

(b) ((Register)) Submit a registration application no later than eleven days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election:

(i) Pursuant to RCW 29A.08.123, 29A.08.330(4), or 29A.08.340; or

(ii) In person at the county auditor's office in his or her county of residence ((no later than eight days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election)), or an alternate location designated by the county auditor.

(2) A person who is already registered to vote in Washington may update his or her registration no later than ((twenty-nine)) twenty- eight days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election to be in effect for that primary, special election, or general election. A registered voter who fails to transfer his or her residential address by this deadline may vote according to his or her previous registration address.

--- END ---