BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An online alternative credit model that awards degrees is established. This model is intended to position the state to meet baccalaureate degree production goals and to serve nontraditional students who may already hold some postsecondary academic credits or life experience that can count towards a degree.

(2) Students targeted for enrollment in this model are those who are early learning providers, to help expand professional degree holders in the field.

(3) Students encouraged but not specifically targeted for enrollment in this model include:

(a) Veterans returning to civilian life with education, knowledge, and skills acquired during military service;

(b) Students transferring from another college or university;

(c) High school students who are college bound;

(d) Students who come to a university or college with academic credits earned through dual credit programs such as running start, international baccalaureate, AP, college in the high school, and other programs;

(e) Individuals who have completed education and training programs provided by an employer;

(f) Individuals who have acquired knowledge and work experience on the job or through an internship; and

(g) Individuals who have acquired some postsecondary academic credit, but whose commitments to work or family prohibit degree completion in a traditional baccalaureate setting.

(4) Central Washington University shall host the online alternative credit model. In order to develop the model the university shall:

(a) Communicate with community and business leaders to identify and deliver needed programs;

(b) Develop and launch curricula and programs in response to the needs of business and students;

(c) Evaluate and offer credit for student learning already acquired outside of academic settings;

(d) Develop a delivery model that provides flexibility for working students in place of a traditional instructional model and pace;

(e) Coordinate with other K-20 education providers; and

(f) Identify strategies to enhance baccalaureate aspirations in underserved communities.

(5) Central Washington University shall consult with the department of early learning for the purposes of targeting students who are early learning providers in subsection (2) of this section and developing programs in subsection (4) of this section.

(6) Central Washington University shall develop and launch a bachelor of arts in early childhood education using the online alternative credit model.

(7) Central Washington University shall report annually by December 1st to the higher education committees of the legislature on the progress in implementing the model and recommendations for improvement or expansion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2015, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---