BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.04.260 and 1993 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement, other than ordinary maintenance, that the state or a municipality causes to be performed by a private party through a contract to rent, lease, or purchase at least fifty percent of the project by one or more state agencies or municipalities shall comply with chapter 39.12 RCW. This section only applies to work, construction, alternation, repair, or improvement that is performed directly on the site of the work.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.12.020 and 2007 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics, upon all public works and under all public building service maintenance contracts of the state or any county, municipality or political subdivision created by its laws, shall be not less than the prevailing rate of wage for an hour's work in the same trade or occupation in the locality within the state where such labor is performed. This chapter only applies to laborers, workers, or mechanics employed directly on the site of the work. For a contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, a contractor required to pay the prevailing rate of wage shall post in a location readily visible to workers at the job site: PROVIDED, That on road construction, sewer line, pipeline, transmission line, street, or alley improvement projects for which no field office is needed or established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of wage statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing, concrete, or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a copy of the wage statement to any employee on request:

(((1)))(a) A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries under RCW 39.12.040; and

(((2)))(b) The address and telephone number of the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries where a complaint or inquiry concerning prevailing wages may be made.

(2) This chapter shall not apply to workers or other persons regularly employed by the state, or any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws.

(3) For purposes of this section, "site of the work" has the same meaning as the phrase "site of the work" as used in the Davis Bacon Act, 40 U.S.C. Sec. 3142, as it existed on the effective date of this section.

--- END ---