BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.44.340 and 2012 c 2 s 211 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Employers holding grocery store or beer and/or wine specialty shop licenses exclusively are permitted to allow their employees, between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one years, to sell, stock, and handle liquor in, on, or about any establishment holding a license to sell such liquor, if:

(a) There is an adult twenty-one years of age or older on duty supervising the sale of liquor at the licensed premises; and

(b) In the case of spirits, there are at least two adults twenty-one years of age or older on duty supervising the sale of spirits at the licensed premises.

(2) Subject to the supervisory requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section, licensees are permitted to allow employees between the ages of sixteen and seventeen years to handle liquor for the sole purpose of providing direct assistance to an individual customer making a liquor purchase. For the purposes of this subsection, "assistance" means:

(a) Transferring liquor to the possession of the customer where the transfer involves removal from a shelf, cabinet, or other display area;

(b) Participating in the bagging or packaging of the liquor during the checkout process; and

(c) Transferring the liquor from the licensee's premises to the motor vehicle of the purchaser in accordance with this subsection (2).

(3) Employees who are at least sixteen years of age, but under twenty-one years of age, may make deliveries of spirits, beer, and/or wine purchased from licensees holding grocery store or beer and/or wine specialty shop licenses exclusively, when delivery is made to ((cars))motor vehicles of customers adjacent to such licensed premises but only, however, when the underage employee is accompanied by the purchaser.

--- END ---