BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.155.005 and 1993 c 507 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that chapter ..., Laws of 2015 (this act) furthers the public health, safety, and welfare by reducing youth access to addictive and harmful products.

(2) While present state law prohibits the sale and distribution of tobacco and vapor products to ((minors)) youth under the age of eighteen, youth obtain ((tobacco)) these products with ease. ((Availability and lack of enforcement put tobacco products in the hands of youth.))

(3) Almost all adults who smoke started smoking when they were teenagers. At the same time, according to the 2012 healthy youth survey, forty-six percent of tenth graders say it is "sort of easy" to "very easy" to get cigarettes. Of these tenth graders who smoked, more than twice as many said they got their cigarettes from social sources, not from a store or vending machine.

(4) The years between age eighteen and age nineteen are a critical period in which more than a quarter of those using tobacco move from experimentation to daily use. The legislature recognizes academic research projecting that raising the legal smoking age to nineteen could cut the youth smoking rate in half within seven years.

(5) The legislature finds that reducing the youth smoking rate will save lives and reduce health care costs. Every year, two billion eight hundred ten million dollars in health care costs can be directly attributed to tobacco use in Washington. Smoking-caused government expenditures cost every Washington household six hundred twenty-five dollars per year.

(6) Federal law requires states to enforce laws prohibiting sale and distribution of tobacco products to minors in a manner that can reasonably be expected to reduce the extent to which the products are available to minors. It is imperative to effectively reduce the sale, distribution, and availability of tobacco products to minors.

Sec. 2. RCW 26.28.080 and 2013 c 47 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Every)) A person who sells or gives, or permits to be sold or given, to ((any)) a person under the age of ((eighteen)) nineteen years any cigar, cigarette, cigarette paper or wrapper, tobacco in any form, or a vapor product is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) It shall be no defense to a prosecution for a violation of this section that the person acted, or was believed by the defendant to act, as agent or representative of another.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "vapor product" means ((a noncombustible tobacco-derived product containing nicotine that employs a mechanical heating element, battery, or circuit, regardless of shape or size, that can be used to heat a liquid nicotine solution contained in cartridges. Vapor product does not include any product that is regulated by the United States food and drug administration under chapter V of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act)) any: (a) Device that employs a battery or other mechanism to heat a solution or substance to produce a vapor or aerosol intended for inhalation; (b) cartridge or container of a solution or substance intended to be used with or in such a device; or (c) solution or substance intended for use in such a device, including, but not limited to, concentrated nicotine. "Vapor product" includes any electronic cigarettes, electronic nicotine delivery systems, electronic cigars, electronic cigarillos, electronic pipes, vape pens, or similar products or devices, as well as any parts that can be used to build such products or devices. "Vapor product" does not include any drug, device, or combination product approved for sale by the United States food and drug administration that is marketed and sold for such approved purpose.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.155.010 and 2009 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions set forth in RCW 82.24.010 shall apply to this chapter. In addition, for the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the context:

(1) "Board" means the Washington state liquor control board.

(2) "Internet" means any computer network, telephonic network, or other electronic network.

(3) (("Minor" refers to an individual who is less than eighteen years old.

(4))) "Sample" means a tobacco product distributed to members of the general public at no cost or at nominal cost for product promotion purposes.

(((5))) (4) "Sampling" means the distribution of samples to members of the public.

(((6))) (5) "Tobacco product" means a product that contains tobacco and is intended for human use, including any product defined in RCW 82.24.010(2) or 82.26.010(((1))) (21), except that for the purposes of RCW 70.155.140 only, "tobacco product" does not include cigars defined in RCW 82.26.010 as to which one thousand units weigh more than three pounds.

(6) "Vapor product" means any: (a) Device that employs a battery or other mechanism to heat a solution or substance to produce a vapor or aerosol intended for inhalation; (b) cartridge or container of a solution or substance intended to be used with or in such a device; or (c) solution or substance intended for use in such a device, including, but not limited to, concentrated nicotine. "Vapor product" includes any electronic cigarettes, electronic nicotine delivery systems, electronic cigars, electronic cigarillos, electronic pipes, vape pens, or similar products or devices, as well as any parts that can be used to build such products or devices. "Vapor product" does not include any drug, device, or combination product approved for sale by the United States food and drug administration that is marketed and sold for such approved purpose.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.155.020 and 1993 c 507 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A person who holds a license issued under RCW 82.24.520 or 82.24.530 shall:

(1) Display the license or a copy in a prominent location at the outlet for which the license is issued; and

(2) Display a sign concerning the prohibition of tobacco sales to ((minors)) persons under the age of nineteen.

Such sign shall:

(a) Be posted so that it is clearly visible to anyone purchasing tobacco products from the licensee;

(b) Be designed and produced by the department of health to read: "THE SALE OF TOBACCO PRODUCTS TO PERSONS UNDER AGE ((18)) 21 IS STRICTLY PROHIBITED BY STATE LAW. IF YOU ARE UNDER ((18)) 21, YOU COULD BE PENALIZED FOR PURCHASING A TOBACCO PRODUCT; PHOTO ID REQUIRED"; and

(c) Be provided free of charge by the liquor control board.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.155.030 and 1994 c 202 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person shall sell or permit to be sold any tobacco product through any device that mechanically dispenses tobacco products unless the device is located fully within premises from which ((minors)) persons under the age of nineteen are prohibited or in industrial worksites where ((minors)) persons under the age of nineteen are not employed and not less than ten feet from all entrance or exit ways to and from each premise.

(2) The board shall adopt rules that allow an exception to the requirement that a device be located not less than ten feet from all entrance or exit ways to and from a premise if it is architecturally impractical for the device to be located not less than ten feet from all entrance and exit ways.

Sec. 6. RCW 70.155.080 and 2002 c 175 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person under the age of ((eighteen)) nineteen who purchases or attempts to purchase, possesses, or obtains or attempts to obtain cigarettes ((or)), tobacco products, or vapor products commits a class 3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW and is subject to a fine as set out in chapter 7.80 RCW or participation in up to four hours of community restitution, or both. The court may also require participation in a ((smoking)) cessation program. This provision does not apply if a person under the age of eighteen, with parental authorization, or a person at least eighteen years of age, but less than nineteen years of age is participating in a controlled purchase as part of a liquor control board, law enforcement, or local health department activity.

(2) Municipal and district courts within the state have jurisdiction for enforcement of this section.

Sec. 7. RCW 70.155.110 and 1993 c 507 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The liquor control board shall, in addition to the board's other powers and authorities, have the authority to enforce the provisions of this chapter and RCW 26.28.080(((4))) and 82.24.500. The liquor control board shall have full power to revoke or suspend the license of any retailer or wholesaler in accordance with the provisions of RCW 70.155.100.

(2) The liquor control board and the board's authorized agents or employees shall have full power and authority to enter any place of business where tobacco products are sold for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter.

(3) For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter and RCW 26.28.080(((4))) and 82.24.500, a peace officer or enforcement officer of the liquor control board who has reasonable grounds to believe a person observed by the officer purchasing, attempting to purchase, or in possession of tobacco products is under the age of ((eighteen)) nineteen years of age, may detain ((such)) a person for a reasonable period of time and in such a reasonable manner as is necessary to determine the person's true identity and date of birth. Further, tobacco products possessed by persons under the age of ((eighteen)) nineteen years of age are considered contraband and may be seized by a peace officer or enforcement officer of the liquor control board.

(4) The liquor control board may work with local county health departments or districts and local law enforcement agencies to conduct random, unannounced, inspections to assure compliance.

Sec. 8. RCW 70.155.120 and 1993 c 507 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The youth tobacco prevention account is created in the state treasury. All fees collected pursuant to RCW 82.24.520 and 82.24.530 and funds collected by the liquor control board from the imposition of monetary penalties and samplers' fees shall be deposited into this account, except that ten percent of all such fees and penalties shall be deposited in the state general fund.

(2) Moneys appropriated from the youth tobacco prevention account to the department of health shall be used by the department of health for implementation of this chapter, including collection and reporting of data regarding enforcement and the extent to which access to tobacco products by youth has been reduced.

(3) The department of health shall enter into interagency agreements with the liquor control board to pay the costs incurred, up to thirty percent of available funds, in carrying out its enforcement responsibilities under this chapter. Such agreements shall set forth standards of enforcement, consistent with the funding available, so as to reduce the extent to which tobacco products are available to individuals under the age of ((eighteen)) nineteen. The agreements shall also set forth requirements for data reporting by the liquor control board regarding its enforcement activities.

(4) The department of health and the department of revenue shall enter into an interagency agreement for payment of the cost of administering the tobacco retailer licensing system and for the provision of quarterly documentation of tobacco wholesaler, retailer, and vending machine names and locations.

(5) The department of health shall, within up to seventy percent of available funds, provide grants to local health departments or other local community agencies to develop and implement coordinated tobacco intervention strategies to prevent and reduce tobacco use by youth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. This act takes effect July 1, 2019.

--- END ---