BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.14.0201 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this section, "taxpayer" means a health maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined in RCW 48.125.010.

(2) Each taxpayer must pay a tax on or before the first day of March of each year to the state treasurer through the insurance commissioner's office. The tax must be equal to the total amount of all premiums and prepayments for health care services collected or received by the taxpayer under RCW 48.14.090 during the preceding calendar year multiplied by the rate of two percent. For tax purposes, the reporting of premiums and prepayments must be on a written basis or on a paid-for basis consistent with the basis required by the annual statement.

(3) Taxpayers must prepay their tax obligations under this section. The minimum amount of the prepayments is the percentages of the taxpayer's tax obligation for the preceding calendar year recomputed using the rate in effect for the current year. For the prepayment of taxes due during the first calendar year, the minimum amount of the prepayments is the percentages of the taxpayer's tax obligation that would have been due had the tax been in effect during the previous calendar year. The tax prepayments must be paid to the state treasurer through the commissioner's office by the due dates and in the following amounts:

(a) On or before June 15, forty-five percent;

(b) On or before September 15, twenty-five percent;

(c) On or before December 15, twenty-five percent.

(4) For good cause demonstrated in writing, the commissioner may approve an amount smaller than the preceding calendar year's tax obligation as recomputed for calculating the health maintenance organization's, health care service contractor's, self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement's, or certified health plan's prepayment obligations for the current tax year.

(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, moneys collected under this section are deposited in the general fund.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2014, moneys collected from taxpayers for premiums written on qualified health benefit plans and stand-alone dental plans offered through the health benefit exchange under chapter 43.71 RCW must be deposited in the health benefit exchange account under RCW 43.71.060.

(6) The taxes imposed in this section do not apply to:

(a) Amounts received by any taxpayer from the United States or any instrumentality thereof as prepayments for health care services provided under Title XVIII (medicare) of the federal social security act.

(b) Amounts received by any taxpayer from the state of Washington as prepayments for health care services provided under:

(i) The medical care services program as provided in RCW 74.09.035; ((or))

(ii) The healthpath Washington managed care health care delivery program administered by the health care authority and department of social and health services under chapter 74.09 RCW, which provides coordinated medicare and medicaid medical, behavioral health, and long-term services and support for eligible enrollees; or

(iii) The Washington basic health plan on behalf of subsidized enrollees as provided in chapter 70.47 RCW.

(c) Amounts received by any health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or any health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW, as prepayments for health care services included within the definition of practice of dentistry under RCW 18.32.020, except amounts received for pediatric oral services that qualify as coverage for the minimum essential coverage requirement under P.L. 111-148 (2010), as amended.

(d) Participant contributions to self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements that are not taxable in this state.

(7) Beginning January 1, 2000, the state preempts the field of imposing excise or privilege taxes upon taxpayers and no county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision has the right to impose any such taxes upon such taxpayers. This subsection is limited to premiums and payments for health benefit plans offered by health care service contractors under chapter 48.44 RCW, health maintenance organizations under chapter 48.46 RCW, and self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements as defined in RCW 48.125.010. The preemption authorized by this subsection must not impair the ability of a county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision to impose excise or privilege taxes upon the health care services directly delivered by the employees of a health maintenance organization under chapter 48.46 RCW.

(8)(a) The taxes imposed by this section apply to a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement only in the event that they are not preempted by the employee retirement income security act of 1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq. The arrangements and the commissioner must initially request an advisory opinion from the United States department of labor or obtain a declaratory ruling from a federal court on the legality of imposing state premium taxes on these arrangements. Once the legality of the taxes has been determined, the multiple employer welfare arrangement certified by the insurance commissioner must begin payment of these taxes.

(b) If there has not been a final determination of the legality of these taxes, then beginning on the earlier of (i) the date the fourth multiple employer welfare arrangement has been certified by the insurance commissioner, or (ii) April 1, 2006, the arrangement must deposit the taxes imposed by this section into an interest bearing escrow account maintained by the arrangement. Upon a final determination that the taxes are not preempted by the employee retirement income security act of 1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq., all funds in the interest bearing escrow account must be transferred to the state treasurer.

(9) The effect of transferring contracts for health care services from one taxpayer to another taxpayer is to transfer the tax prepayment obligation with respect to the contracts.

(10) On or before June 1st of each year, the commissioner must notify each taxpayer required to make prepayments in that year of the amount of each prepayment and must provide remittance forms to be used by the taxpayer. However, a taxpayer's responsibility to make prepayments is not affected by failure of the commissioner to send, or the taxpayer to receive, the notice or forms.

Sec. 2. RCW 48.41.030 and 2004 c 260 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Accounting year" means a twelve-month period determined by the board for purposes of recordkeeping and accounting. The first accounting year may be more or less than twelve months and, from time to time in subsequent years, the board may order an accounting year of other than twelve months as may be required for orderly management and accounting of the pool.

(2) "Administrator" means the entity chosen by the board to administer the pool under RCW 48.41.080.

(3) "Board" means the board of directors of the pool.

(4) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner.

(5) "Covered person" means any individual resident of this state who is eligible to receive benefits from any member, or other health plan.

(6) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.38.025.

(7) "Health care provider" means any physician, facility, or health care professional, who is licensed in Washington state and entitled to reimbursement for health care services.

(8) "Health care services" means services for the purpose of preventing, alleviating, curing, or healing human illness or injury.

(9) "Health carrier" or "carrier" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005.

(10) "Health coverage" means any group or individual disability insurance policy, health care service contract, and health maintenance agreement, except those contracts entered into for the provision of health care services pursuant to Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq. The term does not include short-term care, long-term care, dental, vision, accident, fixed indemnity, disability income contracts, limited benefit or credit insurance, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, insurance arising out of the worker's compensation or similar law, automobile medical payment insurance, or insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard to fault and which is statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance.

(11) "Health plan" means any arrangement by which persons, including dependents or spouses, covered or making application to be covered under this pool, have access to hospital and medical benefits or reimbursement including any group or individual disability insurance policy; health care service contract; health maintenance agreement; uninsured arrangements of group or group-type contracts including employer self-insured, cost-plus, or other benefit methodologies not involving insurance or not governed by Title 48 RCW; coverage under group-type contracts which are not available to the general public and can be obtained only because of connection with a particular organization or group; and coverage by medicare or other governmental benefits. This term includes coverage through "health coverage" as defined under this section, and specifically excludes those types of programs excluded under the definition of "health coverage" in subsection (10) of this section.

(12) "Medical assistance" means coverage under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C., Sec. 1396 et seq.) and chapter 74.09 RCW.

(13) "Medicare" means coverage under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq., as amended).

(14) "Member" means any commercial insurer which provides disability insurance or stop loss insurance, any health care service contractor, any health maintenance organization licensed under Title 48 RCW, and any self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined in RCW 48.125.010. "Member" also means the Washington state health care authority as issuer of the state uniform medical plan. "Member" shall also mean, as soon as authorized by federal law, employers and other entities, including a self-funding entity and employee welfare benefit plans that provide health plan benefits in this state on or after May 18, 1987. "Member" does not include any insurer, health care service contractor, or health maintenance organization whose products are exclusively dental products or those products excluded from the definition of "health coverage" set forth in subsection (10) of this section.

(15) "Network provider" means a health care provider who has contracted in writing with the pool administrator or a health carrier contracting with the pool administrator to offer pool coverage to accept payment from and to look solely to the pool or health carrier according to the terms of the pool health plans.

(16) "Plan of operation" means the pool, including articles, by-laws, and operating rules, adopted by the board pursuant to RCW 48.41.050.

(17) "Point of service plan" means a benefit plan offered by the pool under which a covered person may elect to receive covered services from network providers, or nonnetwork providers at a reduced rate of benefits.

(18) "Pool" means the Washington state health insurance pool as created in RCW 48.41.040.

(19) "Healthpath Washington" means a federal-state partnership for a capitated financial alignment model for individuals enrolled in both medicare and medicaid administered by the health care authority and department of social and health services under chapter 74.09 RCW, which provides coordinated medicare and medicaid medical, behavioral health, and long-term services and support for eligible enrollees.

Sec. 3. RCW 48.41.090 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Following the close of each accounting year, the pool administrator shall determine the total net cost of pool operation which shall include:

(a) Net premium (premiums less administrative expense allowances), the pool expenses of administration, and incurred losses for the year, taking into account investment income and other appropriate gains and losses; and

(b) The amount of pool contributions specified in the state omnibus appropriations act for deposit into the health benefit exchange account under RCW 43.71.060, to assist with the transition of enrollees from the pool into the health benefit exchange created by chapter 43.71 RCW.

(2)(a) Each member's proportion of participation in the pool shall be determined annually by the board based on annual statements and other reports deemed necessary by the board and filed by the member with the commissioner; and shall be determined by multiplying the total cost of pool operation by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction equals that member's total number of resident insured persons, including spouse and dependents, covered under all health plans in the state by that member during the preceding calendar year. The denominator of the fraction equals the total number of resident insured persons, including spouses and dependents, covered under all health plans in the state by all pool members during the preceding calendar year.

(b) For purposes of calculating the numerator and the denominator under (a) of this subsection:

(i) All health plans in the state by the state health care authority include only the uniform medical plan;

(ii) Each ten resident insured persons, including spouse and dependents, under a stop loss plan or the uniform medical plan shall count as one resident insured person; and

(iii) Health plans serving medical care services program clients under RCW 74.09.035 and healthpath Washington enrollees are exempted from the calculation and from participation in the pool((; and

(iv) Health plans established to serve elderly clients or medicaid clients with disabilities under chapter 74.09 RCW when the plan has been implemented on a demonstration or pilot project basis are exempted from the calculation until July 1, 2009)).

(c) Except as provided in RCW 48.41.037, any deficit incurred by the pool, including pool contributions for deposit into the health benefit exchange account, shall be recouped by assessments among members apportioned under this subsection pursuant to the formula set forth by the board among members. The monthly per member assessment may not exceed the 2013 assessment level. If the maximum assessment is insufficient to cover a pool deficit the assessment shall be used first to pay all incurred losses and pool administrative expenses, with the remainder being available for deposit in the health benefit exchange account.

(3) The board may abate or defer, in whole or in part, the assessment of a member if, in the opinion of the board, payment of the assessment would endanger the ability of the member to fulfill its contractual obligations. If an assessment against a member is abated or deferred in whole or in part, the amount by which such assessment is abated or deferred may be assessed against the other members in a manner consistent with the basis for assessments set forth in subsection (2) of this section. The member receiving such abatement or deferment shall remain liable to the pool for the deficiency.

(4) Subject to the limitation imposed in subsection (2)(c) of this section, the pool administrator shall transfer the assessments for pool contributions for the operation of the health benefit exchange to the treasurer for deposit into the health benefit exchange account with the quarterly assessments for 2014 as specified in the state omnibus appropriations act. If assessments exceed actual losses and administrative expenses of the pool and pool contributions for deposit into the health benefit exchange account, the excess shall be held at interest and used by the board to offset future losses or to reduce pool premiums. As used in this subsection, "future losses" includes reserves for incurred but not reported claims.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

The taxes imposed by this chapter do not apply to amounts received under the healthpath Washington program that are exempt under RCW 48.14.0201(6)(b)(ii).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preference contained in section 4 of this act. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(1) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to induce certain designated behavior by taxpayers under RCW 82.32.808(2)(a).

(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to lower costs for providing medical, behavioral health and long-term services and support to high-risk populations and to improve health outcomes, coordination of care, and experience of care. Under chapter 43.136 RCW, the joint legislative audit and review committee must review the business and occupation tax exemption established under section 4 of this act by December 1, 2019.

(3) If a review finds the healthpath Washington program has been successful in improving access to care and achieving savings to the state and federal governments, then the legislative auditor should recommend extension of the expiration date of the tax preference.

(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee must determine whether the healthpath Washington project is: (a) Improving the quality of care without increasing spending; (b) reducing spending without reducing the quality of care; or (c) improving the quality of care and reducing spending.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The tax exemption in section 4 of this act expires upon termination of the healthpath Washington managed care program. The department of social and health services must notify the department of revenue within thirty days of termination of the program.

--- END ---