BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.87.210 and 1963 c 26 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

All moneys, except fines and penalties, received or collected under the terms of this chapter shall be deposited in the ((general fund))construction registration inspection account. All fines and penalties received or collected under the terms of this chapter shall be deposited in the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

All moneys, except fines and penalties, received or collected under the terms of this chapter must be deposited into the construction registration inspection account. All fines and penalties received or collected under the terms of this chapter shall be deposited in the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.22 RCW to read as follows:

All moneys, except fines and penalties, received or collected under the terms of RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.430 and 43.22.432 through 43.22.495 must be deposited into the construction registration inspection account. All fines and penalties received or collected under the terms of RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.430 and 43.22.432 through 43.22.495 shall be deposited in the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 51.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The construction registration inspection account is created in the state treasury. All moneys, except fines and penalties, received or collected under the terms of chapters 18.27 and 70.87 RCW and under the terms of RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.430 and 43.22.432 through 43.22.495 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation. Expenditures from the account, not including moneys transferred to the general fund, may be used only to carry out the purposes of chapters 18.27 and 70.87 RCW and RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.430 and 43.22.432 through 43.22.495.

(2) The department shall set the fees deposited in the account at a level that generates revenue that is as near as practicable to the amount of the appropriation to carry out the duties specified in this section.

(3) On the last working day of the first month following each quarterly period, seven percent of all revenues received into the account during the previous quarter from licenses, permits, and registrations, net of refunds paid to customers, must be transferred into the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2017.

--- END ---