BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The office of the chief information officer shall convene a blue-ribbon panel on cybersecurity. Panel membership shall include but not be limited to representatives from diverse county and municipal governments, public utility districts, privately owned utility companies, state information technology officials, and cybersecurity experts from across the state. The chief information officer and the director of the military department shall serve as cochairs of the panel.

(2) The panel shall review issues including but not limited to protecting critical infrastructure, including water, sewer, power, and gas utilities, from the threat of cyberattack; protecting data transfer and enhancing the security of the state's intergovernmental network; and best practices for local government response in the event of a debilitating cybersecurity incident.

(3) The panel shall publish notice of the date, time, location, and subject of any official meetings and provide such information directly to the technology services board and the appropriate committees of both chambers of the legislature no later than one week before the meeting is scheduled to take place.

(4) Staff support for and expenses of the panel shall be provided by the office of the chief information officer.

(5) In compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the chief information officer must submit a report detailing the recommendations of the panel to the appropriate committees of both houses of the legislature and the governor, as well as any relevant statewide organizations representing local governments or utilities, by December 12, 2016.

(6) This section expires June 30, 2017.

--- END ---