BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.32.030 and 2005 c 100 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Account" means one of the three accounts created in RCW 48.32.040.

(2) "Association" means the Washington insurance guaranty association created in RCW 48.32.040.

(3) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of this state.

(4) "Covered claim" means:

(a) Except for longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance, an unpaid claim, including one for unearned premiums, that arises out of and is within the coverage of an insurance policy to which this chapter applies issued by an insurer, if such insurer becomes an insolvent insurer after the first day of April, 1971 and (i) the claimant or insured is a resident of this state at the time of the insured event; or (ii) the property from which the claim arises is permanently located in this state. "Covered claim" does not include any amount due any reinsurer, insurer, insurance pool, or underwriting association, as subrogation recoveries or otherwise. However, a claim for any such amount asserted against a person insured under a policy issued by an insurer which has become an insolvent insurer, which, if it were not a claim by or for the benefit of a reinsurer, insurer, insurance pool, or underwriting association, would be a "covered claim" may be filed directly with the receiver of the insolvent insurer, but in no event may any such claim be asserted in any legal action against the insured of such insolvent insurer. In addition, "covered claim" does not include any claim filed with the association subsequent to the final date set by the court for the filing of claims against the liquidator or receiver of an insolvent insurer; and

(b) For longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance, an unpaid claim, excluding one for unearned premiums, for benefits due an injured worker under the longshore and harbor workers' compensation act that is within the coverage of an insurance policy to which this chapter applies issued by an insurer, if that insurer becomes an insolvent insurer after April 20, 2005, and (i) the worksite from which the injury occurred is within this state or on the navigable waters within or immediately offshore of this state, or (ii) the worksite from which the injury occurred is outside this state, the injured worker is a permanent resident of this state, the injured worker is temporarily working at the worksite from which the injury occurred, and the injured worker is not covered under a policy of longshore and harbor workers' compensation insurance issued in another state. "Covered claim" does not include any amount due any insurer, reinsurer, insurance pool, or underwriting association, as subrogation recoveries or otherwise.

(5) "Insolvent insurer" means:

(a) An insurer (i) authorized to transact insurance in this state either at the time the policy was issued or when the insured event occurred and (ii) determined to be insolvent and ordered liquidated by a court of competent jurisdiction, and which adjudication was subsequent to the first day of April, 1971; and

(b) In the case of an insurer writing longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance, an insurer (i) authorized to write this class of insurance at the time the policy was written and (ii) determined to be insolvent and ordered liquidated by a court of competent jurisdiction subsequent to April 20, 2005.

(6) "Longshore and harbor workers' compensation act" means the longshore and harbor workers' compensation act as defined in U.S.C. Title 33, Chapter 18, 901 et seq. and its extensions commonly known as the defense base act, outer continental shelf lands act, nonappropriated funds instrumentalities act, District of Columbia workers' compensation act, and the war hazards act.

(7) "Member insurer" means any person who (a) writes any kind of insurance to which this chapter applies under RCW 48.32.020, including the exchange of reciprocal or interinsurance contracts, and (b) holds a certificate of authority to transact insurance in this state.

(8) "Net direct written premiums" means direct gross premiums written in this state on insurance policies to which this chapter applies, less return premiums thereon and dividends paid or credited to policyholders on such direct business. "Net direct written premiums" does not include premiums on contracts between insurers or reinsurers and does not include premiums on policies issued through the Washington longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance assigned risk plan by its servicing carrier.

(9) "Person" means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, or voluntary organization.

Sec. 2. RCW 48.32.060 and 2005 c 100 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The association shall:

(a)(i) For other than covered claims involving the longshore and harbor workers' compensation act, be obligated to the extent of the covered claims existing prior to the order of liquidation and arising within thirty days after the order of liquidation, or before the policy expiration date if less than thirty days after the order of liquidation, or before the insured replaces the policy or on request effects cancellation, if he or she does so within thirty days of the order of liquidation, but such an obligation includes only that amount of each covered claim which is in excess of one hundred dollars and is less than three hundred thousand dollars. In no event shall the association be obligated to a policyholder or claimant in an amount in excess of the face amount of the policy from which the claim arises.

(ii) For covered claims involving longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance, be obligated to the extent of covered claims for insolvencies occurring after April 20, 2005. This obligation is for the statutory obligations established under the longshore and harbor workers' compensation act. However, the insured employer shall reimburse the association for any deductibles that are owed as part of the insured's obligations. Covered claims do not include claims pursuant to policies issued by a servicing carrier on behalf of the Washington United States longshore and harbor workers' compensation act assigned risk plan established in RCW 48.22.070.

(b) Be deemed the insurer to the extent of its obligation on the covered claims and to such extent shall have all rights, duties, and obligations of the insolvent insurer as if the insurer had not become insolvent.

(c)(i) Allocate claims paid and expenses incurred among the three accounts enumerated in RCW 48.32.040 separately, and assess member insurers separately for each account amounts necessary to pay the obligations of the association under (a) of this subsection subsequent to an insolvency, the expenses of handling covered claims subsequent to an insolvency, the cost of examinations under RCW 48.32.110, and other expenses authorized by this chapter. Except as provided for in this subsection for member insurers who write longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance, the assessments of each member insurer shall be in the proportion that the net direct written premiums of the member insurer for the calendar year preceding the assessment on the kinds of insurance in the account bears to the net direct written premiums of all member insurers for the calendar year preceding the assessment on the kinds of insurance in the account. Each member insurer shall be notified of the assessment not later than thirty days before it is due. No member insurer may be assessed in any year on any account an amount greater than two percent of that member insurer's net direct written premiums for the calendar year preceding the assessment on the kinds of insurance in the account. If the maximum assessment, together with the other assets of the association in any account, does not provide in any one year in any account an amount sufficient to make all necessary payments from that account, the funds available may be prorated and the unpaid portion shall be paid as soon thereafter as funds become available. The association shall pay claims in any order which it may deem reasonable, including the payment of claims in the order such claims are received from claimants or in groups or categories of claims, or otherwise. The association may exempt or defer, in whole or in part, the assessment of any member insurer, if the assessment would cause the member insurer's financial statement to reflect amounts of capital or surplus less than the minimum amounts required for a certificate of authority by any jurisdiction in which the member insurer is authorized to transact insurance. Each member insurer serving as a servicing facility may set off against any assessment, authorized payments made on covered claims and expenses incurred in the payment of such claims by such member insurer if they are chargeable to the account for which the assessment is made.

(ii) For member insurers who write longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance, (c)(i) of this subsection applies except as modified by the following:

(A) Beginning July 1, 2005, and prior to an insolvency, each member insurer who writes longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance in this state, whether on a primary or excess coverage basis, shall be assessed at a rate to be determined by the association, but not more than an annual rate of three percent of the net direct written premium for the calendar year preceding the assessment on this kind of insurance. Insurer assessments prior to an insolvency shall continue until a fund is established that equals four percent of the aggregate net direct premium for the calendar year preceding the assessment on all insurers authorized to write this kind of insurance;

(B) Subsequent to an insolvency, each member insurer who writes longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance in this state, whether on a primary or excess coverage basis, shall be assessed at a rate to be determined by the association, but not more than an annual rate of three percent of the net direct written premium for the calendar year preceding the assessment on this kind of insurance. Insurer assessments subsequent to an insolvency shall continue until a fund is established that the association deems sufficient to meet all claim and loan obligations of the fund, provided that the net fund balance may not at any time exceed four percent of the aggregate net direct premium for the calendar year preceding the assessment on all insurers authorized to write this kind of insurance; and

(C) If any insurer fails to provide its net direct written premium data in an accurate and timely manner upon request by the association, the association may, at its discretion, substitute that insurer's direct written premiums for workers' compensation reported or reportable in its statutory annual statement page fourteen data for the state of Washington.

(d) Investigate claims brought against the association and adjust, compromise, settle, and pay covered claims to the extent of the association's obligation and deny all other claims.

(e) Notify such persons as the commissioner directs under RCW 48.32.080(2)(a).

(f) Handle claims through its employees or through one or more insurers or other persons designated as servicing facilities. Designation of a servicing facility is subject to the approval of the commissioner, but such designation may be declined by a member insurer.

(g) Reimburse each servicing facility for obligations of the association paid by the facility and for expenses incurred by the facility while handling claims on behalf of the association and shall pay the other expenses of the association authorized by this chapter.

(2) The association may:

(a) Appear in, defend, and appeal any action on a claim brought against the association.

(b) Employ or retain such persons as are necessary to handle claims and perform other duties of the association.

(c) Borrow funds necessary to effect the purposes of this chapter in accord with the plan of operation. If such a loan is related to the account for longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance, the association may seek such a loan from the Washington longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance assigned risk plan under RCW 48.22.070 or from other interested parties.

(d) Sue or be sued.

(e) Negotiate and become a party to such contracts as are necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

(f) Perform such other acts as are necessary or proper to effectuate the purpose of this chapter.

(g) Refund to the member insurers in proportion to the contribution of each member insurer to that account that amount by which the assets of the account exceed the liabilities, if, at the end of any calendar year, the board of directors finds that the assets of the association in any account exceed the liabilities of that account as estimated by the board of directors for the coming year.

(3) The association shall not access any funds from the automobile insurance account or the account for all other insurance to which this chapter applies to cover the cost of claims or administration arising under the account for longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance.

Sec. 3. RCW 48.22.070 and 1997 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commissioner shall adopt rules establishing a reasonable plan to insure that workers' compensation coverage as required by the United States longshore and harbor workers' compensation act, 33 U.S.C. Secs. 901 through 950, and maritime employer's liability coverage incidental to the workers' compensation coverage is available to those unable to purchase it through the normal insurance market. This plan shall require the participation of all authorized insurers writing primary or excess United States longshore and harbor workers' compensation insurance in the state of Washington and the Washington state industrial insurance fund as defined in RCW 51.08.175 which is authorized to participate in the plan and to make payments in support of the plan in accordance with this section. Any underwriting losses or surpluses incurred by the plan shall be determined by the governing committee of the plan and shall be shared by plan participants in accordance with the following ratios: The state industrial insurance fund, fifty percent; and authorized insurers writing primary or excess United States longshore and harbor workers' compensation insurance, fifty percent.

(2) The Washington state industrial insurance fund may obtain or provide reinsurance coverage for the plan created under subsection (1) of this section the terms of which shall be negotiated between the state fund and the plan. This coverage shall not be obtained or provided if the commissioner determines that the premium to be charged would result in unaffordable rates for coverage provided by the plan. In considering whether excess of loss coverage premiums would result in unaffordable rates for workers' compensation coverage provided by the plan, the commissioner shall compare the resulting plan rates to those provided under any similar pool or plan of other states.

(3) An applicant for plan insurance, a person insured under the plan, or an insurer, affected by a ruling or decision of the manager or committee designated to operate the plan may appeal to the commissioner for resolution of a dispute. In adopting rules under this section, the commissioner shall require that the plan use generally accepted actuarial principles for rate making.

(4) The plan established pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is obligated to fund, through a designated servicing facility, the payment and handling of claims made pursuant to longshore and harbor workers' compensation insurance and maritime employer's liability policies issued by its servicing carrier on behalf of the plan, and the Washington insurance guaranty association is not obligated to cover such claims.

--- END ---