BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.44.318 and 1995 c 100 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in this section, nothing is construed to permit a nonretail class liquor licensee's employee between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one years to handle, transport, or otherwise possess liquor.

(2) Licensees holding nonretail class liquor licenses are permitted to allow their employees between (([the]))the ages of eighteen and twenty-one years to stock, merchandise, and handle ((beer or wine))liquor on or about the:

(a) Nonretail premises if there is an adult twenty-one years of age or older on duty supervising such activities on the premises; and

(b) Retail licensee's premises as long as there is an adult twenty-one years of age or older, employed by the retail licensee, and present at the retail licensee’s premises during the activities described in this subsection (2).

(3) Any act or omission of the nonretail class liquor licensee’s employee occurring at or about the retail licensee’s premises, which violates any provision of this title, is the sole responsibility of the nonretail class liquor licensee.

(4) Nothing in this section absolves the retail licensee from responsibility for the acts or omissions of its own employees who violate any provision of this title.

--- END ---