BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the legislature to encourage industry to utilize new tire technologies with improved side wall tire strength ratings that will reduce motor carrier costs when replacing vehicles or tires. This will be accomplished by allowing single tires to be utilized when historically four or more tires are required when an axle is carrying more than ten thousand pounds.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.44.042 and 2006 c 334 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the maximum gross weights specified in RCW 46.44.041, it is unlawful to operate any vehicle upon the public highways with a gross weight, including load, upon (a) any tire concentrated upon the surface of the highway in excess of ((six hundred))ten thousand pounds ((per inch width of such tire))or (b) any axle or tandem axle in excess of the manufacturer's side wall tire rating (but not to exceed six hundred pounds per inch width) multiplied by the sum of tire widths, in inches, of the wheels of the axle or tandem axles. ((An axle manufactured after July 31, 1993, carrying more than ten thousand pounds gross weight must be equipped with four or more tires. An axle carrying more than ten thousand pounds gross weight must have four or more tires, regardless of date of manufacture. Instead of the four or more tires per axle requirements of this section, an axle may be equipped with two tires limited to five hundred pounds per inch width of tire. This section does not apply to vehicles operating under oversize or overweight permits, or both, issued under RCW 46.44.090, while carrying a nonreducible load.))

(2) The following equipment may operate at six hundred pounds per inch width of tire: (((1)))(a) A nonliftable steering axle or axles on the power unit; (((2)))(b) a tiller axle on firefighting apparatus; (((3)))(c) a rear booster trailing axle equipped with two tires on a ready-mix concrete transit truck; and (((4)))(d) a straddle trailer manufactured before January 1, 1996, equipped with single-tire axles or a single axle using a walking beam supported by two in-line single tires and used exclusively for the transport of fruit bins between field, storage, and processing. A straddle trailer manufactured after January 1, 1996, meeting this use criteria may carry five hundred fifteen pounds per inch width of tire on sixteen and one-half inch wide tires.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the width of the tire is determined by measuring the cross section of the tread of a wheel, the outer face of a track, or the runner of a sled, except (a) the width of the tire in case of solid rubber or hollow center cushion tires, so long as the use ((thereof may be))is permitted by ((the)) law, ((shall be))is measured between the flanges of the rim((. For the purpose of this section)), and (b) the width of the tire((s)) in case of pneumatic tires ((shall be))is the maximum overall normal inflated width as stipulated by the manufacturer when inflated to the pressure specified and without load thereon.

(4) The department of transportation, by rule with respect to state highways, and a local authority, with respect to a public highway under its jurisdiction, may extend the weight table in RCW 46.44.041 to one hundred fifteen thousand pounds. However, the extension must be in compliance with federal law, and vehicles operating under the extension must be in full compliance with the 1997 axle and tire requirements under this section.

(5) This section does not apply to vehicles operating under oversize or overweight permits, or both, issued under RCW 46.44.090, while carrying a nonreducible load.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect August 1, 2015.

--- END ---