BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.655.075 and 2007 c 396 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, by December 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall develop essential academic learning requirements and grade level expectations for educational technology literacy and technology fluency that identify the knowledge and skills that all public school students need to know and be able to do in the areas of technology and technology literacy. The development process shall include a review of current standards that have been developed or are used by other states and national and international technology associations. To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the technology essential academic learning requirements.

(a) As used in this section, "technology literacy" means the ability to responsibly, creatively, and effectively use appropriate technology to communicate; access, collect, manage, integrate, and evaluate information; solve problems and create solutions; build and share knowledge; and improve and enhance learning in all subject areas and experiences.

(b) Technology fluency builds upon technology literacy and is demonstrated when students: Apply technology to real-world experiences; adapt to changing technologies; modify current and create new technologies; and personalize technology to meet personal needs, interests, and learning styles.

(2)(((a))) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, the superintendent shall obtain or develop education technology assessments that may be administered in the elementary, middle, and high school grades to assess the essential academic learning requirements for technology. The assessments shall be designed to be classroom or project-based so that they can be embedded in classroom instruction and be administered and scored by school staff throughout the regular school year using consistent scoring criteria and procedures. By the 2010-11 school year, these assessments shall be made available to school districts for the districts' ((voluntary)) use. ((If a school district uses the assessments created under this section, then the school district shall notify the superintendent of public instruction of the use. The superintendent shall report annually to the legislature on the number of school districts that use the assessments each school year.

(b) Beginning December 1, 2010, and annually thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a report to the relevant legislative committees regarding the use of the assessments.))

(3) Beginning with the 2016-17 school year, all school districts are required to annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction verification that state technology literacy and technology fluency standards are being demonstrated by students at elementary, middle, and high school levels. Verification may be accomplished through any evidence-based method, including assessments developed by the superintendent, used by the district that demonstrate at least the following:

(a) For grades kindergarten through five:

(i) Student understanding of responsible and safe use of the internet; and

(ii) Student use of digital research tools to meet learning objectives.

(b) For grades six through eight:

(i) Student collaboration using digital tools to meet learning goals; and

(ii) Student understanding of cyberbullying and online identity.

(c) For grades nine through twelve:

(i) Student use of online systems to organize learning and work; and

(ii) Student use of a variety of digital tools and resources to enhance learning in all subject areas.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must conduct a survey of school districts to evaluate access to technology for all students and barriers within each school and school district that impede the ability to help students meet state technology literacy and technology fluency goals.

--- END ---