BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.73.250 and 2005 c 463 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All of the state's ambulance and aid services shall:

(a) Make epinephrine available to their emergency medical technicians in their emergency care supplies; and

(b) Make hydrocortisone sodium succinate or similar medication for the treatment of acute adrenal insufficiency available to their emergency medical technicians in their emergency care supplies. ((The))

(2) Emergency medical technicians may administer epinephrine and hydrocortisone sodium succinate or similar medications for the treatment of acute adrenal insufficiency.

(((2)))(3) Nothing in this section authorizes the administration of epinephrine or hydrocortisone sodium succinate, or similar medications, by a first responder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.210 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the department of health, shall develop policy guidelines related to medical emergencies resulting from acute adrenal insufficiency. The policy guidelines must be developed with input from pediatricians, school nurses, other health care providers, and parents of children with adrenal insufficiency. The policy guidelines shall include:

(a) A procedure for each school to follow to develop a treatment plan, including the responsibilities of school nurses and other appropriate school personnel responsible for responding to a student who may be experiencing acute adrenal insufficiency;

(b) The content of a training course for appropriate school personnel for responding to a student who may be experiencing acute adrenal insufficiency; and

(c) A procedure for the development of an individualized emergency health care plan for children diagnosed with adrenal insufficiency.

(2) By September 1, 2017, each school district shall use the policy guidelines developed under subsection (1) of this section to develop and adopt a school district policy for each school in the district to follow to assist students with adrenal insufficiency.

--- END ---