BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the legislature to order a cost driver study of the public four-year institutions of higher education, using the 2013 joint transportation cost driver study as a model. The legislature finds that students now pay over sixty percent of the cost of public four-year higher education. As families have been asked to pay more, it is essential that students, families, the taxpayers, our public institutions of higher education, and lawmakers continue to closely monitor the factors that contribute to the cost of a public four-year education in Washington. Following the passage in 2011 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1795, institutions have been diligent in bringing forward efficiency recommendations. The legislature intends to continue this good work by gaining a clearer understanding of what drives the cost of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The joint higher education committee in RCW 44.04.360 shall conduct a study of higher education costs at the state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College.

(2) In conducting the study, the joint higher education committee shall convene an advisory panel to provide study guidance, data, and recommendations. The advisory panel shall include the members of the joint higher education committee and a representative from each of the following groups: The office of financial management, the student achievement council, the council of presidents, the state auditor's office, the largest labor union at the regional universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the Washington student association, and the faculty of the state universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016. The advisory panel shall meet four times.

(3)(a) The study must describe the cost drivers for each institution and the cost drivers for students over the most recent thirty-year period for which data is available, including the cost of:

(i) Research;

(ii) Faculty and staff salaries;

(iii) Administration;

(iv) Health care and benefits;

(v) Capital;

(vi) Student services;

(vii) Textbooks; and

(viii) Student housing.

(b) The study must also compare these cost drivers to the cost drivers for institutions and students in the global challenge states and other comparable states, where information is available.

(4) The joint higher education committee shall issue a report of its findings to the house of representatives and senate higher education committees by November 1, 2016.

(5) This section expires July 1, 2017.

--- END ---