BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.42.300 and 1979 ex.s. c 211 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The facility shall have a staff member trained or experienced in food management and nutrition responsible for planning menus that meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section and supervising meal preparation and service to insure that the menu plan is followed.

(2) The menu plans shall follow the orders of the resident's physician.

(3) The facility shall:

(a) Meet the nutritional needs of each resident;

(b) Have menus written in advance;

(c) Provide a variety of foods at each meal;

(d) Provide daily and weekly variations in the menus; ((and))

(e) Adjust the menus for seasonal changes; and

(f) Identify the sodium content of each menu item to be served and make the information available to residents at each meal.

(4) If the facility has residents who require medically prescribed special diets, the menus for those residents shall be planned by a professionally qualified dietitian or reviewed and approved by the attending physician. The preparation and serving of meals shall be supervised to insure that the resident accepts the special diet.

--- END ---