BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An employer shall reimburse his or her employee for the cost of any cell phone and cell phone plan if the employer requires the employee to use a cell phone in the discharge of the employee's duties.

(2) If an employer does not reimburse the employee as required under this section, the employee may bring a civil cause of action. If the employee prevails, the court shall award the employee reasonable attorneys' fees and costs incurred to enforce this section. Awards carry interest at the same rate as civil judgments under RCW 4.56.110. Interest accrues from the date on which the employee incurred the necessary business expense.

--- END ---