BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.08.190 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Prior to making ((distributions))the distribution to cities described in subsection (((2)))(3) of this section, ((amounts))sufficient moneys must be retained to ((support))fund the allotments under RCW 43.88.110 from any legislative appropriation for municipal research and services. The legislative appropriation for such services ((must be in the amount specified))may not be less than the amount required under RCW 66.24.065.

(2) Prior to making distributions described in subsection (3) of this section, the quarterly portion of the ten million dollar amount specified in RCW 66.24.065 must be disbursed to local jurisdictions.

(3)(a) When excess funds are distributed during the months of June, September, December, and March of each year, all moneys subject to distribution must be disbursed ((to border areas, counties, cities, and towns as provided in RCW 66.24.065.

(3) The amount remaining after distributions under subsections (1) and (2) of this section must be deposited into the general fund))as follows:

(i) Three-tenths of one percent to border areas under this section;

(ii) From the amount remaining after distribution under (a)(i) of this subsection:

(A) Fifty percent to the general fund of the state;

(B) Ten percent to the counties of the state; and

(C) Forty percent to the incorporated cities and towns of the state.

(b) The total annual distributions to local governments under this subsection (3) may not be less than the amount required under RCW 66.24.065, excluding the annual ten million dollar distribution in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.08.210 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) With respect to the distribution of funds to the incorporated cities and towns ((under RCW 66.24.290(1)(c),)) the computations for distribution must be made by the state agency responsible for collecting the same as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The share coming to each eligible city or town must be determined by a division among the eligible cities and towns within the state ratably on the basis of population as last determined by the office of financial management. However, no city or town in which the sale of liquor is forbidden as the result of an election is entitled to any share in such distribution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect September 1, 2015.

--- END ---