BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.132.020 and 1983 c 257 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter((:)) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Beverage" means beer or other malt beverage ((or)), mineral water, soda water, or other drink in liquid form and intended for human consumption. The term does not include milk-based, soy-based, or similar products requiring heat and pressure in the canning process.

(2) "Beverage container" means a separate and sealed can containing a beverage.

(3) "Department" means the department of ecology created under chapter 43.21A RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.132.030 and 1982 c 113 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person may sell or offer to sell at retail in this state any beverage container ((so)) designed and constructed so that a metal part of the container is detachable in opening the container through use of a metal ring or tab.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits the sale of a beverage container ((which)) if:

(a) The beverage container's only detachable part is a piece of pressure sensitive or metallic tape; or

(b) The beverage container contains cider, as defined in RCW 66.24.210, or beer and is purposefully designed to be opened by removing the entire lid of the container without leaving sharp edges so that the container is effectively transformed into a drinking cup.

(3) Any beverage container described in subsection (2)(b) of this section must contain wording on the outside of the actual container that instructs the consumer as to the proper disposal method of the container's lid.

--- END ---