BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.88B.041 and 2014 c 139 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following long-term care workers are not required to become a certified home care aide pursuant to this chapter:

(a)(i)(A) Registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, certified nursing assistants or persons who are in an approved training program for certified nursing assistants under chapter 18.88A RCW, medicare-certified home health aides, or other persons who hold a similar health credential, as determined by the secretary, or persons with special education training and an endorsement granted by the superintendent of public instruction, as described in RCW 28A.300.010, if the secretary determines that the circumstances do not require certification.

(B) A person who was initially hired as a long-term care worker prior to January 7, 2012, and who completes all of his or her training requirements in effect as of the date he or she was hired.

(ii) Individuals exempted by (a)(i) of this subsection may obtain certification as a home care aide without fulfilling the training requirements in RCW 74.39A.074(1)(d)(ii) but must successfully complete a certification examination pursuant to RCW 18.88B.031.

(b) All long-term care workers employed by community residential service businesses.

(c) An individual provider caring only for his or her biological, step, or adoptive child or parent.

(d) ((Until July 1, 2016,))A person working as an individual provider who provides twenty hours or less of care for one person in any calendar month.

(e) ((Until July 1, 2016,))A person working as an individual provider who only provides respite services and works less than three hundred hours in any calendar year.

(2) A long-term care worker exempted by this section from the training requirements contained in RCW 74.39A.074 may not be prohibited from enrolling in training pursuant to that section.

(3) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.39A.076 and 2014 c 139 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning January 7, 2012, except for long-term care workers exempt from certification under RCW 18.88B.041(1)(a):

(a) A biological, step, or adoptive parent who is the individual provider only for his or her developmentally disabled son or daughter must receive twelve hours of training relevant to the needs of adults with developmental disabilities within the first one hundred twenty days after becoming an individual provider or within one hundred twenty calendar days after March 29, 2012, whichever is later.

(b) Individual providers identified in (b)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection must complete thirty-five hours of training within the first one hundred twenty days after becoming an individual provider or within one hundred twenty calendar days after March 29, 2012, whichever is later. Five of the thirty-five hours must be completed before becoming eligible to provide care. Two of these five hours shall be devoted to an orientation training regarding an individual provider's role as caregiver and the applicable terms of employment, and three hours shall be devoted to safety training, including basic safety precautions, emergency procedures, and infection control. Individual providers subject to this requirement include:

(i) An individual provider caring only for his or her biological, step, or adoptive child or parent unless covered by (a) of this subsection;

(ii) ((Until July 1, 2016,))A person working as an individual provider who provides twenty hours or less of care for one person in any calendar month; and

(iii) ((Until July 1, 2016,))A person working as an individual provider who only provides respite services and works less than three hundred hours in any calendar year.

(2) In computing the time periods in this section, the first day is the date of hire or March 29, 2012, whichever is applicable.

(3) Only training curriculum approved by the department may be used to fulfill the training requirements specified in this section. The department shall only approve training curriculum that:

(a) Has been developed with input from consumer and worker representatives; and

(b) Requires comprehensive instruction by qualified instructors.

(4) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.39A.341 and 2014 c 139 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All long-term care workers shall complete twelve hours of continuing education training in advanced training topics each year. This requirement applies beginning July 1, 2012.

(2) Completion of continuing education as required in this section is a prerequisite to maintaining home care aide certification under chapter 18.88B RCW.

(3) Unless voluntarily certified as a home care aide under chapter 18.88B RCW, subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:

(a) An individual provider caring only for his or her biological, step, or adoptive child;

(b) Registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;

(c) Before January 1, 2016, a long-term care worker employed by a community residential service business;

(d) ((Until July 1, 2016,))A person working as an individual provider who provides twenty hours or less of care for one person in any calendar month; or

(e) ((Until July 1, 2016,))A person working as an individual provider who only provides respite services and works less than three hundred hours in any calendar year.

(4) Only training curriculum approved by the department may be used to fulfill the training requirements specified in this section. The department shall only approve training curriculum that:

(a) Has been developed with input from consumer and worker representatives; and

(b) Requires comprehensive instruction by qualified instructors.

(5) Individual providers under RCW 74.39A.270 shall be compensated for training time required by this section.

(6) The department of health shall adopt rules to implement subsection (1) of this section.

(7) The department shall adopt rules to implement subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.88B.035 and 2013 c 259 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may issue a provisional certification to a long-term care worker who is limited English proficient to allow the person additional time to comply with the requirement that a long-term care worker become certified as a home care aide within two hundred calendar days after the date of hire as provided in RCW 18.88B.021, if the long-term care worker:

(a) Is limited English proficient; and

(b) Complies with other requirements established by the department in rule.

(2) The department shall issue a provisional certification to a long-term care worker who has met the requirements of subsection (1) of this section. The provisional certification may only be issued once and is valid for no more than sixty days after the expiration of the two hundred calendar day requirement for becoming certified.

(3) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "limited English proficient" means that an individual is limited in his or her ability to read, write, or speak English.

(((5) The department may not issue any provisional certifications after March 1, 2016.

(6) This section expires July 1, 2016.))

--- END ---