BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.44.010 and 1998 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All county and municipal peace officers are hereby charged with the duty of investigating and prosecuting all violations of this title, and the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution, and sale of liquor((, and)). All fines imposed for violations of this title and the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution, and sale of liquor ((shall)) belong to the county, city, or town wherein the court imposing the fine is located, and ((shall)) must be placed in the general fund for payment of the salaries of those engaged in the enforcement of the provisions of this title and the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution, and sale of liquor((: PROVIDED, That)). However, all fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or assessed by a district court because of the violation of a state law ((shall)) must be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is later amended.

(2) In addition to any and all other powers granted, the board ((shall have)) has the power to enforce the penal provisions of this title and the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution, and sale of liquor.

(3) In addition to the other duties under this section, the board ((shall)) must enforce chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW.

(4) The board may appoint and employ, assign to duty and fix the compensation of, officers to be designated as liquor enforcement officers. Such liquor enforcement officers ((shall)) have the power, under the supervision of the board, to enforce the penal provisions of this title and the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution, and sale of liquor. Except for the provisions of the gambling act under chapter 9.46 RCW, liquor enforcement officers have the power and authority to enforce the penal provisions of Titles 9, 9A, and 46 RCW and chapter 69.50 RCW while conducting their enforcement duties related to alcohol, tobacco, and marijuana, or working in partnership with state, county, and municipal peace officers. They ((shall)) have the power and authority to serve and execute all warrants and process of law issued by the courts in enforcing: The penal provisions of this title or of any penal law of this state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution, and sale of liquor((, and)); the provisions of chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW; and the provisions of Titles 9, 9A, and 46 RCW and chapter 69.50 RCW while conducting their enforcement duties related to alcohol, tobacco, and marijuana, or working in partnership with state, county, and municipal peace officers. They ((shall)) have the power to arrest without a warrant any person or persons found in the act of violating: Any of the penal provisions of this title or of any penal law of this state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution, and sale of liquor((, and)); the provisions of chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW; and, except for the gambling act under chapter 9.46 RCW, the provisions of Titles 9, 9A, and 46 RCW and chapter 69.50 RCW while conducting their enforcement duties related to alcohol, tobacco, and marijuana, or working in partnership with state, county, and municipal peace officers.

Sec. 2. RCW 10.93.020 and 2006 c 284 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

((As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "General authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the detection and apprehension of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in general, as distinguished from a limited authority Washington law enforcement agency, and any other unit of government expressly designated by statute as a general authority Washington law enforcement agency. The Washington state patrol and the department of fish and wildlife are general authority Washington law enforcement agencies.

(2) "Limited authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any agency, political subdivision, or unit of local government of this state, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to, the state departments of natural resources and social and health services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission, the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and transportation commission, the state liquor control board, the office of the insurance commissioner, and the state department of corrections.

(3) "General authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time, fully compensated and elected, appointed, or employed officer of a general authority Washington law enforcement agency who is commissioned to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally.

(4) "Limited authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time, fully compensated officer of a limited authority Washington law enforcement agency empowered by that agency to detect or apprehend violators of the laws in some or all of the limited subject areas for which that agency is responsible. A limited authority Washington peace officer may be a specially commissioned Washington peace officer if otherwise qualified for such status under this chapter.

(5) "Specially commissioned Washington peace officer", for the purposes of this chapter, means any officer, whether part-time or full-time, compensated or not, commissioned by a general authority Washington law enforcement agency to enforce some or all of the criminal laws of the state of Washington, who does not qualify under this chapter as a general authority Washington peace officer for that commissioning agency, specifically including reserve peace officers, and specially commissioned full-time, fully compensated peace officers duly commissioned by the states of Oregon or Idaho or any such peace officer commissioned by a unit of local government of Oregon or Idaho. A reserve peace officer is an individual who is an officer of a Washington law enforcement agency who does not serve such agency on a full-time basis but who, when called by the agency into active service, is fully commissioned on the same basis as full-time peace officers to enforce the criminal laws of the state.

(6) "Federal peace officer" means any employee or agent of the United States government who has the authority to carry firearms and make warrantless arrests and whose duties involve the enforcement of criminal laws of the United States.

(7) "Agency with primary territorial jurisdiction" means a city or town police agency which has responsibility for police activity within its boundaries; or a county police or sheriff's department which has responsibility with regard to police activity in the unincorporated areas within the county boundaries; or a statutorily authorized port district police agency or four-year state college or university police agency which has responsibility for police activity within the statutorily authorized enforcement boundaries of the port district, state college, or university.

(8) "Primary commissioning agency" means (a) the employing agency in the case of a general authority Washington peace officer, a limited authority Washington peace officer, an Indian tribal peace officer, or a federal peace officer, and (b) the commissioning agency in the case of a specially commissioned Washington peace officer (i) who is performing functions within the course and scope of the special commission and (ii) who is not also a general authority Washington peace officer, a limited authority Washington peace officer, an Indian tribal peace officer, or a federal peace officer.

(9) "Primary function of an agency" means that function to which greater than fifty percent of the agency's resources are allocated.

(10) "Mutual law enforcement assistance" includes, but is not limited to, one or more law enforcement agencies aiding or assisting one or more other such agencies, including the Washington state liquor control board, through loans or exchanges of personnel or of material resources, for law enforcement purposes.

--- END ---