BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.30 RCW to read as follows:

The board of regents of Washington State University may offer and teach medicine as a major line, and is authorized to establish, operate, and maintain a school of medicine at the university. The board of regents of Washington State University may offer and teach forestry as a major line.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.10.115 and 2009 c 207 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in section 1 of this act, the courses of instruction of both the University of Washington and Washington State University shall embrace as major lines, pharmacy, architecture, and forest management as distinguished from forest products and logging engineering which are exclusive to the University of Washington. These major lines shall be offered and taught at said institutions only.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.20.060 and 2009 c 207 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in section 1 of this act, the courses of instruction of the University of Washington shall embrace as exclusive major lines, law, medicine, forest products, logging engineering, library sciences, and fisheries.

--- END ---