BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.43.380 and 1965 c 8 s 43.43.380 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((minimum)) monthly ((salary))salaries and benefits paid to state patrol officers ((shall))must be ((as follows: Officers, three hundred dollars; staff or technical sergeants, three hundred twenty-five dollars; line sergeants, three hundred fifty dollars; lieutenants, three hundred seventy-five dollars; captains, four hundred twenty-five dollars))competitive with law enforcement agencies within the boundaries of the state of Washington. Adjustments are intended to maintain the existing salary levels within the fiftieth percentile of the top five largest Washington state law enforcement compensation plans.

--- END ---