BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.68.030 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 43 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall forward all fees for vehicle registrations under chapters 46.16A and 46.17 RCW, unless otherwise specified by law, to the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit these moneys to the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

(2) Proceeds from vehicle license fees and renewal vehicle license fees must be deposited by the state treasurer as follows:

(a) (($20.35)) Twenty-eight dollars of each initial or renewal vehicle license fee must be deposited in the state patrol highway account in the motor vehicle fund, hereby created. Vehicle license fees, renewal vehicle license fees, and all other funds in the state patrol highway account must be for the sole use of the Washington state patrol for highway activities of the Washington state patrol, subject to proper appropriations and reappropriations.

(b) (($2.02)) Two dollars of each initial vehicle license fee and (($0.93)) two dollars of each renewal vehicle license fee must be deposited each biennium in the Puget Sound ferry operations account.

(c) Any remaining amounts of vehicle license fees and renewal vehicle license fees that are not distributed otherwise under this section must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

(3) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state patrol highway account to the connecting Washington account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the state patrol highway account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2017.

--- END ---