BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.215.005 and 1999 c 335 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The registration and professional education of surgical technologists is in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.215 RCW to read as follows:

In order to perform functions in a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW or an ambulatory surgical facility defined by RCW 70.230.010, a registered surgical technologist must first submit evidence of any one of the following to the department in a manner acceptable to the secretary:

(1) Successful completion of a nationally and programmatically accredited surgical technology program;

(2) Successful completion of a surgical technology program offered by the United States armed forces; or

(3) Performance of surgical technology functions in a hospital or an ambulatory surgical facility for a period of one year in the five years immediately preceding January 1, 2016. A person who has performed surgical technology functions in a hospital or an ambulatory surgical facility for a period of one year in the five years immediately preceding January 1, 2016, may perform surgical technology functions at any hospital or ambulatory surgical facility after January 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 18.215 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not prohibit or affect:

(1) The practice of an individual licensed, certified, or registered under the laws of this state and performing services within his or her authorized scope of practice;

(2) A person performing functions in the discharge of official duties on behalf of the United States government, including the armed forces, coast guard, public health services, veterans' bureau, or bureau of Indian affairs; or

(3) A person completing the clinical portion of a surgical technology education program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 18.215 RCW to read as follows:

A person who does not meet the requirements of this chapter may practice surgical technology in a health care facility if:

(1) After a reasonable effort has been made, the health care facility is unable to employ a sufficient number of persons who meet the requirements of this chapter; and

(2) The health care facility makes a written record of its efforts made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and retains the record at the health care facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 18.215 RCW to read as follows:

The department of health may adopt rules necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 4 of this act take effect January 1, 2016.

--- END ---