BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.01.050 and 2005 c 282 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All actions against any county may be commenced in the superior court of such county, or in the superior court of either of the two nearest judicial districts. All actions by any county shall be commenced in the superior court of the county in which the defendant resides, or in either of the two judicial districts nearest to the county bringing the action.

(2) The determination of the nearest judicial districts is measured by the travel time between county seats using major surface routes, as determined by the administrative office of the courts.

(3) Any provision in a public works contract with any county that requires actions arising under the contract to be commenced in the superior court of the county is against public policy and the provision is void and unenforceable. This subsection shall not be construed to void any contract provision requiring a dispute arising under the contract to be submitted to arbitration.

--- END ---