BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Beginning August 1, 2015, the department of labor and industries shall convene a work group to discuss establishing definitions, policies, and procedures for mandatory reporting of hazardous exposures suffered in the course of employment by firefighters.

(2) The work group must include, at a minimum, stakeholders representing firefighter unions, fire departments, fire chiefs, state fund public employers, and self-insured employers.

(3) By January 1, 2016, the department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature any recommendations for legislation or rule making.

(4) This section expires January 31, 2016.

--- END ---