BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that overregulation of plumbing and electrical work adds to consumer costs without contributing to public health or safety. It is the intent of the legislature to provide administrative mechanisms to exempt from the plumbing and electrical codes minor or incidental work that does not require regulation for the protection of public health or safety, without necessitating further legislative review or action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director shall by rule exempt from the requirements of this chapter minor or incidental work that does not require certification in order to protect public health or safety.

(2) When making an exemption under subsection (1) of this section, the director may, in addition to public health or safety, consider the following:

(a) Consumer health or safety;

(b) Employee health or safety;

(c) Changes in technology;

(d) Practicality and consistency with best practices; and

(e) Enforceability.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "minor or incidental work" includes but is not limited to work for which the department does not require a permit, work for which the manufacturer routinely includes with the appliance instructions for homeowner installation, or the simple disconnection and reconnection of an appliance or fixture in order to move the appliance or fixture in order to accomplish other work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 18.106 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director shall by rule exempt from the requirements of this chapter minor or incidental work that does not require certification in order to protect public health or safety.

(2) When making an exemption under subsection (1) of this section, the director may, in addition to public health or safety, consider the following:

(a) Consumer health or safety;

(b) Employee health or safety;

(c) Changes in technology;

(d) Practicality and consistency with best practices; and

(e) Enforceability.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "minor or incidental work" includes but is not limited to work for which the department does not require a permit, work for which the manufacturer routinely includes with the appliance instructions for homeowner installation, or the simple disconnection and reconnection of an appliance or fixture in order to move the appliance or fixture in order to accomplish other work.

--- END ---