BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 2.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Before granting an order under any of the following titles of the laws of the state of Washington, the court may consult the judicial information system or any related databases, if available, to determine criminal history or the pendency of other proceedings involving the parties:

(a) Granting any temporary or final order establishing a parenting plan or residential schedule or directing residential placement of a child or restraining or limiting a party's contact with a child under Title 26 RCW;

(b) Granting any order regarding a vulnerable child or adult or alleged incapacitated person irrespective of the title or where contained in the laws of the state of Washington;

(c) Granting letters of guardianship or administration or letters testamentary under Title 11 RCW;

(d) Granting any relief under Title 71 RCW;

(e) Granting any relief in a juvenile proceeding under Title 13 RCW; or

(f) Granting any order of protection, temporary order of protection, or criminal no-contact order under chapter 7.90, 7.92, 9A.46, 10.14, 10.99, 26.50, or 26.52 RCW.

(2) In the event that the court consults such a database, the court shall disclose that fact to the parties and shall disclose any particular matters relied upon by the court in rendering the decision. A copy of the document relied upon must be filed, as a confidential document, within the court file, with any confidential contact information such as addresses, phone numbers, or other information that might disclose the location or whereabouts of any person redacted from the document or documents.

--- END ---