BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.555 and 2009 c 577 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the fees authorized in this chapter, the department shall include a surcharge to fund biotoxin testing and monitoring by the department of health of beaches used for recreational shellfishing, and to fund monitoring by the Olympic region harmful algal bloom program of the Olympic natural resources center at the University of Washington. A surcharge of ((three))four dollars applies to resident and nonresident shellfish and seaweed licenses as authorized by RCW 77.32.520(3) (a) and (b); a surcharge of ((two))three dollars applies to resident and nonresident adult combination licenses as authorized by RCW 77.32.470(2)(a); a surcharge of ((two))three dollars applies to annual resident and nonresident razor clam licenses as authorized by RCW 77.32.520(4); and a surcharge of ((one))two dollars applies to the three-day razor clam license authorized by RCW 77.32.520(5). Amounts collected from these surcharges must be deposited in the biotoxin account created in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) Any moneys from surcharges remaining in the general fund—local account after the 2007-2009 biennium must be transferred to the biotoxin account created in subsection (3) of this section and be credited to the appropriate institution. The department of health and the University of Washington shall, by December 1st of each year, provide a letter to the relevant legislative policy and fiscal committees on the status of expenditures. This letter shall include, but is not limited to, the annual appropriation amount, the amount not expended, account fund balance, and reasons for not spending the full annual appropriation.

(3) The biotoxin account is created in the state treasury to be administered by the department of health. All moneys received under subsection (1) of this section must be deposited in the account and used by the department of health and the University of Washington as required by subsection (1) of this section. Of the moneys deposited into the account, one hundred fifty thousand dollars per year must be made available to the University of Washington to implement subsection (1) of this section. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

--- END ---