BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 1.20.017 and 2013 c 5 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each public entity ((shall))must display the national league of families' POW/MIA flag along with the flag of the United States and the flag of the state upon or near the principal building of the public entity on the following days: (a) Former Prisoners of War Recognition Day on April 9th; (b) Welcome Home Vietnam Veterans Day on March 30; (((b)))(c) Armed Forces Day on the third Saturday in May; (((c)))(d) Memorial Day on the last Monday in May; (((d)))(e) Flag Day on June 14; (((e)))(f) Independence Day on July 4; (((f)))(g) National Korean War Veterans Armistice Day on July 27; (((g)))(h) National POW/MIA Recognition Day on the third Friday in September; ((and (h)))(i) Veterans' Day on November 11th; and (j) Pearl Harbor Remembrance Day on December 7th. If the designated day falls on a Saturday or Sunday, then the POW/MIA flag ((will))must be displayed on the preceding Friday.

(2) The governor's veterans affairs advisory committee ((shall))must provide information to public entities regarding the purchase and display of the POW/MIA flag upon request.

(3) As used in this section, "public entity" means every state agency, including each institution of higher education, and every county, city, and town.

--- END ---