BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.22.010 and 2011 c 281 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Cottage food operation" means a person who produces cottage food products only in the home kitchen of that person's primary domestic residence in Washington and only for sale directly to the consumer.

(2) "Cottage food products" means nonpotentially hazardous baked goods; baked candies and candies made on a stovetop; jams, jellies, preserves, and fruit butters as defined in 21 C.F.R. Sec. 150 as it existed on July 22, 2011; and other nonpotentially hazardous foods identified by the director in rule.

(3) "Department" means the department of agriculture.

(4) "Director" means the director of the department.

(5) "Domestic residence" means a single-family dwelling or an area within a rental unit where a single person or family actually resides. Domestic residence does not include:

(a) A group or communal residential setting within any type of structure; or

(b) An outbuilding, shed, barn, or other similar structure.

(6) "Home kitchen" means a kitchen primarily intended for use by the residents of a home. It may contain one or more stoves or ovens, which may be a double oven, designed for residential use.

(7) "Permitted area" means the portion of a domestic residence housing a home kitchen where the preparation, packaging, storage, or handling of cottage food products occurs.

(8) "Potentially hazardous food" means foods requiring temperature control for safety because they are capable of supporting the rapid growth of pathogenic or toxigenic microorganisms, or the growth and toxin production of Clostridium botulinum.

--- END ---