BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.43.039 and 2014 c 84 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For an enrollee who is in the second or third month of the grace period, an issuer of a qualified health plan shall:

(a) Upon request by a health care provider or health care facility, provide information regarding the enrollee's eligibility status in real-time; and

(b) Notify a health care provider or health care facility that an enrollee is in the grace period within three business days after submittal of a claim or status request for services provided.

(2) The information or notification required under subsection (1) of this section must, at a minimum:

(a) Indicate "grace period" or use the appropriate national coding standard as the reason for pending the claim if a claim is pended due to the enrollee's grace period status; and

(b) Except for notifications provided electronically, indicate that enrollee is in the second or third month of the grace period.

(3) Except as required by RCW 70.170.060(1), a health care provider may choose whether to provide care to an enrollee who is in the second or third month of the grace period.

(4) By December 1, 2014, and annually each December 1st thereafter, the health benefit exchange shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the following information for the calendar year: (a) The number of exchange enrollees who entered the grace period; (b) the number of enrollees who subsequently paid premium after entering the grace period; (c) the average number of days enrollees were in the grace period prior to paying premium; and (d) the number of enrollees who were in the grace period and whose coverage was terminated due to nonpayment of premium. The report must include as much data as is available for the calendar year.

(((4)))(5) For purposes of this section, "grace period" means nonpayment of premiums by an enrollee receiving advance payments of the premium tax credit, as defined in section 1412 of the patient protection and affordable care act, P.L. 111-148, as amended by the health care and education reconciliation act, P.L. 111-152, and implementing regulations issued by the federal department of health and human services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act does not modify any rights in an agreement in existence on the effective date of this section.

--- END ---