BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.71.030 and 2012 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The exchange may, consistent with the purposes of this chapter: (a) Sue and be sued in its own name; (b) make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments, with any public or private person or entity; (c) employ, contract with, or engage personnel; (d) pay administrative costs; (e) accept grants, donations, loans of funds, and contributions in money, services, materials or otherwise, from the United States or any of its agencies, from the state of Washington and its agencies or from any other source, and use or expend those moneys, services, materials, or other contributions; and (f) ((aggregate or delegate the aggregation of funds that comprise the premium for a health plan; and (g))) complete other duties necessary to begin open enrollment in qualified health plans through the exchange beginning October 1, 2013.

(2) The board shall develop a methodology to ensure the exchange is self-sustaining after December 31, 2014. The board shall seek input from health carriers to develop funding mechanisms that fairly and equitably apportion among carriers the reasonable administrative costs and expenses incurred to implement the provisions of this chapter. The board shall submit its recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2012. If the legislature does not enact legislation during the 2013 regular session to modify or reject the board's recommendations, the board may proceed with implementation of the recommendations.

(3) The board shall establish policies that permit city and county governments, Indian tribes, tribal organizations, urban Indian organizations, private foundations, and other entities to pay premiums on behalf of qualified individuals.

(4) The employees of the exchange may participate in the public employees' retirement system under chapter 41.40 RCW and the public employees' benefits board under chapter 41.05 RCW.

(5) Qualified employers may access coverage for their employees through the exchange for small groups under section 1311 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended. The exchange shall enable any qualified employer to specify a level of coverage so that any of its employees may enroll in any qualified health plan offered through the small group exchange at the specified level of coverage.

(6) The exchange shall report its activities and status to the governor and the legislature as requested, and no less often than annually.

(7) The exchange shall not aggregate or delegate the aggregation of funds that comprise the premium for an individual qualified health plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act applies to health benefit exchange provisions beginning with the 2016 open enrollment period.

--- END ---