BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

Agricultural land, as defined in RCW 90.58.065, may not be converted to wetland or fish habitat, nor may it be subjected to tidal inundation.

--- END ---