BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.38.310 and 2013 c 225 s 130 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor may enter into an agreement with any federally recognized Indian tribe that (a) is located on a reservation within this state or (b) has lands held in trust by the United States government in a county that is west of the Cascade mountain range that borders Puget Sound with a population of at least one hundred eighteen thousand persons, but less than two hundred fifty thousand persons, regarding fuel taxes included in the price of fuel delivered to a retail station wholly owned and operated by a tribe, tribal enterprise, or tribal member licensed by the tribe to operate a retail station located on reservation or trust property. The agreement may provide mutually agreeable means to address any tribal immunities or any preemption of the fuel tax.

(2) The provisions of this section do not repeal existing state/tribal fuel tax agreements or consent decrees in existence on May 15, 2007. The state and the tribe may agree to substitute an agreement negotiated under this section for an existing agreement or consent decree, or to enter into an agreement using a methodology similar to the state/tribal fuel tax agreements in effect on May 15, 2007.

(3) If a new agreement is negotiated, the agreement must:

(a) Require that the tribe or the tribal retailer acquire all fuel only from persons or companies operating lawfully in accordance with this chapter as a fuel distributor, supplier, or blender, or from a tribal distributor, supplier, or blender lawfully doing business according to all applicable laws;

(b) Provide that the tribe will expend fuel tax proceeds or equivalent amounts on: Planning, construction, and maintenance of roads, bridges, and boat ramps; transit services and facilities; transportation planning; police services; and other highway-related purposes;

(c) Include provisions for audits or other means of ensuring compliance to certify the number of gallons of fuel purchased by the tribe for resale at tribal retail stations, and the use of fuel tax proceeds or their equivalent for the purposes identified in (b) of this subsection. Compliance reports must be delivered to the director of the department of licensing.

(4) Information from the tribe or tribal retailers received by the state or open to state review under the terms of an agreement are deemed personal information under RCW 42.56.230 (4)(b) and are exempt from public inspection and copying.

(5) The governor may delegate the power to negotiate fuel tax agreements to the department of licensing.

(6) The department of licensing must prepare and submit an annual report to the legislature on the status of existing agreements and any ongoing negotiations with tribes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2016.

--- END ---