BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.10.440 and 2013 c 222 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The maximum total dollar amount that may be awarded under a job order contract is four million dollars per year for a maximum of three years. The maximum total dollar amount that may be awarded under a job order contract for the department of enterprise services and counties with a population of more than one million is six million dollars per year for a maximum of three years.

(2) Job order contracts may be executed for an initial contract term of not to exceed two years, with the option of extending or renewing the job order contract for one year. All extensions or renewals must be priced as provided in the request for proposals. The extension or renewal must be mutually agreed to by the public body and the job order contractor.

(3) A public body may have no more than two job order contracts in effect at any one time, with the exception of the department of enterprise services, which may have ((four))six job order contracts in effect at any one time.

(4) At least ninety percent of work contained in a job order contract must be subcontracted to entities other than the job order contractor. The job order contractor must distribute contracts as equitably as possible among qualified and available subcontractors including minority and woman-owned subcontractors to the extent permitted by law.

(5) The job order contractor shall publish notification of intent to perform public works projects at the beginning of each contract year in a statewide publication and in a legal newspaper of general circulation in every county in which the public works projects are anticipated.

(6) Job order contractors shall pay prevailing wages for all work that would otherwise be subject to the requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW. Prevailing wages for all work performed pursuant to each work order must be the rates in effect at the time the individual work order is issued.

(7) If, in the initial contract term, the public body, at no fault of the job order contractor, fails to issue the minimum amount of work orders stated in the public request for proposals, the public body shall pay the contractor an amount equal to the difference between the minimum work order amount and the actual total of the work orders issued multiplied by an appropriate percentage for overhead and profit contained in the contract award coefficient for services as specified in the request for proposals. This is the contractor's sole remedy.

(8) All job order contracts awarded under this section must be signed before July 1, 2021; however the job order contract may be extended or renewed as provided for in this section.

(9) Public bodies may amend job order contracts awarded prior to July 1, 2007, in accordance with this chapter.

--- END ---