BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.15.260 and 2012 c 176 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of unlawful trafficking in fish, shellfish, or wildlife in the second degree if the person traffics in fish, shellfish, or wildlife with a wholesale value of less than two hundred fifty dollars and:

(a) The fish(([, shellfish,])), shellfish, or wildlife is classified as game, food fish, shellfish, game fish, or protected wildlife and the trafficking is not authorized by statute or department rule; or

(b) The fish, shellfish, or wildlife is unclassified and the trafficking violates any department rule.

(2)(a) A person is guilty of unlawful trafficking in fish, shellfish, or wildlife in the first degree if the person commits the act described by subsection (1) of this section and:

(i) The fish, shellfish, or wildlife has a value of two hundred fifty dollars or more; or

(ii) The fish, shellfish, or wildlife is designated as an endangered species or deleterious exotic wildlife and such trafficking is not authorized by any statute or department rule.

(b) For purposes of this subsection (2), whenever any series of transactions that constitute unlawful trafficking would, when considered separately, constitute unlawful trafficking in the second degree due to the value of the fish, shellfish, or wildlife, and the series of transactions are part of a common scheme or plan, then the transactions may be aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of all the transactions considered when determining the degree of unlawful trafficking involved.

(3)(a) Unlawful trafficking in fish, shellfish, or wildlife in the second degree is a class C felony.

(b) Unlawful trafficking in fish, shellfish, or wildlife in the first degree is a class B felony.

--- END ---