BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.320.010 and 2010 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Any person" means adults and children of any nationality.

(2) "Domestic employers of foreign workers" or "domestic employer" means a person or persons residing in the state of Washington who recruit or employ a foreign worker to perform work in Washington state.

(((2))) (3) "Forced labor" means all work or service which is exacted from any person under the menace of any penalty and to which the person has not offered himself or herself voluntarily.

(4) "Foreign worker" or "worker" means a person who is not a citizen of the United States, who comes to Washington state based on an offer of employment, and who holds a nonimmigrant visa for temporary visitors.

(((3))) (5) "Human trafficking" or "trafficking" means an act conducted for the purpose of exploitation, including forced labor, by particular means, for example, by threat of use of force or other forms of coercion, abduction, or fraud or deception.

(6) "International labor recruitment agency" means a corporation, partnership, business, or other legal entity, whether or not organized under the laws of the United States or any state, that does business in the United States and offers Washington state entities engaged in the employment or recruitment of foreign workers, employment referral services involving citizens of a foreign country or countries by acting as an intermediary between these foreign workers and Washington employers.

(7) "Menace of any penalty" means all forms of criminal sanctions and other forms of coercion, including threats, violence, retention of identity documents, confinement, nonpayment or illegal deduction of wages, or debt bondage. "Menace of any penalty" does not include requiring an employee to work overtime or to work certain hours, days, or schedules as a condition of employment or continued employment if the requirement is not prohibited under Washington state and federal laws or regulations.

(8) "Work or service" means all types of work, employment, or occupation, whether legal or not.

--- END ---