BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.16A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must make available a studded tire permit authorizing the use of studded tires as provided under RCW 46.37.420 to a vehicle owner upon submittal of a proper application and payment of the studded tire permit fee under RCW 46.17.400(1)(g). The permit is not part of the motor vehicle registration process.

(2) Each studded tire permit is valid for one winter season. The permit must be affixed to the bottom left corner of the vehicle's windshield and be clearly visible. The department must change the background color of the permit for each winter season. Permits must be made available by October 1st of each year before the ensuing winter season.

(3) Operating a vehicle on a public highway without a valid studded tire permit and properly affixing the permit to the vehicle as required under this section is a traffic infraction with a penalty amount of five hundred dollars, which must be distributed under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.17.400 and 2011 c 171 s 62 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before accepting an application for one of the following permits, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant to pay the following permit fee by permit type in addition to any other fee or tax required by law:

PERMIT TYPE

FEE

AUTHORITY

DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary

$15.00

RCW 46.16A.300

RCW 46.68.030

(b) Department

temporary

$ .50

RCW 46.16A.305

RCW 46.68.450

(c) Farm vehicle trip

$ 6.25

RCW 46.16A.330

RCW 46.68.035

(d) Nonresident military

$10.00

RCW 46.16A.340

RCW 46.68.070

(e) Nonresident

temporary

snowmobile

$ 5.00

RCW 46.10.450

RCW 46.68.350

(f) Special fuel trip

$30.00

RCW 82.38.100

RCW 46.68.460

(g) Studded tire

$100.00

Section 1 of

this act

Section 3 of this act

(h) Temporary ORV use

$ 7.00

RCW 46.09.430

RCW 46.68.045

(((h)))(i) Vehicle trip

$25.00

RCW 46.16A.320

RCW 46.68.455

(2) Permit fees as provided in subsection (1) of this section are in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005, except an additional filing fee may not be charged for:

(a) Dealer temporary permits;

(b) Special fuel trip permits; and

(c) Vehicle trip permits.

(3) Five dollars of the fifteen dollar dealer temporary permit fee provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section must be credited to the payment of vehicle license fees at the time application for registration is made. The remainder must be deposited to the state patrol highway account created in RCW 46.68.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

The studded tire permit fee provided in RCW 46.17.400(1)(g) and the studded tire permit penalty amount provided in section 1(3) of this act must be distributed as follows: Fifty percent for state road maintenance, ten percent to the department for administration of the studded tire permit program, and forty percent to the local government where the vehicle is registered to be used for road maintenance.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.37.420 and 2012 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful to operate a vehicle upon the public highways of this state unless it is completely equipped with pneumatic rubber tires except vehicles equipped with temporary-use spare tires that meet federal standards that are installed and used in accordance with the manufacturer's instructions.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no tire on a vehicle moved on a highway may have on its periphery any block, flange, cleat, or spike or any other protuberance of any material other than rubber which projects beyond the tread of the traction surface of the tire((, except that)).

(3)(a) It is permissible to use: (i) Farm machinery equipped with pneumatic tires or solid rubber tracks having protuberances that will not injure the highway((,)); and ((except also that it is permissible to use))(ii)(A) tire chains, (B) alternative traction devices, or (C) metal studs imbedded within the tire subject to studded tire permit requirements under section 1 of this act, of reasonable proportions and of a type conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol, upon any vehicle when required for safety because of snow, ice, or other conditions tending to cause a vehicle to skid.

(b) It is unlawful to use metal studs imbedded within the tire between April 1st and November 1st, except that a vehicle may be equipped year-round with tires that have retractable studs if: (((a)))(i) The studs retract pneumatically or mechanically to below the wear bar of the tire when not in use; and (((b)))(ii) the retractable studs are engaged only between November 1st and April 1st. Retractable studs may be made of metal or other material and are not subject to the lightweight stud weight requirements under RCW 46.04.272. The state department of transportation may, from time to time, determine additional periods in which the use of tires with metal studs imbedded therein is lawful. The term of the studded tire permit issued under section 1 of this act must be extended at no additional cost to the permit holder if the department of transportation determines that additional periods of the use of metal studs imbedded in tires is lawful.

(((3)))(4) The state department of transportation and local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may issue special permits authorizing the operation upon a highway of traction engines or tractors having movable tracks with transverse corrugations upon the periphery of the movable tracks or farm tractors or other farm machinery, the operation of which upon a highway would otherwise be prohibited under this section.

(((4)))(5) Tires with metal studs imbedded therein may be used between November 1st and April 1st upon school buses and fire department vehicles, any law or regulation to the contrary notwithstanding.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.17.040 and 2014 c 59 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall collect a service fee of:

(a) Twelve dollars for changes in a certificate of title, with or without registration renewal, or for verification of record and preparation of an affidavit of lost title other than at the time of the certificate of title application or transfer; and

(b) Five dollars for a registration renewal, issuing a transit permit or a studded tire permit, or any other service under this section.

(2) Service fees collected under this section by the department or county auditor or other agent appointed by the director must be credited to the capital vessel replacement account under RCW 47.60.322.

--- END ---