BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.520 and 1998 c 245 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of licensing shall use moneys designated for the motorcycle safety education account of the highway safety fund to implement by July 1, 1983, a voluntary motorcycle operator training and education program. The director may contract with public and private entities to implement this program.

(2) There is created a motorcycle safety education advisory board to assist the director of licensing in the development of a motorcycle operator training education program. The board shall monitor this program following implementation and report to the director of licensing as necessary with recommendations including, but not limited to, administration, application, and substance of the motorcycle operator training and education program.

The board shall consist of five members appointed by the director of licensing. Three members of the board, one of whom shall be appointed chairperson, shall be active motorcycle riders or members of nonprofit motorcycle organizations which actively support and promote motorcycle safety education. One member shall be a currently employed Washington state patrol motorcycle officer with at least five years experience and at least one year cumulative experience as a motorcycle officer. One member shall be a member of the public. The term of appointment shall be two years. The board shall meet ((at the call of the director, but not less than two times annually and not less than five times during its term of appointment))quarterly at 7:00 p.m. on the first or second Friday of the last month of each quarter as determined by the members during the September meeting, and shall receive no compensation for services but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses while engaged in business of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended.

(3) The priorities of the program shall be in the following order of priority:

(a) Public awareness of motorcycle safety.

(b) Motorcycle safety education programs conducted by public and private entities.

(c) Classroom and on-cycle training.

(d) Improved motorcycle operator testing.

--- END ---