BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.350.005 and 2005 c 424 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature declares that promoting the health of state residents is a fundamental purpose of state government. The legislature declares it to be a clear public purpose and governmental function to promote life sciences research to foster a preventive and predictive vision of the next generation of health-related innovations, to enhance the competitive position of Washington ((state)) in this vital sector of the economy, and to improve the quality and delivery of health care for the people of Washington.

(2) The legislature also declares that a mission to promote life sciences to spur innovation and improve the quality of life for Washingtonians should encompass the entirety of the life sciences discipline and also include innovations related to agricultural and forestry crop production and animal sciences.

(3) The legislature finds that public support for and promotion of life sciences research will benefit the state and its residents through improved health status and health outcomes, economic development, and contributions to scientific knowledge, and such research will lead to breakthroughs and improvements that might not otherwise be discovered due to lack of existing market incentives, especially in the area of regenerative medicine and agricultural production.

(4) The legislature finds that public support for and promotion of life sciences research has the potential to provide cures or new treatments for many debilitating diseases that cost the state millions of dollars each year.

(5) It is appropriate and consistent with the intent of the master settlement agreement between the state and tobacco product manufacturers to invest a portion of the revenues derived therefrom by the state in life sciences research, to leverage the revenues with other funds, and to encourage cooperation and innovation among public and private institutions involved in life sciences research.

(6) The purpose of this chapter is to establish a life sciences discovery fund authority, to grant that authority the power to contract with the state to receive revenues under the master settlement agreement, and to contract with other entities to receive other funds, and to disburse those funds consistent with the purpose of this chapter.

(7) The life sciences discovery fund is intended to promote the best available research in life sciences disciplines through diverse Washington institutions and to build upon existing strengths in the area of biosciences and biomanufacturing in order to spread the economic benefits across the state. The life sciences discovery fund is also intended to foster improved health care outcomes and improved agricultural production research across this state and the world.

(8) The research investments of the life sciences discovery fund are intended to further the goals of the "Bio 21" report and to support future statewide, comprehensive strategies to lead the nation in life sciences-related research and employment.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.350.010 and 2005 c 424 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Authority" means the life sciences discovery fund authority created in this chapter.

(2) "Board" means the governing board of trustees of the authority.

(3) "Contribution agreement" means any agreement authorized under this chapter in which a private entity or a public entity other than the state agrees to provide to the authority contributions for the purpose of promoting life sciences research.

(4) "Life sciences research" means advanced and applied research and development intended to improve human health, including scientific study of the developing brain and human learning and development, and other areas of scientific research and development vital to the state's economy, such as agricultural crop and animal sciences research.

(5) "Master settlement agreement" means the national master settlement agreement and related documents entered into on November 23, 1998, by the state and the four principal United States tobacco product manufacturers, as amended and supplemented, for the settlement of litigation brought by the state against the tobacco product manufacturers.

(6) "Public employee" means any person employed by the state of Washington or any agency or political subdivision thereof.

(7) "Public facilities" means any public institution, public facility, public equipment, or any physical asset owned, leased, or controlled by the state of Washington or any agency or political subdivision thereof.

(8) "Public funds" means any funds received or controlled by the state of Washington or any agency or political subdivision thereof, including, but not limited to, funds derived from federal, state, or local taxes, gifts or grants from any source, public or private, federal grants or payments, or intergovernmental transfers.

(9) "State agreement" means the agreement authorized under this chapter in which the state provides to the authority the strategic contribution payments required to be made by tobacco product manufacturers to the state and the state's rights to receive such payments, pursuant to the master settlement agreement, for the purpose of promoting life sciences research.

(10) "Strategic contribution payments" means the payments designated as such under the master settlement agreement, which will be made to the state in the years 2008 through 2017.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.350.030 and 2005 c 424 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to other powers and duties prescribed in this chapter, the authority is empowered to:

(1) Use public moneys in the life sciences discovery fund, leveraging those moneys with amounts received from other public and private sources in accordance with contribution agreements, to promote life sciences research;

(2) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, and bequests, and enter into contribution agreements with private entities and public entities other than the state to receive moneys in consideration of the authority's promise to leverage those moneys with amounts received through appropriations from the legislature and contributions from other public entities and private entities, in order to use those moneys to promote life sciences research. Nonstate moneys received by the authority for this purpose shall be deposited in the life sciences discovery fund created in RCW 43.350.070;

(3) Hold funds received by the authority in trust for their use pursuant to this chapter to promote life sciences research;

(4) Manage its funds, obligations, and investments as necessary and as consistent with its purpose including the segregation of revenues into separate funds and accounts;

(5) Make grants to entities pursuant to contract for the promotion of life sciences research to be conducted in the state. Grant agreements shall specify deliverables to be provided by the recipient pursuant to the grant. The authority shall solicit requests for funding and evaluate the requests by reference to factors such as: (a) The quality of the proposed research; (b) its potential to improve health outcomes, with particular attention to the likelihood that it will also lower health care costs, substitute for a more costly diagnostic or treatment modality, or offer a breakthrough treatment for a particular disease or condition; (c) its potential for leveraging additional funding; (d) its potential to provide improvements in agricultural production and animal sciences, health care benefits, or benefits to human learning and development; (e) its potential to stimulate the health care delivery, biomedical manufacturing, and life sciences related employment in the state; (f) the geographic diversity of the grantees within Washington; (g) evidence of potential royalty income and contractual means to recapture such income for purposes of this chapter; and (h) evidence of public and private collaboration;

(6) Create one or more advisory boards composed of scientists, industrialists, and others familiar with life sciences research; and

(7) Adopt policies and procedures to facilitate the orderly process of grant application, review, and reward.

--- END ---