BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends by this act to implement equal protection under Article I, section 12 of the state Constitution for the right to life of each born and preborn human person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act shall be known and may be cited as the Washington state life at conception act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. To implement equal protection for the right to life of each born and preborn human person, and pursuant to the duty and authority of the legislature, including the legislature's power under Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution, to make necessary and proper laws, the legislature hereby declares that the right to life guaranteed by Article I, section 3 of the state Constitution is vested in each human being.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. For purposes of this act, the terms "human person" and "human being" include each and every member of the species homo sapiens at all stages of life including, but not limited to, the moment of fertilization, cloning, and other moment at which an individual member of the human species comes into being.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 1 RCW.

--- END ---