BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.15.031 and 2012 c 230 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The term "operating fees" as used in this chapter shall include the fees, other than building fees, charged all students registering at the state's colleges and universities but shall not include fees for short courses, self-supporting degree credit programs and courses, marine station work, experimental station work, correspondence or extension courses, and individual instruction and student deposits or rentals, disciplinary and library fines, which colleges and universities shall have the right to impose, laboratory, gymnasium, health, technology and student activity fees, or fees, charges, rentals, and other income derived from any or all revenue producing lands, buildings and facilities of the colleges or universities heretofore or hereafter acquired, constructed or installed, including but not limited to income from rooms, dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing or student activity buildings, vehicular parking facilities, land, or the appurtenances thereon, or such other special fees as may be established by any college or university board of trustees or regents from time to time. All moneys received as operating fees at any institution of higher education shall be deposited in a local account containing only operating fees revenue and related interest: PROVIDED, That a minimum of five percent of operating fees shall be retained by ((the)) any four-year institution((s)) of higher education that ((increase)) increased tuition for resident undergraduate students above assumed tuition increases in the 2011-2013 or 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act, a minimum of four percent of operating fees shall be retained by four-year institutions of higher education that ((do)) did not increase tuition for resident undergraduates above assumed increases in the 2011-2013 or 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act, and a minimum of three and one-half percent of operating fees shall be retained by the community and technical colleges for the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820. At least thirty percent of operating fees required to be retained by the four-year institutions for purposes of RCW 28B.15.820 shall be used only for the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820(10).

(2) In addition to the three and one-half percent of operating fees retained by the institutions under subsection (1) of this section, up to three percent of operating fees charged to students at community and technical colleges shall be transferred to the community and technical college innovation account for the implementation of the college board's strategic technology plan in RCW 28B.50.515. The percentage to be transferred to the community and technical college innovation account shall be determined by the college board each year but shall not exceed three percent of the operating fees collected each year.

(3) Local operating fee accounts shall not be subject to appropriation by the legislature but shall be subject to allotment procedures by budget program and fiscal year under chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.15.067 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 958 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) ((Beginning in the 2011-12 academic year,)) Reductions or increases in full-time tuition fees shall be as provided in the omnibus appropriations act for resident undergraduate students at four-year institutions of higher education and community and technical colleges. The governing boards of the state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College; and the state board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates, including nonresident students, summer school students, and students in other self-supporting degree programs((. Percentage increases in full-time tuition)), and increases may exceed the fiscal growth factor. ((Except during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the state board for community and technical colleges may pilot or institute differential tuition models. The board may define scale, scope, and rationale for the models.))

(3)(a) ((Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year and through the end of the 2014-15 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students, including summer school students and students in other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or students; however, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, reductions or increases in tuition must be uniform among resident undergraduate students.

(b))) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with existing student associations or organizations with student undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of potential tuition increases. Each governing board shall make public its proposal for tuition and fee increases twenty-one days before the governing board of the institution considers adoption and allow opportunity for public comment. However, the requirement to make public a proposal for tuition and fee increases twenty-one days before the governing board considers adoption shall not apply if the omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by May 15th. Governing boards shall be required to provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid for by aid.

(((c))) (b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year, the state board for community and technical college system shall consult with existing student associations or organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the impacts of potential tuition increases. The state board for community and technical colleges shall provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid for by aid.

(4) ((Beginning with the 2015-16 academic year through the 2018-19 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College may set tuition for resident undergraduates as follows:

(a) If state funding for a college or university falls below the state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year 2011, the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in (d) of this subsection, reduce enrollments, or both;

(b) If state funding for a college or university is at least at the level of state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year 2011, the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in (d) of this subsection and shall continue to at least maintain the actual enrollment levels for fiscal year 2011 or increase enrollments as required in the omnibus appropriations act;

(c) If state funding is increased so that combined with resident undergraduate tuition the sixtieth percentile of the total per-student funding at similar public institutions of higher education in the global challenge states under RCW 28B.15.068 is exceeded, the governing board shall decrease tuition by the amount needed for the total per-student funding to be at the sixtieth percentile under RCW 28B.15.068; and

(d) The amount of tuition set by the governing board for an institution under this subsection (4) may not exceed the sixtieth percentile of the resident undergraduate tuition of similar public institutions of higher education in the global challenge states.

(5))) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.

(((6))) (5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement program through an interlocal agreement between a school district and a community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.110.

(((7))) (6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose of obtaining a high school diploma.

(((8) Beginning in the 2019-20 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduates at four-year institutions of higher education shall be as provided in the omnibus appropriations act.

(9) The legislative advisory committee to the committee on advanced tuition payment established in RCW 28B.95.170 shall:

(a) Review the impact of differential tuition rates on the funded status and future unit price of the Washington advanced college tuition payment program; and

(b) No later than January 14, 2013, make a recommendation to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding how differential tuition should be addressed in order to maintain the ongoing solvency of the Washington advanced college tuition payment program.))

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.15.102 and 2014 c 162 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year,)) Any four-year institution of higher education that ((increases)) increased tuition beyond levels assumed in the 2011-2013 or 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act is subject to the financial aid requirements included in this section ((and shall remain subject to these requirements through the 2018-19 academic year)).

(2) ((Beginning July 1, 2011, each)) Four-year institutions of higher education that ((raises)) increased tuition beyond levels assumed in the 2011-2013 or 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act ((shall, in a manner consistent with the goal of enhancing the quality of and access to their institutions,)) must provide financial aid to offset full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students as follows:

(a) Subtract from the full-time tuition fees an amount that is equal to the maximum amount of a state need grant award that would be given to an eligible student with a family income at or below fifty percent of the state's median family income as determined by the student achievement council; and

(b) Offset the remainder as follows:

(i) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are at or below fifty percent of the state's median family income shall receive financial aid equal to one hundred percent of the remainder if an institution's full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students is five percent or greater of the state's median family income for a family of four as provided by the student achievement council;

(ii) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are greater than fifty percent and no more than seventy percent of the state's median family income shall receive financial aid equal to seventy-five percent of the remainder if an institution's full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students is ten percent or greater of the state's median family income for a family of four as provided by the student achievement council;

(iii) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes exceed seventy percent and are less than one hundred percent of the state's median family income shall receive financial aid equal to fifty percent of the remainder if an institution's full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students is fifteen percent or greater of the state's median family income for a family of four as provided by the student achievement council; and

(iv) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are at or exceed one hundred percent and are no more than one hundred twenty-five percent of the state's median family income shall receive financial aid equal to twenty-five percent of the remainder if an institution's full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students is twenty percent or greater of the state's median family income for a family of four as provided by the student achievement council.

(3) The financial aid required in subsection (2) of this section shall:

(a) Be reduced by the amount of other financial aid awards, not including the state need grant;

(b) Be prorated based on credit load; and

(c) Only be provided to students up to demonstrated need.

(4) Financial aid sources and methods may be:

(a) Tuition revenue or locally held funds;

(b) Tuition waivers created by a four-year institution of higher education for the specific purpose of serving low and middle-income students; or

(c) Local financial aid programs.

(5) Use of tuition waivers as specified in subsection (4)(b) of this section shall not be included in determining total state tuition waiver authority as defined in RCW 28B.15.910.

(6) By December 31st every year, four-year institutions of higher education that ((increase)) increased tuition beyond levels assumed in the 2011-2013 or 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act ((after January 1, 2011,)) shall report to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature on the effectiveness of the various sources and methods of financial aid in mitigating tuition increases. ((A key purpose of these reports is to provide information regarding the results of the decision to grant tuition-setting authority to the four-year institutions of higher education and whether tuition setting authority should continue to be granted to the institutions or revert back to the legislature after consideration of the impacts on students, including educational access, affordability, and quality.)) These reports shall include:

(a) The amount of financial aid provided to middle-income and low-income resident students with demonstrated need in the aggregate and per student;

(b) An itemization of the sources and methods of financial aid provided by the four-year institution of higher education in the aggregate and per student for resident undergraduate students;

(c) An analysis of the combined impact of federal tuition tax credits and financial aid provided by the institution of higher education on the net cost to students and their families resulting from tuition increases;

(d) In cases where tuition increases are greater than those assumed in the omnibus appropriations act at any four-year institution of higher education, the institution must include an explanation in its report of why this increase was necessary and how the institution will mitigate the effects of the increase. The institution must include in this section of its report a plan and specific timelines; and

(e) An analysis of changes in resident student enrollment patterns, participation rates, graduation rates, and debt load, by race and ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin, age, and socioeconomic status, and a plan to mitigate effects of reduced diversity due to tuition increases. This analysis shall include disaggregated data for resident students in the following income brackets:

(i) Up to seventy percent of the median family income;

(ii) Between seventy-one percent and one hundred twenty-five percent of the median family income; ((and))

(iii) Between one hundred twenty-six percent and one hundred seventy-five percent of the median family income;

(iv) Between one hundred seventy-six percent and two hundred twenty-five percent of the median family income; and

(v) Above ((one)) two hundred twenty-five percent of the median family income.

(7) Beginning in the 2012-13 academic year, the University of Washington shall enroll during each academic year at least the same number of resident first-year undergraduate students at the Seattle campus, as defined in RCW 28B.15.012, as enrolled during the 2009-10 academic year. This requirement shall not apply to nonresident undergraduate and graduate and professional students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 28B.15.068 (Estimates of per-student funding level and tuition—Reports—"Global challenge states"—Communication regarding available tax credits—Tuition mitigation plans) and 2012 c 229 s 525, 2012 c 229 s 524, 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 928, 2011 1st sp.s. c 10 s 7, 2009 c 540 s 1, & 2007 c 151 s 1; and

(2) RCW 28B.15.101 (Authority to modify tuition rates—Performance-based measures and goals—Institutional performance plans) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 10 s 5.

--- END ---