BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.88A.020 and 2012 c 208 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Alternative training" means a nursing assistant-certified program meeting criteria adopted by the commission under RCW 18.88A.087 to meet the requirements of a state-approved nurse aide competency evaluation program consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395i-3(e) and (f) of the federal social security act.

(2) "Approved training program" means a nursing assistant-certified training program approved by the commission to meet the requirements of a state-approved nurse aide training and competency evaluation program consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395i-3(e) and (f) of the federal social security act. For community college, vocational-technical institutes, skill centers, and secondary school as defined in chapter 28B.50 RCW, nursing assistant-certified training programs shall be approved by the commission in cooperation with the board for community and technical colleges or the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) "Commission" means the Washington nursing care quality assurance commission.

(4) "Competency evaluation" means the measurement of an individual's knowledge and skills as related to safe, competent performance as a nursing assistant.

(5) "Department" means the department of health.

(6) "Health care facility" means a nursing home, hospital, hospice care facility, home health care agency, hospice agency, licensed service provider under chapter 71.24 RCW other than an individual health care provider, or other entity for delivery of health care services as defined by the commission.

(7) "Medication assistant" means a nursing assistant-certified with a medication assistant endorsement issued under RCW 18.88A.082 who is authorized, in addition to his or her duties as a nursing assistant-certified, to administer certain medications and perform certain treatments in a nursing home under the supervision of a registered nurse under RCW 18.88A.082.

(8) "Nursing assistant" means an individual, regardless of title, who, under the direction and supervision of a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse, assists in the delivery of nursing and nursing-related activities to patients in a health care facility. The two levels of nursing assistants are:

(a) "Nursing assistant-certified," an individual certified under this chapter; and

(b) "Nursing assistant-registered," an individual registered under this chapter.

(9) "Nursing home" means a nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW.

(10) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

--- END ---