BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that:

(a) There are many reasons that adults who did not receive a high school diploma on the traditional timeline want to earn a high school diploma many years later, including to gain better employment and to continue their education. These adults dropped out of high school for many reasons, such as becoming incarcerated and joining the military. These adults are looking for a second chance at a high school diploma;

(b) Before 2014, the high school proficiency test, called the general educational development test or GED test, was geared both toward those who might want to transfer to college and those who might want to improve their employment situation. The balance between those two goals was part of the GED test philosophy; and

(c) As of 2014, a newly designed test, called the high school equivalency test, replaced the GED test. Parts of the test were designed to align with the rigorous common core state standards, which contain college and career ready expectations. Many people believe that the high school equivalency test has tipped too far in the direction of college readiness, so is inappropriate for returning adults who are not planning to go to college and who do not need highly rigorous academic training to achieve their employment goals. In addition, the test is more expensive, requires an internet-connected computer, and has fewer retest options.

(2) The intent of the legislature is to assure that adults who want to earn a high school equivalency certificate have access to a variety of test options that are appropriate, low cost, and flexible. These efforts will help the state move with fidelity toward the goal, proposed by the student achievement council and adopted by the legislature in 2014, that all adults in Washington ages twenty-five through forty-four have a high school diploma or equivalent by 2023.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.50.536 and 2013 c 39 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to rules adopted by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.190, the state board for community and technical colleges shall adopt rules governing the eligibility of persons sixteen years of age and older to take a test to earn a high school equivalency certificate, rules governing the administration of the test, and rules governing the issuance of a high school equivalency certificate to persons who successfully complete the test.

(2)(a) A high school equivalency certificate is a certificate issued jointly by the college board and the office of the superintendent of public instruction that indicates that the holder has attained standard scores at or above the minimum proficiency level prescribed by the college board on a high school equivalency test.

(b) The college board must identify and accept ((a)) high school equivalency tests that ((is))are at least as rigorous as the general educational development test. The high school equivalency tests identified by the college board must cover reading, writing, mathematics, science, and social studies subject areas.

(c) The college board must identify at least one test option that is low cost to the student and at least one test option that does not require computer proficiency. The college board must identify at least one test option that is appropriate for students who have been in the workforce, need a high school diploma for employment reasons, have been incarcerated or in the military, have been removed from any academic environment for four years or more, or are not planning to pursue a college education.

(3) High school equivalency certificates issued under this section shall be issued in such form and substance as agreed upon by the state board for community and technical colleges and superintendent of public instruction.

(4) The college board must communicate the menu of accepted test options under subsection (2) of this section, to public and private administrators of the high school equivalency tests.

--- END ---