BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

When an authority constructs or operates a transportation facility, it must consider the potential impacts of that facility on parking availability for residents nearby. The authority must provide appropriate parking impact mitigation for residents, as determined by the authority in collaboration with the local government of the area in which the parking impacts occur. Parking impact mitigation may include, but is not limited to, subsidizing zoned residential parking permits in the vicinity of the facility. If a local government implements zoned residential parking permits as a direct result of the parking impacts of the facility, the authority must pay for the cost of the parking permits in the vicinity of the facility.

--- END ---