BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.14.050 and 2007 c 12 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Immediately after appointment the commission shall organize by electing one of its members as chair and shall hold regular meetings at least once a month, and such additional meetings as may be required for the proper discharge of its duties.

The commission shall appoint a chief examiner who shall also serve as secretary of the commission and such assistants as may be necessary. The commission has supervisory responsibility over the chief examiner. The chief examiner shall keep the records for the commission, preserve all reports made to it, superintend and keep a record of all examinations held under its direction, and perform such other duties as the commission may prescribe.

The chief examiner shall be appointed as a result of competitive examination, which examination must be open to all properly qualified citizens of the county or of an adjacent county: PROVIDED, That no appointee of the commission, either as chief examiner or as an assistant to the chief examiner, shall be an employee of the sheriff's department. The chief examiner may be subject to suspension, reduction, or discharge in the same manner and subject to the same limitations as are provided in the case of members of the classified service.

--- END ---