BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Cannabis health and beauty aids are not subject to the regulations of this chapter that apply to marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products.

(2) For purposes of this section, "cannabis health and beauty aid" means a product containing parts of the cannabis plant and which:

(a) Is intended for use only as a topical application to provide therapeutic benefit or to enhance appearance;

(b) Contains a THC concentration of not more than 0.3 percent;

(c) Does not cross the blood-brain barrier; and

(d) Is not intended for consumption by humans or animals.

--- END ---