BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 72.23 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Western state hospital shall enter into a contract with the city in which it is located for the provision of community policing services at the hospital and in the surrounding areas.

(2) For the purposes of this section, community policing services includes, but is not limited to, a neighborhood patrol officer, community service officer, and detective or investigator to proactively address public safety issues at the hospital such as interacting with the public about incidents relating to the state hospital, investigating complaints of patient and staff-related incidents, and conducting training.

(3) Beginning in fiscal biennium 2015-2017, the contract described in subsection (1) of this section must be no less than four hundred sixty-two thousand dollars. In each subsequent fiscal biennium, the contract must increase by one percent, but may never exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars.

--- END ---