BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Any city or county in which a transportation benefit district has been established pursuant to chapter 36.73 RCW with boundaries coterminous with the boundaries of the city or county may by ordinance or resolution of the city or county legislative authority assume the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of the transportation benefit district in accordance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The assumption of the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a transportation benefit district may be initiated by the adoption of an ordinance or a resolution by the city or county legislative authority indicating its intention to conduct a hearing concerning the assumption of such rights, powers, functions, and obligations. If the city or county legislative authority adopts such an ordinance or a resolution of intention, the ordinance or resolution must set a time and place at which the city or county legislative authority will consider the proposed assumption of the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of the transportation benefit district, and must state that all persons interested may appear and be heard. The ordinance or resolution of intention must be published at least two times during the two weeks preceding the scheduled hearing in newspapers of daily general circulation printed or published in the city or county in which the transportation benefit district is to be located.

(2) At the time scheduled for the hearing in the ordinance or resolution of intention, the city or county legislative authority must consider the assumption of the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of the transportation benefit district and hear those appearing and all protests and objections to it. The city or county legislative authority may continue the hearing from time to time, not exceeding sixty days in all.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) If, after receiving testimony, the city or county legislative authority determines that the public interest or welfare would be satisfied by the city or county assuming the rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations of the transportation benefit district, the city or county legislative authority may declare that to be its intent and assume such rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations by ordinance or resolution, providing that the city or county is vested with every right, power, immunity, function, and obligation currently granted to or possessed by the transportation benefit district.

(2) Upon assumption of the rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations of the transportation benefit district by the city or county, the governing body established pursuant to RCW 36.73.020 must be abolished and the city or county legislative authority is vested with all rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations otherwise vested by law in the governing board of the transportation benefit district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. No transfer of any function made pursuant to this chapter may be construed to impair or alter any existing rights acquired under chapter 36.73 RCW or any other provision of law relating to transportation benefit districts, nor as impairing or altering any actions, activities, or proceedings validated thereunder, nor as impairing or altering any civil or criminal proceedings instituted thereunder, nor any rule, regulation, or order promulgated thereunder, nor any administrative action taken thereunder; and neither the assumption of control of any transportation benefit district function by a city or county, nor any transfer of rights, powers, functions, and obligations as provided in this chapter, may impair or alter the validity of any act performed by such transportation benefit district or division thereof or any officer thereof prior to the assumption of such rights, powers, functions, and obligations by any city or county as authorized under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) All rules and regulations and all pending business before the board of any transportation benefit district transferred pursuant to this chapter must be continued and acted upon by the city or county.

(2) All existing contracts and obligations of the transferred transportation benefit district remain in full force and effect and must be performed by the city or county. A transfer authorized in this chapter does not affect the validity of any official act performed by any official or employee prior to the transfer authorized pursuant to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or other writings relating to the administration of the powers, duties, and functions transferred pursuant to this chapter and available to the transportation benefit district must be made available to the city or county.

(2) All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with powers, duties, and functions transferred under this chapter must be assigned to the city or county.

(3) Any appropriations or federal grant made to the transportation benefit district for the purpose of carrying out the rights, powers, functions, and obligations authorized to be assumed by a city or county pursuant to this chapter, on the effective date of such transfer, must be credited to the city or county for the purpose of carrying out such transferred rights, powers, functions, and obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. The city or county must assume and agree to provide for the payment of all of the indebtedness of the transportation benefit district, including the payment and retirement of outstanding general obligation and revenue bonds issued by the transportation benefit district.

Sec. 8. RCW 36.73.065 and 2012 c 152 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, taxes, fees, charges, and tolls may not be imposed by a district without approval of a majority of the voters in the district voting on a proposition at a general or special election. The proposition must include a specific description of: (a) The transportation improvement or improvements proposed by the district; (b) any rebate program proposed to be established under RCW 36.73.067; and (c) the proposed taxes, fees, charges, and the range of tolls imposed by the district to raise revenue to fund the improvement or improvements or rebate program, as applicable.

(2) Voter approval under this section must be accorded substantial weight regarding the validity of a transportation improvement as defined in RCW 36.73.015.

(3) A district may not increase any taxes, fees, charges, or range of tolls imposed or change a rebate program under this chapter once the taxes, fees, charges, tolls, or rebate program takes effect, unless authorized by the district voters pursuant to RCW 36.73.160, or up to fifty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in RCW 82.80.140 by the governing board of the district.

(4)(a) A district that includes all the territory within the boundaries of the jurisdiction, or jurisdictions, establishing the district, but not including territory in which a fee is currently being collected under RCW 82.80.140, may impose by a majority vote of the governing board of the district the following fees, taxes, and charges:

(i) Up to ((twenty))fifty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in RCW 82.80.140; or

(ii) A fee or charge in accordance with RCW 36.73.120.

(b) The vehicle fee authorized in (a) of this subsection may only be imposed for a passenger-only ferry transportation improvement if the vehicle fee is first approved by a majority of the voters within the jurisdiction of the district.

(c)(i) A district solely comprised of a city or cities ((shall))may not impose the fees or charges identified in (a) of this subsection within one hundred eighty days after July 22, 2007, unless the county in which the city or cities reside, by resolution, declares that it will not impose the fees or charges identified in (a) of this subsection within the one hundred eighty-day period; or

(ii) A district solely comprised of a city or cities identified in RCW 36.73.020(6)(b) may not impose the fees or charges until after May 22, 2008, unless the county in which the city or cities reside, by resolution, declares that it will not impose the fees or charges identified in (a) of this subsection through May 22, 2008.

(5) If the interlocal agreement in RCW 82.80.140(2)(a) cannot be reached, a district that includes only the unincorporated territory of a county may impose by a majority vote of the governing body of the district up to ((twenty))fifty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in RCW 82.80.140.

Sec. 9. RCW 82.80.140 and 2010 c 161 s 917 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the provisions of RCW 36.73.065, a transportation benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may fix and impose an annual vehicle fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the district, for each vehicle subject to vehicle license fees under RCW 46.17.350(1) (a), (c), (d), (e), (g), (h), (j), or (n) through (q) and for each vehicle subject to gross weight license fees under RCW 46.17.355 with a scale weight of six thousand pounds or less.

(2)(a) A district that includes all the territory within the boundaries of the jurisdiction, or jurisdictions, establishing the district, but not including territory in which a fee is currently being collected under this section, may impose by a majority vote of the governing board of the district up to ((twenty))fifty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in subsection (1) of this section.

(i) If the district is countywide, the revenues of the fee ((shall))must be distributed to each city within the ((county))district by interlocal agreement that must be effective prior to imposition of the fee. The interlocal agreement is effective when approved by the ((county))district and sixty percent of the cities representing seventy-five percent of the population of the cities within the ((county))district in which the countywide fee is collected.

(ii) If the district is less than countywide, the revenues of the fee must be distributed to each city within the district by interlocal agreement that must be effective prior to imposition of the fee.

(b) A district may not impose a fee under this subsection (2):

(i) For a passenger-only ferry transportation improvement unless the vehicle fee is first approved by a majority of the voters within the jurisdiction of the district; or

(ii) That, if combined with the fees previously imposed by another district within its boundaries under RCW 36.73.065(4)(a)(i), exceeds ((twenty))fifty dollars.

If a district imposes or increases a fee under this subsection (2) that, if combined with the fees previously imposed by another district within its boundaries, exceeds ((twenty))fifty dollars, the district shall provide a credit for the previously imposed fees so that the combined vehicle fee does not exceed ((twenty))fifty dollars.

(3) The department of licensing shall administer and collect the fee. The department shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed one percent of the fees collected, for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The department shall remit remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall distribute the proceeds to the district on a monthly basis.

(4) No fee under this section may be collected until six months after approval under RCW 36.73.065.

(5) The vehicle fee under this section applies only when renewing a vehicle registration, and is effective upon the registration renewal date as provided by the department of licensing.

(6) The following vehicles are exempt from the fee under this section:

(a) Campers, as defined in RCW 46.04.085;

(b) Farm tractors or farm vehicles, as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181;

(c) Mopeds, as defined in RCW 46.04.304;

(d) Off-road and nonhighway vehicles, as defined in RCW 46.04.365;

(e) Private use single-axle trailer, as defined in RCW 46.04.422;

(f) Snowmobiles, as defined in RCW 46.04.546; and

(g) Vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the international registration plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. This act takes effect August 1, 2015.

--- END ---