BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.130.062 and 2008 c 134 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) With regard to complaints that only allege that a license holder has committed an act or acts of unprofessional conduct involving sexual misconduct, the secretary shall serve as the sole disciplining authority in every aspect of the disciplinary process, including initiating investigations, investigating, determining the disposition of the complaint, holding hearings, preparing findings of fact, issuing orders or dismissals of charges as provided in RCW 18.130.110, entering into stipulations permitted by RCW 18.130.172, or issuing summary suspensions under RCW 18.130.135. The board or commission shall review all cases and only refer to the secretary sexual misconduct cases that do not involve clinical expertise or standard of care issues.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2016, for all complaints alleging an act or acts of unprofessional conduct involving sexual misconduct, regardless of whether the secretary or a board or commission is the disciplining authority, all victim interviews conducted as part of an investigation must be conducted by a person who has successfully completed a training program on interviewing victims of sexual misconduct in a manner that minimizes the negative impacts on the victims. The training program may be provided by the disciplining authority, the department, or an outside entity. When determining the type of training that is appropriate to comply with this subsection, the disciplining authority shall consult with at least one statewide organization that provides information, training, and expertise to persons and entities who support victims, family and friends, the general public, and other persons whose lives have been affected by sexual assault.

--- END ---