BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature showed its commitment to equity in education by passing legislation creating a seal of biliteracy, requiring world language for high school graduation, and easing the transitions of English language learners. The legislature intends to establish a cradle to career approach to support English language learners by creating grant programs to expand dual language programs and bilingual education for early learners, elementary students, and secondary students; and by creating a scholarship to meet the present and future demand for bilingual teachers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The K-12 dual language expansion grant program is created to build and expand well-implemented, sustainable dual language programs and create state-level infrastructure dedicated to dual language instruction. Established programs are incentivized to mentor new programs, with funds provided for expansion and implementation.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall administer the grant program. Subject to appropriations made for this purpose, the superintendent shall award no less than four grants to pairs of school districts. Each pair must have one district with an established dual language program with a plan for expansion; and the other district with the desire to implement a new dual language program. The superintendent shall prioritize grants to districts with dual language programming that includes programming for early learners.

(3) The grant period is two years. Grant funds may be used for professional development, supplemental materials, training, administrative staffing of the program, site visits, recruiting bilingual teachers and instructional aides, program evaluation, and coaching.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The dual language teacher pipeline scholarship program is created to build capacity for bilingual and dual language programming by developing a pipeline for dual language teachers, from early childhood to K-12 education.

(2) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, the professional educator standards board shall award scholarships to K-12 teachers and teacher preparation program candidates wishing to pursue a bilingual education or English language learner endorsement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2015, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---