BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that high school students in Washington have been required to meet a standard on high school assessments since 2008 to earn a certificate of academic achievement and graduate. The majority of high school students take these assessments for the first time by the conclusion of tenth grade. Over time, the state has adopted several alternative methods to allow students who do not meet the standard on the tenth grade assessment to demonstrate their competency to graduate. These alternatives include the opportunity to retake the assessment, a comparison of grades earned, collections of evidence, and college entrance or dual credit course exams.

(2) The legislature further finds that studies of other states show that high-stakes exit exams like Washington's can have the effect of lowering the statewide graduation rate and widening the opportunity gap. Evidence also shows that students who pass exit exams do not have higher rates of enrollment or graduation in postsecondary education, or achievement in labor markets.

(3) The legislature recognizes that, in today's competitive global economy, it is not enough for Washington's students to meet a minimum level of competency. To be successful in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship requires increased rigor and achievement. To that end, the state has recently adopted new, academically rigorous policies to better prepare students for future success. Starting in spring 2015, Washington students will be tested using a comprehensive assessment system developed with a multistate consortium. This system, the smarter balanced assessment, will evaluate students in grades three through eight and grade eleven on their college and career readiness based on the Washington state learning standards in English language arts and mathematics and will be used for state and federal accountability purposes. In addition, students beginning with the graduating class of 2019 will also have the requirement to earn twenty-four credits for high school graduation and obtain a more meaningful diploma. Schools also have put a great deal of time and effort into ensuring quality teachers and administrators through the teacher and principal evaluation program, a four-tiered system that establishes eight new criteria for teachers' and principals' evaluations.

(4) The legislature further finds that the transition to the smarter balanced assessment system has markedly complicated the development and administration of the statewide assessment graduation requirement and the state's confusing array of alternative assessments. The classes of 2016 through 2018 will be required to take end-of-course exams or comprehensive assessments in the tenth grade to fulfill graduation requirements for English language arts, mathematics, and biology. In addition, they will be required to take the smarter balanced assessments in the eleventh grade to determine if they are college and career ready and for school and district accountability.

(5) The legislature finds that requiring schools to administer six high school assessments—the smarter balanced English language arts assessment, smarter balanced mathematics, the end-of-course assessment for biology, two mathematics end-of-course assessments, and the English language arts exit exam—creates a costly system in which too much classroom time and too many state resources are devoted to taking and retaking tests for graduation purposes. The time and funding that are now invested in Washington's current state graduation assessments do not result in students meeting a college or career ready measure accepted by postsecondary institutions and organizations.

(6) The legislature further finds that locally directed remediation and intervention strategies, including twelfth grade transition courses, opportunities to retake courses, and more sustained focus on providing college and career guidance through students' high school and beyond plans, would prepare students for postsecondary college and career opportunities. State and local resources that are now directed to develop and administer graduation assessments should be redirected to courses and programs better suited for student needs during high school.

(7) The legislature further finds that taxpayers and tuition payers can save substantial money by avoiding remedial courses taught at public institutions of higher education. An unprecedented agreement among Washington's public institutions of higher education now ensures that high school graduates who successfully complete twelfth grade high school transition courses in English language arts and mathematics will move directly to college-level English and mathematics courses at participating institutions without remediation or additional placement testing.

(8) The legislature therefore intends to eliminate the assessment graduation requirements and the certificate of academic achievement to allow school districts to focus on keeping students engaged through graduation and preparing them to be college and career ready. To better ensure that Washington graduates are college and career ready, the legislature further intends to require students who fail to meet the standard on the smarter balanced assessment to take and pass locally determined courses in their senior year that align with their college or career goals, including, when available, high school transition courses.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.230.090 and 2014 c 217 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state board of education shall establish high school graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as provided in RCW 28A.230.122 and except those equivalencies established by local high schools or school districts under RCW 28A.230.097. The purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.

(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including information on the culture, history, and government of the American Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.

(b) ((The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high school but are not the only requirements for graduation.

(c)))(i) Beginning in the 2015-16 school year, students in grade twelve who have not met the state standard on the English language arts or mathematics statewide student assessment provided for in RCW 28A.655.070 must take and pass a locally determined course in the content area in which the student was not successful. The course shall be consistent with the student's college and career goals identified in his or her high school and beyond plan. When available, school districts should prioritize enrolling such students in high school transition courses.

(ii) As used in this subsection (1), "high school transition course" means an English language arts, mathematics, or science course offered in high school whose successful completion by a high school student will ensure the student college-level placement at participating public institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016. High school transition courses must satisfy core or elective credit graduation requirements established by the state board of education under this section. A student's successful completion of a high school transition course does not entitle the student to be admitted to any public institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(iii) As used in this subsection (1), "not met the state standard" means a score on the statewide student assessment at either a level one or a level two in a four-level scoring system.

(c) Each student shall have a high school and beyond plan to guide the student's high school experience and ensure preparation for postsecondary education or training and career. The high school and beyond plan must meet the following requirements and available high school transition courses:

(i) The plan must be adopted for each student before the student's enrollment in high school;

(ii) The plan must be updated during the high school grades by reviewing transcripts, assessing progress toward identified goals, and revising as necessary for changing interests, goals, and needs;

(iii) The plan must include a four-year plan for course-taking that will ensure fulfillment of state and local graduation requirements and align with the student's career and educational goals;

(iv) For students in grade twelve who have not met the state standard on the statewide student assessment, the high school and beyond plan must include the following information:

(A) The student's results on the state assessment;

(B) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the score on his or her Washington language proficiency assessment;

(C) Any credit deficiencies;

(D) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;

(E) The student's progress toward meeting state and local graduation requirements; and

(F) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken by the student to meet state academic standards and be eligible for graduation, including available programs offered through skill centers or community and technical colleges and available high school transition courses.

(d) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan shall remain at the local level. Effective with the graduating class of 2015, the state board of education may not establish a requirement for students to complete a culminating project for graduation.

(((d)))(e)(i) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement the career and college ready graduation requirement proposal adopted under board resolution on November 10, 2010, and revised on January 9, 2014, to take effect beginning with the graduating class of 2019 or as otherwise provided in this subsection (1)(((d)))(e). The rules must include authorization for a school district to waive up to two credits for individual students based on unusual circumstances and in accordance with written policies that must be adopted by each board of directors of a school district that grants diplomas. The rules must also provide that the content of the third credit of mathematics and the content of the third credit of science may be chosen by the student based on the student's interests and high school and beyond plan with agreement of the student's parent or guardian or agreement of the school counselor or principal.

(ii) School districts may apply to the state board of education for a waiver to implement the career and college ready graduation requirement proposal beginning with the graduating class of 2020 or 2021 instead of the graduating class of 2019. In the application, a school district must describe why the waiver is being requested, the specific impediments preventing timely implementation, and efforts that will be taken to achieve implementation with the graduating class proposed under the waiver. The state board of education shall grant a waiver under this subsection (1)(((d)))(e) to an applying school district at the next subsequent meeting of the board after receiving an application.

(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.

(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized. The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's certificate or credential, and complete other state and local graduation requirements.

(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high school graduation requirements to the education committees of the legislature for review and to the quality education council established under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted legislation.

(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other than English established by the state board of education or a local school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation, students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied the state or local school district graduation requirement for instruction in one or more languages other than English.

(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student who has completed high school courses before attending high school shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling high school graduation requirements if:

(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing the same course requirements and examinations as the high school students enrolled in the class; or

(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school district board of directors.

(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform any other additional assignment to receive credit.

(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.230.125 and 2014 c 102 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the four-year institutions as defined in RCW 28B.76.020, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall develop for use by all public school districts a standardized high school transcript. The superintendent shall establish clear definitions for the terms "credits" and "hours" so that school programs operating on the quarter, semester, or trimester system can be compared.

(2) The standardized high school transcript shall include a notation of whether the student has ((earned a certificate of individual achievement or a certificate of academic achievement))met the career and college readiness standard on the statewide high school assessment identified in RCW 28A.655.070.

(3) The standardized high school transcript may include a notation of whether the student has earned the Washington state seal of biliteracy established under RCW 28A.300.575.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.195.010 and 2009 c 548 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby recognizes that private schools should be subject only to those minimum state controls necessary to insure the health and safety of all the students in the state and to insure a sufficient basic education to meet usual graduation requirements. The state, any agency or official thereof, shall not restrict or dictate any specific educational or other programs for private schools except as hereinafter in this section provided.

Principals of private schools or superintendents of private school districts shall file each year with the state superintendent of public instruction a statement certifying that the minimum requirements hereinafter set forth are being met, noting any deviations. After review of the statement, the state superintendent will notify schools or school districts of those deviations which must be corrected. In case of major deviations, the school or school district may request and the state board of education may grant provisional status for one year in order that the school or school district may take action to meet the requirements. The state board of education shall not require private school students to meet the student learning goals, ((obtain a certificate of academic achievement, or a certificate of individual achievement to graduate from high school,)) to master the essential academic learning requirements, or to be assessed pursuant to RCW ((28A.655.061))28A.655.070. However, private schools may choose, on a voluntary basis, to have their students master these essential academic learning requirements((,))or take the statewide student assessments((, and obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement)). Minimum requirements shall be as follows:

(1) The minimum school year for instructional purposes shall consist of no less than one hundred eighty school days or the equivalent in annual minimum instructional hour offerings, with a school-wide annual average total instructional hour offering of one thousand hours for students enrolled in grades one through twelve, and at least four hundred fifty hours for students enrolled in kindergarten.

(2) The school day shall be the same as defined in RCW 28A.150.203.

(3) All classroom teachers shall hold appropriate Washington state certification except as follows:

(a) Teachers for religious courses or courses for which no counterpart exists in public schools shall not be required to obtain a state certificate to teach those courses.

(b) In exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without certification may teach students so long as a certified person exercises general supervision. Annual written statements shall be submitted to the office of the superintendent of public instruction reporting and explaining such circumstances.

(4) An approved private school may operate an extension program for parents, guardians, or persons having legal custody of a child to teach children in their custody. The extension program shall require at a minimum that:

(a) The parent, guardian, or custodian be under the supervision of an employee of the approved private school who is certified under chapter 28A.410 RCW;

(b) The planning by the certified person and the parent, guardian, or person having legal custody include objectives consistent with this subsection and subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (7) of this section;

(c) The certified person spend a minimum average each month of one contact hour per week with each student under his or her supervision who is enrolled in the approved private school extension program;

(d) Each student's progress be evaluated by the certified person; and

(e) The certified employee shall not supervise more than thirty students enrolled in the approved private school's extension program.

(5) Appropriate measures shall be taken to safeguard all permanent records against loss or damage.

(6) The physical facilities of the school or district shall be adequate to meet the program offered by the school or district: PROVIDED, That each school building shall meet reasonable health and fire safety requirements. A residential dwelling of the parent, guardian, or custodian shall be deemed to be an adequate physical facility when a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody is instructing his or her child under subsection (4) of this section.

(7) Private school curriculum shall include instruction of the basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language, social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of appreciation of art and music, all in sufficient units for meeting state board of education graduation requirements.

(8) Each school or school district shall be required to maintain up-to-date policy statements related to the administration and operation of the school or school district.

All decisions of policy, philosophy, selection of books, teaching material, curriculum, except as in subsection (7) of this section provided, school rules and administration, or other matters not specifically referred to in this section, shall be the responsibility of the administration and administrators of the particular private school involved.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.200.010 and 2004 c 19 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each parent whose child is receiving home-based instruction under RCW 28A.225.010(4) shall have the duty to:

(a) File annually a signed declaration of intent that he or she is planning to cause his or her child to receive home-based instruction. The statement shall include the name and age of the child, shall specify whether a certificated person will be supervising the instruction, and shall be written in a format prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file the statement by September 15th of the school year or within two weeks of the beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with the superintendent of the public school district within which the parent resides or the district that accepts the transfer, and the student shall be deemed a transfer student of the nonresident district. Parents may apply for transfer under RCW 28A.225.220;

(b) Ensure that test scores or annual academic progress assessments and immunization records, together with any other records that are kept relating to the instructional and educational activities provided, are forwarded to any other public or private school to which the child transfers. At the time of a transfer to a public school, the superintendent of the local school district in which the child enrolls may require a standardized achievement test to be administered and shall have the authority to determine the appropriate grade and course level placement of the child after consultation with parents and review of the child's records; and

(c) Ensure that a standardized achievement test approved by the state board of education is administered annually to the child by a qualified individual or that an annual assessment of the student's academic progress is written by a certificated person who is currently working in the field of education. The state board of education shall not require these children to meet the student learning goals, master the essential academic learning requirements, or to take the assessments((, or to obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement pursuant to RCW 28A.655.061 and 28A.155.045)). The standardized test administered or the annual academic progress assessment written shall be made a part of the child's permanent records. If, as a result of the annual test or assessment, it is determined that the child is not making reasonable progress consistent with his or her age or stage of development, the parent shall make a good faith effort to remedy any deficiency.

(2) Failure of a parent to comply with the duties in this section shall be deemed a failure of such parent's child to attend school without valid justification under RCW 28A.225.020. Parents who do comply with the duties set forth in this section shall be presumed to be providing home-based instruction as set forth in RCW 28A.225.010(4).

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.230.122 and 2011 c 203 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A student who fulfills the requirements specified in subsection (((3)))(4) of this section toward completion of an international baccalaureate diploma programme is considered to have satisfied state minimum requirements for graduation from a public high school((, except that:

(a) The provisions of RCW 28A.655.061 regarding the certificate of academic achievement or RCW 28A.155.045 regarding the certificate of individual achievement apply to students under this section; and

(b))).

(2) The provisions of RCW 28A.230.170 regarding study of the United States Constitution and the Washington state Constitution apply to students under this section.

(((2)))(3) School districts may require students under this section to complete local graduation requirements that are in addition to state minimum requirements before issuing a high school diploma under RCW 28A.230.120. However, school districts are encouraged to waive local requirements as necessary to encourage students to pursue an international baccalaureate diploma.

(((3)))(4) To receive a high school diploma under this section, a student must complete and pass all required international baccalaureate diploma programme courses as scored at the local level; pass all internal assessments as scored at the local level; successfully complete all required projects and products as scored at the local level; and complete the final examinations administered by the international baccalaureate organization in each of the required subjects under the diploma programme.

Sec. 7. RCW 28A.300.575 and 2014 c 102 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state seal of biliteracy is established to recognize public high school graduates who have attained a high level of proficiency in speaking, reading, and writing in one or more world languages in addition to English. School districts are encouraged to award the seal of biliteracy to graduating high school students who meet the criteria established by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under this section. Participating school districts shall place a notation on a student's high school diploma and high school transcript indicating that the student has earned the seal.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules establishing criteria for award of the Washington state seal of biliteracy. The criteria must require a student to demonstrate proficiency in English by meeting state high school graduation requirements in English((, including through state assessments and credits,)) and proficiency in one or more world languages other than English. The criteria must permit a student to demonstrate proficiency in another world language through multiple methods including nationally or internationally recognized language proficiency tests and competency-based world language credits awarded under the model policy adopted by the Washington state school directors' association.

(3) For the purposes of this section, a world language other than English must include American sign language and Native American languages.

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.305.130 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-based accountability framework that creates a unified system of increasing levels of support for schools in order to improve student academic achievement; provide leadership in the creation of a system that personalizes education for each student and respects diverse cultures, abilities, and learning styles; and promote achievement of the goals of RCW 28A.150.210. In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the state board of education shall:

(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public business;

(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently conduct the work of the board;

(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding the work of the board;

(4) For purposes of statewide accountability:

(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading, writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998, each as amended. The goals may be established for all students, economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient students, students with disabilities, and students from disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic backgrounds. The board may establish school and school district goals addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for students in grades seven through twelve. The board shall adopt the goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the board shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature;

(b)(i) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the standard on the statewide student assessment ((and, for high school students, to obtain a certificate of academic achievement)). The board shall also determine student scores that identify levels of student performance below and beyond the standard. ((The board shall consider the incorporation of the standard error of measurement into the decision regarding the award of the certificates.)) The board shall set such performance standards and levels in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that may be established for this purpose.

(ii) ((By the end of the 2014-15 school year, establish the scores students must achieve to meet the standard and earn a certificate of academic achievement on the tenth grade English language arts assessment and the end-of-course mathematics assessments developed in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070 to be used as the state transitions to high school assessments developed with a multistate consortium.

(iii))) By the end of the 2014-15 school year, establish the scores students must achieve to meet the standard ((and earn a certificate of academic achievement)) on the high school English language arts assessment and the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with a multistate consortium in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070. To determine the appropriate score, the state board shall review the transition experience of Washington students to the consortium-developed assessments((,))and examine the student scores used in other states that are administering the consortium-developed assessments((, and review the scores in other states that require passage of an eleventh grade assessment as a high school graduation requirement. The scores established by the state board of education for the purposes of earning a certificate of academic achievement and graduation from high school may be different from the scores used for the purpose of determining a student's career and college readiness)).

(((iv)))(iii) The legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards for the high school statewide student assessment. Any changes recommended by the board in the performance standards for the high school assessment shall be presented to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by November 30th of the school year in which the changes will take place to permit the legislature to take statutory action before the changes are implemented if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature. The legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards and any changes made to the elementary level performance standards and the middle school level performance standards. The board must provide an explanation of and rationale for all initial performance standards and any changes, for all grade levels of the statewide student assessment. If the board changes the performance standards for any grade level or subject, the superintendent of public instruction must recalculate the results from the previous ten years of administering that assessment regarding students below, meeting, and beyond the state standard, to the extent that this data is available, and post a comparison of the original and recalculated results on the superintendent's web site;

(c) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and

(d) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035, information on the progress that has been made in achieving goals adopted by the board;

(5) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve. However, no private school may be approved that operates a kindergarten program only and no private school shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school officials;

(6) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;

(7) Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be appointed as provided by RCW 28A.300.020. The board may delegate to the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not limited to, the authority to employ necessary personnel and the authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all but one of the other personnel of the board are exempt from civil service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and

(8) Adopt a seal that shall be kept in the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.320.190 and 2009 c 578 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The extended learning opportunities program is created for eligible eleventh and twelfth grade students who are not on track to meet local or state graduation requirements as well as eighth grade students who need additional assistance in order to have the opportunity for a successful entry into high school. The program shall provide early notification of graduation status and information on education opportunities including preapprenticeship programs that are available.

(2) Under the extended learning opportunities program and to the extent funds are available for that purpose, districts shall make available to students in grade twelve who have failed to meet one or more local or state graduation requirements the option of continuing enrollment in the school district in accordance with RCW 28A.225.160. Districts are authorized to use basic education program funding to provide instruction to eligible students under RCW 28A.150.220(((3)))(5).

(3) Under the extended learning opportunities program, instructional services for eligible students can occur during the regular school day, evenings, on weekends, or at a time and location deemed appropriate by the school district, including the educational service district, in order to meet the needs of these students. Instructional services provided under this section do not include services offered at private schools. Instructional services can include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Individual or small group instruction;

(b) Instruction in English language arts and/or mathematics that eligible students need to ((pass all or part of the Washington assessment of student learning))meet the career and college readiness standard on the statewide high school assessment identified in RCW 28A.655.070;

(c) Attendance in a public high school or public alternative school classes or at a skill center;

(d) Inclusion in remediation programs, including summer school;

(e) Language development instruction for English language learners;

(f) Online curriculum and instructional support, including programs for credit retrieval ((and Washington assessment of student learning preparatory classes)); and

(g) Reading improvement specialists available at the educational service districts to serve eighth, eleventh, and twelfth grade educators through professional development in accordance with RCW 28A.415.350. The reading improvement specialist may also provide direct services to eligible students and those students electing to continue a fifth year in a high school program who are still struggling with basic reading skills.

Sec. 10. RCW 28A.320.195 and 2013 c 184 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each school district board of directors is encouraged to adopt an academic acceleration policy for high school students as provided under this section.

(2) Under an academic acceleration policy:

(a) The district automatically enrolls any student who meets the state standard on the high school statewide student assessment in the next most rigorous level of advanced courses offered by the high school. Students who successfully complete such an advanced course are then enrolled in the next most rigorous level of advanced course, with the objective that students will eventually be automatically enrolled in courses that offer the opportunity to earn dual credit for high school and college.

(b) The subject matter of the advanced courses in which the student is automatically enrolled depends on the content area or areas of the statewide student assessment where the student has met the state standard. ((Students who meet the state standard on both end-of-course mathematics assessments are considered to have met the state standard for high school mathematics.)) Students who meet the state standard in ((both reading and writing))English language arts are eligible for enrollment in advanced courses in English, social studies, humanities, and other related subjects.

(c) The district must notify students and parents or guardians regarding the academic acceleration policy and the advanced courses available to students.

(d) The district must provide a parent or guardian with an opportunity to opt out of the academic acceleration policy and enroll a student in an alternative course.

Sec. 11. RCW 28A.320.208 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the beginning of each school year, school districts must notify parents and guardians of enrolled students from eighth through twelfth grade about each student assessment required by the state, the minimum state-level graduation requirements, and any additional school district graduation requirements. The information may be provided when the student is enrolled, contained in the student or parent handbook, or posted on the school district's web site. The notification must include the following:

(a) When each assessment will be administered;

(b) ((Which assessments will be required for graduation and))What options students have to meet graduation requirements if they do not pass a given assessment;

(c) Whether the results of the assessment will be used for program placement or grade-level advancement;

(d) When the assessment results will be released to parents or guardians and whether there will be an opportunity for parents and teachers to discuss strategic adjustments; and

(e) Whether the assessment is required by the school district, state, federal government, or more than one of these entities.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide information to the school districts to enable the districts to provide the information to the parents and guardians in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 12. RCW 28A.600.310 and 2012 c 229 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not yet received the credits required for the award of a high school diploma and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may apply to a participating institution of higher education to enroll in courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education. A student receiving home-based instruction enrolling in a public high school for the sole purpose of participating in courses or programs offered by institutions of higher education shall not be counted by the school district in any required state or federal accountability reporting if the student's parents or guardians filed a declaration of intent to provide home-based instruction and the student received home-based instruction during the school year before the school year in which the student intends to participate in courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education. Students receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW and students attending private schools approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW shall not be required to meet the student learning goals((, obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement to graduate from high school,)) or to master the essential academic learning requirements. However, students are eligible to enroll in courses or programs in participating universities only if the board of directors of the student's school district has decided to participate in the program. Participating institutions of higher education, in consultation with school districts, may establish admission standards for these students. If the institution of higher education accepts a secondary school pupil for enrollment under this section, the institution of higher education shall send written notice to the pupil and the pupil's school district within ten days of acceptance. The notice shall indicate the course and hours of enrollment for that pupil.

(2)(a) In lieu of tuition and fees, as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041:

(i) Running start students shall pay to the community or technical college all other mandatory fees as established by each community or technical college and, in addition, the state board for community and technical colleges may authorize a fee of up to ten percent of tuition and fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041; and

(ii) All other institutions of higher education operating a running start program may charge running start students a fee of up to ten percent of tuition and fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041 in addition to technology fees.

(b) The fees charged under this subsection (2) shall be prorated based on credit load.

(3)(a) The institutions of higher education must make available fee waivers for low-income running start students. Each institution must establish a written policy for the determination of low-income students before offering the fee waiver. A student shall be considered low income and eligible for a fee waiver upon proof that the student is currently qualified to receive free or reduced-price lunch. Acceptable documentation of low-income status may also include, but is not limited to, documentation that a student has been deemed eligible for free or reduced-price lunches in the last five years, or other criteria established in the institution's policy.

(b) Institutions of higher education, in collaboration with relevant student associations, shall aim to have students who can benefit from fee waivers take advantage of these waivers. Institutions shall make every effort to communicate to students and their families the benefits of the waivers and provide assistance to students and their families on how to apply. Information about waivers shall, to the greatest extent possible, be incorporated into financial aid counseling, admission information, and individual billing statements. Institutions also shall, to the greatest extent possible, use all means of communication, including but not limited to web sites, online catalogues, admission and registration forms, mass e-mail messaging, social media, and outside marketing to ensure that information about waivers is visible, compelling, and reaches the maximum number of students and families that can benefit.

(4) The pupil's school district shall transmit to the institution of higher education an amount per each full-time equivalent college student at statewide uniform rates for vocational and nonvocational students. The superintendent of public instruction shall separately calculate and allocate moneys appropriated for basic education under RCW 28A.150.260 to school districts for purposes of making such payments and for granting school districts seven percent thereof to offset program related costs. The calculations and allocations shall be based upon the estimated statewide annual average per full-time equivalent high school student allocations under RCW 28A.150.260, excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction, participating institutions of higher education, and the state board for community and technical colleges shall consult on the calculation and distribution of the funds. The funds received by the institution of higher education from the school district shall not be deemed tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the institution of higher education. A student enrolled under this subsection shall be counted for the purpose of meeting enrollment targets in accordance with terms and conditions specified in the omnibus appropriations act.

(5) The state board for community and technical colleges, in collaboration with the other institutions of higher education that participate in the running start program and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall identify, assess, and report on alternatives for providing ongoing and adequate financial support for the program. Such alternatives shall include but are not limited to student tuition, increased support from local school districts, and reallocation of existing state financial support among the community and technical college system to account for differential running start enrollment levels and impacts. The state board for community and technical colleges shall report the assessment of alternatives to the governor and to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature by September 1, 2010.

Sec. 13. RCW 28A.655.068 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, the statewide high school assessment in science shall be an end-of-course assessment for biology that measures the state standards for life sciences, in addition to systems, inquiry, and application as they pertain to life sciences.

(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction may develop or adopt science end-of-course assessments or a comprehensive science assessment ((that includes subjects in addition to biology for purposes of RCW 28A.655.061,)) when so directed by the legislature. ((The legislature intends to transition from a biology end-of-course assessment to a more comprehensive science assessment in a manner consistent with the way in which the state transitioned to an English language arts assessment and a comprehensive mathematics assessment. The legislature further intends that the transition will include at least two years of using the student assessment results from either the biology end-of-course assessment or the more comprehensive assessment in order to provide students with reasonable opportunities to demonstrate high school competencies while being mindful of the increasing rigor of the new assessment.))

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop or adopt a science assessment in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070(10) that is not biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.

(((c) Before the next subsequent school year after the legislature directs the superintendent to develop or adopt a new science assessment, the superintendent of public instruction shall review the objective alternative assessments for the science assessment and make recommendations to the legislature regarding additional objective alternatives, if any.))

(3) The superintendent of public instruction may participate with consortia of multiple states as common student learning standards and assessments in science are developed. The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board of education, may modify the essential academic learning requirements and statewide student assessments in science, including the high school assessment, according to the multistate common student learning standards and assessments as long as the education committees of the legislature have opportunities for review before the modifications are adopted, as provided under RCW 28A.655.070.

(((4) The statewide high school assessment under this section shall be used to demonstrate that a student meets the state standards in the science content area of the statewide student assessment for purposes of RCW 28A.655.061.))

Sec. 14. RCW 28A.655.070 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop essential academic learning requirements that identify the knowledge and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state board of education.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:

(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential academic learning requirements; and

(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the grade level content expectations to be assessed on the statewide student assessment and used for state or federal accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing the statewide student assessment.

(3)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if each student has mastered the essential academic learning requirements identified in subsection (1) of this section. School districts shall administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system may include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.

(b) ((Effective with the 2009 administration of the Washington assessment of student learning and continuing with the statewide student assessment, the superintendent shall redesign the assessment in the content areas of reading, mathematics, and science in all grades except high school by shortening test administration and reducing the number of short answer and extended response questions.

(c)))(i) By the 2014-15 school year, the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board of education, shall modify the statewide student assessment system to transition to assessments developed with a multistate consortium((, as provided in this subsection:

(i))).

(ii) The assessments developed with a multistate consortium to assess student proficiency in English language arts and mathematics shall be administered beginning in the 2014-15 school year. The reading and writing assessments shall not be administered by the superintendent of public instruction or schools after the 2013-14 school year.

(((ii)))(iii) The high school assessments in English language arts and mathematics ((in (c)(i) of this subsection))developed with the multistate consortium shall be used ((for the purposes of earning a certificate of academic achievement for high school graduation under the timeline established in RCW 28A.655.061 and)) for assessing student career and college readiness.

(((iii) During the transition period specified in RCW 28A.655.061, the superintendent of public instruction shall use test items and other resources from the consortium assessment to develop and administer a tenth grade high school English language arts assessment, an end-of-course mathematics assessment to assess the standards common to algebra I and integrated mathematics I, and an end-of-course mathematics assessment to assess the standards common to geometry and integrated mathematics II.))

(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments, then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.

(5) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational support for students who have not mastered the essential academic learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's educational development.

(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content areas from one school year to the next.

(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide educational support to individual students, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance information as possible within the constraints of the assessment system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school districts:

(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may provide additional achievement information for individual students; and

(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily shared with parents and students.

(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.

(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and assessments for goals one and two.

(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.

(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the unique needs of special education students when developing the assessments under this section.

(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments under this section.

(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts, and health and fitness.

Sec. 15. RCW 28A.700.080 and 2008 c 170 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and conduct an ongoing campaign for career and technical education to increase awareness among teachers, counselors, students, parents, principals, school administrators, and the general public about the opportunities offered by rigorous career and technical education programs. Messages in the campaign shall emphasize career and technical education as a high quality educational pathway for students, including for students who seek advanced education that includes a bachelor's degree or beyond. In particular, the office shall provide information about the following:

(a) The model career and technical education programs of study developed under RCW 28A.700.060;

(b) Career and technical education course equivalencies and dual credit for high school and college;

(c) ((The career and technical education alternative assessment guidelines under RCW 28A.655.065;

(d))) The availability of scholarships for postsecondary workforce education, including the Washington award for vocational excellence, and apprenticeships through the opportunity grant program under RCW 28B.50.271, grants under RCW 28A.700.090, and other programs; and

(((e)))(d) Education, apprenticeship, and career opportunities in emerging and high-demand programs.

(2) The office shall use multiple strategies in the campaign depending on available funds, including developing an interactive web site to encourage and facilitate career exploration; conducting training and orientation for guidance counselors and teachers; and developing and disseminating printed materials.

(3) The office shall seek advice, participation, and financial assistance from the workforce training and education coordinating board, higher education institutions, foundations, employers, apprenticeship and training councils, workforce development councils, and business and labor organizations for the campaign.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 28A.155.045 (Certificate of individual achievement) and 2007 c 354 s 3 & 2004 c 19 s 104;

(2) RCW 28A.155.170 (Graduation ceremony—Certificate of attendance—Students with individualized education programs) and 2007 c 318 s 2;

(3) RCW 28A.600.405 (Participation in high school completion pilot program—Eligible students—Funding allocations—Rules—Information for students and parents) and 2012 1st sp.s. c 10 s 4 & 2007 c 355 s 4;

(4) RCW 28A.655.061 (High school assessment system—Certificate of academic achievement—Exemptions—Options to retake high school assessment—Objective alternative assessment—Student learning plans) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 2, 2011 1st sp.s. c 22 s 2, 2010 c 244 s 1, 2009 c 524 s 5, & 2008 c 321 s 2;

(5) RCW 28A.655.063 (Objective alternative assessments—Reimbursement of costs—Testing fee waivers) and 2007 c 354 s 7 & 2006 c 115 s 5;

(6) RCW 28A.655.065 (Objective alternative assessment methods—Appeals from assessment scores—Waivers and appeals from assessment requirements—Rules) and 2009 c 556 s 19, 2008 c 170 s 205, 2007 c 354 s 6, & 2006 c 115 s 1;

(7) RCW 28A.655.066 (Statewide end-of-course assessments for high school mathematics) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 3, 2011 c 25 s 2, 2009 c 310 s 3, & 2008 c 163 s 3; and

(8) RCW 28B.50.534 (High school completion pilot program) and 2007 c 355 s 3.

--- END ---