BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A health care facility that employs a health care provider, provides staff privileges to a health care provider, or enters into any contractual agreement with a health care provider, may not limit or prohibit a health care provider's safe, timely, effective, efficient, patient-centered, equitable, evidence-based, and medically accurate patient care.

(2) For purposes of this section, "patient care" means all aspects of the health care provider's interaction with the patient, including the provision of information, referrals, and clinical care.

(3) Nothing in this section supersedes the professional standards of care to which health care providers are expected to adhere.

(4) Nothing in this section may be construed to interfere with the ability of health care facilities to limit health services for financial reasons.

--- END ---