BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must manage wolf-related wildlife interactions using lethal means when all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The department has confirmed to its satisfaction that wolves from the same pack were involved in at least two wildlife interactions involving livestock during the previous six-month time period;

(b) The department has determined that the wildlife interactions were not associated with intentional feeding or other activities that resulted in an unnatural attraction of wolves by the owner of the affected livestock;

(c) The department has confirmed that at least one of the wildlife interactions resulted in the death of a livestock animal;

(d) The owner of the affected livestock appropriately employed at least one nonlethal prevention method; and

(e) In the opinion of the department, future wildlife interactions involving livestock and the same wolf pack are likely to continue.

(2) This section only applies in department-identified recovery zones where:

(a) Lethal management actions are legally allowed under federal law; and

(b) The department has documented the existence of at least four wolf packs.

(3) This section provides the conditions where the department must manage wolf-related wildlife interactions using lethal means. Nothing in this section prohibits the department from utilizing lethal management techniques under different conditions when, in the opinion of the department, lethal management techniques are appropriate and available.

--- END ---