BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.165.035 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in the 2015-16 school year, expenditure of funds from the learning assistance program must be consistent with the provisions of RCW 28A.655.235.

(2) Use of best practices that have been demonstrated through research to be associated with increased student achievement magnifies the opportunities for student success. To the extent they are included as a best practice or strategy in one of the state menus or an approved alternative under this section or RCW 28A.655.235, the following are services and activities that may be supported by the learning assistance program:

(a) Extended learning time opportunities occurring:

(i) Before or after the regular school day;

(ii) On Saturday; and

(iii) Beyond the regular school year;

(b) Services under RCW 28A.320.190;

(c) Professional development for certificated and classified staff that focuses on:

(i) The needs of a diverse student population;

(ii) Specific literacy and mathematics content and instructional strategies; and

(iii) The use of student work to guide effective instruction and appropriate assistance;

(d) Consultant teachers to assist in implementing effective instructional practices by teachers serving participating students;

(e) Tutoring support for participating students;

(f) Outreach activities and support for parents of participating students, including employing parent and family engagement coordinators; and

(g) Up to five percent of a district's learning assistance program allocation may be used for development of partnerships with community-based organizations, educational service districts, and other local agencies to deliver academic and nonacademic supports to participating students who are significantly at risk of not being successful in school to reduce barriers to learning, increase student engagement, and enhance students' readiness to learn. ((The office of the superintendent of public instruction must approve any community-based organization or local agency before learning assistance funds may be expended.))School-community learning assistance program action plans detailing partnerships with community-based organizations must be submitted annually to the office of the superintendent of public instruction in accordance with section 2 of this act.

(3) In addition to the state menu developed under RCW 28A.655.235, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene a panel of experts, including the Washington state institute for public policy, to develop additional state menus of best practices and strategies for use in the learning assistance program to assist struggling students at all grade levels in English language arts and mathematics and reduce disruptive behaviors in the classroom. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall publish the state menus by July 1, 2015, and update the state menus by each July 1st thereafter.

(4)(a) Beginning in the 2016-17 school year, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, school districts must use a practice or strategy that is on a state menu developed under subsection (3) of this section or RCW 28A.655.235.

(b) Beginning in the 2016-17 school year, school districts may use a practice or strategy that is not on a state menu developed under subsection (3) of this section for two school years initially. If the district is able to demonstrate improved outcomes for participating students over the previous two school years at a level commensurate with the best practices and strategies on the state menu, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall approve use of the alternative practice or strategy by the district for one additional school year. Subsequent annual approval by the superintendent of public instruction to use the alternative practice or strategy is dependent on the district continuing to demonstrate increased improved outcomes for participating students.

(c) Beginning in the 2016-17 school year, school districts may enter cooperative agreements with state agencies, local governments, or school districts for administrative or operational costs needed to provide services in accordance with the state menus developed under this section and RCW 28A.655.235.

(5) School districts are encouraged to implement best practices and strategies from the state menus developed under this section and RCW 28A.655.235 before the use is required.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.165 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each school district using funds for the purpose of RCW 28A.165.035(2)(g) shall coordinate with relevant local community-based organizations that provide educational or enhancement services to students eligible for the learning assistance program. The purpose of coordinating the use of funds is to further invest in advancing the state's knowledge regarding how to effectively operationalize intensive student-level interventions, both in and out of school. Inventing and then scaling highly effective service integration models is a key goal of personalizing instruction and supports for each and every student. This investment shall be used to allow creative and intensive school and community partnerships to turn around academic performance in high-needs schools.

(2)(a) Each school and district receiving funds under RCW 28A.165.035(2)(g) shall develop a school-community learning assistance program action plan that details how a school building or school district will partner with community-based organizations, educational service districts, and other local agencies that serve students who are significantly at risk of not being successful in school by reducing barriers to learning, increasing student engagement, and enhancing students' readiness to learn.

(b) The school-community learning assistance program action plan must detail the process around the community-based organizations chosen, show how the community-based organization is culturally or linguistically appropriate for the students being targeted, and must show the inclusiveness of the planning phase that includes all key partners, and includes the following information:

(i) That there are offices in the community;

(ii) Priority issue areas are identified and defined by residents of the community;

(iii) Solutions to address priority issues are developed with residents of the community; and

(iv) Program design, implementation, and evaluation components have the residents intimately involved in leadership positions.

(c) The school-community learning assistance program action plan must also detail potential opportunities for using learning assistance program funds to support the activities identified in the plan.

(d) The school-community learning assistance program action plan shall be submitted annually.

(e) The community-based organizations providing the following services must be included in the plan:

(i) Before and after school programs;

(ii) Summer programs;

(iii) Expanded learning opportunities offered outside of traditional school hours as defined in RCW 28A.630.122; or

(iv) Youth development programs.

(f) The community-based organizations included in the plan must show an ability to serve:

(i) Underrepresented or underserved students; or

(ii) Students of diverse cultural or linguistic backgrounds.

(g) The school-community learning assistance program action plan must also show that:

(i) The project leadership and decision making, including decisions on budget and programming, are shared among the school district, school, and community partners, with well-defined roles and responsibilities, and grant resources to carry out the project plan; and

(ii) The project outcomes define clear, ambitious, and realistic measurements of success, aligned with learning assistance program targets, to reduce the opportunity gap, especially for low-income students, students of color, students who are English language learners, or students receiving special education services. Well-defined project measurements include formative, interim, and summative evidence allowing frequent and more than annual progress monitoring and course correction.

(h) A structured and ongoing plan shall be used for partners to communicate and analyze data, including a project implementation process, to evaluate progress. This could include problem-solving, shared professional learning opportunities, and if in compliance with federal law, sharing of student data.

(i) The school-community learning assistance program action plan shall also demonstrate a connection between the school day and additional support hours that enhance personalized support and instruction.

(j) The school-community learning assistance program action plan shall include culturally responsive strategies that are designed to meet the needs of student subgroups the project intends to benefit, including students of color, students who are English language learners, students who are immigrants or refugees, and students receiving special education services.

(k) The school-community learning assistance program action plan must identify a strong return on investment for project funds and impact long-term student success.

(l) The school-community learning assistance program action plan must promote parent leadership and empowerment and support schools to be authentic partners with families.

(m) The school-community learning assistance program action plan must identify school staff to be held accountable for facilitating effective project and partnership coordination.

(n) The school-community learning assistance program action plan must include a sustainability plan to promote long-term partnerships.

(o) The school-community learning assistance program action plan must include how the project is likely to inform future programs with other communities, districts, or community-based organizations, and both districts and community-based organizations must agree to share learning about best and promising practices.

(3)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall issue a biennial report providing an overview on how districts and schools are using community-based partners to improve academic and behavioral success as well as lessons learned by school districts and schools that are supporting learning through community-based organizations using learning assistance program funds.

(b) The first report is due by November 1, 2016, and subsequent reports are due by November 1st of each even-numbered year thereafter.

--- END ---