BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 101. RCW 43.82.055 and 2007 c 506 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of financial management shall:

(1) Work with the department of ((general administration))enterprise services and all other state agencies to determine the long-term facility needs of state government; ((and))

(2) Develop and submit a six-year facility plan to the legislature by January 1st of every odd-numbered year((, beginning January 1, 2009,)) that includes state agency space requirements and other pertinent data necessary for cost-effective facility planning. The department of ((general administration))enterprise services shall assist with this effort as required by the office of financial management; and

(3) Establish and enforce policies and workplace strategies that promote the efficient use of state facilities.

Sec. 102. RCW 43.82.150 and 2007 c 506 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of financial management shall develop and maintain an inventory system to account for all facilities owned or leased ((facilities utilized)) by state government. At a minimum, the inventory system must include the facility owner, location, type, condition, use data, and size of each facility. In addition, for owned facilities, the inventory system must include the date and cost of original construction and the cost of any major remodeling or renovation. The inventory must be updated by all agencies, departments, boards, commissions, and institutions by June 30th of each year. The office of financial management shall publish a report summarizing information contained in the inventory system for each agency by October 1st of each year, beginning in 2010 and shall submit this report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

(2) ((All agencies, departments, boards, commissions, and institutions of the state of Washington shall provide to the office of financial management a complete inventory of owned and leased facilities by September 1, 2010. The inventory must be updated and submitted to the office of financial management by September 1st of each subsequent year.)) The ((inventories))inventory required under this subsection must be submitted in a standard format prescribed by the office of financial management.

(3) ((The office of financial management shall report to the legislature by September 1, 2008, on recommended improvements to the inventory system, redevelopment costs, and an implementation schedule for the redevelopment of the inventory system. The report shall also make recommendations on other improvements that will improve accountability and assist in the evaluation of budget requests and facility management by the governor and the legislature.

(4))) For the purposes of this section, "facilities" means buildings and other structures with walls and a roof. "Facilities" does not mean roads, bridges, parking areas, utility systems, and other similar improvements to real property.

Sec. 103. RCW 43.88.160 and 2012 c 230 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This section sets forth the major fiscal duties and responsibilities of officers and agencies of the executive branch. The regulations issued by the governor pursuant to this chapter shall provide for a comprehensive, orderly basis for fiscal management and control, including efficient accounting and reporting therefor, for the executive branch of the state government and may include, in addition, such requirements as will generally promote more efficient public management in the state.

(1) Governor; director of financial management. The governor, through the director of financial management, shall devise and supervise a modern and complete accounting system for each agency to the end that all revenues, expenditures, receipts, disbursements, resources, and obligations of the state shall be properly and systematically accounted for. The accounting system shall include the development of accurate, timely records and reports of all financial affairs of the state. The system shall also provide for central accounts in the office of financial management at the level of detail deemed necessary by the director to perform central financial management. The director of financial management shall adopt and periodically update an accounting procedures manual. Any agency maintaining its own accounting and reporting system shall comply with the updated accounting procedures manual and the rules of the director adopted under this chapter. An agency may receive a waiver from complying with this requirement if the waiver is approved by the director. Waivers expire at the end of the fiscal biennium for which they are granted. The director shall forward notice of waivers granted to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The director of financial management may require such financial, statistical, and other reports as the director deems necessary from all agencies covering any period.

(2) Except as provided in chapter 43.88C RCW, the director of financial management is responsible for quarterly reporting of primary operating budget drivers such as applicable workloads, caseload estimates, and appropriate unit cost data. These reports shall be transmitted to the legislative fiscal committees or by electronic means to the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee. Quarterly reports shall include actual monthly data and the variance between actual and estimated data to date. The reports shall also include estimates of these items for the remainder of the budget period.

(3) The director of financial management shall report at least annually to the appropriate legislative committees regarding the status of all appropriated capital projects, including transportation projects, showing significant cost overruns or underruns. If funds are shifted from one project to another, the office of financial management shall also reflect this in the annual variance report. Once a project is complete, the report shall provide a final summary showing estimated start and completion dates of each project phase compared to actual dates, estimated costs of each project phase compared to actual costs, and whether or not there are any outstanding liabilities or unsettled claims at the time of completion.

(4) In addition, the director of financial management, as agent of the governor, shall:

(a) Develop and maintain a system of internal controls and internal audits comprising methods and procedures to be adopted by each agency that will safeguard its assets, check the accuracy and reliability of its accounting data, promote operational efficiency, and encourage adherence to prescribed managerial policies for accounting and financial controls. The system developed by the director shall include criteria for determining the scope and comprehensiveness of internal controls required by classes of agencies, depending on the level of resources at risk.

Each agency head or authorized designee in an agency that meets risk-based criteria to be developed by the director of financial management shall be assigned the responsibility and authority for establishing and maintaining internal audits following ((the))professional audit standards ((of internal auditing of the institute of internal auditors));

(b) Make surveys and analyses of agencies with the object of determining better methods and increased effectiveness in the use of manpower and materials; and the director shall authorize expenditures for employee training to the end that the state may benefit from training facilities made available to state employees;

(c) Establish policies for allowing the contracting of child care services;

(d) Report to the governor with regard to duplication of effort or lack of coordination among agencies;

(e) Review any pay and classification plans, and changes thereunder, developed by any agency for their fiscal impact: PROVIDED, That none of the provisions of this subsection shall affect merit systems of personnel management now existing or hereafter established by statute relating to the fixing of qualifications requirements for recruitment, appointment, or promotion of employees of any agency. The director shall advise and confer with agencies including appropriate standing committees of the legislature as may be designated by the speaker of the house and the president of the senate regarding the fiscal impact of such plans and may amend or alter the plans, except that for the following agencies no amendment or alteration of the plans may be made without the approval of the agency concerned: Agencies headed by elective officials;

(f) Fix the number and classes of positions or authorized employee years of employment for each agency and during the fiscal period amend the determinations previously fixed by the director except that the director shall not be empowered to fix the number or the classes for the following: Agencies headed by elective officials;

(g) Adopt rules to effectuate provisions contained in (a) through (f) of this subsection.

(5) The treasurer shall:

(a) Receive, keep, and disburse all public funds of the state not expressly required by law to be received, kept, and disbursed by some other persons: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not apply to those public funds of the institutions of higher learning which are not subject to appropriation;

(b) Receive, disburse, or transfer public funds under the treasurer's supervision or custody;

(c) Keep a correct and current account of all moneys received and disbursed by the treasurer, classified by fund or account;

(d) Coordinate agencies' acceptance and use of credit cards and other payment methods, if the agencies have received authorization under RCW 43.41.180;

(e) Perform such other duties as may be required by law or by regulations issued pursuant to this law.

It shall be unlawful for the treasurer to disburse public funds in the treasury except upon forms or by alternative means duly prescribed by the director of financial management. These forms or alternative means shall provide for authentication and certification by the agency head or the agency head's designee that the services have been rendered or the materials have been furnished; or, in the case of loans or grants, that the loans or grants are authorized by law; or, in the case of payments for periodic maintenance services to be performed on state owned equipment, that a written contract for such periodic maintenance services is currently in effect; and the treasurer shall not be liable under the treasurer's surety bond for erroneous or improper payments so made. When services are lawfully paid for in advance of full performance by any private individual or business entity other than equipment maintenance providers or as provided for by RCW 42.24.035, such individual or entity other than central stores rendering such services shall make a cash deposit or furnish surety bond coverage to the state as shall be fixed in an amount by law, or if not fixed by law, then in such amounts as shall be fixed by the director of the department of enterprise services but in no case shall such required cash deposit or surety bond be less than an amount which will fully indemnify the state against any and all losses on account of breach of promise to fully perform such services. No payments shall be made in advance for any equipment maintenance services to be performed more than twelve months after such payment except that institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 may make payments in advance for equipment maintenance services to be performed up to sixty months after such payment. Any such bond so furnished shall be conditioned that the person, firm or corporation receiving the advance payment will apply it toward performance of the contract. The responsibility for recovery of erroneous or improper payments made under this section shall lie with the agency head or the agency head's designee in accordance with rules issued pursuant to this chapter. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit a public body to advance funds to a private service provider pursuant to a grant or loan before services have been rendered or material furnished.

(6) The state auditor shall:

(a) Report to the legislature the results of current post audits that have been made of the financial transactions of each agency; to this end the auditor may, in the auditor's discretion, examine the books and accounts of any agency, official, or employee charged with the receipt, custody, or safekeeping of public funds. Where feasible in conducting examinations, the auditor shall utilize data and findings from the internal control system prescribed by the office of financial management. The current post audit of each agency may include a section on recommendations to the legislature as provided in (c) of this subsection.

(b) Give information to the legislature, whenever required, upon any subject relating to the financial affairs of the state.

(c) Make the auditor's official report on or before the thirty-first of December which precedes the meeting of the legislature. The report shall be for the last complete fiscal period and shall include determinations as to whether agencies, in making expenditures, complied with the laws of this state. The state auditor is authorized to perform or participate in performance verifications and performance audits as expressly authorized by the legislature in the omnibus biennial appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan approved by the joint legislative audit and review committee. The state auditor, upon completing an audit for legal and financial compliance under chapter 43.09 RCW or a performance verification, may report to the joint legislative audit and review committee or other appropriate committees of the legislature, in a manner prescribed by the joint legislative audit and review committee, on facts relating to the management or performance of governmental programs where such facts are discovered incidental to the legal and financial audit or performance verification. The auditor may make such a report to a legislative committee only if the auditor has determined that the agency has been given an opportunity and has failed to resolve the management or performance issues raised by the auditor. If the auditor makes a report to a legislative committee, the agency may submit to the committee a response to the report. This subsection (6) shall not be construed to authorize the auditor to allocate other than de minimis resources to performance audits except as expressly authorized in the appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan. The results of a performance audit conducted by the state auditor that has been requested by the joint legislative audit and review committee must only be transmitted to the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(d) Be empowered to take exception to specific expenditures that have been incurred by any agency or to take exception to other practices related in any way to the agency's financial transactions and to cause such exceptions to be made a matter of public record, including disclosure to the agency concerned and to the director of financial management. It shall be the duty of the director of financial management to cause corrective action to be taken within six months, such action to include, as appropriate, the withholding of funds as provided in RCW 43.88.110. The director of financial management shall annually report by December 31st the status of audit resolution to the appropriate committees of the legislature, the state auditor, and the attorney general. The director of financial management shall include in the audit resolution report actions taken as a result of an audit including, but not limited to, types of personnel actions, costs and types of litigation, and value of recouped goods or services.

(e) Promptly report any irregularities to the attorney general.

(f) Investigate improper governmental activity under chapter 42.40 RCW.

In addition to the authority given to the state auditor in this subsection (6), the state auditor is authorized to conduct performance audits identified in RCW 43.09.470. Nothing in this subsection (6) shall limit, impede, or restrict the state auditor from conducting performance audits identified in RCW 43.09.470.

(7) The joint legislative audit and review committee may:

(a) Make post audits of the financial transactions of any agency and management surveys and program reviews as provided for in chapter 44.28 RCW as well as performance audits and program evaluations. To this end the joint committee may in its discretion examine the books, accounts, and other records of any agency, official, or employee.

(b) Give information to the legislature or any legislative committee whenever required upon any subject relating to the performance and management of state agencies.

(c) Make a report to the legislature which shall include at least the following:

(i) Determinations as to the extent to which agencies in making expenditures have complied with the will of the legislature and in this connection, may take exception to specific expenditures or financial practices of any agencies; and

(ii) Such plans as it deems expedient for the support of the state's credit, for lessening expenditures, for promoting frugality and economy in agency affairs, and generally for an improved level of fiscal management.

Sec. 104. RCW 47.04.280 and 2013 c 199 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to establish policy goals for the planning, operation, performance of, and investment in, the state's transportation system. The policy goals established under this section are deemed consistent with the benchmark categories adopted by the state's blue ribbon commission on transportation on November 30, 2000. Public investments in transportation should support achievement of these policy goals:

(a) Economic vitality: To promote and develop transportation systems that stimulate, support, and enhance the movement of people and goods to ensure a prosperous economy;

(b) Preservation: To maintain, preserve, and extend the life and utility of prior investments in transportation systems and services;

(c) Safety: To provide for and improve the safety and security of transportation customers and the transportation system;

(d) Mobility: To improve the predictable movement of goods and people throughout Washington state;

(e) Environment: To enhance Washington's quality of life through transportation investments that promote energy conservation, enhance healthy communities, and protect the environment; and

(f) Stewardship: To continuously improve the quality, effectiveness, and efficiency of the transportation system.

(2) The powers, duties, and functions of state transportation agencies must be performed in a manner consistent with the policy goals set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) These policy goals are intended to be the basis for establishing detailed and measurable objectives and related performance measures.

(4) It is the intent of the legislature that the ((office of financial management))department of transportation establish objectives and performance measures for the department ((of transportation)) and other state agencies with transportation-related responsibilities to ensure transportation system performance at local, regional, and state government levels progresses toward the attainment of the policy goals set forth in subsection (1) of this section. ((The office of financial management shall submit initial objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its review and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during the 2008 legislative session.)) The ((office of financial management ))department of transportation shall submit objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its review and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during each regular session of the legislature during an even-numbered year thereafter.

(5) A local or regional agency engaging in transportation planning may voluntarily establish objectives and performance measures to demonstrate progress toward the attainment of the policy goals set forth in subsection (1) of this section or any other transportation policy goals established by the local or regional agency. A local or regional agency engaging in transportation planning is encouraged to provide local and regional objectives and performance measures to be included with the objectives and performance measures submitted to the legislature pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

(6) This section does not create a private right of action.

Sec. 105. RCW 47.64.170 and 2013 c 306 s 521 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any ferry employee organization certified as the bargaining representative shall be the exclusive representative of all ferry employees in the bargaining unit and shall represent all such employees fairly.

(2) A ferry employee organization or organizations and the governor may each designate any individual as its representative to engage in collective bargaining negotiations.

(3) Negotiating sessions, including strategy meetings of the employer or employee organizations, mediation, and the deliberative process of arbitrators are exempt from the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW. Hearings conducted by arbitrators may be open to the public by mutual consent of the parties.

(4) Terms of any collective bargaining agreement may be enforced by civil action in Thurston county superior court upon the initiative of either party.

(5) Ferry system employees or any employee organization shall not negotiate or attempt to negotiate directly with anyone other than the person who has been appointed or authorized a bargaining representative for the purpose of bargaining with the ferry employees or their representative.

(6)(a) Within ten working days after the first Monday in September of every odd-numbered year, the parties shall attempt to agree on an interest arbitrator to be used if the parties are not successful in negotiating a comprehensive collective bargaining agreement. If the parties cannot agree on an arbitrator within the ten-day period, either party may request a list of seven arbitrators from the federal mediation and conciliation service. The parties shall select an interest arbitrator using the coin toss/alternate strike method within thirty calendar days of receipt of the list. Immediately upon selecting an interest arbitrator, the parties shall cooperate to reserve dates with the arbitrator for potential arbitration between August 1st and September 15th of the following even-numbered year. The parties shall also prepare a schedule of at least five negotiation dates for the following year, absent an agreement to the contrary. The parties shall execute a written agreement before November 1st of each odd-numbered year setting forth the name of the arbitrator and the dates reserved for bargaining and arbitration. This subsection (6)(a) imposes minimum obligations only and is not intended to define or limit a party's full, good faith bargaining obligation under other sections of this chapter.

(b) The negotiation of a proposed collective bargaining agreement by representatives of the employer and a ferry employee organization shall commence on or about February 1st of every even-numbered year.

(c) For negotiations covering the 2009-2011 biennium and subsequent biennia, the time periods specified in this section, and in RCW 47.64.210 and 47.64.300 through 47.64.320, must ensure conclusion of all agreements on or before October 1st of the even-numbered year next preceding the biennial budget period during which the agreement should take effect. These time periods may only be altered by mutual agreement of the parties in writing. Any such agreement and any impasse procedures agreed to by the parties under RCW 47.64.200 must include an agreement regarding the new time periods that will allow final resolution by negotiations or arbitration by October 1st of each even-numbered year.

(7) It is the intent of this section that the collective bargaining agreement or arbitrator's award shall commence on July 1st of each odd-numbered year and shall terminate on June 30th of the next odd-numbered year to coincide with the ensuing biennial budget year, as defined by RCW 43.88.020(7), to the extent practical. It is further the intent of this section that all collective bargaining agreements be concluded by October 1st of the even-numbered year before the commencement of the biennial budget year during which the agreements are to be in effect. After the expiration date of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter, except to the extent provided in subsection (11) of this section and RCW 47.64.270(4), all of the terms and conditions specified in the collective bargaining agreement remain in effect until the effective date of a subsequently negotiated agreement, not to exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement. Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement according to law.

(8) The office of financial management shall conduct a salary survey, for use in collective bargaining and arbitration((, which must be conducted through a contract with a firm nationally recognized in the field of human resources management consulting)).

(9) Except as provided in subsection (11) of this section:

(a) The governor shall submit a request either for funds necessary to implement the collective bargaining agreements including, but not limited to, the compensation and fringe benefit provisions or for legislation necessary to implement the agreement, or both. Requests for funds necessary to implement the collective bargaining agreements shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless such requests:

(i) Have been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1st before the legislative session at which the requests are to be considered; and

(ii) Have been certified by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible financially for the state.

(b) The governor shall submit a request either for funds necessary to implement the arbitration awards or for legislation necessary to implement the arbitration awards, or both. Requests for funds necessary to implement the arbitration awards shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless such requests:

(i) Have been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1st before the legislative session at which the requests are to be considered; and

(ii) Have been certified by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible financially for the state.

(c) The legislature shall approve or reject the submission of the request for funds necessary to implement the collective bargaining agreements or arbitration awards as a whole for each agreement or award. The legislature shall not consider a request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement or arbitration award unless the request is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060. If the legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, either party may reopen all or part of the agreement and award or the exclusive bargaining representative may seek to implement the procedures provided for in RCW 47.64.210 and 47.64.300.

(10) If, after the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of an agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.

(11)(a) For the collective bargaining agreements negotiated for the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may consider a request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement even if the request for funds was not received by the office of financial management by October 1st and was not transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060.

(b) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, a collective bargaining agreement related to employee health care benefits negotiated between the employer and coalition pursuant to RCW 41.80.020(3) regarding the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee must be a separate agreement for which the governor may request funds necessary to implement the agreement. The legislature may act upon a 2013-2015 collective bargaining agreement related to employee health care benefits if an agreement is reached and submitted to the office of financial management and legislative budget committees before final legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating budget by the sitting legislature.

(c) For the collective bargaining agreements negotiated for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may consider a request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement reached after October 1st after a determination of financial infeasibility by the director of the office of financial management if the request for funds is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060.

Sec. 106. RCW 47.64.360 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((office of financial management))department of transportation shall complete a government management and accountability performance report that provides a baseline assessment of current performance on the performance measures identified in RCW 47.64.355 ((and section 11 of this act)) using final 2009-2011 data. This report must be presented to the legislature by November 1, 2011, through the attainment report required in RCW 47.01.071(5) and 47.04.280.

(2) By December 31, 2012, and each year thereafter, the ((office of financial management))department of transportation shall complete a performance report for the prior fiscal year. This report must be reviewed by the joint transportation committee.

(3) Management shall lead implementation of the performance measures in RCW 47.64.355 ((and section 11 of this act)).

Sec. 107. RCW 79.44.060 and 2003 c 334 s 508 are each amended to read as follows:

When the chief administrative officer of an agency of state government is satisfied that an assessing district has complied with all the conditions precedent to the levy of assessments for district purposes, pursuant to this chapter against lands occupied, used, or under the jurisdiction of the officer's agency, he or she shall pay them, together with any interest thereon from any funds specifically appropriated to the agency therefor or from any funds of the agency which under existing law have been or are required to be expended to pay assessments on a current basis. ((In all other cases, the chief administrative officer shall certify to the director of financial management that the assessment is one properly chargeable to the state. The director of financial management shall pay such assessments from funds available or appropriated for this purpose.))

Except as provided in RCW 79.44.190 no lands of the state shall be subject to a lien for unpaid assessments, nor shall the interest of the state in any land be sold for unpaid assessments where assessment liens attached to the lands prior to state ownership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108. RCW 43.41.130, 43.41.140, 43.41.150, 43.41.370, and 43.41.380 are each recodified as sections in chapter 43.19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.41.190 (Community network programs—Recommended legislation) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 318; and

(2) RCW 43.41.195 (Community networks—Fund distribution formula) and 1999 c 372 s 8 & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 319.

PART II

HUMAN RESOURCES FUNCTIONS

Sec. 201. RCW 28A.345.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 467 are each amended to read as follows:

The association shall contract with ((the human resources director in)) the office of financial management to audit in odd-numbered years the association's staff classifications and employees' salaries. The association shall give copies of the audit reports to the office of financial management and the committees of each house of the legislature dealing with common schools.

Sec. 202. RCW 34.05.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 431 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter shall not apply to:

(a) The state militia, or

(b) The board of clemency and pardons, or

(c) The department of corrections or the indeterminate sentencing review board with respect to persons who are in their custody or are subject to the jurisdiction of those agencies.

(2) The provisions of RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 shall not apply:

(a) To adjudicative proceedings of the board of industrial insurance appeals except as provided in RCW 7.68.110 and 51.48.131;

(b) Except for actions pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, to the denial, suspension, or revocation of a driver's license by the department of licensing;

(c) To the department of labor and industries where another statute expressly provides for review of adjudicative proceedings of a department action, order, decision, or award before the board of industrial insurance appeals;

(d) To actions of the Washington personnel resources board, the ((human resources)) director((, or the office)) of financial management, and the department of enterprise services when carrying out their duties under chapter 41.06 RCW;

(e) To adjustments by the department of revenue of the amount of the surcharge imposed under RCW 82.04.261; or

(f) To the extent they are inconsistent with any provisions of chapter 43.43 RCW.

(3) Unless a party makes an election for a formal hearing pursuant to RCW 82.03.140 or 82.03.190, RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 do not apply to a review hearing conducted by the board of tax appeals.

(4) The rule-making provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

(a) Reimbursement unit values, fee schedules, arithmetic conversion factors, and similar arithmetic factors used to determine payment rates that apply to goods and services purchased under contract for clients eligible under chapter 74.09 RCW; and

(b) Adjustments by the department of revenue of the amount of the surcharge imposed under RCW 82.04.261.

(5) All other agencies, whether or not formerly specifically excluded from the provisions of all or any part of the administrative procedure act, shall be subject to the entire act.

Sec. 203. RCW 34.12.100 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 469 are each amended to read as follows:

The chief administrative law judge shall be paid a salary fixed by the governor after recommendation of the ((human resources)) director ((in the office)) of financial management. The salaries of administrative law judges appointed under the terms of this chapter shall be determined by the chief administrative law judge after recommendation of the ((department of personnel))director of financial management.

Sec. 204. RCW 41.04.340 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 432 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 12 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) An attendance incentive program is established for all eligible employees. As used in this section the term "eligible employee" means any employee of the state, other than eligible employees of the community and technical colleges and the state board for community and technical colleges identified in RCW 28B.50.553, and teaching and research faculty at the state and regional universities and The Evergreen State College, entitled to accumulate sick leave and for whom accurate sick leave records have been maintained. No employee may receive compensation under this section for any portion of sick leave accumulated at a rate in excess of one day per month. The state and regional universities and The Evergreen State College shall maintain complete and accurate sick leave records for all teaching and research faculty.

(2) In January of the year following any year in which a minimum of sixty days of sick leave is accrued, and each January thereafter, any eligible employee may receive remuneration for unused sick leave accumulated in the previous year at a rate equal to one day's monetary compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick leave in excess of sixty days. Sick leave for which compensation has been received shall be deducted from accrued sick leave at the rate of four days for every one day's monetary compensation.

From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, the rate of monetary compensation for the purposes of this subsection shall not be reduced by any temporary salary reduction.

(3) At the time of separation from state service due to retirement or death, an eligible employee or the employee's estate may elect to receive remuneration at a rate equal to one day's current monetary compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick leave. From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, the rate of monetary compensation for the purposes of this subsection shall not be reduced by any temporary salary reduction.

(4) Remuneration or benefits received under this section shall not be included for the purpose of computing a retirement allowance under any public retirement system in this state.

(5) Except as provided in subsections (7) through (9) of this section for employees not covered by chapter 41.06 RCW, this section shall be administered, and rules shall be adopted to carry out its purposes, by the ((human resources)) director of financial management for persons subject to chapter 41.06 RCW((: PROVIDED, That determination of classes of eligible employees shall be subject to approval by the office of financial management)).

(6) Should the legislature revoke any remuneration or benefits granted under this section, no affected employee shall be entitled thereafter to receive such benefits as a matter of contractual right.

(7) In lieu of remuneration for unused sick leave at retirement as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an agency head or designee may with equivalent funds, provide eligible employees with a benefit plan that provides for reimbursement for medical expenses. This plan shall be implemented only after consultation with affected groups of employees. For eligible employees covered by chapter 41.06 RCW, procedures for the implementation of these plans shall be adopted by the ((human resources)) director of the state health care authority. For eligible employees exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, ((and classified employees who have opted out of coverage of chapter 41.06 RCW as provided in RCW 41.56.201,)) implementation procedures shall be adopted by an agency head having jurisdiction over the employees.

(8) Implementing procedures adopted by the ((human resources)) director of the state health care authority or agency heads shall require that each medical expense plan authorized by subsection (7) of this section apply to all eligible employees in any one of the following groups: (a) Employees in an agency; (b) employees in a major organizational subdivision of an agency; (c) employees at a major operating location of an agency; (d) exempt employees under the jurisdiction of an elected or appointed Washington state executive; (e) employees of the Washington state senate; (f) employees of the Washington state house of representatives; (g) classified employees in a bargaining unit established by the ((director of personnel))public employment relations commission; or (h) other group of employees defined by an agency head that is not designed to provide an individual-employee choice regarding participation in a medical expense plan. However, medical expense plans for eligible employees in any of the groups under (a) through (h) of this subsection who are covered by a collective bargaining agreement shall be implemented only by written agreement with the bargaining unit's exclusive representative and a separate medical expense plan may be provided for unrepresented employees.

(9) Medical expense plans authorized by subsection (7) of this section must require as a condition of participation in the plan that employees in the group affected by the plan sign an agreement with the employer. The agreement must include a provision to hold the employer harmless should the United States government find that the employer or the employee is in debt to the United States as a result of the employee not paying income taxes due on the equivalent funds placed into the plan, or as a result of the employer not withholding or deducting a tax, assessment, or other payment on the funds as required by federal law. The agreement must also include a provision that requires an eligible employee to forfeit remuneration under subsection (3) of this section if the employee belongs to a group that has been designated to participate in the medical expense plan permitted under this section and the employee refuses to execute the required agreement.

Sec. 205. RCW 41.04.665 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 435 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An agency head may permit an employee to receive leave under this section if:

(a)(i) The employee suffers from, or has a relative or household member suffering from, an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition which is of an extraordinary or severe nature;

(ii) The employee has been called to service in the uniformed services;

(iii) A state of emergency has been declared anywhere within the United States by the federal or any state government and the employee has needed skills to assist in responding to the emergency or its aftermath and volunteers his or her services to either a governmental agency or to a nonprofit organization engaged in humanitarian relief in the devastated area, and the governmental agency or nonprofit organization accepts the employee's offer of volunteer services; or

(iv) The employee is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking; ((or

(v) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium only, the employee is eligible to use leave in lieu of temporary layoff under section 3(5), chapter 32, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.;))

(b) The illness, injury, impairment, condition, call to service, emergency volunteer service, or consequence of domestic violence, sexual assault, temporary layoff under section 3(5), chapter 32, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess., or stalking has caused, or is likely to cause, the employee to:

(i) Go on leave without pay status; or

(ii) Terminate state employment;

(c) The employee's absence and the use of shared leave are justified;

(d) The employee has depleted or will shortly deplete his or her:

(i) Annual leave and sick leave reserves if he or she qualifies under (a)(i) of this subsection;

(ii) Annual leave and paid military leave allowed under RCW 38.40.060 if he or she qualifies under (a)(ii) of this subsection; or

(iii) Annual leave if he or she qualifies under (a)(iii)((,))or (iv)((, or (v))) of this subsection;

(e) The employee has abided by agency rules regarding:

(i) Sick leave use if he or she qualifies under (a)(i) or (iv) of this subsection; or

(ii) Military leave if he or she qualifies under (a)(ii) of this subsection; and

(f) The employee has diligently pursued and been found to be ineligible for benefits under chapter 51.32 RCW if he or she qualifies under (a)(i) of this subsection.

(2) The agency head shall determine the amount of leave, if any, which an employee may receive under this section. However, an employee shall not receive a total of more than five hundred twenty-two days of leave, except that, a supervisor may authorize leave in excess of five hundred twenty-two days in extraordinary circumstances for an employee qualifying for the shared leave program because he or she is suffering from an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition which is of an extraordinary or severe nature. Shared leave received under the uniformed service shared leave pool in RCW 41.04.685 is not included in this total.

(3) An employee may transfer annual leave, sick leave, and his or her personal holiday, as follows:

(a) An employee who has an accrued annual leave balance of more than ten days may request that the head of the agency for which the employee works transfer a specified amount of annual leave to another employee authorized to receive leave under subsection (1) of this section. In no event may the employee request a transfer of an amount of leave that would result in his or her annual leave account going below ten days. For purposes of this subsection (3)(a), annual leave does not accrue if the employee receives compensation in lieu of accumulating a balance of annual leave.

(b) An employee may transfer a specified amount of sick leave to an employee requesting shared leave only when the donating employee retains a minimum of one hundred seventy-six hours of sick leave after the transfer.

(c) An employee may transfer, under the provisions of this section relating to the transfer of leave, all or part of his or her personal holiday, as that term is defined under RCW 1.16.050, or as such holidays are provided to employees by agreement with a school district's board of directors if the leave transferred under this subsection does not exceed the amount of time provided for personal holidays under RCW 1.16.050.

(4) An employee of an institution of higher education under RCW 28B.10.016, school district, or educational service district who does not accrue annual leave but does accrue sick leave and who has an accrued sick leave balance of more than twenty-two days may request that the head of the agency for which the employee works transfer a specified amount of sick leave to another employee authorized to receive leave under subsection (1) of this section. In no event may such an employee request a transfer that would result in his or her sick leave account going below twenty-two days. Transfers of sick leave under this subsection are limited to transfers from employees who do not accrue annual leave. Under this subsection, "sick leave" also includes leave accrued pursuant to RCW 28A.400.300(((2)))(1)(b) or 28A.310.240(1) with compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies.

(5) Transfers of leave made by an agency head under subsections (3) and (4) of this section shall not exceed the requested amount.

(6) Leave transferred under this section may be transferred from employees of one agency to an employee of the same agency or, with the approval of the heads of both agencies, to an employee of another state agency.

(7) While an employee is on leave transferred under this section, he or she shall continue to be classified as a state employee and shall receive the same treatment in respect to salary, wages, and employee benefits as the employee would normally receive if using accrued annual leave or sick leave.

(a) All salary and wage payments made to employees while on leave transferred under this section shall be made by the agency employing the person receiving the leave. The value of leave transferred shall be based upon the leave value of the person receiving the leave.

(b) In the case of leave transferred by an employee of one agency to an employee of another agency, the agencies involved shall arrange for the transfer of funds and credit for the appropriate value of leave.

(i) Pursuant to rules adopted by the office of financial management, funds shall not be transferred under this section if the transfer would violate any constitutional or statutory restrictions on the funds being transferred.

(ii) The office of financial management may adjust the appropriation authority of an agency receiving funds under this section only if and to the extent that the agency's existing appropriation authority would prevent it from expending the funds received.

(iii) Where any questions arise in the transfer of funds or the adjustment of appropriation authority, the director of financial management shall determine the appropriate transfer or adjustment.

(8) Leave transferred under this section shall not be used in any calculation to determine an agency's allocation of full time equivalent staff positions.

(9) The value of any leave transferred under this section which remains unused shall be returned at its original value to the employee or employees who transferred the leave when the agency head finds that the leave is no longer needed or will not be needed at a future time in connection with the illness or injury for which the leave was transferred or for any other qualifying condition. Before the agency head makes a determination to return unused leave in connection with an illness or injury, or any other qualifying condition, he or she must receive from the affected employee a statement from the employee's doctor verifying that the illness or injury is resolved. To the extent administratively feasible, the value of unused leave which was transferred by more than one employee shall be returned on a pro rata basis.

(10) An employee who uses leave that is transferred to him or her under this section may not be required to repay the value of the leave that he or she used.

(11) The ((human resources)) director of financial management may adopt rules as necessary to implement subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 206. RCW 41.04.680 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 437 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of financial management and other personnel authorities shall adopt rules or policies governing the accumulation and use of sick leave for state agency and department employees, expressly for the establishment of a plan allowing participating employees to pool sick leave and allowing any sick leave thus pooled to be used by any participating employee who has used all of the sick leave, annual leave, and compensatory leave that has been personally accrued by him or her. Each department or agency of the state may allow employees to participate in a sick leave pool established by the office of financial management and other personnel authorities.

(1) For purposes of calculating maximum sick leave that may be donated or received by any one employee, pooled sick leave:

(a) Is counted and converted in the same manner as sick leave under the Washington state leave sharing program as provided in this chapter; and

(b) Does not create a right to sick leave in addition to the amount that may be donated or received under the Washington state leave sharing program as provided in this chapter.

(2) The office of financial management and other personnel authorities, except the personnel authorities for higher education institutions, shall adopt rules which provide:

(a) That employees are eligible to participate in the sick leave pool after one year of employment with the state or agency of the state if the employee has accrued a minimum amount of unused sick leave, to be established by rule;

(b) That participation in the sick leave pool shall, at all times, be voluntary on the part of the employees;

(c) That any sick leave pooled shall be removed from the personally accumulated sick leave balance of the employee contributing the leave;

(d) That any sick leave in the pool that is used by a participating employee may be used only for the employee's personal illness, accident, or injury;

(e) That a participating employee is not eligible to use sick leave accumulated in the pool until all of his or her personally accrued sick, annual, and compensatory leave has been used;

(f) A maximum number of days of sick leave in the pool that any one employee may use;

(g) That a participating employee who uses sick leave from the pool is not required to recontribute such sick leave to the pool, except as otherwise provided in this section;

(h) That an employee who cancels his or her membership in the sick leave pool is not eligible to withdraw the days of sick leave contributed by that employee to the pool;

(i) That an employee who transfers from one position in state government to another position in state government may transfer from one pool to another if the eligibility criteria of the pools are comparable and the administrators of the pools have agreed on a formula for transfer of credits;

(j) That alleged abuse of the use of the sick leave pool shall be investigated, and, on a finding of wrongdoing, the employee shall repay all of the sick leave credits drawn from the sick leave pool and shall be subject to such other disciplinary action as is determined by the agency head;

(k) That sick leave credits may be drawn from the sick leave pool by a part-time employee on a pro rata basis; and

(l) That each department or agency shall maintain accurate and reliable records showing the amount of sick leave which has been accumulated and is unused by employees, in accordance with guidelines established by the ((department of personnel))office of financial management.

(3) Personnel authorities for higher education institutions shall adopt policies consistent with the needs of the employees under their respective jurisdictions.

Sec. 207. RCW 41.06.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 401 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the words used in this chapter have the meaning given in this section.

(1) "Affirmative action" means a procedure by which racial minorities, women, persons in the protected age category, persons with disabilities, Vietnam-era veterans, and disabled veterans are provided with increased employment opportunities. It shall not mean any sort of quota system.

(2) "Agency" means an office, department, board, commission, or other separate unit or division, however designated, of the state government and all personnel thereof; it includes any unit of state government established by law, the executive officer or members of which are either elected or appointed, upon which the statutes confer powers and impose duties in connection with operations of either a governmental or proprietary nature.

(3) "Board" means the Washington personnel resources board established under the provisions of RCW 41.06.110, except that this definition does not apply to the words "board" or "boards" when used in RCW 41.06.070.

(4) "Career development" means the progressive development of employee capabilities to facilitate productivity, job satisfaction, and upward mobility through work assignments as well as education and training that are both state-sponsored and are achieved by individual employee efforts, all of which shall be consistent with the needs and obligations of the state and its agencies.

(5) "Classified service" means all positions in the state service subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(6) "Comparable worth" means the provision of similar salaries for positions that require or impose similar responsibilities, judgments, knowledge, skills, and working conditions.

(7) "Competitive service" means all positions in the classified service for which a competitive examination is required as a condition precedent to appointment.

(8) "Department" means an agency of government that has as its governing officer a person, or combination of persons such as a commission, board, or council, by law empowered to operate the agency responsible either to (a) no other public officer or (b) the governor.

(9) "Director" means the ((human resources)) director ((within the office)) of financial management ((and appointed under RCW 43.41.113))or the director's designee.

(10) "Institutions of higher education" means the University of Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.

(11) "Noncompetitive service" means all positions in the classified service for which a competitive examination is not required.

(12) "Related boards" means the state board for community and technical colleges; and such other boards, councils, and commissions related to higher education as may be established.

(13) "Training" means activities designed to develop job-related knowledge and skills of employees.

Sec. 208. RCW 41.06.157 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 411 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To promote the most effective use of the state's workforce and improve the effectiveness and efficiency of the delivery of services to the citizens of the state, the director shall adopt and maintain a comprehensive classification plan for all positions in the classified service. The classification plan must:

(a) Be simple and streamlined;

(b) Support state agencies in responding to changing technologies, economic and social conditions, and the needs of its citizens;

(c) Value workplace diversity;

(d) Facilitate the reorganization and decentralization of governmental services;

(e) Enhance mobility and career advancement opportunities; and

(f) Consider rates in other public employment and private employment in the state.

(2) An appointing authority and an employee organization representing classified employees of the appointing authority for collective bargaining purposes may jointly request the ((human resources)) director of financial management to initiate a classification study.

(3) For institutions of higher education and related boards, the director may adopt special salary ranges to be competitive with positions of a similar nature in the state or the locality in which the institution of higher education or related board is located.

(4) The director may undertake salary surveys of positions in other public and private employment to establish market rates. Any salary survey information collected from private employers which identifies a specific employer with salary rates which the employer pays to its employees shall not be subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 209. RCW 41.06.167 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 413 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((human resources)) director of financial management shall undertake comprehensive compensation surveys for officers and entry-level officer candidates of the Washington state patrol, with such surveys to be conducted in the year prior to the convening of every other one hundred five day regular session of the state legislature. Salary and fringe benefit survey information collected from private employers which identifies a specific employer with the salary and fringe benefit rates which that employer pays to its employees shall not be subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 210. RCW 42.17A.705 and 2012 c 229 s 582 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer" includes:

(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind, the chief information officer of the office of chief information officer, the director of the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of commerce, the director of the consolidated technology services agency, the secretary of corrections, the director of early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the director of enterprise services, the secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the secretary of health, the administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, ((the human resources director,)) the executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the executive director of the state investment board, the director of labor and industries, the director of licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the executive director of the public disclosure commission, the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of the recreation and conservation office, the director of retirement systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and state universities and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and each campus president of each state community college;

(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;

(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and

(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of trustees of each community college and each technical college, each member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities authority, student achievement council, higher education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, state investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, liquor control board, lottery commission, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and recreation commission, Washington personnel resources board, board of pilotage commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure commission, public employees' benefits board, recreation and conservation funding board, salmon recovery funding board, shorelines hearings board, board of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington State University board of regents, and Western Washington University board of trustees.

Sec. 211. RCW 41.80.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 972 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the matters subject to bargaining include wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment, and the negotiation of any question arising under a collective bargaining agreement.

(2) The employer is not required to bargain over matters pertaining to:

(a) Health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits, except as required in subsection (3) of this section;

(b) Any retirement system or retirement benefit; or

(c) Rules of the ((human resources)) director of financial management, the director of enterprise services, or the Washington personnel resources board adopted under RCW 41.06.157.

(3) Matters subject to bargaining include the number of names to be certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits. However, except as provided otherwise in this subsection for institutions of higher education, negotiations regarding the number of names to be certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits shall be conducted between the employer and one coalition of all the exclusive bargaining representatives subject to this chapter. The exclusive bargaining representatives for employees that are subject to chapter 47.64 RCW shall bargain the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits with the employer as part of the coalition under this subsection. Any such provision agreed to by the employer and the coalition shall be included in all master collective bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties. For institutions of higher education, promotional preferences and the number of names to be certified for vacancies shall be bargained under the provisions of RCW 41.80.010(4). For agreements covering the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, any agreement between the employer and the coalition regarding the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits is a separate agreement and shall not be included in the master collective bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties.

(4) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall not agree to any proposal that would prevent the implementation of approved affirmative action plans or that would be inconsistent with the comparable worth agreement that provided the basis for the salary changes implemented beginning with the 1983-1985 biennium to achieve comparable worth.

(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall not bargain over matters pertaining to management rights established in RCW 41.80.040.

(6) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter, the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a statute is invalid and unenforceable.

(7) This section does not prohibit bargaining that affects contracts authorized by RCW 41.06.142.

Sec. 212. RCW 43.03.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to RCW 41.04.820, the directors of the several departments and members of the several boards and commissions, whose salaries are fixed by the governor and the chief executive officers of the agencies named in RCW 43.03.028(1) as now or hereafter amended shall each severally receive such salaries, payable in monthly installments, as shall be fixed by the governor or the appropriate salary fixing authority, in an amount not to exceed the recommendations of the ((department of personnel))office of financial management. From February 18, 2009, through June 30, 2013, a salary or wage increase shall not be granted to any position under this section, except that increases may be granted for positions for which the employer has demonstrated difficulty retaining qualified employees if the following conditions are met:

(1) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources;

(2) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of client services; and

(3) For any state agency of the executive branch, not including institutions of higher education, the salary increase is approved by the director of the office of financial management.

Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010, through June 30, 2011, to a position under this section shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than July 31, 2011, detailing the positions for which salary increases were granted, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the increases.

Any agency granting a salary increase from July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2013, to a position under this section shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 31, 2012, and July 31, 2013, detailing the positions for which salary increases were granted during the preceding fiscal year, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the increases.

Sec. 213. RCW 43.06.013 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 454 are each amended to read as follows:

When requested by the governor or the director of the department of enterprise services, nonconviction criminal history fingerprint record checks shall be conducted through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and the federal bureau of investigation on applicants for agency head positions appointed by the governor. Information received pursuant to this section shall be confidential and made available only to the governor or director of ((the department of personnel))financial management or their employees directly involved in the selection, hiring, or background investigation of the subject of the record check. When necessary, applicants may be employed on a conditional basis pending completion of the criminal history record check. "Agency head" as used in this section has the same definition as provided in RCW 34.05.010.

Sec. 214. RCW 43.41.113 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 430 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of financial management shall direct and supervise the personnel policy and application of the civil service laws, chapter 41.06 RCW.

(2) ((The human resources director is created in the office of financial management. The human resources director shall be appointed by the governor, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall receive a salary in an amount fixed by the governor.

(3))) The ((human resources)) director or the director's designee has the authority and shall perform the functions as prescribed in chapter 41.06 RCW, or as otherwise prescribed by law.

(((4)))(3) The ((human resources)) director may delegate to any agency the authority to perform administrative and technical personnel activities if the agency requests such authority and the ((human resources)) director is satisfied that the agency has the personnel management capabilities to effectively perform the delegated activities. The ((human resources)) director shall prescribe standards and guidelines for the performance of delegated activities. If the ((human resources)) director determines that an agency is not performing delegated activities within the prescribed standards and guidelines, the director shall withdraw the authority from the agency to perform such activities.

Sec. 215. RCW 43.131.090 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 459 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the legislature specifies a shorter period of time, a terminated entity shall continue in existence until June 30th of the next succeeding year for the purpose of concluding its affairs: PROVIDED, That the powers and authority of the entity shall not be reduced or otherwise limited during this period. Unless otherwise provided:

(1) All employees of terminated entities classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, shall be transferred as appropriate or as otherwise provided in the procedures adopted by the ((human resources)) director of financial management pursuant to RCW 41.06.150;

(2) All documents and papers, equipment, or other tangible property in the possession of the terminated entity shall be delivered to the custody of the entity assuming the responsibilities of the terminated entity or if such responsibilities have been eliminated, documents and papers shall be delivered to the state archivist and equipment or other tangible property to the department of enterprise services;

(3) All funds held by, or other moneys due to, the terminated entity shall revert to the fund from which they were appropriated, or if that fund is abolished to the general fund;

(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 34.05.020, all rules made by a terminated entity shall be repealed, without further action by the entity, at the end of the period provided in this section, unless assumed and reaffirmed by the entity assuming the related legal responsibilities of the terminated entity;

(5) All contractual rights and duties of an entity shall be assigned or delegated to the entity assuming the responsibilities of the terminated entity, or if there is none to such entity as the governor shall direct.

Sec. 216. RCW 48.37.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 460 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When the commissioner determines that other market conduct actions identified in RCW 48.37.040(4)(a) have not sufficiently addressed issues raised concerning company activities in Washington state, the commissioner has the discretion to conduct market conduct examinations in accordance with the NAIC market conduct uniform examination procedures and the NAIC market regulation handbook.

(2)(a) In lieu of an examination of an insurer licensed in this state, the commissioner shall accept an examination report of another state, unless the commissioner determines that the other state does not have laws substantially similar to those of this state, or does not have a market oversight system that is comparable to the market conduct oversight system set forth in this law.

(b) The commissioner's determination under (a) of this subsection is discretionary with the commissioner and is not subject to appeal.

(c) If the insurer to be examined is part of an insurance holding company system, the commissioner may also seek to simultaneously examine any affiliates of the insurer under common control and management which are licensed to write the same lines of business in this state.

(3) Before commencement of a market conduct examination, market conduct oversight personnel shall prepare a work plan consisting of the following:

(a) The name and address of the insurer being examined;

(b) The name and contact information of the examiner-in-charge;

(c) The name of all market conduct oversight personnel initially assigned to the market conduct examination;

(d) The justification for the examination;

(e) The scope of the examination;

(f) The date the examination is scheduled to begin;

(g) Notice of any noninsurance department personnel who will assist in the examination;

(h) A time estimate for the examination;

(i) A budget for the examination if the cost of the examination is billed to the insurer; and

(j) An identification of factors that will be included in the billing if the cost of the examination is billed to the insurer.

(4)(a) Within ten days of the receipt of the information contained in subsection (3) of this section, insurers may request the commissioner's discretionary review of any alleged conflict of interest, pursuant to RCW 48.37.090(2), of market conduct oversight personnel and noninsurance department personnel assigned to a market conduct examination. The request for review shall specifically describe the alleged conflict of interest in the proposed assignment of any person to the examination.

(b) Within five business days of receiving a request for discretionary review of any alleged conflict of interest in the proposed assignment of any person to a market conduct examination, the commissioner or designee shall notify the insurer of any action regarding the assignment of personnel to a market conduct examination based on the insurer's allegation of conflict of interest.

(5) Market conduct examinations shall, to the extent feasible, use desk examinations and data requests before an on-site examination.

(6) Market conduct examinations shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions set forth in the NAIC market regulation handbook and the NAIC market conduct uniform examinations procedures, subject to the precedence of the provisions of chapter 82, Laws of 2007.

(7) The commissioner shall use the NAIC standard data request.

(8) Announcement of the examination shall be sent to the insurer and posted on the NAIC's examination tracking system as soon as possible but in no case later than sixty days before the estimated commencement of the examination, except where the examination is conducted in response to extraordinary circumstances as described in RCW 48.37.050(2)(a). The announcement sent to the insurer shall contain the examination work plan and a request for the insurer to name its examination coordinator.

(9) If an examination is expanded significantly beyond the original reasons provided to the insurer in the notice of the examination required by subsection (3) of this section, the commissioner shall provide written notice to the insurer, explaining the expansion and reasons for the expansion. The commissioner shall provide a revised work plan if the expansion results in significant changes to the items presented in the original work plan required by subsection (3) of this section.

(10) The commissioner shall conduct a preexamination conference with the insurer examination coordinator and key personnel to clarify expectations at least thirty days before commencement of the examination, unless otherwise agreed by the insurer and the commissioner.

(11) Before the conclusion of the field work for market conduct examination, the examiner-in-charge shall review examination findings to date with insurer personnel and schedule an exit conference with the insurer, in accordance with procedures in the NAIC market regulation handbook.

(12)(a) No later than sixty days after completion of each market conduct examination, the commissioner shall make a full written report of each market conduct examination containing only facts ascertained from the accounts, records, and documents examined and from the sworn testimony of individuals, and such conclusions and recommendations as may reasonably be warranted from such facts.

(b) The report shall be certified by the commissioner or by the examiner-in-charge of the examination, and shall be filed in the commissioner's office subject to (c) of this subsection.

(c) The commissioner shall furnish a copy of the market conduct examination report to the person examined not less than ten days and, unless the time is extended by the commissioner, not more than thirty days prior to the filing of the report for public inspection in the commissioner's office. If the person so requests in writing within such period, the commissioner shall hold a hearing to consider objections of such person to the report as proposed, and shall not so file the report until after such hearing and until after any modifications in the report deemed necessary by the commissioner have been made.

(d) Within thirty days of the end of the period described in (c) of this subsection, unless extended by order of the commissioner, the commissioner shall consider the report, together with any written submissions or rebuttals and any relevant portions of the examiner's work papers and enter an order:

(i) Adopting the market conduct examination report as filed or with modification or corrections. If the market conduct examination report reveals that the company is operating in violation of any law, rule, or order of the commissioner, the commissioner may order the company to take any action the commissioner considers necessary and appropriate to cure that violation;

(ii) Rejecting the market conduct examination report with directions to the examiners to reopen the examination for purposes of obtaining additional data, documentation, or information, and refiling under this subsection; or

(iii) Calling for an investigatory hearing with no less than twenty days' notice to the company for purposes of obtaining additional documentation, data, information, and testimony.

(e) All orders entered under (d) of this subsection must be accompanied by findings and conclusions resulting from the commissioner's consideration and review of the market conduct examination report, relevant examiner work papers, and any written submissions or rebuttals. The order is considered a final administrative decision and may be appealed under the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and must be served upon the company by certified mail or certifiable electronic means, together with a copy of the adopted examination report. A copy of the adopted examination report must be sent by certified mail or certifiable electronic means to each director at the director's residential address or to a personal e-mail account.

(f)(i) Upon the adoption of the market conduct examination report under (d) of this subsection, the commissioner shall continue to hold the content of the examination report as private and confidential information for a period of five days except that the order may be disclosed to the person examined. Thereafter, the commissioner may open the report for public inspection so long as no court of competent jurisdiction has stayed its publication.

(ii) If the commissioner determines that regulatory action is appropriate as a result of any market conduct examination, he or she may initiate any proceedings or actions as provided by law.

(iii) Nothing contained in this subsection requires the commissioner to disclose any information or records that would indicate or show the existence or content of any investigation or activity of a criminal justice agency.

(g) The insurer's response shall be included in the commissioner's order adopting the final report as an exhibit to the order. The insurer is not obligated to submit a response.

(13) The commissioner may withhold from public inspection any examination or investigation report for so long as he or she deems it advisable.

(14)(a) Market conduct examinations within this state of any insurer domiciled or having its home offices in this state, other than a title insurer, made by the commissioner or the commissioner's examiners and employees shall, except as to fees, mileage, and expense incurred as to witnesses, be at the expense of the state.

(b) Every other examination, whatsoever, or any part of the market conduct examination of any person domiciled or having its home offices in this state requiring travel and services outside this state, shall be made by the commissioner or by examiners designated by the commissioner and shall be at the expense of the person examined; but a domestic insurer shall not be liable for the compensation of examiners employed by the commissioner for such services outside this state.

(c) When making a market conduct examination under this chapter, the commissioner may contract, in accordance with applicable state contracting procedures, for qualified attorneys, appraisers, independent certified public accountants, contract actuaries, and other similar individuals who are independently practicing their professions, even though those persons may from time to time be similarly employed or retained by persons subject to examination under this chapter, as examiners as the commissioner deems necessary for the efficient conduct of a particular examination. The compensation and per diem allowances paid to such contract persons shall be reasonable in the market and time incurred, shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the compensation and per diem allowances for examiners set forth in the guidelines adopted by the national association of insurance commissioners, unless the commissioner demonstrates that one hundred twenty-five percent is inadequate under the circumstances of the examination, and subject to the provisions of (a) of this subsection.

(d)(i) The person examined and liable shall reimburse the state upon presentation of an itemized statement thereof, for the actual travel expenses of the commissioner's examiners, their reasonable living expenses allowance, and their per diem compensation, including salary and the employer's cost of employee benefits, at a reasonable rate approved by the commissioner, incurred on account of the examination. Per diem, salary, and expenses for employees examining insurers domiciled outside the state of Washington shall be established by the commissioner on the basis of the national association of insurance commissioner's recommended salary and expense schedule for zone examiners, or the salary schedule ((established by the human resources director)) and the expense schedule established by the office of financial management, whichever is higher. A domestic title insurer shall pay the examination expense and costs to the commissioner as itemized and billed by the commissioner.

(ii) The commissioner or the commissioner's examiners shall not receive or accept any additional emolument on account of any examination.

(iii) Market conduct examination fees subject to being reimbursed by an insurer shall be itemized and bills shall be provided to the insurer on a monthly basis for review prior to submission for payment, or as otherwise provided by state law.

(e) Nothing contained in this chapter limits the commissioner's authority to terminate or suspend any examination in order to pursue other legal or regulatory action under the insurance laws of this state. Findings of fact and conclusions made pursuant to any examination are prima facie evidence in any legal or regulatory action.

(f) The commissioner shall maintain active management and oversight of market conduct examination costs, including costs associated with the commissioner's own examiners, and with retaining qualified contract examiners necessary to perform an examination. Any agreement with a contract examiner shall:

(i) Clearly identify the types of functions to be subject to outsourcing;

(ii) Provide specific timelines for completion of the outsourced review;

(iii) Require disclosure to the insurer of contract examiners' recommendations;

(iv) Establish and use a dispute resolution or arbitration mechanism to resolve conflicts with insurers regarding examination fees; and

(v) Require disclosure of the terms of the contracts with the outside consultants that will be used, specifically the fees and/or hourly rates that can be charged.

(g) The commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, shall review and affirmatively endorse detailed billings from the qualified contract examiner before the detailed billings are sent to the insurer.

Sec. 217. RCW 49.74.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 463 are each amended to read as follows:

If the commission reasonably believes that a state agency, an institution of higher education, or the state patrol has failed to comply with an affirmative action rule adopted under RCW 41.06.150 or 43.43.340, the commission shall notify the director of the state agency, president of the institution of higher education, or chief of the Washington state patrol of the noncompliance, as well as the ((human resources)) director of financial management. The commission shall give the director of the state agency, president of the institution of higher education, or chief of the Washington state patrol an opportunity to be heard on the failure to comply.

--- END ---