BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 3.34.050 and 1998 c 19 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

At the general election in November 1962 and quadrennially thereafter, there shall be elected by the voters of each district court district the number of judges authorized for the district by the district court districting plan. Judges shall be elected for each district and electoral district, if any, by the qualified electors of the district in the same manner as judges of courts of record are elected, except as provided in chapter ((29.21))29A.52 RCW. Not less than ten days before the time for filing declarations of candidacy for the election of judges for districts entitled to more than one judge, the county auditor shall designate each such office of district judge to be filled by a number, commencing with the number one and numbering the remaining offices consecutively. At the time of the filing of the declaration of candidacy, each candidate shall designate by number which one, and only one, of the numbered offices for which he or she is a candidate and the name of the candidate shall appear on the ballot for only the numbered office for which the candidate filed a declaration of candidacy.

Sec. 2. RCW 14.08.304 and 1994 c 223 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The board of airport district commissioners shall consist of three members. The first commissioners shall be appointed by the county legislative authority. At the next general district election, held as provided in RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330, three airport district commissioners shall be elected. The terms of office of airport district commissioners shall be two years, or until their successors are elected and qualified and have assumed office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280. Members of the board of airport district commissioners shall be elected at each regular district general election on a nonpartisan basis in accordance with the general election law. Vacancies on the board of airport district commissioners shall occur and shall be filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW. Members of the board of airport district commissioners shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be reimbursed for actual necessary traveling and sustenance expenses incurred while engaged on official business.

Sec. 3. RCW 27.12.100 and 1965 c 63 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

An intercounty rural library district shall be established by joint action of two or more counties proceeding by either of the following alternative methods:

(1) The boards of county commissioners of any two or more counties shall adopt identical resolutions proposing the formation of such a district to include all of the areas outside of incorporated cities or towns in such counties as may be designated in such resolutions. In lieu of such resolutions a petition of like purport signed by ten percent of the registered voters residing outside of incorporated cities or towns of a county, may be filed with the county auditor thereof, and shall have the same effect as a resolution. The proposition for the formation of the district as stated on the petition shall be prepared by the attorney general upon request of the state library commission. Action to initiate the formation of such a district shall become ineffective in any county if corresponding action is not completed within one year thereafter by each other county included in such proposal. The county auditor in each county shall check the validity of the signatures on the petition and shall certify to the board of county commissioners the sufficiency of the signatures. If each petition contains the signatures of ten percent of the registered voters residing outside the incorporated cities and towns of the county, each board of county commissioners shall pass a resolution calling an election for the purpose of submitting the question to the voters and setting the date of said election. When such action has been taken in each of the counties involved, notification shall be made by each board of county commissioners to the board of county commissioners of the county having the largest population according to the last federal census, who shall give proper notification to each county auditor. At the next general or special election held in the respective counties there shall be submitted to the voters in the areas outside of incorporated cities and towns a question as to whether an intercounty rural library district shall be established as outlined in the resolutions or petitions. Notice of said election shall be given by the county auditor ((pursuant to RCW 29.27.080. The county auditor shall provide for the printing of a separate ballot and shall provide for the distribution of ballots to the polling places pursuant to RCW 29.04.020)). The county auditor shall instruct the election boards in split precincts. The respective county canvassing boards in each county to be included within the intercounty rural library district shall canvass the votes and certify the results to the county auditor pursuant to chapter ((29.62))29A.60 RCW; the result shall then be certified by each county auditor to the county auditor of the county having the largest population according to the last federal census. If a majority of the electors voting on the proposition in each of the counties affected shall vote in favor of such district it shall thereby become established, and the board of county commissioners of the county having the largest population according to the last federal census shall declare the intercounty rural library district established. If two or more of the counties affected are in an existing intercounty rural library district, then the electors in areas outside incorporated cities and towns in those counties shall vote as a unit and the electors in areas outside incorporated cities and towns in each of the other affected counties shall vote as separate units. If a majority of the electors voting on the proposition in the existing district and a majority of the voters in any of the other affected counties shall vote in favor of an expanded intercounty rural library district it shall thereby become established.

(2) The county commissioners of two or more counties meeting in joint session attended by a majority of the county commissioners of each county may, by majority vote of those present, order the establishment of an intercounty rural library district to include all of the area outside of incorporated cities and towns in as many of the counties represented at such joint meeting as shall be determined by resolution of such joint meeting. If two or more counties are in an existing intercounty rural library district, then a majority vote of all of the commissioners present from those counties voting as a unit, and a majority vote of the commissioners present from any other county shall cause the joint session to order the establishment of an expanded intercounty rural library district. No county, however, shall be included in such district if a majority of its county commissioners vote against its inclusion in such district.

Sec. 4. RCW 27.15.020 and 1996 c 258 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon receipt of a completed written request to both establish a library capital facility area and submit a ballot proposition under RCW 27.15.050 to finance library capital facilities, that is signed by a majority of the members of the board of trustees of a library district or board of trustees of a city or town library, the county legislative authority or county legislative authorities for the county or counties in which a proposed library capital facility area is to be established shall submit separate ballot propositions to voters to authorize establishing the proposed library capital facility area and authorizing the library capital facility area, if established, to finance library capital facilities by issuing general indebtedness and imposing excess levies to retire the indebtedness. The ballot propositions shall be submitted to voters at a general or special election. If the proposed election date is not a general election, the county legislative authority is encouraged to request an election when another unit of local government with territory located in the proposed library capital facility area is already holding a special election under RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330. Approval of the ballot proposition to create a library capital facility area shall be by a simple majority vote.

A completed request submitted under this section shall include: (1) A description of the boundaries of the library capital facility area; and (2) a copy of the resolution of the legislative authority of each city or town, and board of trustees of each library district, with territory included within the proposed library capital facility area indicating both: (a) Its approval of the creation of the proposed library capital facility area; and (b) agreement on how election costs will be paid for submitting ballot propositions to voters that authorize the library capital facility area to incur general indebtedness and impose excess levies to retire the general indebtedness.

Sec. 5. RCW 27.15.050 and 1996 c 258 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A library capital facility area may contract indebtedness or borrow money to finance library capital facilities and may issue general obligation bonds for such purpose not exceeding an amount, together with any existing indebtedness of the library capital facility area, equal to one and one-quarter percent of the value of the taxable property in the district and impose excess property tax levies to retire the general indebtedness as provided in RCW 39.36.050 if a ballot proposition authorizing both the indebtedness and excess levies is approved by at least three-fifths of the voters of the library capital facility area voting on the proposition, and the total number of voters voting on the proposition constitutes not less than forty percent of the total number of voters in the library capital facility area voting at the last preceding general election. The term "value of the taxable property" has the meaning set forth in RCW 39.36.015. Such a proposition shall be submitted to voters at a general or special election and may be submitted to voters at the same election as the election when the ballot proposition authorizing the establishing of the library capital facility area is submitted. If the proposed election date is not a general election, the county legislative authority is encouraged to request an election when another unit of local government with territory located in the proposed library capital facility area is already holding a special election under RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330.

(2) A library capital facility area may accept gifts or grants of money or property of any kind for the same purposes for which it is authorized to borrow money in subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.315.275 and 1999 c 315 s 704 are each amended to read as follows:

Notice of special elections as provided for in RCW 28A.315.265 shall be given by the county auditor as provided in RCW ((29.27.080))29A.52.355. The notice of election shall state the purpose for which the election has been called and contain a description of the boundaries of the proposed new district and a statement of any terms of adjustment of bonded indebtedness on which to be voted.

Sec. 7. RCW 28A.320.410 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.521 are each amended to read as follows:

All school district elections, regular or special, shall be conducted according to the election laws of the state as contained in Title 29A RCW, and in the event of a conflict as to the application of the laws of this title or Title 29A RCW, the latter shall prevail.

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.323.050 and 1990 c 33 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

The registered voters residing within a joint school district shall be entitled to vote on the office of school director of their district.

Jurisdiction of any such election shall rest with the county auditor of the county administering such joint district as provided in RCW ((28A.315.380))28A.323.040.

At each general election, or upon approval of a request for a special election as provided for in RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330, such county auditor shall:

(1) See that there shall be at least one polling place in each county;

(2) At least twenty days prior to the elections concerned, certify in writing to the superintendent of the school district the number and location of the polling places established by such auditor for such regular or special elections; and

(3) Do all things otherwise required by law for the conduct of such election.

It is the intention of this section that the qualified electors of a joint school district shall not be forced to go to a different polling place on the same day when other elections are being held to vote for school directors of their district.

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.343.010 and 1990 c 33 s 317 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever the directors to be elected in a school district that is not divided into directors' districts are not all to be elected for the same term of years, the county auditor shall distinguish them and designate the same as provided for in RCW ((29.21.140))29A.24.020, and assign position numbers thereto as provided in RCW ((28A.315.470))28A.343.320 and each candidate shall indicate on his or her declaration of candidacy the term for which he or she seeks to be elected and position number for which he or she is filing. The candidate receiving the largest number of votes for each position shall be deemed elected.

Sec. 10. RCW 28A.343.030 and 1991 c 363 s 23 and 1991 c 288 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The board of directors of every first-class school district other than a school district of the first class having within its boundaries a city with a population of four hundred thousand people or more which is not divided into directors' districts may submit to the voters at any regular school district election a proposition to authorize the board of directors to divide the district into directors' districts or for second-class school districts into director districts or a combination of no fewer than three director districts and no more than two at large positions. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposition is affirmative, the board of directors shall proceed to divide the district into directors' districts following the procedure established in RCW ((29.70.100))29A.76.010. Such director districts, if approved, shall not become effective until the next regular school election when a new five member board of directors shall be elected, one from each of the director districts from among the residents of the respective director district, or from among the residents of the entire school district in the case of directors at large, by the electors of the entire district, two for a term of two years and three for a term of four years, unless such district elects its directors for six years, in which case, one for a term of two years, two for a term of four years, and two for a term of six years.

Sec. 11. RCW 28A.343.320 and 1990 c 161 s 4 and 1990 c 59 s 98 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Candidates for the position of school director shall file their declarations of candidacy as provided in Title 29A RCW.

The positions of school directors in each district shall be dealt with as separate offices for all election purposes, and where more than one position is to be filled, each candidate shall file for one of the positions so designated: PROVIDED, That in school districts containing director districts, or a combination of director districts and director at large positions, candidates shall file for such director districts or at large positions. Position numbers shall be assigned to correspond to director district numbers to the extent possible.

Sec. 12. RCW 28A.343.330 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.316 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in RCW ((29.21.010))29A.52.210, the positions of school directors and the candidates therefor shall appear separately on the nonpartisan ballot in substantially the following form:

SCHOOL DIRECTOR ELECTION BALLOT

District No. . . . .

Date . . . . . .

To vote for a person make a cross (X) in the square at the right of the name of the person for whom you desire to vote.

School District Directors

Position No. 1

Vote for One

. . . .

□

. . . .

□

. . . .

□

Position No. 2

Vote for One

. . . .

□

. . . .

□

. . . .

□

To Fill Unexpired Term

Position No. 3

2 (or 4) year term

Vote for One

. . . .

□

. . . .

□

. . . .

□

The names of candidates shall appear upon the ballot in order of filing for each position. There shall be no rotation of names in the printing of such ballots.

Sec. 13. RCW 28A.343.350 and 1999 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding RCW 42.12.010(4), a school director elected from a director district may continue to serve as a director from the district even though the director no longer resides in the director district, but continues to reside in the school district, under the following conditions:

(1) If, as a result of redrawing the director district boundaries, the director no longer resides in the director district, the director shall retain his or her position for the remainder of his or her term of office; and

(2) If, as a result of the director changing his or her place of residence the director no longer resides in the director district, the director shall retain his or her position until a successor is elected and assumes office as follows: (a) If the change in residency occurs after the opening of the regular filing period provided under RCW ((29.15.020))29A.24.050, in the year two years after the director was elected to office, the director shall remain in office for the remainder of his or her term of office; or (b) if the change in residency occurs prior to the opening of the regular filing period provided under RCW ((29.15.020))29A.24.050, in the year two years after the director was elected to office, the director shall remain in office until a successor assumes office who has been elected to serve the remainder of the unexpired term of office at the school district general election held in that year.

Sec. 14. RCW 28A.343.660 and 1991 c 363 s 28 and 1991 c 288 ss 5 and 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any school district of the first class having within its boundaries a city with a population of four hundred thousand people or more shall be divided into seven director districts. The boundaries of such director districts shall be established by the members of the school board, such boundaries to be established so that each such district shall comply, as nearly as practicable, with the criteria established in RCW ((29.70.100))29A.76.010. Boundaries of such director districts shall be adjusted by the school board following the procedure established in RCW ((29.70.100))29A.76.010 after each federal decennial census if population change shows the need thereof to comply with the criteria of RCW ((29.70.100))29A.76.010. No person shall be eligible for the position of school director in any such director district unless such person resides in the particular director district. Residents in the particular director district desiring to be a candidate for school director shall file their declarations of candidacy for such director district and for the position of director in that district and shall be voted upon, in any primary required to be held for the position under Title 29A RCW, by the registered voters of that particular director district. In the general election, each position shall be voted upon by all the registered voters in the school district. The order of the names of candidates shall appear on the primary and general election ballots as required for nonpartisan positions under Title 29A RCW. Except as provided in RCW ((28A.315.680))28A.343.670, every such director so elected in school districts divided into seven director districts shall serve for a term of four years as otherwise provided in RCW ((28A.315.460))28A.343.610.

Sec. 15. RCW 28A.343.670 and 1995 c 335 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

The school boards of any school district of the first class having within its boundaries a city with a population of four hundred thousand people or more shall establish the director district boundaries. Appointment of a board member to fill any vacancy existing for a new director district prior to the next regular school election shall be by the school board. Prior to the next regular election in the school district and the filing of declarations of candidacy therefor, the incumbent school board shall designate said director districts by number. Directors appointed to fill vacancies as above provided shall be subject to election, one for a six-year term, and one for a two-year term and thereafter the term of their respective successors shall be for four years. The term of office of incumbent members of the board of such district shall not be affected by RCW ((28A.315.450, 28A.315.460, 28A.315.570, 28A.315.670, and 28A.315.680))28A.343.300, 28A.343.600, 28A.343.610, 28A.343.660, and 28A.343.670.

Sec. 16. RCW 28A.535.030 and 1990 c 33 s 482 are each amended to read as follows:

At the time of the adoption of the resolution provided for in RCW 28A.535.020, the board of directors shall direct the school district superintendent to give notice to the county auditor of the suggested time and purpose of such election, and specifying the amount and general character of the indebtedness proposed to be ratified. Such superintendent shall also cause written or printed notices to be posted in at least five places in such school district at least twenty days before such election. In addition to his or her other duties relating thereto, the county auditor shall give notice of such election as provided for in RCW ((29.27.080))29A.52.355.

Sec. 17. RCW 35.02.078 and 1994 c 216 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

An election shall be held in the area proposed to be incorporated to determine whether the proposed city or town shall be incorporated when the boundary review board takes action on the proposal other than disapproving the proposal, or if the county legislative authority does not disapprove the proposal as provided in RCW 35.02.070. Voters at this election shall determine if the area is to be incorporated.

The initial election on the question of incorporation shall be held at the next special election date specified in RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330 that occurs sixty or more days after the final public hearing by the county legislative authority or authorities, or action by the boundary review board or boards. The county legislative authority or authorities shall call for this election and, if the incorporation is approved, shall call for other elections to elect the elected officials as provided in this section. If the vote in favor of the incorporation receives forty percent or less of the total vote on the question of incorporation, no new election on the question of incorporation for the area or any portion of the area proposed to be incorporated may be held for a period of three years from the date of the election in which the incorporation failed.

If the incorporation is authorized as provided by RCW 35.02.120, separate elections shall be held to nominate and elect persons to fill the various elective offices prescribed by law for the population and type of city or town, and to which it will belong. The primary election to nominate candidates for these elective positions shall be held at the next special election date, as specified in RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330, that occurs sixty or more days after the election on the question of incorporation. The election to fill these elective positions shall be held at the next special election date, as specified in RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330, that occurs thirty or more days after certification of the results of the primary election.

Sec. 18. RCW 35.02.100 and 1986 c 234 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The notice of election on the question of the incorporation shall be given as provided by RCW ((29.27.080 but))29A.52.355 and shall ((further)) describe the boundaries of the proposed city or town, its name, and the number of inhabitants ascertained by the county legislative authority or the boundary review board to reside in it.

Sec. 19. RCW 35.02.139 and 1994 c 223 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

An election shall be held to elect city or town elected officials at the next municipal general election occurring more than twelve months after the date of the first election of councilmembers or commissioners. Candidates shall run for specific council or commission positions. The staggering of terms of members of the city or town council shall be established at this election, where the simple majority of the persons elected as councilmembers receiving the greatest numbers of votes shall be elected to four-year terms of office and the remainder of the persons elected as councilmembers shall be elected to two-year terms of office. Newly elected councilmembers or newly elected commissioners shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified. The terms of office of newly elected commissioners shall not be staggered, as provided in chapter 35.17 RCW. All councilmembers and commissioners who are elected subsequently shall be elected to four-year terms of office and shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280.

Sec. 20. RCW 35.06.080 and 1994 c 81 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The first election of officers of the new corporation after the advancement of classification is approved shall be at the next general municipal election and the officers of the old corporation, as altered by the election when the advancement was approved, shall remain in office until the officers of the new corporation are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280. A primary shall be held where necessary to nominate candidates for the elected offices of the corporation as a second-class city. Candidates for city council positions shall run for specific council positions. The council of the old corporation may adopt a resolution providing that the offices of city attorney, clerk, and treasurer are appointive.

The three persons who are elected to council positions one through six receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to four-year terms of office and the other three persons who are elected to council positions one through six, and the person elected to council position seven, shall be elected to two-year terms of office. The person elected as mayor and the persons elected to any other elected office shall be elected to four-year terms of office. All successors to all elected positions, other than council position number seven, shall be elected to four-year terms of office and successors to council position number seven shall be elected to two-year terms of office.

There shall be no election of town offices at this election when the first officers of the new corporation are elected and the offices of the town shall expire when the officers of the new corporation assume office.

The ordinances, bylaws, and resolutions adopted by the old corporation shall, as far as consistent with the provisions of this title, continue in force until repealed by the council of the new corporation.

The council and officers of the town shall, upon demand, deliver to the proper officers of the new corporation all books of record, documents, and papers in their possession belonging to the old corporation.

Sec. 21. RCW 35.07.050 and 1965 c 7 s 35.07.050 are each amended to read as follows:

Notice of such election shall be given ((as provided in RCW 29.27.080)).

Sec. 22. RCW 35.10.410 and 1985 c 281 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The submission of a ballot proposal to the voters of two or more contiguous cities for the consolidation of these contiguous cities may be caused by the adoption of a joint resolution, by a majority vote of each city legislative body, seeking consolidation of such contiguous cities. The joint resolution shall provide for submission of the question to the voters at the next general municipal election, if one is to be held more than ninety days but not more than one hundred eighty days after the passage of the joint resolution, or shall call for a special election to be held for that purpose at the next special election date, as specified in RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330, that occurs ninety or more days after the passage of the joint resolution. The legislative bodies of the cities also shall notify the county legislative authority of each county in which the cities are located of the proposed consolidation.

Sec. 23. RCW 35.10.420 and 1995 c 196 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The submission of a ballot proposal to the voters of two or more contiguous cities for the consolidation of these contiguous cities may also be caused by the filing of a petition with the legislative body of each such city, signed by the voters of each city in number equal to not less than ten percent of voters who voted in the city at the last general municipal election therein, seeking consolidation of such contiguous cities. A copy of the petition shall be forwarded immediately by each city to the auditor of the county or counties within which that city is located.

The county auditor or auditors shall determine the sufficiency of the signatures in each petition within ten days of receipt of the copies and immediately notify the cities proposed to be consolidated of the sufficiency. If each of the petitions is found to have sufficient valid signatures, the auditor or auditors shall call a special election at which the question of whether such cities shall consolidate shall be submitted to the voters of each of such cities. If a general election is to be held more than ninety days but not more than one hundred eighty days after the filing of the last petition, the question shall be submitted at that election. Otherwise the question shall be submitted at a special election to be called for that purpose at the next special election date, as specified in RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330, that occurs ninety or more days after the date when the last petition was filed.

If each of the petitions is found to have sufficient valid signatures, the auditor or auditors also shall notify the county legislative authority of each county in which the cities are located of the proposed consolidation.

Petitions shall conform with the requirements for form prescribed in RCW 35A.01.040, except different colored paper may be used on petitions circulated in the different cities. A legal description of the cities need not be included in the petitions.

Sec. 24. RCW 35.13.060 and 1989 c 351 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon granting the petition under the twenty percent annexation petition under the election method, and after the auditor has certified the petition as being sufficient, the legislative body of the city or town shall indicate to the county auditor its preference for the date of the election on the annexation to be held, which shall be one of the dates for special elections provided under RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330 that is sixty or more days after the date the preference is indicated. The county auditor shall call the special election at the special election date indicated by the city or town.

Sec. 25. RCW 35.13.080 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 164 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Notice of an annexation election shall particularly describe the boundaries of the area proposed to be annexed, describe the boundaries of the proposed service area if the simultaneous creation of a community municipal corporation is provided for, state the objects of the election as prayed in the petition or as stated in the resolution and require the voters to cast ballots which shall contain the words "For annexation" and "Against annexation" or words equivalent thereto, or contain the words "For annexation and adoption of comprehensive plan" and "Against annexation and adoption of comprehensive plan" or words equivalent thereto in case the simultaneous adoption of a comprehensive plan is proposed, and, if appropriate, the words "For creation of community municipal corporation" and "Against creation of community municipal corporation" or words equivalent thereto, or contain the words "For annexation and creation of community municipal corporation" and "Against annexation and creation of community municipal corporation" or words equivalent thereto in case the simultaneous creation of a community municipal corporation is proposed, and which in case the assumption of indebtedness is proposed, shall contain as a separate proposition, the words "For assumption of indebtedness" and "Against assumption of indebtedness" or words equivalent thereto and if only a portion of the indebtedness of the annexing city or town is to be assumed, an appropriate separate proposition for and against the assumption of such portion of the indebtedness shall be submitted to the voters. If the creation of a community municipal corporation and election of community councilmembers is provided for, the notice shall also require the voters within the service area to cast ballots for candidates for positions on such council. The notice shall be posted for at least two weeks prior to the date of election in four public places within the area proposed to be annexed and published in accordance with the notice required by RCW ((29.27.080))29A.52.355 prior to the date of election in a newspaper of general circulation in the area proposed to be annexed.

Sec. 26. RCW 35.13.090 and 1996 c 286 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The proposition for or against annexation or for or against annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan, or for or against creation of a community municipal corporation, or any combination thereof, as the case may be, shall be deemed approved if a majority of the votes cast on that proposition are cast in favor of annexation or in favor of annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan, or for creation of the community municipal corporation, or any combination thereof, as the case may be.

(2) If a proposition for or against assumption of all or any portion of indebtedness was submitted to the registered voters, it shall be deemed approved if a majority of at least three-fifths of the registered voters of the territory proposed to be annexed voting on such proposition vote in favor thereof, and the number of registered voters voting on such proposition constitutes not less than forty percent of the total number of votes cast in such territory at the last preceding general election.

(3) If either or both propositions were approved by the registered voters, the county auditor shall on completion of the canvassing of the returns transmit to the county legislative authority and to the clerk of the city or town to which annexation is proposed a certificate of the election results, together with a certified abstract of the vote showing the whole number who voted at the election, the number of votes cast for annexation and the number cast against annexation or for annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan and the number cast against annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan or for creation of a community municipal corporation and the number cast against creation of a community municipal corporation, or any combination thereof, as the case may be.

(4) If a proposition for assumption of all or of any portion of indebtedness was submitted to the registered voters, the abstract shall include the number of votes cast for assumption of indebtedness and the number of votes cast against assumption of indebtedness, together with a statement of the total number of votes cast in such territory at the last preceding general election.

(5) If the proposition for creation of a community municipal corporation was submitted and approved, the abstract shall include the number of votes cast for the candidates for community council positions and certificates of election shall be issued pursuant to RCW ((29.27.100))29A.52.360 to the successful candidates who shall assume office as soon as qualified.

Sec. 27. RCW 35.16.030 and 1994 c 273 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The election returns shall be canvassed as provided in RCW ((29.13.040))29A.60.010. If three-fifths of the votes cast on the proposition favor the reduction of the corporate limits, the legislative body of the city or town, by an order entered on its minutes, shall direct the clerk to make and transmit to the office of the secretary of state a certified abstract of the vote. The abstract shall show the total number of voters voting, the number of votes cast for reduction and the number of votes cast against reduction.

Sec. 28. RCW 35.16.050 and 1996 c 286 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A certified copy of the ordinance defining the reduced city or town limits together with a map showing the corporate limits as altered shall be filed in accordance with RCW ((29.15.026))29A.76.020 and recorded in the office of the county auditor of the county in which the city or town is situated, upon the effective date of the ordinance. The new boundaries of the city or town shall take effect immediately after they are filed and recorded with the county auditor.

Sec. 29. RCW 35.17.260 and 1996 c 286 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Ordinances may be initiated by petition of registered voters of the city filed with the commission. If the petition accompanying the proposed ordinance is signed by the registered voters in the city equal in number to twenty-five percent of the votes cast for all candidates for mayor at the last preceding city election, and if it contains a request that, unless passed by the commission, the ordinance be submitted to a vote of the registered voters of the city, the commission shall either:

(1) Pass the proposed ordinance without alteration within twenty days after the county auditor's certificate of sufficiency has been received by the commission; or

(2) Immediately after the county auditor's certificate of sufficiency for the petition is received, cause to be called a special election to be held on the next election date, as provided in RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330, that occurs not less than forty-five days thereafter, for submission of the proposed ordinance without alteration, to a vote of the people unless a general election will occur within ninety days, in which event submission must be made on the general election ballot.

Sec. 30. RCW 35.17.310 and 1965 c 7 s 35.17.310 are each amended to read as follows:

The city clerk shall cause any ordinance or proposition required to be submitted to the voters at an election to be published once in each of the daily newspapers in the city not less than five nor more than twenty days before the election, or if no daily newspaper is published in the city, publication shall be made in each of the weekly newspapers published therein. This publication shall be in addition to the notice required in ((chapter 29.27)) RCW 29A.52.355.

Sec. 31. RCW 35.17.400 and 1994 c 223 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The first election of commissioners shall be held at the next special election that occurs at least sixty days after the election results are certified where the proposition to organize under the commission form was approved by city voters, and the commission first elected shall commence to serve as soon as they have been elected and have qualified and shall continue to serve until their successors have been elected and qualified and have assumed office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280. The date of the second election for commissioners shall be in accordance with RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330 such that the term of the first commissioners will be as near as possible to, but not in excess of, four years calculated from the first day in January in the year after the year in which the first commissioners were elected.

Sec. 32. RCW 35.18.020 and 1994 c 223 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The number of councilmembers in a city or town operating with a council-manager plan of government shall be based upon the latest population of the city or town that is determined by the office of financial management as follows:

(a) A city or town having not more than two thousand inhabitants, five councilmembers; and

(b) A city or town having more than two thousand, seven councilmembers.

(2) Except for the initial staggering of terms, councilmembers shall serve for four-year terms of office. All councilmembers shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280. Councilmembers may be elected on a citywide or townwide basis, or from wards or districts, or any combination of these alternatives. Candidates shall run for specific positions. Wards or districts shall be redrawn as provided in chapter ((29.70))29A.76 RCW. Wards or districts shall be used as follows: (a) Only a resident of the ward or district may be a candidate for, or hold office as, a councilmember of the ward or district; and (b) only voters of the ward or district may vote at a primary to nominate candidates for a councilmember of the ward or district. Voters of the entire city or town may vote at the general election to elect a councilmember of a ward or district, unless the city or town had prior to January 1, 1994, limited the voting in the general election for any or all council positions to only voters residing within the ward or district associated with the council positions. If a city or town had so limited the voting in the general election to only voters residing within the ward or district, then the city or town shall be authorized to continue to do so.

(3) When a city or town has qualified for an increase in the number of councilmembers from five to seven by virtue of the next succeeding population determination made by the office of financial management, two additional council positions shall be filled at the next municipal general election with the person elected to one of the new council positions receiving the greatest number of votes being elected for a four-year term of office and the person elected to the other additional council position being elected for a two-year term of office. The two additional councilmembers shall assume office immediately when qualified in accordance with RCW ((29.01.135))29A.04.133, but the term of office shall be computed from the first day of January after the year in which they are elected. Their successors shall be elected to four-year terms of office.

Prior to the election of the two new councilmembers, the city or town council shall fill the additional positions by appointment not later than forty-five days following the release of the population determination, and each appointee shall hold office only until the new position is filled by election.

(4) When a city or town has qualified for a decrease in the number of councilmembers from seven to five by virtue of the next succeeding population determination made by the office of financial management, two council positions shall be eliminated at the next municipal general election if four council positions normally would be filled at that election, or one council position shall be eliminated at each of the next two succeeding municipal general elections if three council positions normally would be filled at the first municipal general election after the population determination. The council shall by ordinance indicate which, if any, of the remaining positions shall be elected at-large or from wards or districts.

(5) Vacancies on a council shall occur and shall be filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.

Sec. 33. RCW 35.20.100 and 1997 c 25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be three departments of the municipal court, which shall be designated as Department Nos. 1, 2 and 3. However, when the administration of justice and the accomplishment of the work of the court make additional departments necessary, the legislative body of the city may create additional departments as they are needed. The departments shall be established in such places as may be provided by the legislative body of the city, and each department shall be presided over by a municipal judge. However, notwithstanding the priority of action rule, for a defendant incarcerated at a jail facility outside the city limits but within the county in which the city is located, the city may, pursuant to an interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW, contract with the county to transfer jurisdiction and venue over the defendant to a district court and to provide all judicial services at the district court as would be provided by a department of the municipal court. The judges shall select, by majority vote, one of their number to act as presiding judge of the municipal court for a term of one year, and he or she shall be responsible for administration of the court and assignment of calendars to all departments. A change of venue from one department of the municipal court to another department shall be allowed in accordance with the provisions of RCW 3.66.090 in all civil and criminal proceedings. The city shall assume the costs of the elections of the municipal judges in accordance with the provisions of RCW ((29.13.045))29A.04.410.

Sec. 34. RCW 35.21.203 and 1989 c 250 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The necessary expenses of defending an elective city or town official in a judicial hearing to determine the sufficiency of a recall charge as provided in RCW ((29.82.023))29A.56.140 shall be paid by the city or town if the official requests such defense and approval is granted by the city or town council. The expenses paid by the city or town may include costs associated with an appeal of the decision rendered by the superior court concerning the sufficiency of the recall charge.

Sec. 35. RCW 35.22.055 and 1974 ex.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever the population of a city is three hundred thousand persons or more, not less than ten days before the time for filing declarations of candidacy for election of freeholders under Article XI, section 10 (Amendment 40), of the state Constitution, the city clerk shall designate the positions to be filled by consecutive number, commencing with one. The positions to be designated shall be dealt with as separate offices for all election purposes, and each candidate shall file for one, but only one, of the positions so designated.

In the printing of ballots, the positions of the names of candidates for each numbered position shall be ((changed as many times as there are candidates for the numbered positions, following insofar as applicable the procedure provided for in RCW 29.30.040 for the rotation of names on primary ballots, the intention being that ballots at the polls will reflect as closely as practicable the rotation procedure as provided for therein))in accordance with RCW 29A.36.121.

Sec. 36. RCW 35.22.200 and 2001 c 73 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative powers of a charter city shall be vested in a mayor and a city council, to consist of such number of members and to have such powers as may be provided for in its charter. The charter may provide for direct legislation by the people through the initiative and referendum upon any matter within the scope of the powers, functions, or duties of the city. The mayor and council and such other elective officers as may be provided for in such charter shall be elected at such times and in such manner as provided in Title 29A RCW, and for such terms and shall perform such duties as may be prescribed in the charter, and shall receive compensation in accordance with the process or standards of a charter provision or ordinance which conforms with RCW 35.21.015.

Sec. 37. RCW 35.22.235 and 2003 c 111 s 2301 are each amended to read as follows:

All regular elections in first-class cities having a mayor-council form of government whose charters provide for twelve councilmembers elected for a term of two years, two being elected from each of six wards, and for the election of a mayor, treasurer, and comptroller for terms of two years, shall be held biennially as provided in RCW 29A.04.330. The term of each councilmember, mayor, treasurer, and comptroller shall be four years and until his or her successor is elected and qualified and assumes office in accordance with RCW ((29A.20.040))29A.60.280. The terms of the councilmembers shall be so staggered that six councilmembers shall be elected to office at each regular election.

Sec. 38. RCW 35.22.245 and 2003 c 111 s 2302 are each amended to read as follows:

All regular elections in first-class cities having a mayor-council form of government whose charters provide for seven councilmembers, one to be elected from each of six wards and one at large, for a term of two years, and for the election of a mayor, comptroller, treasurer and attorney for two year terms, shall be held biennially as provided in RCW 29A.04.330. The terms of the six councilmembers to be elected by wards shall be four years and until their successors are elected and qualified and the term of the councilmember to be elected at large shall be two years and until their successors are elected and qualified. The terms of the councilmembers shall be so staggered that three ward councilmembers and the councilmember at large shall be elected at each regular election. The term of the mayor, attorney, treasurer, and comptroller shall be four years and until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29A.20.040))29A.60.280.

Sec. 39. RCW 35.23.051 and 1997 c 361 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

General municipal elections in second-class cities shall be held biennially in the odd-numbered years and shall be subject to general election law.

The terms of office of the mayor, city attorney, clerk, and treasurer shall be four years and until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280: PROVIDED, That if the offices of city attorney, clerk, and treasurer are made appointive, the city attorney, clerk, and treasurer shall not be appointed for a definite term: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the term of the elected treasurer shall not commence in the same biennium in which the term of the mayor commences, nor in which the terms of the city attorney and clerk commence if they are elected.

Council positions shall be numbered in each second-class city so that council position seven has a two-year term of office and council positions one through six shall each have four-year terms of office. Each councilmember shall remain in office until a successor is elected and qualified and assumes office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280.

In its discretion the council of a second-class city may divide the city by ordinance, into a convenient number of wards, not exceeding six, fix the boundaries of the wards, and change the ward boundaries from time to time and as provided in RCW ((29.70.100))29A.76.010. No change in the boundaries of any ward shall be made within one hundred twenty days next before the date of a general municipal election, nor within twenty months after the wards have been established or altered. However, if a boundary change results in one ward being represented by more councilmembers than the number to which it is entitled, those having the shortest unexpired terms shall be assigned by the council to wards where there is a vacancy, and the councilmembers so assigned shall be deemed to be residents of the wards to which they are assigned for purposes of determining whether those positions are vacant.

Whenever such city is so divided into wards, the city council shall designate by ordinance the number of councilmembers to be elected from each ward, apportioning the same in proportion to the population of the wards. Thereafter the councilmembers so designated shall be elected by the voters resident in such ward, or by general vote of the whole city as may be designated in such ordinance. Council position seven shall not be associated with a ward and the person elected to that position may reside anywhere in the city and voters throughout the city may vote at a primary to nominate candidates for position seven, when a primary is necessary, and at a general election to elect the person to council position seven. Additional territory that is added to the city shall, by act of the council, be annexed to contiguous wards without affecting the right to redistrict at the expiration of twenty months after last previous division. The removal of a councilmember from the ward for which he or she was elected shall create a vacancy in such office.

Wards shall be redrawn as provided in chapter ((29.70))29A.76 RCW. Wards shall be used as follows: (1) Only a resident of the ward may be a candidate for, or hold office as, a councilmember of the ward; and (2) only voters of the ward may vote at a primary to nominate candidates for a councilmember of the ward. Voters of the entire city may vote at the general election to elect a councilmember of a ward, unless the city had prior to January 1, 1994, limited the voting in the general election for any or all council positions to only voters residing within the ward associated with the council positions. If a city had so limited the voting in the general election to only voters residing within the ward, then the city shall be authorized to continue to do so. The elections for the remaining council position or council positions that are not associated with a ward shall be conducted as if the wards did not exist.

Sec. 40. RCW 35.23.805 and 1994 c 81 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

In a city initially classified as a second-class city prior to January 1, 1993, that retained its second-class city plan of government when the city reorganized as a noncharter code city, the terms of office of mayor, city clerk, city treasurer and councilmembers shall be four years, and until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280, but not more than six councilmembers normally shall be elected in any one year to fill a full term.

Sec. 41. RCW 35.23.850 and 1995 c 134 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

In any city initially classified as a second-class city prior to January 1, 1993, that retained its second-class city plan of government when the city reorganized as a noncharter code city, the city council may divide the city into wards, not exceeding six in all, or change the boundaries of existing wards at any time less than one hundred twenty days before a municipal general election. No change in the boundaries of wards shall affect the term of any councilmember, and councilmembers shall serve out their terms in the wards of their residences at the time of their elections. However, if these boundary changes result in one ward being represented by more councilmembers than the number to which it is entitled, those having the shortest unexpired terms shall be assigned by the council to wards where there is a vacancy, and the councilmembers so assigned shall be deemed to be residents of the wards to which they are assigned for purposes of determining whether those positions are vacant.

The representation of each ward in the city council shall be in proportion to the population as nearly as is practicable.

Wards shall be redrawn as provided in chapter ((29.70))29A.76 RCW. Wards shall be used as follows: (1) Only a resident of the ward may be a candidate for, or hold office as, a councilmember of the ward; and (2) only voters of the ward may vote at a primary to nominate candidates for a councilmember of the ward. Voters of the entire city may vote at the general election to elect a councilmember of a ward, unless the city had prior to January 1, 1994, limited the voting in the general election for any or all council positions to only voters residing within the ward associated with the council positions. If a city had so limited the voting in the general election to only voters residing within the ward, then the city shall be authorized to continue to do so. The elections for the remaining council position or council positions that are not associated with a ward shall be conducted as if the wards did not exist.

Sec. 42. RCW 35.30.080 and 2003 c 42 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a majority of the legislative body of an unclassified city determines that it would serve the best interests and general welfare of such municipality to change the election procedures of such city to the procedures specified in this section, such legislative body may, by resolution, declare its intention to adopt such procedures for the city. Such resolution must be adopted at least one hundred eighty days before the general municipal election at which the new election procedures are implemented. Within ten days after the passage of the resolution, the legislative body shall cause it to be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation within the city.

(2) All general municipal elections in an unclassified city adopting a resolution under subsection (1) of this section shall be held biennially in the odd-numbered years as provided in RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330 and shall be held in accordance with the general election laws of the state.

The term of the treasurer shall not commence in the same biennium in which the term of the mayor commences. Candidates for the city council shall run for specific council positions. The staggering of terms of city officers shall be established at the first election, where the simple majority of the persons elected as councilmembers receiving the greatest numbers of votes shall be elected to four-year terms of office and the remainder of the persons elected as councilmembers and the treasurer shall be elected to two-year terms of office. Thereafter, all elected city officers shall be elected for four-year terms and until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280.

Sec. 43. RCW 35.61.030 and 2002 c 88 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section for review by a boundary review board, the ballot proposition authorizing creation of a metropolitan park district that is submitted to voters for their approval or rejection shall appear on the ballot of the next general election or at the next special election date specified under RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330 occurring sixty or more days after the last resolution proposing the creation of the park district is adopted or the date the county auditor certifies that the petition proposing the creation of the park district contains sufficient valid signatures. Where the petition or copy thereof is filed with two or more county auditors in the case of a proposed district in two or more counties, the county auditors shall confer and issue a joint certification upon finding that the required number of signatures on the petition has been obtained.

(2) Where the proposed district is located wholly or in part in a county in which a boundary review board has been created, notice of the proposal to create a metropolitan park district shall be filed with the boundary review board as provided under RCW 36.93.090 and the special election at which a ballot proposition authorizing creation of the park district shall be held on the special election date specified under RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330 that is sixty or more days after the date the boundary review board is deemed to have approved the proposal, approves the proposal, or modifies and approves the proposal. The creation of a metropolitan park district is not subject to review by a boundary review board if the proposed district only includes one or more cities and in such cases the special election at which a ballot proposition authorizing creation of the park district shall be held as if a boundary review board does not exist in the county or counties.

(3) The petition proposing the creation of a metropolitan park district, or the resolution submitting the question to the voters, shall choose and describe the composition of the initial board of commissioners of the district that is proposed under RCW 35.61.050 and shall choose a name for the district. The proposition shall include the following terms:

□ "For the formation of a metropolitan park district to be governed by [insert board composition described in ballot proposition]."

□ "Against the formation of a metropolitan park district."

Sec. 44. RCW 35.61.050 and 2002 c 88 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The resolution or petition submitting the ballot proposition shall designate the composition of the board of metropolitan park commissioners from among the alternatives provided under subsections (2) through (4) of this section. The ballot proposition shall clearly describe the designated composition of the board.

(2) The commissioners of the district may be selected by election, in which case at the same election at which the proposition is submitted to the voters as to whether a metropolitan park district is to be formed, five park commissioners shall be elected. The election of park commissioners shall be null and void if the metropolitan park district is not created. Candidates shall run for specific commission positions. No primary shall be held to nominate candidates. The person receiving the greatest number of votes for each position shall be elected as a commissioner. The staggering of the terms of office shall occur as follows: (a) The two persons who are elected receiving the two greatest numbers of votes shall be elected to six-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or five-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; (b) the two persons who are elected receiving the next two greatest numbers of votes shall be elected to four-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or three-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; and (c) the other person who is elected shall be elected to a two-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The initial commissioners shall take office immediately when they are elected and qualified, and for purposes of computing their terms of office the terms shall be assumed to commence on the first day of January in the year after they are elected. Thereafter, all commissioners shall be elected to six-year terms of office. All commissioners shall serve until their respective successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280. Vacancies shall occur and shall be filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.

(3) In a district wholly located within a city or within the unincorporated area of a county, the governing body of such city or legislative authority of such county may be designated to serve in an ex officio capacity as the board of metropolitan park commissioners, provided that when creation of the district is proposed by citizen petition, the city or county approves by resolution such designation.

(4) Where the proposed district is located within more than one city, more than one county, or any combination of cities and counties, each city governing body and county legislative authority may be designated to collectively serve ex officio as the board of metropolitan park commissioners through selection of one or more members from each to serve as the board, provided that when creation of the district is proposed by citizen petition, each city governing body and county legislative authority approve by resolution such designation. Within six months of the date of certification of election results approving creation of the district, the size and membership of the board shall be determined through interlocal agreement of each city and county. The interlocal agreement shall specify the method for filling vacancies on the board.

(5) Metropolitan park districts created by a vote of the people prior to June 13, 2002, may not change the composition and method of selection of their governing authority without approval of the voters. Should such a change be desired, the board of park commissioners shall submit a ballot proposition to the voters of the metropolitan park district.

Sec. 45. RCW 35.61.270 and 1985 c 469 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

If the park commissioners concur in the petition, they shall cause the proposal to be submitted to the electors of the territory proposed to be annexed, at an election to be held in the territory, which shall be called, canvassed and conducted in accordance with the general election laws. The board of park commissioners by resolution shall fix a time for the holding of the election to determine the question of annexation, and in addition to the notice required by RCW ((29.27.080))29A.52.355 shall give notice thereof by causing notice to be published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the park district, and by posting notices in five public places within the territory proposed to be annexed in the district.

The ballot to be used at the election shall be in the following form:

□ "For annexation to metropolitan park district."

□ "Against annexation to metropolitan park district."

Sec. 46. RCW 35.95A.100 and 2002 c 248 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every authority has the power to impose annual regular property tax levies in an amount equal to one dollar and fifty cents or less per thousand dollars of assessed value of property in the authority area when specifically authorized to do so by a majority of the voters voting on a proposition submitted at a special election or at the regular election of the authority. A proposition authorizing the tax levies will not be submitted by an authority more than twice in any twelve-month period. Ballot propositions must conform with RCW ((29.30.111))29A.36.210. The number of years during which the regular levy will be imposed may be limited as specified in the ballot proposition or may be unlimited in duration. In the event an authority is levying property taxes, which in combination with property taxes levied by other taxing districts subject to the limitations provided in RCW 84.52.043 and 84.52.050, exceed these limitations, the authority's property tax levy shall be reduced or eliminated consistent with RCW 84.52.010.

(2) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the first levy imposed under this section following the approval of the levies by the voters under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 47. RCW 35A.02.025 and 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the filing of a referendum petition in the manner provided in RCW 35A.29.170 signed by qualified electors in number equal to not less than ten percent of the votes cast in the last general municipal election, such resolution as authorized by RCW 35A.02.020 shall be referred to the voters for confirmation or rejection in the next general municipal election if one is to be held within one hundred and eighty days from the date of filing of the referendum petition, or at a special election to be called for that purpose in accordance with RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330.

Sec. 48. RCW 35A.02.050 and 1994 c 223 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The first election of officers where required for reorganization under a different general plan of government newly adopted in a manner provided in RCW 35A.02.020, 35A.02.030, 35A.06.030, or 35A.06.060, as now or hereafter amended, shall be at the next general municipal election if one is to be held more than ninety days but not more than one hundred and eighty days after certification of a reorganization ordinance or resolution, or otherwise at a special election to be held for that purpose in accordance with RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330. In the event that the first election of officers is to be held at a general municipal election, such election shall be preceded by a primary election pursuant to RCW ((29.21.010 and 29.13.070))29A.52.210 and 29A.04.311. In the event that the first election of all officers is to be held at a special election rather than at a general election, and notwithstanding any provisions of any other law to the contrary, such special election shall be preceded by a primary election to be held on a date authorized by RCW ((29.13.010))29A.04.321, and the persons nominated at that primary election shall be voted upon at the next succeeding special election that is authorized by RCW ((29.13.010))29A.04.321: PROVIDED, That in the event the ordinances calling for reclassification or reclassification and reorganization under the provisions of Title 35A RCW have been filed with the secretary of state pursuant to RCW 35A.02.040 in an even-numbered year at least ninety days prior to a state general election then the election of new officers shall be concurrent with the state primary and general election and shall be conducted as set forth in general election law.

Upon reorganization, candidates for all offices shall file or be nominated for and successful candidates shall be elected to specific council positions. The initial terms of office for those elected at a first election of all officers shall be as follows: (1) A simple majority of the persons who are elected as councilmembers receiving the greatest numbers of votes and the mayor in a city with a mayor-council plan of government shall be elected to four-year terms of office, if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or three-year terms of office, if the election is held in an even-numbered year; and (2) the other persons who are elected as councilmembers shall be elected to two-year terms of office, if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or one-year terms of office, if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The newly elected officials shall take office immediately when they are elected and qualified, but the length of their terms of office shall be calculated from the first day of January in the year following the election. Thereafter, each person elected as a councilmember or mayor in a city with a mayor-council plan of government shall be elected to a four-year term of office. Each councilmember and mayor in a city with a mayor-council plan of government shall serve until a successor is elected and qualified and assumes office as provided in RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280.

The former officers shall, upon the election and qualification of new officers, deliver to the proper officers of the reorganized noncharter code city all books of record, documents and papers in their possession belonging to such municipal corporation before the reorganization thereof.

Sec. 49. RCW 35A.02.060 and 1990 c 259 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

When a petition which is sufficient under the rules set forth in RCW 35A.01.040 is filed with the legislative body of an incorporated city or town, signed by qualified electors of such municipality in number equal to not less than ten percent of the votes cast at the last general municipal election, seeking adoption by the city or town of the classification of noncharter code city and the reorganization of the city or town under one of the plans of government authorized in this title, the county auditor shall file with the legislative body thereof a certificate of sufficiency of such petition. Thereupon, the legislative body shall cause such proposal to be submitted to the voters at the next general municipal election if one is to be held within one hundred eighty days after certification of the sufficiency of the petition, or at a special election to be held for that purpose not less than ninety days nor more than one hundred and eighty days from such certification of sufficiency. Ballot titles for elections under this chapter shall be prepared by the city attorney ((as provided in RCW 35A.29.120)).

Sec. 50. RCW 35A.07.050 and 1990 c 259 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

When a petition which is sufficient under the rules set forth in RCW 35A.01.040 is filed with the legislative body of a charter city, signed by registered voters of such city in number equal to not less than ten percent of the votes cast at the last general municipal election, seeking adoption by the city of the classification of charter code city, the county auditor shall file with the legislative body thereof a certificate of sufficiency of such petition. Thereupon the legislative body shall cause such proposal to be submitted to the voters at the next general municipal election if one is to be held within one hundred eighty days, or at a special election to be held for that purpose not less than ninety days nor more than one hundred and eighty days after the filing of such petition. Ballot titles for such election shall be prepared by the city attorney ((as provided in RCW 35A.29.120)).

Sec. 51. RCW 35A.08.100 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.08.100 are each amended to read as follows:

Ballot titles for elections under this chapter shall be prepared by the city attorney ((as provided in RCW 35A.29.120)). The ballot statement in the election for adopting or rejecting the proposed charter shall clearly state that, upon adoption of the proposed charter, the city would be governed by its charter and by this title.

Sec. 52. RCW 35A.12.040 and 1994 c 223 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

Officers shall be elected at biennial municipal elections to be conducted as provided in chapter 35A.29 RCW. The mayor and the councilmembers shall be elected for four-year terms of office and until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280. At any first election upon reorganization, councilmembers shall be elected as provided in RCW 35A.02.050. Thereafter the requisite number of councilmembers shall be elected biennially as the terms of their predecessors expire and shall serve for terms of four years. The positions to be filled on the city council shall be designated by consecutive numbers and shall be dealt with as separate offices for all election purposes. Election to positions on the council shall be by majority vote from the city at large, unless provision is made by charter or ordinance for election by wards. The mayor and councilmembers shall qualify by taking an oath or affirmation of office and as may be provided by law, charter, or ordinance.

Sec. 53. RCW 35A.12.180 and 1994 c 223 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

At any time not within three months previous to a municipal general election the council of a noncharter code city organized under this chapter may divide the city into wards or change the boundaries of existing wards. No change in the boundaries of wards shall affect the term of any councilmember, and councilmembers shall serve out their terms in the wards of their residences at the time of their elections: PROVIDED, That if this results in one ward being represented by more councilmembers than the number to which it is entitled those having the shortest unexpired terms shall be assigned by the council to wards where there is a vacancy, and the councilmembers so assigned shall be deemed to be residents of the wards to which they are assigned for purposes of those positions being vacant. The representation of each ward in the city council shall be in proportion to the population as nearly as is practicable.

Wards shall be redrawn as provided in chapter ((29.70))29A.76 RCW. Wards shall be used as follows: (1) Only a resident of the ward may be a candidate for, or hold office as, a councilmember of the ward; and (2) only voters of the ward may vote at a primary to nominate candidates for a councilmember of the ward. Voters of the entire city may vote at the general election to elect a councilmember of a ward, unless the city had prior to January 1, 1994, limited the voting in the general election for any or all council positions to only voters residing within the ward associated with the council positions. If a city had so limited the voting in the general election to only voters residing within the ward, then the city shall be authorized to continue to do so.

Sec. 54. RCW 35A.14.050 and 1989 c 351 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

After consideration of the proposed annexation as provided in RCW 35A.14.200, the county annexation review board, within thirty days after the final day of hearing, shall take one of the following actions:

(1) Approval of the proposal as submitted.

(2) Subject to RCW 35.02.170, modification of the proposal by adjusting boundaries to include or exclude territory; except that any such inclusion of territory shall not increase the total area of territory proposed for annexation by an amount exceeding the original proposal by more than five percent: PROVIDED, That the county annexation review board shall not adjust boundaries to include territory not included in the original proposal without first affording to residents and property owners of the area affected by such adjustment of boundaries an opportunity to be heard as to the proposal.

(3) Disapproval of the proposal.

The written decision of the county annexation review board shall be filed with the board of county commissioners and with the legislative body of the city concerned. If the annexation proposal is modified by the county annexation review board, such modification shall be fully set forth in the written decision. If the decision of the boundary review board or the county annexation review board is favorable to the annexation proposal, or the proposal as modified by the review board, the legislative body of the city at its next regular meeting if to be held within thirty days after receipt of the decision of the boundary review board or the county annexation review board, or at a special meeting to be held within that period, shall indicate to the county auditor its preference for a special election date for submission of such annexation proposal, with any modifications made by the review board, to the voters of the territory proposed to be annexed. The special election date that is so indicated shall be one of the dates for special elections provided under RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330 that is sixty or more days after the date the preference is indicated. The county legislative authority shall call the special election at the special election date so indicated by the city. If the boundary review board or the county annexation review board disapproves the annexation proposal, no further action shall be taken thereon, and no proposal for annexation of the same territory, or substantially the same as determined by the board, shall be initiated or considered for twelve months thereafter.

Sec. 55. RCW 35A.29.120 and 1993 c 256 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

When any question is to be submitted to the voters of a code city, or when a proposition is to be submitted to the voters of an area under provisions of this title, the question or proposition shall be advertised as provided for nominees for office, and in such cases there shall also be printed on the ballot a ballot title for the question or proposition in the form applicable under RCW ((29.79.055, 29.27.060,)) 82.14.036, 82.46.021, or 82.80.090 or as otherwise expressly required by state law. The ballot title shall be prepared by the attorney for the code city((, or as specified in RCW 29.27.060 for elections held outside of a code city)).

Sec. 56. RCW 35A.29.130 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.29.130 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the filing of a ballot title as defined in RCW 35A.29.120, the county auditor shall forthwith notify the persons proposing the measure of the exact language of the ballot title. If the persons filing any local question covered by RCW 35A.29.120 are dissatisfied with the ballot title formulated by the attorney for the code city or by the county prosecuting attorney, they may appeal to the superior court of the county where the question is to appear on the ballot, as provided in RCW ((29.27.067))29A.36.090.

Sec. 57. RCW 35A.29.180 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.29.180 are each amended to read as follows:

Elective officers of code cities may be recalled in the manner provided in chapter ((29.82))29A.56 RCW.

Sec. 58. RCW 35A.42.050 and 1983 c 3 s 67 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to provisions of general law relating to public officials and others in public administration, employment or public works, the duties and conduct of such officers and other persons shall be governed by: (1) Chapter 9A.68 RCW relating to bribery of a public officer; (2) Article II, section 30 of the Constitution of the state of Washington relating to bribery or corrupt solicitation; (3) RCW 35.17.150 relating to misconduct in code cities having a commission form of government; (4) chapter 42.23 RCW in regard to interest in contracts; (5) chapter ((29.85))29A.84 RCW relating to misconduct in connection with elections; (6) RCW 49.44.060 ((and 49.44.070)) relating to grafting by employees; (7) RCW 49.44.020 and 49.44.030 relating to the giving or solicitation of a bribe to a labor representative; (8) chapter 42.20 RCW relating to misconduct of a public officer; (9) RCW 49.52.050 and 49.52.090 relating to rebating by employees; and (10) chapter 9.18 RCW relating to bribery and grafting.

Sec. 59. RCW 35A.56.010 and 1996 c 230 s 1605 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in this title, state laws relating to special service or taxing districts shall apply to, grant powers, and impose duties upon code cities and their officers to the same extent as such laws apply to and affect other classes of cities and towns and their employees, including, without limitation, the following: (1) Chapter 70.94 RCW, relating to air pollution control; (2) chapter 68.52 RCW, relating to cemetery districts; (3) chapter ((29.68))29A.28 RCW, relating to congressional districts; (4) chapters 14.07 and 14.08 RCW, relating to municipal airport districts; (5) chapter 36.88 RCW, relating to county road improvement districts; (6) Title 85 RCW, relating to diking districts, drainage districts, and drainage improvement districts; (7) chapter 36.54 RCW, relating to ferry districts; (8) Title 52 RCW, relating to fire protection districts; (9) Title 86 RCW, relating to flood control districts and flood control; (10) chapter 70.46 RCW, relating to health districts; (11) chapters 87.03 through 87.84 and 89.12 RCW, relating to irrigation districts; (12) chapter 35.61 RCW, relating to metropolitan park districts; (13) chapter 35.58 RCW, relating to metropolitan municipalities; (14) chapter 17.28 RCW, relating to mosquito control districts; (15) chapter 17.12 RCW, relating to agricultural pest districts; (16) Title 53 RCW, relating to port districts; (17) chapter 70.44 RCW, relating to public hospital districts; (18) Title 54 RCW, relating to public utility districts; (19) chapter 91.08 RCW, relating to public waterway districts; (20) chapter 89.12 RCW, relating to reclamation districts; (21) chapters 57.02 through 57.36 RCW, relating to water-sewer districts; and (22) chapter 17.04 RCW, relating to weed districts.

Sec. 60. RCW 36.16.020 and 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The term of office of all county and precinct officers shall be four years and until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280: PROVIDED, That this section and RCW 36.16.010 shall not apply to county commissioners.

Sec. 61. RCW 36.16.030 and 1996 c 108 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided elsewhere in this section, in every county there shall be elected from among the qualified voters of the county a county assessor, a county auditor, a county clerk, a county coroner, three county commissioners, a county prosecuting attorney, a county sheriff and a county treasurer, except that in each county with a population of less than forty thousand no coroner shall be elected and the prosecuting attorney shall be ex officio coroner. Whenever the population of a county increases to forty thousand or more, the prosecuting attorney shall continue as ex officio coroner until a coroner is elected, at the next general election at which the office of prosecuting attorney normally would be elected, and assumes office as provided in RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280. In any county where the population has once attained forty thousand people and a current coroner is in office and a subsequent census indicates less than forty thousand people, the county legislative authority may maintain the office of coroner by resolution or ordinance. If the county legislative authority has not passed a resolution or enacted an ordinance to maintain the office of coroner, the elected coroner shall remain in office for the remainder of the term for which he or she was elected, but no coroner shall be elected at the next election at which that office would otherwise be filled and the prosecuting attorney shall be the ex officio coroner. In a county with a population of two hundred fifty thousand or more, the county legislative authority may replace the office of coroner with a medical examiner system and appoint a medical examiner as specified in RCW 36.24.190. A noncharter county may have five county commissioners as provided in RCW 36.32.010 and 36.32.055 through 36.32.0558.

Sec. 62. RCW 36.22.220 and 1992 c 163 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The county auditor of each county, as ex officio supervisor of all primaries and elections, general or special, within the county under Title 29A RCW, may appoint one or more well-qualified persons to act as assistants or deputies; however, not less than two persons of the auditor's office who conduct primaries and elections in the county shall be certified under chapter ((29.60))29A.04 RCW as elections administrators.

Sec. 63. RCW 36.32.030 and 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

The terms of office of county commissioners shall be four years and until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280: PROVIDED, That the terms shall be staggered so that either one or two commissioners are elected at a general election held in an even-numbered year.

Sec. 64. RCW 36.32.0558 and 2003 c 238 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Vacancies on a board of county commissioners consisting of five members shall be filled as provided in RCW 36.32.070, except that:

(1) Whenever there are three or more vacancies, the governor shall appoint one or more commissioners until there are a total of three commissioners;

(2) Whenever there are two vacancies, the three commissioners shall fill one of the vacancies;

(3) Whenever there is one vacancy, the four commissioners shall fill the single vacancy; and

(4) Whenever there is a vacancy after the general election in a year that the position appears on the ballot and before the start of the next term, the term of the successor who is of the same party as the incumbent may commence once he or she has qualified as defined in RCW ((29.01.135))29A.04.133 and shall continue through the term for which he or she was elected.

Sec. 65. RCW 36.32.070 and 2003 c 238 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever there is a vacancy in the board of county commissioners, except as provided in RCW 36.32.0558, it shall be filled as follows:

(1) If there are three vacancies, the governor of the state shall appoint two of the officers. The two commissioners thus appointed shall then meet and select the third commissioner. If the two appointed commissioners fail to agree upon selection of the third after the expiration of five days from the day they were appointed, the governor shall appoint the remaining commissioner.

(2) Whenever there are two vacancies in the office of county commissioner, the governor shall appoint one commissioner, and the two commissioners then in office shall appoint the third commissioner. If they fail to agree upon a selection after the expiration of five days from the day of the governor's appointment, the governor shall appoint the third commissioner.

(3) Whenever there is one vacancy in the office of county commissioner, the two remaining commissioners shall fill the vacancy. If the two commissioners fail to agree upon a selection after the expiration of five days from the day the vacancy occurred, the governor shall appoint the third commissioner.

(4) Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of county commissioner after the general election in a year that the position appears on the ballot and before the start of the next term, the term of the successor who is of the same party as the incumbent may commence once he or she has qualified as defined in RCW ((29.01.135))29A.04.133 and shall continue through the term for which he or she was elected.

Sec. 66. RCW 36.69.070 and 1994 c 223 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

A ballot proposition authorizing the formation of the proposed park and recreation district shall be submitted to the voters of the proposed district for their approval or rejection at the next general state election occurring sixty or more days after the county legislative authority fixes the boundaries of the proposed district. Notices of the election for the formation of the park and recreation district shall state generally and briefly the purpose thereof and shall give the boundaries of the proposed district and name the day of the election and the hours during which the polls will be open. The proposition to be submitted to the voters shall be stated in such manner that the voters may indicate yes or no upon the proposition of forming the proposed park and recreation district.

The initial park and recreation commissioners shall be elected at the same election, but this election shall be null and void if the district is not authorized to be formed. No primary shall be held to nominate candidates for the initial commissioner positions. Candidates shall run for specific commission positions. A special filing period shall be opened as provided in RCW ((29.15.170 and 29.15.180))29A.24.171 and 29A.24.181. The person who receives the greatest number of votes for each commission position shall be elected to that position. The three persons who are elected receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to four-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or three-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The other two persons who are elected shall be elected to two-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or one-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The initial commissioners shall take office immediately upon being elected and qualified, but the length of such terms shall be computed from the first day of January in the year following this election.

Sec. 67. RCW 36.69.090 and 1996 c 324 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A park and recreation district shall be governed by a board of five commissioners. Except for the initial commissioners, all commissioners shall be elected to staggered four-year terms of office and shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280. Candidates shall run for specific commissioner positions.

Elections for park and recreation district commissioners shall be held biennially in conjunction with the general election in each odd-numbered year. Elections shall be held in accordance with the provisions of Title 29A RCW dealing with general elections, except that there shall be no primary to nominate candidates. All persons filing and qualifying shall appear on the general election ballot and the person receiving the largest number of votes for each position shall be elected.

Sec. 68. RCW 36.105.050 and 1991 c 363 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

The initial members of the community council shall be elected at the same election as the ballot proposition is submitted authorizing the creation of the community council. However, the election of the initial community councilmembers shall be null and void if the ballot proposition authorizing the creation of the community council is not approved.

No primary election shall be held to nominate candidates for initial council positions. The initial community council shall consist of the candidate for each council position who receives the greatest number of votes for that council position. Staggering of terms of office shall be accomplished by having the majority of the winning candidates who receive the greatest number of votes being elected to four-year terms of office, and the remaining winning candidates being elected to two-year terms of office, if the election was held in an even-numbered year, or the majority of the winning candidates who receive the greatest number of votes being elected to three-year terms of office, and the remaining winning candidates being elected to one-year terms of office, if the election was held in an odd-numbered year, with the term computed from the first day of January in the year following the election. Initial councilmembers shall take office immediately when qualified in accordance with RCW ((29.01.135))29A.04.133.

However, where the county operates under a charter providing for the election of members of the county legislative authority in odd-numbered years, the terms of office of the initial councilmembers shall be four years and two years, if the election of the initial councilmembers was held on an odd-numbered year, or three years and one year, if the election of the initial councilmembers was held on an even-numbered year.

Sec. 69. RCW 39.36.050 and 1984 c 186 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The governing body of a taxing district desiring to place a ballot proposition authorizing indebtedness before the voters may submit the proposition at any special election held on the dates authorized in ((chapter 29.13)) RCW 29A.04.330. The ballot proposition shall include the maximum amount of the indebtedness to be authorized, the maximum term any bonds may have, a description of the purpose or purposes of the bond issue, and whether excess property tax levies authorized under RCW 84.52.056 will be authorized.

When it is required that such bonds be retired by excess property tax levies, or when the governing body desires such bonds be retired by excess property tax levies, the ballot proposition shall also include authorization for such excess bond retirement property tax levies provided under RCW 84.52.056.

Notice of the proposed election shall be published as required by RCW ((29.27.080))29A.52.355.

Sec. 70. RCW 43.07.140 and 1991 c 72 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state is hereby specifically authorized to print, reprint, and distribute the following materials:

(1) Lists of active corporations;

(2) The provisions of Title 23 RCW;

(3) The provisions of Title 23B RCW;

(4) The provisions of Title 24 RCW;

(5) The provisions of chapter 25.10 RCW;

(6) The provisions of Title 29A RCW;

(7) The provisions of chapter 18.100 RCW;

(8) The provisions of chapter 19.77 RCW;

(9) The provisions of chapter 43.07 RCW;

(10) The provisions of the Washington state Constitution;

(11) The provisions of chapters 40.14, 40.16, and 40.20 RCW, and any statutes, rules, schedules, indexes, guides, descriptions, or other materials related to the public records of state or local government or to the state archives; and

(12) Rules and informational publications related to the statutory provisions set forth above.

Sec. 71. RCW 43.135.060 and 1998 c 321 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After July 1, 1995, the legislature shall not impose responsibility for new programs or increased levels of service under existing programs on any political subdivision of the state unless the subdivision is fully reimbursed by the state for the costs of the new programs or increases in service levels. Reimbursement by the state may be made by: (a) A specific appropriation; or (b) increases in state distributions of revenue to political subdivisions occurring after January 1, 1998.

(2) If by order of any court, or legislative enactment, the costs of a federal or local government program are transferred to or from the state, the otherwise applicable state expenditure limit shall be increased or decreased, as the case may be, by the dollar amount of the costs of the program.

(3) The legislature, in consultation with the office of financial management or its successor agency, shall determine the costs of any new programs or increased levels of service under existing programs imposed on any political subdivision or transferred to or from the state.

(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the costs incurred for voting devices or machines under RCW ((29.04.200))29A.12.150.

Sec. 72. RCW 46.20.205 and 1999 c 6 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever any person after applying for or receiving a driver's license or identicard moves from the address named in the application or in the license or identicard issued to him or her, the person shall within ten days thereafter notify the department of the address change. The notification must be in writing on a form provided by the department and must include the number of the person's driver's license. The written notification, or other means as designated by rule of the department, is the exclusive means by which the address of record maintained by the department concerning the licensee or identicard holder may be changed.

(a) The form must contain a place for the person to indicate that the address change is not for voting purposes. The department of licensing shall notify the secretary of state by the means described in RCW ((29.07.270(3)))29A.08.350 of all change of address information received by means of this form except information on persons indicating that the change is not for voting purposes.

(b) Any notice regarding the cancellation, suspension, revocation, disqualification, probation, or nonrenewal of the driver's license, commercial driver's license, driving privilege, or identicard mailed to the address of record of the licensee or identicard holder is effective notwithstanding the licensee's or identicard holder's failure to receive the notice.

(2) When a licensee or holder of an identicard changes his or her name of record, the person shall notify the department of the name change. The person must make the notification within ten days of the date that the name change is effective. The notification must be in writing on a form provided by the department and must include the number of the person's driver's license. The department of licensing shall not change the name of record of a person under this section unless the person has again satisfied the department regarding his or her identity in the manner provided by RCW 46.20.035.

Sec. 73. RCW 52.04.011 and 1999 c 105 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A territory adjacent to a fire protection district and not within the boundaries of a city, town, or other fire protection district may be annexed to the fire protection district by petition of fifteen percent of the qualified registered electors residing within the territory proposed to be annexed. Such territory may be located in a county or counties other than the county or counties within which the fire protection district is located. The petition shall be filed with the fire commissioners of the fire protection district and if the fire commissioners concur in the petition they shall file the petition with the county auditor of the county within which the territory is located. If this territory is located in more than one county, the original petition shall be filed with the auditor of the county within which the largest portion of the territory is located, who shall be designated as the lead auditor, and a copy shall be filed with the auditor of each other county within which such territory is located. Within thirty days after the date of the filing of the petition the auditor shall examine the signatures on the petition and certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures. If this territory is located in more than one county, the auditor of each other county who receives a copy of the petition shall examine the signatures and certify to the lead auditor the number of valid signatures and the number of registered voters residing in that portion of the territory that is located within the county. The lead auditor shall certify the sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures.

After the county auditor has certified the sufficiency of the petition, the county legislative authority or authorities, or the boundary review board or boards, of the county or counties in which such territory is located shall consider the proposal under the same basis that a proposed incorporation of a fire protection district is considered, with the same authority to act on the proposal as in a proposed incorporation, as provided under chapter 52.02 RCW. If the proposed annexation is approved by the county legislative authority or boundary review board, the board of fire commissioners shall adopt a resolution requesting the county auditor to call a special election, as specified under RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330, at which the ballot proposition is to be submitted. No annexation shall occur when the territory proposed to be annexed is located in more than one county unless the county legislative authority or boundary review board of each county approves the proposed annexation.

(2) The county legislative authority or authorities of the county or counties within which such territory is located have the authority and duty to determine on an equitable basis, the amount of any obligation which the territory to be annexed to the district shall assume to place the property owners of the existing district on a fair and equitable relationship with the property owners of the territory to be annexed as a result of the benefits of annexing to a district previously supported by the property owners of the existing district. If a boundary review board has had its jurisdiction invoked on the proposal and approves the proposal, the county legislative authority of the county within which such territory is located may exercise the authority granted in this subsection and require such an assumption of indebtedness. This obligation may be paid to the district in yearly benefit charge installments to be fixed by the county legislative authority. This benefit charge shall be collected with the annual tax levies against the property in the annexed territory until fully paid. The amount of the obligation and the plan of payment established by the county legislative authority shall be described in general terms in the notice of election for annexation and shall be described in the ballot proposition on the proposed annexation that is presented to the voters for their approval or rejection. Such benefit charge shall be limited to an amount not to exceed a total of fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the special election on the proposed annexation shall be held only within the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed to the fire protection district.

(3) On the entry of the order of the county legislative authority incorporating the territory into the existing fire protection district, the territory shall become subject to the indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, of the existing district. If the petition is signed by sixty percent of the qualified registered electors residing within the territory proposed to be annexed, and if the board of fire commissioners concur, an election in the territory and a hearing on the petition shall be dispensed with and the county legislative authority shall enter its order incorporating the territory into the existing fire protection district.

Sec. 74. RCW 52.06.030 and 1989 c 63 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The board of the merger district may, by resolution, reject or approve the petition as presented, or it may modify the terms and conditions of the proposed merger, and shall transmit the petition, together with a copy of its resolution to the merging district.

If the petition is approved as presented or as modified, the board of the merging district shall send an elector-signed petition, if there is one, to the auditor or auditors of the county or counties in which the merging district is located, who shall within thirty days examine the signatures and certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures. If the merging district is located in more than one county, the auditor of the county within which the largest portion of the merging district is located shall be the lead auditor. Each other auditor shall certify to the lead auditor the number of valid signatures and the number of registered voters of the merging district who reside in the county. The lead auditor shall certify as to the sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures. No signatures may be withdrawn from the petition after the filing. A certificate of sufficiency shall be provided to the board of the merging district, which shall adopt a resolution requesting the county auditor or auditors to call a special election, as provided in RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330, for the purpose of presenting the question of merging the districts to the voters of the merging district.

If there is no elector-signed petition, the merging district board shall adopt a resolution requesting the county auditor or auditors to call a special election in the merging district, as specified under RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330, for the purpose of presenting the question of the merger to the electors.

Sec. 75. RCW 52.14.060 and 1994 c 223 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

The initial three members of the board of fire commissioners shall be elected at the same election as when the ballot proposition is submitted to the voters authorizing the creation of the fire protection district. If the district is not authorized to be created, the election of the initial fire commissioners shall be null and void. If the district is authorized to be created, the initial fire commissioners shall take office immediately when qualified. Candidates shall file for each of the three separate fire commissioner positions. Elections shall be held as provided in chapter ((29.21))29A.52 RCW, with the county auditor opening up a special filing period as provided in RCW ((29.15.170 and 29.15.180))29A.24.171 and 29A.24.181, as if there were a vacancy. The person who receives the greatest number of votes for each position shall be elected to that position. The terms of office of the initial fire commissioners shall be staggered as follows: (1) The person who is elected receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to a six-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a five-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; (2) the person who is elected receiving the next greatest number of votes shall be elected to a four-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a three-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; and (3) the other person who is elected shall be elected to a two-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The initial commissioners shall take office immediately when elected and qualified and their terms of office shall be calculated from the first day of January in the year following their election.

The term of office of each subsequent commissioner shall be six years. Each commissioner shall serve until a successor is elected and qualified and assumes office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280.

Sec. 76. RCW 52.14.070 and 1989 c 63 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

Before beginning the duties of office, each fire commissioner shall take and subscribe the official oath for the faithful discharge of the duties of office as required by RCW ((29.01.135))29A.04.133, which oath shall be filed in the office of the auditor of the county in which all, or the largest portion of, the district is located.

Sec. 77. RCW 53.04.020 and 1992 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

At any general election or at any special election which may be called for that purpose, the county legislative authority of any county in this state may, or on petition of ten percent of the registered voters of such county based on the total vote cast in the last general county election, shall, by resolution submit to the voters of such county the proposition of creating a port district coextensive with the limits of such county. Such petition shall be filed with the county auditor, who shall within fifteen days examine the signatures thereof and certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency thereof, and for such purpose the county auditor shall have access to all registration books in the possession of the officers of any incorporated city or town in such proposed port district. If such petition be found to be insufficient, it shall be returned to the persons filing the same, who may amend or add names thereto for ten days, when the same shall be returned to the county auditor, who shall have an additional fifteen days to examine the same and attach his or her certificate thereto. No person having signed such petition shall be allowed to withdraw his or her name therefrom after the filing of the same with the county auditor. Whenever such petition shall be certified to as sufficient, the county auditor shall forthwith transmit the same, together with his or her certificate of sufficiency attached thereto, to the legislative authority of the county, who shall submit such proposition at the next general election or, if such petition so requests, the county legislative authority shall, at their first meeting after the date of such certificate, by resolution, call a special election to be held in accordance with RCW ((29.13.010 and 29.13.020))29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330. The notice of election shall state the boundaries of the proposed port district and the object of such election. In submitting the question to the voters for their approval or rejection, the proposition shall be expressed on the ballot substantially in the following terms:

"Port of . . . . . ., Yes." (giving the name of the principal seaport city within such proposed port district, or if there be more than one city of the same class within such district, such name as may be determined by the legislative authority of the county).

"Port of . . . . . ., No." (giving the name of the principal seaport city within such port district, or if there be more than one city of the same class within such district, such name as may be determined by the legislative authority of the county).

Sec. 78. RCW 53.04.080 and 1990 c 259 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

At any general election or at any special election which may be called for that purpose the county legislative authority of any county in this state in which there exists a port district which is not coextensive with the limits of the county, shall on petition of the commissioners of such port district, by resolution, submit to the voters residing within the limits of any territory which the existing port district desires to annex or include in its enlarged port district, the proposition of enlarging the limits of such existing port districts so as to include therein the whole of the territory embraced within the boundaries of such county, or such territory as may be described in the petition by legal subdivisions. Such petition shall be filed with the county auditor, who shall forthwith transmit the same to the county legislative authority, who shall submit such proposition at the next general election, or, if such petition so request, the county legislative authority, shall at their first meeting after the date of filing such petition, by resolution, call a special election to be held in accordance with RCW ((29.13.010 and 29.13.020))29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330. The notice of election shall state the boundaries of the proposed enlarged port district and the object of the special election. In submitting the question to the voters of the territory proposed to be annexed or included for their approval or rejection, the proposition shall be expressed on the ballots substantially in the following terms:

"Enlargement of the port of . . . . . ., yes." (Giving ((then [the]))the name of the port district which it is proposed to enlarge);

"Enlargement of the port of . . . . . ., no." (Giving the name of the port district which it is proposed to enlarge).

Such election, whether general or special, shall be held in each precinct wholly or partially embraced within the limits of the territory proposed to be annexed or included and shall be conducted and the votes cast thereat counted, canvassed, and the returns thereof made in the manner provided by law for holding general or special county elections.

Sec. 79. RCW 53.12.130 and 1994 c 223 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

Two additional port commissioners shall be elected at the next district general election following the election at which voters authorized the increase in port commissioners to five members.

The port commissioners shall divide the port district into five commissioner districts prior to the first day of June in the year in which the two additional commissioners shall be elected, unless the voters approved the nomination of the two additional commissioners from district-wide commissioner districts as permitted in RCW 53.12.010(2). The new commissioner districts shall be numbered one through five and the three incumbent commissioners shall represent commissioner districts one through three. If, as a result of redrawing the district boundaries two or three of the incumbent commissioners reside in one of the new commissioner districts, the commissioners who reside in the same commissioner district shall determine by lot which of the first three numbered commissioner districts they shall represent for the remainder of their respective terms. A primary shall be held to nominate candidates from districts four and five where necessary and commissioners shall be elected from commissioner districts four and five at the general election. The persons elected as commissioners from commissioner districts four and five shall take office immediately after qualification as defined under RCW ((29.01.135))29A.04.133.

In a port district where commissioners are elected to four-year terms of office, the additional commissioner thus elected receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected to a four-year term of office and the other additional commissioner thus elected shall be elected to a term of office of two years, if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or the additional commissioner thus elected receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected to a term of office of three years and the other shall be elected to a term of office of one year, if the election is held in an even-numbered year. In a port district where the commissioners are elected to six-year terms of office, the additional commissioner thus elected receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected to a six-year term of office and the other additional commissioner shall be elected to a four-year term of office, if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or the additional commissioner receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected to a term of office of five-years and the other shall be elected to a three-year term of office, if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The length of terms of office shall be computed from the first day of January in the year following this election.

Successor commissioners from districts four and five shall be elected to terms of either six or four years, depending on the length of terms of office to which commissioners of that port district are elected.

Sec. 80. RCW 53.12.172 and 1994 c 223 s 85 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In every port district the term of office of each port commissioner shall be four years in each port district that is countywide with a population of one hundred thousand or more, or either six or four years in all other port districts as provided in RCW 53.12.175, and until a successor is elected and qualified and assumes office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280.

(2) The initial port commissioners shall be elected at the same election as when the ballot proposition is submitted to voters authorizing the creation of the port district. If the port district is created the persons elected at this election shall serve as the initial port commission. No primary shall be held. The person receiving the greatest number of votes for commissioner from each commissioner district shall be elected as the commissioner of that district.

(3) The terms of office of the initial port commissioners shall be staggered as follows in a port district that is countywide with a population of one hundred thousand or more: (a) The two persons who are elected receiving the two greatest numbers of votes shall be elected to four-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or three-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year, and shall hold office until successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280; and (b) the other person who is elected shall be elected to a two-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or a one-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year, and shall hold office until a successor is elected and qualified and assumes office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280.

(4) The terms of office of the initial port commissioners in all other port districts shall be staggered as follows: (a) The person who is elected receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to a six-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or to a five-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year, and shall hold office until a successor is elected and qualified and assumes office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280; (b) the person who is elected receiving the next greatest number of votes shall be elected to a four-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or to a three-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year, and shall hold office until a successor is elected and qualified and assumes office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280; and (c) the other person who is elected shall be elected to a two-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year, and shall hold office until a successor is elected and qualified and assumes office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280.

(5) The initial port commissioners shall take office immediately after being elected and qualified, but the length of their terms shall be calculated from the first day in January in the year following their elections.

Sec. 81. RCW 53.12.221 and 1992 c 146 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Port commissioners of countywide port districts with populations of one hundred thousand or more who are holding office as of June 11, 1992, shall retain their positions for the remainder of their terms until their successors are elected and qualified, and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280. Their successors shall be elected to four-year terms of office except as otherwise provided in RCW 53.12.130.

Sec. 82. RCW 53.16.015 and 1994 c 223 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

The port commission of a port district that uses commissioner districts may redraw the commissioner district boundaries as provided in chapter ((29.70))29A.76 RCW at any time and submit the redrawn boundaries to the county auditor if the port district is not coterminous with a county that has the same number of county legislative authority districts as the port has port commissioners. The new commissioner districts shall be used at the next election at which a port commissioner is regularly elected that occurs at least one hundred eighty days after the redrawn boundaries have been submitted. Each commissioner district shall encompass as nearly as possible the same population.

Sec. 83. RCW 53.36.070 and 1983 c 3 s 162 are each amended to read as follows:

Any port district organized under the laws of this state shall, in addition to the powers otherwise provided by law, have the power to raise revenue by the levy and collection of an annual tax on all taxable property within such port district of not to exceed forty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the assessed valuation of the taxable property in such port district, for dredging, canal construction, or land leveling or filling purposes, the proceeds of any such levy to be used exclusively for such dredging, canal construction, or land leveling and filling purposes: PROVIDED, That no such levy for dredging, canal construction, or land leveling or filling purposes under the provisions of RCW 53.36.070 and 53.36.080 shall be made unless and until the question of authorizing the making of such additional levy shall have been submitted to a vote of the electors of the district in the manner provided by law for the submission of the question of making additional levies in school districts of the first class at an election held under the provisions of RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330 and shall have been authorized by a majority of the electors voting thereon.

Sec. 84. RCW 53.36.100 and 1994 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A port district having adopted a comprehensive scheme of harbor improvements and industrial developments may thereafter raise revenue, for six years only, and a second six years if the procedures are followed under subsection (2) of this section, in addition to all other revenues now authorized by law, by an annual levy not to exceed forty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the assessed valuation of the taxable property in such port district. In addition, if voters approve a ballot proposition authorizing additional levies by a simple majority vote, a port district located in a county bordering on the Pacific Ocean having adopted a comprehensive scheme of harbor improvements and industrial developments may impose these levies for a third six-year period. Said levies shall be used exclusively for the exercise of the powers granted to port districts under chapter 53.25 RCW except as provided in RCW 53.36.110. The levy of such taxes is herein authorized notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 84.52.050 and 84.52.043. The revenues derived from levies made under RCW 53.36.100 and 53.36.110 not expended in the year in which the levies are made may be paid into a fund for future use in carrying out the powers granted under chapter 53.25 RCW, which fund may be accumulated and carried over from year to year, with the right to continue to levy the taxes provided for in RCW 53.36.100 and 53.36.110 for the purposes herein authorized.

(2) If a port district intends to levy a tax under this section for one or more years after the first six years these levies were imposed, the port commission shall publish notice of this intention, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the district, by June 1 of the year in which the first levy of the seventh through twelfth year period is to be made. If within ninety days of the date of publication a petition is filed with the county auditor containing the signatures of eight percent of the number of voters registered and voting in the port district for the office of the governor at the last preceding gubernatorial election, the county auditor shall canvass the signatures in the same manner as prescribed in RCW ((29.79.200))29A.72.230 and certify their sufficiency to the port commission within two weeks. The proposition to make these levies in the seventh through twelfth year period shall be submitted to the voters of the port district at a special election, called for this purpose, no later than the date on which a primary election would be held under RCW ((29.13.070))29A.04.311. The levies may be made in the seventh through twelfth year period only if approved by a majority of the voters of the port district voting on the proposition.

Sec. 85. RCW 54.08.060 and 1994 c 223 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever a proposition for the formation of a public utility district is to be submitted to voters in any county, the county legislative authority may by resolution call a special election, and at the request of petitioners for the formation of such district contained in the petition shall do so and shall provide for holding the same at the earliest practicable time. If the boundaries of the proposed district embrace an area less than the entire county, such election shall be confined to the area so included. The notice of such election shall state the boundaries of the proposed district and the object of such election; in other respects, such election shall be held and called in the same manner as provided by law for the holding and calling of general elections: PROVIDED, That notice thereof shall be given for not less than ten days nor more than thirty days prior to such special election. In submitting the proposition to the voters for their approval or rejection, such proposition shall be expressed on the ballots in substantially the following terms:

Public Utility District No. . . . .YES

Public Utility District No. . . . . NO

At the same special election on the proposition to form a public utility district, there shall also be an election for three public utility district commissioners. However, the election of such commissioners shall be null and void if the proposition to form the public utility district does not receive approval by a majority of the voters voting on the proposition. No primary shall be held. A special filing period shall be opened as provided in RCW ((29.15.170 and 29.15.180))29A.24.171 and 29A.24.181. The person receiving the greatest number of votes for the commissioner of each commissioner district shall be elected as the commissioner of that district. Commissioner districts shall be established as provided in RCW 54.12.010. The terms of the initial commissioners shall be staggered as follows: (1) The person who is elected receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to a six-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year or a five-year term if the election is held in an odd-numbered year; (2) the person who is elected receiving the next greatest number of votes shall be elected to a four-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year or a three-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year; and (3) the other person who is elected shall be elected to a two-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year or a one-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year. The commissioners first to be elected at such special election shall assume office immediately when they are elected and qualified, but the length of their terms of office shall be calculated from the first day in January in the year following their elections.

The term "general election" as used herein means biennial general elections at which state and county officers in a noncharter county are elected.

Sec. 86. RCW 54.40.070 and 1994 c 223 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty days after the public utility district commission divides the district into District A and District B, the county legislative authority shall call a special election, to be held at the next special election date provided for under RCW ((29.13.010))29A.04.321 that occurs sixty or more days after the call, at which time the initial commissioners for District A and District B shall be elected. No primary shall be held and a special filing period shall be opened as provided in RCW ((29.15.170 and 29.15.180))29A.24.171 and 29A.24.181. The person receiving the greatest number of votes for each position shall be elected.

The person who is elected receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to a four-year term of office, and the other person who is elected shall be elected to a two-year term of office, if the election is held in an even-numbered year, or the person who is elected receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to a three-year term of office, and the other person who is elected shall be elected to a one-year term of office, if the election is held in an odd-numbered year. The length of these terms of office shall be calculated from the first day in January in the year following their elections.

The newly elected commissioners shall assume office immediately after being elected and qualified and shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280. Each successor shall be elected to a four-year term of office.

Sec. 87. RCW 57.04.140 and 1997 c 447 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As an alternative means to forming a water-sewer district, a county legislative authority may authorize the formation of a water-sewer district to serve a new development that at the time of formation does not have any residents, at written request of sixty percent of the owners of the area to be included in the proposed district. The county legislative authority shall review the proposed district according to the procedures and criteria in RCW 57.02.040.

(2) The county legislative authority shall appoint the initial water-sewer commissioners of the district. The commissioners shall serve until seventy-five percent of the development is sold and occupied, or until some other time as specified by the county legislative authority when the district is approved. Commissioners serving under this section are not entitled to any form of compensation from the district.

(3) New commissioners shall be elected according to the procedures in chapter 57.12 RCW at the next election held under RCW ((29.13.010))29A.04.321 that follows more than ninety days after the date seventy-five percent of the development is sold and occupied, or after the time specified by the county legislative authority when the district is approved.

(4) A water-sewer district created under this section may be transferred to a city or county, or dissolved if the district is inactive, by order of the county legislative authority at the written request of sixty percent of the owners of the area included in the district.

Sec. 88. RCW 57.12.030 and 1996 c 230 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as in this section otherwise provided, the term of office of each district commissioner shall be six years, such term to be computed from the first day of January following the election, and commissioners shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280.

Three initial district commissioners shall be elected at the same election at which the proposition is submitted to the voters as to whether such district shall be formed. The election of initial district commissioners shall be null and void if the ballot proposition to form the district is not approved. Each candidate shall run for one of three separate commissioner positions. A special filing period shall be opened as provided in RCW ((29.15.170 and 29.15.180))29A.24.171 and 29A.24.181. The person receiving the greatest number of votes for each position shall be elected to that position.

The initial district commissioners shall assume office immediately when they are elected and qualified. Staggering of the terms of office for the initial district commissioners shall be accomplished as follows: (1) The person who is elected receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to a six-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a five-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; (2) the person who is elected receiving the next greatest number of votes shall be elected to a four-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a three-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; and (3) the other person who is elected shall be elected to a two-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The terms of office shall be calculated from the first day of January after the election.

Thereafter, commissioners shall be elected to six-year terms of office. Commissioners shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280.

Sec. 89. RCW 57.12.039 and 2001 c 63 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding RCW 57.12.020 and 57.12.030, the board of commissioners may provide by majority vote that subsequent commissioners be elected from commissioner districts within the district. If the board exercises this option, it shall divide the district into three, five, or seven if the number of commissioners has been increased under RCW 57.12.015, commissioner districts of approximately equal population following current precinct and district boundaries.

(2) Commissioner districts shall be used as follows: (a) Only a registered voter who resides in a commissioner district may be a candidate for, or serve as, a commissioner of the commissioner district; and (b) only voters of a commissioner district may vote at a primary to nominate candidates for a commissioner of the commissioner district. Voters of the entire district may vote at a general election to elect a person as a commissioner of the commissioner district. Commissioner districts shall be redrawn as provided in chapter ((29.70))29A.76 RCW.

(3) In districts in which commissioners are nominated from commissioner districts, at the inception of a five-member or a seven-member board of commissioners, the new commissioner districts shall be numbered one through five or one through seven and the incumbent commissioners shall represent up to five commissioner districts depending on the amount of commissioners. If, as a result of redrawing the district boundaries two or three of the incumbent commissioners reside in one of the new commissioner districts, the commissioners who reside in the same commissioner district shall determine by lot which of the first three or five numbered commissioner districts they shall represent for the remainder of their respective terms. A primary shall be held to nominate candidates from the remaining districts where necessary and commissioners shall be elected at large at the general election. The persons elected as commissioners from the remaining commissioner districts shall take office immediately after qualification as defined under RCW ((29.01.135))29A.04.133.

Sec. 90. RCW 57.24.190 and 1996 c 230 s 910 are each amended to read as follows:

The annexation resolution under RCW 57.24.180 shall be subject to referendum for forty-five days after the passage thereof. Upon the filing of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the board of commissioners, signed by registered voters in number equal to not less than ten percent of the registered voters in the area to be annexed who voted in the last municipal general election, the question of annexation shall be submitted to the voters of such area in a general election if one is to be held within ninety days or at a special election called for that purpose by the board of commissioners in accordance with RCW ((29.13.010 and 29.13.020))29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330. Notice of that election shall be given under RCW 57.24.020 and the election shall be conducted under RCW 57.24.040. The annexation shall be deemed approved by the voters unless a majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in opposition thereto.

After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the date of passage of the annexation resolution, if no timely and sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed shall become a part of the district upon the date fixed in the resolution of annexation upon transmitting the resolution to the county legislative authority.

Sec. 91. RCW 67.38.130 and 1984 c 131 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The governing body of a cultural arts, stadium and convention district may levy or cause to levy the following ad valorem taxes:

(1) Regular ad valorem property tax levies in an amount equal to twenty-five cents or less per thousand dollars of the assessed value of property in the district in each year for six consecutive years when specifically authorized so to do by a majority of at least three-fifths of the electors thereof approving a proposition authorizing the levies submitted at a general or special election, at which election the number of persons voting "yes" on the proposition shall constitute three-fifths of a number equal to forty percentum of the total votes cast in such taxing district at the last preceding general election; or by a majority of at least three-fifths of the electors thereof voting on the proposition when the number of electors voting yes on the proposition exceeds forty percentum of the total votes cast in such taxing district in the last preceding general election. Ballot propositions shall conform with RCW ((29.30.111))29A.36.210.

In the event a cultural arts, stadium and convention district is levying property taxes, which in combination with property taxes levied by other taxing districts subject to the one percent limitation provided for in Article VII, section 2, of our state Constitution result in taxes in excess of the limitation provided for in RCW 84.52.043, the cultural arts, stadium and convention district property tax levy shall be reduced or eliminated before the property tax levies of other taxing districts are reduced: PROVIDED, That no cultural arts, stadium, and convention district may pledge anticipated revenues derived from the property tax herein authorized as security for payments of bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That such limitation shall not apply to property taxes approved pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 shall apply to levies after the first levy authorized under this section following the approval of such levy by voters pursuant to this section.

(2) An annual excess ad valorem property tax for general district purposes when authorized by the district voters in the manner prescribed by section 2, Article VII of the Constitution and by RCW 84.52.052.

(3) Multi-year excess ad valorem property tax levies used to retire general obligation bond issues when authorized by the district voters in the manner prescribed by section 2, Article VII of the Constitution and by RCW 84.52.056.

The district shall include in its regular property tax levy for each year a sum sufficient to pay the interest and principal on all outstanding general obligation bonds issued without voter approval pursuant to RCW 67.38.110 and may include a sum sufficient to create a sinking fund for the redemption of all outstanding bonds.

Sec. 92. RCW 68.52.250 and 1990 c 259 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

Special elections submitting propositions to the registered voters of the district may be called at any time by resolution of the cemetery commissioners in accordance with RCW ((29.13.010 and 29.13.020))29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330, and shall be called, noticed, held, conducted and canvassed in the same manner and by the same officials as provided for the election to determine whether the district shall be created.

Sec. 93. RCW 70.44.047 and 1997 c 99 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

If, as the result of redrawing the boundaries of commissioner districts as permitted or required under the provisions of this chapter, chapter ((29.70))29A.76 RCW, or any other statute, more than the correct number of commissioners who are associated with commissioner districts reside in the same commissioner district, a commissioner or commissioners residing in that redrawn commissioner district equal in number to the number of commissioners in excess of the correct number shall be assigned to the drawn commissioner district or districts in which less than the correct number of commissioners associated with commissioner districts reside. The commissioner or commissioners who are so assigned shall be those with the shortest unexpired term or terms of office, but if the number of such commissioners with the same terms of office exceeds the number that are to be assigned, the board of commissioners shall select by lot from those commissioners which one or ones are assigned. A commissioner who is so assigned shall be deemed to be a resident of the commissioner district to which he or she is assigned for purposes of determining whether a position is vacant.

Sec. 94. RCW 70.44.056 and 1997 c 99 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In all existing public hospital districts in which an increase in the number of district commissioners is proposed, the additional commissioner positions shall be deemed to be vacant and the board of commissioners of the public hospital district shall appoint qualified persons to fill those vacancies in accordance with RCW 42.12.070.

Each person who is appointed shall serve until a qualified person is elected at the next general election of the district occurring one hundred twenty days or more after the date of the election at which the voters of the district approved the ballot proposition authorizing the increase in the number of commissioners. If needed, special filing periods shall be authorized as provided in RCW ((29.15.170 and 29.15.180))29A.24.171 and 29A.24.181 for qualified persons to file for the vacant office. A primary shall be held to nominate candidates if sufficient time exists to hold a primary and more than two candidates file for the vacant office. Otherwise, no primary shall be held and the candidate receiving the greatest number of votes for each position shall be elected. Except for the initial terms of office, persons elected to each of these additional commissioner positions shall be elected to a six-year term. The newly elected commissioners shall assume office as provided in RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280.

The initial terms of the new commissioners shall be staggered as follows: (1) When the number of commissioners is increased from three to five, the person elected receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to a six-year term of office, and the other person shall be elected to a four-year term; (2) when the number of commissioners is increased from three or five to seven, the terms of the new commissioners shall be staggered over the next three district general elections so that two commissioners will be elected at the first district general election following the election where the additional commissioners are elected, two commissioners will be at the second district general election after the election of the additional commissioners, and three commissioners will be elected at the third district general election following the election of the additional commissioners, with the persons elected receiving the greatest number of votes elected to serve the longest terms.

Sec. 95. RCW 80.36.390 and 1987 c 229 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this section, "telephone solicitation" means the unsolicited initiation of a telephone call by a commercial or nonprofit company or organization to a residential telephone customer and conversation for the purpose of encouraging a person to purchase property, goods, or services or soliciting donations of money, property, goods, or services. "Telephone solicitation" does not include:

(a) Calls made in response to a request or inquiry by the called party. This includes calls regarding an item that has been purchased by the called party from the company or organization during a period not longer than twelve months prior to the telephone contact;

(b) Calls made by a not-for-profit organization to its own list of bona fide or active members of the organization;

(c) Calls limited to polling or soliciting the expression of ideas, opinions, or votes; or

(d) Business-to-business contacts.

For purposes of this section, each individual real estate agent or insurance agent who maintains a separate list from other individual real estate or insurance agents shall be treated as a company or organization. For purposes of this section, an organization as defined in RCW ((29.01.090 or 29.01.100))29A.04.086 or 29A.04.097 and organized pursuant to chapter 29A.80 RCW ((29.42.010)) shall not be considered a commercial or nonprofit company or organization.

(2) A person making a telephone solicitation must identify him or herself and the company or organization on whose behalf the solicitation is being made and the purpose of the call within the first thirty seconds of the telephone call.

(3) If, at any time during the telephone contact, the called party states or indicates that he or she does not wish to be called again by the company or organization or wants to have his or her name and individual telephone number removed from the telephone lists used by the company or organization making the telephone solicitation, then:

(a) The company or organization shall not make any additional telephone solicitation of the called party at that telephone number within a period of at least one year; and

(b) The company or organization shall not sell or give the called party's name and telephone number to another company or organization: PROVIDED, That the company or organization may return the list, including the called party's name and telephone number, to the company or organization from which it received the list.

(4) A violation of subsection (2) or (3) of this section is punishable by a fine of up to one thousand dollars for each violation.

(5) The attorney general may bring actions to enforce compliance with this section. For the first violation by any company or organization of this section, the attorney general shall notify the company with a letter of warning that the section has been violated.

(6) A person aggrieved by repeated violations of this section may bring a civil action in superior court to enjoin future violations, to recover damages, or both. The court shall award damages of at least one hundred dollars for each individual violation of this section. If the aggrieved person prevails in a civil action under this subsection, the court shall award the aggrieved person reasonable attorneys' fees and cost of the suit.

(7) The utilities and transportation commission shall by rule ensure that telecommunications companies inform their residential customers of the provisions of this section. The notification may be made by (a) annual inserts in the billing statements mailed to residential customers, or (b) conspicuous publication of the notice in the consumer information pages of local telephone directories.

Sec. 96. RCW 80.52.050 and 1982 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The election required under RCW 80.52.040 shall be conducted in the manner provided in this section.

(1)(a) If the applicant is a public utility district, joint operating agency, city, or county, the election shall be among the voters of the public utility district, city, or county, or among the voters of the local governmental entities comprising the membership of the joint operating agency.

(b) If the applicant is any public agency other than those described in subsection (1)(a) of this section, or is an assignee of a joint operating agency and not itself a joint operating agency, the election shall be conducted statewide in the manner provided in Title 29A RCW for statewide elections.

(2) The election shall be held at the next statewide general election occurring more than ninety days after submission of a request by an applicant to the secretary of state unless a special election is requested by the applicant as provided in this section.

(3) If no statewide election can be held under subsection (2) of this section within one hundred twenty days of the submission to the secretary of state of a request by an applicant for financing authority under this chapter, the applicant may request that a special election be held if such election is necessary to avoid significant delay in construction or acquisition of the energy project. Within ten days of receipt of such a request for a special election, the secretary of state shall designate a date for the election pursuant to RCW ((29.13.010))29A.04.321 and certify the date to the county auditor of each county in which an election is to be held under this section.

(4) Prior to an election under this section, the applicant shall submit to the secretary of state a cost-effectiveness study, prepared by an independent consultant approved by the state finance committee, pertaining to the major public energy project under consideration. The study shall be available for public review and comment for thirty days. At the end of the thirty-day period, the applicant shall prepare a final draft of the study which includes the public comment, if any.

(5) The secretary of state shall certify the ballot issue for the election to be held under this section to the county auditor of each county in which an election is to be held. The certification shall include the statement of the proposition as provided in RCW 80.52.060. The costs of the election shall be relieved by the applicant in the manner provided by RCW ((29.13.045))29A.04.410. In addition, the applicant shall reimburse the secretary of state for the applicant's share of the costs related to the preparation and distribution of the voters' pamphlet required by subsection (6) of this section and such other costs as are attributable to any election held pursuant to this section.

(6) Prior to an election under this section, the secretary of state shall provide an opportunity for supporters and opponents of the requested financing authority to present their respective views in a voters' pamphlet which shall be distributed to the voters of the local governmental entities participating in the election. Upon submission of an applicant's request for an election pursuant to this section, the applicant shall provide the secretary of state with the following information regarding each major public energy project for which the applicant seeks financing authority at such election, which information shall be included in the voters' pamphlet:

(a) The name, location, and type of major public energy project, expressed in common terms;

(b) The dollar amount and type of bonds being requested;

(c) If the bond issuance is intended to finance the acquisition of all or a portion of the project, the anticipated total cost of the acquisition of the project;

(d) If the bond issuance is intended to finance the planning or construction of all or a portion of the project, the anticipated total cost of construction of the project;

(e) The projected average rate increase for consumers of the electricity to be generated by the project. The rate increase shall be that which will be necessary to repay the total indebtedness incurred for the project, including estimated interest;

(f) A summary of the final cost-effectiveness study conducted under subsection (4) of this section;

(g) The anticipated functional life of the project;

(h) The anticipated decommissioning costs of the project; and

(i) If a special election is requested by the applicant, the reasons for requesting a special election.

Sec. 97. RCW 82.14.036 and 1983 c 99 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any referendum petition to repeal a county or city ordinance imposing a tax or altering the rate of the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(2) shall be filed with a filing officer, as identified in the ordinance, within seven days of passage of the ordinance. Within ten days, the filing officer shall confer with the petitioner concerning form and style of the petition, issue an identification number for the petition, and write a ballot title for the measure. The ballot title shall be posed as a question so that an affirmative answer to the question and an affirmative vote on the measure results in the tax or tax rate increase being imposed and a negative answer to the question and a negative vote on the measure results in the tax or tax rate increase not being imposed. The petitioner shall be notified of the identification number and ballot title within this ten-day period.

After this notification, the petitioner shall have thirty days in which to secure on petition forms the signatures of not less than fifteen percent of the registered voters of the county for county measures, or not less than fifteen percent of the registered voters of the city for city measures, and to file the signed petitions with the filing officer. Each petition form shall contain the ballot title and the full text of the measure to be referred. The filing officer shall verify the sufficiency of the signatures on the petitions. If sufficient valid signatures are properly submitted, the filing officer shall submit the referendum measure to the county or city voters at a general or special election held on one of the dates provided in RCW ((29.13.010))29A.04.321 as determined by the county legislative authority or city council, which election shall not take place later than one hundred twenty days after the signed petition has been filed with the filing officer.

After April 22, 1983, the referendum procedure provided in this section shall be the exclusive method for subjecting any county or city ordinance imposing a tax or altering the rate under RCW 82.14.030(2) to a referendum vote.

Any county or city tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(2) that has been imposed prior to April 22, 1983, is not subject to the referendum procedure provided for in this section.

Sec. 98. RCW 82.46.021 and 2000 c 103 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Any referendum petition to repeal a county or city ordinance imposing a tax or altering the rate of the tax authorized under RCW 82.46.010(3) shall be filed with a filing officer, as identified in the ordinance, within seven days of passage of the ordinance. Within ten days, the filing officer shall confer with the petitioner concerning form and style of the petition, issue an identification number for the petition, and write a ballot title for the measure. The ballot title shall be posed as a question so that an affirmative answer to the question and an affirmative vote on the measure results in the tax or tax rate increase being imposed and a negative answer to the question and a negative vote on the measure results in the tax or tax rate increase not being imposed. The petitioner shall be notified of the identification number and ballot title within this ten-day period.

After this notification, the petitioner shall have thirty days in which to secure on petition forms the signatures of not less than fifteen percent of the registered voters of the county for county measures, or not less than fifteen percent of the registered voters of the city for city measures, and to file the signed petitions with the filing officer. Each petition form shall contain the ballot title and the full text of the measure to be referred. The filing officer shall verify the sufficiency of the signatures on the petitions. If sufficient valid signatures are properly submitted, the filing officer shall submit the referendum measure to the county or city voters at a general or special election held on one of the dates provided in RCW ((29.13.010))29A.04.321 as determined by the county legislative authority or city council, which election shall not take place later than one hundred twenty days after the signed petition has been filed with the filing officer.

After April 22, 1983, the referendum procedure provided for in this section shall be the exclusive method for subjecting any county or city ordinance imposing a tax or increasing the rate under RCW 82.46.010(3) to a referendum vote.

Any county or city tax authorized under RCW 82.46.010(3) that has been imposed prior to April 22, 1983, is not subject to the referendum procedure provided for in this section.

Sec. 99. RCW 82.80.090 and 1990 c 42 s 214 are each amended to read as follows:

A referendum petition to repeal a county or city ordinance imposing a tax or fee authorized under RCW ((82.80.020 and)) 82.80.030 must be filed with a filing officer, as identified in the ordinance, within seven days of passage of the ordinance. Within ten days, the filing officer shall confer with the petitioner concerning form and style of the petition, issue an identification number for the petition, and write a ballot title for the measure. The ballot title shall be posed as a question so that an affirmative answer to the question and an affirmative vote on the measure results in the tax or fee being imposed and a negative answer to the question and a negative vote on the measure results in the tax or fee not being imposed. The petitioner shall be notified of the identification number and ballot title within this ten-day period.

After this notification, the petitioner has thirty days in which to secure on petition forms the signatures of not less than fifteen percent of the registered voters of the county for county measures, or not less than fifteen percent of the registered voters of the city for city measures, and to file the signed petitions with the filing officer. Each petition form must contain the ballot title and the full text of the measure to be referred. The filing officer shall verify the sufficiency of the signatures on the petitions. If sufficient valid signatures are properly submitted, the filing officer shall submit the referendum measure to the county or city voters at a general or special election held on one of the dates provided in RCW ((29.13.010))29A.04.321 as determined by the county or city legislative authority, which election shall not take place later than one hundred twenty days after the signed petition has been filed with the filing officer.

The referendum procedure provided in this section is the exclusive method for subjecting any county or city ordinance imposing a tax or fee under RCW ((82.80.020 and)) 82.80.030 to a referendum vote.

Sec. 100. RCW 85.38.060 and 1991 c 349 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The county legislative authority or authorities shall cause an election on the question of creating the special district to be held if findings as provided in RCW 85.38.050 are made. The county legislative authority or authorities shall designate a time and date for such election, which shall be one of the special election dates provided for in RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330, together with the site or sites at which votes may be cast. The persons allowed to vote on the creation of a special district shall be those persons who, if the special district were created, would be qualified voters of the special district as described in RCW 85.38.010. The county auditor or auditors of the counties within which the proposed special district is located shall conduct the election and prepare a list of presumed eligible voters.

Notices for the election shall be published as provided in RCW 85.38.040. The special district shall be created if the proposition to create the special district is approved by a simple majority vote of the voters voting on the proposition and the special district may assume operations whenever the initial members of the governing body are appointed as provided in RCW 85.38.070.

Any special district created after July 28, 1985, may only have special assessments measured and imposed, and budgets adopted, as provided in RCW 85.38.140 through 85.38.170.

If the special district is created, the county or counties may charge the special district for the costs incurred by the county engineer or engineers pursuant to RCW 85.38.030 and the costs of the auditor or auditors related to the election to authorize the creation of the special district pursuant to this section. Such county actions shall be deemed to be special benefits of the property located within the special district that are paid through the imposition of special assessments.

Sec. 101. RCW 85.38.070 and 1991 c 349 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in RCW 85.38.090, each special district shall be governed by a three-member governing body. The term of office for each member of a special district governing body shall be six years and until his or her successor is elected and qualified. One member of the governing body shall be elected at the time of special district general elections in each even-numbered year for a term of six years beginning as soon as the election returns have been certified for assumption of office by elected officials of cities.

(2) The terms of office of members of the governing bodies of special districts, who are holding office on July 28, 1985, shall be altered to provide staggered six-year terms as provided in this subsection. The member who on July 28, 1985, has the longest term remaining shall have his or her term altered so that the position will be filled at the February 1992, special district general election; the member with the second longest term remaining shall have his or her term altered so that the position will be filled at the December, 1989, special district general election; and the member with the third longest term of office shall have his or her term altered so that the position will be filled at the December, 1987, special district general election.

(3) The initial members of the governing body of a newly created special district shall be appointed by the legislative authority of the county within which the special district, or the largest portion of the special district, is located. These initial governing body members shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified at the next special district general election held at least ninety days after the special district is established. At that election the first elected members of the governing body shall be elected. No primary elections may be held. Any voter of a special district may become a candidate for such a position by filing written notice of this intention with the county auditor at least thirty, but not more than sixty, days before a special district general election. The county auditor in consultation with the special district shall establish the filing period. The names of all candidates for such positions shall be listed alphabetically. At this first election, the candidate receiving the greatest number of votes shall have a six-year term, the candidate receiving the second greatest number of votes shall have a four-year term, and the candidate receiving the third greatest number of votes shall have a two-year term of office. The initially elected members of a governing body shall take office immediately when qualified as defined in RCW ((29.01.135))29A.04.133. Thereafter the candidate receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected for a six-year term of office. Members of a governing body shall hold their office until their successors are elected and qualified, and assume office as soon as the election returns have been certified.

(4) The requirements for the filing period and method for filing declarations of candidacy for the governing body of the district and the arrangement of candidate names on the ballot for all special district elections conducted after the initial election in the district shall be the same as the requirements for the initial election in the district. No primary elections may be held for the governing body of a special district.

(5) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the governing body of a special district, the legislative authority of the county within which the special district, or the largest portion of the special district, is located, shall appoint a district voter to serve until a person is elected, at the next special district general election occurring sixty or more days after the vacancy has occurred, to serve the remainder of the unexpired term. The person so elected shall take office immediately when qualified as defined in RCW ((29.01.135))29A.04.133.

If an election for the position which became vacant would otherwise have been held at this special district election, only one election shall be held and the person elected to fill the succeeding term for that position shall take office immediately when qualified as defined in RCW ((29.01.135))29A.04.133 and shall serve both the remainder of the unexpired term and the succeeding term. A vacancy occurs upon the death, resignation, or incapacity of a governing body member or whenever the governing body member ceases being a qualified voter of the special district.

(6) An elected or appointed member of a special district governing body, or a candidate for a special district governing body, must be a qualified voter of the special district: PROVIDED, That the state, its agencies and political subdivisions, or their designees under RCW 85.38.010(3) shall not be eligible for election or appointment.

Sec. 102. RCW 86.15.050 and 2003 c 304 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board of county commissioners of each county shall be ex officio, by virtue of their office, supervisors of the zones created in each county. In any zone with more than two thousand residents, an election of supervisors other than the board of county commissioners may be held as provided in this section.

(2) When proposed by citizen petition or by resolution of the board of county commissioners, a ballot proposition authorizing election of the supervisors of a zone shall be submitted by ordinance to the voters residing in the zone at any general election, or at any special election which may be called for that purpose.

(3) The ballot proposition shall be submitted (a) if the board of county supervisors enacts an ordinance submitting the proposition after adopting a resolution proposing the election of supervisors of a zone; or (b) if a petition proposing the election of supervisors of a zone is submitted to the county auditor of the county in which the zone is located that is signed by registered voters within the zone, numbering at least fifteen percent of the votes cast in the last county general election by registered voters within the zone.

(4) Upon receipt of a citizen petition under subsection (3)(b) of this section, the county auditor shall determine whether the petition is signed by a sufficient number of registered voters, using the registration records and returns of the preceding general election, and, no later than forty-five days after receipt of the petition, shall attach to the petition the auditor's certificate stating whether or not sufficient signatures have been obtained. If the signatures are found by the auditor to be insufficient, the petition shall be returned to the person filing it.

(5) The ballot proposition authorizing election of supervisors of zones shall appear on the ballot of the next general election or at the next special election date specified under RCW ((29.13.020))29A.04.330 occurring sixty or more days after the last resolution proposing election of supervisors or the date the county auditor certifies that the petition proposing such election contains sufficient valid signatures.

(6) The petition proposing the election of zone supervisors, or the ordinance submitting the question to the voters, shall describe the proposed election process. The ballot proposition shall include the following:

□ "For the direct election of flood control zone district supervisors."

□ "Against the direct election of flood control zone district supervisors."

(7) The ordinance or petition submitting the ballot proposition shall designate the proposed composition of the supervisors of zones, which shall be clearly described in the ballot proposition. The ballot proposition shall state that the zone supervisors shall thereafter be selected by election, and, at the same election at which the proposition is submitted to the voters as to whether to elect zone supervisors, three zone supervisors shall be elected. The election of zone supervisors is null and void if the voters, by a simple majority, do not approve the direct election of the zone supervisors. Candidates shall run for specific supervisor positions. No primary may be held to nominate candidates. The person receiving the greatest number of votes for each position shall be elected as a supervisor. The staggering of the terms of office shall occur as follows: (a) The person who is elected receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to a six-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a five-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; (b) the person who is elected receiving the second greatest number of votes shall be elected to a four-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a three-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; and (c) the other person who is elected shall be elected to a two-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The initial supervisors shall take office immediately when they are elected and qualified, and for purposes of computing their terms of office the terms shall be assumed to commence on the first day of January in the year after they are elected. Thereafter, all supervisors shall be elected to six-year terms of office. All supervisors shall serve until their respective successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))29A.60.280. Vacancies may occur and shall be filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.

(8) The costs and expenses directly related to the election of zone supervisors shall be borne by the zone.

Sec. 103. RCW 87.03.083 and 1979 ex.s. c 185 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Every member of an irrigation district board of directors is subject to recall and discharge by the legal voters of such district pursuant to the provisions of chapter ((29.82))29A.56 RCW.

--- END ---