BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 79A.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director of the parks and recreation commission may, in consultation with the department of natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife, designate specific days when certain recreation sites or lands, or all recreation sites or lands, may be lawfully accessed without having to display a discover pass or day-use permit.

(2) The free access days should be designated to best showcase state parks or other recreation sites or lands, provide equitable access statewide for persons with limited incomes, and not significantly impact state finances. In identifying appropriate free access days, the commission should consider, when practicable and appropriate, the following factors:

(a) Any similar free access days planned by the national park service for national parks;

(b) The commemoration of a grand opening of a state parks facility or a facility on another state recreation site or land;

(c) Local community celebrations;

(d) Other local, regional, statewide, or national events, holidays, or commemorative days.

Sec. 2. RCW 79A.80.050 and 2012 c 261 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) A discover pass or a day-use permit are not required within a state park for persons who have a valid camper registration, or annual natural investment permit, issued by the state parks and recreation commission.

(((2) The state parks and recreation commission must provide up to twelve days a year where entry to state parks is free. At least three of those days must be on weekends. When practicable, the free access days should be timed to correspond with any similar free access days planned by the national park service for national parks located in the general region of high volume state parks.))

Sec. 3. RCW 79A.05.040 and 1999 c 249 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to other duties the commission may from time to time impose, it is the duty of the director to:

(((1))) (a) Ensure the control of weeds in parks to the extent required by RCW 17.04.160 and 17.10.205; ((and

(2))) (b) Participate in the operations of the environmental enhancement and job creation task force under chapter 43.21J RCW; and

(c) Designate free access days pursuant to section 1 of this act.

(2) The director has the power reasonably necessary to carry out these duties.

--- END ---