BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that facilities at institutions of higher education paid for primarily with funds provided by state taxpayers are not currently made available without rent to public high schools for sporting events or performance arts productions. It is the intent of the legislature that the public institutions of higher education make sports fields, gymnasiums, and auditoriums available for use rent free to public high school sports teams and performing arts productions five times each per year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.77 RCW to read as follows:

The council shall adopt statewide facility use policies that require certain facilities at public four-year institutes of higher education to be made available for use rent free five times each per year, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Only higher education facilities, principally sports fields, gymnasiums, and auditoriums which are commonly made available for rent and whose total project construction costs were funded by fifty-one percent or more from state funding sources are subject to this requirement;

(2) Users for the purpose of this section include sports teams or performing arts productions of public high schools only. Users do not include teams or groups from private high schools or public high school clubs;

(3) Scheduling use of the higher education facilities shall be made on a first-come, first-serve basis;

(4) For purposes of this section, the public four-year institutions of higher education shall not charge rental fees for use of the facilities. However, the institutions may charge for other services as they relate to the use of the facility, such as concessions, parking fees, ticket sales, custodial fees, and security.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

The board shall adopt statewide facility use policies that require certain facilities at public two-year institutes of higher education to be made available for use rent free five times each per year, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Only higher education facilities, principally sports fields, gymnasiums, and auditoriums which are commonly made available for rent and whose total project construction costs were funded by fifty-one percent or more from state funding sources are subject to this requirement;

(2) Users for the purpose of this section include sports teams or performing arts productions of public high schools only. Users do not include teams or groups from private high schools or public high school clubs;

(3) Scheduling use of the higher education facilities shall be made on a first-come, first-serve basis;

(4) For purposes of this section, the public two-year institutions of higher education shall not charge rental fees for use of the facilities. However, the institutions may charge for other services as they relate to the use of the facility, such as concessions, parking fees, ticket sales, custodial fees, and security.

--- END ---