BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must amend the categorical exemption available to Washington department of transportation projects under WAC 197-11-800(26) as of the effective date of this section so that the same categorical exemption applies to structurally deficient city, town, or county bridge repair or replacement projects.

(2) For purposes of this section, "structurally deficient" means a bridge that is classified as in poor condition under the state bridge condition rating system and is reported by the state to the national bridge inventory as having a deck, superstructure, or substructure rating of four or below. Structurally deficient bridges are characterized by deteriorated conditions of significant bridge elements and potentially reduced load-carrying capacity. Bridges deemed structurally deficient typically require significant maintenance and repair to remain in service, and require major rehabilitation or replacement to address the underlying deficiency.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.28.170 and 2006 c 334 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the department finds that as a consequence of accident, natural disaster, or other emergency, an existing state highway is in jeopardy or is rendered impassible in one or both directions and the department further finds that prompt reconstruction, repair, or other work is needed to preserve or restore the highway for public travel, the department may obtain at least three written bids for the work without publishing a call for bids, and the secretary of transportation may award a contract forthwith to the lowest responsible bidder.

The department shall notify any association or organization of contractors filing a request to regularly receive notification. Notification to an association or organization of contractors shall include: (a) The location of the work to be done; (b) the general anticipated nature of the work to be done; and (c) the date determined by the department as reasonable in view of the nature of the work and emergent nature of the problem after which the department will not receive bids.

(2) Whenever the department finds it necessary to protect a highway facility from imminent damage or to perform emergency work to reopen a highway facility, the department may contract for such work on a negotiated basis not to exceed force account rates for a period not to exceed thirty working days.

(3) The secretary shall review any contract exceeding seven hundred thousand dollars awarded under subsection (1) or (2) of this section with the office of financial management within thirty days of the contract award.

(4) Any person, firm, or corporation awarded a contract for work must be prequalified pursuant to RCW 47.28.070 and may be required to furnish a bid deposit or performance bond.

(5) A city, town, or county may use the contracting process available to the department under subsection (1) of this section for the repair or replacement of a bridge deemed structurally deficient, as defined in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW to read as follows:

The repair or replacement of a city, town, or county bridge deemed structurally deficient, as defined in section 1 of this act, may use the contracting process available under RCW 47.28.170.

--- END ---