BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the transportation sector is Washington's largest contributor to greenhouse emissions and hazardous air pollutants as defined by federal national ambient air quality standards and mobile source air toxics rules. The sector's portion is considerably higher than the national average because our state relies heavily on hydropower for electricity generation, unlike other states that rely on fossil fuels such as coal, petroleum, and natural gas to generate electricity.

(2) The legislature also finds that federal clean air act regulations and complementary Washington policies supporting renewable energy generation, energy efficiency, and energy conservation are likely to result in further reduction of emissions in the electricity and in the combined residential, commercial, and industrial sectors. The legislature finds that state policy can achieve the greatest return on investment in reducing greenhouse gas emissions and improving air quality by expediting the transition to alternative fuel vehicles, including electric vehicles.

(3) The legislature finds that utilities, who are traditionally responsible for understanding and engineering the electrical grid for safety and reliability, must be fully empowered and incentivized to be engaged in electrification of our transportation system. The legislature further finds that it has given utilities other policy directives to promote energy conservation which do not make the benefits of building out electric vehicle infrastructure, as well as any subsequent increase in energy consumption, readily apparent. Therefore the legislature intends to provide a clear policy directive and financial incentive to utilities for electric vehicle infrastructure build-out.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In establishing rates for each electrical company regulated under this title, the commission may allow an incentive rate of return on investment on capital expenditures for electric vehicle supply equipment that is deployed for the benefit of ratepayers. The commission must consider and may adopt other policies to improve access to electric vehicle supply equipment.

(2) An incentive rate of return on investment under this section may be allowed only if the company chooses to pursue capital investment in electric vehicle supply equipment on a fully regulated basis similar to other capital investments behind a customer's meter. In the case of an incentive rate of return on investment allowed under this section, an increment of up to two percent must be added to the rate of return on common equity allowed on the company's other investments.

(3) The incentive rate of return on investment authorized in subsection (2) of this section applies only to projects which have been installed after July 1, 2015, and which are reasonably expected, at the time they are placed in the rate base, to result in real and tangible benefits for rate payers by being installed and located where electric vehicles are most likely to be parked for intervals longer than two hours.

(4) The incentive rate of return on investment increment pursuant to this section may be earned only for a period up to the depreciable life of the electric vehicle supply equipment as defined in the depreciation schedules developed by the company and submitted to the commission for review. When the capital investment has fully depreciated, an electrical company may gift the electric vehicle supply equipment to the owner of the property on which it is located.

(5) By December 31, 2017, the commission must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with regard to the use of any incentives allowed under this section, the quantifiable impacts of the incentives on actual electric vehicle deployment, and any recommendations to the legislature about utility participation in the electric vehicle market.

--- END ---