BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 15.24.800 (Financing assistance for commission building);

(2) RCW 15.24.802 (General obligation bonds to fund commission building);

(3) RCW 15.24.804 (Bond issuance and sale);

(4) RCW 15.24.806 (Bond proceeds, etc., to state building construction account);

(5) RCW 15.24.808 (Expenditure of bond proceeds);

(6) RCW 15.24.810 (Fund for payment of bond principal and interest);

(7) RCW 15.24.812 (Certification and payment of bond principal and interest);

(8) RCW 15.24.814 (RCW 15.24.810 and 15.24.812 not exclusive method of payment);

(9) RCW 15.24.816 (Bonds constitute legal investments for state and other public funds); and

(10) RCW 15.24.818 (Bonds to be issued only after certification of sufficiency of funds).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 79.24.100 (Bond issue authorized);

(2) RCW 79.24.110 (Sale of bonds—Price—Investment of funds in);

(3) RCW 79.24.120 (Life of bonds—Payment of interest);

(4) RCW 79.24.130 (Signatures—Registration of bonds);

(5) RCW 79.24.140 (Proceeds to capitol building construction account);

(6) RCW 79.24.150 (Bonds as security and legal investment);

(7) RCW 79.24.160 (Use of proceeds specified);

(8) RCW 79.24.652 (Bonds authorized—Amount—Interest and maturity—Payable from certain revenues);

(9) RCW 79.24.654 (Maturities—Covenants—Section's provisions as contract with bond holders—Where payable);

(10) RCW 79.24.656 (Signatures—Registration);

(11) RCW 79.24.658 (Payment of principal and interest—State building and parking bond redemption fund—Reserve—Owner's remedies—Disposition of proceeds of sale—Nondebt-limit revenue bond retirement account);

(12) RCW 79.24.660 (Bonds as security and legal investment);

(13) RCW 79.24.662 (Use of bond proceeds);

(14) RCW 79.24.664 (Appropriation);

(15) RCW 79.24.666 (State capitol committee to act upon advice of legislative committee—State capitol committee powers); and

(16) RCW 79.24.668 (Severability—1969 ex.s. c 272).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 28A.525.210 (1984 bond issue for construction, modernization of school plant facilities—Intent);

(2) RCW 28A.525.212 (1984 bond issue for construction, modernization of school plant facilities—Authorized—Sale);

(3) RCW 28A.525.214 (1984 bond issue for construction, modernization of school plant facilities—Proceeds deposited in common school construction fund—Use);

(4) RCW 28A.525.216 (1984 bond issue for construction, modernization of school plant facilities—Proceeds—Administration);

(5) RCW 28A.525.218 (1984 bond issue for construction, modernization of school plant facilities—State general obligation bond fund utilized for payment of principal and interest—Committee's and treasurer's duties—Form and condition of bonds);

(6) RCW 28A.525.220 (1984 bond issue for construction, modernization of school plant facilities—Legislature may provide additional means for payment);

(7) RCW 28A.525.222 (1984 bond issue for construction, modernization of school plant facilities—Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(8) RCW 28A.525.230 (Bonds authorized—Amount—As compensation for sale of timber—Sale, conditions);

(9) RCW 28A.525.240 (Bond anticipation notes—Authorized—Payment);

(10) RCW 28A.525.250 (Form, terms, conditions, sale and covenants of bonds and notes);

(11) RCW 28A.525.260 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds and notes—Use);

(12) RCW 28A.525.270 (State general obligation bond retirement fund utilized for payment of bond principal and interest—Procedure);

(13) RCW 28A.525.280 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(14) RCW 28A.525.290 (Chapter provisions as limited by other statutes, covenants and proceedings); and

(15) RCW 28A.525.300 (Proceeds from sale of bonds as compensation for sale of timber from trust lands).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 28B.50.401 (Transfer of moneys in community college bond retirement fund to state general fund—Purpose);

(2) RCW 28B.50.402 (Transfer of moneys in community and technical college bond retirement fund to state general fund—Exception);

(3) RCW 28B.50.403 (Refunding bonds—Authorized—Limitations);

(4) RCW 28B.50.404 (Refunding bonds—Issuance—Security);

(5) RCW 28B.50.405 (Refunding bonds—Community and technical college refunding bond retirement fund of 1974);

(6) RCW 28B.50.406 (Refunding bonds—Legislature may provide additional means of payments);

(7) RCW 28B.50.407 (Refunding bonds—Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(8) RCW 28B.56.010 (Purpose);

(9) RCW 28B.56.020 (Bonds authorized—Payment—Limitations);

(10) RCW 28B.56.040 (Proceeds from bond sale—Administration and expenditure);

(11) RCW 28B.56.050 ("Community college facilities" defined);

(12) RCW 28B.56.070 (Referral to electorate);

(13) RCW 28B.56.080 (Form, terms, conditions and manner of sale and issuance—Limitation);

(14) RCW 28B.56.090 (Anticipation notes—Authorized—Contents—Payment);

(15) RCW 28B.56.100 (Community college capital improvements bond redemption fund of 1972—Created—Tax receipts—Use of funds—Use of debt-limit general fund bond retirement account);

(16) RCW 28B.56.110 (Legislature may provide additional means of revenue);

(17) RCW 28B.56.120 (Bonds as legal investment for state and municipal corporation funds);

(18) RCW 28B.57.010 (State general obligation bonds in lieu of building, limited obligation bonds—"Community college capital projects" defined);

(19) RCW 28B.57.020 (Amount of bonds authorized);

(20) RCW 28B.57.030 (Projects enumerated);

(21) RCW 28B.57.040 (Bond anticipation notes, authorized, payment—Form, terms, conditions, sale and covenants of bonds and notes);

(22) RCW 28B.57.060 (Administration of proceeds from bonds and notes);

(23) RCW 28B.57.070 (1975 community college capital construction bond retirement fund—Created—Purpose);

(24) RCW 28B.57.080 (Moneys to be transferred from community college account to state general fund—Limitation);

(25) RCW 28B.57.090 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(26) RCW 28B.57.100 (Prerequisite to bond issuance);

(27) RCW 28B.58.010 (State general obligation bonds in lieu of building, limited obligation bonds—"Community college capital projects" defined—Consideration for minority contractors on projects so funded);

(28) RCW 28B.58.020 (Amount of bonds authorized);

(29) RCW 28B.58.030 (Bond anticipation notes, authorized, payment—Form, term, conditions, sale and covenants of bonds and notes);

(30) RCW 28B.58.040 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds and notes);

(31) RCW 28B.58.050 (Administration of proceeds from bonds and notes);

(32) RCW 28B.58.060 (Payment of principal and interest on bonds);

(33) RCW 28B.58.070 (Moneys to be transferred from community college account to state general fund—Limitation);

(34) RCW 28B.58.080 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(35) RCW 28B.58.090 (Prerequisite to bond issuance);

(36) RCW 28B.59.010 (Purpose—"Community college capital projects" defined);

(37) RCW 28B.59.020 (Amount of general obligation bonds authorized);

(38) RCW 28B.59.030 (Bond anticipation notes, authorized, payment—Form, term, conditions, sale and covenants of bonds and notes);

(39) RCW 28B.59.040 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds and notes);

(40) RCW 28B.59.050 (Administration of the proceeds from bonds and notes);

(41) RCW 28B.59.060 (Payment of the principal and interest on bonds);

(42) RCW 28B.59.070 (Moneys to be transferred from community college account to state general fund—Limitation);

(43) RCW 28B.59.080 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(44) RCW 28B.59.090 (Prerequisite to bond issuance);

(45) RCW 28B.59B.010 (Purpose—Bonds authorized—Amount—Conditions);

(46) RCW 28B.59B.020 (Bond anticipation notes—Authorized—Bond proceeds to apply to payment on);

(47) RCW 28B.59B.030 (Form, terms, conditions, sale, redemption and covenants of bonds and notes—Pledge of state's credit);

(48) RCW 28B.59B.040 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds and notes);

(49) RCW 28B.59B.050 (Administration of proceeds from bonds and notes);

(50) RCW 28B.59B.060 (Payment of the principal and interest on bonds and notes);

(51) RCW 28B.59B.070 (Moneys to be transferred from community college account to state general fund);

(52) RCW 28B.59B.080 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(53) RCW 28B.59B.090 (Prerequisite to bond issuance);

(54) RCW 28B.59C.010 (Purpose—Bonds authorized—Amount—Conditions);

(55) RCW 28B.59C.020 (Bond anticipation notes—Authorized—Bond proceeds to apply to payment on);

(56) RCW 28B.59C.030 (Form, terms, conditions, sale, redemption and covenants of bonds and notes—Pledge of state's credit);

(57) RCW 28B.59C.040 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds and notes);

(58) RCW 28B.59C.050 (Administration of proceeds from bonds and notes);

(59) RCW 28B.59C.060 (Payment of principal and interest on bonds and notes);

(60) RCW 28B.59C.070 (Moneys to be transferred from community college account to state general fund);

(61) RCW 28B.59C.080 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(62) RCW 28B.59D.010 (Purpose—Bonds authorized—Amount—Condition);

(63) RCW 28B.59D.020 (Bonds to pledge credit of state, promise to pay);

(64) RCW 28B.59D.030 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds);

(65) RCW 28B.59D.040 (Administration and expenditure of proceeds from sale of bonds—Condition);

(66) RCW 28B.59D.050 (Existing fund utilized for payment of principal and interest—Committee and treasurer's duties);

(67) RCW 28B.59D.060 (Transfer of account moneys to general fund—College board and treasurer's duties); and

(68) RCW 28B.59D.070 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 43.83I.010 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms, etc);

(2) RCW 43.83I.020 (Bond anticipation notes—Proceeds of bonds and interest on notes);

(3) RCW 43.83I.030 (Bonds and notes—Powers and duties of state finance committee);

(4) RCW 43.83I.050 (1976 fisheries bond retirement fund created);

(5) RCW 43.83I.060 (Legal investment for public funds);

(6) RCW 43.83I.100 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms, etc);

(7) RCW 43.83I.110 (Bond anticipation notes—Proceeds of bonds and interest on notes);

(8) RCW 43.83I.120 (Bonds and notes—Powers and duties of state finance committee);

(9) RCW 43.83I.130 (Proceeds deposited in fisheries capital projects account—Exception);

(10) RCW 43.83I.140 (1977 fisheries bond retirement fund created);

(11) RCW 43.83I.150 (Legal investment for public funds);

(12) RCW 43.83I.160 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms, etc.—Appropriation required);

(13) RCW 43.83I.162 (Bond anticipation notes—Payment);

(14) RCW 43.83I.164 (Form, terms, conditions, etc., of bonds and notes—Pledge and promise);

(15) RCW 43.83I.168 (Retirement of bonds from 1977 fisheries bond retirement fund);

(16) RCW 43.83I.170 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(17) RCW 43.83I.172 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms, etc.—Appropriation required);

(18) RCW 43.83I.174 (Bond anticipation notes);

(19) RCW 43.83I.176 (Form, terms, conditions, etc., of bonds and notes—Pledge and promise);

(20) RCW 43.83I.178 (Proceeds deposited in fisheries capital projects account—Use);

(21) RCW 43.83I.180 (Retirement of bonds from 1977 fisheries bond retirement fund);

(22) RCW 43.83I.182 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(23) RCW 43.83I.184 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance—Appropriation required);

(24) RCW 43.83I.186 (Deposit of proceeds in fisheries capital projects account—Use);

(25) RCW 43.83I.188 (Administration of proceeds);

(26) RCW 43.83I.190 (Retirement of bonds from state general obligation bond retirement fund—Pledge and promise—Remedies of bondholders);

(27) RCW 43.83I.192 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(28) RCW 43.83I.194 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(29) RCW 43.83I.900 (Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 132);

(30) RCW 43.83I.910 (Severability—1977 ex.s. c 343);

(31) RCW 43.83I.912 (Severability—1979 ex.s. c 224);

(32) RCW 43.83I.914 (Severability—1981 c 231); and

(33) RCW 43.83I.915 (Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 59).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 43.96B.200 (Legislative finding);

(2) RCW 43.96B.205 (Bond issue—Authorized);

(3) RCW 43.96B.210 (Bond issue—Issuance and sale of bonds—Form, terms, conditions, etc.—Authority of state finance committee);

(4) RCW 43.96B.215 (Bond issue—Anticipation notes—Disposition of proceeds—Acquisition of property by Expo '74 commission authorized);

(5) RCW 43.96B.220 (Bond issue—Administration of proceeds);

(6) RCW 43.96B.225 (Bond issue—Redemption fund—Payment of bonds);

(7) RCW 43.96B.230 (Bond issue—Additional means of payment);

(8) RCW 43.96B.235 (Bond issue—Legal investment for public funds);

(9) RCW 43.96B.240 (Appropriation);

(10) RCW 43.96B.245 (Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 116); and

(11) RCW 43.96B.900 (Severability—1971 ex.s. c 3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 43.99C.010 (Declaration);

(2) RCW 43.99C.015 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms—Appropriation required);

(3) RCW 43.99C.020 (Definitions);

(4) RCW 43.99C.025 (Bond anticipation notes—Payment);

(5) RCW 43.99C.030 (Form, terms, conditions, etc., of bonds and notes);

(6) RCW 43.99C.035 (Pledge and promise);

(7) RCW 43.99C.045 (Administration of proceeds—Distribution—Transfer of fixed assets);

(8) RCW 43.99C.047 (Prohibition of expenditures not submitted in budget document or schedule—Capital appropriation—Exception—Contents);

(9) RCW 43.99C.050 (Retirement of bonds and notes from 1979 handicapped facilities bond redemption fund—Retirement of bonds and notes from state general obligation bond retirement fund);

(10) RCW 43.99C.055 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds); and

(11) RCW 43.99C.060 (Bonds legal investment for public funds).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 28B.10.850 (Capital improvements, bonds for—Authorized—Form, terms, conditions, sale, signatures);

(2) RCW 28B.10.852 (Capital improvements, bonds for—Bond anticipation notes, purpose);

(3) RCW 28B.10.853 (Capital improvements, bonds for—Bond redemption fund created, purpose—Compelling transfer of funds to);

(4) RCW 28B.10.854 (Capital improvements, bonds for—Legislature may provide additional means of revenue);

(5) RCW 28B.10.855 (Capital improvements, bonds for—As legal investment for state and municipal funds);

(6) RCW 28B.106.005 (Findings—Purpose);

(7) RCW 28B.106.010 (Definitions);

(8) RCW 28B.106.020 (Bond authorization—Issuance—Requirements);

(9) RCW 28B.106.030 (Bond sale proceeds—Deposit—Use);

(10) RCW 28B.106.040 (Higher education bond retirement fund of 1988—Creation—Use—Use of debt-limit general fund bond retirement account);

(11) RCW 28B.106.050 (Additional means to raise money for bond retirement);

(12) RCW 28B.106.060 (Bonds to be legal investment);

(13) RCW 28B.106.070 (Publicity—Marketing strategies and educational programs);

(14) RCW 28B.106.080 (Interest on bonds exempt from any state income tax);

(15) RCW 28B.106.901 (Short title);

(16) RCW 28B.106.902 (Severability—1988 c 125);

(17) RCW 28B.13.010 (Bonds authorized—Amount—Purpose—Form, conditions of sale, etc);

(18) RCW 28B.13.020 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds);

(19) RCW 28B.13.030 (Bond anticipation notes—Authorized—Payment of principal and interest on—Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds and notes);

(20) RCW 28B.13.040 (Bond redemption fund—Created—Use—Rights of bond owner and holder);

(21) RCW 28B.13.050 (Chapter not exclusive method for payment of interest and principal on bonds);

(22) RCW 28B.13.060 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(23) RCW 28B.13.900 (Severability—1974 ex.s. c 181);

(24) RCW 28B.14.010 (Bonds authorized—Amount—Consideration for minority contractors on projects so funded);

(25) RCW 28B.14.020 (Bond anticipation notes—Authorized—Payment);

(26) RCW 28B.14.030 (Form, terms, conditions, sale and covenants of bonds and notes);

(27) RCW 28B.14.040 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds and notes—Use);

(28) RCW 28B.14.050 (1975 state higher education bond retirement fund—Created—Purpose);

(29) RCW 28B.14.060 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(30) RCW 28B.14B.010 (Bonds authorized—Amount—Conditions);

(31) RCW 28B.14B.020 (Bond anticipation notes—Authorized—Payment);

(32) RCW 28B.14B.030 (Form, terms, conditions, sale and covenants of bonds and notes);

(33) RCW 28B.14B.040 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds and notes—Use);

(34) RCW 28B.14B.050 (State higher education bond retirement fund of 1977—Created—Purpose);

(35) RCW 28B.14B.060 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(36) RCW 28B.14C.010 (Purpose—Bonds authorized—Amount);

(37) RCW 28B.14C.020 (Refunding as benefit to state);

(38) RCW 28B.14C.030 (Constitutional and statutory authority applicable—Specific state finance committee powers);

(39) RCW 28B.14C.040 (Limitation as to amount of bonds to be issued—Pledge of state's credit);

(40) RCW 28B.14C.050 (Disposition of proceeds of refunding issues);

(41) RCW 28B.14C.060 (Institutions of higher education refunding bond retirement fund of 1977—Created—Use);

(42) RCW 28B.14C.070 (Chapter not exclusive method for payment of interest and principal on bonds);

(43) RCW 28B.14C.080 (Chapter as affecting University of Washington building revenue bond redemption);

(44) RCW 28B.14C.090 (Chapter as affecting Washington State University building revenue bond redemption);

(45) RCW 28B.14C.100 (Chapter as affecting Western Washington State College building and normal school fund revenue bonds);

(46) RCW 28B.14C.110 (Chapter as affecting Eastern Washington State College building and normal school fund revenue bonds);

(47) RCW 28B.14C.120 (Chapter as affecting Central Washington State College building and normal school fund revenue bonds);

(48) RCW 28B.14C.130 (Chapter as affecting Evergreen State College building revenue bonds);

(49) RCW 28B.14C.140 (Use limited when reserves transferred to state general fund);

(50) RCW 28B.14C.900 (Severability—1977 ex.s. c 354);

(51) RCW 28B.14D.010 (Bonds authorized—Amount—Conditions);

(52) RCW 28B.14D.020 (Bond anticipation notes—Authorized—Payment);

(53) RCW 28B.14D.030 (Form, terms, conditions, sale and covenants of bonds and notes);

(54) RCW 28B.14D.050 (Administration and use of proceeds from bonds and notes);

(55) RCW 28B.14D.060 (Higher education bond retirement fund of 1979—Created—Purpose—Treasurer's duties);

(56) RCW 28B.14D.070 (Building or capital projects account moneys deposited in general fund);

(57) RCW 28B.14D.080 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(58) RCW 28B.14D.090 (Prerequisite for issuance of bonds);

(59) RCW 28B.14D.900 (Construction—Provisions as subordinate in nature);

(60) RCW 28B.14D.950 (Severability—1979 ex.s. c 253);

(61) RCW 28B.14E.010 (Bonds authorized—Amount—Conditions);

(62) RCW 28B.14E.020 (Bond anticipation notes—Authorized—Payment);

(63) RCW 28B.14E.030 (Form, terms, conditions, sale and covenants of bonds and notes);

(64) RCW 28B.14E.040 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds and notes—Use);

(65) RCW 28B.14E.050 (Existing fund utilized for payment of principal and interest—Treasurer's duties);

(66) RCW 28B.14E.060 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(67) RCW 28B.14E.950 (Severability—1979 ex.s. c 223);

(68) RCW 28B.14F.010 (Bonds authorized—Amount—Condition);

(69) RCW 28B.14F.020 (Bonds to pledge credit of state, promise to pay);

(70) RCW 28B.14F.030 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds—Use);

(71) RCW 28B.14F.040 (Existing fund utilized for payment of principal and interest—Committee and treasurer's duties);

(72) RCW 28B.14F.050 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(73) RCW 28B.14F.060 (Bonds authorized—Amount—Condition);

(74) RCW 28B.14F.062 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds—Use);

(75) RCW 28B.14F.064 (Existing fund utilized for payment of principal and interest—Committee and treasurer's duties—Form and conditions of bonds);

(76) RCW 28B.14F.066 (Refunding bonds—Legislature may provide additional means for payment);

(77) RCW 28B.14F.068 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(78) RCW 28B.14F.070 (Bonds authorized—Amount—Condition);

(79) RCW 28B.14F.072 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds—Use);

(80) RCW 28B.14F.074 (Existing fund utilized for payment of principal and interest);

(81) RCW 28B.14F.076 (Legislature may provide additional methods of raising money);

(82) RCW 28B.14F.078 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(83) RCW 28B.14F.950 (Severability—1981 c 232);

(84) RCW 28B.14F.951 (Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 58);

(85) RCW 28B.14F.952 (Severability—1984 c 264);

(86) RCW 28B.14G.010 (Bonds authorized—Amount—Condition);

(87) RCW 28B.14G.020 (Bonds to pledge credit of state, promise to pay);

(88) RCW 28B.14G.030 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds);

(89) RCW 28B.14G.040 (Administration and expenditure of proceeds from sale of bonds—Condition);

(90) RCW 28B.14G.050 (Existing fund utilized for payment of principal and interest—Committee and treasurer's duties);

(91) RCW 28B.14G.060 (Apportioning shares of principal and interest payments—Committee and treasurer's duties);

(92) RCW 28B.14G.070 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(93) RCW 28B.14G.080 (Issuance of bonds subject to certification of maintenance of fund balances);

(94) RCW 28B.14G.900 (Construction—Provisions as subordinate in nature); and

(95) RCW 28B.14G.950 (Severability—1981 c 233).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 47.10.010 (First priority highway projects—Declaration of);

(2) RCW 47.10.020 (Bond issue authorized—Use of motor vehicle fund);

(3) RCW 47.10.030 (Form and term of bonds);

(4) RCW 47.10.040 (Bonds not general obligations—Taxes pledged);

(5) RCW 47.10.050 (Sale of bonds);

(6) RCW 47.10.060 (Proceeds—Deposit and use);

(7) RCW 47.10.070 (Source of funds for payment of principal and interest);

(8) RCW 47.10.080 (Highway bond retirement fund);

(9) RCW 47.10.090 (Excess sums in bond retirement fund—Use);

(10) RCW 47.10.100 (Allocation of bonds);

(11) RCW 47.10.110 (Columbia Basin highway projects—Reimbursement by counties);

(12) RCW 47.10.120 (Columbia Basin highway projects—Limit as to amounts currently retained);

(13) RCW 47.10.130 (Agate Pass Bridge to become toll free—Cancellation of Agate Pass bonds);

(14) RCW 47.10.140 (Appropriation from motor vehicle fund);

(15) RCW 47.10.150 (Declaration of necessity for additional funds);

(16) RCW 47.10.160 (Additional bonds—Issuance and sale authorized—Use of motor vehicle fund);

(17) RCW 47.10.170 (Additional bonds—Form and term of bonds);

(18) RCW 47.10.180 (Additional bonds—Bonds not general obligations—Taxes pledged);

(19) RCW 47.10.190 (Additional bonds—Sale of bonds);

(20) RCW 47.10.200 (Additional bonds—Proceeds—Deposit and use);

(21) RCW 47.10.210 (Additional bonds—Source of funds for payment of principal and interest);

(22) RCW 47.10.220 (Additional bonds—Highway bond retirement fund);

(23) RCW 47.10.230 (Additional bonds—Excess sums in bond retirement fund—Use);

(24) RCW 47.10.240 (Additional bonds—Allocation—Primary state highway No. 1);

(25) RCW 47.10.250 (Additional bonds—Allocation—Primary state highway No. 2, Snoqualmie Pass);

(26) RCW 47.10.260 (Additional bonds—Allocation—Columbia Basin highways);

(27) RCW 47.10.270 (Additional bonds—Allocation—Echo Lake route);

(28) RCW 47.10.280 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Declaration of priority);

(29) RCW 47.10.290 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Issuance and sale of bonds);

(30) RCW 47.10.300 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Form and term of bonds);

(31) RCW 47.10.310 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Bonds not general obligations—Taxes pledged);

(32) RCW 47.10.320 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Sale of bonds);

(33) RCW 47.10.330 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Bond proceeds—Deposit and use);

(34) RCW 47.10.340 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Source of funds for payment of bond principal and interest);

(35) RCW 47.10.350 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Highway bond retirement fund);

(36) RCW 47.10.360 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Reimbursement by counties);

(37) RCW 47.10.370 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Limit as to amounts currently retained from excise taxes);

(38) RCW 47.10.380 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Excess sums in bond retirement fund—Use);

(39) RCW 47.10.390 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Allocation of funds to each county);

(40) RCW 47.10.400 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Appropriation from motor vehicle fund);

(41) RCW 47.10.410 (Echo Lake route—Declaration of necessity);

(42) RCW 47.10.420 (Echo Lake route—Additional bond issue authorized—Use of motor vehicle fund);

(43) RCW 47.10.430 (Echo Lake route—Form and term of bonds);

(44) RCW 47.10.440 (Echo Lake route—Bonds not general obligations—Taxes pledged);

(45) RCW 47.10.450 (Echo Lake route—Sale of bonds);

(46) RCW 47.10.460 (Echo Lake route—Proceeds—Deposit and use);

(47) RCW 47.10.470 (Echo Lake route—Source of funds for payment of principal and interest);

(48) RCW 47.10.480 (Echo Lake route—Highway bond retirement fund);

(49) RCW 47.10.490 (Echo Lake route—Excess sums in bond retirement fund—Use);

(50) RCW 47.10.500 (Echo Lake route—Appropriation from motor vehicle fund);

(51) RCW 47.10.700 (Tacoma-Seattle-Everett facility—Declaration of necessity);

(52) RCW 47.10.702 (Tacoma-Seattle-Everett facility—To be part of federal system as limited access—Federal standards and conditions to be met);

(53) RCW 47.10.704 (Tacoma-Seattle-Everett facility—Powers and duties of highway commission—Route of project);

(54) RCW 47.10.706 (Tacoma-Seattle-Everett facility—Issuance and sale of bonds authorized);

(55) RCW 47.10.708 (Tacoma-Seattle-Everett facility—Form and term of bonds);

(56) RCW 47.10.710 (Tacoma-Seattle-Everett facility—Sale of bonds);

(57) RCW 47.10.712 (Tacoma-Seattle-Everett facility—Proceeds from bonds—Deposit and use);

(58) RCW 47.10.714 (Tacoma-Seattle-Everett facility—Bonds not general obligations—Taxes pledged);

(59) RCW 47.10.716 (Tacoma-Seattle-Everett facility—Source of funds for payment of principal and interest);

(60) RCW 47.10.718 (Tacoma-Seattle-Everett facility—Additional security for payment of bonds—Pledge of federal funds);

(61) RCW 47.10.720 (Tacoma-Seattle-Everett facility—Highway bond retirement fund);

(62) RCW 47.10.722 (Tacoma-Seattle-Everett facility—Excess sums in bond retirement fund—Use);

(63) RCW 47.10.724 (Tacoma-Seattle-Everett facility—Appropriation from motor vehicle fund);

(64) RCW 47.10.726 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Declaration of public interest);

(65) RCW 47.10.727 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Issuance and sale of limited obligation bonds);

(66) RCW 47.10.728 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Form and term of bonds);

(67) RCW 47.10.729 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Bonds not general obligations—Taxes pledged);

(68) RCW 47.10.730 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Sale of bonds—Legal investment for state funds);

(69) RCW 47.10.731 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Bond proceeds—Deposit and use);

(70) RCW 47.10.732 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Source of funds for payment of bond principal and interest);

(71) RCW 47.10.733 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Highway bond retirement fund);

(72) RCW 47.10.734 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Repayment to state by Grant, Franklin and Adams counties by retention of funds);

(73) RCW 47.10.735 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Repayment, limitation as to amount of funds retained—Deficits);

(74) RCW 47.10.736 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Sums in excess of retirement requirements—Use);

(75) RCW 47.10.737 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Allocation of bonds to counties—Conditions upon issuance—Use of county engineering forces);

(76) RCW 47.10.738 (Construction in Grant, Franklin, Adams counties authorized—Appropriation from motor vehicle fund);

(77) RCW 47.10.751 (Additional funds—Declaration of necessity);

(78) RCW 47.10.752 (Additional funds—Issuance and sale of limited obligation bonds);

(79) RCW 47.10.753 (Additional funds—Form and term of bonds);

(80) RCW 47.10.754 (Additional funds—Sale of bonds—Legal investment for state funds);

(81) RCW 47.10.755 (Additional funds—Bond proceeds—Deposit and use);

(82) RCW 47.10.756 (Additional funds—Bonds not general obligations—Taxes pledged);

(83) RCW 47.10.757 (Additional funds—Source of funds for payment of bond principal and interest);

(84) RCW 47.10.758 (Additional funds—Highway bond retirement fund);

(85) RCW 47.10.759 (Additional funds—Sums in excess of retirement requirements—Use);

(86) RCW 47.10.760 (Additional funds—Appropriation from motor vehicle fund);

(87) RCW 47.10.761 (Reserve funds—Purposes);

(88) RCW 47.10.762 (Issuance and sale of general obligation bonds);

(89) RCW 47.10.763 (Bonds—Term—Terms and conditions—Signatures—Registration—Where payable—Negotiable instruments);

(90) RCW 47.10.764 (Bonds—Denominations—Manner and terms of sale—Legal investment for state funds);

(91) RCW 47.10.765 (Bonds—Bond proceeds—Deposit and use);

(92) RCW 47.10.766 (Bonds—Statement describing nature of obligation—Pledge of excise taxes);

(93) RCW 47.10.767 (Bonds—Designation of funds to repay bonds and interest);

(94) RCW 47.10.768 (Bonds—Pledge of federal aid funds);

(95) RCW 47.10.769 (Bonds—Repayment procedure—Bond retirement fund);

(96) RCW 47.10.770 (Bonds—Sums in excess of retirement requirements—Use); and

(97) RCW 47.10.771 (Bonds—Appropriation from motor vehicle fund).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 37.14.010 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms, etc);

(2) RCW 37.14.020 (Anticipation notes—Proceeds of bonds and notes);

(3) RCW 37.14.030 (Administration of proceeds);

(4) RCW 37.14.040 (Retirement of bonds from Indian cultural center construction bond redemption fund—Source—Remedies of bond holders);

(5) RCW 37.14.050 (Legal investment for public funds); and

(6) RCW 37.14.900 (Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 128).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 70.48.270 (Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds);

(2) RCW 70.48.280 (Proceeds of bond sale—Deposits—Administration);

(3) RCW 70.48.310 (Jail renovation bond retirement fund—Debt-limit general fund bond retirement account);

(4) RCW 70.48.320 (Bonds legal investments for public funds);

(5) RCW 72.19.070 (General obligation bond issue to provide buildings—Authorized—Form, terms, etc);

(6) RCW 72.19.100 (General obligation bond issue to provide buildings—Bond redemption fund—Payment from sales tax);

(7) RCW 72.19.110 (General obligation bond issue to provide buildings—Legislature may provide additional means of revenue);

(8) RCW 72.19.120 (General obligation bond issue to provide buildings—Bonds legal investment for state and municipal corporation funds);

(9) RCW 72.19.130 (Referral to electorate);

(10) RCW 70.48A.010 (Legislative declaration);

(11) RCW 70.48A.020 (Bond issue authorized—Appropriations);

(12) RCW 70.48A.030 (Proceeds from bond sale—Deposit, use);

(13) RCW 70.48A.040 (Proceeds from bond sale—Administration);

(14) RCW 70.48A.050 (Bonds—Minimum sale price);

(15) RCW 70.48A.060 (Bonds—State's full faith and credit pledged);

(16) RCW 70.48A.070 (Bonds—Payment of interest, retirement);

(17) RCW 70.48A.080 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(18) RCW 70.48A.090 (Legislative intent); and

(19) RCW 70.48A.900 (Severability—1981 c 131).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 43.83.010 (Limited obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, form, payment, etc.—Continuation of tax levy);

(2) RCW 43.83.030 (Limited obligation bonds—Retirement from state building construction bond redemption fund—Retail sales tax collections, continuation of levy);

(3) RCW 43.83.040 (Limited obligation bonds—Legislature may provide additional means of raising revenue);

(4) RCW 43.83.050 (Limited obligation bonds—Bonds are negotiable, legal investment and security);

(5) RCW 43.83.060 (Limited obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, form, payment, etc.—Continuation of tax levy);

(6) RCW 43.83.062 (Limited obligation bonds—Proceeds to be deposited in state building construction account—Use);

(7) RCW 43.83.064 (Limited obligation bonds—Retirement from state building construction bond redemption fund—Retail sales tax collections, continuation of levy);

(8) RCW 43.83.066 (Limited obligation bonds—Legislature may provide additional means of raising revenue);

(9) RCW 43.83.068 (Limited obligation bonds—Bonds are negotiable, legal investment and security);

(10) RCW 43.83.070 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, form, payment, etc);

(11) RCW 43.83.074 (General obligation bonds—Retirement from state building and higher education bond redemption fund—Retail sales tax collections, continuation of levy);

(12) RCW 43.83.076 (General obligation bonds—Legislature may provide additional means of raising revenue);

(13) RCW 43.83.078 (General obligation bonds—Legal investment for state and local funds);

(14) RCW 43.83.082 (General obligation bonds—Capital improvement and capital project defined);

(15) RCW 43.83.084 (General obligation bonds—Referral to electorate);

(16) RCW 43.83.090 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, form, payment, etc);

(17) RCW 43.83.094 (General obligation bonds—Retirement from state building and higher education bond redemption fund—Retail sales tax collections, continuation of levy);

(18) RCW 43.83.096 (General obligation bonds—Legislature may provide additional means of raising revenue);

(19) RCW 43.83.098 (General obligation bonds—Legal investment for state and local funds);

(20) RCW 43.83.102 (General obligation bonds—Capital improvement and capital project defined);

(21) RCW 43.83.104 (General obligation bonds—Referral to electorate);

(22) RCW 43.83.110 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance—Payment);

(23) RCW 43.83.112 (General obligation bonds—Powers and duties of state finance committee);

(24) RCW 43.83.114 (General obligation bonds—Anticipation notes—Proceeds);

(25) RCW 43.83.116 (General obligation bonds—Administration of proceeds from sale);

(26) RCW 43.83.118 (General obligation bonds—Payment from bond redemption fund—Procedure—General obligation of state);

(27) RCW 43.83.120 (General obligation bonds—Charges against state agencies to reimburse state general fund);

(28) RCW 43.83.122 (General obligation bonds—Legislature may provide additional means for payment);

(29) RCW 43.83.124 (General obligation bonds—Legal investment for state and other public bodies);

(30) RCW 43.83.126 (Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 217);

(31) RCW 43.83.130 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance—Payment);

(32) RCW 43.83.132 (General obligation bonds—Powers and duties of state finance committee);

(33) RCW 43.83.134 (General obligation bonds—Anticipation notes—Proceeds);

(34) RCW 43.83.136 (General obligation bonds—Administration of proceeds from sale);

(35) RCW 43.83.138 (General obligation bonds—Payment from bond redemption fund—Procedure);

(36) RCW 43.83.140 (General obligation bonds—General obligation of state);

(37) RCW 43.83.142 (General obligation bonds—Charges against state agencies to reimburse state general fund);

(38) RCW 43.83.144 (General obligation bonds—Legislature may provide additional means for payment);

(39) RCW 43.83.146 (General obligation bonds—Legal investment for state and other public bodies);

(40) RCW 43.83.148 (Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 249);

(41) RCW 43.83.150 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms—Appropriation required);

(42) RCW 43.83.152 (Form, terms, conditions, etc., of bonds);

(43) RCW 43.83.154 (Bond anticipation notes—Deposit of proceeds of bonds and notes in state building construction account and state general obligation bond retirement fund);

(44) RCW 43.83.156 (Administration of proceeds);

(45) RCW 43.83.158 (Retirement of bonds from state general obligation bond retirement fund—Pledge and promise—Remedies of bondholders);

(46) RCW 43.83.160 (State general obligation bond retirement fund created—Trust fund for retirement of state general obligation bonds—Use of designated bond retirement accounts);

(47) RCW 43.83.162 (Separate accounting records required for each issue of bonds);

(48) RCW 43.83.164 (Payment on certain bonds from state general obligation bond retirement fund prohibited);

(49) RCW 43.83.166 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(50) RCW 43.83.168 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(51) RCW 43.83.170 (Severability—1979 ex.s. c 230);

(52) RCW 43.83.172 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms, etc.—Appropriation required);

(53) RCW 43.83.174 (Deposit of proceeds in state building construction account—Use);

(54) RCW 43.83.176 (Administration of proceeds);

(55) RCW 43.83.178 (Retirement of bonds from state general obligation bond retirement fund—Pledge and promise—Remedies of bondholders);

(56) RCW 43.83.180 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(57) RCW 43.83.182 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(58) RCW 43.83.184 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance—Appropriation required);

(59) RCW 43.83.186 (Deposit of proceeds in state building construction account—Use);

(60) RCW 43.83.188 (Administration of proceeds);

(61) RCW 43.83.190 (Retirement of bonds from state general obligation bond retirement fund—Pledge and promise—Remedies of bondholders);

(62) RCW 43.83.192 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(63) RCW 43.83.194 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(64) RCW 43.83.196 (Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 54);

(65) RCW 43.83.198 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance—Price—Appropriation required);

(66) RCW 43.83.200 (Deposit of proceeds in state building construction account—Use);

(67) RCW 43.83.202 (Administration of proceeds);

(68) RCW 43.83.204 (Retirement of bonds from state general obligation bond retirement fund—Pledge and promise—Remedies of bondholders);

(69) RCW 43.83.206 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(70) RCW 43.83.208 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(71) RCW 43.83.210 (Severability—1984 c 271);

(72) RCW 43.99G.010 (General obligation bonds authorized—Terms—Appropriation required—Short-term obligations);

(73) RCW 43.99G.030 (Retirement of bonds from debt-limit general fund bond retirement account);

(74) RCW 43.99G.040 (Retirement of bonds from nondebt-limit reimbursable bond retirement account);

(75) RCW 43.99G.050 (Retirement of bonds from debt-limit general fund bond retirement account);

(76) RCW 43.99G.060 (Pledge and promise—Remedies of bondholders);

(77) RCW 43.99G.070 (Institutions of higher education—Apportionment of principal and interest payments—Transfer of moneys to general fund);

(78) RCW 43.99G.080 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(79) RCW 43.99G.090 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(80) RCW 43.99G.100 (General obligation bonds authorized—Terms—Appropriation required—Short-term obligations);

(81) RCW 43.99G.102 (Conditions and limitations—Deposit of proceeds—Administration);

(82) RCW 43.99G.104 (Retirement of bonds from debt-limit general fund bond retirement account);

(83) RCW 43.99G.108 (Pledge and promise—Remedies of bondholders);

(84) RCW 43.99G.112 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(85) RCW 43.99G.114 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(86) RCW 43.99G.900 (Severability—1985 ex.s. c 4); and

(87) RCW 43.99G.901 (Severability—1987 1st ex.s. c 3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 43.31.956 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms, conditions, etc.—Appropriation required—Pledge and promise—Seal);

(2) RCW 43.31.960 (Administration of proceeds);

(3) RCW 43.31.962 (Retirement of bonds from cultural facilities bond redemption fund of 1979—Retirement of bonds from state general obligation bond retirement fund—Remedies of bondholders); and

(4) RCW 43.31.964 (Bonds legal investment for public funds).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 43.83C.010 (Declaration);

(2) RCW 43.83C.020 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms—Appropriation required);

(3) RCW 43.83C.040 (Administration of proceeds—Division into shares—Use of funds);

(4) RCW 43.83C.050 (Definitions);

(5) RCW 43.83C.060 (Referral to electorate);

(6) RCW 43.83C.070 (Form, terms, conditions, etc., of bonds);

(7) RCW 43.83C.080 (Anticipation notes—Pledge and promise—Seal);

(8) RCW 43.83C.090 (Retirement of bonds from recreation improvements bond redemption fund—Retail sales tax collections—Remedies of bond holders);

(9) RCW 43.83C.100 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(10) RCW 43.83C.110 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(11) RCW 43.99A.010 (Declaration of purpose);

(12) RCW 43.99A.020 (General obligation bonds authorized);

(13) RCW 43.99A.030 (Form of bonds—Rate of interest—Sale and issuance);

(14) RCW 43.99A.040 (Full faith and credit of state pledged—Call prior to due date—Facsimile signatures);

(15) RCW 43.99A.050 (Disposition of proceeds of sale);

(16) RCW 43.99A.060 (Outdoor recreational bond redemption fund of 1967—Created—Use—Sales tax revenues deposited in);

(17) RCW 43.99A.070 (Proceeds from sale of bonds—Administration—Disposition and use);

(18) RCW 43.99A.080 (Construction of phrase "acquisition and development of outdoor recreational areas and facilities.");

(19) RCW 43.99A.090 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(20) RCW 43.99A.100 (Bonds legal investment for funds of state and municipal corporations);

(21) RCW 43.99A.110 (Referral to electorate);

(22) RCW 43.99B.010 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms—Appropriation required);

(23) RCW 43.99B.012 (Form, terms, conditions, etc., of bonds);

(24) RCW 43.99B.014 (Proceeds to be deposited in outdoor recreation account);

(25) RCW 43.99B.016 (Administration of proceeds);

(26) RCW 43.99B.018 (Retirement of bonds from outdoor recreational bond redemption fund of 1979—Retirement of bonds from general obligation bond retirement fund—Pledge and promise—Remedies of bondholders);

(27) RCW 43.99B.020 (Definitions);

(28) RCW 43.99B.022 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(29) RCW 43.99B.024 (Legal investment for public funds);

(30) RCW 43.99B.026 (Severability—1979 ex.s. c 229);

(31) RCW 43.99B.028 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale terms—Appropriation required);

(32) RCW 43.99B.030 (Proceeds to be deposited in outdoor recreation account—Use);

(33) RCW 43.99B.032 (Administration of proceeds);

(34) RCW 43.99B.034 (Retirement of bonds from state general obligation bond retirement fund—Pledge and promise—Remedies of bondholders);

(35) RCW 43.99B.036 (Definitions);

(36) RCW 43.99B.038 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(37) RCW 43.99B.040 (Legal investment for public funds);

(38) RCW 43.99B.042 (Severability—1981 c 236);

(39) RCW 79A.10.010 (General obligation bonds authorized);

(40) RCW 79A.10.020 (Disposition of proceeds of sale);

(41) RCW 79A.10.030 (Bonds payable from proceeds of corporation fees);

(42) RCW 79A.10.040 (Outdoor recreational bond redemption fund);

(43) RCW 79A.10.050 (Remedies of bondholders);

(44) RCW 79A.10.060 (Legislature may provide additional means of support);

(45) RCW 79A.10.070 (Bonds legal investment for funds of state and municipal corporations); and

(46) RCW 79A.10.090 (Consent of world fair bondholders prerequisite to issuance of bonds authorized by this chapter).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 77.90.010 (General obligation bonds authorized—Purpose—Terms—Appropriation required);

(2) RCW 77.90.020 (Administration of proceeds);

(3) RCW 77.90.030 ("Facilities" defined);

(4) RCW 77.90.040 (Form, terms, conditions, etc., of bonds);

(5) RCW 77.90.050 (Anticipation notes—Authorized—Payment of principal and interest on bonds and notes);

(6) RCW 77.90.060 (Salmon enhancement construction bond retirement fund—Created—Purpose);

(7) RCW 77.90.070 (Availability of sufficient revenue required before bonds issued); and

(8) RCW 77.90.080 (Bonds legal investment for public funds).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 43.83D.010 (Declaration);

(2) RCW 43.83D.020 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms—Appropriation required);

(3) RCW 43.83D.030 (Proceeds to be deposited in state and local improvements revolving account);

(4) RCW 43.83D.040 (Administration of proceeds—Comprehensive plan—Use of funds);

(5) RCW 43.83D.050 (Definitions);

(6) RCW 43.83D.060 (Referral to electorate);

(7) RCW 43.83D.070 (Form, terms, conditions, etc., of bonds);

(8) RCW 43.83D.080 (Anticipation notes—Pledge and promise—Seal);

(9) RCW 43.83D.090 (Retirement of bonds from social and health service facilities bond redemption fund—Retail sales tax collections—Remedies of bond holders);

(10) RCW 43.83D.100 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(11) RCW 43.83D.110 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(12) RCW 43.83H.010 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms, etc);

(13) RCW 43.83H.020 ("Social and health services facilities" defined);

(14) RCW 43.83H.040 (Administration of proceeds);

(15) RCW 43.83H.050 (Retirement of bonds from social and health services construction bond redemption fund—Source—Remedies of bond holders);

(16) RCW 43.83H.060 (Legal investment for public funds);

(17) RCW 43.83H.100 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms, etc);

(18) RCW 43.83H.110 ("Social and health services facilities" defined);

(19) RCW 43.83H.120 (Anticipation notes—Proceeds of bonds and notes);

(20) RCW 43.83H.130 (Administration of proceeds);

(21) RCW 43.83H.140 (Retirement of bonds from social and health services construction bond redemption fund of 1976—Source—Remedies of bond holders);

(22) RCW 43.83H.150 (Legal investment for public funds);

(23) RCW 43.83H.160 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms, etc.—Pledge and promise);

(24) RCW 43.83H.162 ("Social and health services facilities" defined);

(25) RCW 43.83H.164 (Bond anticipation notes—Deposit of proceeds of bonds and notes in social and health services construction account and social and health services bond redemption fund of 1979);

(26) RCW 43.83H.166 (Administration of proceeds);

(27) RCW 43.83H.168 (Retirement of bonds and notes from social and health services bond redemption fund of 1979—Retirement of bonds and notes from state general obligation bond retirement fund—Remedies of bondholders);

(28) RCW 43.83H.170 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(29) RCW 43.83H.172 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance—Pledge and promise);

(30) RCW 43.83H.174 ("Social and health services facilities" defined);

(31) RCW 43.83H.176 (Deposit of proceeds in state social and health services construction account—Use);

(32) RCW 43.83H.178 (Administration of proceeds);

(33) RCW 43.83H.180 (Retirement of bonds from state general obligation bond retirement fund—Remedies of bondholders);

(34) RCW 43.83H.182 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(35) RCW 43.83H.184 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance—Price—Appropriation required);

(36) RCW 43.83H.186 (Deposit of proceeds in state social and health services construction account—Use);

(37) RCW 43.83H.188 (Administration of proceeds);

(38) RCW 43.83H.190 (Retirement of bonds from state general obligation bond retirement fund—Pledge and promise—Remedies of bondholders);

(39) RCW 43.83H.192 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(40) RCW 43.83H.194 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(41) RCW 43.83H.900 (Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 125);

(42) RCW 43.83H.910 (Severability—1977 ex.s. c 342);

(43) RCW 43.83H.912 (Severability—1979 ex.s. c 252);

(44) RCW 43.83H.914 (Severability—1981 c 234); and

(45) RCW 43.83H.915 (Severability—1984 c 269).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 43.75.200 (General obligation bonds—Refunding—Amount—Authority of state finance committee to issue);

(2) RCW 43.75.205 (General obligation bonds—Form, terms, covenants, etc.—Sale—Redemption);

(3) RCW 43.75.215 (General obligation bonds—Redemption—Enforcement);

(4) RCW 43.75.230 (Legislature may provide additional means for paying bonds);

(5) RCW 43.75.235 (Bonds legal investment for state and other public body funds);

(6) RCW 43.75.900 (Severability—1973 c 9); and

(7) RCW 43.75.910 (Effective date—1973 c 9).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 47.02.020 (Issuance and sale of limited obligation bonds);

(2) RCW 47.02.030 (Bonds—Term—Terms and conditions);

(3) RCW 47.02.040 (Bonds—Signatures—Registration—Where payable—Negotiable instruments);

(4) RCW 47.02.050 (Bonds—Denominations—Manner and terms of sale—Legal investment for state funds);

(5) RCW 47.02.060 (Bonds—Bond proceeds—Deposit and use);

(6) RCW 47.02.070 (Bonds—Statement describing nature of obligation—Pledge of excise taxes);

(7) RCW 47.02.080 (Bonds—Designation of funds to repay bonds and interest);

(8) RCW 47.02.090 (Bonds—Repayment procedure—Highway bond retirement fund);

(9) RCW 47.02.100 (Bonds—Sums in excess of retirement requirements—Use); and

(10) RCW 47.02.110 (Bonds—Appropriation from motor vehicle fund).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 28B.20.750 (Hospital project bonds—State general obligation bonds in lieu of revenue bonds);

(2) RCW 28B.20.751 (Hospital project bonds—Amount authorized);

(3) RCW 28B.20.752 (Hospital project bonds—Bond anticipation notes, authorized, payment);

(4) RCW 28B.20.753 (Hospital project bonds—Form, terms, conditions, sale, and covenants for bonds and notes);

(5) RCW 28B.20.754 (Hospital project bonds—Disposition of proceeds);

(6) RCW 28B.20.755 (Hospital project bonds—Administration of proceeds from bonds and notes);

(7) RCW 28B.20.756 (Hospital project bonds—1975 University of Washington hospital bond retirement fund, created, purpose);

(8) RCW 28B.20.757 (Hospital project bonds—Regents to accumulate moneys for bond payments);

(9) RCW 28B.20.758 (Hospital project bonds—As legal investment for public funds); and

(10) RCW 28B.20.759 (Hospital project bonds—Prerequisite to issuance).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 28B.30.600 (Tree fruit research center facility, financing—Bonds, authorization conditional—Amount—Discharge);

(2) RCW 28B.30.602 (Tree fruit research center facility, financing—Bonds, committee to control issuance, sale and retirement of);

(3) RCW 28B.30.604 (Tree fruit research center facility, financing—Anticipation notes authorized—Use of proceeds);

(4) RCW 28B.30.606 (Tree fruit research center facility, financing—Administration of proceeds from sale of bonds or notes—Investment of surplus funds);

(5) RCW 28B.30.608 (Tree fruit research center facility, financing—Security for bonds issued);

(6) RCW 28B.30.610 (Tree fruit research center facility, financing—Office-laboratory facilities bond redemption fund created, use);

(7) RCW 28B.30.612 (Tree fruit research center facility, financing—Rights of owner and holder of bonds);

(8) RCW 28B.30.614 (Tree fruit research center facility, financing—Lease agreement prerequisite to sale of bonds—Disposition of lease payments);

(9) RCW 28B.30.616 (Tree fruit research center facility, financing—Bonds, legislature may provide additional means for payment);

(10) RCW 28B.30.618 (Tree fruit research center facility, financing—Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(11) RCW 28B.30.619 (Tree fruit research center facility, financing—Appropriation);

(12) RCW 28B.30.620 (Tree fruit research center facility, financing—Alternatives authorized);

(13) RCW 28B.31.010 (Purpose—Bonds authorized—Amount—Payment);

(14) RCW 28B.31.020 (Bond anticipation notes—Authorized—Bond proceeds to apply to payment on);

(15) RCW 28B.31.030 (Form, terms, conditions, sale and covenants of bonds and notes—Pledge of state's credit);

(16) RCW 28B.31.050 (Administration of proceeds from bonds and notes);

(17) RCW 28B.31.060 (Washington State University bond retirement fund of 1977—Created—Purpose—Payment of interest and principal on bonds and notes);

(18) RCW 28B.31.070 (Transfer of moneys to state general fund from Washington State University building account);

(19) RCW 28B.31.080 (Bonds as legal investment for public funds);

(20) RCW 28B.31.090 (Prerequisite to bond issuance); and

(21) RCW 28B.31.100 (Chapter not to repeal, override, or limit other statutes or actions—Transfers under RCW 28B.31.070 as subordinate).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 43.83A.010 (Declaration);

(2) RCW 43.83A.020 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms—Appropriation required);

(3) RCW 43.83A.040 (Administration of proceeds—Use of funds—Integration of disposal systems);

(4) RCW 43.83A.050 (Definitions);

(5) RCW 43.83A.060 (Referral to electorate);

(6) RCW 43.83A.070 (Form, terms, conditions, etc., of bonds);

(7) RCW 43.83A.080 (Anticipation notes—Pledge and promise—Seal);

(8) RCW 43.83A.090 (Retirement of bonds from waste disposal facilities bond redemption fund—Retail sales tax collections—Remedies of bond holders—Debt-limit general fund bond retirement account);

(9) RCW 43.83A.100 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(10) RCW 43.83A.110 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(11) RCW 43.83A.900 (Appropriation);

(12) RCW 43.99F.010 (Declaration);

(13) RCW 43.99F.020 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms—Appropriation required);

(14) RCW 43.99F.040 (Administration of proceeds);

(15) RCW 43.99F.050 (Definitions);

(16) RCW 43.99F.060 (Form, terms, conditions, etc., of bonds);

(17) RCW 43.99F.070 (Anticipation notes—Payment—Pledge and promise—Seal);

(18) RCW 43.99F.080 (Retirement of bonds from waste disposal facilities bond redemption fund—Remedies of bondholders—Debt-limit general fund bond retirement account);

(19) RCW 43.99F.090 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(20) RCW 43.99F.100 (Bonds legal investment for public funds); and

(21) RCW 43.99F.110 (Referral to electorate).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 90.50.010 (Bond issue—Authorized);

(2) RCW 90.50.030 (Bond proceeds—Administration);

(3) RCW 90.50.040 (Water pollution control facilities bond redemption fund—Bonds payable from sales tax revenues—Remedies of bondholders);

(4) RCW 90.50.050 (Legislature may provide additional means for bond payment);

(5) RCW 90.50.060 (Bonds legal investment for state and municipal corporation funds);

(6) RCW 90.50.080 (Definitions); and

(7) RCW 90.50.900 (Referral of act to electorate).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 43.83B.010 (Declaration);

(2) RCW 43.83B.020 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms—Appropriation required);

(3) RCW 43.83B.030 (Proceeds to be deposited in state and local improvements revolving account);

(4) RCW 43.83B.040 (Administration of proceeds—Use of funds);

(5) RCW 43.83B.050 (Definitions);

(6) RCW 43.83B.060 (Referral to electorate);

(7) RCW 43.83B.070 (Form, terms, conditions, etc., of bonds);

(8) RCW 43.83B.080 (Anticipation notes—Pledge and promise—Seal);

(9) RCW 43.83B.090 (Retirement of bonds from water supply facilities bond redemption fund—Retail sales tax collections—Remedies of bond holders);

(10) RCW 43.83B.100 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(11) RCW 43.83B.110 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(12) RCW 43.83B.355 (Form, sale, conditions, etc., of bonds—"Water supply facilities for water withdrawal and distribution" defined);

(13) RCW 43.83B.365 (Administration of proceeds from sale of bonds);

(14) RCW 43.83B.370 (Retirement of bonds and notes from emergency water projects bond redemption fund—Remedies of bond holders);

(15) RCW 43.83B.375 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(16) RCW 43.99D.005 (Transfer of duties to the department of health);

(17) RCW 43.99D.010 (Declaration);

(18) RCW 43.99D.015 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms—Appropriation required);

(19) RCW 43.99D.020 (Proceeds to be deposited in state and local improvements revolving account—Water supply facilities);

(20) RCW 43.99D.025 (Administration of proceeds—Use of funds);

(21) RCW 43.99D.030 (Definitions);

(22) RCW 43.99D.035 (Form, terms, conditions, etc., of bonds);

(23) RCW 43.99D.040 (Anticipation notes—Payment—Pledge and promise—Seal);

(24) RCW 43.99D.045 (Retirement of bonds from 1979 water supply facilities bond redemption fund—Retirement of bonds from state general obligation bond retirement fund—Remedies of bondholders);

(25) RCW 43.99D.050 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(26) RCW 43.99D.055 (Bonds legal investment for public funds);

(27) RCW 43.99D.900 (Severability—1979 ex.s. c 258);

(28) RCW 43.99E.005 (Transfer of duties to the department of health);

(29) RCW 43.99E.010 (Declaration);

(30) RCW 43.99E.015 (General obligation bonds—Authorized—Issuance, sale, terms—Appropriation required);

(31) RCW 43.99E.025 (Administration of proceeds);

(32) RCW 43.99E.030 (Definitions);

(33) RCW 43.99E.035 (Form, terms, conditions, etc., of bonds);

(34) RCW 43.99E.040 (Anticipation notes—Payment—Pledge and promise—Seal);

(35) RCW 43.99E.045 (Retirement of bonds from public water supply facilities bond redemption fund—Remedies of bondholders—Debt-limit general fund bond retirement account);

(36) RCW 43.99E.050 (Legislature may provide additional means for payment of bonds);

(37) RCW 43.99E.055 (Bonds legal investment for public funds); and

(38) RCW 43.99E.900 (Severability—1979 ex.s. c 234).

Sec. 24. RCW 28A.525.200 and 2006 c 263 s 320 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 28A.525.010 through ((28A.525.222)) 28A.525.200, the allocation and distribution of funds by the superintendent of public instruction, considering policy recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel, for the purposes of providing assistance in the construction of school plant facilities shall be governed by this chapter.

Sec. 25. RCW 28B.10.851 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

The proceeds from ((the sale of the bonds authorized herein, together with)) all grants, donations, transferred funds and all other moneys which the state finance committee may direct the state treasurer to deposit therein shall be deposited in the state higher education construction account hereby created in the state treasury.

Sec. 26. RCW 28B.14D.040 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The proceeds from ((the sale of the bonds authorized in this chapter, together with)) all grants, donations, transferred funds, and all other moneys which the state finance committee or the board of regents or board of trustees of any of the state institutions of higher education may direct the state treasurer to deposit therein, shall be deposited in the higher education construction account hereby created in the state treasury.

Sec. 27. RCW 35.21.900 and 2006 c 35 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Cities are authorized to transfer real property pursuant to RCW 43.99C.070 and 43.83D.120 (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 28. RCW 35A.40.050 and 2007 c 64 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Excess and inactive funds on hand in the treasury of any code city may be invested in the same manner and subject to the same limitations as provided for city and town funds in all applicable statutes, including, but not limited to the following: RCW 35.39.030, 35.58.510, 35.81.070, 35.82.070, 36.29.020, 39.58.020, 39.58.080, 39.58.130, 39.60.010, 39.60.020, 41.16.040, 68.52.060, and 68.52.065((, and 72.19.120)).

The responsibility for determining the amount of money available in each fund for investment purposes shall be placed upon the department, division, or board responsible for the administration of such fund.

Moneys thus determined available for this purpose may be invested on an individual fund basis or may, unless otherwise restricted by law be commingled within one common investment portfolio for the mutual benefit of all participating funds: PROVIDED, That if such moneys are commingled in a common investment portfolio, all income derived therefrom shall be apportioned among the various participating funds or the general or current expense fund as the governing body of the code city determines by ordinance or resolution.

Any excess or inactive funds on hand in the city treasury not otherwise invested for the specific benefit of any particular fund, may be invested by the city treasurer in United States government bonds, notes, bills or certificates of indebtedness for the benefit of the general or current expense fund.

Sec. 29. RCW 35A.79.020 and 2006 c 35 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Code cities are authorized to transfer real property pursuant to RCW 43.99C.070 and 43.83D.120 (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 30. RCW 41.16.040 and 2007 c 218 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall have such general powers as are vested in it by the provisions of this chapter, and in addition thereto, the power to:

(1) Generally supervise and control the administration of this chapter and the firefighters' pension fund created hereby.

(2) Pass upon and allow or disallow all applications for pensions or other benefits provided by this chapter.

(3) Provide for payment from said fund of necessary expenses of maintenance and administration of said pension system and fund.

(4) Invest the moneys of the fund in a manner consistent with the investment policies outlined in RCW 35.39.060. Authorized investments shall include investment grade securities issued by the United States, state, municipal corporations, other public bodies, corporate bonds, and other investments authorized by RCW 35.39.030, 35.58.510, 35.81.070, 35.82.070, 36.29.020, 39.58.020, 39.58.080, 39.58.130, 39.60.010, 39.60.020, 68.52.060, and 68.52.065((, and 72.19.120)).

(5) Employ such agents, employees and other personnel as the board may deem necessary for the proper administration of this chapter.

(6) Compel witnesses to appear and testify before it, in the same manner as is or may be provided by law for the taking of depositions in the superior court. Any member of the board may administer oaths to witnesses who testify before the board of a nature and in a similar manner to oaths administered by superior courts of the state of Washington.

(7) Issue vouchers approved by the chairperson and secretary and to cause warrants therefor to be issued and paid from said fund for the payment of claims allowed by it.

(8) Keep a record of all its proceedings, which record shall be public; and prepare and file with the city treasurer and city clerk or comptroller prior to the date when any payments are to be made from the fund, a list of all persons entitled to payment from the fund, stating the amount and purpose of such payment, said list to be certified to and signed by the chairperson and secretary of the board and attested under oath.

(9) Make rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter for the purpose of carrying out and effecting the same.

(10) Appoint one or more duly licensed and practicing physicians who shall examine and report to the board upon all applications for relief and pension under this chapter. Such physicians shall visit and examine all sick firefighters and firefighters who are disabled when, in their judgment, the best interests of the relief and pension fund require it or when ordered by the board. They shall perform all operations on such sick and injured firefighters and render all medical aid and care necessary for the recovery of such firefighters on account of sickness or disability received while in the performance of duty as defined in this chapter. Such physicians shall be paid from said fund, the amount of said fees or salary to be set and agreed upon by the board and the physicians. No physician not regularly appointed or specially appointed and employed, as hereinafter provided, shall receive or be entitled to any fees or compensation from said fund as attending physician to a sick or injured firefighter. If any sick or injured firefighter refuses the services of the appointed physicians, or the specially appointed and employed physician, he or she shall be personally liable for the fees of any other physician employed by him or her. No person shall have a right of action against the board or the municipality for negligence of any physician employed by it. The board shall have the power and authority to select and employ, besides the regularly appointed physician, such other physician, surgeon or specialist for consultation with, or assistance to the regularly appointed physician, or for the purpose of performing operations or rendering services and treatment in particular cases, as it shall deem advisable, and to pay fees for such services from said fund. Said board shall hear and decide all applications for such relief or pensions under this chapter, and its decisions on such applications shall be final and conclusive and not subject to revision or reversal except by the board.

Sec. 31. RCW 43.70.900 and 2007 c 52 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

All references to the secretary or department of social and health services in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary or department of health when referring to the functions transferred in RCW 43.70.080, 18.104.005, ((43.83B.005, 43.99D.005, 43.99E.005,)) 70.08.005, 70.22.005, 70.24.005, 70.40.005, 70.41.005, and 70.54.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32. RCW 43.75.225 is decodified.

Sec. 33. RCW 43.83.020 and 2004 c 276 s 907 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized herein shall be deposited in the)) state building construction account ((which)) is hereby established in the state treasury and shall be used exclusively for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of the capital appropriation acts((, and for payment of the expense incurred in the printing, issuance, and sale of such bonds)).

(2) During the 2003-2005 biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the state building construction account to the conservation assistance revolving account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 34. RCW 43.83A.030 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

((The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter shall be deposited in)) (1) The state and local improvements revolving account is hereby created in the state treasury and shall be used exclusively for the purpose ((specified in this chapter and for payment of the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds)) of providing funds for the planning, acquisition, construction, and improvement of public waste disposal facilities in this state.

(2) As used in this section the phrase "public waste disposal facilities" shall not include the acquisition of equipment used to collect, carry, and transport garbage.

(3) As used in this section, the term "waste disposal facilities" shall mean any facilities or systems owned or operated by a public body for the collection, storage, treatment, disposal, recycling, control, or recovery of liquid wastes or solid wastes, including, but not limited to, sanitary sewage, storm water, residential, industrial, and commercial wastes, material segregated into recyclables and nonrecyclables, and any combination of such wastes; and all equipment, utilities, structures, real property, and interests in and improvements on real property, necessary for or incidental to such purpose.

(4) As used in this section, the term "public body" means the state of Washington or any agency, political subdivision, taxing district, or municipal corporation thereof, and those Indian tribes now or hereafter recognized as such by the federal government for participation in the federal land and water conservation program and which may constitutionally receive grants or loans from the state of Washington.

Sec. 35. RCW 43.83D.120 and 2006 c 35 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Public bodies((, as defined in RCW 43.83D.050,)) may transfer without further consideration real property and facilities acquired, constructed, or otherwise improved under ((this chapter)) the social and health services facilities 1972 bond issue to nonprofit corporations organized to provide individuals with social and health services, in exchange for the promise to continually operate services benefiting the public on the site, subject to all the conditions in this section. For purposes of this section, "transfer" may include lease renewals. The nonprofit corporation shall use the real property and facilities for the purpose of providing the following programs as designated by the department of social and health services: Facilities for social services, adult and juvenile correction or detention, child welfare, day care, drug abuse and alcoholism treatment, mental health, public health, developmental disabilities, and vocational rehabilitation.

(2) The deed transferring the property in subsection (1) of this section must provide for immediate reversion back to the public body if the nonprofit corporation ceases to use the property for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The nonprofit corporation is authorized to sell the property transferred to it pursuant to subsection (1) of this section only if all of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) Any such sale must be subject to prior written approval by the department of social and health services; (b) all proceeds from such a sale must be applied to the purchase price of a different property or properties of equal or greater value than the original property; (c) any new property or properties must be used for the purposes stated in subsection (1) of this section; (d) the new property or properties must be available for use within one year of sale; and (e) the nonprofit corporation must enter into an agreement with the public entity to reimburse the public entity for the value of the original property at the time of the sale if the nonprofit corporation ceases to use the new property for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) If the nonprofit corporation ceases to use the property for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section, the property and facilities revert immediately to the public body. The public body shall then determine if the property, or the reimbursed amount in the case of a reimbursement under subsection (3)(e) of this section, may be used by another program as designated by the department of social and health services. These programs have priority in obtaining the property to ensure that the purposes specified in ((this chapter)) the social and health services facilities 1972 bond issue are carried out.

(5) As used in this section, the term "public body" means the state of Washington, or any agency, political subdivision, taxing district, or municipal corporation thereof, and those Indian tribes now or hereafter recognized as such by the federal government for participation in the federal land and water conservation program and which may constitutionally receive grants or loans from the state of Washington.

Sec. 36. RCW 43.83H.030 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

((The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter shall be deposited in)) (1) The state social and health services construction account is hereby created in the state treasury and shall be used exclusively for the ((purposes specified in this chapter and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of such bonds)) purpose of providing needed capital improvements consisting of the planning, acquisition, construction, remodeling, improving, and equipping of social and health services facilities.

(2) As used in this section, the term "social and health services facilities" shall include, without limitation, facilities for use in veterans' service programs, adult correction programs, juvenile rehabilitation programs, mental health programs, and developmental disabilities programs for which an appropriation is made from the social and health services construction account in the general fund by chapter 276, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess., the capital appropriations act, or subsequent capital appropriations acts.

Sec. 37. RCW 43.83I.040 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 132 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

((Except for that portion of the proceeds required to pay bond anticipation notes pursuant to RCW 43.83I.020, the proceeds from the sale of the bonds and/or bond anticipation notes authorized in RCW 43.83I.010 through 43.83I.060, together with)) All grants, donations, transferred funds, and all other moneys which the state finance committee may direct the state treasurer to deposit therein, shall be deposited in the fisheries capital projects account of the general fund hereby created in the state treasury. All such proceeds shall be used exclusively for the ((purposes specified in RCW 43.83I.010 through 43.83I.060 and for the payment of the expenses incurred in connection with the sale and issuance of such bonds and bond anticipation notes)) purpose of providing needed capital improvements consisting of the acquisition, construction, remodeling, furnishing and equipping of state buildings and facilities for the department of fish and wildlife.

Sec. 38. RCW 43.99C.070 and 2006 c 35 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Public bodies((, as defined in RCW 43.99C.020,)) may transfer without further consideration real property and facilities acquired, constructed, or otherwise improved under ((this chapter)) the handicapped facilities 1979 bond issue to nonprofit corporations organized to provide services for individuals with physical or mental disabilities, in exchange for the promise to continually operate services benefiting the public on the site, subject to all the conditions in this section. For purposes of this section, "transfer" may include lease renewals. The nonprofit corporation shall use the real property and facilities for the purpose of providing the following limited programs as designated by the department of social and health services: Nonprofit community centers, close-to-home living units, employment and independent living training centers, vocational rehabilitation centers, developmental disabilities training centers, and community homes for individuals with mental illness.

(2) The deed transferring the property in subsection (1) of this section must provide for immediate reversion back to the public body if the nonprofit corporation ceases to use the property for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The nonprofit corporation is authorized to sell the property transferred to it pursuant to subsection (1) of this section only if all of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) Any such sale must have the prior written approval by the department of social and health services; (b) all proceeds from such a sale must be applied to the purchase price of a different property or properties of equal or greater value than the original property; (c) any new property or properties must be used for the purposes stated in subsection (1) of this section; (d) the new property or properties must be available for use within one year of sale; and (e) the nonprofit corporation must enter into an agreement with the public entity to reimburse the public entity for the value of the original property at the time of the sale if the nonprofit corporation ceases to use the new property for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) If the nonprofit corporation ceases to use the property for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section, the property and facilities revert immediately to the public body. The public body shall then determine if the property, or the reimbursed amount in the case of a reimbursement under subsection (3)(e) of this section, may be used by another program as designated by the department of social and health services. These programs have priority in obtaining the property to ensure that the purposes specified in ((this chapter)) the handicapped facilities 1979 bond issue are carried out.

(5) As used in this section, the term "public body" means the state of Washington, or any agency, political subdivision, taxing district, or municipal corporation thereof, and those Indian tribes now or hereafter recognized as such by the federal government for participation in the federal land and water conservation program and which may constitutionally receive grants or loans from the state of Washington.

Sec. 39. RCW 43.99E.020 and 1979 ex.s. c 234 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

((The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter shall be deposited in)) (1) The state and local improvements revolving account—water supply facilities is hereby created in the general fund and shall be used exclusively for the ((purpose specified in this chapter and for payment of the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds)) purpose of providing funds for the planning, acquisition, construction, and improvement of water supply facilities within the state.

(2) As used in this section, the term "water supply facilities" means domestic, municipal, industrial, and agricultural (and any associated fishery, recreational, or other beneficial use) water supply or distribution systems including, but not limited to, all equipment, utilities, structures, real property, and interests in and improvements on real property necessary for or incidental to the acquisition, construction, installation, or use of any such water supply or distribution system.

Sec. 40. RCW 43.99F.030 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

((The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter shall be deposited in)) (1) The state and local improvements revolving account, Waste Disposal Facilities, 1980 is hereby created in the state treasury and shall be used exclusively for the purpose ((specified in this chapter and for payment of the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds)) of providing funds to public bodies for the planning, design, acquisition, construction, and improvement of public waste disposal and management facilities, or for purposes of assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in waste disposal and management facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, in this state.

(2) "Waste disposal and management facilities" means any facilities or systems for the control, collection, storage, treatment, disposal, recycling, or recovery of nonradioactive liquid wastes or nonradioactive solid wastes, or a combination thereof, including, but not limited to, sanitary sewage, storm water, residential, industrial, commercial, and agricultural wastes, and concentrations of organic sediments waste, inorganic nutrients, and toxic materials which are causing environmental degradation and loss of the beneficial use of the environment, and material segregated into recyclables and nonrecyclables. Waste disposal and management facilities may include all equipment, utilities, structures, real property, and interest in and improvements on real property necessary for or incidental to such purpose. As used in this chapter, the phrase "waste disposal and management facilities" shall not include the acquisition of equipment used to collect residential or commercial garbage.

(3) "Public body" means the state of Washington or any agency, political subdivision, taxing district, or municipal corporation thereof, an agency of the federal government, and those Indian tribes now or hereafter recognized as such by the federal government.

(4) "Control" means those measures necessary to maintain and/or restore the beneficial uses of polluted land and water resources including, but not limited to, the diversion, sedimentation, flocculation, dredge and disposal, or containment or treatment of nutrients, organic waste, and toxic material to restore the beneficial use of the state's land and water resources and prevent the continued pollution of these resources.

(5) "Planning" means the development of comprehensive plans for the purpose of identifying statewide or regional needs for specific waste disposal facilities as well as the development of plans specific to a particular project.

Sec. 41. RCW 43.99G.020 and 2012 c 198 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

((Bonds issued under RCW 43.99G.010 are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) General obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of thirty-eight million fifty-four thousand dollars, or so much thereof as may be required, shall be issued for the purpose of providing funds for grants and loans to local governments and subdivisions of the state for capital projects through the community economic revitalization board and for the department of enterprise services, military department, parks and recreation commission, and department of corrections to acquire real property and perform capital projects which consist of the planning, designing, constructing, remodeling, repairing, furnishing, and equipping of state buildings, structures, utilities, roads, grounds, lands, and waters, and to provide for the administrative cost of such projects, including costs of bond issuance and retirement, salaries and related costs of officials and employees of the state, costs of insurance or credit enhancement agreements, and other expenses incidental to the administration of capital projects. The proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection shall be deposited in the state building construction account, shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this subsection and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection, and shall be administered by the department of enterprise services, subject to legislative appropriation.

(2) General obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of four million six hundred thirty-five thousand dollars, or so much thereof as may be required, shall be issued for the purpose of providing funds for the planning, design, acquisition, construction, and improvement of a Washington state agricultural trade center, and to provide for the administrative cost of such projects, including costs of bond issuance and retirement, salaries and related costs of officials and employees of the state, costs of insurance or credit enhancement agreements, and other expenses incidental to the administration of capital projects. The proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection shall be deposited in the state building construction account, shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this subsection and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection, and shall be administered as provided in the capital budget acts, subject to legislative appropriation.

(3) General obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of twenty-five million dollars, or so much thereof as may be required, shall be issued for the purpose of providing funds for the department of social and health services and the department of corrections to perform capital projects which consist of the planning, designing, constructing, remodeling, repairing, furnishing, and equipping of state buildings, structures, utilities, roads, and grounds, and to provide for the administrative cost of such projects, including costs of bond issuance and retirement, salaries and related costs of officials and employees of the state, costs of insurance or credit enhancement agreements, and other expenses incidental to the administration of capital projects. The proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection shall be deposited in the social and health services construction account, shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this subsection and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection, and shall be administered by the department of social and health services, subject to legislative appropriation.

(4) General obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of one million dollars, or so much thereof as may be required, shall be issued for the purpose of providing funds for the department of fish and wildlife to acquire real property and perform capital projects which consist of the planning, designing, constructing, remodeling, repairing, furnishing, and equipping of state buildings, structures, utilities, roads, grounds, lands, and waters, and to provide for the administrative cost of such projects, including costs of bond issuance and retirement, salaries and related costs of officials and employees of the state, costs of insurance or credit enhancement agreements, and other expenses incidental to the administration of capital projects. The proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection shall be deposited in the fisheries capital projects account, shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this subsection and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection, and shall be administered by the department of fisheries, subject to legislative appropriation.

(5) General obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of fifty-three million dollars, or so much thereof as may be required, shall be issued for the purpose of providing funds for state agencies and the institutions of higher education, including the community colleges, to perform capital renewal projects which consist of the planning, designing, constructing, remodeling, repairing, furnishing, and equipping of state buildings, structures, utilities, roads, grounds, lands, and waters, and to provide for the administrative cost of such projects, including costs of bond issuance and retirement, salaries and related costs of officials and employees of the state, costs of insurance or credit enhancement agreements, and other expenses incidental to the administration of capital projects. The proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection shall be deposited in the state building construction account, shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this subsection and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection, and shall be administered as provided in the capital budget acts, subject to legislative appropriation.

(6) General obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of twenty-two million dollars, or so much thereof as may be required, shall be issued for the purpose of providing funds for the University of Washington and the state community colleges to perform capital projects which consist of the planning, designing, constructing, remodeling, repairing, improving, furnishing, and equipping of state buildings, structures, utilities, roads, grounds, and lands, and to provide for the administrative cost of such projects, including costs of bond issuance and retirement, salaries and related costs of officials and employees of the state, costs of insurance or credit enhancement agreements, and other expenses incidental to the administration of capital projects. The proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection shall be deposited in))The higher education reimbursable short-term bond account is hereby created in the state treasury, ((shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this subsection and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection,)) and shall be administered by the University of Washington, subject to legislative appropriation. This account shall be used exclusively for the purpose of providing funds for the University of Washington and the state community colleges to perform capital projects which consist of the planning, designing, constructing, remodeling, repairing, improving, furnishing, and equipping of state buildings, structures, utilities, roads, grounds, and lands, and to provide for the administrative cost of such projects, including costs of bond issuance and retirement, salaries and related costs of officials and employees of the state, costs of insurance or credit enhancement agreements, and other expenses incidental to the administration of capital projects.

(((7) General obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of twenty-eight million dollars, or so much thereof as may be required, shall be issued for the purpose of providing funds for the institutions of higher education to perform capital projects which consist of the planning, designing, constructing, remodeling, repairing, furnishing, and equipping of state buildings, structures, utilities, roads, grounds, and lands, and to provide for the administrative cost of such projects, including costs of bond issuance and retirement, salaries and related costs of officials and employees of the state, costs of insurance or credit enhancement agreements, and other expenses incidental to the administration of capital projects. The proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection shall be deposited in the higher education construction account, shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this subsection and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection, and shall be administered by Washington State University, subject to legislative appropriation.

(8) General obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of seventy-five million dollars, or so much thereof as may be required, shall be issued for the purpose of providing funds for the institutions of higher education, including facilities for the community college system, to perform capital projects which consist of the planning, designing, constructing, remodeling, repairing, furnishing, and equipping of state buildings, structures, utilities, roads, grounds, and lands, and to provide for the administrative cost of such projects, including costs of bond issuance and retirement, salaries and related costs of officials and employees of the state, costs of insurance or credit enhancement agreements, and other expenses incidental to the administration of capital projects. The proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection, together with all grants, donations, transferred funds, and all other moneys which the state finance committee may direct the state treasurer to deposit therein, shall be deposited in the state higher education construction account in the state treasury and shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this subsection and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection.))

Sec. 42. RCW 43.99H.020 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 15 s 2 and 1990 c 33 s 582 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Bonds issued under RCW 43.99H.010 are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

General obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of one billion four hundred four million dollars, or so much thereof as may be required, shall be issued for the purposes described and authorized by the legislature in the capital and operating appropriations acts for the 1989-91 fiscal biennium and subsequent fiscal biennia, and to provide for the administrative cost of such projects, including costs of bond issuance and retirement, salaries and related costs of officials and employees of the state, costs of insurance or credit enhancement agreements, and other expenses incidental to the administration of capital projects, and to provide for reimbursement of bond-funded accounts from the 1987-89 fiscal biennium. Subject to such changes as may be required in the appropriations acts, the proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection shall be deposited in the state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020 and transferred as follows:

(1) Thirty million dollars to the state and local improvements revolving account—waste disposal facilities, created by RCW 43.83A.030 (as recodified by this act), to be used for the purposes described in RCW 43.83A.020 (as recodified by this act);

(2) Five million three hundred thousand dollars to the salmon enhancement construction account created by RCW 75.48.030;

(3) One hundred twenty million dollars to the state and local improvements revolving account—waste disposal facilities, 1980 created by RCW 43.99F.030 (as recodified by this act), to be used for the purposes described in ((RCW 43.99F.020)) RCW 43.99F.030 (as recodified by this act);

(4) Forty million dollars to the common school construction fund as referenced in RCW 28A.515.320.

(5) Three million two hundred thousand dollars to the state higher education construction account created by RCW 28B.10.851 (as recodified by this act);

(6) Eight hundred five million dollars to the state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020;

(7) Nine hundred fifty thousand dollars to the higher education reimbursable short-term bond account created by RCW 43.99G.020(6) (as recodified by this act);

(8) Twenty-nine million seven hundred thirty thousand dollars to the outdoor recreation account created by ((RCW 43.99.060)) RCW 79A.25.060;

(9) Sixty million dollars to the state and local improvements revolving account—water supply facilities, created by RCW 43.99E.020 (as recodified by this act) to be used for the purposes described in ((chapter 43.99E RCW)) RCW 43.99E.020 (as recodified by this act);

(10) Four million three hundred thousand dollars to the state social and health services construction account created by RCW 43.83H.030 (as recodified by this act);

(11) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the fisheries capital projects account created by RCW 43.83I.040 (as recodified by this act);

(12) Four million nine hundred thousand dollars to the state ((facilities renewal)) building construction account created by RCW ((43.99G.020(5))) 43.83.020;

(13) Two million three hundred thousand dollars to the essential rail assistance account created by ((RCW 47.76.030)) RCW 47.76.250;

(14) One million one hundred thousand dollars to the essential rail bank account hereby created in the state treasury;

(15) Seventy-three million dollars to the east capitol campus construction account hereby created in the state treasury;

(16) Eight million dollars to the higher education construction account created in RCW 28B.14D.040 (as recodified by this act);

(17) Sixty-three million two hundred thousand dollars to the labor and industries construction account hereby created in the state treasury;

(18) Seventy-five million dollars to the higher education construction account created by RCW 28B.14D.040 (as recodified by this act);

(19) Twenty-six million five hundred fifty thousand dollars to the habitat conservation account hereby created in the state treasury; and

(20) Eight million dollars to the public safety reimbursable bond account hereby created in the state treasury.

These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this subsection, and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the office of financial management, subject to legislative appropriation.

Bonds authorized for the purposes of subsection (17) of this section shall be issued only after the director of the department of labor and industries has certified, based on reasonable estimates, that sufficient revenues will be available from the accident fund created in RCW 51.44.010 and the medical aid fund created in RCW 51.44.020 to meet the requirements of RCW 43.99H.060(4) during the life of the bonds.

Bonds authorized for the purposes of subsection (18) of this section shall be issued only after the board of regents of the University of Washington has certified, based on reasonable estimates, that sufficient revenues will be available from nonappropriated local funds to meet the requirements of RCW 43.99H.060(4) during the life of the bonds.

Sec. 43. RCW 43.99I.020 and 2012 c 198 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Bonds issued under RCW 43.99I.010 are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

General obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of one billion two hundred seventy-one million sixty-five thousand dollars, or so much thereof as may be required, shall be issued for the purposes described and authorized by the legislature in the capital and operating appropriations acts for the 1991-93 fiscal biennium and subsequent fiscal biennia, and to provide for the administrative cost of such projects, including costs of bond issuance and retirement, salaries and related costs of officials and employees of the state, costs of insurance or credit enhancement agreements, and other expenses incidental to the administration of capital projects. Subject to such changes as may be required in the appropriations acts, the proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section shall be deposited in the state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020 and transferred as follows:

(1) Eight hundred thirty-five thousand dollars to the state higher education construction account created by RCW 28B.10.851 (as recodified by this act);

(2) Eight hundred seventy-one million dollars to the state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020;

(3) Two million eight hundred thousand dollars to the ((energy efficiency services account created by RCW 39.35C.110)) enterprise services account;

(4) Ninety-eight million six hundred forty-eight thousand dollars to the higher education reimbursable construction account hereby created in the state treasury;

(5) Three million two hundred eighty-four thousand dollars to the ((data processing building construction account created in RCW 43.99I.100)) state general fund; and

(6) Nine hundred thousand dollars to the ((Washington state dairy products commission facility account created in RCW 43.99I.110)) state general fund.

These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this section, and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the office of financial management, subject to legislative appropriation.

Sec. 44. RCW 43.99K.020 and 1997 c 456 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW 43.99K.010 shall be deposited in the state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. The proceeds shall be transferred as follows:

(1) Seven hundred eighty-five million four hundred thirty-eight thousand dollars to remain in the state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020;

(2) Twenty-two million five hundred thousand dollars to the outdoor recreation account created by ((RCW 43.99.060)) RCW 79A.25.060;

(3) Twenty-one million one hundred thousand dollars to the habitat conservation account created by ((RCW 43.98A.020)) RCW 79A.15.020;

(4) Two million nine hundred twelve thousand dollars to the public safety reimbursable bond account; and

(5) Ten million dollars to the higher education construction account created by RCW 28B.14D.040 (as recodified by this act).

These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this section and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the office of financial management subject to legislative appropriation.

Sec. 45. RCW 43.99L.020 and 1997 c 456 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW 43.99L.010 shall be deposited in the state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. The proceeds shall be transferred as follows:

(1) Nine hundred fifteen million dollars to remain in the state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020;

(2) One million six hundred thousand dollars to the public safety reimbursable bond account; and

(3) Forty-four million three hundred thousand dollars to the higher education construction account created by RCW 28B.14D.040 (as recodified by this act).

These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this section and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the office of financial management subject to legislative appropriation.

Sec. 46. RCW 43.99P.020 and 1999 c 380 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW 43.99P.010 shall be deposited in the state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. The proceeds shall be transferred as follows:

(1) Nine hundred fifty million dollars to remain in the state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020;

(2) Twenty-two million five hundred thousand dollars to the outdoor recreation account created by ((RCW 43.99.060)) RCW 79A.25.060;

(3) Twenty-two million five hundred thousand dollars to the habitat conservation account created by ((RCW 43.98A.020)) RCW 79A.15.020;

(4) One hundred thirty-six million eight hundred thirty-six thousand dollars to the higher education construction account created by RCW 28B.14D.040 (as recodified by this act);

(5) Thirty-six million three hundred thousand dollars to the state higher education construction account created by RCW 28B.10.851 (as recodified by this act).

These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this section and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the office of financial management subject to legislative appropriation.

Sec. 47. RCW 43.99Q.020 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW 43.99Q.010 shall be deposited in the state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. The proceeds shall be transferred as follows:

(1) Seven hundred seventy-four million two hundred thousand dollars to remain in the state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020;

(2) Twenty-two million five hundred thousand dollars to the outdoor recreation account created by RCW 79A.25.060;

(3) Twenty-two million five hundred thousand dollars to the habitat conservation account created by RCW 79A.15.020;

(4) Sixty million dollars to the state taxable building construction account which is hereby established in the state treasury. All receipts from taxable bond issues are to be deposited into the account. If the state finance committee deems it necessary to issue more than fifty million dollars of the bonds authorized in RCW 43.99Q.010 as taxable bonds in order to comply with federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds, the proceeds of such additional taxable bonds shall be transferred to the state taxable building construction account in lieu of any transfer otherwise provided by this section. The state treasurer shall submit written notice to the director of financial management if it is determined that any such additional transfer to the state taxable building construction account is necessary. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation;

(5) Twenty-nine million twenty-five thousand dollars to the higher education construction account created by RCW ((28B.140.040 [28B.14D.040])) 28B.14D.040 (as recodified by this act).

These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this section and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the office of financial management subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 48. RCW 67.40.040 (Deposit of proceeds in state convention and trade center account and appropriate subaccounts—Credit against future borrowings—Use) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 938 are each repealed.

Sec. 49. RCW 70.95.165 and 1989 c 431 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county or city siting a solid waste disposal facility shall review each potential site for conformance with the standards as set by the department for:

(a) Geology;

(b) Groundwater;

(c) Soil;

(d) Flooding;

(e) Surface water;

(f) Slope;

(g) Cover material;

(h) Capacity;

(i) Climatic factors;

(j) Land use;

(k) Toxic air emissions; and

(l) Other factors as determined by the department.

(2) The standards in subsection (1) of this section shall be designed to use the best available technology to protect the environment and human health, and shall be revised periodically to reflect new technology and information.

(3) Each county shall establish a local solid waste advisory committee to assist in the development of programs and policies concerning solid waste handling and disposal and to review and comment upon proposed rules, policies, or ordinances prior to their adoption. Such committees shall consist of a minimum of nine members and shall represent a balance of interests including, but not limited to, citizens, public interest groups, business, the waste management industry, and local elected public officials. The members shall be appointed by the county legislative authority. A county or city shall not apply for funds from the state and local improvements revolving account, Waste Disposal Facilities, 1980, under ((chapter 43.99F)) RCW 43.99F.030 (as recodified by this act), for the preparation, update, or major amendment of a comprehensive solid waste management plan unless the plan or revision has been prepared with the active assistance and participation of a local solid waste advisory committee.

Sec. 50. RCW 70.95.267 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 41 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is authorized to use referendum 26 (((chapter 43.83A RCW))) (RCW 43.83A.030 (as recodified by this act)) funds of the Washington futures account to disburse to local governments in developing solid waste recovery and/or recycling projects.

Sec. 51. RCW 70.95.268 and 1984 c 123 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is authorized to use funds under ((chapter 43.99F)) RCW 43.99F.030 (as recodified by this act) to disburse to local governments in developing solid waste recovery or recycling projects. Priority shall be given to those projects that use incineration of solid waste to produce energy and to recycling projects.

Sec. 52. RCW 79.17.120 and 2006 c 263 s 334 are each amended to read as follows:

The purchases authorized under RCW 79.17.110 shall be classified as for the construction of common A.525.200school plant facilities under RCW 28A.525.010 through ((28A.525.222)) 28A.525.200 and shall be payable out of the common school construction fund as otherwise provided for in RCW 28A.515.320 if the school district involved was under emergency school construction classification as established by the superintendent of public instruction at any time during the period of its lease of state lands.

Sec. 53. RCW 87.80.130 and 2003 c 306 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A board of joint control created under the provisions of this chapter shall have full authority within its area of jurisdiction to enter into and perform any and all necessary contracts; to accept grants and loans, including, but not limited to, those provided under chapter((s)) 43.83B and (( 43.99E RCW)) RCW 43.99E.020 (as recodified by this act), to appoint and employ and discharge the necessary officers, agents, and employees; to sue and be sued as a board but without personal liability of the members thereof in any and all matters in which all the irrigation entities represented on the board as a whole have a common interest without making the irrigation entities parties to the suit; to represent the entities in all matters of common interest as a whole within the scope of this chapter; and to do any and all lawful acts required and expedient to carry out the purposes of this chapter. A board of joint control may, subject to the same limitations as an irrigation district operating under chapter 87.03 RCW, acquire any property or property rights for use within the board's area of jurisdiction by power of eminent domain; acquire, purchase, or lease in its own name all necessary real or personal property or property rights; and sell, lease, or exchange any surplus real or personal property or property rights. Any transfers of water, however, are limited to transfers authorized under subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a) A board of joint control is authorized and encouraged to pursue conservation and system efficiency improvements to optimize the use of appropriated waters and to either redistribute the saved water within its area of jurisdiction, or transfer the water to others, or both. A redistribution of saved water as an operational practice internal to the board of joint control's area of jurisdiction, may be authorized if it can be made without detriment or injury to rights existing outside of the board of control's area of jurisdiction, including instream flow water rights established under state or federal law.

(b) Prior to undertaking a water conservation or system efficiency improvement project that will result in a redistribution of saved water, the board of joint control must consult with the department of ecology and, if the board's jurisdiction is within a United States reclamation project, the board must obtain the approval of the bureau of reclamation. The purpose of such consultation is to assure that the proposal will not impair the rights of other water holders or bureau of reclamation contract water users.

(c) A board of joint control does not have the power to authorize a change of any water right that would change the point or points of diversion, purpose of use, or place of use outside the board's area of jurisdiction, without the approval of the department of ecology pursuant to RCW 90.03.380 and, if the board's jurisdiction is within a United States reclamation project, the approval of the bureau of reclamation. Any change in place of use that results from a transfer of water between the individual entities of the board of joint control shall not result in any reduction in the total water supply available in a federal reclamation project. In making the determination of whether a change of place of use in an area covered by a federal reclamation project will result in a reduction in the total water supply available, the board of joint control shall consult with the bureau of reclamation.

(d) The board of joint control shall notify the department of ecology, and any Indian tribe requesting notice, of transfers of water between the individual entities of the board of joint control. This subsection (2)(d) applies only to a board of joint control created after January 1, 2003.

(3) A board of joint control is authorized to design, construct, and operate either drainage projects, or water quality enhancement projects, or both.

(4) Where the board of joint control area of jurisdiction is totally within a federal reclamation project, the board is authorized to accept operational responsibility for federal reserved works.

(5) Nothing contained in this chapter gives a board of joint control the authority to abridge the existing rights, responsibilities, and authorities of an individual irrigation entity or others within the area of jurisdiction; nor in a case where the board of joint control consists of representatives of two or more divisions of a federal reclamation project shall the board of joint control abridge any powers of an existing board of control created through federal contract; nor shall a board of joint control have any authority to abridge or modify a water right benefiting lands within its area of jurisdiction without consent of the party holding the ownership interest in the water right.

(6) A board of joint control created under this chapter may not use any authority granted to it by this chapter or by RCW 90.03.380 to authorize a transfer of or change in a water right or to authorize a redistribution of saved water before July 1, 1997.

Sec. 54. RCW 90.38.900 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The policies and purposes of this chapter shall not be construed as replacing or amending the policies or the purposes for which funds available under chapter 43.83B RCW, ((43.99E,)) RCW 43.99E.020 (as recodified by this act) or chapter 90.90 RCW may be used within or without the Yakima river basin.

Sec. 55. RCW 90.42.060 and 1991 c 347 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The policies and purposes of this chapter shall not be construed as replacing or amending the policies or the purposes for which funds available under chapter 43.83B RCW or ((43.99E)) RCW 43.99E.020 (as recodified by this act) may be used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 56. RCW 90.50.020 is recodified as a section in chapter 90.48 RCW.

Sec. 57. RCW 90.72.080 and 1992 c 100 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Counties that have formed shellfish protection districts shall receive high priority for state water quality financial assistance to implement shellfish protection programs, including grants and loans provided under ((chapters 43.99F,)) RCW 43.99F.030 (as recodified by this act), chapters 70.146((,)) and 90.50A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 58. RCW 28B.10.851, 28B.14.040, 43.75.225, 43.83A.030, 43.83H.030, 43.83I.040, 43.99E.020, 43.99F.030, and 43.99G.020 are each recodified as sections in chapter 43.83 RCW.

--- END ---