BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.343 RCW to read as follows:

Effective September 1, 2018, no first-class school director district may comprise more than thirty-five thousand students or have more than five members of its board of directors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The superintendent of public instruction shall convene educational service districts to analyze options and make recommendations for a clear legal framework and process for dividing a school district that has more than thirty-five thousand students into two districts.

(2) The analysis must include, but not be limited to:

(a) A time frame, criteria, and process for initiating a division of a school district;

(b) Roles and responsibilities of the office of the superintendent of public instruction, educational service districts, and regional committees on school district organization; and

(c) Recommendations for how to address such issues as:

(i) Drawing new district boundaries;

(ii) A process to transfer existing employees;

(iii) Identifying issues related to collective bargaining agreements;

(iv) Division of assets and liabilities;

(v) Clarifying effective dates of transfers of property for taxation purposes;

(vi) Dealing with levies and bonded indebtedness; and

(vii) Circumstances that require approval of voters in dividing the school district.

(3) In conducting the analysis, the educational service districts must consult with individuals with legal and financial expertise.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction must submit a final report and recommendations to the governor and the education and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015. The recommendations must specifically address amendments to current law as well as propose new laws as necessary.

(5) This section expires July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---