BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature recognizes that during the past ten years Washington public schools have seen an increased focus on high quality instructional practice, more accurate assessments, and responsive academic interventions. Most recently, Washington has adopted new, rigorous learning standards for English language arts, mathematics, and science that require practical, real-life applications of knowledge that prepare Washington students for success in college, work, and life. In addition, a new twenty-four credit career and college ready framework will be implemented for graduating students in 2019. Schools also have put a great deal of time and effort into ensuring quality teachers and administrators through the teacher-principal evaluation program, a four-tiered system that establishes eight new criteria for teachers' and principals' evaluations.

(2) As school districts implement the new rigorous career and college learning standards and graduation requirements, the legislature finds that school guidance counselors and school-based career and college guidance programs play an essential role in preparing students for academic and career achievement. The prototypical school model adopted in 2009 specifies that guidance counselors and graduation advising are necessary to support school districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic education. The legislature recognizes that, under Article IX of the state Constitution and McCleary v. State, the state must provide ample funding for its program of basic education.

(3) The legislature finds that the state has increased efforts to meet individual students' academic and social and emotional needs, with the goal of reducing barriers to student success in school. These efforts have included, among several others, the jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program that, through forty-nine jobs for Washington graduates sites, has been shown to keep students engaged successfully by providing them with leadership and employability skills. The jobs for America's graduates program is connected to career and technical education to give students technical skills leading to postsecondary education, apprenticeships, and living wage careers.

(4) The legislature further finds that the office of the superintendent of public instruction has developed a comprehensive guidance and planning program called career guidance Washington. Career guidance Washington is a career and college readiness program model designed to prepare students for their futures with guidance curriculum and tools through the development of students' high school and beyond plans. The legislature finds that the program model helps middle school and high school students meet their senior year goals when career guidance Washington is established as a school-wide program.

(5) The legislature further finds that school districts that implement a comprehensive multitiered approach have been more successful in increasing graduation rates, especially for students at greatest risk of dropping out. By providing foundational supports for all students, more strategic interventions for struggling students, and even more intensive supports for students in the greatest need, districts have been able to keep students in school, engaged in their education and focused on graduation.

(6) The legislature recognizes that, in spite of these foundational efforts, graduation rates in Washington have remained stagnant at approximately seventy-six percent for the past three years. Graduation rates for minority and vulnerable populations remain even lower. These rates are unacceptable if the state intends for all high school students to become college and career ready.

(7) To help provide support for all Washington students, the legislature finds that it is essential for school districts to establish school-wide programs that provide comprehensive college and career guidance for middle and high school students through the career guidance Washington program model. For more intensive support, the legislature further intends to establish a grant program in the office of the superintendent of public instruction that will assist school districts to provide comprehensive multitier supports to struggling students, including students with substance abuse and mental health issues. The legislature also intends to establish the statewide jobs for Washington graduates program in the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Finally, to better track education outcomes for the most vulnerable students in the state and assess state programs and efforts, the legislature intends to direct the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop additional data analytics to assist policymakers and school personnel.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.600.045 and 2008 c 170 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop a comprehensive career and college readiness program model, career guidance Washington, designed to help students make choices through their high school and beyond plans regarding course selection, goal setting, career planning, and postsecondary options, including financial aid.

(2) The legislature encourages each middle school, junior high school, and high school to implement ((a comprehensive guidance and planning program for all students)) with all students the career guidance Washington program model identified in subsection (1) of this section. ((The purpose of the program is to support students as they navigate their education and plan their future; encourage an ongoing and personal relationship between each student and an adult in the school; and involve parents in students' educational decisions and plans.

(2) A comprehensive guidance and planning program is a program that contains at least the following components:

(a) A curriculum intended to provide the skills and knowledge students need to select courses, explore options, plan for their future, and take steps to implement their plans. The curriculum may include such topics as analysis of students' test results; diagnostic assessments of students' academic strengths and weaknesses; use of assessment results in developing students' short-term and long-term plans; assessments of student interests and aptitude; goal-setting skills; planning for high school course selection; independent living skills; exploration of options and opportunities for career and technical education at the secondary and postsecondary level; exploration of career opportunities in emerging and high-demand programs including apprenticeships; and postsecondary options and how to access them;

(b) Regular meetings between each student and a teacher who serves as an advisor throughout the student's enrollment at the school;

(c) Student-led conferences with the student's parents, guardians, or family members and the student's advisor for the purpose of demonstrating the student's accomplishments; identifying weaknesses; planning and selecting courses; and setting long-term goals; and

(d) Data collection that allows schools to monitor students' progress.))

(3) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(a) Provide support for ((comprehensive guidance and planning)) career guidance Washington programs in public schools, including providing ongoing development and improvement of the ((curriculum described in subsection (2) of this section)) program model; and

(b) In partnership with the educational service districts, provide professional development, technical assistance, and guidance for school districts to implement the program.

(4) In consultation with the state board of education, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and make available an electronic tool for use in developing and maintaining high school and beyond plans.

(5) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(a) Allocate grants to school districts to implement career guidance Washington programs;

(b) Allocate supplemental grants to school districts that implement career guidance Washington programs and demonstrate a need for additional staff members to provide strategic support and intervention for struggling students; and

(c) Allocate supplemental grants to schools for the development and implementation of behavioral health service coordination and delivery for struggling students. Grant funding under this subsection (5)(c) shall be provided to school districts for the purpose of (i) coordinating school-based and community-based mental health and substance abuse evidence-based programming, screening, referral, and case management processes for individual students, and (ii) providing mental health promotion and substance abuse prevention through student, staff, family, and community education and awareness efforts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(1) Administer a statewide curriculum or program, such as the jobs for Washington graduates program, that meets at least the following criteria:

(a) Designates and assigns counselors, mentors, or coaches to students who have been identified as needing intensive intervention;

(b) Provides group instruction and individual student supports designed to reduce students' social, emotional, and health barriers to success;

(c) Offers a competency-based curriculum that includes employability competencies and intensive career exploration and development opportunities;

(d) Makes employment opportunities available for students who participate in the program, and provides assistance to students in the exploration of postsecondary education opportunities; and

(e) Offers follow-up services and support to students, including services and support for employment and postsecondary enrollment.

(2) Provide professional development, technical assistance, and guidance for school districts to implement the curriculum or program.

(3) Allocate grants to school districts for the purpose of establishing the school-based curriculum or program.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.300.500 and 2007 c 401 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction is authorized to establish a longitudinal student data system for and on behalf of school districts in the state. The primary purpose of the data system is to better aid research into programs and interventions that are most effective in improving student performance, better understand the state's public educator workforce, and provide information on areas within the educational system that need improvement. The longitudinal student data system must be designed to allow efficient delivery of reports that enable school districts to direct program activities to achieve greater success for students, including increasing graduation rates.

(2) The confidentiality of personally identifiable student data shall be safeguarded consistent with the requirements of the federal family educational rights privacy act and applicable state laws. Consistent with the provisions of these federal and state laws, data may be disclosed for educational purposes and studies, including but not limited to:

(a) Educational studies authorized or mandated by the state legislature;

(b) Studies initiated by other state educational authorities and authorized by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, including analysis conducted by the education data center established under RCW 43.41.400; and

(c) Studies initiated by other public or private agencies and organizations and authorized by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) Any agency or organization that is authorized by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to access student-level data shall adhere to all federal and state laws protecting student data and safeguarding the confidentiality and privacy of student records.

(4) Nothing in this section precludes the office of the superintendent of public instruction from collecting and distributing aggregate data about students or student-level data without personally identifiable information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2015, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---