BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1) From January 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016, the department may not issue a certificate of need for the sale, purchase, or lease of an existing hospital to another hospital or a purchasing entity that has an ownership or investment interest in any other hospital within Washington.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2016.

--- END ---