BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that professional sports organizations levy substantial fines and penalties against athletes in Washington state. The professional sports organizations then use proceeds from the fines and penalties for various internal purposes. The legislature finds that these moneys would be better utilized for a public benefit by requiring the fines and penalties be directed to a charitable organization of the athlete's choosing. This will encourage fair assessment of fines and penalties and simultaneously provide significant benefit to Washington communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Professional sports organization" is any professional sports franchise operating in the state or the national organization including, but not limited to, the national football league.

(2) "Professional-sports-services contract" has the same meaning as in RCW 19.225.010.

(3) "Charitable organization" means any 501(c)(3) organization registered in the state at the time of the donation.

(4) "Fine" and "penalty" means any monetary assessment against an athlete by the professional sports organization for violating the professional-sports-services contract or organization policy or rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If an athlete employed by a professional sports organization is assessed a fine or penalty, the entire amount of the fine or penalty must be paid to a charitable organization of the athlete's choosing. The payment to the charitable organization must occur within the time frame specified by the fine or penalty assessment. The professional sports organization cannot require the athlete to pay any amount of the fine or penalty to the professional sports organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---