BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that hypoglycemia is a severe medical problem for people with diabetes. Maintaining control of blood sugar levels requires disciplined self-management, a challenge especially for young children, adolescents, and the elderly. Hypoglycemic episodes can have catastrophic outcomes, resulting in seizure, brain damage, and death. Rapid and appropriate administration of oral glucose can counteract a severe hypoglycemic episode, and may make the difference between life and death.

(2) The legislature finds that the administration of oral glucose is not indicated in certain situations, and the administration of glucagon is the preferred method of treatment. The legislature further finds that some situations may arise when glucagon must be administered by injection to save a person's life. It is paramount that emergency response personnel receive appropriate training on the use of emergency glucagon pens to treat severe hypoglycemia.

(3) The purpose of this act is to authorize emergency medical technicians to administer glucagon in emergency situations and to have glucagon emergency kits available in their emergency care supplies.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.73.250 and 2005 c 463 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All of the state's ambulance and aid services shall:

(a) Make epinephrine available to their emergency medical technicians in their emergency care supplies; and

(b) Make glucagon emergency kits available to their emergency medical technicians in their emergency care supplies. ((The))

(2) Emergency medical technicians may administer epinephrine or glucagon.

(((2)))(3) Nothing in this section authorizes the administration of epinephrine or glucagon by a first responder.

--- END ---