BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The authority shall issue a request for proposals to provide integrated managed health and behavioral health care for foster children receiving care through the medical assistance program. The request for proposals must address the program elements described in section 110, chapter 225, Laws of 2014, including development of a service delivery system, benefit design, reimbursement mechanisms, and standards for contracting with health plans. The request for proposals must be issued and completed in time for services under the integrated managed care plan to begin on December 1, 2016. If the authority determines that it is not feasible for the mental health services required under the T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter settlement to be integrated in the health plans by December 1, 2016, the necessary services may be purchased separately by the authority as supplemental services to the plan. The services must be fully integrated into the health plans no later than January 1, 2018.

--- END ---