BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 9.41.092 (Licensed dealer deliveries—Background checks) and 2015 c 1 s 4 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(2) RCW 9.41.113 (Firearm sales or transfers—Background checks—Requirements—Exceptions) and 2015 c 1 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(3) RCW 9.41.115 (Penalties—Violations of RCW 9.41.113) and 2015 c 1 s 9 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(4) RCW 9.41.137 (Department of licensing, authority to adopt rules—Reporting of violations—Authority to revoke licenses) and 2015 c 1 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(5) RCW 82.08.833 (Exemptions—Sales or transfers of firearms—Unlicensed persons—Background check requirements) and 2015 c 1 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(6) 2015 c 1 s 2 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(7) 2015 c 1 s 5 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(8) 2015 c 1 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(9) 2015 c 1 s 7 (Initiative Measure No. 594);

(10) 2015 c 1 s 11 (Initiative Measure No. 594); and

(11) 2015 c 1 s 1 (uncodified) (Initiative Measure No. 594).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The secretary of state shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

--- END ---