BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. RCW 82.38.083 (Deductions—Handling losses—Reports) and 2013 c 225 s 205 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 82.36.029 (Deductions—Handling losses—Reports) and 1998 c 176 s 10 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect August 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act takes effect only if either chapter ... (House Bill No. 1993), Laws of 2015 or chapter ... (Senate Bill No. 5297), Laws of 2015 is enacted by June 30, 2015.

--- END ---