BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that transparency in community and technical college budgeting is essential to maintaining public trust in the community and technical college system. The legislature intends to require all nonappropriated local funds and corresponding fund balances to be posted on the colleges' web sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Within thirty days of adopting their annual college budgets, each community and technical college district shall post on its web site the budgeted and nonbudgeted revenues and anticipated expenditures for all nonstate, nonappropriated funds including, but not limited to, revenue from tuition, parking, rentals, parking lot fees, bookstore sales, contract revenues such as international student fees, running start revenue, and all other nonappropriated accounts.

(2) Annually, within thirty days after fiscal closing, each community and technical college shall post on its web site the ending fund balances for all nonstate, nonappropriated funds and accounts from the previous fiscal year. These balances must be reported as ending fund balances from the recently closed fiscal year and the projected beginning fund balances for the upcoming year where there is a difference between ending balance and beginning fund balance due to transfers of funds between accounts. The office of the state treasurer and the office of financial management are strongly encouraged to make all relevant data available to each community and technical college to ensure timely posting of the relevant information to the college web sites.

--- END ---