BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 38.52.180 and 2011 c 336 s 791 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be no liability on the part of anyone including any person, partnership, corporation, the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof who owns or maintains any building or premises which have been designated by a local organization for emergency management as a shelter from destructive operations or attacks by enemies of the United States for any injuries sustained by any person while in or upon said building or premises, as a result of the condition of said building or premises or as a result of any act or omission, or in any way arising from the designation of such premises as a shelter, when such person has entered or gone upon or into said building or premises for the purpose of seeking refuge therein during destructive operations or attacks by enemies of the United States or during tests ordered by lawful authority, except for an act of willful negligence by such owner or occupant or his or her servants, agents, or employees.

(2) All legal liability for damage to property or injury or death to persons (except an emergency worker, regularly enrolled and acting as such), caused by acts done or attempted during or while traveling to or from an emergency or disaster, search and rescue, or training or exercise authorized by the department in preparation for an emergency or disaster or search and rescue, under the color of this chapter in a bona fide attempt to comply therewith, except as provided in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section regarding covered volunteer emergency workers, shall be the obligation of the state of Washington. Suits may be instituted and maintained against the state for the enforcement of such liability, or for the indemnification of persons appointed and regularly enrolled as emergency workers while actually engaged in emergency management duties, or as members of any agency of the state or political subdivision thereof engaged in emergency management activity, or their dependents, for damage done to their private property, or for any judgment against them for acts done in good faith in compliance with this chapter: PROVIDED, That the foregoing shall not be construed to result in indemnification in any case of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith on the part of any agent of emergency management: PROVIDED, That should the United States or any agency thereof, in accordance with any federal statute, rule, or regulation, provide for the payment of damages to property and/or for death or injury as provided for in this section, then and in that event there shall be no liability or obligation whatsoever upon the part of the state of Washington for any such damage, death, or injury for which the United States government assumes liability.

(3) No act or omission by a covered volunteer emergency worker while engaged in a covered activity shall impose any liability for civil damages resulting from such an act or omission upon:

(a) The covered volunteer emergency worker;

(b) The supervisor or supervisors of the covered volunteer emergency worker;

(c) Any facility or their officers or employees;

(d) The employer or sponsoring organization of the covered volunteer emergency worker;

(e) The owner of the property or vehicle where the act or omission may have occurred during the covered activity;

(f) Any local organization that registered the covered volunteer emergency worker; and

(g) The state or any state or local governmental entity.

(4) The immunity in subsection (3) of this section applies only when the covered volunteer emergency worker was engaged in a covered activity:

(a) Within the scope of his or her assigned duties;

(b) Under the direction of a local emergency management organization or the department, or a local law enforcement agency for search and rescue; and

(c) The act or omission does not constitute gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

(5) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Covered volunteer emergency worker" means an emergency worker as defined in RCW 38.52.010 who (i) is not receiving or expecting compensation as an emergency worker from the state or local government, or (ii) is not a state or local government employee unless on leave without pay status.

(b) "Covered activity" means:

(i) Providing assistance or transportation authorized by the department during an emergency or disaster or search and rescue as defined in RCW 38.52.010, whether such assistance or transportation is provided at the scene of the emergency or disaster or search and rescue, at an alternative care site, at a hospital, or while in route to or from such sites or between sites; or

(ii) Participating in training or exercise authorized by the department in preparation for an emergency or disaster or search and rescue.

(6) Any requirement for a license to practice any professional, mechanical, or other skill shall not apply to any authorized emergency worker who shall, in the course of performing his or her duties as such, practice such professional, mechanical, or other skill during an emergency described in this chapter.

(7) The provisions of this section shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which he or she would otherwise be entitled under this chapter, or under the workers' compensation law, or under any pension or retirement law, nor the right of any such person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of congress.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.09.320 and 2011 c 171 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

((The department shall issue a certificate of title to the owner of an off-road vehicle. The owner shall pay the fee established under RCW 46.17.100. Issuance of the certificate of title does not qualify the vehicle for registration under chapter 46.16A RCW.)) (1) The application for a certificate of title of an off-road vehicle must be made by the owner or owner's representative to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director on a form furnished or approved by the department and must contain:

(a) A description of the off-road vehicle, including make, model, vehicle identification number or engine serial number if no vehicle identification number exists, type of body, and model year of the vehicle;

(b) The name and address of the person who is the registered owner of the off-road vehicle and, if the off-road vehicle is subject to a security interest, the name and address of the secured party; and

(c) Other information the department may require.

(2) The application for a certificate of title must be signed by the person applying to be the registered owner and be sworn to by that person in the manner described under RCW 9A.72.085.

(3) The owner must pay the fee established under RCW 46.17.100.

(4) Issuance of the certificate of title does not qualify the off-road vehicle for registration under chapter 46.16A RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.09.442 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any wheeled all-terrain vehicle operated within this state must display a metal tag to be affixed to the rear of the wheeled all-terrain vehicle. The initial metal tag must be issued with an original off-road vehicle registration and upon payment of the initial vehicle license fee under RCW 46.17.350(1)(s). The metal tag must be replaced every seven years at a cost of two dollars. Revenue from replacement metal tags must be deposited into the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account. The department must design the metal tag, which must:

(a) Be the same size as a motorcycle license plate;

(b) Have the words "RESTRICTED VEHICLE" listed at the top of the tag;

(c) Contain designated identification through a combination of letters and numbers;

(d) Leave space at the bottom left corner of the tag for an off-road tab issued under subsection (2) of this section; and

(e) Leave space at the bottom right corner of the tag for an on-road tab, when required, issued under subsection (3) of this section.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (5)(b) of this section, a person who operates a wheeled all-terrain vehicle must have a current and proper off-road vehicle registration, with the appropriate off-road tab, and pay the annual vehicle license fee as provided in RCW 46.17.350(1)(s), which must be deposited into the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account. The off-road tab must be issued annually by the department upon payment of initial and renewal vehicle license fees under RCW 46.17.350(1)(s).

(3) Except as provided in subsection (5)(a) of this section, a person who operates a wheeled all-terrain vehicle upon a public roadway must have a current and proper on-road vehicle registration, with the appropriate on-road tab, which must be of a bright color that can be seen from a reasonable distance, and pay the annual vehicle license fee as provided in RCW 46.17.350(1)(r). The on-road tab must be issued annually by the department upon payment of initial and renewal vehicle license fees under RCW 46.17.350(1)(r). For purposes of this subsection, a special year tab issued pursuant to chapter 46.19 RCW to a person with a disability may be displayed on a wheeled all-terrain vehicle in lieu of an on-road tab.

(4) A wheeled all-terrain vehicle may not be registered for commercial use.

(5)(a) A wheeled all-terrain vehicle registration and a metal tag are not required under this chapter for a wheeled all-terrain vehicle that meets the definition in RCW 46.09.310(19), is owned by a resident of another state, and has a vehicle registration and metal tag or license plate issued in accordance with the laws of the other state allowing for on-road travel in that state. This exemption applies only to the extent that: (i) A similar exemption or privilege is granted under the laws of that state for wheeled all-terrain vehicles registered in Washington, and (ii) the other state has equipment requirements for on-road use that meet or exceed the requirements listed in RCW 46.09.457. The department may publish on its web site a list of states that meet the exemption requirements under this subsection.

(b) Off-road operation in Washington state of a wheeled all-terrain vehicle owned by a resident of another state and meeting the definition in RCW 46.09.310(19) is governed by RCW 46.09.420(4).

Sec. 4. RCW 46.09.457 and 2015 c 160 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person may operate a wheeled all-terrain vehicle upon any public roadway of this state, not including nonhighway roads and trails, subject to RCW 46.09.455 and the following equipment and declaration requirements:

(a) A person who operates a wheeled all-terrain vehicle must comply with the following equipment requirements:

(i) Headlights meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.030 and 46.37.040 and used at all times when the vehicle is in motion upon a highway;

(ii) One tail lamp meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.525 and used at all times when the vehicle is in motion upon a highway; however, a utility-type vehicle, as described under RCW 46.09.310, must have two tail lamps meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.070(1) and to be used at all times when the vehicle is in motion upon a highway;

(iii) A stop lamp meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.200;

(iv) Reflectors meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.060;

(v) During hours of darkness, as defined in RCW 46.04.200, turn signals meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.200. Outside of hours of darkness, the operator must comply with RCW 46.37.200 or 46.61.310;

(vi) A mirror attached to either the right or left handlebar, which must be located to give the operator a complete view of the highway for a distance of at least two hundred feet to the rear of the vehicle; however, a utility-type vehicle, as described under RCW 46.09.310(19), must have two mirrors meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.400;

(vii) A windshield meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.430, unless the operator wears glasses, goggles, or a face shield while operating the vehicle, of a type conforming to rules adopted by the Washington state patrol;

(viii) A horn or warning device meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.380;

(ix) Brakes in working order;

(x) A spark arrester and muffling device meeting the requirements of RCW 46.09.470; and

(xi) For utility-type vehicles, as described under RCW 46.09.310(19), seat belts meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.510.

(b) A person who operates a wheeled all-terrain vehicle upon a public roadway must provide a declaration that includes the following:

(i) Documentation of a safety inspection to be completed by a licensed wheeled all-terrain vehicle dealer or motor vehicle repair shop in the state of Washington that must outline the vehicle information and certify under oath that all wheeled all-terrain vehicle equipment as required under this section meets the requirements outlined in state and federal law. A person who makes a false statement regarding the inspection of equipment required under this section is guilty of false swearing, a gross misdemeanor, under RCW 9A.72.040;

(ii) Documentation that the licensed wheeled all-terrain vehicle dealer or motor vehicle repair shop did not charge more than fifty dollars per safety inspection and that the entire safety inspection fee is paid directly and only to the licensed wheeled all-terrain vehicle dealer or motor vehicle repair shop;

(iii) A statement that the licensed wheeled all-terrain vehicle dealer or motor vehicle repair shop is entitled to the full amount charged for the safety inspection;

(iv) A vehicle identification number verification that must be completed by a licensed wheeled all-terrain vehicle dealer or motor vehicle repair shop in the state of Washington;

(v) A release, on a form to be supplied by the department, signed by the owner of the wheeled all-terrain vehicle and verified by the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director that releases the state, counties, cities, and towns from any liability; and

(vi) A statement that outlines that the owner understands that the original wheeled all-terrain vehicle was not manufactured for on-road use and that it has been modified for use on public roadways.

(2) This section does not apply to emergency services vehicles, vehicles used for emergency management purposes, or vehicles used in the production of agricultural and timber products on and across lands owned, leased, or managed by the owner or operator of the wheeled all-terrain vehicle or the operator's employer.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.19.030 and 2014 c 124 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall design special license plates for persons with disabilities, parking placards, and year tabs displaying the international symbol of access.

(2) Special license plates for persons with disabilities must be displayed on the motor vehicle as standard issue license plates as described in RCW 46.16A.200.

(3) Parking placards must include both a serial number and the expiration date on the face of the placard. The expiration date and serial number must be of a sufficient size as to be easily visible from a distance of ten feet from where the placard is displayed.

(4) Parking placards must be displayed when the motor vehicle is parked by suspending it from the rearview mirror. In the absence of a rearview mirror, the parking placard must be displayed on the dashboard. The parking placard must be displayed in a manner that allows for the entire placard to be viewed through the vehicle windshield.

(5) Special year tabs for persons with disabilities must be displayed on license plates or metal tags issued pursuant to RCW 46.09.442, in a manner as defined by the department.

(6) Persons who have been issued special license plates for persons with disabilities, parking placards, or special license plates with a special year tab for persons with disabilities may park in places reserved for persons with physical disabilities.

--- END ---