BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The Washington state legislature finds that very little information is known about young children who are homeless. Further, the legislature finds that information about young children who are homeless is necessary to make policy decisions pertaining to early learning, health care, and other social services. For these reasons, it is necessary to conduct a comprehensive analysis of the homeless youth population.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The Washington state institute for public policy shall conduct an analysis to identify characteristics of the homeless youth population from birth to age ten. To do so, the Washington state institute for public policy shall consult with applicable governmental and nongovernmental organizations to identify homeless youth and services that they receive, including, but not limited to, data from the homeless client management information system, automated client eligibility system, and any other applicable state and local government sources. The Washington state institute for public policy shall further pursue information gathering techniques with organizations that provide services to homeless youth and their families to identify barriers to accessing services, whether the services available meet the need of the homeless population, and whether there are services needed by this population that are not available. The Washington state institute for public policy shall survey the best practices of other states and make recommendations to the legislature regarding the most cost-effective ways to support this population.

(2) To the extent possible using these methods, the Washington state institute for public policy must further identify the number of homeless youth in Washington state from birth to ten years old and the average length of homelessness for this population. The Washington state institute for public policy shall submit an interim report by December 31, 2015, and a final report by June 30, 2016, based on this analysis to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2015, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---