BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Any charter, ordinance, regulation, rule, or resolution enacted by any city, town, county, or port district and regulating wages, hours of work, employee retention, or leave from employment must apply equally to both unionized and nonunionized employers.

(2) No charter, ordinance, regulation, rule, or resolution enacted by any city, town, county, or port district and regulating wages, hours of work, employee retention, or leave from employment may permit its requirements be waived, in whole or in part, in collective bargaining.

(3) Any provision of any charter, ordinance, regulation, rule, or resolution enacted before or after the effective date of this section that conflicts with subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not be adopted or agreed to and is preempted and unenforceable.

(4) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Leave from employment" means sick leave, vacation leave, holiday leave, leave when an employee's place of business of child's school or place of care has been closed by order of a public official, and any other type of employee leave except leave for domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking; and

(b) "Employee retention" means offering work to or retaining employees following a business succession.

(5) This section does not impair any provision of a collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

Section 1 of this act governs the authority of a city or town to regulate private employers and to contract regarding wages, hours of work, employee retention, or leave from employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

Section 1 of this act governs the authority of a code city to regulate private employers and to contract regarding wages, hours of work, employee retention, or leave from employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

Section 1 of this act governs the authority of a county to regulate private employers and to contract regarding wages, hours of work, employee retention, or leave from employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

Section 1 of this act governs the authority of a port district to regulate private employers and to contract regarding wages, hours of work, employee retention, or leave from employment.

--- END ---