BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.315.195 and 2012 c 186 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A proposed change in school district organization by transfer of territory from one school district to another may be initiated by:

(a) A petition in writing presented to the educational service district superintendent((:

(a)))signed by at least fifty percent plus one of the active registered voters residing in the territory proposed to be transferred; or

(b) A written agreement signed by a majority of the members of the board of directors of ((one))each of the districts affected by a proposed transfer of territory and providing documentation that, before signing the ((petition))agreement, the boards of directors ((took the following actions:

(i) Communicated the proposed transfer to the board of directors of the affected district or districts and provided an opportunity for the board of the affected district or districts to respond; and

(ii)))communicated the proposed transfer to the registered voters residing in the territory proposed to be transferred, provided notice of a public hearing regarding the proposal, and provided the voters an opportunity to comment on the proposal at ((the))a public hearing. A public hearing under this subsection (1)(b) must be conducted by the boards of directors of each of the affected districts, but may be a single hearing conducted jointly by the boards.

(2) The petition or agreement shall state the name and number of each district affected, describe the boundaries of the territory proposed to be transferred, and state the reasons for desiring the change and the number of children of school age, if any, residing in the territory.

(3) The educational service district superintendent shall not complete any transfer of territory under this section that involves ten percent or more of the common school student population of the entire district from which the transfer is proposed, unless the educational service district superintendent has first called and held a special election of the voters of the entire school district from which the transfer of territory is proposed. The purpose of the election is to afford those voters an opportunity to approve or reject the proposed transfer. A simple majority shall determine approval or rejection.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction may establish rules limiting the frequency of petitions that may be filed pertaining to territory included in whole or in part in a previous petition.

(5) A petition to transfer territory must be processed in accordance with RCW 28A.315.199 and 28A.315.205. A written agreement to transfer territory must be processed in accordance with RCW 28A.315.215.

--- END ---