BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislative task force on the Columbia river gorge commission is established consisting of the following five members:

(a) Two members from the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. If possible, the members must represent districts that are within or adjacent to the Columbia river gorge national scenic area as identified in the Columbia river gorge national scenic act, P.L. 99-663. If possible, the speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of representatives.

(b) Two members from the senate appointed by the president of the senate. If possible, the members must represent districts that are within or adjacent to the Columbia river gorge national scenic area as identified in the Columbia river gorge national scenic act, P.L. 99-663. If possible, the president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses in the senate; and

(c) The governor or the governor's designee.

(2) The legislative task force shall meet and work with the Columbia river gorge commission and a corresponding task force authorized by the state of Oregon to address a range of topics relating to the Columbia river gorge national scenic area act, P.L. 99-663, which may include, but is not be limited to:

(a) Funding of the commission by the states of Washington and Oregon;

(b) The various effects of the Columbia river gorge national scenic area act, P.L. 99-663 on the states of Washington and Oregon; and

(c) Changes to the Columbia river gorge national scenic area act, P.L. 99-663 and to the Columbia river gorge commission that could enhance the relationship between the commission and states of Washington and Oregon.

(3) A majority of the members of the legislative task force constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

(4) Official action by the legislative task force requires the approval of a majority of members of the legislative task force.

(5) The legislative task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chair of the task force.

(6) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appointment to become immediately effective.

(7) The legislative task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the chair or of a majority of the members of the legislative task force.

(8) The legislative task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the legislative task force.

(9) By September 15, 2016, the legislative task force shall submit a report to the legislature consistent with RCW 43.01.036 and may include recommendations for legislation.

(10) Legislative members of the legislative task force are entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members of the task force, except those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(11) The expenses of the legislative task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(12) All departments in the executive, legislative, and judicial branches of the state government must assist the legislative task force in the performance of the legislative task force's duties and, to the extent permitted by laws relating to confidentiality and upon request of a legislative task force member, furnish information and advice that a member of the legislative task force considers necessary to perform his or her duties.

(13) Staff support for the legislative task force shall be provided by the house of representatives office of program research, senate committee services, and the governor's office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) Section 1 of this act does not become effective unless the state of Oregon, on or before July 11, 2015, approves a corresponding five-member task force to work with the Columbia river gorge commission and the legislative task force on the Columbia river gorge commission in carrying out the duties of section 1 of this act.

(2) The governor must provide written notification to the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate when the state of Oregon approves the corresponding task force. Section 1 of this act becomes effective on the date that either the chief clerk of the house of representatives or the secretary of the senate receives the notice.

(3) Either the chief clerk of the house of representatives or the secretary of the senate must provide written notification to the office of the code reviser regarding the effective date of section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire December 30, 2016.

--- END ---