BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

No institution of higher education may assign a student to purchase a textbook that costs more than one hundred dollars unless:

(1) There is no available and comparable alternative that costs less than one hundred dollars; and

(2) There is no available substitute through open course materials.

--- END ---