BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the cost of textbooks are a barrier to higher education for many students. The state board for community and technical colleges through the open course library, and universities around the country through various open education material programs, have achieved significant cost savings for students. It is the intent of the legislature to create a pilot program at one regional university, with the goal of expanding the grant program to all of the four-year institutions of higher education if the pilot successfully results in a cost savings to students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) Beginning in the 2015-16 academic year, the Washington open education pilot program is established at Eastern Washington University to reduce student's cost of attendance by creating an open educational resources program.

(2) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, the Eastern Washington University libraries shall award up to ten grants per year to faculty members to develop or obtain open educational materials and resources. The faculty members shall develop the materials and resources in collaboration with the Eastern Washington University libraries. The Eastern Washington University libraries shall develop a process for review and selection of grant applications.

(3) In developing the pilot project, the Eastern Washington University libraries are encouraged to use the University of Massachusetts Amherst open education initiative as a model.

(4) Beginning November 1, 2016, and by November 1st of the following year, Eastern Washington University shall submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature a report of the pilot project, including:

(a) How the program is being implemented, including a comparison between the pilot program at Eastern Washington University and programs at the University of Massachusetts Amherst and other institutions with similar models;

(b) The number of faculty that applied for the grant and the number of faculty that received the grant;

(c) The courses and departments of the faculty members that received the grants; and

(d) The total cost savings to students and the cost savings per student enrolled in a course taught by a grant recipient.

(5) This section expires June 30, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---