BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that school personnel are often the first responders when there is a violent threat or natural or man-made disaster at a school. The legislature further finds that school personnel need to be trained to intervene and provide assistance during these emergency incidents. The legislature recognizes an educational service district has developed a model for a regional school safety and security center, which can provide this type of training. The legislature intends to provide training to other regions in the state by authorizing a pilot program to create regional school safety and security centers in three other educational service districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) During the 2015-2017 biennium, three educational service districts shall implement a pilot program to create regional school safety and security centers in each of the three educational service districts. One educational service district must be an educational service district that is entirely west of the crest of the Cascade mountains and is partially bounded by an international border. One educational service district must be east of the crest of the Cascade mountains. One educational service district may be located anywhere in the state of Washington.

(2) The pilot program must include the following components:

(a) Establishment of a network of school safety coordinators for the educational service districts, which shall focus on prevention planning, intervention, mitigation, crisis response, and community recovery regarding emergency incidents in schools;

(b) Collaboration with the educational service district that developed the model for a regional school safety and security center to adopt its model for a regional school safety and security center;

(c) Creation of technology-based systems that enable more efficient and effective communication between schools and emergency response entities, including local law enforcement, local fire departments, and state and federal responders;

(d) Provision of technology support to improve communication and data management between schools and emergency response entities;

(e) Ongoing training of school personnel and emergency responders to establish a system for preventative identification, intervention strategies, and management of risk behaviors;

(f) Development of a professional development program to train school personnel as first responders until the arrival of emergency responders; and

(g) Building a collaborative relationship between educational service districts participating in the pilot program, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the school safety advisory committee and focusing on expanding regional school safety and security centers to all of the other educational service districts.

(3) This section expires December 31, 2017.

--- END ---