BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The purpose of the teacher endorsement and certification help pilot project, known as the TEACH pilot, is to develop an expandable program that provides grants to teachers taking basic skills and content tests for teacher certification programs. It is the legislature's intent to incentivize underrepresented students to obtain certain endorsements and to increase access and affordability for underrepresented students to obtain teacher certifications and endorsements in areas with significant needs. The current endorsement shortage areas include special education; early childhood education; and science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM).

(2) The legislature intends for the student achievement council and the professional educator standards board to make financially needy students aware of the TEACH pilot.

(3) It is the intent of the legislature that the professional educator standards board update its list of endorsement shortage areas in response to school district demands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.630 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds specifically appropriated for this purpose, the teacher endorsement and certification help pilot project, known as the TEACH pilot, is created. The scale of the TEACH pilot is dependent on the level of funding appropriated.

(2) The student achievement council, after consultation with the professional educator standards board, shall have the power and duty to develop and adopt rules as necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW to administer the pilot project described in this section. The rules, which must be adopted by August 1, 2016, must include:

(a) A TEACH pilot grant application process;

(b) A financial need verification process;

(c) The order of priority in which the applications will be approved; and

(d) A process for disbursing TEACH pilot grant awards to selected applicants.

(3) A student seeking a TEACH pilot grant to cover the costs of basic skills and content tests required for teacher certification and endorsement shall submit an application to the student achievement council, following the rules developed under this section.

(4) To qualify for financial assistance, an applicant must meet the following criteria:

(a) Be enrolled in, have applied to, or have completed a teacher preparation program approved by the professional educator standards board;

(b) Demonstrate financial need, as defined by the office of student financial assistance and consistent with the income criteria required to receive the state need grant established in chapter 28B.92 RCW;

(c) Apply for a TEACH pilot grant under this section; and

(d) Register for an endorsement competency test in endorsement shortage areas.

(5) Beginning September 1, 2016, the student achievement council, in collaboration with the professional educator standards board, shall award a TEACH pilot grant to a student who meets the qualifications listed in this section and in rules developed under this section. The TEACH pilot grant award must cover the costs of basic skills and content tests required for teacher certification. The council shall prioritize TEACH pilot grant awards first to applicants registered for competency tests in endorsement shortage areas and second to applicants with greatest financial need. The council shall scale the number of TEACH pilot grant awards to the amount of funds appropriated for this purpose.

(6) The student achievement council and the professional educator standards board shall include information about the TEACH pilot in materials distributed to schools and students.

(7) By December 31, 2018, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the student achievement council, in collaboration with the professional educator standards board, shall submit a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that details the effectiveness and costs of the pilot project. The preliminary report must (a) compare the numbers and demographic information of students taking and passing tests in the endorsement shortage areas before and after implementation of the pilot project, and (b) determine the amount of TEACH pilot grant award financial assistance awarded each pilot year and per student.

(8) By December 31, 2020, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the student achievement council, in collaboration with the professional educator standards board, shall submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that details the effectiveness and costs of the pilot project. In addition to updating the preliminary report, the final report must (a) compare the numbers and demographic information of students obtaining teaching certificates with endorsement competencies in the endorsement shortage areas before and after implementation of the pilot project, and (b) recommend whether the pilot project should be modified, continued, and expanded.

(9) This section expires June 30, 2021.

--- END ---