BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW to read as follows:

Employee organizations representing educational public employees under this chapter shall submit a digital copy of their collective bargaining agreement to the commission within thirty days of the effective date of the collective bargaining agreement.

--- END ---