BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that requests for state funding for local infrastructure projects exceeds the resources available for these projects. As a result, alternate funding mechanisms for local infrastructure projects have become an increasingly valuable financing option for projects that have meaningful impacts on the lives of many Washingtonians and the businesses that serve them.

Therefore, the legislature intends to broaden the potential creation and use of community facilities districts for financing infrastructure projects by allowing these districts to be formed and utilized in limited areas of more intensive rural development. The legislature does not intend for this act to modify growth management planning requirements under chapter 36.70A RCW, nor does it intend for this act to increase the size of limited areas of more intensive rural development, or the allowable or potential development in these areas.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.145.020 and 2010 c 7 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Community facilities districts are authorized to be formed for the purposes authorized under this chapter. Community facilities districts must be created in accordance with this chapter and may only include land within:

(a) Urban growth areas designated under ((the state growth management act, located in portions of one or more cities, towns, or counties when created in accordance with this chapter))RCW 36.70A.110; or

(b) Limited areas of more intensive rural development designated under RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d). Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) modifies or may be construed as modifying requirements under chapter 36.70A RCW. A district may include one or more noncontiguous tracts, lots, parcels, or other properties meeting the requirements of this chapter.

(((1)))(2) To form a community facilities district, a petition must be presented to the applicable legislative authorities. The petition must:

(a) Designate and describe the boundaries of the district by metes and bounds or reference to United States townships, ranges, and legal subdivisions;

(b) Be executed by one hundred percent of all owners of private property located within the boundaries of the proposed district. The property owners must include a request to subject their property to the assessments, up to the amount included in the petition and authorized under this chapter;

(c) Include a certification by the petitioners that they want to voluntarily submit their property to the authority of the district under this chapter to approve the petitioner's request to submit their property to the assessments, up to the amount included in the petition and authorized under this chapter;

(d) Include a general explanation of the objective and plan of the district and describe the specific facilities that the district anticipates financing;

(e) Declare the district will be conducive to public health, safety, and welfare;

(f) Assert that the purpose for forming the district will be a benefit to the land located in the district;

(g) Be accompanied by an "obligation" signed by at least two petitioners who agree to pay the costs of the formation process;

(h) Include a list of petitioners or representatives thereof who are willing and able to serve on the board of supervisors. All petitioners within a proposed district who are natural persons, or natural persons who are designated representatives of petitioners, are eligible to include their name on the list of eligible supervisors. The petitioners may nominate qualified professions to serve on the board of supervisors in lieu of the petitioners or representatives of the petitioners;

(i) If it proposes a special assessment, include: (i) A diagram showing each separate lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property in the district; (ii) the acreage of the property; (iii) the name and address of the owner or reputed owner of each lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property as shown on the tax rolls of the county assessor; (iv) a preliminary assessment roll showing the special assessment proposed to be imposed on each lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property; and (v) a proposed method or combination of methods for computing special assessments, determining the benefit to assessed property or use from facilities or improvements funded directly or indirectly by special assessments under this chapter; and

(j) Include an explanation of what security will be provided to ensure the timely payment of assessments and the timely payment of bonds issued by the district.

(((2)))(3) The petition must be filed with the auditor of each county in which property included within the proposed district is located. The auditor for the county in which the largest geographic portion of the proposed district is located must be the lead auditor for the purposes of this section. Within thirty days of the lead auditor's receipt of the petition, the lead auditor must confirm that the petition has been validly executed by one hundred percent of all owners of the property located within the proposed district, including confirmation by the auditors of all other counties with whom the petition was filed. Within ten days of the lead auditor's finding that the petition either does or does not contain the required signatures, the lead auditor must either (a) transmit the petition, together with a certificate of sufficiency attached thereto, to each legislative authority petitioned for formation of the district; or (b) return the petition to the petitioners with a list of property owners who must sign the petition in order to comply with this section. There are no restrictions on the number of petitions that may be submitted by one or more property owners.

(((3)))(4) A petition may be amended for any reason if the amendment is signed by one hundred percent of the owners of property located within the district proposed in the amended petition.

--- END ---