BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Under qualifications, terms, conditions, benefits, and continuity of care requirements set by the board, retired or disabled school employees and retired or disabled state employees who are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.26, 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW and their dependents, may enroll in medical and dental plans under the authority, provided they apply no later than the end of the open enrollment period for the plan year beginning January 1, 2016.

(2) Retired or disabled school employees and retired or disabled state employees and their dependents shall be responsible for payment of rates developed by the authority, and shall include any amounts necessary for administration in accordance with this chapter. Premium rates charged to retired or disabled school employees and retired or disabled state employees and their dependents shall be based on the experience of the community-rated risk pool established under RCW 41.05.022 and shall be reduced by the amount of the subsidy provided under RCW 41.05.085.

(3) The authority may establish rules to implement the enrollment opportunity under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect September 1, 2015.

--- END ---