BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the joint transportation committee, during its study "Efficiencies in the Construction and Operation of State Transportation Projects," uncovered the fact that a court interpretation of the state prevailing wage law had extended the application of the law beyond federal standards and added hundreds of thousands of dollars in costs to transportation projects. The study recommended, as a cost reduction mechanism, having Washington's prevailing wage law be more consistent with the federal prevailing wage law for transportation projects.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.12.020 and 2007 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics, upon all public works and under all public building service maintenance contracts of the state or any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, shall be not less than the prevailing rate of wage for an hour's work in the same trade or occupation in the locality within the state where such labor is performed. For a contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, a contractor required to pay the prevailing rate of wage shall post in a location readily visible to workers at the job site: PROVIDED, That on road construction, sewer line, pipeline, transmission line, street, or alley improvement projects for which no field office is needed or established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of wage statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing, concrete, or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a copy of the wage statement to any employee on request:

(1) A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries under RCW 39.12.040; and

(2) The address and telephone number of the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries where a complaint or inquiry concerning prevailing wages may be made.

This chapter shall not apply to workers or other persons regularly employed by the state, or any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws; or to workers on a public works transportation project other than mechanics and laborers employed directly on the site of work for a public works transportation project.

--- END ---