BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.05.550 and 2008 c 87 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Federal poverty level" means the official poverty level based on family size established and adjusted under section 673(2) of the omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1981 (P.L. 97-35; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9902(2), as amended).

(b) "Foundation" means the prescription drug assistance foundation established in this section, a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of this state to provide assistance in accessing prescription drugs to qualified uninsured individuals.

(c) "Health insurance coverage including prescription drugs" means prescription drug coverage under a private insurance plan, including a plan offered through the health benefit exchange under chapter 43.71 RCW, the medicaid program, the state children's health insurance program ("SCHIP"), the medicare program, the basic health plan, or any employer-sponsored health plan that includes a prescription drug benefit.

(d) "Qualified uninsured individual" means an uninsured person or an underinsured person who is a resident of this state and ((has an income below three hundred percent of the federal poverty level)) whose income meets financial criteria established by the foundation.

(e) "Underinsured" means an individual who has health insurance coverage including prescription drugs, but for whom the prescription drug coverage is inadequate for their needs.

(f) "Uninsured" means an individual who lacks health insurance coverage including prescription drugs.

(2)(a) The administrator shall establish the foundation as a nonprofit corporation, organized under the laws of this state. The foundation shall assist qualified uninsured individuals in obtaining prescription drugs at little or no cost.

(b) The foundation shall be administered in a manner that:

(i) Begins providing assistance to qualified uninsured individuals by January 1, 2006;

(ii) Defines the population that may receive assistance in accordance with this section; and

(iii) Complies with the eligibility requirements necessary to obtain and maintain tax-exempt status under federal law.

(c) The board of directors of the foundation consists of up to eleven with a minimum of five members appointed by the governor to staggered terms of three years. The governor shall select as members of the board individuals who (i) will represent the interests of persons who lack prescription drug coverage; and (ii) have demonstrated expertise in business management and in the administration of a not-for-profit organization.

(d) The foundation shall apply for and comply with all federal requirements necessary to obtain and maintain tax-exempt status with respect to the federal tax obligations of the foundation's donors.

(e) The foundation is authorized, subject to the direction and ratification of the board, to receive, solicit, contract for, collect, and hold in trust for the purposes of this section, donations, gifts, grants, and bequests in the form of money paid or promised, services, materials, equipment, or other things tangible or intangible that may be useful for helping the foundation to achieve its purpose. The foundation may use all sources of public and private financing to support foundation activities. No general fund-state funds shall be used for the ongoing operation of the foundation.

(f) No liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature, shall arise against any member of the board of directors of the foundation or against an employee or agent of the foundation for any lawful action taken by them in the performance of their administrative powers and duties under this section.

--- END ---