BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The natural disaster economic recovery account is created in the state treasury to be used only for the purposes of this section.

(2) Expenditures from the account may be made only to support the economic recovery and development of areas described in the proclamation of a state of emergency by the governor for a natural disaster pursuant to RCW 43.06.010. Expenditures may be authorized for:

(a) Rebuilding public infrastructure that was destroyed or damaged by a natural disaster;

(b) Economic development projects, including tourism promotion and job creation;

(c) Affordable and transitional housing development;

(d) Small business grant programs; and

(e) Other assistance projects dedicated to support sustainable economic recovery efforts within the disaster area.

(3) Expenditures authorized under this section may not supplant or otherwise affect eligibility for other state or federal funding sources for emergency relief, including but not limited to the Stafford act and other emergency management programs administered by the Washington military department under chapter 38.52 RCW.

(4) Funding may be provided directly to a state agency, county, city, or other local subdivision, or a nonprofit organization dedicated to the long-term recovery of an area affected by a natural disaster.

(5) The department must administer the account and must direct the expenditure of funds subject to appropriations by the legislature.

(6) The department may receive private and public grants, donations, and private and public emergency financial aid for the account.

(7) The governor, upon receiving the recommendation of the director, may authorize the expenditure of funds provided in subsection (6) of this section.

(8) The state auditor may conduct an audit of any expenditure made from this account including the use of any account funds paid directly to a private or public entity.

--- END ---