BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.310 and 1981 c 139 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person shall manufacture, and no person shall sell, distribute, furnish, or supply to any other person, any gambling device, including but not limited to punchboards and pull-tabs, in this state, or for use within this state, without first obtaining a license to do so from the commission under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) Such licenses shall not be issued by the commission except respecting devices which are designed and permitted for use in connection with activities authorized under this chapter: PROVIDED, That this requirement for licensure shall apply only insofar as the commission has adopted, or may adopt, rules implementing it as to particular categories of gambling devices and related equipment.

(3) A business may possess gambling devices or components of authorized gambling devices without first obtaining a license if the business registers with the commission. Possession of gambling devices or components of gambling devices is allowed only when:

(a) The devices and components are:

(i) Inspected and approved by the commission;

(ii) Not available to the general public;

(iii) Accessible only to employees of the business;

(iv) Possessed only in locations approved by the commission;

(v) Not used for gambling purposes; and

(b) The business is in compliance with any commission rules adopted under this chapter and has paid any inspection fees as required by the commission.

--- END ---