BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.4277 and 2014 c 225 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A health or social welfare organization may deduct from the measure of tax amounts received as compensation for providing mental health services and chemical dependency services under a government-funded program.

(2) A behavioral health organization may deduct from the measure of tax amounts received from the state of Washington for distribution to a health or social welfare organization that is eligible to deduct the distribution under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) A person claiming a deduction under this section must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply ((to this section))throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Chemical dependency" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 70.96A.020.

(b) "Health or social welfare organization" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.431.

(((b)))(c) "Mental health services" and "behavioral health organization" have the meanings provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(5) This section expires ((August 1, 2016))January 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect April 1, 2016.

--- END ---