BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act may be known as the supreme court social justice act.

Sec. 2. RCW 29A.76.040 and 2003 c 111 s 1904 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) With regard to functions relating to census, apportionment, and the establishment of legislative ((and)), congressional, and supreme court districts, the secretary of state shall:

(a) Coordinate and monitor precinct mapping functions of the county auditors and county engineers;

(b) Maintain official state base maps and correspondence lists and maintain an index of all such maps and lists;

(c) Furnish to the United States bureau of the census as needed for the decennial census of population, current, accurate, and easily readable versions of maps of all counties, cities, towns, and other areas of this state, which indicate current precinct boundaries together with copies of the census correspondence lists.

(2) The secretary of state shall serve as the state liaison with the United States bureau of census on matters relating to the preparation of maps and the tabulation of population for apportionment purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) Supreme court districts may not be drawn or applied in a manner that denies a protected class an equal opportunity to elect candidates of its choice or an equal opportunity to influence the outcome of an election. This means that: (a) The minority group is sufficiently large and geographically compact to constitute a majority in a single-member district; (b) the minority group is politically cohesive; and (c) the white majority votes sufficiently as a bloc to enable it usually to defeat the minority's preferred candidate.

(2) A supreme court district is in violation of this section when it is shown that:

(a) The elections in the district exhibit, considering the totality of the circumstances, polarized voting; and

(b) Members of a protected class do not have an equal opportunity to elect candidates of their choice or an equal opportunity to influence the outcome of an election for a candidate for supreme court.

(3) In determining whether there is polarized voting under this section, a court shall analyze elections for members of the supreme court. The election of candidates who are members of a protected class and who were elected prior to the filing of an action pursuant to this chapter shall not preclude a finding of polarized voting that results in an unequal opportunity for a protected class to elect candidates of their choice or influence the outcome of elections.

(4) The court shall determine whether polarized voting has occurred by examining results of elections in which at least one candidate is a member of a protected class. Only elections conducted prior to the filing of an action pursuant to this chapter shall be used to establish or rebut the existence of polarized voting that results in an unequal opportunity for a protected class to elect candidates of their choice.

(5) Members of different protected classes may file an action jointly pursuant to this chapter if they demonstrate that their combined voting preferences as a group are different from the rest of the electorate and demonstrate based on the totality of the circumstances that there is polarized voting that results in an unequal opportunity for these protected classes to elect candidates of their choice.

(6) In an action filed pursuant to this section, the trial court shall set a trial to be held no later than one hundred eighty days after the filing of a complaint, and shall set a discovery and motions calendar accordingly.

(7) Proof of intent on the part of the voters or elected officials to discriminate against a protected class is not required.

(8) For purposes of any applicable statute of limitations, a cause of action under this section arises every time there is an election for supreme court justices pursuant to an at-large method of election or a district-based election which includes at least one candidate with credible qualifications of a protected class.

(9) The plaintiff's constitutional right to secrecy of the plaintiff's vote is not waived by the filing of any action pursuant to this chapter and is not subject to discovery.

(10) In seeking a temporary restraining order of a preliminary injunction, a plaintiff shall be required to post a bond or any other security in order to secure such equitable relief.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Upon a finding of a violation of section 3 of this act, the court shall implement appropriate remedies, including notifying the legislature to call for a reconvening of the redistricting commission. Any proposed districts by the commission must be submitted to the court prior to its implementation. The court may raise concerns with the redistricting commission if it suspects the remedy will not rectify the legal problem.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A voter who voted in the election and who is a member of a protected class and who resides in the supreme court district where a violation of section 3 of this act is alleged may file an action in the superior court of the county in which the resident resides or the two nearest judicial districts as determined pursuant to RCW 36.01.050(2). There is no requirement that an action filed pursuant to this chapter be filed as a class action.

Sec. 6. RCW 44.05.020 and 2011 c 60 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise.

(1) "Chief election officer" means the secretary of state.

(2) "Federal census" means the decennial census required by federal law to be prepared by the United States bureau of the census in each year ending in zero.

(3) "Lobbyist" means an individual required to register with the Washington public disclosure commission pursuant to RCW 42.17A.600.

(4) "Plan" means a plan for legislative ((and)), congressional, and supreme court redistricting mandated by Article II, section 43 of the state Constitution.

Sec. 7. RCW 44.05.030 and 1984 c 13 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A redistricting commission shall be established in January of each year ending in one to accomplish state legislative ((and)), congressional, and supreme court redistricting. The five-member commission shall be appointed as follows:

(1) Each legislative leader of the two largest political parties in each house of the legislature shall appoint one voting member to the commission by January 15th of each year ending in one.

(2) The four legislators appointing commission members pursuant to this section shall certify their appointments to the chief election officer. If an appointing legislator does not certify an appointment by January 15th of each year ending in one, within five days the supreme court shall certify an appointment to the chief election officer.

(3) No later than January 31st of the year of their selection, the four appointed members, by an affirmative vote of at least three, shall appoint and certify to the chief election officer the nonvoting fifth member who shall act as the commission's chairperson. If by January 31st of the year of their selection three of the four voting members fail to elect a chairperson, the supreme court shall within five days certify an appointment to the chief election officer. A vacancy on the commission shall be filled by the person who made the initial appointment, or their successor, within fifteen days after the vacancy occurs.

Sec. 8. RCW 44.05.060 and 1984 c 13 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

No member of the commission may:

(1) Campaign for elective office while a member of the commission;

(2) Actively participate in or contribute to any political campaign of any candidate for state or federal elective office while a member of the commission; or

(3) Hold or campaign for a seat in the state house of representatives, the state senate, the state supreme court, or congress for two years after the effective date of the plan.

Sec. 9. RCW 44.05.090 and 1990 c 126 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In the redistricting plan:

(1) Districts shall have a population as nearly equal as is practicable, excluding nonresident military personnel, based on the population reported in the federal decennial census.

(2) To the extent consistent with subsection (1) of this section the commission plan should, insofar as practical, accomplish the following:

(a) District lines should be drawn so as to coincide with the boundaries of local political subdivisions and areas recognized as communities of interest. The number of counties and municipalities divided among more than one district should be as small as possible;

(b) Districts should be composed of convenient, contiguous, and compact territory. Land areas may be deemed contiguous if they share a common land border or are connected by a ferry, highway, bridge, or tunnel. Areas separated by geographical boundaries or artificial barriers that prevent transportation within a district should not be deemed contiguous; and

(c) Whenever practicable, a precinct shall be wholly within a single legislative district.

(3) The commission's plan and any plan adopted by the supreme court under RCW 44.05.100(4) shall provide for forty-nine legislative districts and supreme court districts.

(4) The house of representatives shall consist of ninety-eight members, two of whom shall be elected from and run at large within each legislative district. The senate shall consist of forty-nine members, one of whom shall be elected from each legislative district.

(5) The commission shall exercise its powers to provide fair and effective representation and to encourage electoral competition. The commission's plan shall not be drawn purposely to favor or discriminate against any political party or group.

Sec. 10. RCW 44.05.100 and 2002 c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon approval of a redistricting plan by three of the voting members of the commission, but not later than January 1st of the year ending in two, the commission shall submit the plan to the legislature.

(2) After submission of the plan by the commission, the legislature shall have the next thirty days during any regular or special session to amend the commission's plan. If the legislature amends the commission's plan the legislature's amendment must be approved by an affirmative vote in each house of two-thirds of the members elected or appointed thereto, and may not include more than two percent of the population of any legislative or congressional district.

(3) The plan approved by the commission, with any amendment approved by the legislature, shall be final upon approval of such amendment or after expiration of the time provided for legislative amendment by subsection (2) of this section whichever occurs first, and shall constitute the districting law applicable to this state for legislative and congressional elections, beginning with the next elections held in the year ending in two. This plan shall be in force until the effective date of the plan based upon the next succeeding federal decennial census or until a modified plan takes effect as provided in RCW 44.05.120(6).

(4) If three of the voting members of the commission fail to approve and submit a plan within the time limitations provided in subsection (1) of this section, the supreme court shall adopt a plan by March 1st of the year ending in two. Any such plan approved by the court is final and constitutes the districting law applicable to this state for legislative and congressional elections, beginning with the next election held in the year ending in two. Any plan adopted pursuant to direction of the courts must subsequently be approved by the legislature. This plan shall be in force until the effective date of the plan based on the next succeeding federal decennial census or until a modified plan takes effect as provided in RCW 44.05.120(6).

Sec. 11. RCW 44.05.120 and 1983 c 16 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a commission has ceased to exist, the legislature may, upon an affirmative vote in each house of two-thirds of the members elected or appointed thereto, adopt legislation reconvening the commission for the purpose of modifying the redistricting plan.

(2) RCW 44.05.050 governs the eligibility of persons to serve on the reconvened commission. A vacancy involving a voting member of the reconvened commission shall be filled by the person who made the initial appointment, or their successor, within fifteen days after the effective date of the legislation reconvening the commission. A vacancy involving the nonvoting member of the commission shall be filled by an affirmative vote of at ((lease [least])) least three of four voting members, within fifteen days after all other vacancies are filled or, if no other vacancies exist, within fifteen days after the effective date of the legislation reconvening the commission. A subsequent vacancy on a reconvened commission shall be filled by the person or persons who made the initial appointment, or their successor, within fifteen days after the vacancy occurs. If any appointing authority fails to make a required appointment within the time limitations established by this subsection, within five days after that date the supreme court shall make the required appointment.

(3) The provisions of RCW 44.05.070 and 44.05.080 are applicable if a commission is reconvened under this section.

(4) The commission shall complete the modification to the redistricting plan as soon as possible, but no later than sixty days after the effective date of the legislation reconvening the commission. At least three of the voting members shall approve the modification to the redistricting plan.

(5) Following approval of a modification to the redistricting plan by the commission, the legislature has the next thirty days during any regular or special session to amend the commission's modification. Any amendment by the legislature must be approved by an affirmative vote in each house of two-thirds of the members elected or appointed thereto. No amendment by the legislature may include more than two percent of the population of any legislative ((or)), congressional, or supreme court district contained in the commission's modification.

(6) The commission's modification to the redistricting plan, with any amendments approved by the legislature, shall be final upon approval of the amendments or after expiration of the time provided for legislative amendment by subsection (5) of this section, whichever occurs first.

(7) Following the period provided by subsection (4) of this section for the commission's approval of a modification to the redistricting plan, the commission shall take all necessary steps to conclude its business and cease operations in accordance with RCW 44.05.110(1). A reconvened commission shall cease to exist ninety days after the effective date of the legislation reconvening the commission, unless the supreme court extends the commission's term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. This act takes effect if the proposed amendment to Article II, section 43 and Article IV, section 3 of the state Constitution creating districts from which supreme court justices will be elected is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at a general election held in November 2015. If the proposed amendment is not so approved and ratified, this act is null and void in its entirety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 3 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 29A RCW.

--- END ---