BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.210 RCW to read as follows:

(1) School districts shall require any student who was expelled, suspended, or removed from school due to reasons relating to violence or mental health issues be assessed by an independent, private, third-party mental health professional before the student is readmitted into school. If the mental health professional decides that the student is mentally healthy, then the student may return to school.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Independent third party" means a mental health professional other than a mental health professional from whom the student has received or is receiving treatment.

(b) "Mental health professional" means a person who treats a patient's mental health needs, including a psychologist and a psychiatrist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---