BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.315 RCW to read as follows:

Effective September 1, 2019, no first-class school district may comprise more than thirty-five thousand students or have more than five members on its board of directors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The superintendent of public instruction shall convene educational service districts to analyze options and make recommendations for a clear legal framework and process for dividing a school district that has more than thirty-five thousand students into two districts.

(2) The analysis must include, but not be limited to:

(a) A time frame, criteria, and process for initiating a division of a school district;

(b) Roles and responsibilities of the office of the superintendent of public instruction, educational service districts, and regional committees on school district organization; and

(c) Recommendations for how to address such issues as:

(i) Drawing new district boundaries, and the timeline and process for obtaining final voter approval on the new boundaries;

(ii) A process to transfer existing employees;

(iii) Identifying issues related to collective bargaining agreements;

(iv) Division of assets and liabilities;

(v) Clarifying effective dates of transfers of property for taxation purposes;

(vi) Dealing with levies and bonded indebtedness;

(vii) The timeline and process for reducing the number of directors;

(viii) The process for involving community input, which shall include at least three public hearings; and

(ix) Circumstances that require approval of voters in dividing the school district.

(3) In conducting the analysis, the educational service districts must consult with individuals with legal and financial expertise. The educational service districts must also seek input from the public, particularly residents of any school district that may be imminently affected by section 1 of this act, with respect to recommendations for a process for dividing a school district that has more than thirty-five thousand students into two districts.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction must submit a final report and recommendations to the governor and the education and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015. The recommendations must specifically address amendments to current law as well as propose new laws as necessary.

(5) This section expires July 1, 2016.

--- END ---