BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 39.19 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The microbusiness, minibusiness, and small business enhancement program is established within the office to facilitate opportunities for business growth and increased job development, spur entrepreneurship and leadership, and increase the number and quality of certified businesses enterprises qualifying for contracts with state and local governments.

(2) To accomplish the goals of the program, the office shall:

(a) Identify microbusinesses, minibusinesses, and small businesses eligible for certification under this chapter. The office shall work with community organizations, including associate development organizations defined in RCW 43.330.010, to identify new businesses;

(b) Assist identified microbusinesses, minibusinesses, and small businesses in the certification process;

(c) Provide training and information to microbusinesses, minibusinesses, and small businesses on preparing proposals for government contracts;

(d) Assist microbusinesses, minibusinesses, and small businesses in developing a business plan that will enable them to grow and be successful; and

(e) Provide established certified businesses development services that focus on business growth, job growth, and increased participation in government contracting.

(3) The office shall work with the department of commerce to leverage grants, programs, federal funds, and other resources to accomplish the goals of the program.

(4) "Microbusiness" for purposes of this section has the same meaning as RCW 39.26.010(17).

(5) "Minibusiness" for the purposes of this section has the same meaning as RCW 39.26.010(18).

(6) "Small business" for purposes of this section has the same meaning as RCW 39.26.010(23).

(7) The office must develop outcome-focused performance measures to assess program effectiveness. Performance measures shall include, but not be limited to: The number of businesses identified and newly certified by the office; the number of jobs created and sustained; the number of existing certified businesses that increase the number of government contracts secured; and the growth of minority, women, and disadvantaged business enterprises securing government contracts.

(8) The office shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the effectiveness of the program by December 1, 2016.

--- END ---