BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of ecology must complete a study that analyzes the current extent of light pollution that adversely affects the quality of the environment, the value of property, and the health and well-being of the public. The study must, at minimum, evaluate:

(a) The risks to public health, well-being, and the environment posed by light pollution;

(b) The locations in the state with the greatest prevalence of light pollution and the greatest impacts of light pollution on environmental quality, ecosystem function, and public well-being; and

(c) Policy options for addressing light pollution that have been adopted by other jurisdictions.

(2) By January 1, 2017, the department of ecology must submit a report containing its analysis and recommendations to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature. The recommendations must include recommendations for policy changes to address light pollution.

--- END ---