BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.01.044 and 1983 c 283 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As an alternative, in addition to the provisions of RCW 43.01.040 authorizing the accumulation of vacation leave in excess of thirty days with the filing of a statement of necessity, vacation leave in excess of thirty days may also be accumulated as provided in this section but without the filing of a statement of necessity. The accumulation of leave under this alternative method shall be governed by the following provisions:

(1) Each subordinate officer and employee of the several offices, departments, and institutions of state government may accumulate the vacation leave days between the time thirty days is accrued and his or her anniversary date of state employment.

(2) All vacation days accumulated under this section shall be used by the anniversary date and at a time convenient to the employing office, department, or institution. If an officer or employee does not use the excess leave by the anniversary date, then such leave may be transferred to the employee's sick leave bank upon the employee's written request or it shall be automatically extinguished and considered to have never existed.

(3) This section shall not result in any increase in a retirement allowance under any public retirement system in this state.

(4) Any vacation day transferred to the employee's sick leave bank must be used before other sick leave and is not subject to cash out.

(5) Should the legislature revoke any benefits or rights provided under this section, no affected officer or employee shall be entitled thereafter to receive such benefits or exercise such rights as a matter of contractual right.

(((5))) (6) Vacation leave credit acquired and accumulated under this section shall never, regardless of circumstances, be deferred by the employing office, department or institution by filing a statement of necessity under the provisions of RCW 43.01.040.

(((6))) (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, on or after July 24, 1983, a statement of necessity for excess leave, shall as a minimum, include the following: (a) the specific number of days of excess leave; and (b) the date on which it was authorized. A copy of any such authorization shall be sent to the department of retirement systems.

--- END ---