BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.285.030 and 2014 c 45 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the attorney general.

(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.

(3)(a) "Biomass energy" includes: (i) Organic by-products of pulping and the wood manufacturing process; (ii) animal manure; (iii) solid organic fuels from wood; (iv) forest or field residues; (v) untreated wooden demolition or construction debris; (vi) food waste and food processing residuals; (vii) liquors derived from algae; (viii) dedicated energy crops; and (ix) yard waste.

(b) "Biomass energy" does not include: (i) Wood pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) wood from old growth forests; or (iii) municipal solid waste.

(4) "Coal transition power" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 80.80.010.

(5) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and transportation commission.

(6) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power consumption resulting from increases in the efficiency of energy use, production, or distribution.

(7) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 80.52.030.

(8) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and training council within the department of labor and industries.

(9) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases electricity for ultimate consumption and not for resale.

(10) "Department" means the department of commerce or its successor.

(11) "Distributed generation" means an eligible renewable resource where the generation facility or any integrated cluster of such facilities has a generating capacity of not more than five megawatts.

(12) "Eligible renewable resource" means:

(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable resource other than freshwater that commences operation after March 31, 1999, where: (i) The facility is located in the Pacific Northwest; or (ii) the electricity from the facility is delivered into Washington state on a real-time basis without shaping, storage, or integration services;

(b) Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency improvements completed after March 31, 1999, to hydroelectric generation projects owned by a qualifying utility and located in the Pacific Northwest where the additional generation does not result in new water diversions or impoundments;

(c) Hydroelectric generation from a project completed after March 31, 1999, where the generation facility is located in irrigation pipes, irrigation canals, water pipes whose primary purpose is for conveyance of water for municipal use, and wastewater pipes located in Washington where the generation does not result in new water diversions or impoundments;

(d) Qualified biomass energy; ((or))

(e) For a qualifying utility that serves customers in other states, electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable resource other than freshwater that commences operation after March 31, 1999, where: (i) The facility is located within a state in which the qualifying utility serves retail electrical customers; and (ii) the qualifying utility owns the facility in whole or in part or has a long-term contract with the facility of at least twelve months or more;

(f) The portion of incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency improvements completed after March 31, 1999, attributable to a qualifying utility's share of the electricity output from hydroelectric generation projects whose energy output is marketed by the Bonneville power administration where the additional generation does not result in new water diversions or impoundments; or

(g) The environmental attributes, including renewable energy credits under (f) of this subsection, transferred to investor-owned utilities pursuant to the Bonneville power administration's residential exchange program.

(13) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 19.29A.010.

(14) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of electricity delivered in the most recently completed year by a qualifying utility to its Washington retail customers.

(15)(a) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally related characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and other electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage, qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided emissions of pollutants to the air, soil, or water, and avoided emissions of carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases.

(b) "Nonpower attributes" does not include any aspects, claims, characteristics, and benefits associated with the on-site capture and destruction of methane or other greenhouse gases at a facility through a digester system, landfill gas collection system, or other mechanism, which may be separately marketable as greenhouse gas emission reduction credits, offsets, or similar tradable commodities. However, these separate avoided emissions may not result in or otherwise have the effect of attributing greenhouse gas emissions to the electricity.

(16) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined for the Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific Northwest electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698; 16 U.S.C. Sec. 839a). Beginning January 1, 2016, "Pacific Northwest" also includes the entire state of Montana.

(17) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 39.35C.010.

(18) "Qualified biomass energy" means electricity produced from a biomass energy facility that: (a) Commenced operation before March 31, 1999; (b) contributes to the qualifying utility's load; and (c) is owned either by: (i) A qualifying utility; or (ii) an industrial facility that is directly interconnected with electricity facilities that are owned by a qualifying utility and capable of carrying electricity at transmission voltage.

(19) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as the term "electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves more than twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington. The number of customers served may be based on data reported by a utility in form 861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the energy information administration, United States department of energy.

(20) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable certificate of proof, except as provided in RCW 19.285.040(2)(m), of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible renewable resource where, except as provided in subsection (12)(g) of this section, the generation facility is not powered by freshwater. The certificate includes all of the nonpower attributes associated with that one megawatt-hour of electricity, and the certificate is verified by a renewable energy credit tracking system selected by the department.

(21) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean, or tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised on land cleared from old growth or first-growth forests where the clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; or (i) biomass energy.

(22) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other entity of Washington state government to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter.

(23) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing January 1st and ending December 31st.

Sec. 2. RCW 19.285.040 and 2014 c 26 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each qualifying utility shall pursue all available conservation that is cost-effective, reliable, and feasible.

(a) By January 1, 2010, using methodologies consistent with those used by the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning council in the most recently published regional power plan as it existed on June 12, 2014, or a subsequent date as may be provided by the department or the commission by rule, each qualifying utility shall identify its achievable cost-effective conservation potential through 2019. Nothing in the rule adopted under this subsection precludes a qualifying utility from using its utility specific conservation measures, values, and assumptions in identifying its achievable cost-effective conservation potential. At least every two years thereafter, the qualifying utility shall review and update this assessment for the subsequent ten-year period.

(b) Beginning January 2010, each qualifying utility shall establish and make publicly available a biennial acquisition target for cost-effective conservation consistent with its identification of achievable opportunities in (a) of this subsection, and meet that target during the subsequent two-year period. At a minimum, each biennial target must be no lower than the qualifying utility's pro rata share for that two-year period of its cost-effective conservation potential for the subsequent ten-year period.

(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection, beginning on January 1, 2014, cost-effective conservation achieved by a qualifying utility in excess of its biennial acquisition target may be used to help meet the immediately subsequent two biennial acquisition targets, such that no more than twenty percent of any biennial target may be met with excess conservation savings.

(ii) Beginning January 1, 2014, a qualifying utility may use single large facility conservation savings in excess of its biennial target to meet up to an additional five percent of the immediately subsequent two biennial acquisition targets, such that no more than twenty-five percent of any biennial target may be met with excess conservation savings allowed under all of the provisions of this section combined. For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c)(ii), "single large facility conservation savings" means cost-effective conservation savings achieved in a single biennial period at the premises of a single customer of a qualifying utility whose annual electricity consumption prior to the conservation savings exceeded five average megawatts.

(iii) Beginning January 1, 2012, and until December 31, 2017, a qualifying utility with an industrial facility located in a county with a population between ninety-five thousand and one hundred fifteen thousand that is directly interconnected with electricity facilities that are capable of carrying electricity at transmission voltage((,)) may use cost-effective conservation from that industrial facility in excess of its biennial acquisition target to help meet the immediately subsequent two biennial acquisition targets, such that no more than twenty-five percent of any biennial target may be met with excess conservation savings allowed under all of the provisions of this section combined.

(d) In meeting its conservation targets, a qualifying utility may count high-efficiency cogeneration owned and used by a retail electric customer to meet its own needs. High-efficiency cogeneration is the sequential production of electricity and useful thermal energy from a common fuel source, where, under normal operating conditions, the facility has a useful thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total energy output. The reduction in load due to high-efficiency cogeneration shall be: (i) Calculated as the ratio of the fuel chargeable to power heat rate of the cogeneration facility compared to the heat rate on a new and clean basis of a best-commercially available technology combined-cycle natural gas-fired combustion turbine; and (ii) counted towards meeting the biennial conservation target in the same manner as other conservation savings.

(e) The commission may determine if a conservation program implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective based on the commission's policies and practice.

(f) The commission may rely on its standard practice for review and approval of investor-owned utility conservation targets.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (j) of this subsection, each qualifying utility shall use eligible renewable resources or acquire equivalent renewable energy credits, or any combination of them, to meet the following annual targets:

(i) At least three percent of its load by January 1, 2012, and each year thereafter through December 31, 2015;

(ii) At least nine percent of its load by January 1, 2016, and each year thereafter through December 31, 2019; and

(iii) At least fifteen percent of its load by January 1, 2020, and each year thereafter.

(b) A qualifying utility may count distributed generation at double the facility's electrical output if the utility: (i) Owns or has contracted for the distributed generation and the associated renewable energy credits; or (ii) has contracted to purchase the associated renewable energy credits.

(c) In meeting the annual targets in (a) of this subsection, a qualifying utility shall calculate its annual load based on the average of the utility's load for the previous two years.

(d) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i) The utility's weather-adjusted load for the previous three years on average did not increase over that time period; (ii) after December 7, 2006, the utility did not commence or renew ownership or incremental purchases of electricity from resources other than coal transition power or renewable resources other than on a daily spot price basis and the electricity is not offset by equivalent renewable energy credits; and (iii) the utility invested at least one percent of its total annual retail revenue requirement that year on eligible renewable resources, renewable energy credits, or a combination of both.

(e) The requirements of this section may be met for any given year with renewable energy credits produced during that year, the preceding year, or the subsequent year. Each renewable energy credit may be used only once to meet the requirements of this section.

(f) In complying with the targets established in (a) of this subsection, a qualifying utility may not count:

(i) Eligible renewable resources or distributed generation where the associated renewable energy credits are owned by a separate entity; or

(ii) Eligible renewable resources or renewable energy credits obtained for and used in an optional pricing program such as the program established in RCW 19.29A.090.

(g) Where fossil and combustible renewable resources are cofired in one generating unit located in the Pacific Northwest where the cofiring commenced after March 31, 1999, the unit shall be considered to produce eligible renewable resources in direct proportion to the percentage of the total heat value represented by the heat value of the renewable resources.

(h)(i) A qualifying utility that acquires an eligible renewable resource or renewable energy credit may count that acquisition at one and two-tenths times its base value:

(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility that commenced operation after December 31, 2005; and

(B) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship programs approved by the council during facility construction.

(ii) The council shall establish minimum levels of labor hours to be met through apprenticeship programs to qualify for this extra credit.

(i) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an annual target in (a) of this subsection if events beyond the reasonable control of the utility that could not have been reasonably anticipated or ameliorated prevented it from meeting the renewable energy target. Such events include weather-related damage, mechanical failure, strikes, lockouts, and actions of a governmental authority that adversely affect the generation, transmission, or distribution of an eligible renewable resource under contract to a qualifying utility.

(j)(i) Beginning January 1, 2016, only a qualifying utility that owns or is directly interconnected to a qualified biomass energy facility may use qualified biomass energy to meet its compliance obligation under this subsection.

(ii) A qualifying utility may no longer use electricity and associated renewable energy credits from a qualified biomass energy facility if the associated industrial pulping or wood manufacturing facility ceases operation other than for purposes of maintenance or upgrade.

(k) An industrial facility that hosts a qualified biomass energy facility may only transfer or sell renewable energy credits associated with its facility to the qualifying utility with which it is directly interconnected with facilities owned by such a qualifying utility and that are capable of carrying electricity at transmission voltage. The qualifying utility may only use an amount of renewable energy credits associated with qualified biomass energy that are equivalent to the proportionate amount of its annual targets under (a)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection that was created by the load of the industrial facility. A qualifying utility that owns a qualified biomass energy facility may not transfer or sell renewable energy credits associated with qualified biomass energy to another person, entity, or qualifying utility.

(l) Beginning January 1, 2018, a qualifying utility may use eligible renewable resources as identified under RCW 19.285.030(12) (f) and (g) to meet its compliance obligation under this subsection (2). A qualifying utility may not transfer or sell these eligible renewable resources to another utility for compliance purposes under this chapter.

(m) Renewable energy credits allocated under RCW 19.285.030(12)(g) may not be transferred or sold to another qualifying utility for compliance under this chapter.

(3) Utilities that become qualifying utilities after December 31, 2006, shall meet the requirements in subsections (1) and (2) of this section on a time frame comparable in length to that provided for qualifying utilities as of December 7, 2006.

(4) Except as provided in (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection, beginning on January 1, 2021, and each year thereafter, all electric utilities as that term is defined in RCW 19.29A.010 shall meet one hundred percent of any new generation need with any one or any combination of the following: Conservation, eligible renewable resources, and storage.

(a) New generation subject to the requirements of this subsection, whether that new generation is needed to replace retiring generation, to meet load growth, or for any other purpose, includes the following:

(i) A utility's new or increased ownership interest in a new or existing generation facility or unit, consistent with RCW 19.285.030(16); and

(ii) A new or increased contractual commitment that obligates a utility to purchase a specified amount of megawatt-hours. Contracts do not comply with this subsection unless the sources or origins of generation can be ascertained with reasonable certainty. A contract is not in compliance with this subsection if the contract specifies a source of generation where the megawatt-hours from such source are double-counted or contractually committed to another purchaser.

(b) The following are not subject to the requirements of this subsection: (i) A utility's allocation of Bonneville power administration tier 1 power, as determined pursuant to a utility's tier 1 contract with Bonneville power administration; (ii) short-term spot market purchases; (iii) generation that is found by the Washington utilities and transportation commission or a utility's governing board to be required to maintain reliable service and comply with applicable standards of the North American electric reliability corporation or its successor; and (iv) increased megawatt-hours from a generation facility that is already owned by a utility where the utility's ownership interest in the facility does not increase.

(c) A utility may acquire new generation other than conservation, eligible renewable resources, and storage for integration, ancillary services, load following, and peak load requirements only if the new generation is found by the Washington utilities and transportation commission or a utility's governing board to be required for such purposes.

(d) A utility may only acquire existing Washington-based and Washington utility-owned hydropower in a year where a utility acquires new generation that individually or collectively serves more than ten percent of the utility's annual load. The hydropower acquired pursuant to this subsection (4)(d) may not exceed fifty percent of the new generation acquired by the utility.

(e) If a utility acquires a new ownership interest or contractual commitment in gas-fired generation after January 1, 2015, and before January 1, 2021, only the megawatt-hours needed to serve the utility's load in the year that the utility acquires such ownership interest or contractual commitment will be considered existing generation. Any increase in the megawatt-hours used or acquired by the utility after January 1, 2021, must be treated as new generation and are subject to the requirements of this subsection (4).

(f) For the purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Ancillary services" means those services necessary to support the transmission of electric power from resources to loads while maintaining reliable operations of the interconnected transmission system in accordance with good utility practice.

(ii) "Integration" means the incremental reserve requirement necessary to follow changes in the output of a variable energy resource to maintain a continuous balance between loads and generation.

(iii) "Load following" means generation necessary to follow changes in load on a moment-to-moment basis to maintain a continuous balance between loads and generation.

(iv) "Peak load" means a utility's highest forecast load requirement over a ten-year planning period.

(v) "Short-term spot market purchase" means: (A) The purchase of energy on the spot market for immediate delivery; or (B) a contract for the purchase of energy on the spot market that is for a term of no more than three months.

(vi) "Spot market" means a physical market in which wholesale electricity is bought, sold, or traded for immediate delivery, such as the Mid-Columbia spot market.

(vii) "Storage" means a set of technologies capable of storing previously generated electric energy and releasing that energy at a later time. For the purposes of this subsection (4)(f)(vii), pumped storage projects are considered an energy storage tool for grid stabilization and improved integration of variable renewable energy resources and should not cause any additional adverse impacts to waterways. Adverse impacts may be in river, in-channel peaking, ramping, new pumping of groundwater, or diversion of surface water resources. Utilities should focus on reservoirs already built where water rights are already issued.

(viii) "Tier 1 contract" means a power sales contract between a consumer-owned utility and the Bonneville power administration that contains a contract high water mark, and under which the utility purchases power from Bonneville at rates established by Bonneville in accordance with Bonneville's tiered rate methodology.

(g) The requirements of this subsection (4) do not replace or modify the requirements contained in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section for qualifying utilities. Qualifying utilities must comply with the requirements of this subsection in addition to the requirements imposed elsewhere in this section and chapter.

(h) The requirements of this subsection (4) constitute renewable energy targets that are subject to the accountability and enforcement provisions under RCW 19.285.060, the reporting and public disclosure provisions under RCW 19.285.070, and the rule-making provisions under RCW 19.285.080. The provisions of RCW 19.285.060, 19.285.070, and 19.285.080 must be applied and enforced with respect to all electric utilities for the purposes of this subsection (4).

--- END ---