BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.60.190 and 2011 c 349 s 21 and 2011 c 10 s 58 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Fourteen days after a primary or special election and twenty-one days after a general election, the county canvassing board shall complete the canvass and certify the results. Each ballot that was returned before 8:00 p.m. on the day of the special election, general election, or primary, and each ballot bearing a postmark on or before the date of the special election, general election, or primary and received no later than the day before certification, must be included in the canvass report.

If the April election falls in the fifth week of the month, certification must be conducted ten days following the special election.

--- END ---