BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.41.073 and 2004 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person licensed to carry a pistol in ((a)) any other state ((the laws of which recognize and give effect in that state to a concealed pistol license issued under the laws of the state of Washington)) is authorized to carry a concealed pistol in this state if:

(i) The ((licensing state does not issue concealed pistol licenses to persons under twenty-one)) license holder from the other state is not under eighteen years of age; and

(ii) The licensing state requires mandatory fingerprint-based background checks of criminal and mental health history for all persons who apply for a concealed pistol license.

(b) This section applies to a license holder from another state only while the license holder is not a resident of this state. A license holder from another state must carry the handgun in compliance with the laws of this state.

(2) The attorney general shall periodically publish a list of states the laws of which ((recognize and give effect in that state to a concealed pistol license issued under the laws of the state of Washington and which)) meet the requirements of subsection (1)(a)(((i) and (ii))) of this section.

--- END ---