BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not apply to vehicles used in autonomous vehicle testing, or persons directly involved in that testing, if the testing occurs:

(1) Within the boundaries of Joint Base Lewis-McChord military base; and

(2) With the prior written approval of the joint base garrison commander, setting the time, place, and general plan for the autonomous vehicle testing.

--- END ---