BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

The department may not deny a license to serve foster children under this chapter for lacking proof of influenza immunizations for individuals living in the foster home.

--- END ---