BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 59.20.050 and 1999 c 359 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No landlord may offer a mobile home lot for rent to anyone without offering a written rental agreement for a term of one year or more. No landlord may offer to anyone any rental agreement for a term of one year or more for which the monthly rental is greater, or the terms of payment or other material conditions more burdensome to the tenant, than any month-to-month rental agreement also offered to such tenant or prospective tenant. Anyone who desires to occupy a mobile home lot for other than a term of one year or more may have the option to be on a month-to-month basis but must waive, in writing, the right to such one year or more term: PROVIDED, That annually, at any anniversary date of the tenancy the tenant may require that the landlord provide a written rental agreement for a term of one year. No landlord shall allow a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model to be moved into a mobile home park in this state until a written rental agreement has been signed by and is in the possession of the parties: PROVIDED, That if the landlord allows the tenant to move a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model into a mobile home park without obtaining a written rental agreement for a term of one year or more, or a written waiver of the right to a one-year term or more, the term of the tenancy shall be deemed to be for one year from the date of occupancy of the mobile home lot((;)).

(2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply if:

(a) The mobile home park or part thereof has been acquired or is under imminent threat of condemnation for a public works project((,)); or

(b) An employer-employee relationship exists between a landlord and tenant((;)).

(3) No landlord may offer a mobile home lot for rent or sale without providing the prospective tenant or buyer (a) a copy of the proposed rental or sale agreement, (b) a copy of the rules and regulations of the mobile home park, and (c) a copy of the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act (this chapter) no later than three days prior to the signing of the rental or sale agreement. A landlord satisfies the requirements of this subsection by providing the prospective tenant or buyer a copy of each document either by paper, email, or the web site where such information may be found. The final rental or sales agreement must indicate that the renter or buyer was provided a copy of each of the documents required under this subsection and that by signing the agreement the renter or buyer attests that he or she has received a copy of each of the documents required under this subsection.

(4) The provisions of this section shall apply to any tenancy upon expiration of the term of any oral or written rental agreement governing such tenancy.

--- END ---