BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.46.010 and 2014 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative authority of any county or city must identify in the adopted budget the capital projects funded in whole or in part from the proceeds of the tax authorized in this section, and must indicate that such tax is intended to be in addition to other funds that may be reasonably available for such capital projects.

(2)(a) The legislative authority of any county or any city may impose an excise tax on each sale of real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-quarter of one percent of the selling price. The revenues from this tax must be used by any city or county with a population of five thousand or less and any city or county that does not plan under RCW 36.70A.040 for any capital purpose identified in a capital improvements plan and local capital improvements, including those listed in RCW 35.43.040.

(b) After April 30, 1992, revenues generated from the tax imposed under this subsection (2) in counties over five thousand population and cities over five thousand population that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 must be used solely for financing capital projects specified in a capital facilities plan element of a comprehensive plan and housing relocation assistance under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450. However, revenues (i) pledged by such counties and cities to debt retirement prior to April 30, 1992, may continue to be used for that purpose until the original debt for which the revenues were pledged is retired, or (ii) committed prior to April 30, 1992, by such counties or cities to a project may continue to be used for that purpose until the project is completed.

(3) In lieu of imposing the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2), the legislative authority of any county or any city may impose an additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-half of one percent of the selling price.

(4) Taxes imposed under this section must be collected from persons who are taxable by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the unincorporated areas of the county or within the corporate limits of the city, as the case may be.

(5) Taxes imposed under this section must comply with all applicable rules, regulations, laws, and court decisions regarding real estate excise taxes as imposed by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW.

(6) ((As used in this section,)) The definitions in this subsection (6) apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "City" means any city or town ((and)).

(b) "Capital project" means those public works projects of a local government for planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets; roads; highways; sidewalks; street and road lighting systems; traffic signals; bridges; domestic water systems; storm and sanitary sewer systems; parks; recreational facilities; law enforcement facilities; fire protection facilities; trails; libraries; administrative ((and/or)) facilities; judicial facilities; river ((and/or)) flood control projects; waterway flood control projects by those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended funds derived from the tax authorized by this section for such purposes; ((and,)) until December 31, 1995, housing projects for those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended or committed to expend funds derived from the tax authorized by this section or the tax authorized by RCW 82.46.035 for such purposes; and technology infrastructure that is integral to the capital project.

(7) From July 22, 2011, until December 31, 2016, a city or county may use the greater of one hundred thousand dollars or thirty-five percent of available funds under this section, but not to exceed one million dollars per year, for the operations and maintenance of existing capital projects as defined in subsection (6) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 82.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A city or county that meets the requirements of subsection (2) of this section may use the greater of one hundred thousand dollars or twenty-five percent of available funds, but not to exceed one million dollars per year, from revenues collected under RCW 82.46.010 for the maintenance of capital projects, as defined in RCW 82.46.010(6)(b).

(2) A city or county may use revenues pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if:

(a) The city or county prepares a written report demonstrating that it has or will have adequate funding from all sources of public funding to pay for all capital projects, as defined in RCW 82.46.010, identified in its capital facilities plan for the succeeding two-year period. Cities or counties not required to prepare a capital facilities plan may satisfy this provision by using a document that, at a minimum, identifies capital project needs and available public funding sources for the succeeding two-year period; and

(b) The city or county has not enacted, after the effective date of this section, any requirement on the listing, leasing, or sale of real property, unless the requirement is either specifically authorized by state or federal law or is a seller or landlord disclosure requirement pursuant to section 4 of this act.

(3) The report prepared under subsection (2)(a) of this section must: (a) Include information necessary to determine compliance with the requirements of subsection (2)(a) of this section; (b) identify how revenues collected under RCW 82.46.010 were used by the city or county during the prior two-year period; (c) identify how funds authorized under subsection (1) of this section will be used during the succeeding two-year period; and (d) identify what percentage of funding for capital projects within the city or county is attributable to revenues under RCW 82.46.010 compared to all other sources of capital project funding. The city or county must prepare and adopt the report as part of its regular, public budget process.

(4) The authority to use funds as authorized in this section is in addition to the authority to use funds pursuant to RCW 82.46.010(7), which remains in effect through December 31, 2016.

(5) For purposes of this section, "maintenance" means the use of funds for labor and materials that will preserve, prevent the decline of, or extend the useful life of a capital project. "Maintenance" does not include labor or material costs for routine operations of a capital project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 82.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A city or county that meets the requirements of subsection (2) of this section may use the greater of one hundred thousand dollars or twenty-five percent of available funds, but not to exceed one million dollars per year, from revenues collected under RCW 82.46.035 for:

(a) The maintenance of capital projects, as defined in RCW 82.46.035(5); or

(b) The planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement, rehabilitation, improvement, or maintenance of capital projects as defined in RCW 82.46.010(6)(b) that are not also included within the definition of capital projects in RCW 82.46.035(5).

(2) A city or county may use revenues pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if:

(a) The city or county prepares a written report demonstrating that it has or will have adequate funding from all sources of public funding to pay for all capital projects, as defined in RCW 82.46.035(5), identified in its capital facilities plan for the succeeding two-year period; and

(b) The city or county has not enacted, after the effective date of this section, any requirement on the listing, leasing, or sale of real property, unless the requirement is either specifically authorized by state or federal law or is a seller or landlord disclosure requirement pursuant to section 4 of this act.

(3) The report prepared under subsection (2)(a) of this section must: (a) Include information necessary to determine compliance with the requirements of subsection (2)(a) of this section; (b) identify how revenues collected under RCW 82.46.035 were used by the city or county during the prior two-year period; (c) identify how funds authorized under subsection (1) of this section will be used during the succeeding two-year period; and (d) identify what percentage of funding for capital projects within the city or county is attributable to revenues under RCW 82.46.035 compared to all other sources of capital project funding. The city or county must prepare and adopt the report as part of its regular, public budget process.

(4) The authority to use funds as authorized in this section is in addition to the authority to use funds pursuant to RCW 82.46.035(7), which remains in effect through December 31, 2016.

(5) For purposes of this section, "maintenance" means the use of funds for labor and materials that will preserve, prevent the decline of, or extend the useful life of a capital project. "Maintenance" does not include labor or material costs for routine operations of a capital project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 64.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any ordinance, resolution, or policy adopted by a city or county that imposes a requirement on landlords or sellers of real property, or their agents, to provide information to a buyer or tenant pertaining to the subject property or the surrounding area is effective only after the ordinance, resolution, or policy is posted electronically in accordance with RCW 43.110.030(2)(e).

(2) If, prior to the effective date of this section, a city or county adopted an ordinance, resolution, or policy that imposes a requirement on landlords or sellers of real property, or their agents, to provide information to a buyer or tenant pertaining to the subject property or the surrounding area, the city or county must cause the ordinance, resolution, or policy to be posted electronically in accordance with RCW 43.110.030(2)(e) within ninety days of the effective date of this section, or the requirement shall thereafter cease to be in effect.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.110.030 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of commerce must contract for the provision of municipal research and services to cities, towns, and counties. Contracts for municipal research and services must be made with state agencies, educational institutions, or private consulting firms, that in the judgment of the department are qualified to provide such research and services. Contracts for staff support may be made with state agencies, educational institutions, or private consulting firms that in the judgment of the department are qualified to provide such support.

(2) Municipal research and services consists of:

(a) Studying and researching city, town, and county government and issues relating to city, town, and county government;

(b) Acquiring, preparing, and distributing publications related to city, town, and county government and issues relating to city, town, and county government;

(c) Providing educational conferences relating to city, town, and county government and issues relating to city, town, and county government; ((and))

(d) Furnishing legal, technical, consultative, and field services to cities, towns, and counties concerning planning, public health, utility services, fire protection, law enforcement, public works, and other issues relating to city, town, and county government; and

(e) Providing a list of all requirements imposed by all cities, towns, and counties on landlords or sellers of real property to provide information to a buyer or tenant pertaining to the subject property or the surrounding area. The list must be posted in a specific section on a web site maintained by the entity with which the department of commerce contracts for the provision of municipal research and services under this section, and must list by jurisdiction all applicable requirements. Cities, towns, and counties must provide information for posting on the web site in accordance with section 4 of this act.

(3) Requests for legal services by county officials must be sent to the office of the county prosecuting attorney. Responses by the department of commerce to county requests for legal services must be provided to the requesting official and the county prosecuting attorney.

(4) The department of commerce must coordinate with the association of Washington cities and the Washington state association of counties in carrying out the activities in this section.

--- END ---