BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act may be known and cited as the Puget Sound armed services legacy memorial act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The legislature recognizes that Washington is home for all branches of the military with a significant presence throughout Puget Sound. We recognize that hundreds of thousands of men and women who have valiantly served and defended the United States of America have connections to Washington state. Billions of dollars flow through our economy because of the active and industrious military presence. Knowing how important this industry is to our country and state, we have the unique opportunity to build a historic monument, freight mobility corridor, and economic vitality zone as a fitting tribute. The legislature finds that the United States navy moors decommissioned and soon-to-be decommissioned aircraft carriers in Bremerton, Washington. These ships have decades of military history associated with their service that are worth incorporating into a functional monument instead of being towed away and reduced to nothing more than scrap metal and memories.

The legislature further finds that state route number 16 is the traffic corridor connecting the port of Tacoma and Interstate 5 to Bremerton. A bridge across Sinclair Inlet linking state route number 16 to state route number 304 will provide a safer freight mobility corridor than what currently exists, and a bridge has been requested by the community for over a decade.

The legislature intends to build the Puget Sound armed services legacy memorial incorporating the aircraft carriers into the design of a stately bridge. This rare military tribute will be the catalyst for revitalizing economic activity, tourism, and jobs in the surrounding areas. It will recycle and memorialize the aircraft carriers while also opening the door to a multitude of additional funding sources beyond that of a traditional bridge.

The legislature intends to create a task force to look at this auspicious project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The Puget Sound armed services legacy memorial legislative joint task force is established for the purposes of gathering information, identifying issues, and planning for future steps related to building an armed services tribute bridge near Bremerton naval base. The task force must be comprised of voting members as follows:

(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;

(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives; and

(c) The primary sponsor of this act is chair of the task force and must call the first meeting of the task force.

(2) The task force must invite the following ex officio members:

(a) The commander of the Kitsap naval base, or his or her designee;

(b) The mayors of Bremerton and Port Orchard, or their designees;

(c) The secretary of transportation, or his or her designee;

(d) The director of the state department of veterans affairs, or his or her designee;

(e) A delegate for Kitsap county government, as recommended by the task force chair with approval from the chairs of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees;

(f) A delegate from a Kitsap county veterans organization, as recommended by the task force chair with approval from the chairs of the house of representatives and senate transportation committees;

(g) A delegate of the Suquamish tribe, as appointed by the chief of the tribe; and

(h) A delegate of the Port Gamble S'klallam tribe, as appointed by the chief of the tribe.

(3) The task force must hold at least two work sessions during 2015 to explore acquiring decommissioned aircraft carriers moored at Bremerton from the federal government to be incorporated into a highway bridge as an extension of state route number 16 to connect with state route number 304 and as a tribute to armed forces that have served in Washington and on the aircraft carriers.

(4)(a) At a minimum, the task force must:

(i) Visit the proposed location and see the aircraft carriers if permitted by the United States navy; and

(ii) Take testimony from the following:

(A) A panel of experts on bridge design;

(B) A panel with knowledge of military historical monuments; and

(C) A panel of community leaders to discuss economic benefits and jobs that may be brought to the region.

(b) The voting members of the task force may ask the house of representatives office of program research or senate committee services to research and report on issues related to the feasibility of such a project.

(5)(a) The task force shall use legislative facilities, and staff support must be provided by senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research. In addition, the departments of transportation and veterans affairs must cooperate with the task force and provide information as the chair and task force members may reasonably request.

(b) Nonlegislative members and presenters to the task force from state departments or agencies may be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(c) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.

(d) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives.

(6) This section expires December 31, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary of transportation must contact the commander of the United States navy's inactive ship maintenance facility regarding the right to purchase decommissioned aircraft carriers located at Bremerton and purchase such vessels if funding is available.

--- END ---