BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.88.092 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 33 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As part of the biennial budget process, the office of financial management shall collect from agencies, and agencies shall provide, information to produce reports, summaries, and budget detail sufficient to allow review, analysis, and documentation of all current and proposed expenditures for information technology by state agencies. Information technology budget detail must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required pursuant to RCW 43.88.030.

(2) The office of financial management must collect, and present as part of the biennial budget documentation, information for all existing information technology projects as defined by technology services board policy. The office of financial management must work with the office of the chief information officer to maximize the ability to draw this information from the information technology portfolio management data collected by the consolidated technology services agency. Connecting project information collected through the portfolio management process with financial data developed under subsection (1) of this section provides transparency regarding expenditure data for existing technology projects.

(3) The chief information officer shall evaluate proposed information technology expenditures and establish priority ranking categories of the proposals. No more than one-third of the proposed expenditures shall be ranked in the highest priority category.

(4)(a) In addition to and in support of the chief information officer's prioritization of proposed information technology expenditures required by subsection (3) of this section, agency budget requests for proposed information technology expenditures must include the following:

(i) The agency's priority ranking of each information technology request;

(ii) The estimated cost of the request for the current biennium;

(iii) The estimated total cost of the request over all biennia; and

(iv) The expected timeline to complete the request.

(b) The office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management may also request agencies to include additional information on proposed information technology expenditure requests.

(5) The biennial budget documentation submitted by the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.030 must include an information technology plan and a technology budget for the state identifying current baseline funding for information technology, proposed and ongoing major information technology projects, and their associated costs. This plan and technology budget must be presented using a method similar to the capital budget, identifying project costs through stages of the project and across fiscal periods and biennia from project initiation to implementation. This information must be submitted electronically, in a format to be determined by the office of financial management and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.

(((5))) (6) The office of financial management shall also institute a method of accounting for information technology-related expenditures, including creating common definitions for what constitutes an information technology investment.

(((6))) (7) For the purposes of this section, "major information technology projects" includes projects that have a significant anticipated cost, complexity, or are of statewide significance, such as enterprise-level solutions, enterprise resource planning, and shared services initiatives.

--- END ---