BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a fee of ten cents placed upon each sale at retail of prescription opioids. Receipts from the sale shall be remitted to the department of revenue at the same time as the pharmacy remits its business and occupations tax.

(2) The department of revenue shall deposit all receipts from the fee in subsection (1) this section in the naloxone access account established in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) The naloxone access account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the fee in subsection (1) of this section must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may only be used for the department of health to administer the naloxone access grant program and distribute grants to local health jurisdictions.

(4) The department shall establish the naloxone access grant program to distribute funds to local health jurisdictions to purchase naloxone and distribute it to persons at highest risk for opioid overdose. The department shall establish all necessary procedures to administer the naloxone access grant program, including establishing application procedures, adopting scoring criteria for grant applications, and distributing grants from the naloxone access account to successful applicants.

--- END ---