BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.46.105 and 2010 c 249 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A toll collection system may include, but is not limited to, electronic toll collection and photo tolling.

(2)(a) A photo toll system may take photographs, digital photographs, microphotographs, videotapes, or other recorded images of the vehicle and vehicle license plate only.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs, digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, other recorded images, or other records identifying a specific instance of travel prepared under this chapter are for the exclusive use of the tolling agency for toll collection and enforcement purposes and are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding relates to a civil penalty under RCW 46.63.160. No photograph, digital photograph, microphotograph, videotape, other recorded image, or other record identifying a specific instance of travel may be used for any purpose other than toll collection or enforcement of civil penalties under RCW 46.63.160. Records identifying a specific instance of travel by a specific person or vehicle must be retained only as required to ensure payment and enforcement of tolls and to comply with state records retention policies.

(3) The department and its agents shall only use electronic toll collection system technology for toll collection purposes.

(4) Tolls may be collected and paid by the following methods:

(a) A customer may pay an electronic toll through an electronic toll collection account;

(b) A customer who does not have an electronic toll collection account may pay a photo toll either through a customer-initiated payment or in response to a toll bill; or

(c) A customer who does not have an electronic toll collection account may pay with cash on toll facilities that have a manual cash collection system.

(5) The department may charge a customer only one toll for multiple crossings of the Tacoma Narrows bridge while traveling in the same vehicle in a single calendar day.

(6) To the extent practicable, the department shall adopt electronic toll collection options, which allow for anonymous customer accounts and anonymous accounts that are not linked to a specific vehicle.

(((6))) (7) The transportation commission shall adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, to assess administrative fees as appropriate for toll collection processes. Administrative fees must not exceed toll collection costs. All administrative fees collected under this section must be deposited into the toll facility account of the facility on which the toll was assessed.

(((7))) (8) Failure to pay a photo toll by the toll payment due date is a violation for which a notice of civil penalty may be issued under RCW 46.63.160.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.46.110 and 2002 c 114 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall retain toll charges on any existing and future facilities constructed under this chapter and financed primarily by bonds issued by the state until:

(a) All costs of investigation, financing, acquisition of property, and construction advanced from the motor vehicle fund have been fully repaid, except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section;

(b) Obligations incurred in constructing that facility have been fully paid; and

(c) The motor vehicle fund is fully repaid under RCW 47.46.140.

(2) This section does not:

(a) Prohibit the use of toll revenues to fund maintenance, operations, or management of facilities constructed under this chapter except as prohibited by RCW 47.56.245;

(b) Require repayment of funds specifically appropriated as a nonreimbursable state financial contribution to a project.

(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2)(a) of this section, upon satisfaction of the conditions enumerated in subsection (1) of this section:

(a) The facility must be operated as a toll-free facility; and

(b) The operation, maintenance, upkeep, and repair of the facility must be paid from funds appropriated for the use of the department for the construction and maintenance of the primary state highways of the state of Washington.

(4) As provided in RCW 47.46.105(5), the department may charge a driver only one toll for multiple crossings of the Tacoma Narrows bridge in one day.

--- END ---