BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the 2015-16 school year, an enhancement of 0.5 additional certificated instructional staff per prototypical elementary school must be allocated for purposes of promoting a safe and healthy school learning climate. The allocations required by this section are in addition to the allocations required by RCW 28A.150.260. The allocation formula in this section is for school district allocation purposes only, but funding so appropriated must be expended for the purposes of this section.

(2) Services that may be supported by these allocations include, but are not limited to:

(a) Physical care;

(b) Mental health care and social emotional learning. Social emotional learning is the process through which children acquire the knowledge, attitudes, and skills they need to recognize and manage their emotions, demonstrate caring for others, establish positive relationships, make responsible decisions, and handle challenging situations constructively; and

(c) Connecting students and their families, particularly homeless students and their families, to housing assistance, employment assistance, counseling, and other community resources.

--- END ---