BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to enact legislation concerning improving the fiscal health of local governments to ensure the continued provision of vital public services and high quality of life in Washington communities.

--- END ---