BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.535 and 2014 c 192 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((There is levied and collected a marijuana excise tax equal to twenty-five percent of the selling price on each wholesale sale in this state of marijuana by a licensed marijuana producer to a licensed marijuana processor or another licensed marijuana producer. This tax is the obligation of the licensed marijuana producer.

(2) There is levied and collected a marijuana excise tax equal to twenty-five percent of the selling price on each wholesale sale in this state of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products by a licensed marijuana processor to a licensed marijuana retailer. This tax is the obligation of the licensed marijuana processor.

(3))) There is levied and collected a marijuana excise tax equal to ((twenty-five)) thirty percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products. This tax is ((the obligation of the licensed marijuana retailer, is)) separate and in addition to general state and local sales and use taxes that apply to retail sales of tangible personal property, and is not part of the total retail price to which general state and local sales and use taxes apply.

(((4))) (2) All revenues collected from the marijuana excise ((taxes)) tax imposed under ((subsections (1) through (3) of)) this section shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the dedicated marijuana fund.

(((5))) (3) The ((state liquor control board shall)) tax imposed in this section must be paid by the buyer to the seller. Each seller must collect from the buyer the full amount of the tax payable on each taxable sale. The tax collected as required by this section are deemed to be held in trust by the seller until paid to the board. If any seller fails to collect the tax imposed in this section, or having collected the tax, fails to pay it as prescribed by the board, whether such failure is the result of the seller's own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the seller's control, the seller is, nevertheless, personally liable to the state for the amount of the tax.

(4) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Board" means the state liquor control board.

(b) "Retail sale" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.

(c) "Selling price" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010, except that when product is sold under circumstances where the total amount of consideration paid for the product is not indicative of its true value, "selling price" means the true value of the product sold as determined or agreed to by the board.

(d) "Product" means marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

(e) "True value" means market value based on sales at comparable locations in this state of the same or similar product of like quality and character sold under comparable conditions of sale to comparable purchasers. However, in the absence of such sales of the same or similar product, true value means the value of the product sold as determined by all of the seller's direct and indirect costs attributable to the product.

(f) "Wholesale sale" means any sale that is not a retail sale.

(5) The board must regularly review the tax levels established under this section and make recommendations to the legislature as appropriate regarding adjustments that would further the goal of discouraging use while undercutting illegal market prices.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.334 and 2013 c 3 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided under subsection (6) of this section, the action, order, or decision of the state liquor control board as to any denial of an application for the reissuance of a license to produce, process, or sell marijuana, or as to any revocation, suspension, or modification of any license to produce, process, or sell marijuana, ((shall)) or as to the administrative review of a notice of unpaid trust fund taxes under section 3 of this act, must be an adjudicative proceeding and subject to the applicable provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(((1))) (2) An opportunity for a hearing may be provided to an applicant for the reissuance of a license prior to the disposition of the application, and if no opportunity for a prior hearing is provided then an opportunity for a hearing to reconsider the application must be provided the applicant.

(((2))) (3) An opportunity for a hearing must be provided to a licensee prior to a revocation or modification of any license and, except as provided in subsection (((4))) (7) of this section, prior to the suspension of any license.

(((3))) (4) An opportunity for a hearing must be provided to any person issued a notice of unpaid trust fund taxes under section 3 of this act.

(5) No hearing ((shall)) may be required under this section until demanded by the applicant ((or)), licensee, or person issued a notice of unpaid trust fund taxes under section 3 of this act.

(((4))) (6) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if the licensee's or applicant's designated premises is located within a city, county, or town subject to an ordinance enacted pursuant to section 5 of this act, prohibiting the siting or operation of any business or facility to be used for the production, processing, or retail sale of marijuana.

(7) The state liquor control board may summarily suspend a license for a period of up to one hundred eighty days without a prior hearing if it finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively require emergency action, and it incorporates a finding to that effect in its order. Proceedings for revocation or other action must be promptly instituted and determined. An administrative law judge may extend the summary suspension period for up to one calendar year from the first day of the initial summary suspension in the event the proceedings for revocation or other action cannot be completed during the initial one hundred eighty-day period due to actions by the licensee. The state liquor control board's enforcement division shall complete a preliminary staff investigation of the violation before requesting an emergency suspension by the state liquor control board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW under the subchapter heading "article V" to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the board determines that a limited liability business entity has collected trust fund taxes and has failed to remit those taxes to the board and that business entity has been terminated, dissolved, or abandoned, or is insolvent, the board may pursue collection of the entity's unpaid trust fund taxes, including penalties on those taxes, against any or all of the responsible individuals. For purposes of this subsection, "insolvent" means the condition that results when the sum of the entity's debts exceeds the fair market value of its assets. The board may presume that an entity is insolvent if the entity refuses to disclose to the board the nature of its assets and liabilities.

(2)(a) For a responsible individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief financial officer, liability under this section applies regardless of fault or whether the individual was or should have been aware of the unpaid trust fund tax liability of the limited liability business entity.

(b) For any other responsible individual, liability under this section applies only if he or she willfully failed to pay or to cause to be paid to the board the trust fund taxes due from the limited liability business entity.

(3)(a) Except as provided in this subsection (3)(a), a responsible individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief financial officer is liable under this section only for trust fund tax liability accrued during the period that he or she was the chief executive or chief financial officer. However, if the responsible individual had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's trust fund taxes to the board during any period of time that the person was not the chief executive or chief financial officer, that individual is also liable for trust fund tax liability that became due during the period that he or she had the duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's taxes to the board but was not the chief executive or chief financial officer.

(b) All other responsible individuals are liable under this section only for trust fund tax liability that became due during the period he or she had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's taxes to the board.

(4) Persons described in subsection (3)(b) of this section are exempt from liability under this section in situations where nonpayment of the limited liability business entity's trust fund taxes was due to reasons beyond their control as determined by the board by rule.

(5) Any person having been issued a notice of unpaid trust fund taxes under this section is entitled to an administrative hearing under RCW 69.50.334 and any such rules the board may adopt.

(6) This section does not relieve the limited liability business entity of its trust fund tax liability or otherwise impair other tax collection remedies afforded by law.

(7) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Board" means the state liquor control board.

(b) "Chief executive" means: The president of a corporation or for other entities or organizations other than corporations or if the corporation does not have a president as one of its officers, the highest ranking executive manager or administrator in charge of the management of the company or organization.

(c) "Chief financial officer" means: The treasurer of a corporation or for entities or organizations other than corporations or if a corporation does not have a treasurer as one of its officers, the highest senior manager who is responsible for overseeing the financial activities of the entire company or organization.

(d) "Limited liability business entity" means a type of business entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity, or a business entity that is managed or owned in whole or in part by an entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity. Limited liability business entities include corporations, limited liability companies, limited liability partnerships, trusts, general partnerships and joint ventures in which one or more of the partners or parties are also limited liability business entities, and limited partnerships in which one or more of the general partners are also limited liability business entities.

(e) "Manager" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.005.

(f) "Member" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.005, except that the term only includes members of member-managed limited liability companies.

(g) "Officer" means any officer or assistant officer of a corporation, including the president, vice president, secretary, and treasurer.

(h)(i) "Responsible individual" includes any current or former officer, manager, member, partner, or trustee of a limited liability business entity with unpaid trust fund tax liability.

(ii) "Responsible individual" also includes any current or former employee or other individual, but only if the individual had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's unpaid trust fund tax liability.

(iii) Whenever any taxpayer has one or more limited liability business entities as a member, manager, or partner, "responsible individual" also includes any current and former officers, members, or managers of the limited liability business entity or entities or of any other limited liability business entity involved directly in the management of the taxpayer. For purposes of this subsection (7)(h)(iii), "taxpayer" means a limited liability business entity with unpaid trust fund taxes.

(i) "Trust fund taxes" means taxes collected from buyers and deemed held in trust under RCW 69.50.535.

(j) "Willfully failed to pay or to cause to be paid" means that the failure was the result of an intentional, conscious, and voluntary course of action.

Sec. 4. RCW 69.50.331 and 2013 c 3 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of considering any application for a license to produce, process, or sell marijuana, or for the renewal of a license to produce, process, or sell marijuana, the state liquor control board may cause an inspection of the premises to be made, and may inquire into all matters in connection with the construction and operation of the premises. For the purpose of reviewing any application for a license and for considering the denial, suspension, revocation, or renewal or denial thereof, of any license, the state liquor control board may consider any prior criminal conduct of the applicant including an administrative violation history record with the state liquor control board and a criminal history record information check. The state liquor control board may submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The state liquor control board shall require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation. The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW shall not apply to these cases. Subject to the provisions of this section, the state liquor control board may, in its discretion, grant or deny the renewal or license applied for. Denial may be based on, without limitation, the existence of chronic illegal activity documented in objections submitted pursuant to subsections (7)(c) and (9) of this section. Authority to approve an uncontested or unopposed license may be granted by the state liquor control board to any staff member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting this authority shall be adopted by rule. No license of any kind may be issued to:

(a) A person under the age of twenty-one years;

(b) A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not lawfully resided in the state for at least ((three)) six months prior to applying to receive a license;

(c) A partnership, employee cooperative, association, nonprofit corporation, or corporation unless formed under the laws of this state, and unless all of the members thereof are qualified to obtain a license as provided in this section; or

(d) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or agent, unless the manager or agent possesses the same qualifications required of the licensee.

(2)(a) The state liquor control board may, in its discretion, subject to the provisions of RCW 69.50.334, suspend or cancel any license; and all protections of the licensee from criminal or civil sanctions under state law for producing, processing, or selling marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products thereunder shall be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.

(b) The state liquor control board shall immediately suspend the license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license shall be automatic upon the state liquor control board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

(c) The state liquor control board may request the appointment of administrative law judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who shall have power to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under rules and regulations the state liquor control board may adopt.

(d) Witnesses shall be allowed fees and mileage each way to and from any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446. Fees need not be paid in advance of appearance of witnesses to testify or to produce books, records, or other legal evidence.

(e) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order of the state liquor control board or a subpoena issued by the state liquor control board, or any of its members, or administrative law judges, or on the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, the judge of the superior court of the county in which the person resides, on application of any member of the board or administrative law judge, shall compel obedience by contempt proceedings, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said court or a refusal to testify therein.

(3) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a license, the licensee shall forthwith deliver up the license to the state liquor control board. Where the license has been suspended only, the state liquor control board shall return the license to the licensee at the expiration or termination of the period of suspension. The state liquor control board shall notify all other licensees in the county where the subject licensee has its premises of the suspension or cancellation of the license; and no other licensee or employee of another licensee may allow or cause any marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products to be delivered to or for any person at the premises of the subject licensee.

(4) Every license issued under chapter 3, Laws of 2013 shall be subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by chapter 3, Laws of 2013 or by rules adopted by the state liquor control board to implement and enforce chapter 3, Laws of 2013. All conditions and restrictions imposed by the state liquor control board in the issuance of an individual license shall be listed on the face of the individual license along with the trade name, address, and expiration date.

(5) Every licensee shall post and keep posted its license, or licenses, in a conspicuous place on the premises.

(6) No licensee shall employ any person under the age of twenty-one years.

(7)(a) Before the state liquor control board issues a new or renewed license to an applicant it shall give notice of the application to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town, if the application is for a license within an incorporated city or town, or to the county legislative authority, if the application is for a license outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.

(b) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee selected by it, or the county legislative authority or the official or employee selected by it, shall have the right to file with the state liquor control board within twenty days after the date of transmittal of the notice for applications, or at least thirty days prior to the expiration date for renewals, written objections against the applicant or against the premises for which the new or renewed license is asked. The state liquor control board may extend the time period for submitting written objections.

(c) The written objections shall include a statement of all facts upon which the objections are based, and in case written objections are filed, the city or town or county legislative authority may request, and the state liquor control board may in its discretion hold, a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If the state liquor control board makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal based on the written objections of an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority, the applicant may request a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If a hearing is held at the request of the applicant, state liquor control board representatives shall present and defend the state liquor control board's initial decision to deny a license or renewal.

(d) Upon the granting of a license under this title the state liquor control board shall send written notification to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to the county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.

(8)(a) The state liquor control board shall not issue a license for any premises within:

(i) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, one thousand feet of the perimeter of the grounds of any elementary or secondary school, playground, recreation center or facility, child care center, public park, public transit center, or library, or any game arcade admission to which is not restricted to persons aged twenty-one years or older; or

(ii) A city, county, or town that has enacted an ordinance pursuant to section 5 of this act.

(b) A city, county, or town may permit the licensing of premises within one thousand feet but not less than one hundred feet of the uses described in (a)(i) of this subsection, except elementary schools, secondary schools, and playgrounds, by adopting legislation declaring that the exemption:

(i) Is necessary to create enough potential locations within the city, town, or county to allow a marijuana producer, processor, or retailer to be sited; and

(ii) Will not negatively impact the jurisdiction's strong regulatory enforcement, law enforcement interests, public safety, or public health. The state liquor control board may license premises complying with the distance requirements stated in the ordinance.

(9) In determining whether to grant or deny a license or renewal of any license, the state liquor control board shall give substantial weight to objections from an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority based upon chronic illegal activity associated with the applicant's operations of the premises proposed to be licensed or the applicant's operation of any other licensed premises, or the conduct of the applicant's patrons inside or outside the licensed premises. "Chronic illegal activity" means (a) a pervasive pattern of activity that threatens the public health, safety, and welfare of the city, town, or county including, but not limited to, open container violations, assaults, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or other criminal law violations, or as documented in crime statistics, police reports, emergency medical response data, calls for service, field data, or similar records of a law enforcement agency for the city, town, county, or any other municipal corporation or any state agency; or (b) an unreasonably high number of citations for violations of RCW 46.61.502 associated with the applicant's or licensee's operation of any licensed premises as indicated by the reported statements given to law enforcement upon arrest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any registered voter of a county, city, or town may submit a petition calling for the county, city, or town to prohibit the siting or operation of any business or facility to be used for the production, processing, and retail sale of marijuana products under this chapter. The petition must be signed by thirty percent or more of the voters of the jurisdiction and must be filed with the legislative authority of the applicable county, city, or town. With respect to petitions to be filed with a county under this subsection, only registered voters in the unincorporated area of the county may initiate and sign the petition.

(b) If the legislative authority determines the petition to be sufficient, it must, within sixty days of determining the petition to be sufficient, hold a public hearing on the petition and an implementing ordinance. Following the public hearing, the legislative authority of the county, city, or town must submit the question of prohibiting siting or operation of any business or facility to be used for the production, processing, or retail sale of marijuana products under this chapter to the voters of the jurisdiction at a general election.

(c) If a majority of the voters of the county, city, or town voting in the election approve the prohibition, the prohibition will take effect on the date specified in the petition. If no effective date is specified in the petition, the prohibition takes effect sixty days after the election.

(2) As an alternative to the petition process established in subsection (1) of this section, the legislative authority of any city, town, or county may initiate an ordinance provided for in subsection (1) of this section by submitting a ballot proposition at a general election prohibiting the siting or operation of any business or facility to be used for the production, processing, or sale of marijuana under this chapter. If a majority of the voters of the county, city, or town voting in the election approve the prohibition, the prohibition takes effect on the date specified in the ballot proposition. If no effective date is specified in the ballot proposition, the prohibition will take effect sixty days after the election.

(3) With respect to a county enacting an ordinance under this section, the ordinance may only apply to unincorporated areas of the county. No voters within the boundaries of an incorporated city or town may participate in a county election under this section.

(4) Nothing in this section may be construed to extend powers to cities, counties, or towns beyond the power to prohibit the siting or operation of any business or facility to be used for the production, processing, or sale of marijuana.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, counties also have the authority granted in section 5 of this act to prohibit by ordinance the siting or operation of any business or facility to be used for the production, processing, or sale of marijuana under chapter 69.50 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, cities and towns also have the authority granted in section 5 of this act to prohibit by ordinance the siting or operation of any business or facility to be used for the production, processing, or sale of marijuana under chapter 69.50 RCW

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, code cities also have the authority granted in section 5 of this act to prohibit by ordinance the siting or operation of any business or facility to be used for the production, processing, or sale of marijuana under chapter 69.50 RCW.

Sec. 9. RCW 69.50.445 and 2013 c 3 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful to open a package containing marijuana, useable marijuana, ((or a)) marijuana-infused products, or marijuana concentrate, or consume marijuana, useable marijuana, ((or a)) marijuana-infused products, or marijuana concentrate, in ((view of the general)) a public place.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "public place" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 66.04.010, but the exclusions in RCW 66.04.011 do not apply.

(3) A person who violates this section is guilty of a class 3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A licensed marijuana producer, marijuana processor, or marijuana retailer, or their employees, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and the administrative rules adopted thereunder, may use the services of a common carrier subject to regulation under chapters 81.28 and 81.29 RCW and licensed in compliance with the regulations established under section 11 of this act, to physically transport or deliver marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products within the state.

(2) An employee of a common carrier engaged in marijuana-related transportation or delivery services authorized under subsection (1) of this section is prohibited from carrying or using a firearm during the course of providing such services, unless:

(a) Pursuant to section 11 of this act, the state liquor control board explicitly authorizes the carrying or use of firearms by such employee while engaged in the transportation or delivery services;

(b) The employee has an armed private security guard license issued pursuant to RCW 18.170.040; and

(c) The employee is in full compliance with the regulations established by the state liquor control board under section 11 of this act.

(3) A common carrier licensed under section 11 of this act may, for the purpose of transporting and delivering marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products, utilize Washington state ferry routes for such transportation and delivery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The state liquor control board must adopt rules providing for an annual licensing procedure of a common carrier who seeks to transport or deliver marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products within the state.

(2) The rules for licensing must:

(a) Establish criteria for considering the approval or denial of a common carrier's original application or renewal application;

(b) Provide minimum qualifications for any employee authorized to drive or operate the transportation or delivery vehicle, including a minimum age of at least twenty-one years;

(c) Address the safety of the employees transporting or delivering the products, including issues relating to the carrying of firearms by such employees;

(d) Address the security of the products being transported, including a system of electronically tracking all products at both the point of pickup and the point of delivery; and

(e) Set reasonable fees for the application and licensing process.

(3) The state liquor control board may adopt rules establishing the maximum amounts of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products that may be physically transported or delivered at one time by a common carrier as provided under section 10 of this act.

Sec. 12. RCW 69.50.4013 and 2013 c 3 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to possess a controlled substance unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by this chapter.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 69.50.4014, any person who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3)(a) The possession, by a person twenty-one years of age or older, of useable marijuana or marijuana-infused products in amounts that do not exceed those set forth in RCW 69.50.360(3) is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

(b) The possession of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products being physically transported or delivered within the state, in amounts not exceeding those that may be established under section 11(3) of this act, by an employee of a common carrier when performing the duties authorized under section 10 of this act, is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

Sec. 13. RCW 69.50.4014 and 2003 c 53 s 335 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in RCW 69.50.401(2)(c) or as otherwise authorized by this chapter, any person found guilty of possession of forty grams or less of ((marihuana)) marijuana is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 14. RCW 18.170.020 and 2007 c 154 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The requirements of this chapter do not apply to:

(1) A person who is employed exclusively or regularly by one employer and performs the functions of a private security guard solely in connection with the affairs of that employer, if the employer is not a private security company. However, in accordance with section 10 of this act, an employee engaged in marijuana-related transportation or delivery services on behalf of a common carrier must be licensed as an armed private security guard under this chapter in order to be authorized to carry or use a firearm while providing such services;

(2) A sworn peace officer while engaged in the performance of the officer's official duties;

(3) A sworn peace officer while employed by any person to engage in off-duty employment as a private security guard, but only if the employment is approved by the chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction where the employment takes place and the sworn peace officer does not employ, contract with, or broker for profit other persons to assist him or her in performing the duties related to his or her private employer; or

(4) A person performing crowd management or guest services including, but not limited to, a person described as a ticket taker, usher, door attendant, parking attendant, crowd monitor, or event staff who:

(a) Does not carry a firearm or other dangerous weapon including, but not limited to, a stun gun, taser, pepper mace, or nightstick;

(b) Does not wear a uniform or clothing readily identifiable by a member of the public as that worn by a private security officer or law enforcement officer; and

(c) Does not have as his or her primary responsibility the detainment of persons or placement of persons under arrest.

The exemption provided in this subsection applies only when a crowd has assembled for the purpose of attending or taking part in an organized event, including preevent assembly, event operation hours, and postevent departure activities.

Sec. 15. RCW 66.08.050 and 2014 c 63 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The board, subject to the provisions of this title and the rules, must:

(1) Determine the nature, form and capacity of all packages to be used for containing liquor kept for sale under this title;

(2) Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and documents in the name of the board, under such regulations as the board may fix;

(3) Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations whatsoever relating to the business of the board;

(4) Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the board, and to determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such employee;

(5) Perform services for the state lottery commission to such extent, and for such compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon between the board and the commission;

(6) Accept and deposit into the general fund-local account and disburse, subject to appropriation, federal grants or other funds or donations from any source for the purpose of improving public awareness of the health risks associated with alcohol and marijuana consumption by youth and the abuse of alcohol and marijuana by adults in Washington state. The board's alcohol awareness program must cooperate with federal and state agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an active public beverage alcohol awareness program;

(7) Monitor and regulate the practices of licensees as necessary in order to prevent the theft and illegal trafficking of liquor pursuant to RCW 66.28.350;

(8) Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the foregoing or not, to carry out the provisions of this title, and has full power to do each and every act necessary to the conduct of its regulatory functions, including all supplies procurement, preparation and approval of forms, and every other undertaking necessary to perform its regulatory functions whatsoever, subject only to audit by the state auditor. However, the board has no authority to regulate the content of spoken language on licensed premises where wine and other liquors are served and where there is not a clear and present danger of disorderly conduct being provoked by such language or to restrict advertising of lawful prices.

Sec. 16. RCW 69.50.540 and 2013 c 3 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

All marijuana excise taxes collected from sales of marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products under RCW 69.50.535, and the license fees, penalties, and forfeitures derived under chapter 3, Laws of 2013 from marijuana producer, marijuana processor, and marijuana retailer licenses shall every three months be disbursed by the state liquor control board as follows:

(1) One hundred twenty-five thousand dollars to the department of social and health services to design and administer the Washington state healthy youth survey, analyze the collected data, and produce reports, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, department of health, department of commerce, family policy council, and state liquor control board. The survey shall be conducted at least every two years and include questions regarding, but not necessarily limited to, academic achievement, age at time of substance use initiation, antisocial behavior of friends, attitudes toward antisocial behavior, attitudes toward substance use, laws and community norms regarding antisocial behavior, family conflict, family management, parental attitudes toward substance use, peer rewarding of antisocial behavior, perceived risk of substance use, and rebelliousness. Funds disbursed under this subsection may be used to expand administration of the healthy youth survey to student populations attending institutions of higher education in Washington;

(2) Fifty thousand dollars to the department of social and health services for the purpose of contracting with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct the cost-benefit evaluation and produce the reports described in RCW 69.50.550. This appropriation shall end after production of the final report required by RCW 69.50.550;

(3) Five thousand dollars to the University of Washington alcohol and drug abuse institute for the creation, maintenance, and timely updating of web-based public education materials providing medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use;

(4) An amount not exceeding one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the state liquor control board as is necessary for administration of chapter 3, Laws of 2013. Within the amount provided in this subsection, the state liquor control board shall contract with one or more state or local law enforcement agencies to perform activities supporting the locating and eradication of marijuana production that is in violation of this act. The contract must prioritize, but not exclusively focus on, such violations on public land. The contract must direct the law enforcement agency to inform the appropriate federal agency or agencies of such activities;

(5) Of the funds remaining after the disbursements identified in subsections (1) through (4) of this section:

(a) Fifteen percent to the department of social and health services division of behavioral health and recovery for implementation and maintenance of programs and practices aimed at the prevention or reduction of maladaptive substance use, substance-use disorder, substance abuse or substance dependence, as these terms are defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, among middle school and high school age students, whether as an explicit goal of a given program or practice or as a consistently corresponding effect of its implementation; PROVIDED, That:

(i) Of the funds disbursed under (a) of this subsection, at least eighty-five percent must be directed to evidence-based and cost-beneficial programs and practices that produce objectively measurable results; and

(ii) Up to fifteen percent of the funds disbursed under (a) of this subsection may be directed to research-based and emerging best practices or promising practices.

In deciding which programs and practices to fund, the secretary of the department of social and health services shall consult, at least annually, with the University of Washington's social development research group and the University of Washington's alcohol and drug abuse institute;

(b) Ten percent to the department of health for the creation, implementation, operation, and management of a marijuana education and public health program that contains the following:

(i) A marijuana use public health hotline that provides referrals to substance abuse treatment providers, utilizes evidence-based or research-based public health approaches to minimizing the harms associated with marijuana use, and does not solely advocate an abstinence-only approach;

(ii) A grants program for local health departments or other local community agencies that supports development and implementation of coordinated intervention strategies for the prevention and reduction of marijuana use by youth; and

(iii) Media-based education campaigns across television, internet, radio, print, and out-of-home advertising, separately targeting youth and adults, that provide medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use;

(c) Six-tenths of one percent to the University of Washington and four-tenths of one percent to Washington State University for research on the short and long-term effects of marijuana use, to include but not be limited to formal and informal methods for estimating and measuring intoxication and impairment, and for the dissemination of such research;

(d) Fifty percent to the state basic health plan trust account to be administered by the Washington basic health plan administrator and used as provided under chapter 70.47 RCW;

(e) Five percent to the Washington state health care authority to be expended exclusively through contracts with community health centers to provide primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity health care services as provided under RCW 41.05.220;

(f) Three-tenths of one percent to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to fund grants to building bridges programs under chapter 28A.175 RCW; and

(g) The remainder to the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Cannabis beauty aids are not subject to the regulations of this chapter that apply to marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products.

(2) For purposes of this section, "cannabis beauty aid" means a product containing parts of the cannabis plant and which:

(a) Is intended for use only as a topical application to enhance appearance;

(b) Contains a THC concentration of not more than 0.3 percent;

(c) Does not cross the blood-brain barrier; and

(d) Is not intended for consumption by humans or animals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Applicants for a marijuana producer's, marijuana processor's, or marijuana retailer's license under this chapter must display a sign provided by the state liquor control board on the outside of the premises to be licensed notifying the public that the premises are subject to an application for such license. The sign must:

(a) Contain text with content sufficient to notify the public of the nature of the pending license application, the date of the application, the name of the applicant, and contact information for the state liquor control board;

(b) Be conspicuously displayed on, or immediately adjacent to, the premises subject to the application and in the location that is most likely to be seen by the public;

(c) Be of a size sufficient to ensure that it will be readily seen by the public; and

(d) Be posted within three days of the submission of the application to the state liquor control board.

(2) The state liquor control board shall adopt such rules as are necessary for the implementation of this section, including rules pertaining to the size of the sign and the text thereon, the textual content of the sign, the fee for providing the sign, and any other requirements necessary to ensure that the sign provides adequate notice to the public.

Sec. 19. RCW 69.50.101 and 2014 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, definitions of terms shall be as indicated where used in this chapter:

(a) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a patient or research subject by:

(1) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the practitioner's authorized agent); or

(2) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner.

(b) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.

(c) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.

(d) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or state laws, or federal or commission rules.

(e)(1) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:

(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or

(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II.

(2) The term does not include:

(i) a controlled substance;

(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug application;

(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, to the extent conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or

(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.

(f) "Deliver" or "delivery," means the actual or constructive transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.

(g) "Department" means the department of health.

(h) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.

(i) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.

(j) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance.

(k) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.

(l) "Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to them; (2) controlled substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection. The term does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

(m) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its successor agency.

(n) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.

(o) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:

(1) that the commission has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled substance;

(2) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and

(3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture of the controlled substance.

(p) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in subsection (z)(5) of this section, RCW 69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and 69.50.206(b)(4), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c) the term includes any positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and 69.50.208(a) the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.

(q) "Lot" means a definite quantity of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product identified by a lot number, every portion or package of which is uniform within recognized tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.

(r) "Lot number" shall identify the licensee by business or trade name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and the date of harvest or processing for each lot of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product.

(s) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled substance:

(1) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner's professional practice; or

(2) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.

(t) "Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration greater than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin. The term does not include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination.

(u) "Marijuana concentrates" means products consisting wholly or in part of the resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis and having a THC concentration greater than ((sixty)) ten percent.

(v) "Marijuana processor" means a person licensed by the state liquor control board to process marijuana into useable marijuana and marijuana-infused products, package and label useable marijuana and marijuana-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell useable marijuana and marijuana-infused products at wholesale to marijuana retailers.

(w) "Marijuana producer" means a person licensed by the state liquor control board to produce and sell marijuana at wholesale to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers.

(x) "Marijuana-infused products" means products that contain marijuana or marijuana extracts, are intended for human use, are derived from marijuana as defined in subsection (t) of this section, and have a THC concentration no greater than ((0.3)) ten percent ((and no greater than sixty percent)). The term "marijuana-infused products" does not include either useable marijuana or marijuana concentrates.

(y) "Marijuana retailer" means a person licensed by the state liquor control board to sell useable marijuana and marijuana-infused products in a retail outlet.

(z) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

(1) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.

(2) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.

(3) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.

(4) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their salts have been removed.

(5) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(6) Cocaine base.

(7) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(8) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of any substance referred to in subparagraphs (1) through (7).

(aa) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.

(bb) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L., except its seeds.

(cc) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(dd) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing.

(ee) "Practitioner" means:

(1) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW; an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.57A.020 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.57A.040; an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW; a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or research in this state.

(2) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state.

(3) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed physician assistant or a licensed osteopathic physician assistant specifically approved to prescribe controlled substances by his or her state's medical quality assurance commission or equivalent and his or her supervising physician, an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed to prescribe controlled substances, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any state of the United States.

(ff) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.

(gg) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.

(hh) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the state liquor control board for the retail sale of useable marijuana and marijuana-infused products.

(ii) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(jj) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(kk) "THC concentration" means percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol content per dry weight of any part of the plant Cannabis, or per volume or weight of marijuana product, or the combined percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant Cannabis regardless of moisture content.

(ll) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a member of the individual's household or for administering to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's household.

(mm) "Useable marijuana" means dried marijuana flowers. The term "useable marijuana" does not include either marijuana-infused products or marijuana concentrates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---