BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature recognizes that every child should experience emotional and physical development that is free from abuse and neglect. In 2015, Washington child protective services received reports screened in for investigation that alleged the sexual abuse or sexual exploitation, or both, of two thousand six hundred three children. Further, the legislature finds that most sexual assaults are unreported. The legislature also finds that a clear relationship exists between youth victimization and mental health problems and delinquent behavior.

(2) The legislature finds that twenty-six states have enacted Erin's laws. Erin's laws are intended to help children, teachers, and parents identify sexual abuse, and to provide assistance, referral, or resource information for children and families who are victims of child sexual abuse. The legislation in these states requires the study or development of age-appropriate child sexual abuse identification and prevention.

(3) The legislature finds that the federal every student succeeds act, P.L. 114-95, provides federal funding that can be used for the implementation of programs required under Erin's laws.

(4) It is the intent of the legislature to adopt an Erin's law in order to protect the children of Washington, one of the state's most vulnerable populations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The Erin's law task force is established for the purpose of creating and implementing a curriculum for the prevention of sexual abuse for students from kindergarten through twelfth grade in the state of Washington. The task force comprises:

(a) The director of the department of early learning or the director's designee;

(b) The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee;

(c) The attorney general or the attorney general's designee;

(d) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(e) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(f) One representative of a state association of principals;

(g) One teacher selected by the largest union of teachers in the state;

(h) One teacher selected by the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and

(i) One representative of a state association of school counselors.

(2) The task force must choose or develop a model curriculum for the prevention of sexual abuse for students from kindergarten through twelfth grade and make implementation recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016. The model curriculum must:

(a) Be evidence-based;

(b) Be age-appropriate and culturally sensitive;

(c) Include a professional training component for administrators, teachers, and other school staff on talking to students about child sexual abuse prevention, the effects of sexual abuse on children, handling disclosures, and mandatory reporting;

(d) Include a component that encourages parental involvement in child sexual abuse prevention; and

(e) Allow school districts the flexibility to determine when and how the curriculum is offered to students.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make the model curriculum available on its web site at no charge to the school districts, and shall update the curriculum periodically.

(4) Each school district shall implement a curriculum for the prevention of sexual abuse for students from kindergarten through twelfth grade that meets the requirements in subsection (2) of this section, beginning in the 2017-18 school year. Districts are encouraged to adopt the Erin's law task force model curriculum.

(5) Each school district shall provide the parents or guardians of each student with written notice of the opportunity to opt out of the curriculum required under subsection (4) of this section.

(6) The superintendent of each school district shall designate one of the district's staff with the responsibility for the district's compliance with this section.

--- END ---