BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 88.02.370 and 2010 c 161 s 1014 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A vessel owner shall notify the department in writing within five business days after a vessel is or has been:

(a) Sold;

(b) Given as a gift to another person;

(c) Traded, either privately or to a vessel dealer;

(d) Donated to charity;

(e) Turned over to an insurance company or wrecking yard; or

(f) Disposed of.

(2) A report of sale is properly filed if it is received by the department within five business days after the date of sale or transfer and it includes:

(a) The date of sale or transfer;

(b) The owner's name and address;

(c) The name and address of the person acquiring the vessel;

(d) The vessel hull identification number and vessel registration number; and

(e) A date stamp by the department showing it was received on or before the fifth business day after the date of sale or transfer.

(3) The department shall:

(a) Provide or approve reports of sale forms;

(b) Provide a system enabling a vessel owner to submit reports of sale electronically;

(c) Immediately update the department's vessel record when a report of sale has been filed;

(d) Provide instructions on release of interest forms that allow the seller of a vessel to release their interest in a vessel at the same time a financial institution, as defined in RCW 30A.22.040, releases its lien on the vessel; and

(e) Send a report to the department of revenue that lists vessels for which a report of sale has been received but no transfer of ownership has taken place. The department shall send the report once each quarter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2017.

--- END ---