BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.68A.100 and 2013 c 302 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of commercial sexual abuse of a minor if:

(a) He or she pays a fee to a minor or a third person, with the reasonable belief that the person is a minor, as compensation for a minor having engaged in sexual conduct with him or her;

(b) He or she pays or agrees to pay a fee to a minor or a third person, with the reasonable belief that the person is a minor, pursuant to an understanding that in return therefore such minor will engage in sexual conduct with him or her; or

(c) He or she attempts, solicits, offers, or requests to engage in sexual conduct with a minor, with the reasonable belief that the person is a minor, in return for a fee.

(2) Commercial sexual abuse of a minor is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) In addition to any other penalty provided under chapter 9A.20 RCW, a person guilty of commercial sexual abuse of a minor is subject to the provisions under RCW 9A.88.130 and 9A.88.140.

(4) Consent of a minor to the sexual conduct does not constitute a defense to any offense listed in this section.

(5) For purposes of this section, "sexual conduct" means sexual intercourse or sexual contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.

--- END ---