BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that individuals with developmental disabilities should be allowed to participate in prevocational services if they choose. Requiring individuals to transition out of this environment against their wishes undermines the guiding supreme court decision in Olmstead v. L.C., 527 U.S. 581, which held that Title II of the Americans with disabilities act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. 12131 et. seq.) requires states to provide certain individuals with developmental disabilities community-based program options rather than institutional placements, but that there is no requirement that community-based treatments be imposed on individuals against their will.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall develop rules to allow clients to participate in prevocational services, if available and requested by the client.

--- END ---