BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "McCleary decision" means the decision of the Washington supreme court in the case of McCleary v. the State of Washington.

(2) "Natural resource agency" or "natural resource agencies" means the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the recreation and conservation office, and the state parks and recreation commission.

(3) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of public instruction.

(4) "Third-party seller" means a private landowner or the federal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) Regardless of funding source, no natural resource agency may purchase any landholding from a third-party seller, or award a grant for the purchase of a landholding from a third party, until the superintendent confirms, consistent with section 3 of this act, that the state has fulfilled its obligation under article IX of the Washington state Constitution to fully fund education.

(2) This section applies to all land purchases by a natural resource agency regardless if the land purchase was directed by the state capital budget or if funding was provided from the federal government. If funding is provided by the legislature for a specific land purchase, the office of financial management must withhold distribution of any funds to the subject natural resource agency until the conditions of this section are fulfilled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The superintendent must, in consultation with the office of the attorney general, provide formal notification to the administrative heads of the natural resource agencies and the office of financial management upon the Washington supreme court lifting the court supervision related to the McCleary decision.

(2) Upon the receipt for notification from the superintendent under this section, the natural resource agencies may pursue land purchases subject to any other limitations in the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This chapter applies only to land subject to a purchase agreement entered into by a natural resources agency after the effective date of this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 77.12.037 and 2000 c 107 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission may acquire, consistent with section 2 of this act, by gift, easement, purchase, lease, or condemnation lands, buildings, water rights, rights-of-way, or other necessary property, and construct and maintain necessary facilities for purposes consistent with this title. Consistent with section 2 of this act, the commission may authorize the director to acquire property under this section, but the power of condemnation may only be exercised by the director when an appropriation has been made by the legislature for the acquisition of a specific property, except to clear title and acquire access rights-of-way.

(2) The commission may sell, lease, convey, or grant concessions upon real or personal property under the control of the department.

Sec. 6. RCW 77.12.220 and 2000 c 107 s 219 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of this title and consistent with section 2 of this act, the commission may make agreements to obtain real or personal property or to transfer or convey property held by the state to the United States or its agencies or instrumentalities, units of local government of this state, public service companies, or other persons, if in the judgment of the commission and the attorney general the transfer and conveyance is consistent with public interest. For purposes of this section, "local government" means any city, town, county, special district, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation.

(2) If the commission agrees to a transfer or conveyance under this section or to a sale or return of real property under RCW 77.12.210, the director shall certify, with the attorney general, to the governor that the agreement has been made. The certification shall describe the real property. The governor then may execute and the secretary of state attest and deliver to the appropriate entity or person the instrument necessary to fulfill the agreement.

Sec. 7. RCW 79A.05.030 and 2005 c 373 s 1 and 2005 c 360 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The commission shall:

(1) Have the care, charge, control, and supervision of all parks and parkways acquired or set aside by the state for park or parkway purposes.

(2) Adopt policies, and adopt, issue, and enforce rules pertaining to the use, care, and administration of state parks and parkways. The commission shall cause a copy of the rules to be kept posted in a conspicuous place in every state park to which they are applicable, but failure to post or keep any rule posted shall be no defense to any prosecution for the violation thereof.

(3) Permit the use of state parks and parkways by the public under such rules as shall be adopted.

(4) Clear, drain, grade, seed, and otherwise improve or beautify parks and parkways, and erect structures, buildings, fireplaces, and comfort stations and build and maintain paths, trails, and roadways through or on parks and parkways.

(5) Grant concessions or leases in state parks and parkways, upon such rentals, fees, or percentage of income or profits and for such terms, in no event longer than fifty years, and upon such conditions as shall be approved by the commission: PROVIDED, That leases exceeding a twenty-year term shall require a unanimous vote of the commission: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if, during the term of any concession or lease, it is the opinion of the commission that it would be in the best interest of the state, the commission may, with the consent of the concessionaire or lessee, alter and amend the terms and conditions of such concession or lease: PROVIDED FURTHER, That television station leases shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 79A.05.085, only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the rates of such concessions or leases shall be renegotiated at five-year intervals. No concession shall be granted which will prevent the public from having free access to the scenic attractions of any park or parkway.

(6) Employ such assistance as it deems necessary. Commission expenses relating to its use of volunteer assistance shall be limited to premiums or assessments for the insurance of volunteers by the department of labor and industries, compensation of staff who assist volunteers, materials and equipment used in authorized volunteer projects, training, reimbursement of volunteer travel as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and other reasonable expenses relating to volunteer recognition. The commission, at its discretion, may waive commission fees otherwise applicable to volunteers. The commission shall not use volunteers to replace or supplant classified positions. The use of volunteers may not lead to the elimination of any employees or permanent positions in the bargaining unit.

(7) By majority vote of its authorized membership, and consistent with section 2 of this act, select and purchase or obtain options upon, lease, or otherwise acquire for and in the name of the state such tracts of land, including shore and tide lands, for park and parkway purposes as it deems proper. If the commission cannot acquire any tract at a price it deems reasonable, it may, by majority vote of its authorized membership, obtain title thereto, or any part thereof, by condemnation proceedings conducted by the attorney general as provided for the condemnation of rights-of-way for state highways. Option agreements executed under authority of this subsection shall be valid only if:

(a) The cost of the option agreement does not exceed one dollar; and

(b) Moneys used for the purchase of the option agreement are from (i) funds appropriated therefor, or (ii) funds appropriated for undesignated land acquisitions, or (iii) funds deemed by the commission to be in excess of the amount necessary for the purposes for which they were appropriated; and

(c) The maximum amount payable for the property upon exercise of the option does not exceed the appraised value of the property.

(8) Cooperate with the United States, or any county or city of this state, in any matter pertaining to the acquisition, development, redevelopment, renovation, care, control, or supervision of any park or parkway, and enter into contracts in writing to that end. All parks or parkways, to which the state contributed or in whose care, control, or supervision the state participated pursuant to the provisions of this section, shall be governed by the provisions hereof.

(9) Within allowable resources, maintain policies that increase the number of people who have access to free or low-cost recreational opportunities for physical activity, including noncompetitive physical activity.

(10) Adopt rules establishing the requirements for a criminal history record information search for the following: Job applicants, volunteers, and independent contractors who have unsupervised access to children or vulnerable adults, or who will be responsible for collecting or disbursing cash or processing credit/debit card transactions. These background checks will be done through the Washington state patrol criminal identification section and may include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which shall be through the submission of fingerprints. A permanent employee of the commission, employed as of July 24, 2005, is exempt from the provisions of this subsection.

Sec. 8. RCW 79.71.040 and 1987 c 472 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is authorized to, consistent with section 2 of this act, acquire property or less than fee interests in property, as defined by RCW 64.04.130, by all means, except eminent domain, for creating natural resources conservation areas, where acquisition is the best way to achieve the purposes of this chapter. Areas acquired or assembled by the department for conservation purposes will be designated as "Washington natural resources conservation areas."

Sec. 9. RCW 79.70.030 and 2003 c 334 s 549 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to set aside, preserve, and protect natural areas within the state, the department is authorized, in addition to any other powers, to:

(1) Establish the criteria for selection, acquisition, management, protection, and use of such natural areas, including:

(a) Limiting public access to natural area preserves consistent with the purposes of this chapter. Where appropriate, and on a case-by-case basis, a buffer zone with an increased low level of public access may be created around the environmentally sensitive areas;

(b) Developing a management plan for each designated natural area preserve. The plan must identify the significant resources to be conserved consistent with the purposes of this chapter and identify the areas with potential for low-impact public and environmental educational uses. The plan must specify the types of management activities and public uses that are permitted, consistent with the purposes of this chapter. The department must make the plans available for review and comment by the public, and state, tribal, and local agencies, prior to final approval;

(2) Cooperate or contract with any federal, state, or local governmental agency, private organizations, or individuals in carrying out the purpose of this chapter;

(3) Consistent with the plan and with section 2 of this act, acquire by gift, devise, purchase, grant, dedication, or means other than eminent domain, the fee or any lesser right or interest in real property which shall be held and managed as a natural area;

(4) Acquire by gift, devise, grant, or donation any personal property to be used in the acquisition and/or management of natural areas;

(5) Inventory existing public, state, and private lands in cooperation with the council to assess possible natural areas to be preserved within the state;

(6) Maintain a natural heritage program to provide assistance in the selection and nomination of areas containing natural heritage resources for registration or dedication. The program shall maintain a classification of natural heritage resources, an inventory of their locations, and a data bank for such information. The department shall cooperate with the department of fish and wildlife in the selection and nomination of areas from the data bank that relate to critical wildlife habitats. Information from the data bank shall be made available to public and private agencies and individuals for environmental assessment and proprietary land management purposes. Usage of the classification, inventory, or data bank of natural heritage resources for any purpose inconsistent with the natural heritage program is not authorized;

(7) Prepare a natural heritage plan which shall govern the natural heritage program in the conduct of activities to create and manage a system of natural areas that includes natural resources conservation areas, and may include areas designated under the research natural area program on federal lands in the state;

(a) The plan shall list the natural heritage resources to be considered for registration and shall provide criteria for the selection and approval of natural areas under this chapter;

(b) The department shall provide opportunities for input, comment, and review to the public, other public agencies, and private groups with special interests in natural heritage resources during preparation of the plan;

(c) Upon approval by the council and adoption by the department, the plan shall be updated and submitted biennially to the appropriate committees of the legislature for their information and review. The plan shall take effect ninety days after the adjournment of the legislative session in which it is submitted unless the reviewing committees suggest changes or reject the plan; and

(8) Maintain a state register of natural areas containing significant natural heritage resources to be called the Washington register of natural area preserves. Selection of natural areas for registration shall be in accordance with criteria listed in the natural heritage plan and accomplished through voluntary agreement between the owner of the natural area and the department. No privately owned lands may be proposed to the council for registration without prior notice to the owner or registered without voluntary consent of the owner. No state or local governmental agency may require such consent as a condition of any permit or approval of or settlement of any civil or criminal proceeding or to penalize any landowner in any way for failure to give, or for withdrawal of, such consent.

(a) The department shall adopt rules as authorized by RCW 43.12.065 and 79.70.030(1) and chapter 34.05 RCW relating to voluntary natural area registration.

(b) After approval by the council, the department may place sites onto the register or remove sites from the register.

(c) The responsibility for management of registered natural area preserves shall be with the preserve owner. A voluntary management agreement may be developed between the department and the owners of the sites on the register.

(d) Any public agency may register lands under provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 10. RCW 79.155.040 and 2011 c 216 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as limited by RCW 79.155.070, the department is authorized to acquire, consistent with section 2 of this act, by purchase, gift, donation, grant, transfer, or other means other than eminent domain fee interest or a partial interest, including conservation easements, in lands or other real property suitable for management as part of the community forest trust and that are appropriate to further the goals of the community forest trust.

(b) The fair market value of any real property, and the associated valuable materials, of any land transferred into the community forest trust from state lands must be provided to the beneficiaries of the ((transferee [transferor])) transferor trust or used for the furtherance of the ((transferee [transferor])) transferor trust.

(2) The department is authorized to receive funds for purposes of establishing the community forest trust from grants, gifts, bequests, or loans, whether public or private, as well as from legislative appropriation.

(3) All acquisitions of real property for the community forest trust must be approved by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 79A.15 RCW to read as follows:

The board shall, through the implementation of this chapter and through the adoption of policies and priorities for the accounts and programs created in this chapter, ensure and enable state agencies in their compliance efforts with section 2 of this act.

Sec. 12. RCW 79A.25.020 and 2007 c 241 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To supervise the administrative operations of the boards, office, and their staff;

(2) To administer recreation and conservation grant-in-aid programs and contracts, and provide technical assistance to state and local agencies;

(3) To prepare and update, reflective of the policies embodied in section 2 of this act, a strategic plan for the acquisition, renovation, and development of recreational resources and the preservation and conservation of open space. The plan shall be prepared in coordination with the office of the governor and the office of financial management, with participation of federal, state, and local agencies having recreational responsibilities, user groups, private sector interests, and the general public. The plan shall be submitted to the recreation and conservation funding board for review, and the board shall submit its recommendations on the plan to the governor. The plan shall include, but is not limited to: (a) an inventory of current resources; (b) a forecast of recreational resource demand; (c) identification and analysis of actual and potential funding sources; (d) a process for broad scale information gathering; (e) an assessment of the capabilities and constraints, both internal and external to state government, that affect the ability of the state to achieve the goals of the plan; (f) an analysis of strategic options and decisions available to the state; (g) an implementation strategy that is coordinated with executive policy and budget priorities; and (h) elements necessary to qualify for participation in or the receipt of aid from any federal program for outdoor recreation;

(4) To represent and promote the interests of the state on recreational issues and further the mission of the board and office;

(5) Upon approval of the relevant board, to enter into contracts and agreements with private nonprofit corporations to further state goals of preserving, conserving, and enhancing recreational resources and open space for the public benefit and use;

(6) To appoint such technical and other committees as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(7) To create and maintain a repository for data, studies, research, and other information relating to recreation and conservation resources in the state, and to encourage the interchange of such information;

(8) To encourage and provide opportunities for interagency and regional coordination and cooperative efforts between public agencies and between public and private entities involved in the development and preservation of recreational and conservation resources; and

(9) To prepare the state trails plan, as required by RCW 79A.35.040.

Sec. 13. RCW 79A.25.120 and 2007 c 241 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

Any public body or any agency of state government authorized to acquire or improve public outdoor recreation land which desires funds from the outdoor recreation account, the recreation resource account, or the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account shall submit to the board a long-range plan for developing outdoor recreation facilities within its authority and detailed plans for the projects sought to be financed from these accounts, including estimated cost, compliance with section 2 of this act, and ((such)) other information as the board may require. The board shall analyze all proposed plans and projects, and shall recommend to the governor for inclusion in the budget such projects as it may approve and find to be consistent with an orderly plan for the acquisition and improvement of outdoor recreation lands in the state.

Sec. 14. RCW 79A.25.260 and 2012 c 128 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The habitat and recreation lands coordinating group is established. The group must include representatives from the office, the state parks and recreation commission, the department of natural resources, and the department of fish and wildlife. The members of the group must have subject matter expertise with the issues presented in this section. Representatives from appropriate stakeholder organizations and local government must also be considered for participation on the group, but may only be appointed or invited by the director.

(2) To ensure timely completion of the duties assigned to the group, the director shall submit yearly progress reports to the office of financial management.

(3) The group must:

(a) Review agency land acquisition and disposal plans and policies to help ensure statewide coordination of habitat and recreation land acquisitions and disposals and compliance with section 2 of this act;

(b) Produce an interagency, statewide biennial forecast of habitat and recreation land acquisition and disposal plans;

(c) Establish procedures for publishing the biennial forecast of acquisition and disposal plans on web sites or other centralized, easily accessible formats;

(d) Develop and convene an annual forum for agencies to coordinate their near-term acquisition and disposal plans;

(e) Develop a recommended method for interagency geographic information system-based documentation of habitat and recreation lands in cooperation with other state agencies using geographic information systems;

(f) Develop recommendations for standardization of acquisition and disposal recordkeeping, including identifying a preferred process for centralizing acquisition data;

(g) Develop an approach for monitoring the success of acquisitions;

(h) Identify and commence a dialogue with key state and federal partners to develop an inventory of potential public lands for transfer into habitat and recreation land management status; and

(i) Review existing and proposed habitat conservation plans on a regular basis to foster statewide coordination and save costs.

(4) If prioritization among the various requirements of subsection (3) of this section is necessary due to the availability of resources, the group shall prioritize implementation of subsection (3)(a) through (d) and (g) of this section.

(5) The group shall revisit the planning requirements of relevant grant programs administered by the office to determine whether coordination of state agency habitat and recreation land acquisition and disposal could be improved by modifying those requirements.

(6) The group must develop options for centralizing coordination of habitat and recreation land acquisition made with funds from federal grants. The advantages and drawbacks of the following options, at a minimum, must be developed:

(a) Requiring that agencies provide early communication on the status of federal grant applications to the office, the office of financial management, or directly to the legislature;

(b) Establishing a centralized pass-through agency for federal funds, where individual agencies would be the primary applicants.

(7) This section expires July 31, 2017. Prior to January 1, 2017, the group shall make a formal recommendation to the board and the appropriate committees of the legislature as to whether the existence of the habitat and recreation lands coordinating group should be continued beyond July 31, 2017, and if so, whether any modifications to its enabling statute should be pursued.

Sec. 15. RCW 43.88.030 and 2006 c 334 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of financial management shall provide all agencies with a complete set of instructions for submitting biennial budget requests to the director at least three months before agency budget documents are due into the office of financial management. The budget document or documents shall consist of the governor's budget message which shall be explanatory of the budget and shall contain an outline of the proposed financial policies of the state for the ensuing fiscal period, as well as an outline of the proposed six-year financial policies where applicable, and shall describe in connection therewith the important features of the budget. The biennial budget document or documents shall also describe performance indicators that demonstrate measurable progress towards priority results. The message shall set forth the reasons for salient changes from the previous fiscal period in expenditure and revenue items and shall explain any major changes in financial policy. Attached to the budget message shall be such supporting schedules, exhibits and other explanatory material in respect to both current operations and capital improvements as the governor shall deem to be useful to the legislature. The budget document or documents shall set forth a proposal for expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period, or six-year period where applicable, based upon the estimated revenues and caseloads as approved by the economic and revenue forecast council and caseload forecast council or upon the estimated revenues and caseloads of the office of financial management for those funds, accounts, sources, and programs for which the forecast councils do not prepare an official forecast. Revenues shall be estimated for such fiscal period from the source and at the rates existing by law at the time of submission of the budget document, including the supplemental budgets submitted in the even-numbered years of a biennium. However, the estimated revenues and caseloads for use in the governor's budget document may be adjusted to reflect budgetary revenue transfers and revenue and caseload estimates dependent upon budgetary assumptions of enrollments, workloads, and caseloads. All adjustments to the approved estimated revenues and caseloads must be set forth in the budget document. The governor may additionally submit, as an appendix to each supplemental, biennial, or six-year agency budget or to the budget document or documents, a proposal for expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period from revenue sources derived from proposed changes in existing statutes.

The budget document or documents shall also contain:

(a) Revenues classified by fund and source for the immediately past fiscal period, those received or anticipated for the current fiscal period, and those anticipated for the ensuing biennium;

(b) The undesignated fund balance or deficit, by fund;

(c) Such additional information dealing with expenditures, revenues, workload, performance, and personnel as the legislature may direct by law or concurrent resolution;

(d) Such additional information dealing with revenues and expenditures as the governor shall deem pertinent and useful to the legislature;

(e) Tabulations showing expenditures classified by fund, function, and agency;

(f) The expenditures that include nonbudgeted, nonappropriated accounts outside the state treasury;

(g) Identification of all proposed direct expenditures to implement the Puget Sound water quality plan under chapter 90.71 RCW, shown by agency and in total; and

(h) Tabulations showing each postretirement adjustment by retirement system established after fiscal year 1991, to include, but not be limited to, estimated total payments made to the end of the previous biennial period, estimated payments for the present biennium, and estimated payments for the ensuing biennium.

(2) The budget document or documents shall include detailed estimates of all anticipated revenues applicable to proposed operating or capital expenditures and shall also include all proposed operating or capital expenditures. The total of beginning undesignated fund balance and estimated revenues less working capital and other reserves shall equal or exceed the total of proposed applicable expenditures. The budget document or documents shall further include:

(a) Interest, amortization and redemption charges on the state debt;

(b) Payments of all reliefs, judgments, and claims;

(c) Other statutory expenditures;

(d) Expenditures incident to the operation for each agency;

(e) Revenues derived from agency operations;

(f) Expenditures and revenues shall be given in comparative form showing those incurred or received for the immediately past fiscal period and those anticipated for the current biennium and next ensuing biennium;

(g) A showing and explanation of amounts of general fund and other funds obligations for debt service and any transfers of moneys that otherwise would have been available for appropriation;

(h) Common school expenditures on a fiscal-year basis;

(i) A showing, by agency, of the value and purpose of financing contracts for the lease/purchase or acquisition of personal or real property for the current and ensuing fiscal periods; and

(j) A showing and explanation of anticipated amounts of general fund and other funds required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of the retirement system specified under chapter 41.45 RCW, and the contributions to meet such amortization, stated in total dollars and as a level percentage of total compensation.

(3) The governor's operating budget document or documents shall reflect the statewide priorities as required by RCW 43.88.090.

(4) The governor's operating budget document or documents shall identify activities that are not addressing the statewide priorities.

(5) A separate capital budget document or schedule shall be submitted that will contain the following:

(a) A statement setting forth a long-range facilities plan for the state that identifies and includes the highest priority needs within affordable spending levels;

(b) A capital program consisting of proposed capital projects for the next biennium and the two biennia succeeding the next biennium consistent with the long-range facilities plan. Insomuch as is practical, and recognizing emergent needs, the capital program shall reflect the priorities, projects, and spending levels proposed in previously submitted capital budget documents in order to provide a reliable long-range planning tool for the legislature and state agencies;

(c) A capital plan consisting of proposed capital spending for at least four biennia succeeding the next biennium;

(d) A strategic plan for reducing backlogs of maintenance and repair projects. The plan shall include a prioritized list of specific facility deficiencies and capital projects to address the deficiencies for each agency, cost estimates for each project, a schedule for completing projects over a reasonable period of time, and identification of normal maintenance activities to reduce future backlogs;

(e) A statement of the reason or purpose for a project;

(f) Verification that a project is consistent with the provisions set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW;

(g) A statement about the proposed site, size, and estimated life of the project, if applicable;

(h) Estimated total project cost;

(i) For major projects valued over five million dollars, estimated costs for the following project components: Acquisition, consultant services, construction, equipment, project management, and other costs included as part of the project. Project component costs shall be displayed in a standard format defined by the office of financial management to allow comparisons between projects;

(j) Estimated total project cost for each phase of the project as defined by the office of financial management;

(k) Estimated ensuing biennium costs;

(l) Estimated costs beyond the ensuing biennium;

(m) Estimated construction start and completion dates;

(n) Source and type of funds proposed;

(o) Estimated ongoing operating budget costs or savings resulting from the project, including staffing and maintenance costs;

(p) For any capital appropriation requested for a state agency for the acquisition of land or the capital improvement of land in which the primary purpose of the acquisition or improvement is recreation or wildlife habitat conservation, the capital budget document, or an omnibus list of recreation and habitat acquisitions provided with the governor's budget document, shall identify the projected costs of operation and maintenance for at least the two biennia succeeding the next biennium and a plan for compliance with section 2 of this act. Omnibus lists of habitat and recreation land acquisitions shall include individual project cost estimates for operation and maintenance as well as a total for all state projects included in the list. The document shall identify the source of funds from which the operation and maintenance costs are proposed to be funded;

(q) Such other information bearing upon capital projects as the governor deems to be useful;

(r) Standard terms, including a standard and uniform definition of normal maintenance, for all capital projects;

(s) Such other information as the legislature may direct by law or concurrent resolution.

For purposes of this subsection (5), the term "capital project" shall be defined subsequent to the analysis, findings, and recommendations of a joint committee comprised of representatives from the house capital appropriations committee, senate ways and means committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, and office of financial management.

(6) No change affecting the comparability of agency or program information relating to expenditures, revenues, workload, performance and personnel shall be made in the format of any budget document or report presented to the legislature under this section or RCW 43.88.160(1) relative to the format of the budget document or report which was presented to the previous regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year without prior legislative concurrence. Prior legislative concurrence shall consist of (a) a favorable majority vote on the proposal by the standing committees on ways and means of both houses if the legislature is in session or (b) a favorable majority vote on the proposal by members of the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee if the legislature is not in session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---