BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 10.79 RCW to read as follows:

A magistrate must affix his or her signature to a search warrant before any law enforcement agency deploys a radar device that is used to detect human presence inside a residence.

--- END ---