BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.470 and 2011 c 339 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A personal use saltwater, freshwater, combination, temporary, or family fishing weekend license is required for all persons fifteen years of age or older to fish for or possess fish taken for personal use from state waters or offshore waters.

(2) The fees for annual personal use saltwater, freshwater, or combination licenses are as follows:

(a) A combination license allows the holder to fish for or possess fish, shellfish, and seaweed from state waters or offshore waters. The fee for this license is ((forty-five)) thirty-one dollars and fifty cents for residents, ((one hundred eight)) seventy-five dollars and fifty cents for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth. There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge for this license, to be deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.

(b) A saltwater license allows the holder to fish for or possess fish taken from saltwater areas. The fee for this license is ((twenty-five)) seventeen dollars and fifty cents for residents, ((fifty-two)) thirty-six dollars and fifty cents for nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors. There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge for this license, to be deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.

(c) A freshwater license allows the holder to fish for, take, or possess food fish or game fish species in all freshwater areas. The fee for this license is ((twenty-five)) seventeen dollars and fifty cents for residents, ((seventy-five)) fifty-two dollars and fifty cents for nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors.

(3)(a) A temporary combination fishing license is valid for one to three consecutive days and allows the holder to fish for or possess fish, shellfish, and seaweed taken from state waters or offshore waters. The fee for this temporary fishing license is:

(i) One day - ((Eight)) Five dollars and fifty cents for residents and ((sixteen)) eleven dollars for nonresidents;

(ii) Two days - ((Twelve)) eight dollars for residents and ((twenty-four)) seventeen dollars for nonresidents; and

(iii) Three days - ((Fifteen)) Ten dollars and fifty cents for residents and ((thirty)) twenty-one dollars for nonresidents.

(b) The fee for a charter stamp is eight dollars for a one-day temporary combination fishing license for residents and nonresidents for use on a charter boat as defined in RCW 77.65.150.

(c) Except for active duty military personnel serving in any branch of the United States armed forces, the temporary combination fishing license is not valid on game fish species for an eight-consecutive-day period beginning on the opening day of the lowland lake fishing season as defined by rule of the commission.

(d) The temporary combination fishing license fee for active duty military personnel serving in any branch of the United States armed forces is the resident rate as set forth in (a) of this subsection. Active duty military personnel must provide a valid military identification card at the time of purchase of the temporary license to qualify for the resident rate.

(e) There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge on the temporary combination fishing license and the associated charter stamp, to be deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.

(4) A family fishing weekend license allows for a maximum of six anglers: One resident and five youth; two residents and four youth; or one resident, one nonresident, and four youth. This license allows the holders to fish for or possess fish taken from state waters or offshore waters. The fee for this license is twenty dollars. This license is only valid during periods as specified by rule of the department.

(5) The commission may adopt rules to create and sell combination licenses for all hunting and fishing activities at or below a fee equal to the total cost of the individual license contained within any combination.

(6) The commission may adopt rules to allow the use of two fishing poles per fishing license holder for use on selected state waters. If authorized by the commission, license holders must purchase a two-pole stamp to use a second pole. The proceeds from the sale of the two-pole stamp must be deposited into the state wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170 and used for the operation and maintenance of state-owned fish hatcheries. The fee for a two-pole stamp is thirteen dollars for residents and nonresidents, and five dollars for seniors.

--- END ---