BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to enact legislation concerning investing in education and essential public services by modifying and improving the fairness of Washington's excise tax system by narrowing or eliminating tax preferences, reinstating a previously expired surtax on certain business and occupation taxes while increasing the small business tax credit, and implementing marketplace fairness in Washington.

--- END ---