BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to enact legislation concerning investing in education and essential public services by modifying and improving the fairness of Washington's excise tax system by narrowing or eliminating tax preferences and implementing marketplace fairness in Washington.

--- END ---