BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to enact legislation concerning investing in education and essential public services while improving the fairness of Washington's excise tax system by reinstating a previously expired surtax on certain business and occupation taxes while increasing the small business tax credit.

--- END ---