BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to enact legislation concerning investing in education and essential public services while improving the fairness of Washington's excise tax system by narrowing or eliminating tax preferences.

--- END ---