BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The student achievement council, in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall study the demand for qualified information technology and cybersecurity employees at state agencies, including the need for individuals with specializations or certifications in information technology and cybersecurity, such as project management and common business-oriented language programmers. The student achievement council shall review methods and programs for students in information technology or cybersecurity certificate or degree programs across the state that would incentivize and attract high-demand, information technology and cybersecurity students to work for state agencies after graduation. These methods or programs may include, but are not limited to, conditional loan or scholarship programs, loan forgiveness programs, or stipend incentives. The student achievement council shall report to the legislature regarding the findings by January 1, 2016.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2016.

--- END ---