BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 27.34.900 and 1993 c 101 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The building and grounds designated as Block 2, Grainger's Addition to the City of Olympia, County of Thurston, acquired by the state under senate joint resolution No. 18, session of 1939, is hereby designated a part of the state capitol, to be known as the state capital historical museum. ((This structure is to be used to house and interpret the collection of the Washington state historical society. This section does not limit the society's use of other structures.)) The state capital historical museum may be leased by the department of enterprise services to other state agencies or private parties as established in chapter 43.82 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.19.125 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of enterprise services shall have custody and control of the capitol buildings and grounds, supervise and direct proper care, heating, lighting and repairing thereof, and designate rooms in the capitol buildings to be occupied by various state officials.

(2) During the 2007-2009 biennium, responsibility for development of the "Wheeler block" on the capitol campus as authorized in section 6013, chapter 520, Laws of 2007 shall be transferred from the department of general administration to the department of information services.

(3) Effective July 1, 2015, responsibility for maintenance and leasing of the state capital historical museum is transferred from the Washington state historical society to the department of enterprise services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---