BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17A.560 and 2006 c 348 s 5 and 2006 c 344 s 31 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) ((During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing through the date of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on the date a special legislative session convenes and continuing through the date that session adjourns,)) No state official or a person employed by or acting on behalf of a state official or state legislator may solicit or accept contributions to a public office fund, to a candidate or authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt:

(a) During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing through the date of final adjournment; or

(b) During the period beginning on the date that a special legislative session is officially announced, but not exceeding fifteen days before the special session convenes, and continuing through the date that special session adjourns.

(2) Contributions received through the mail after the thirtieth day before a regular legislative session, or the date that a special session is announced, may be accepted if the contribution is postmarked prior to the thirtieth day before the regular session, or the date the special session is announced.

(((2))) (3) This section does not apply to activities authorized in RCW 43.07.370.

--- END ---