BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.19.125 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of enterprise services shall have custody and control of the capitol buildings and grounds, supervise and direct proper care, heating, lighting and repairing thereof, and designate rooms in the capitol buildings to be occupied by various state officials.

(2) During the 2007-2009 biennium, responsibility for development of the "Wheeler block" on the capitol campus as authorized in section 6013, chapter 520, Laws of 2007 shall be transferred from the department of general administration to the department of information services.

(3) As of the effective date of this section, responsibility for the maintenance, operation, and any subsequent leasing of the state capital historical museum is transferred from the Washington state historical society to the department of enterprise services.

Sec. 2. RCW 27.34.900 and 1993 c 101 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The building and grounds designated as Block 2, Grainger's Addition to the City of Olympia, County of Thurston, acquired by the state under senate joint resolution No. 18, session of 1939, is hereby designated a part of the state capitol, to be known as the state capital historical museum. ((This structure is to be used to house and interpret the collection of the Washington state historical society. This section does not limit the society's use of other structures.))

(2) At the discretion of the department of enterprise services in consultation with the office of financial management, the state capital historical museum may be leased by the department of enterprise services to other state agencies or private parties as established in chapter 43.82 RCW. The department of enterprise services must ensure that reasonable access to the building and grounds is maintained for members of the public and the use of community organizations.

(3) The department of enterprise services may not sell or dispose of the state capital historical museum building or grounds without legislative approval.

--- END ---