BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By January 31, 2016, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must develop a social media safety model curriculum, or update an existing curriculum on social media, that includes age-appropriate safety lessons on how to respond to alarming or disturbing social media posts and provides information regarding the availability of means to report such posts anonymously.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must make the social media safety model curriculum available to all school districts and publish the curriculum on its web site. The curriculum must be updated biennially.

(3) Every school year, beginning in the 2016-17 school year, there shall be made available to all students in each common school as defined in RCW 28A.150.020 at least one age-appropriate educational program, class, or activity designed to teach social media safety. Such a program, class, or activity must include information about how to respond to alarming or disturbing social media posts and the availability of means to report such posts anonymously. A school district may use the model curriculum developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, develop its own curriculum, or use another curriculum that includes the requisite information.

--- END ---