BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that: Students are susceptible to both natural and man-made disasters; students in Washington attend school in a state with high natural disaster risks, on top of modern day man-made disaster risks; and there is a need for safety plans that require communication, evacuation, and timely response to disasters.

(2) The legislature finds that the following natural and man-made risks have potential to cause death and great injury to health and the economy, which require planning.

(a) Earthquakes. Based on at-risk populations, Washington is ranked the second most dangerous state for earthquakes, and averages over one thousand earthquakes a year. Washington sits on the Cascadia subduction zone, which can produce estimated earthquakes of 9.0 on the Richter scale; the Juan de Fuca plate, which has produced earthquakes of up to 7.1 on the Richter scale; and various crustal plates, which have produced earthquakes up to 7.5 on the Richter scale. Experts predict it is merely a matter of time before a large earthquake occurs in the state. A significant relationship between earthquakes and tsunamis exist, as ninety-eight percent of the world's tsunamis are attributable to earthquakes.

(b) Tsunamis. Over seventy-three percent of the world's tsunamis have been observed along the Pacific ring of fire. The coast of Washington is located in the ring of fire. A local earthquake from the Cascadia subduction zone would cause tsunami waves to reach the outer coastal communities within thirty minutes or less. It is imperative to note that the Cascadia subduction zone can produce estimated earthquakes up to 9.0 on the Richter scale. Both the 2004 Indonesian tsunami and the 2011 Japanese tsunami resulted from 9.0 magnitude earthquakes.

(c) Volcanoes. Washington has five major volcanoes: Mount Baker, Glacier Peak, Mount Rainier, Mount Saint Helens, and Mount Adams. Mount Adams is the nineteenth most dangerous volcano in the nation, Glacier Peak is the twelfth most dangerous, Mount Baker is the eleventh most dangerous, and Mount Rainer is the third most dangerous. In 1980, the eruption of Mount Saint Helens created the largest debris avalanche in recorded history, with five hundred twenty million tons of ash spread across the United States. An eruption of Mount Rainier, the highest peak in the Cascade mountain range, would produce lava, ash, glacial outburst floods, and lahars. This would cause upwards of six billion dollars in damages.

(d) Other natural disasters. The Washington military emergency management division lists avalanches, drought, floods, landslides, severe storms, and wildland fires as prominent natural disasters affecting Washington. Any one of these events could occur during school hours, putting Washington students at risk.

(e) Man-made disasters.

(i) Terrorism. Washington is home to local, national, and international businesses, prominent tourist attractions, and governmental targets. As such, there will always be a risk to the state and its students.

(ii) On-school shooters. The federal bureau of investigation states that crime in schools is one of the most troublesome social problems facing the nation. To date, this decade has seen a total of one hundred forty-seven school deaths, not including recent shootings, such as the one at Sandy Hook Elementary School.

(iii) Local hazards. In Washington, local hazards such as grain elevator explosions, contaminated firefighting runoff, and various hazards from the manufacturing of fireworks, chemicals, and pharmaceuticals, and oil refinery activities can occur in individual jurisdictions. Any one of these local events would expose students to danger.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.320.125 and 2013 c 14 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature considers it to be a matter of public safety for public schools and staff to have current safe school plans and procedures in place, fully consistent with federal law. The legislature further finds and intends, by requiring safe school plans to be in place, that school districts will become eligible for federal assistance. The legislature further finds that schools are in a position to serve the community in the event of an emergency resulting from natural disasters or man-made disasters.

(2) Schools and school districts shall consider the guidance provided by the superintendent of public instruction, including the comprehensive school safety checklist and the model comprehensive safe school plans that include prevention, intervention, all hazard/crisis response, and postcrisis recovery, when developing their own individual comprehensive safe school plans. Each school district shall adopt, no later than September 1, 2008, and implement a safe school plan consistent with the school mapping information system pursuant to RCW 36.28A.060. The plan shall:

(a) Include required school safety policies and procedures;

(b) Address emergency mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery;

(c) Include provisions for assisting and communicating with students and staff, including those with special needs or disabilities;

(d) Use the training guidance provided by the Washington emergency management division of the state military department in collaboration with the Washington state office of the superintendent of public instruction school safety center and the school safety center advisory committee;

(e) Require the building principal to be certified on the incident command system;

(f) Take into account the manner in which the school facilities may be used as a community asset in the event of a community-wide emergency; and

(g) Set guidelines for requesting city or county law enforcement agencies, local fire departments, emergency service providers, and county emergency management agencies to meet with school districts and participate in safety-related drills.

(3) School districts, in collaboration with local emergency response agencies, shall annually review and update their safe school plans.

(4) To the extent funds are available, school districts shall annually:

(a) ((Review and update safe school plans in collaboration with local emergency response agencies;

(b))) Conduct an inventory of all hazardous materials;

(((c))) (b) Update information on the school mapping information system to reflect current staffing and updated plans, including:

(i) Identifying all staff members who are trained on the national incident management system, trained on the incident command system, or are certified on the incident command system; and

(ii) Identifying school transportation procedures for evacuation, to include bus staging areas, evacuation routes, communication systems, parent-student reunification sites, and secondary transportation agreements consistent with the school mapping information system; and

(((d))) (c) Provide information to all staff on the use of emergency supplies and notification and alert procedures.

(((4))) (5) To the extent funds are available, school districts shall annually record and report on the information and activities required in subsection (((3))) (4) of this section to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

(((5))) (6) School districts are encouraged to work with local emergency management agencies and other emergency responders to conduct one tabletop exercise, one functional exercise, and two full-scale exercises within a four-year period.

(((6))) (7)(a) Schools shall conduct ((no less than one safety-related drill each month that school is in session. Schools shall complete no less than one drill using the school mapping information system, three drills for lockdowns, one drill for shelter-in-place, three drills for fire evacuation in accordance with the state fire code, and one other safety-related drill to be determined by the school. Schools should consider drills for earthquakes, tsunamis, or other high-risk local events. Schools shall document the date and time of such drills. This subsection is intended to satisfy all federal requirements for comprehensive school emergency drills and evacuations)) the following drills annually, while school is in session:

(i) No less than one drill using the school mapping information system;

(ii) No less than two drills for lockdowns, one of which must have school-wide participation, including students and staff;

(iii) No less than one drill for shelter-in-place, which must have school-wide participation, including students and staff;

(iv) No less than two drills for fire evacuation in accordance with the state fire code;

(v) No less than one earthquake drill;

(vi) For schools located in tsunami evacuation zones designated as such by the Washington department of natural resources, no less than one tsunami evacuation drill;

(vii) For schools located in lahar evacuation areas, no less than one lahar evacuation drill; and

(viii) No less than one other safety-related drill to be determined by the school, with input from a local emergency organization or law enforcement. Schools should consider high-risk local events.

(b) Schools shall document the date and time of the drills required in this subsection (7).

(c) This subsection (7) is intended to satisfy all federal requirements for comprehensive school emergency drills and evacuations.

(8) Schools shall publish and communicate emergency procedures applicable to all students and staff. This requirement includes:

(a) Publishing procedures on the school's web site, where applicable;

(b) Making procedures available in paper format to all staff;

(c) Making printed emergency procedures easily accessible at the school's main office and the main entry of each school building; and

(d) Making emergency procedures available in any additional locations that the school deems beneficial.

(((7))) (9) Educational service districts are encouraged to apply for federal emergency response and crisis management grants with the assistance of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington emergency management division of the state military department.

(((8))) (10) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish a program to provide incentives to schools that demonstrate a commitment to emergency planning and preparedness beyond the provisions in this section. The office may determine the appropriate incentives, as long as the incentives encourage creativity and commitment beyond the provisions required in this section.

(11) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to implement provisions of this section. These rules may include, but are not limited to, provisions for evacuations, lockdowns, or other components of a comprehensive safe school plan.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.320.080 and 1995 c 77 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

Every board of directors, unless otherwise specifically provided by law, shall:

(1) Provide for the expenditure of a reasonable amount for suitable commencement exercises;

(2) In addition to providing free instruction in lip reading for children disabled by defective hearing, make arrangements for free instruction in lip reading to adults disabled by defective hearing whenever in its judgment such instruction appears to be in the best interests of the school district and adults concerned;

(3) Join with boards of directors of other school districts or an educational service district pursuant to RCW 28A.310.180(3), or both such school districts and educational service district in buying supplies, equipment and services by establishing and maintaining a joint purchasing agency, or otherwise, when deemed for the best interests of the district, any joint agency formed hereunder being herewith authorized and empowered to issue interest bearing warrants in payment of any obligation owed: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That those agencies issuing interest bearing warrants shall assign accounts receivable in an amount equal to the amount of the outstanding interest bearing warrants to the county treasurer issuing such interest bearing warrants: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the joint purchasing agency shall consider the request of any one or more private schools requesting the agency to jointly buy supplies, equipment, and services including but not limited to school bus maintenance services, and, after considering such request, may cooperate with and jointly make purchases with private schools of supplies, equipment, and services, including but not limited to school bus maintenance services, so long as such private schools pay in advance their proportionate share of the costs or provide a surety bond to cover their proportionate share of the costs involved in such purchases;

(4) Consider the request of any one or more private schools requesting the board to jointly buy supplies, equipment and services including but not limited to school bus maintenance services, and, after considering such request, may provide such joint purchasing services: PROVIDED, That such private schools pay in advance their proportionate share of the costs or provide a surety bond to cover their proportionate share of the costs involved in such purchases; ((and))

(5) Consider the request of any one or more private schools requesting the board of directors to jointly buy supplies, equipment, and services directly related to emergency planning and disaster preparedness and, after considering such request, may provide such joint purchasing services: PROVIDED, That such private schools pay in advance their proportionate share of the costs or provide a surety bond to cover their proportionate share of the costs involved in such purchases; and

(6) Prepare budgets as provided for in chapter 28A.505 RCW.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.195.010 and 2009 c 548 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby recognizes that private schools should be subject only to those minimum state controls necessary to insure the health and safety of all the students in the state and to insure a sufficient basic education to meet usual graduation requirements. The state, any agency or official thereof, shall not restrict or dictate any specific educational or other programs for private schools except as hereinafter in this section provided.

Principals of private schools or superintendents of private school districts shall file each year with the state superintendent of public instruction a statement certifying that the minimum requirements hereinafter set forth are being met, noting any deviations. After review of the statement, the state superintendent will notify schools or school districts of those deviations which must be corrected. In case of major deviations, the school or school district may request and the state board of education may grant provisional status for one year in order that the school or school district may take action to meet the requirements. The state board of education shall not require private school students to meet the student learning goals, obtain a certificate of academic achievement, or a certificate of individual achievement to graduate from high school, to master the essential academic learning requirements, or to be assessed pursuant to RCW 28A.655.061. However, private schools may choose, on a voluntary basis, to have their students master these essential academic learning requirements, take the assessments, and obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement. Minimum requirements shall be as follows:

(1) The minimum school year for instructional purposes shall consist of no less than one hundred eighty school days or the equivalent in annual minimum instructional hour offerings, with a school-wide annual average total instructional hour offering of one thousand hours for students enrolled in grades one through twelve, and at least four hundred fifty hours for students enrolled in kindergarten.

(2) The school day shall be the same as defined in RCW 28A.150.203.

(3) All classroom teachers shall hold appropriate Washington state certification except as follows:

(a) Teachers for religious courses or courses for which no counterpart exists in public schools shall not be required to obtain a state certificate to teach those courses.

(b) In exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without certification may teach students so long as a certified person exercises general supervision. Annual written statements shall be submitted to the office of the superintendent of public instruction reporting and explaining such circumstances.

(4) An approved private school may operate an extension program for parents, guardians, or persons having legal custody of a child to teach children in their custody. The extension program shall require at a minimum that:

(a) The parent, guardian, or custodian be under the supervision of an employee of the approved private school who is certified under chapter 28A.410 RCW;

(b) The planning by the certified person and the parent, guardian, or person having legal custody include objectives consistent with this subsection and subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (((7))) (8) of this section;

(c) The certified person spend a minimum average each month of one contact hour per week with each student under his or her supervision who is enrolled in the approved private school extension program;

(d) Each student's progress be evaluated by the certified person; and

(e) The certified employee shall not supervise more than thirty students enrolled in the approved private school's extension program.

(5) Appropriate measures shall be taken to safeguard all permanent records against loss or damage.

(6) The physical facilities of the school or district shall be adequate to meet the program offered by the school or district: PROVIDED, That each school building shall meet reasonable health and fire safety requirements. A residential dwelling of the parent, guardian, or custodian shall be deemed to be an adequate physical facility when a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody is instructing his or her child under subsection (4) of this section.

(7) The school or district shall comply with the requirements of RCW 28A.320.125 relating to safe school plans.

(8) Private school curriculum shall include instruction of the basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language, social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of appreciation of art and music, all in sufficient units for meeting state board of education graduation requirements.

(((8))) (9) Each school or school district shall be required to maintain up-to-date policy statements related to the administration and operation of the school or school district.

All decisions of policy, philosophy, selection of books, teaching material, curriculum, except as in subsection (((7))) (8) of this section provided, school rules and administration, or other matters not specifically referred to in this section, shall be the responsibility of the administration and administrators of the particular private school involved.

--- END ---