BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that large retroactive utility bills may impose undue hardship on residential customers, particularly those living on low and fixed incomes. The legislature intends to limit the period of time for which a consumer-owned utility may issue a corrected bill when the billing error is attributable to circumstances within the utility's control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 19.29A RCW to read as follows:

(1) A consumer-owned utility may not collect amounts underbilled due to a billing error of the consumer-owned utility for any period greater than six months from the date the billing error occurred.

(2) For purposes of this section "billing error" means error arising from: (a) Nonregistering, incorrectly registering, or crossed meters; (b) other faulty equipment; and (c) administrative error, including incorrect meter reads, clerical errors, incorrect billing calculations, and application of an incorrect daily billing factor.

--- END ---