BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) By June 30, 2015, the treasurer shall transfer into the state general fund the entire budget stabilization account deposit for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium that is attributable to extraordinary revenue growth.

(2) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the treasurer shall transfer into the state general fund the entire budget stabilization account deposit for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium that is attributable to extraordinary revenue growth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---