BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

A law enforcement agency, and its officers, agents, and employees, are not liable for injuries to persons or property resulting from any act or omission of the agency, officer, agent, or employee, while acting in the course and scope of official duties, unless the act or omission constitutes intentional, or willful and wanton, misconduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

The department of corrections, and its agents, officers, and employees, are not liable for injuries to persons or property resulting from an act or omission of the agency, officer, agent, or employee, while acting in the course and scope of official duties, unless the act or omission constitutes intentional, or willful and wanton, misconduct.

--- END ---