BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to 2015 2nd sp.s. c ... (ESHB 1106) to read as follows:

(1) The sum of $1,410,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, from the state general fund to the state health care authority.

(2) The sum of $1,388,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the state general fund to the state health care authority.

(3) The sum of $10,104,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2017, from the general fund—federal to the state health care authority.

(4) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to increase the reimbursement rate for providing long-acting reversible contraceptives such as intrauterine devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to 2015 2nd sp.s. c ... (ESHB 1106) to read as follows:

(1) The sum of $966,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, from the state general fund to the state health care authority.

(2) The office of financial management shall reduce allotments for the health care authority by $4,263,000 from the general fund—state appropriation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, and by $10,644,000 from the general fund—federal appropriation for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2017. The amounts reduced from allotments must be placed in reserve status and must remain unexpended.

(3) The allotment reductions in this section reflect savings attributable to providing stand-alone family planning coverage to clients regardless of citizenship status, and the savings will be achieved by preventing unwanted pregnancies that generate state costs for prenatal, birth, and postpartum services, and for medical coverage for newborns.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---