BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By June 30, 2015, the treasurer shall transfer into the state general fund the entire budget stabilization account deposit for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium that is attributable to extraordinary revenue growth, not to exceed fifty million dollars.

(2) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the treasurer shall transfer into the state general fund the entire budget stabilization account deposit for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium that is attributable to extraordinary revenue growth, not to exceed seventy-five million dollars.

(3) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the treasurer shall transfer into the state general fund the entire budget stabilization account deposit for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium that is attributable to extraordinary revenue growth, not to exceed five hundred fifty million dollars.

(4) For purposes of RCW 43.88.055(4), the transfers in this section do not alter the requirement to balance in ensuing biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---