BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act may be known and cited as the Travis alert act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of health, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, the Washington state patrol, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and the superintendent of public instruction, shall design a training program that will familiarize first responders and 911 personnel with the techniques for best handling situations in which persons with disabilities are present at the scene of an emergency in order to maximize the safety of persons with disabilities, minimize the likelihood of injury to persons with disabilities, and promote the safety of all persons present. The program must include a checklist of disabilities, symptoms of such disabilities, and things to do and not do relevant to a particular disability so first responders and emergency personnel can easily and quickly determine the specific scenario into which they are entering. The department shall make the training program available to all first responder agencies in the state.

(2) For purposes of this section, "persons with disabilities" means individuals who have been diagnosed with a physical, mental, emotional, intellectual, behavioral, developmental, or sensory disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director, through the state enhanced 911 coordinator, and in collaboration with the department of health, the department of social and health services, the Washington state patrol, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and other individuals and entities at the discretion of the director, shall assess:

(a) The resources, capabilities, and procedures available or required in order to include as part of the enhanced 911 emergency service the ability to allow an immediate display on the screen indicating that a person with a disability may be present at the scene of an emergency, the caller's identification, location, phone number, address, and license plate number if made available, that is linked to the caller, emergency contact information for others who will know about the person with a disability such as siblings, grandparents, friends, or neighbors, if made available, information regarding alternative residences and vehicles a person with a disability frequently or regularly lives or commutes in, if made available, detailed information regarding the disability of the person including a picture and physical description of a person, if made available, and the name, address, and phone number of the diagnosing physician, if made available;

(b) How best to acquire, implement, and safeguard the information in the system provided by a person with a disability, or a parent, guardian, or caretaker of a person with a disability, such as requiring a person who chooses to use the system to submit proof of the diagnosis of the disability by a licensed health care physician along with the information listed in (a) of this subsection, and allowing or requiring the person to update the information in the system on a periodic basis in order to keep the information current;

(c) What information provided by a person should remain confidential and how to best ensure such information remains confidential, unless the person providing the information gives written permission to release it for purposes of this act or the information is otherwise releasable or available under other provisions of law; and

(d) The need to provide various agencies and employees, which are first responders and emergency personnel, immunity from civil liability for acts or omissions in the performance of their duties, and what standard should apply, such as if the act or omission is the result of simple negligence, willful misconduct, or gross negligence.

(2) For purposes of this section, "person with a disability" means an individual who has been diagnosed with a physical, mental, emotional, intellectual, behavioral, developmental, or sensory disability.

--- END ---