BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.36.201 and 2013 c 11 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The names of candidates certified by the secretary of state or the county canvassing board as qualified to appear on the general election shall be printed on the general election ballot.

(2) If a primary for an office was held, no name of any candidate shall be placed upon the ballot at a general or special election unless it appears upon the certificate of either (((1))) (a) the secretary of state, or (((2))) (b) the county canvassing board.

((Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a temporary elected position such as a charter review board member or freeholder,)) (3) A candidate's name shall not appear on a ballot more than once unless he or she is a candidate for:

(a) Precinct committee officer;

(b) A temporary elected position such as a charter review board member or freeholder;

(c) Both statewide elected office and the office of the president or vice president of the United States; or

(d) Both congressional office and the office of president or vice president of the United States.

--- END ---