BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the public is entitled to complete disclosure regarding the influence of money in politics. Therefore, the legislature intends to increase disclosure by requiring electronic filing by lobbyists.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 42.17A RCW to read as follows:

(1) All agencies required to report under RCW 42.17A.635 must file all reports required by this chapter electronically over the internet as provided by the commission under RCW 42.17A.055.

(2) No later than January 1, 2018, all lobbyists and lobbyists' employers required to file reports under RCW 42.17A.600, 42.17A.615, 42.17A.625, or 42.17A.630 must file all reports required by this chapter electronically over the internet as provided by the commission under RCW 42.17A.055.

(3) The commission shall design, develop, implement, and maintain computer hardware and software or other applications to accommodate electronic filing of the reports required by this section and a database and query system compatible with current architecture, technology, and operating systems that result in readily available data to the public for review and analysis. The commission is encouraged to engage stakeholders in the design and development of the system.

(4) If an agency, lobbyist, or lobbyist employer attempts to file electronically within the required time frames stipulated in this chapter, but is unsuccessful due to a technological failure and declares that such an attempt was made within the required time frame, the commission must provide the filer with an alternative means of filing.

--- END ---