BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27.031 and 2015 c 11 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there shall be in effect in all counties and cities the state building code which shall consist of the following codes which are hereby adopted by reference:

(1)(a) The International Building Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc.;

(b) The International Residential Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc.;

(2) The International Mechanical Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc., except that the standards for liquefied petroleum gas installations shall be NFPA 58 (Storage and Handling of Liquefied Petroleum Gases) and ANSI Z223.1/NFPA 54 (National Fuel Gas Code);

(3) The International Fire Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc., including those standards of the National Fire Protection Association specifically referenced in the International Fire Code: PROVIDED, That, notwithstanding any wording in this code, participants in religious ceremonies shall not be precluded from carrying hand-held candles;

(4) The International Wildland Urban Interface Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc.;

(5) Except as provided in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform Plumbing Code and Uniform Plumbing Code Standards, published by the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials: PROVIDED, That any provisions of such code affecting sewers or fuel gas piping are not adopted;

(((5))) (6) The rules adopted by the council establishing standards for making buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by individuals with disabilities or elderly persons as provided in RCW 70.92.100 through 70.92.160; and

(((6))) (7) The state's climate zones for building purposes are designated in RCW 19.27A.020(3) and may not be changed through the adoption of a model code or rule.

In case of conflict among the codes enumerated in subsections (1), (2), (3), ((and)) (4), and (5) of this section, the first named code shall govern over those following.

The codes enumerated in this section shall be adopted by the council as provided in RCW 19.27.074. The council shall solicit input from first responders to ensure that firefighter safety issues are addressed during the code adoption process.

The council may issue opinions relating to the codes at the request of a local official charged with the duty to enforce the enumerated codes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2018.

--- END ---