BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that children have a right to be free from discrimination in public schools. The legislature further finds that the term "redskins" is a disparaging racial reference to Native Americans and has an undeniable connotation with the historical mistreatment of Native American people that this state and this country has actively attempted to reject. Such a racially offensive term has no place in association with public schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.642 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By the start of the 2017-18 school year, no public school may use the term "redskins" for any school club, organization, or athletic team name, mascot, or nickname.

(2) Any public school that is using the prohibited name on the effective date of this section is not required to adopt a new name by the start of the 2017-18 school year, but should make reasonable efforts within its budget to adopt a new name and replace its existing equipment, materials, signage, and other property bearing the prohibited name.

--- END ---