BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.37.640 and 2003 c 33 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Air bag" means an inflatable restraint system or portion of an inflatable restraint system ((installed in a motor vehicle)) including, but not limited to, the cushion material, cover, sensors, controllers, inflators, and wiring that (a) operates in the event of a crash and (b) is designed in accordance with federal motor vehicle safety standards for the specific make, model, and year of the motor vehicle in which it is or will be installed.

(2) "Previously deployed air bag" means an inflatable restraint system or portion of the system that has been activated or inflated as a result of a collision or other incident involving the vehicle.

(3) "Nondeployed salvage air bag" means an inflatable restraint system that has not been previously activated or inflated as a result of a collision or other incident involving the vehicle.

(4) "Counterfeit air bag" means a replacement motor vehicle inflatable occupant restraint system, including all component parts including, but not limited to, the cushion material, cover, sensors, controllers, inflators, and wiring, displaying a mark identical or similar to the genuine mark of a motor vehicle manufacturer without authorization from the manufacturer.

(5) "Nonfunctional air bag" means a replacement motor vehicle inflatable occupant restraint system, including all component parts including, but not limited to, the cushion material, cover, sensors, controllers, inflators, and wiring, which: (a) Was previously deployed or damaged; (b) has an electric fault that is detected by the vehicle air bag diagnostic system after the installation procedure is completed; or (c) includes any part or object including, but not limited to, a counterfeit or repaired air bag cover, installed in a motor vehicle to mislead the owner or operator of the motor vehicle into believing that a functional air bag has been installed.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.37.650 and 2011 c 96 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for a person ((is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if he or she knew or reasonably should have known that an air bag he or she)), with criminal negligence, to manufacture, import, sell, offer for sale, install((s)), or reinstall((s)) a device in a vehicle for compensation, or distribute((s)) as an auto part, or replace a motor vehicle air bag, that: (a) Is a counterfeit air bag, (b) is a nonfunctional air bag, (c) is a previously deployed or damaged air bag that is part of an inflatable restraint system, or (d) otherwise does not meet all applicable federal safety standards for an air bag. This section does not apply to nondeployed salvage air bags that meet the requirements of RCW 46.37.660(1).

(2) A person ((found guilty under subsection (1) of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars or by confinement in the county jail for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both)) in violation of this section is guilty of a class C felony if the criminal negligence caused bodily injury as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or death to another person.

(3) A person in violation of this section is guilty of a class C felony, regardless if the criminal negligence caused harm to another.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.37.660 and 2003 c 33 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Whenever an air bag that is part of a previously deployed inflatable restraint system is replaced by either a new air bag that is part of an inflatable restraint system or a nondeployed salvage air bag that is part of an inflatable restraint system, the air bag must conform to the original equipment manufacturer requirements and the installer must verify that the self-diagnostic system for the inflatable restraint system indicates that the entire inflatable restraint system is operating properly.

(b) A person in violation of this subsection (1) is guilty of a class C felony if the violation caused bodily injury as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or death to another person.

(c) A person in violation of this subsection (1) is guilty of a class C felony, regardless if the violation caused harm to another.

(2)(a) No person may sell, install, or reinstall in any motor vehicle any device that causes the vehicle's diagnostic system to inaccurately indicate that the vehicle is equipped with a functional air bag when a counterfeit air bag, a nonfunctional air bag, or no air bag is installed. This subsection does not apply to nondeployed salvage air bags that meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

(b) A person in violation of this subsection (2) is guilty of a class C felony if the violation caused bodily injury as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or death to another person.

(c) A person in violation of this subsection (2) is guilty of a class C felony, regardless if the violation caused harm to another.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.63.020 and 2014 c 124 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:

(1) RCW 46.09.457(1)(b)(i) relating to a false statement regarding the inspection of and installation of equipment on wheeled all-terrain vehicles;

(2) RCW 46.09.470(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance;

(3) RCW 46.09.480 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;

(4) RCW 46.10.490(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;

(5) RCW 46.10.495 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;

(6) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of title, registration certificates, and markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed or declared a total loss;

(7) RCW 46.16A.030 and 46.16A.050(3) relating to the nonpayment of taxes and fees by failure to register a vehicle and falsifying residency when registering a motor vehicle;

(8) RCW 46.16A.520 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to drive;

(9) RCW 46.16A.320 relating to vehicle trip permits;

(10) RCW 46.19.050(1) relating to knowingly providing false information in conjunction with an application for a special placard or license plate for disabled persons' parking;

(11) RCW 46.19.050(8) relating to illegally obtaining a parking placard, special license plate, special year tab, or identification card;

(12) RCW 46.19.050(9) relating to sale of a parking placard, special license plate, special year tab, or identification card;

(13) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's license;

(14) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a driver's license or instruction permit;

(15) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of a driver's license;

(16) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked license or status;

(17) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;

(18) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an occupational driver's license, temporary restricted driver's license, or ignition interlock driver's license;

(19) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without an ignition interlock device in violation of a license notation that the device is required;

(20) RCW 46.20.750 relating to circumventing an ignition interlock device;

(21) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;

(22) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;

(23) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of financial responsibility;

(24) RCW 46.35.030 relating to recording device information;

(25) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of sunscreening material;

(26) RCW 46.37.650 relating to the manufacture, importation, sale, ((resale,)) distribution, or installation of a counterfeit air bag, nonfunctional air bag, or previously deployed or damaged air bag;

(27) RCW 46.37.660 relating to the sale or installation of a device that causes a vehicle's diagnostic system to inaccurately indicate that the vehicle has a functional air bag when a counterfeit air bag, nonfunctional air bag, or no air bag is installed;

(28) RCW 46.37.671 through 46.37.675 relating to signal preemption devices;

(((28))) (29) RCW 46.37.685 relating to switching or flipping license plates, utilizing technology to flip or change the appearance of a license plate, selling a license plate flipping device or technology used to change the appearance of a license plate, or falsifying a vehicle registration;

(((29))) (30) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot vehicles;

(((30))) (31) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous articles;

(((31))) (32) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car or other property;

(((32))) (33) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;

(((33))) (34) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairers, storage persons, and appraisers;

(((34))) (35) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer, and an alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;

(((35))) (36) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;

(((36))) (37) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck operators;

(((37))) (38) RCW 46.55.300 relating to vehicle immobilization;

(((38))) (39) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers, flaggers, or firefighters;

(((39))) (40) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or cooperate with an officer;

(((40))) (41) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give identification to an officer;

(((41))) (42) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police vehicles;

(((42))) (43) RCW 46.61.212(4) relating to reckless endangerment of emergency zone workers;

(((43))) (44) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;

(((44))) (45) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(((45))) (46) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;

(((46))) (47) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;

(((47))) (48) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;

(((48))) (49) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent driving;

(((49))) (50) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of roadway workers;

(((50))) (51) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on highways;

(((51))) (52) RCW 46.61.655(7) (a) and (b) relating to failure to secure a load;

(((52))) (53) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an unattended vehicle with the motor running;

(((53))) (54) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle fuel;

(((54))) (55) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or attempt to cancel a traffic citation;

(((55))) (56) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding, abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;

(((56))) (57) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic offenders;

(((57))) (58) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to obtain a refund;

(((58))) (59) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle business practices, except where that chapter provides for the assessment of monetary penalties of a civil nature;

(((59))) (60) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of passengers in for hire vehicles;

(((60))) (61) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier insurance;

(((61))) (62) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine without a vehicle certificate;

(((62))) (63) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a limousine carrier;

(((63))) (64) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;

(((64))) (65) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training schools;

(((65))) (66) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a cab card, letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued under chapter 46.87 RCW;

(((66))) (67) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2015 c 261 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI

Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XV

Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV

Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII

Malicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII

Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(3))

XI

Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

X

Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IX

Abandonment of Dependent Person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit and Run—Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

VIII

Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.100)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII

Air bag diagnostic systems (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(2)(b))

Air bag replacement requirements (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(1)(b))

Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW 9A.48.120)

Counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.650(2))

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.050(1))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.675)

Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.060(1))

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VI

Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.070(1))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

V

Abandonment of Dependent Person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Air bag diagnostic systems (RCW 46.37.660(2)(c))

Air bag replacement requirements (RCW 46.37.660(1)(c))

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (RCW 46.37.650(3))

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Dealing in Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.050(2))

Domestic Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220, 26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Driving While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.502(6))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.504(6))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sending, Bringing into State Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.060(2))

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV

Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run—Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel—Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.070(2))

Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health care service contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health maintenance organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance professional (RCW 48.17.063(2))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicle Prowling 2 (third or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.52.100(3))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Viewing of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.075(1))

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III

Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace Officer With a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily Harm By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 1 (RCW 9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW 9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.82.055)

Unlawful Hunting of Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.410(3)(b))

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful Misbranding of Food Fish or Shellfish 1 (RCW 69.04.938(3))

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Unlawful Taking of Endangered Fish or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.120(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of a Nondesignated Vessel (RCW 77.15.530(4))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II

Commercial Fishing Without a License 1 (RCW 77.15.500(3)(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Engaging in Fish Dealing Activity Unlicensed 1 (RCW 77.15.620(3))

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, and RCW 9A.44.132)

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068)

Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 2 (RCW 9A.56.360(3))

Scrap Processing, Recycling, or Supplying Without a License (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 19.290.100)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW 9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Participation of Non-Indians in Indian Fishery (RCW 77.15.570(2))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlawful Purchase or Use of a License (RCW 77.15.650(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 2 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(a))

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Voyeurism (RCW 9A.44.115)

I

Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a Mental Health Advance Directive (RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Spotlighting Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.450(3)(b))

Suspension of Department Privileges 1 (RCW 77.15.670(3)(b))

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business beyond the scope of licensure (RCW 48.17.063)

Unlawful Fish and Shellfish Catch Accounting (RCW 77.15.630(3)(b))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal Identification Device (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Releasing, Planting, Possessing, or Placing Deleterious Exotic Wildlife (RCW 77.15.250(2)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.144)

Unlawful Use of Net to Take Fish 1 (RCW 77.15.580(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of Prohibited Aquatic Animal Species (RCW 77.15.253(3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Violating Commercial Fishing Area or Time 1 (RCW 77.15.550(3)(b))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The legislature finds that the practices covered by this act are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this act is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

--- END ---