BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.08.185 and 2013 c 60 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An electric vehicle charging station made available for public use must be indicated by vertical signage identifying the station as an electric vehicle charging station and indicating that it is ((only)) for electric vehicle charging. The signage must be consistent with the manual on uniform traffic control devices, as adopted by the department of transportation under RCW 47.36.030. Additionally, the electric vehicle charging station must be indicated by green pavement markings. Supplementary signage may be posted to provide additional information including, but not limited to, the amount of the monetary penalty under subsection (2)(a) of this section for parking in the station while not connected to the charging equipment, whether the electric vehicle charging station is available for either public or private use, or both, or any time of day or length of time restrictions on use of the station if any. A private property owner where an electric vehicle charging station is located may choose not to make the electric vehicle charging station available for public use and may designate which vehicles and under which circumstances the electric vehicle charging station may be used.

(2)(a) It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of one hundred twenty-four dollars, for any person to park a vehicle in an electric vehicle charging station made available for public use provided on public or private property if the vehicle is not connected to the charging equipment. The parking infraction must be processed as prescribed under RCW 3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16A.120, and 46.20.270(((3))) (2).

(b) It is not a parking infraction under (a) of this subsection if the private property owner designates the station to be for private use or the station is marked so that other types of vehicles may use the station.

(3) For purposes of this section, "electric vehicle charging station" means a public or private parking space that is served by charging equipment that has as its primary purpose the transfer of electric energy to a battery or other energy storage device in an electric vehicle.

--- END ---