BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79A.25.310 and 2011 c 154 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created the Washington invasive species council to exist until June 30, ((2017)) 2022. Staff support to the council shall be provided by the recreation and conservation office and from the agencies represented on the council. For administrative purposes, the council shall be located within the office.

(2) The purpose of the council is to provide policy level direction, planning, and coordination for combating harmful invasive species throughout the state and preventing the introduction of others that may be potentially harmful.

(3) The council is a joint effort between local, tribal, state, and federal governments, as well as the private sector and nongovernmental interests. The purpose of the council is to foster cooperation, communication, and coordinated approaches that support local, state, and regional initiatives for the prevention and control of invasive species.

(4) For the purposes of this chapter, "invasive species" include nonnative organisms that cause economic or environmental harm and are capable of spreading to new areas of the state. "Invasive species" does not include domestic livestock, intentionally planted agronomic crops, or nonharmful exotic organisms.

Sec. 2. RCW 79A.25.370 and 2011 c 154 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The invasive species council account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from appropriations, gifts, grants, and donations must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only to carry out the purposes of the council. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW and the approval of the director of the recreation and conservation office is required for expenditures. All expenditures must be directed by the council.

(2) This section expires June 30, ((2017)) 2022.

--- END ---