BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) A health carrier shall use the database selected pursuant to RCW 48.165.035 to accept and manage credentialing applications from health care providers.

(b) Effective June 1, 2018, a health carrier shall make a determination approving or denying a credentialing application submitted to the carrier no later than ninety days after receiving a complete application from a health care provider.

(c) Effective June 1, 2020, a health carrier shall make a determination approving or denying a credentialing application submitted to the carrier no later than ninety days after receiving a complete application from a health care provider. All determinations made by a health carrier in approving or denying credentialing applications must average no more than sixty days.

(d) This section does not require health carriers to approve a credentialing application or to place providers into a network.

(2) This section does not apply to health care entities that utilize credentialing delegation arrangements in the credentialing of their health care providers with health carriers.

(3) For purposes of this section, "credentialing" means the collection, verification, and assessment of whether a health care provider meets relevant licensing, education, and training requirements.

(4) Nothing in this section creates an oversight or enforcement duty on behalf of the office of the insurance commissioner against a health carrier for failure to comply with the terms of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When submitting a credentialing application to a health carrier, a health care provider shall submit the application to health carriers using the database selected pursuant to RCW 48.165.035.

(2) A health care provider shall update credentialing information as necessary to provide for the purposes of recredentialing.

(3) This section does not apply to providers practicing at entities that utilize credentialing delegation arrangements in the credentialing of their health care providers with health carriers.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Credentialing" has the same meaning as in section 1 of this act.

(b) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005(23)(a).

(c) "Health carrier" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect June 1, 2018.

--- END ---