BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A supplemental capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2017, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program and State Land Acquisition Study (92000003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for the Washington wildlife and recreation program and state land acquisition study as described in section 6005 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

Spokane Court Facility Upgrade (92000001)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$103,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$103,000

Sec. 1003. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000095)

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State. . . .(($6,451,000))

﻿ $96,819,000

((Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account—

State. . . .$90,368,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$96,819,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,863,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$107,682,000

Sec. 1004. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000189)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the public works board must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State. . . .(($4,000,000))

﻿ $204,000,000

((Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account—

State. . . .$200,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$204,000,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$680,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$884,000,000

Sec. 1005. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Trust Fund Appropriation (30000833)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to award loans and grants on a competitive basis to affordable housing projects statewide that will produce, at a minimum, a total of 1,900 homes and 500 seasonal beds, in the following categories and amounts:

(a) For people with chronic mental illness, 281 homes;

(b) For homeless families with children, 529 homes;

(c) For people with disabilities, developmental disabilities, veterans, and others, 400 homes; of that number, a minimum of 80 must be for veterans;

(d) For homeless youth, 200 homes;

(e) For farmworkers, 176 homes and 500 seasonal beds;

(f) For seniors, 200 homes;

(g) For homeownership, 100 homes.

(2) If upon review of completed applications, the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

(3) In evaluating projects for homes for homeless families with children specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section, consistent with Engrossed House Bill No. 1633, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in chapter 43.185.070(5), including projects involving collaborative partnerships between local school districts and either public housing authorities or nonprofit housing providers, that help children of low-income families succeed in school.

(4) $625,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for designing, engineering, constructing, installing, and other costs and fees associated with connecting existing and future farmworker housing in Skagit county to the city of Burlington sewer system.

(5)(a) $2,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely as a grant to ((the Puget Sound regional council)) King county on behalf of jurisdictions within the regional transit authority district encompassing portions of King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties for a revolving loan fund to support the development of affordable housing opportunities related to equitable transit-oriented development in accordance with Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5987 (transportation revenue). This amount must be provided in the form of a direct grant without a requirement that the grant be a reimbursement for local expenditures.

(b) Amounts provided in this section must be used to ((plan, predesign, design, provide technical assistance and financial services, and build low-income housing units in)) support the development or preservation of affordable housing opportunities related to equitable transit-oriented development for households whose adjusted income is at or below 80 percent of area median income, including underserved communities of concern. "Underserved communities of concern" are persons and families who: (i) Have incomes at or below thirty percent of the median family income for the county or standard metropolitan statistical area where the project is located; (ii) experience chronic homelessness; and (iii) lack affordable housing. Underserved communities of concern include veterans, immigrants, and refugee communities.

(c) Amounts provided in this section must be matched by local government nonstate cash resources.

(6) $500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for energy efficiency upgrades for the transitions supportive housing project in north Spokane.

(7) $350,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the city of Kirkland for the design and construction of an emergency shelter for women and families.

(8) $1,400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the city of Bellevue for the design and construction of an emergency shelter for homeless men.

(9)(a) $3,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation and $3,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for the construction or renovation of four health homes that will serve people with severe health and housing challenges, including those who are medically fragile and those who have been diagnosed with a chronic behavioral health disorder. Agencies operating health homes shall employ protocols to improve the care and stability of clients and mental health outcomes. The homes must be located in counties that have adopted the tax, authorized under RCW 82.14.460, for chemical dependency or mental health treatment services and include: (i) The Everett first low barrier housing; (ii) the 22 north emergency housing in Bellingham; (iii) a project in southwest Washington; and (iv) a project in eastern Washington.

(b) Local housing authorities may serve as fiscal agents for the projects.

(10) $1,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the establishment of a health home in Pierce county. The amount in this subsection is contingent upon Pierce county adopting the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.460.

(11) $1,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the PSKS homeless youth facility in Seattle; and

(12) $1,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for cocoon house in Everett.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction

Account—State. . . .(($75,000,000))

﻿ $80,000,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$83,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$220,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($295,000,000))

﻿ $303,000,000

Sec. 1006. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1033 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Ultra-Efficient Affordable Housing Demonstration (30000836)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for loans or grants to low-income housing developers to design and construct ultra-high energy efficient housing projects including single and multifamily units;

(2) By December 1, 2015, in consultation with professional building, energy efficiency and housing finance organizations, the office of financial management, and appropriate legislative staff, the department shall develop a process that is designed to solicit, evaluate, and fund ultra-high energy efficient housing projects as part of the housing trust fund competitive program.

(3) To receive funding, a project must demonstrate energy-saving and renewable energy systems designed to reach net-zero energy use after housing is fully occupied and must provide a life-cycle cost analysis report to the department.

(4) The department must consider, at a minimum and in any order, the following factors in assigning a numerical ranking to a project:

(a) Whether the proposed design has demonstrated that the project will achieve net-zero energy use when fully occupied;

(b) The life-cycle cost of the project;

(c) That the project demonstrates a design, use of materials, and construction process that can be replicated by the Washington building industry;

(d) The extent to which the project leverages nonstate funds;

(e) The extent to which the project is ready to proceed to construction;

(f) Whether the project promotes sustainable use of resources and environmental quality;

(g) Whether the project is being well-managed to fund maintenance and capital depreciation;

(h) Reduction of housing and utilities carbon footprint; and

(i) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(5) The department must monitor and track the results of the housing projects that receive ultra-high energy efficiency funding under this section. By December 1, 2018, the department must submit a report to appropriate legislative committees documenting:

(a) Project costs compared to the costs of traditional design and construction;

(b) Life-cycle costs;

(c) Use of sustainable resources;

(d) Energy savings and reduction of carbon footprint;

(e) Any lessons learned; and

(f) A data collection plan to monitor actual performance in order to validate projected savings.

(6) $600,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Riverton Park home-ownership project in Tukwila.

Appropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

Sec. 1007. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1036 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Behavioral Health Beds - Acute & Residential (92000344)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department of commerce, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, to issue grants to hospitals or other entities to establish new community hospital inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, or crisis stabilization facilities with sixteen or fewer beds for the purpose of providing short-term detention services through the publicly funded mental health system. Funds may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the community hospital inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, or crisis stabilization facilities. These funds may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services. The department shall establish criteria for the issuance of grants and priority must be given to those proposals to establish new community hospital inpatient psychiatric beds or free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities. The criteria must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional support networks, as defined in RCW 71.24.025;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical access to short-term detention services under chapter 71.05 RCW in their region;

(c) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(d) A commitment by the applicant to maintain the beds or facility for at least a ten-year period;

(e) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(f) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;

(g) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW; and

(h) A lack of local resources, including nonmedicaid operating reserves, and regional fund balances that are not contractually encumbered.

(2) To accommodate the emergent need for inpatient psychiatric services, the department of health and the department of commerce, in collaboration with the department of social and health services shall establish a concurrent and expedited process for the purpose of grant applicants meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, or crisis stabilization facilities.

(3) The following list is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

Cascade mental health. . . .$3,000,000

((Woodmont)) Kent recovery center. . . .$5,000,000

Parkside conversion to behavioral health beds. . . .(($3,000,000))

$4,000,000

((Navos behavioral health center for children, youth &

families. . . .$2,000,000))

Central Washington comprehensive mental health. . . .$2,000,000

Swedish Ballard psychiatric unit. . . .$3,000,000

Substance abuse & mental health facilities. . . .$2,000,000

Fairfax behavioral health - Providence health &

services facility. . . .$1,000

Daybreak Youth Services. . . .$1,500,000

(4) Multicare-Franciscan joint venture. . . .$5,000,000

(5) State Mental Hospital Diversion Projects. . . .$7,552,000

(a) The appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the department of commerce, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the health care authority, to issue grants to entities for the development of facilities that provide for the diversion or transition of patients from the state hospitals.

(b) Funds may be used for construction and equipment costs directly associated with the establishment of community hospital inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, crisis triage centers, and crisis stabilization facilities; secure detoxification facilities and co-occurring treatment facilities; or other transitional facilities that provide for the diversion or transition of state hospital patients. These funds may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.

(c) The department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the health care authority, shall establish criteria for the issuance of grants including but not limited to: (i) A clear demonstration of need; (ii) a commitment to serving persons who are publicly funded; (iii) a commitment to maintain the beds or facility for at least a ten-year period; and (iv) specific performance and outcome measures to ensure greatest benefit to the region. The department may only fund proposals that provide evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more behavioral health organizations as defined in RCW 71.24.025 or the health care authority in the case of an application submitted from a region that has become an early adopter of integrated medical and behavioral health services pursuant to RCW 71.24.380(5). In awarding these funds, the department must prioritize an equitable distribution for facilities in both rural and urban areas with the greatest demonstrated need.

(6) Competitive grants. . . .$10,499,000

(7) Clallam county respite center. . . .$847,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($32,000,000))

﻿ $44,399,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($32,000,000))

﻿ $44,399,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017 Local and Community Projects (30000846)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is released for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) As the most trade dependent state in the nation, the legislature recognizes the significant statewide benefits to be gained from the proposed Asia Pacific cultural center. The multipurpose facility will serve as a needed cultural resource for Washington's Asian and Pacific Islander community; provide affordable housing and educational opportunities; strengthen relations with our Asia-Pacific trading partners; and deliver economic growth as a commercial and tourist destination. The legislature intends to support the development of the project through a grant to be used for project coordination and development of a sustainable financial plan, which the legislature intends as a prerequisite to consideration of any further state capital commitment.

(8) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Projects

Amounts

Airway Heights Recreational Complex (Airway Heights)

$200,000

Algona Community Center (Algona)

$500,000

Asia Pacific Cultural Center (Ruston)

$200,000

Bellevue Boys & Girls Club (Bellevue)

$200,000

Bridgeview Education and Employment Resource Center (Vancouver)

$750,000

Central Alarm System (Cook)

$1,000

Chehalis Boys & Girls Club New Facility (Chehalis)

$200,000

Chelatchie Prairie RR Museum & Building Entrance (Yacolt)

$200,000

Chelatchie Prairie RR Museum & Building Maintenance (Yacolt)

$300,000

Coastal Resiliency Project (Ocean Shores)

$200,000

DuPont Historical Museum Renovation (DuPont)

$21,000

Edmonds Veterans Plaza (Edmonds)

$77,000

Ellensburg Train Station (Ellensburg)

$400,000

Evergreen Pool Improvements (White Center)

$90,000

Fort Steilacoom Park (pave and stripe parking lot) (Lakewood)

$257,000

Goldendale Senior Center (Goldendale)

$155,000

Grays Harbor Gateway Center (Aberdeen)

$550,000

Historic Fox Theatre Restoration (Centralia)

$250,000

Historic Ship Preservation Project (Bremerton)

$300,000

Holocaust Center for Humanity (Seattle)

$200,000

Kingston Green Community Village (Kingston)

$85,000

Kitsap Peninsula Water Trails (Multiple, along peninsula)

$52,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center (Lake Stevens)

$309,000

Lyle Activity Center Restoration (Lyle)

$270,000

Mason County Veterans Shelter / Housing (Shelton)

$206,000

Meals on Wheels Kitchen and Café Equipment (Richland)

$206,000

Mental Health Housing, First and Denny (Seattle)

$500,000

Mill Creek Parks and Public Works Shop (Mill Creek)

$257,000

Mother Joseph Academy Roof Replacement (Vancouver)

$1,000,000

Parkland Prairie Nature Preserve (Parkland)

$30,000

Pasco Early Learning Center (Pasco)

$300,000

Pepin Creek Realignment (Lynden)

$400,000

Performing Arts & Event Center (Federal Way)

$52,000

Port of Sunnyside Demolish Carnation Building (Sunnyside)

$100,000

RAC-Covered Bleachers Project (Lacey)

$26,000

Riverwalk Trail Phase VI (Puyallup)

$500,000

Scott Hill Park of Woodland (Woodland)

$500,000

Shelter and Navigation Center (Seattle)

$600,000

Skagit County Children's Advocacy Center (Mount Vernon)

$318,000

Skyline Community Meeting Space (White Salmon)

$172,000

South Kitsap High School NJROTC (Port Orchard)

$30,000

SR 542 Kendall, Columbia Valley Trail (Kendall)

$77,000

Tenino Depot Museum Roof (Tenino)

$22,000

Wesley Homes (Des Moines)

$100,000

Westport Marina Dredging (Westport)

$200,000

Total

$11,363,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,363,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,363,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Disaster Emergency Response (92000377)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $209,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant to Chelan county for its emergency operations center.

(2) $500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the city of Twisp for its city hall/emergency response.

(3) $1,100,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the city of Pateros for its water reservoir project.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,809,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rapid Housing Improvement Program (30000863)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $100,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a study of available housing opportunities for veterans experiencing homelessness and the conversion of units to provide permanent supportive housing for geriatric veterans with psychiatric disorders. The study must also, in collaboration with the department of veterans affairs, evaluate the feasibility of converting building 10 at the state veterans home at Retsil into housing for veterans.

(2) $125,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for landlord mitigation for the cost of damages that may be caused to private market units renting to housing choice voucher holders. In order to be eligible for assistance, a landlord must obtain a judgment against a tenant from the county in which the property is located. Participation is restricted to units within jurisdictions that prohibit denying tenancy based solely on the applicant's source of income. Reimbursement is allowed only for amounts related to property damage, unpaid rent, and other damages caused as a result of the voucher-holder tenant's occupancy. Damages must exceed normal wear and tear on the property and be in excess of $500 but not more than $5,000 per tenancy. A claim must be submitted within one year of obtaining a judgment against a tenant.

Appropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Saint Edward Feasibility Study (91000850)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000

Sec. 1012. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1040 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects 2016 (92000369)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is released for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) $2,209,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Fairchild air force base protection and community empowerment project, including the purchase of twenty acres of land by Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights for development of affordable housing and the ((county's)) purchase of mobile home parks by Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights in order to reduce the use of the accident potential zone for residential purposes. There shall be no limitations on the sequence of the purchase of mobile home parks. If ((the county)) Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights subsequently rezones, develops, and leases the mobile home park property for commercial or industrial uses contrary to the allowed uses in the accident potential zone, ((the county)) Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights must repay to the state the amount spent on the purchase of mobile home parks in its entirety within ten years. Mobile home parks purchased under the provisions of this subsection may be sold by Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights, provided that the uses of the mobile home park property are not contrary to the allowed uses in the accident potential zone. Any moneys from this sale must be used to purchase other mobile home parks in the Fairchild air force base protection and community empowerment project. The twenty acres of land purchased under this subsection for development as affordable housing may be sold, in whole or in part, by the recipient, provided the property sold is used for affordable housing as required in the Fairchild air force base protection and community empowerment project. Recipients of funds provided under this subsection are not required to demonstrate that the project site is under their control for a minimum of ten years but they must demonstrate that the project site is under their control through ownership or long-term lease. Projects funded under this subsection are not required to meet the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125(6) and subsection (5) of this section.

(8) $850,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the White River restoration project. Design solutions for flooding reductions in the lower White River must include a floodplain habitat design that both reduces flood risks and restores salmon habitat by reconnecting the river with its floodplain and a sustainable riparian corridor. Project designs and plans must also identify lands for acquisition needed for floodplain reconnection where pending or existing development eliminates the potential for riparian and aquatic habitat restoration. The city shall work cooperatively with the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe and the Puyallup Tribe of Indians, and develop a plan collaboratively to achieve both flood reduction and habitat restoration.

(9) Up to $150,000 of the appropriation in this section for the veterans helping veterans: Emergency transition shelter project may be spent on preconstruction or preacquisition activities, including, but not limited to, building inspections, design of necessary renovations, cost estimation, and other activities necessary to identify and select a facility appropriate for the program. The remainder of the appropriation must be used for eventual acquisition and renovations of a facility.

(10) $2,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the mercy housing and health care center at Sand Point. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the center may not house any community health care training organization that has been investigated by and has paid settlement fees to the attorney general's office for alleged medicaid fraud.

(11) The Lake Chelan land use plan must be developed without adverse impacts on agricultural operations.

(12) $1,300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for phase one of the main street revitalization project in the city of Mountlake Terrace.

(13) $300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the city of Stanwood to acquire property for a new city hall/public safety facility.

(14) Up to 30 percent of the funding for the Kennewick boys and girls club may be used for land acquisition.

(15) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Projects

Amounts

Algona senior center

$500,000

All-accessible destination playground

$750,000

Appleway trail

$1,000,000

Basin 3 sewer rehabilitation

$1,500,000

Bellevue downtown park inspiration playground and sensory garden

$1,000,000

Bender fields parking lot and restrooms

$1,000,000

Blackhills community soccer complex safety projects

$750,000

Bremerton children's dental clinic

$396,000

Brewster reservoir replacement

$1,250,000

Brookville gardens

$1,200,000

Camas-Washougal Babe Ruth youth baseball improve Louis Bloch park

$10,000

Cancer immunotherapy facility-Seattle children's research inst.

$7,000,000

Caribou trail apartments

$100,000

Carnegie library imprv for the rapid recidivism reduction program

$1,000,000

Cavelero park - regional park facility/skateboard park

$500,000

CDM caregiving services: Clark county aging resource center

$1,200,000

Centerville school heating upgrades

$46,000

Chambers Creek regional park pier extension and moorage

$1,750,000

City of LaCenter parks & rec community center

$1,500,000

City of Lynden pipeline

$2,000,000

City of Lynden-Riverview road construction

$850,000

City of Lynden-safe ((rtes)) routes to school and Kaemingk trail gap elim.

$300,000

City of Mt. Vernon downtown flood protect project & riverfront trail

$1,500,000

City of Olympia - Percival Landing renovation

$950,000

City of Pateros water system

$1,838,000

City of Stanwood ((police station/city hall relocation)) City hall/public safety facility property acquisition

$300,000

Classroom door barricade - nightlock

$45,000

Confluence area parks upgrade and restoration

$1,000,000

Corbin senior center elevator

$300,000

Covington community park

$5,000,000

Cross Kirkland corridor trail connection 52nd St.

$1,069,000

Dawson place child advocacy center building completion project

$161,000

Dekalb street pier

$500,000

DNR/City of Castle Rock exchange

$80,000

Dr. Sun Yat Sen memorial statue

$10,000

Drug abuse and prevention center - Castle Rock

$96,000

DuPont historical museum renovation

$46,000

East Tacoma community center

$1,000,000

Edmonds center for the arts: Gym climate control & roof repairs

$250,000

Edmonds senior & community center

$1,250,000

Emergency generator for kidney resource center

$226,000

Enumclaw expo center

$350,000

Fairchild air force base protection & comm empowerment project

$2,209,000

Federal Way PAC center

$2,000,000

Filipino community of Seattle village (innovative learning center)

$1,200,000

Franklin Pierce early learning center

$2,000,000

Gateway center project

$1,000,000

Gilda club repairs

$800,000

Granite Falls boys & girls club

$1,000,000

Gratzer park ball fields

$200,000

Grays Harbor navigation improvement project

$2,500,000

Green river gorge open space buffer, Kummer connection

$750,000

Guy Cole center revitalization

$450,000

Historic renovation Maryhill museum

$1,000,000

Hopelink at Ronald commons

$750,000

Irvine slough storm water separation

$500,000

Kahlotus highway sewer force main

$2,625,000

Kennewick boys and girls club

$500,000

Kent east hill YMCA

$500,000

Key Pen civics center

$50,000

KiBe high school parking

$125,000

Kitsap humane society - shelter renovation

$90,000

Lacey boys & girls club

$29,000

Lake Chelan land use plan

$75,000

LeMay car museum ADA access improvements

$500,000

Lyman city park renovation

$167,000

Lyon creek flood reduction project

$400,000

Marine terminal rail investments

$1,000,000

Martin Luther King Jr. family outreach center expansion project

$85,000

Mason county Belfair wastewater system rate relief

$1,500,000

McAllister museum

$660,000

Mercer arena energy savings & sustainability funding

$450,000

Mercy housing and health center at Sand Point

$2,500,000

Meridian center for health

$2,500,000

Minor Road water reservoir replacement

$1,500,000

Mountains to Sound Greenway Tiger Mountain access improvements

$300,000

Mountlake Terrace Main street revitalization project

$1,300,000

Mt. Spokane guest services building & preservation/maintenance of existing facilities

$520,000

((Mukilteo)) Boys & girls club of Snohomish county (Brewster, Sultan, Granite Falls, Arlington, and Mukilteo)

$1,000,000

Mukilteo tank farm clean-up

$250,000

New Shoreline medical-dental clinic

$1,500,000

Nordic heritage museum

$2,000,000

North Kitsap fishline foodbank

$625,000

Northwest native canoe center project

$250,000

Oak Harbor clean water facility

$2,500,000

Okanogan emergency communications

$400,000

Onalaska community tennis and sports courts

$80,000

Opera house ADA elevator

$357,000

Orcas Island library expansion

$1,400,000

Pacific community center

$250,000

PCAF's building for the future

$350,000

Pe Ell second street

$197,000

Perry technical school

$1,000,000

Pike Place Market front project

$800,000

Police station security/hardening

$38,000

Port of Centralia - Centralia station

$500,000

Port of Sunnyside demolish the carnation building

$450,000

PROVAIL TBI residential facility

$450,000

Quincy water reuse

$1,500,000

Redmond downtown park

$3,000,000

Redondo boardwalk repairs

$1,500,000

Renovate senior center

$400,000

Rochester boys & girls club

$38,000

Rockford wastewater treatment

$1,200,000

Roslyn renaissance-NW improve company bldg renovation project

$900,000

Sammamish rowing association boathouse

$500,000

SE 240th St. watermain system improvement project

$700,000

SE Seattle financial & economic opportunity center

$1,500,000

SeaTac international marketplace & transit-oriented community

$1,250,000

Seattle theatre group

$131,000

Snohomish veterans memorial rebuild

$10,000

Snoqualmie riverfront project

$1,520,000

South 228th street inter-urban trail connector

$500,000

Splash pad/foundation: Centralia outdoor pool restoration project

$200,000

Spokane women's club

$300,000

Springbrook park neighborhood connection project

$300,000

SR 532 flood berm and bike/ped path

$85,000

St. Vincent food bank & community services construction project

$400,000

Stan & Joan cross park

$750,000

Steilacoom Sentinel Way repairs

$450,000

Stilly Valley youth project Arlington B&G club

$2,242,000

Sunset neighborhood park

$1,750,000

Support, advocacy & resource center for victims of violence

$750,000

The gathering house job training café

$14,000

The Salvation Army Clark County: Corps community center

$1,200,000

Thurston county food bank

$500,000

Tulalip water pipeline, (final of 8 segments)

$2,000,000

Twin Bridges museum rehab Lyle Wa

$64,000

Twisp civic building

$500,000

Vancouver, Columbia waterfront project

$2,500,000

Vantage point senior apartments

$2,000,000

Veterans center

$500,000

Veterans helping veterans: Emergency transition shelter

$600,000

Waitsburg Main Street bridge replacement

$1,700,000

Washington green schools

$105,000

Washougal roof repair

$350,000

Water meter and system improvement program

$500,000

Water reservoir and transmission main

$500,000

Wayne golf course land preservation

$500,000

White River restoration project

$850,000

Willapa behavioral health safety improvement project

$75,000

WSU LID frontage - local and economic benefits

$500,000

Yakima children's museum center

$50,000

Yakima SunDome

$2,000,000

Yelm community center

$500,000

Yelm senior center

$80,000

Youth wellness campus gymnasium renovation

$1,000,000

Total

$130,169,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$130,169,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$130,169,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Joint Base Lewis McChord North Clear Zone Base Realignment and Closure Preparation (92000383)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000

Sec. 1014. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1076 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Oversight of State Facilities (30000046)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of financial management, with assistance from the department of enterprise services and other state agencies as needed, shall conduct space studies and make recommendations to the legislature on the state's space standards including alternative workplace strategies. State agencies shall provide space use data in a format prescribed by the office of financial management to support this effort. The office of financial management shall report the results and recommendations to the legislative fiscal committees by July 1, 2016.

(2) The office of financial management, with assistance from the department of enterprise services and other state agencies as needed, shall update the lease space requirements to reflect high performance building standards and any other components that may improve the conditions of leased space.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,040,000))

﻿ $1,182,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,120,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($2,160,000))

﻿ $2,302,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,160,000))

﻿ $2,302,000

Sec. 1015. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1077 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Construction Contingency Pool (90000300)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for construction projects that confront emergent and unavoidable costs in excess of the construction contingency included in the project appropriation. For requests occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting contingency funds from the office of financial management. Eligible agencies that may apply to the pool include higher education institutions, the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, the department of enterprise services, ((the criminal justice training commission,)) the department of veterans affairs, the parks and recreation commission, and the department of fish and wildlife. Eligible construction projects are only projects that had cost reductions as kept on file with the office of financial management. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee as projects are approved for funding.

(2)(a) The legislature intends to use the 1063 Block building development project as a model of efficient space and energy use for both owned and leased state office buildings.

(b) To achieve this intent, the office of financial management must reconsider tenants for the building, including consideration of the utilities and transportation commission, all current tenants of the general administration building with operations compatible with a high density office building, and other possible tenants. The measure of achieving a higher space efficiency is measured by the average square feet per housed employee.

(c) The office of financial management must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the redesign and the increase space efficiency by October 15, 2015.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

Sec. 1016. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1078 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repairs (90000301)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected building or grounds failures that will impact public health and safety and the day-to-day operations of the facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, an emergency declaration signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The emergency declaration must include a description of the health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of other funding that may be applied to the project. For emergencies occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting emergency funds from the office of financial management. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee as emergency projects are approved for funding.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $7,000,000

Sec. 1017. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1079 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repair Pool for K-12 Public Schools (90000302)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for minor works repairs at west sound skill center.

(2) $103,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Oakesdale school boiler.

(3) $113,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Oakesdale school roof.

((Emergency repair funding)) (4) The remaining portion of the appropriation is provided solely for emergency repairs to address unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at K-12 public schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day-to-day operations of the school facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, an emergency declaration must be signed by the school district board of directors and the superintendent of public instruction, and submitted to the office of financial management for consideration. The emergency declaration must include a description of the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of local funding to be applied to the project. Grants of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as emergency projects are approved for funding.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,216,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$6,216,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $6,216,000

Sec. 1018. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1083 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Equipment Benchmarks for Capital Projects Study (92000010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office of financial management shall submit a higher education and skill center capital project equipment cost study to the governor and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by December 1, 2015. The study must include benchmarks for standard ranges of fixed and nonfixed equipment expenditures in different types of facilities and an examination of alternatives for financing equipment costs where the equipment has a life expectancy that is less than the length of bond financing. The alternative analysis must include a life-cycle cost analysis of the competing alternatives to determine the most cost-effective options to the state bond and general fund budget.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($250,000))

﻿ $125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($250,000))

﻿ $125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cost-Effective K-3 Classrooms Assessment (30000053)

The office of financial management shall analyze cost-effective options for the procurement of high quality, sustainably built, energy efficient, and healthy classroom space to address the need for K-3 classrooms statewide. The analysis may include the potential for use of advanced sustainable materials and innovative design, production and procurement processes. The office of financial management may contract with one or more consultants to assist with the analysis.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp. s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Water Infrastructure Investment Analysis (92000016)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature finds that population growth, climate change, and other factors are creating increasing stresses on critical water infrastructure, fisheries, and watershed health. To inform policy decisions about the scale and timing of new investments in flood risk reduction, water quality, and water supply both in-stream and out-of-stream, it is the intent of the legislature to direct an analysis of the economic implications related to water infrastructure and fisheries habitat restoration needs across the state.

(2) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to contract for an analysis of the economic implications relating to water infrastructure and fisheries habitat restoration needs.

(a) The analysis must incorporate existing data and information relating to:

(i) Integrated water supply and management planning that addresses water storage for municipal and agricultural uses, in-stream or out-of-stream water supply needs, or both, as well as fisheries habitat and passage improvements;

(ii) Multiple benefit approaches that reduce the risk from floods and protect and restore naturally functioning areas; and

(iii) Low-impact development retrofits to reduce toxics and other pollutants in storm water.

(b) The analysis must consider, but not be limited to, fishing and recreation benefits of improved floodplain and riparian habitat, in-stream flows, municipal and agricultural water storage benefits, and fish passage projects.

(c) The analysis must provide a review of other state reports that examine the economic implications to water infrastructure and fisheries habitat restoration needs.

(d) The analysis must address, but not be limited to:

(i) A 20 year forecast of known need for investment for the three categories identified in (a) of this subsection;

(ii) Estimated effects on the Washington economy without new infrastructure investment, including impacts on households, business, and commerce caused by flooding, drought, and degraded water quality from storm water runoff; and

(iii) Estimated economic benefits, including jobs, commerce, and development associated with each billion dollars invested in the categories in (a) of this subsection.

(3) The consultant shall invite representatives of interest groups to provide input in conducting the analysis. The interest groups must include, but are not be limited to, the Washington business roundtable, the Washington state labor council, and the Washington environmental council. The consultant must report its findings to the house of representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee by January 15, 2017.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cross Laminated Timber Pilot Project (92000015)

(1) $75,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the Washington State University college of engineering and architecture, to prepare a review and summary of available engineering test results and other evidence demonstrating the performance of cross laminated timber (CLT) and other regionally sourced sustainable or renewable materials in building construction. The review must emphasize results and evidence that are relevant to the consideration of building code amendments that allow for greater use of CLT in construction. Administrative overhead charges by Washington State University may not exceed five percent of the amount provided in this subsection. The report must be submitted to the state building code council and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016.

(2) $50,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the department of commerce or an associate development organization in an area of the state with appropriate forest resources to assist prospective CLT manufacturers in evaluating the potential CLT market and determine necessary investments to manufacture CLT.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

K-3 Modular Classrooms (91000437)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for providing modular classrooms for the purpose of supporting reduced class sizes in kindergarten through third grade to the following school districts: (a) Seattle school district; (b) Mount Vernon school district; (c) Sequim school district; (d) Wapato school district; and (e) Toppenish school district.

(2) The legislature intends the modular classrooms to be a model for classrooms to use mass timber products, which includes cross laminated timber.

(3)(a) The department of enterprise services shall develop a process for providing up to four modular classrooms to each of the school districts identified in subsection (2) of this section. The department of enterprise services shall contract with the modular suppliers for construction, delivery, and hook up at the school site.

(b) A request for qualification process must be used to select modular classroom builders. The department of enterprise services shall distribute modular specifications, including standard size and amenities, to the school districts prior to the final selection of modular classroom builders. School districts may provide comments within 30 days of receiving the specifications. After comments are received, the department of enterprise services shall issue the request for qualifications that includes a standardized specification for all modulars based on size and operational requirements.

(c) The competitive process must include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts including representatives from the school districts receiving modulars.

(d) Scoring criteria must include: Innovative use of cross laminated timber (CLT), school district requirements and operational reliability, schedule of delivery of the modular classrooms to the school, overall cost, cost per square foot, percent CLT used, regional sourcing of CLT, sustainability, operating costs, energy costs, warranty, design life, and ability to be connected either vertically or horizontally.

(e) At least two builders must be selected for the competition using a centralized contract. The number of modulars must be equal between the modular suppliers.

(4)(a) Participating school districts must have a site identified for the modular classrooms before delivery. School districts must provide furnishings.

(b) The modular classroom supplier must: Prepare the site, obtain any permits required, deliver the classrooms to the school district site, install the modular classrooms, and make utility connections.

(c) Administration fees may not exceed two and one-half percent of the contract amount.

(5) The department of enterprise services shall report to the legislature the results of the competition including cost, CLT use, and any improvements that can be made.

(6) School districts receiving modular classrooms from this section remain eligible for the K-3 class size reduction construction pilot grant program as specified in section 201, chapter 41, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,500,000

Sec. 1023. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1088 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation (30000722)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) No minor works funds may be allotted until the action part of the plan is provided. Up to $300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided for the department to develop an implementation plan for a capitol campus parking strategy. The action part of the plan must include: (((1))) (a) During the legislative sessions a reduction of agency reserve stalls from twenty-six percent to fifteen percent as recommended by the 2014 state of Washington parking and transportation study; (((2))) (b) cost-benefit of incorporating parking attendants or parking arms to accept payment for campus parking during the legislative sessions; (((3))) (c) installation of at least two electronic boards, or other methods of providing the available parking capacity in the east plaza garage. The department shall work in cooperation with the city of Olympia, and the city may provide a proposal to enforce parking on the capitol campus. The department shall report to all fiscal committees on its progress by November 1, 2015.

(2) $60,000 of the Thurston county capital facilities account—state appropriation is provided solely for minor works repair at the 120 Union Avenue building and is contingent upon the building remaining open subject to the following conditions: (a) The department shall: (i) Apply the current capital projects surcharge to the operating rents; (ii) increase the tenant rental rate by $1 per square foot per year above the current rate; (iii) add a clause to the tenant contracts that the lease shall be terminated should a major building system failure occur. A major building system includes failure of the roof, heating, and electrical systems; (iv) add a clause to the tenant contracts that the lease may be terminated if the occupancy of the building falls below 30 percent; and (v) actively promote rental of vacant space in the building; and (b) the department may close the building once the legislature has approved construction funding for a project at the site.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .(($850,000))

﻿ $1,910,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($5,608,000))

﻿ $4,608,000

State Vehicle Parking Account—State. . . .$900,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($7,358,000))

﻿ $7,418,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$19,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($26,358,000))

﻿ $26,418,000

Sec. 1024. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1095 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Lake Long-term Management Planning (30000740)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely to make tangible progress on reaching broad agreement on a long-term plan for the management of Capitol Lake/Deschutes Estuary/Lower Budd Inlet/Deschutes River watershed, building on the recommendations of the 2014 situation assessment for Capitol Lake management prepared by the Ruckleshaus center and prior related reports.

The department shall:

(a) Identify and summarize the findings of the best available science concerning water quality and habitat as they relate to conceptual options of retaining or removing the dam;

(b) Identify multiple hybrid options for future management of Capitol Lake, which options must include substantial improvement in fish and wildlife habitat and ecosystem functions, maintaining a historic reflecting pool at the north end of the lake/estuary, and adaptive management strategies;

(c) Identify general cost estimates for construction and maintenance of each conceptual option, in consultation with the office of financial management;

(d) Identify the range of public support for or concerns about each option;

(e) Identify conceptual options and degree of general support for shared funding by state, local, and federal governments and potentially other entities;

(f) Identify one or more conceptual options for long-term shared governance of a future management plan, including consideration of an option similar to state lake management districts, chapter 36.61 RCW or shellfish protection districts, chapter 90.72 RCW.

(g) Engage in other related activities which would contribute to reaching broad agreement on the long-term management plan.

The department shall conduct its information gathering and report preparation with a pro-active approach to public engagement, and may create such advisory entities as it determines would be helpful.

(2) The department may contract for facilitation, research, or other services to assist in the preparation of this report.

(3) The department shall make periodic reports to the state capitol committee, the office of financial management, and fiscal committees of the legislature, with a final report to be submitted no later than January 1, 2017. The reports must include visual representations of proposals to aid the public and decision-makers to understand and evaluate them.

Appropriation:

((Enterprise Services Account—State. . . .$250,000))

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Tri Cities Readiness Center - Land (30000808)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$900,000

Military Department Capital Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Emergency Management Division's (EMD's) UPS Replacement (30000810)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

Sec. 1027. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

The reappropriation and appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature intends to support the transfer of the Olympia armory to the Thurston county boys and girls club. The military department must execute an agreement to transfer title of the property to the Thurston county boys and girls club if the club agrees to use the facility as a boys and girls club for a minimum of ten years. The transfer agreement must specify a mutually agreed transfer date following the completion of the Thurston county readiness center. The transfer agreement must require the club to cover any closing costs and must specify a purchase price of one dollar. The agreement must be reported to the house of representatives capital budget committee, senate ways and means committee, and the governor's office by January 1, 2016.

(2) The legislature intends to support the transfer of the Puyallup armory to the central Pierce fire and rescue (Pierce county fire protection district No. 6). By January 1, 2017, the military department must execute a memorandum of understanding to transfer title of the property to the central Pierce fire and rescue if the district agrees to use the facility as a fire and rescue station for a minimum of ten years. The memorandum must provide central Pierce fire and rescue with a right of first refusal and specify a mutually agreed transfer date following the vacation of the Puyallup armory. The memorandum must require the central Pierce fire and rescue to cover any closing costs and must specify a purchase price equal to fair market value for the raw land only. The memorandum must be reported to the house of representatives capital budget committee, the senate ways and means committee, and the governor's office by January 1, 2017.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,750,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($7,883,000))

﻿ $635,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .(($34,207,000))

﻿ $1,800,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($42,090,000))

﻿ $2,435,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))

﻿ $40,161,000

TOTAL. . . .(($44,890,000))

﻿ $45,396,000

Sec. 1028. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1114 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

National Parks Service Maritime Heritage Grants (91000008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $28,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the center for wooden boats' historic small craft project.

(2) $87,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Northwest seaport's preservation of the national historic landmark 1889 tugboat Arthur Foss.

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .(($105,000))

﻿ $115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($105,000))

﻿ $115,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

Sec. 2001. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 2004 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide (91000037)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Up to $950,000 may be used for necessary renovations at the Maple Lane facility for the purpose of temporary forensic beds.))

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($10,645,000))

﻿ $16,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($10,645,000))

﻿ $16,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Competency Restoration (91000040)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$950,000

Sec. 2003. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 2016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

((Western State Hospital - East Campus)) Eastern State Hospital: Psychiatric Intensive Care Unit (30002773)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,200,000))

﻿ $1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,200,000))

﻿ $1,250,000

Sec. 2004. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 2023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

ESH-15 Bed Addition for Substitute Senate Bill No. 5889 (92000016)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,400,000))

﻿ $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,400,000))

﻿ $1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and Treatment Center: CLIP Capacity (30003324)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,150,000

TOTAL. . . .$6,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital - Eastlake: Emergency Generator Replacement (30003326)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Lakeland Village: Code Required Campus Infrastructure Upgrades (30002238)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Western State Hospital (30003388)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple Lane-Cascade: Remodel for Forensic Services (91000039)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen-Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: New Civil Ward (92000022)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

Sec. 2012. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 2029 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Preconstruction Loans (30000334)

Appropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance ((Repayment)) Account—

State. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000

Sec. 2013. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 2035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000174)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the restoration and preservation of the Washington soldiers home cemetery.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,095,000))

﻿ $3,345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,690,000

TOTAL. . . .(($12,785,000))

﻿ $13,035,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 3001. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (20084010)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Projects subject to the original reappropriation in this section continue to be authorized. It is the intent of the legislature that the funding reduction in the 2015-2017 biennium will be restored in future biennia.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$221,000

Water Quality Capital Account—State. . . .$43,000

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($570,000))

﻿ $1,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($834,000))

﻿ $265,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$66,036,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))

﻿ $569,000

TOTAL. . . .$66,870,000

Sec. 3002. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

(2) Projects subject to the original reappropriation in this section continue to be authorized. It is the intent of the legislature that the funding reduction in the 2015-2017 biennium will be restored in future biennia.

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$1,959,000

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($3,666,000))

﻿ $1,502,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($5,625,000))

﻿ $3,461,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$35,573,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))

﻿ $2,164,000

TOTAL. . . .$41,198,000

Sec. 3003. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000208)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3024, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

(2) Projects subject to the original reappropriation in this section continue to be authorized. It is the intent of the legislature that the funding reduction in the 2015-2017 biennium will be restored in future biennia.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($12,341,000))

﻿ $11,511,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,759,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))

﻿ $830,000

TOTAL. . . .$34,100,000

Sec. 3004. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000217)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Projects subject to the original reappropriation in this section continue to be authorized. It is the intent of the legislature that the funding reduction in the 2015-2017 biennium will be restored in future biennia.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($2,117,000))

﻿ $751,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,883,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))

﻿ $1,366,000

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

Sec. 3005. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Projects subject to the original reappropriation in this section continue to be authorized. It is the intent of the legislature that the funding reduction in the 2015-2017 biennium will be restored in future biennia.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($1,896,000))

﻿ $698,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,504,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))

﻿ $1,198,000

TOTAL. . . .$16,400,000

Sec. 3006. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3033 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Statewide Storm Water Projects (30000294)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3041, chapter 4, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

(2) Projects subject to the original reappropriation in this section continue to be authorized. It is the intent of the legislature that the funding reduction in the 2015-2017 biennium will be restored in future biennia.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($14,411,000))

﻿ $12,411,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,589,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))

﻿ $2,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000

Sec. 3007. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000337)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Projects subject to the original reappropriation in this section continue to be authorized. It is the intent of the legislature that the funding reduction in the 2015-2017 biennium will be restored in future biennia.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .(($19,100,000))

﻿ $12,655,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))

﻿ $6,445,000

TOTAL. . . .$31,500,000

Sec. 3008. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000351)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Projects subject to the original reappropriation in this section continue to be authorized. It is the intent of the legislature that the funding reduction in the 2015-2017 biennium will be restored in future biennia.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .(($6,735,000))

﻿ $4,035,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,565,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))

﻿ $2,700,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,300,000

Sec. 3009. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3054 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000427)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the department of ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its centennial clean water program grant.

(2) The agency must encourage local government use of federally funded water pollution control infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture - rural development.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($10,000,000))

﻿ $12,500,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($20,000,000))

﻿ $22,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$160,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($180,000,000))

﻿ $182,500,000

Sec. 3010. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Woodstove Emissions (30000429)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,350,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department of ecology to extend support for the wood stove removal and replacement program in Pierce county, operated by the Puget Sound clean air agency under the federally approved maintenance plan for fine particle pollution.

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($10,000,000))

﻿ $11,500,000

Sec. 3011. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3059 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Projects subject to the original appropriation in this section continue to be authorized. It is the intent of the legislature that the funding reduction in the 2015-2017 biennium will be restored in future biennia.

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($65,050,000))

﻿ $60,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($300,000,000))

﻿ $305,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$365,050,000

Sec. 3012. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3062 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Financial Assistance Program (30000535)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for the storm water financial assistance program.

(2) $981,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Washington State University LID frontage - water quality project.

(3) Projects subject to the original appropriation in this section continue to be authorized. It is the intent of the legislature that the funding reduction in the 2015-2017 biennium will be restored in future biennia.

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($33,000,000))

﻿ $31,200,000

((State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,000,000))

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($53,000,000))

﻿ $31,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$280,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($333,000,000))

﻿ $311,200,000

Sec. 3013. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3066 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Toxics Sites – Puget Sound (30000542)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Projects subject to the original appropriation in this section continue to be authorized. It is the intent of the legislature that the funding reduction in the 2015-2017 biennium will be restored in future biennia.

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($22,550,000))

﻿ $18,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($72,763,000))

﻿ $76,763,000

TOTAL. . . .$95,313,000

Sec. 3014. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3074 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

FY 2012 Statewide Stormwater Grant Program (91000053)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Projects subject to the original reappropriation in this section continue to be authorized. It is the intent of the legislature that the funding reduction in the 2015-2017 biennium will be restored in future biennia.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($14,789,000))

﻿ $12,789,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,284,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))

﻿ $2,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$24,073,000

Sec. 3015. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3075 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Stormwater Retrofit and LID Competitive Grants (91000054)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Projects subject to the original reappropriation in this section continue to be authorized. It is the intent of the legislature that the funding reduction in the 2015-2017 biennium will be restored in future biennia.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($6,952,000))

﻿ $5,652,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,511,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))

﻿ $1,300,000

TOTAL. . . .$14,463,000

Sec. 3016. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3081 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Improvements (92000076)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3081, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

(2) Projects subject to the original reappropriation in this section continue to be authorized. It is the intent of the legislature that the funding reduction in the 2015-2017 biennium will be restored in future biennia.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .(($91,456,000))

﻿ $68,456,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,544,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))

﻿ $23,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($100,000,000))

﻿ $120,000,000

Sec. 3017. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3084 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Drought Response (92000142)

Appropriation:

((State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000))

State Drought Preparedness Account—State. . . .(($14,000,000))

﻿ $6,723,000

((Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$16,000,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($16,000,000))

﻿ $6,723,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low Interest Loans for Drought Wells (92000148)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department shall establish a low-interest loan program to allow agricultural or public entities to drill or retrofit wells to mitigate the effects of drought. For loans that are repaid within five years, the interest rate must be thirty percent of the average rate for twenty year municipal bonds as published in the bond buyer index, and for loans that are repaid between five and twenty years, the rate must be sixty percent of the average rate for twenty year municipal bonds as published in the bond buyer index. A well that is funded by this program may be operated only during a drought declaration.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Port of Tacoma Arkema/Dunlap Mound (92000158)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Treatment Plant (Lakewood) (92000156)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Port Angeles Municipal Landfill (92000155)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE AGENCY

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Program (30000002)

Appropriation:

Underground Storage Tank Revolving Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$90,000,000

Sec. 3023. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3109 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Local Grant Authority (30000857)

Appropriation:

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—

Private/Local. . . .(($1,000,000))

﻿ $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($6,200,000))

﻿ $7,200,000

Sec. 3024. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3165 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000222)

The legislature encourages the board to consider applications for the 2017-2019 funding program that will fund the purchase and installation of capital equipment to control invasive species at or near selected boat launches serving vessels 26 feet in length or less.

Appropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .(($9,360,000))

﻿ $14,210,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$37,800,000

TOTAL. . . .(($47,160,000))

﻿ $52,010,000

Sec. 3025. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3166 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000223)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $50,000 of the NOVA program account—state appropriation is provided solely for improvements to the trails database maintained by the recreation and conservation office.

(2) $2,450,000 of the NOVA program account—state appropriation is provided solely for purposes other than education and enforcement projects.

(3) For project funds returned for projects in the NOVA program account—state, the recreation and conservation office may apply the funds to priority projects in any categories within the NOVA program.

Appropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State. . . .(($8,670,000))

﻿ $11,170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$34,770,000

TOTAL. . . .(($43,440,000))

﻿ $45,940,000

Sec. 3026. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3179 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreation and Conservation Office Recreation Grants (92000131)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The recreation and conservation office may retain up to four percent of these appropriations to administer the grants.

(2) A maximum of $1,000,000 of unused funds in this appropriation may be used for further planning, acquisition, and development of the Olympic discovery trail project between Discovery Bay and the trail's intersection with the Larry Scott trail in Jefferson county, without requiring matching resources.

(3) Matching resources are not required for the Concrete water spray park project.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($32,785,000))

﻿ $29,170,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$5,611,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($38,396,000))

﻿ $34,781,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($38,396,000))

﻿ $34,781,000

Sec. 3027. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitchell Act Federal Grant (91000021)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .(($1,014,000))

﻿ $5,014,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,986,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($3,000,000))

﻿ $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Puget Sound and Adjacent Waters Nearshore Restoration - Match (30000753)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,500,000

Sec. 3029. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3229 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

State Forest Land Replacement (30000223)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the department to transfer from state forest land status to natural resources conservation area status certain state forest lands in Skamania county.

(2)(a) The remainder of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the department to transfer from state forest land status to natural resources conservation area status certain state forest lands in counties:

(i) With a population of twenty-five thousand or fewer;

(ii) With risks of timber harvest deferrals greater than thirty years due to the presence of wildlife species listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered species act; and

(iii) That are not identified in subsection (1) of this section.

(b) This appropriation must be used equally for the transfer of qualifying state forest lands in the qualifying counties.

(3) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and other valuable materials transferred must be distributed as provided in RCW 79.64.110. The value of the land transferred must be deposited in the park land trust revolving account and be used solely to buy replacement state forest land, consistent with RCW 79.22.060.

(((3))) (4) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department shall execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties identified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section must include terms that restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.

(((4))) (5) The department and ((Skamania county)) applicable counties shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this section. The department shall identify eligible properties for transfer, consistent with subsections (1) and (2) of this section, in consultation with ((Skamania county)) the applicable counties, and may not execute any property transfers that are not in the statewide interest of either the state forest trust or the natural resources conservation area program.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,000,000))

﻿ $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($10,500,000))

﻿ $13,500,000

Sec. 3030. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3235 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Contaminated Sites Cleanup and Settlement (30000240)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $261,000 is provided solely for the state's share of liability under the model toxics control act for the cleanup of lead contamination at a rock pit now owned by plum creek timber company.

(2) $95,000 is provided solely for the contaminated soils cleanup at the Cedar creek correction center.

(3) $125,000 is provided solely for the webster nursery pesticides and groundwater cleanup.

(4) $375,000 is provided solely for the underground storage tank cleanup of contaminated soils of an old fueling station at the department of natural resources, SE region headquarters' parking lot that is within the city of Ellensburg new drinking water supply wellhead protection area.

(5) $75,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the state's share of liability under the comprehensive environmental response, compensation, and liability act for the cleanup of contamination at the Salt creek firing range site in Port Angeles, Clallam County.

Appropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$856,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$75,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$931,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($856,000))

﻿ $931,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Fire Communications Base Stations and Mountain Top Repeaters (92000030)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$626,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$626,000

Sec. 3032. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3232 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Blanchard Working Forest (30000231)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the department of natural resources shall not authorize or conduct any logging operations in the one thousand, six hundred acres on Mount Blanchard, referred to as the core management zone.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,500,000

Sec. 3033. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3184 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program (30000017)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the ((five)) six conservation projects in Washington state approved for grant awards as part of the United States department of agriculture regional conservation partnership program authorized under the 2014 farm bill:

(a) Palouse river watershed implementation partnership;

(b) Precision conservation for salmon and water quality in the Puget Sound;

(c) Upper Columbia irrigation enhancement project;

(d) Yakama nation on-reservation lower Yakima basin restoration project; ((and))

(e) Confederated tribes of the Colville reservation water quality and habitat improvement project; and

(f) Spokane river watershed resource conservation partnership.

(2) The state building construction account—state is provided solely for state match to the United States department of agriculture regional conservation partnership program.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$23,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$28,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,000,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

Sec. 4001. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 4002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire Training Academy Burn Building Replacement (30000071)

Reappropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .(($200,000))

﻿ $385,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($1,300,000))

﻿ $1,115,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

Sec. 5001. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2013-15 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance (30000145)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5020, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. and section 6022 ((of this act)), chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$255,339,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$132,250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($387,589,000))

﻿ $387,739,000

Sec. 5002. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tri-Tech Skills Center East Growth (30000159)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding is provided solely as a grant to constitute local funding available to the Tri-tech skills center in order to be eligible for state funding assistance through the school construction assistance program pursuant to RCW 28A.525.166.

(2) Funds provided in this section may not be used for any project with total ((project)) construction costs per square foot that exceed the construction cost allocation for calculating state funding assistance in subsection (1) by more than thirty-five percent.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,702,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,702,000

Sec. 5003. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Capital Program Administration (30000165)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall publish to its web site and report to the office of financial management, the appropriate committees of the legislature, and the legislative evaluation and accountability program a list of local school district projects submitted for school construction assistance within seven business days of the grant program deadline. The report must be updated within seven days following the superintendent of public instruction's final grant award decisions. Prior versions of the report must be maintained on the web site in order to monitor changes in estimates as the grant process progresses. The report must include, but not be limited to:

(a) School district;

(b) Project name;

(c) Estimated square footage by proposed project type;

(d) Estimated total of all project costs and estimated total construction contract cost;

(e) Funding sources and election dates, if applicable; and

(f) Intent to front-fund the project.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide to the office of financial management and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee in electronic database form the following:

(a) Study and survey information beginning with grants awarded July 1, 2015, or later; and

(b) All available inventory and condition of schools data.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall contract with educational service district 112 construction services group to perform an analysis of school construction costs. The analysis must include a significant sample of new ((and modernization)) school construction projects completed over the past ten years, with costs adjusted for construction inflation. The analysis must determine the major sources of variation in total school construction costs among different kinds of projects, districts, and regions. The analysis must estimate the cost difference due to variations in:

(a) The size of the project including the size per expected enrollment;

(b) ((Whether it is a new school or modernization project;

(c))) Whether it is an elementary school, middle school, high school, or skills center;

(((d))) (c) The extent of specialized higher cost facilities such as laboratories, shops, performing arts and indoor athletic facilities;

(((e))) (d) Delivering specialized programs at skill centers including but not limited to: Dental and medical assisting, mechanical and engineering programs, first responder training, culinary programs, cyber security, and others;

(((f))) (e) Site requirements;

(((g))) (f) Durability of construction materials, finishes, building system components, and general life expectancy of the building; and

(((h))) (g) Other design and construction feature that may contribute to cost variations.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must prepare a report on the findings from subsection (3) of this section and submit the report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by September 1, 2016.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,924,000))

﻿ $3,274,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,244,000

TOTAL. . . .(($15,168,000))

﻿ $15,518,000

Sec. 5004. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2015-17 School Construction Assistance Program (30000169)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $990,000 of the common school construction account—state is provided solely for the Spokane Valley technical skills center to construct five science classrooms.

(2) $675,000 of the common school construction account—state is provided solely for study and survey grants. In calculating study and survey grants, for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award no more than fifty percent of the dollar amount for the minimum grants and square footage allocations. School districts receiving these grants in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium must use data collected or validated by the Washington State University extension energy office for the inventory and condition of existing school facilities.

(3) School districts receiving funding through the 2015-17 school construction assistance program must map the design of new facilities and remap the design of facilities to be remodeled.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must weight and prioritize grant requests on the following criteria and in the following order: (a) Will provide facility capacity needs to reduce kindergarten through third grade class sizes at high poverty schools; (b) will provide facility capacity needs to reduce kindergarten through third grade class sizes in remaining schools.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must expedite allocation and distribution of any eligible funds under the school construction assistance grant program for the appropriations provided to the superintendent of public instruction in this act for distressed schools, STEM pilot projects, or skill centers. For purposes of determining state funding assistance, eligible area must be calculated as follows: (a) Eligible area for STEM pilot projects is 1,440 square feet per science lab or classroom combination, or both; and 1,040 square feet per science classroom. Total eligible area per STEM pilot project must not exceed 15,840 square feet, and total eligible area of all STEM pilot projects from this section must not exceed 36,880 square feet; (b) eligible area for skill centers is gross square feet of the proposed project as submitted to the office of financial management as requested by the superintendent for consideration in the 2015-2017 capital budget. Eligible area for the Spokane Valley technical skills center must not exceed 5,400 square feet, and; (c) eligible area for replacement of the cafeteria at Marysville-Pilchuck high school is 13,500 square feet.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($302,121,000))

﻿ $305,721,000

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .(($305,978,000))

﻿ $337,135,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal. . . .$3,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($611,099,000))

﻿ $645,856,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,638,150,000

TOTAL. . . .(($4,249,249,000))

﻿ $4,284,006,000

Sec. 5005. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

STEM Pilot Program (91000402)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $200,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the contract with the statewide STEM organization described in subsection (4) of this section.

(2) The ((amounts)) remaining portion of the appropriation in this section ((are)) is provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to provide STEM pilot project grants to school districts. At the option of a recipient school district, these grants, or a portion of these grants, may constitute the districts' local funding for purposes of eligibility for the school construction assistance program under RCW 28A.525.166 other than for new construction or new-in-lieu of modernization construction projects of entire new schools. Subject to the terms in this section, school districts are eligible to receive grants if they have a special housing burden due to lack of sufficient space for science classrooms and labs to enable students to meet statutory graduation requirements.

(((2))) (3) The superintendent shall award grants to eligible school districts under the following conditions:

(a) A district must demonstrate a lack of sufficient space of science classrooms and labs to facilitate meeting statutory graduation requirements;

(b) The district has secured private donations of cash, like-kind, or equipment in a value of no less than $100,000. Before the superintendent may provide funding assistance through the school construction assistance program, the district must provide verification of the donation to the superintendent;

(c) The project is either: (i) Construction of new lab or classroom additions at existing facilities; or (ii) modernization of labs or classrooms at existing facilities.

(d) At least one grant award is made to school districts located in southwest Washington that currently offer curriculum using equipment called Real-Time PCR and a scanning electron microscope to build partnerships with academia and industry leaders to develop in-depth research projects;

(((d))) (e) At least one grant award is made to school districts located in the Puget Sound region; and

(((e))) (f) At least two grant awards are made to school districts located east of the Cascade mountains.

(((3))) (4) The STEM pilot project grants program must be administered by the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the STEM education innovation alliance specified in RCW 28A.188.030 and the statewide STEM organization specified in RCW 28A.188.050. The superintendent of public instruction must develop grant application materials and criteria in consultation with the statewide STEM organization, must review applications for accuracy and financial reasonableness, and must administer awarded grants. With funds specifically appropriated for this purpose, the superintendent of public instruction must contract with the statewide STEM organization specified in RCW 28A.188.050 to evaluate applications against the criteria developed for the program and develop a single prioritized list. The superintendent of public instruction must award no less than six and no more than eight grants within the appropriated funding and may ((only)) depart from the recommended prioritized list only after ((notifying)) consulting with the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature ((with an explanation of the reasons for departing from the list)). The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Priority for school districts that secure private donations of cash, like-kind, or equipment in value no less than $100,000 weighted by the ratio of school district enrollments to value of donation;

(b) A district's lack of ability to raise funds through levies or bonds in the prior ten-year period;

(c) Priority for applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program;

(d) The extent that existing STEM facilities are inadequate including the lack of adequate STEM facilities to meet graduation requirements in RCW 28A.150.220;

(e) A demonstration that existing STEM faculty are in place and are qualified to deliver an interactive, project-based STEM curriculum in the proposed specialized STEM facilities, or a plan and budget are in place to recruit or train such STEM faculty;

(((4))) (5) For purposes of grant applications made in the 2015-2017 biennium, additional square footage funded through this grant program is excluded from the school district's inventory of available educational space for determining eligibility for state assistance for new construction ((for)) until the earlier of: (a) Five years following acceptance of the project by the school district board of directors((,)); or (b) the date of the final review of the latest study and survey of the affected school district following acceptance of the project by the school district board of directors((; whichever date is earliest)).

(((5))) (6) Each school district is limited to one grant award, which may be used for more than one school facility within the district, of no more than $4,000,000.

(((6))) (7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may charge fees consistent with capital budget guidelines established by the office of financial management for administering the grants.

(((7))) (8) The superintendent of public instruction must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on: (a) The timing and use of the funds by the end of each fiscal year, until the funds are fully expended; and (b) recommendations to establish a STEM grant program within the framework of the school construction assistance program by December 1, 2016.

(((8) $200,000 of the appropriation is provided for the contract with the statewide STEM organization specified in RCW 28A.188.050.))

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,500,000

Sec. 5006. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

K-3 Class-Size Reduction Grants (92000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $10,000,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for Seattle public schools to provide additional state assistance for public school facilities necessary to support all-day kindergarten and class size reduction in kindergarten through third grade.

(2) The remaining portion of the appropriation is for the K-3 class size reduction construction pilot grant program specified in section 201, chapter ((. . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6080))) 41, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess. to provide additional state assistance for public school facilities necessary to support all-day kindergarten and class size reduction in kindergarten through third grade.

(3) Within the remaining portion of the appropriation, a maximum of $750,000 is provided for the office of superintendent of public instruction to administer the K-3 class size reduction construction grant pilot program. The office may not use these funds for indirect costs.

(4) Should Seattle public schools have received additional state funds, in excess of the block grant provided in subsection (1) of this section, through the K-3 class size reduction construction grant pilot program, Seattle public schools may receive the amount provided by the calculated grant in the pilot program in excess of the block grant.

(5) The funding provided in subsection (1) of this section may not constitute local funding available to the Seattle public schools in order to be eligible for state funding assistance through the school construction assistance program pursuant to RCW 28A.525.166.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($200,000,000))

﻿ $234,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($200,000,000))

﻿ $234,500,000

Sec. 5007. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5091 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WORKFORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

Central Area Community Opportunity Center (91000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $100,000 is provided solely for the purposes of predesign, development, and transition costs at the Seattle Vocational Institute to create the central area community opportunity center and clearinghouse. During predesign and development phase, community needs and input must be considered for project transition and completion. During this process, the board must work with the department of enterprise services to identify current available space within the Seattle Vocational Institute building, and shall prescribe methods of maximizing space efficiency for both current and potential tenants. The board and the department of enterprise services shall also identify costs associated with any renovation work needed to create additional usable space. The Seattle Central College shall work with the board on this effort. A report must be delivered to the legislature by December 1, ((2015)) 2016.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000

Sec. 5008. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5054 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Inventory and Condition of Schools Data Collection (91000033)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature intends to complete the data collection, input, and verification of the inventory and condition of public school facilities in order to make informed decisions about K-12 school facility data collection processes and classroom capacity needs to fulfill current educational graduation requirements and class-size ratios. These decisions are best made when based on accurate data collected in a thorough and consistent manner by professionals experienced in making such inventory and condition assessments for public institutions.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the Washington State University extension energy office to complete collection, input, and verification of selected data of public school facilities, including skill centers, in the inventory and condition of schools system administered and maintained by the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) The Washington State University extension energy office shall conduct on-site visits to assess inventory and condition of all facilities for school districts that have no current study and survey as defined in RCW 28A.525.050 on file with the superintendent of public instruction as of July 1, 2015, or no pending study and survey to be filed with the superintendent through an outstanding study and survey grant award. The data collected, sufficient to meet the study and survey requirements for school facilities space inventory and condition analysis, through on-site visits must be input into the inventory and condition of schools system.

(4) The Washington State University extension energy office shall input into the inventory and condition of schools system applicable data of inventory and condition of school facilities from all current studies and surveys on file with the superintendent of public instruction as of July 1, 2015. The data must be input into the system in a manner that captures older information and data first. As studies and surveys from outstanding grant awards are filed with the superintendent, the Washington State University extension energy office shall input data into the system once current study and survey data has been input. Activities conducted pursuant to this subsection must occur concurrently with activities in subsection (3) of this section.

(5) The Washington State University extension energy office shall conduct on-site verification of data for school districts whose current studies and surveys on file with the superintendent will expire by June 30, 2017. Data verification must be conducted to evaluate the study and survey process as a tool to collect accurate inventory and condition of schools data upon which policymakers can make informed decisions regarding school facility and capacity needs. Activities conducted pursuant to this subsection must occur concurrently with activities in subsection (3) of this section and once sufficient data has been input into the system per subsection (4) of this section to conduct on-site visits to verification.

(6)(a) The Washington State University extension energy office, concurrent with activities conducted in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section, must collect data to determine the information in (c)(i) through (vii) of this subsection. Additional on-site data collection for this task or collection of data from "as-built" documents or other valid sources must be accomplished to produce a valid sample for determining:

(b) The accuracy of reported number of classrooms in the most recent survey of classrooms and building data by the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and

(c) The variation in the size of schools and the allocation of space to the categories described in (c)(i) through (vii) of this subsection. The sample must be sufficient to determine this information for elementary, middle, high schools, and skills centers in districts of different sizes, growth rates, age, and relative property values.

(i) The square footage and number of classrooms. Classrooms are rooms that are used as classrooms or that could be used as classrooms under building code requirements and must include labs, shops, computer rooms used for instruction, art, and music classrooms. For this purpose, a music classroom is not a room designed to seat an audience;

(ii) The square footage of libraries;

(iii) The square footage of cafeteria and kitchen space;

(iv) The square footage of gymnasiums, locker rooms, and other indoor athletic facilities;

(v) The square footage of auditoriums and other performing arts space not counted as classrooms;

(vi) The square footage of administrative offices, and space used primarily by staff; and

(vii) The square footage of other space such as bathrooms, general circulation, mechanical rooms, and the balance of the total facility square footage not included in (c)(i) through (vi) of this subsection;

(d) The data included in (c)(i) through (vii) of this subsection must indicate whether the space is in a structure with a permanent foundation or not.

(7) As a general condition of appropriations provided to the superintendent of public instruction in this act, the superintendent of public instruction and each state school district shall provide requested facilities information and access to facilities in a timely manner to enable the Washington State University extension energy office to complete the tasks, oversight, and reporting requirements assigned in this section.

(8) The Washington State University extension energy office shall report progress of data collection, input, and verification to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2015. The Washington State University extension energy office must complete all work in this section and make a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2016.

(9) If funding provided in this section is insufficient to carry out the tasks identified within this section, the Washington State University extension energy office shall prioritize the tasks to ensure the requirements in subsection (6) of this section are completed first. The Washington State University extension energy office may enter into an interagency agreement with the office of superintendent of public instruction for additional funding to carry out the tasks identified in this subsection.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,550,000))

﻿ $2,336,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,550,000))

﻿ $2,336,000

Sec. 5009. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5085 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

North Campus Utility Upgrade (30000426)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($600,000))

﻿ $209,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,982,000))

﻿ $3,373,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,582,000

Sec. 5010. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5086 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Performing Arts Exterior Renewal (30000428)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($387,000))

﻿ $355,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,560,000))

﻿ $2,592,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,947,000

Sec. 5011. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5089 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000615)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,572,000))

﻿ $3,995,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$4,886,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($8,458,000))

﻿ $8,881,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$64,422,000

TOTAL. . . .(($72,880,000))

﻿ $73,303,000

Sec. 5012. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5098 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Facilities Preservation – Minor Works Projects (30000222)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,515,000))

﻿ $2,684,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($12,515,000))

﻿ $12,684,000

Sec. 5013. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5099 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Grants (30000237)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Project﻿ Authorized Amount

Pantages centennial: Façade restoration. . . .$685,000

Chong Wa parapet preservation. . . .$66,000

Rehabilitation of historic structures. . . .$750,000

Renovation heating of interior space of Balfour dock. . . .$1,000,000

Town hall historic restoration: Phase one of construction. . . .$1,000,000

Washington hall restoration. . . .$452,000

Rehabilitation of Ritzville library for ADA compliance. . . .$138,000

Quartermaster and dental surgery renovation project. . . .$309,000

Skagit city school restoration. . . .$91,000

Yamasaki courtyard restoration project. . . .$129,000

Prairie line trail historic interpretation project. . . .$400,000

Ancich netshed restoration. . . .$662,000

Chimney, gutter, and kitchen restoration. . . .$11,000

Federal building rehabilitation - phases II and III. . . .$920,000

Preservation of the Colville Indian agency cabin in Chewelah. . . .$33,000

Arthur Foss preservation and restoration phase II. . . .$166,000

Seaport landing development - renovation of building #8. . . .$1,000,000

Si view community center rehabilitation project phase II. . . .$130,000

Revitalization to historic wells house for community use. . . .$26,000

Chiyo's garden phase II. . . .$108,000

Historic community center, library, and city hall

restoration. . . .$185,000

Sea mar latino history and cultural center. . . .$654,000

Olympia waldorf school - the next 100 years. . . .$20,000

Chinook school restoration - final phase. . . .$79,000

Phase III of Worthington park - Quilcene. . . .$244,000

El centro de la raza community access and security project. . . .$100,000

Steam locomotives changed everything. . . .$199,000

The artifact/exhibit environmental conservation project. . . .$8,000

F/V Shenandoah restoration project - phase three. . . .$41,000

Henderson house and Tumwater historic district interpretive. . . .$50,000

Carnegie library renovation phase II. . . .$344,000

Gig Harbor boatshop, Eddon boatyard house restoration. . . .Alternate

Yakima Valley trolley capital improvement project. . . .Alternate

Total. . . .$10,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Campbell House Roof Replacement (92000001)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$376,000

(End of part)

PART 6

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 6001. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are ((thirty-six million eight hundred thirteen)) eighty-two million nine hundred twenty-one thousand dollars for the 2015-2017 biennium, ((two hundred thirty-three million two hundred eighty-six)) three hundred fifty-four million eight hundred fifty thousand dollars for the 2017-2019 biennium, and ((three hundred twenty-seven million two hundred thirty-four)) four hundred forty-eight million five hundred twenty-six thousand dollars for the 2019-2021 biennium.

Sec. 6002. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. (1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of enterprise services and the state treasurer's office to develop requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include charges for services rendered.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Department of enterprise services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $69,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new office building at 1063 Capitol Way South, Olympia.

(4) Department of enterprise services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $8,077,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to repair the natural resources building parking garage fire suppression system.

(5) Department of ecology: Enter into a financing contract for up to $180,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for programmatic improvements to the headquarters building and the eastern regional office.

(6) Department of ecology: Enter into a financing contract for up to $760,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for preservation improvements to the headquarters building.

(7) Central Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $8,414,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a welcome center.

(8) The Evergreen State College: Enter into a financing contract for up to $12,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase a permanent location for the Tacoma program.

(9) Western Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $6,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the carver building renovation.

(10) Eastern Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $10,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the Washington street facility project. The university shall not use their building account or other appropriated account as a fund source for the certificate of participation.

(11) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Centralia Community College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the student services building.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Centralia Community College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct student housing.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark College for up to $8,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the culinary arts facility.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark College for up to $35,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to design and construct a student recreation center.

(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin College for up to $7,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to design and construct a health science center.

(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River College for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an aviation program center.

(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Highline College for up to $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the maintenance and grounds building.

(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the main building.

(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate and expand the Myklebust gymnasium.

(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Tacoma Community College for up to $12,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to expand a health and wellness center.

(k) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla Community College for up to $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a workforce and business development center.

(l) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bellevue College for up to $45,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct student housing.

(m) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase and renovate student housing at the Fort Steilacoom campus.

(n) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Falls Community College for up to $19,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the gymnasium.

(o) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College for up to $6,200,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a recreation center.

(12) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for up to $13,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to replace the fire training academy burn building; however, local agencies that use the burn building must have indicated support for required fee increases to pay for the debt service for the financing contract. Indication of support means at least sixty percent of local agencies which have used the facility within the prior ten years support the fee increase.

(13) Department of corrections: Enter into a financing contract for up to $2,163,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves for the remodel of the correctional industry's food factory.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6003. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:

By June 30, 2017, the department of natural resources shall transfer to Green River College, South Seattle College-Georgetown campus, Grays Harbor College, and Highline College the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institution trust land currently leased to the colleges. The transfer documents must specify that the land be used for the educational purposes of the colleges and if the land ceases to be used for the educational purposes of the colleges, the colleges shall transfer the land to the department of natural resources to be managed as charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institution trust land.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6004. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:

The department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, and the state parks and recreation commission shall evaluate the use of locally-produced renewable biofertilizers and fiber from dairy digester systems when such products are cost-competitive and provide a suitable substitute for imported conventional fertilizers and fiber when blended with or used in place of conventional fertilizers and fiber. By November 1, 2016, the agencies shall report to the legislature and governor with the results of the demonstration projects.

Sec. 6005. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

JLARC WWRP & STATE LAND ACQUISITION STUDY. (1) The joint legislative audit and review committee must conduct a review of state and local efforts to protect and conserve habitat and expand outdoor recreation since 1990.

(2) The review has two objectives:

(a) To determine what existing or potential objective outcome measures can be used to evaluate the success of major regulatory programs or state expenditures that are intended to protect and conserve habitat and expand outdoor recreation; and

(b) To compare the amount of habitat lands protected through acquisitions and easements with the amount of lands protected through the major regulatory programs within three counties west of the cascades and three counties east of the cascades.

(3) The review must include state expenditures and local and federal expenditures used to match state funding in the following programs:

(a) Salmon recovery funding board expenditures;

(b) Puget Sound acquisition and restoration;

(c) Puget Sound estuary and salmon restoration;

(d) The Washington wildlife and recreation program;

(e) State parks and recreation commission expenditures that expand recreational lands and facilities;

(f) Trust land transfer program and other expenditures by the department of natural resources that protect habitat or expand recreation; and

(g) Other state expenditures that expand recreational lands and facilities.

(((3))) (4) The review must also include the following regulatory programs:

(a) Growth management regulations regarding critical areas;

(b) Wetland restrictions;

(c) Shoreline management rules;

(d) Forest practices regulation; ((and))

(e) Hydraulic project approval program;

(f) The clean water act; and

(g) Flood plain management.

(((4))) (5) The review must identify other objective benefits provided by each of the included programs, such as public safety, habitat protection, environmental quality, public health, protection of ((intrastructure)) infrastructure, maintaining or improving recreational access proportional to state population growth, and economic development. The review must include existing studies and analyses of these objective benefits.

(((5))) (6) The review must also examine a sample of recreation and habitat land acquisition by state agencies within the past ten years to determine whether the state agencies have a land stewardship program for the land parcels, what that program entails, and the extent of compliance with that program. Land stewardship includes, but is not limited to, restoring or developing the land to meet the objectives of the acquisition, suppressing invasive weeds, securing the property to prevent damage, and maintaining the land to prevent wildfires.

(((6))) (7) In undertaking the review, the joint legislative audit and review committee may contract with experts, and shall utilize information provided by state agencies, and provided by stakeholders who use science-based data to quantify benefits of natural lands in measuring the outcomes of regulatory and funding programs to protect and conserve habitat.

(((7))) (8) By December 1, ((2016)) 2017, the joint legislative audit and review committee must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the senate and the house of representatives that presents information and findings from the study. The report is to include recommendations for accountability measures for determining the achievement of intended outcomes for protecting, acquiring, and improving habitat and recreation lands and facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6006. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:

Until June 30, 2027, the director of the department of enterprise services is granted authority to transfer and convey real property, known as the former northern state hospital site, to the port of Skagit upon the director's determination that such a transfer is appropriate and in furtherance of the interest of the state. Provided, that any conveyance of ownership interest to the port of Skagit county must restrict the port from transferring ownership of the property to any nongovernmental entity or private person. Should legal requirements to provide behavioral health services at other locations fail to be met, having made diligent efforts to do so, the state may extend the leases with the current behavioral health tenants for the minimum time needed to meet such requirements with due diligence. The director shall consult with the office of financial management. This transfer is not subject to the requirements of RCW 43.09.210.

Sec. 6007. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION—ART WORK ALLOWANCE. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210.

(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding $200,000 by colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027.

(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any public building by a state agency identified in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200.

(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission during the 2015-2017 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely for direct acquisition of works of art. Art allocations not expended within the ensuing two biennia will lapse. The commission may use up to $100,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces in the state art collection pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210.

(5) The executive director of the arts commission shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the one-half of one percent for works of art purchased or commissioned as required by RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200. The findings of the review must be reported annually to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by ((August)) September 15th. The review must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) Projects purchased or commissioned per biennium; (b) partner agencies; (c) funding sources by fiscal year; (d) artwork costs; (e) administrative costs; (f) collection care costs; and (g) project status.

Sec. 6008. RCW 28B.10.027 and 2005 c 36 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All universities and colleges shall allocate as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding two hundred thousand dollars of any building, an amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state arts commission with the approval of the board of regents or trustees for the acquisition of works of art.

(2) For projects funded in the 2015-2017 capital budget, an institution of higher education, working with the Washington arts commission, may expend up to ten percent of the projected art allocation for a project during the design phase in order to select an artist and design art to be integrated in the building design. The one-half of one percent to be expended by the Washington arts commission must be adjusted downward by the amount expended by a university or college during the design phase of the capital project.

(3) The works of art may be placed on public lands of institutions of higher education, integral to or attached to a public building or structure of institutions of higher education, detached within or outside a public building or structure of institutions of higher education, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public facilities.

(4) In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of one percent of the appropriation shall be used to provide for the administration of the visual arts program, including conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation of the work of art. For the purpose of this section building shall not include sheds, warehouses, and other buildings of a temporary nature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6009. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:

Consistent with RCW 39.35B.050, the office of financial management shall require a life cycle cost analysis to be prepared as part of any proposal to acquire, construct, or lease all new state office buildings and warehouses to establish the economic viability of the project and prove its benefit to Washington state taxpayers. A life cycle cost analysis must be prepared on all projects or buildings greater than 20,000 square feet. A life cycle cost analysis must be performed by the office of financial management when preparing the state's six-year facilities plan or when evaluating a request for a project through the modified predesign or budget review processes. All results of the life cycle cost analysis must be verified by an independent consultant selected by the chairs of the house of representatives and senate capital budget committees and transmitted to the appropriate legislative committees and be published on the office of financial management's web site to inform stakeholders. Funding for the life cycle cost analysis must include funding for the review by independent consultants. The life cycle cost analysis must include all moneys related to the development of the project including but not limited to: (1) Predesign; (2) design; (3) consultants; (4) demolition; (5) construction costs; (6) tenant relocation costs; (7) parking costs; (8) ongoing maintenance; (9) future capital improvements expected during the term of the lease or building ownership; and (10) other related costs by both state-owned and privately owned facilities.

Sec. 6010. RCW 39.80.040 and 2010 c 5 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

In the procurement of architectural and engineering services, the agency shall encourage firms engaged in the lawful practice of their profession to submit annually a statement of qualifications and performance data. The agency shall evaluate current statements of qualifications and performance data on file with the agency, together with those that may be submitted by other firms regarding the proposed project, and shall conduct discussions with one or more firms regarding anticipated concepts and the relative utility of alternative methods of approach for furnishing the required services and then shall select therefrom, based upon criteria established by the agency, the firm deemed to be the most highly qualified to provide the services required for the proposed project. Such agency procedures and guidelines shall include a plan to ((insure)) ensure that minority and women-owned firms and veteran-owned firms are afforded the maximum practicable opportunity to compete for and obtain public contracts for services. The level of participation by minority and women-owned firms and veteran-owned firms shall be consistent with their general availability within the professional communities involved. For the 2015-2017 biennium the procurement for services related to modular classrooms may be expedited.

Sec. 6011. RCW 43.83B.430 and 2011 c 5 s 911 are each amended to read as follows:

The state drought preparedness account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from appropriated funds designated for the account and funds transferred from the state emergency water projects revolving account must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for drought preparedness. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state drought preparedness account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium the account may also be used for drought response.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6012. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:

To avoid unnecessary duplication of infrastructure installation and reduce school construction costs funded through the school construction assistance program in this budget, by June 1, 2016, the building code council shall adopt emergency amendments providing that buildings classed as E occupancies, as defined in the state building code, are not required to install an emergency voice alarm system as defined in the 2012 International Building Code and International Fire Code section 907.2.3. The school district must comply with RCW 28A.320.126 by working collaboratively with local law enforcement agencies to develop an emergency response system using evolving technologies and the school district must adopt a safe school plan under RCW 28A.320.125.

Sec. 6013. RCW 70.148.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 993 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The pollution liability insurance program trust account is established in the custody of the state treasurer. All funds appropriated for this chapter and all premiums collected for reinsurance shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter including payment of costs of administering the pollution liability insurance and underground storage tank community assistance programs. Expenditures for payment of administrative and operating costs of the agency are subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW and may be made only after appropriation by statute. No appropriation is required for other expenditures from the account.

(2) Each calendar quarter, the director shall report to the insurance commissioner the loss and surplus reserves required for the calendar quarter. The director shall notify the department of revenue of this amount by the fifteenth day of each calendar quarter.

(3) Each calendar quarter the director shall determine the amount of reserves necessary to fund commitments made to provide financial assistance under RCW 70.148.130 to the extent that the financial assistance reserves do not jeopardize the operations and liabilities of the pollution liability insurance program. The director shall notify the department of revenue of this amount by the fifteenth day of each calendar quarter. The director may immediately establish an initial financial assistance reserve of five million dollars from available revenues. The director may not expend more than fifteen million dollars for the financial assistance program.

(4) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the pollution liability insurance program trust account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

(5) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the pollution liability insurance program trust account to the underground storage tank revolving account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

(6) This section expires July 1, 2020.

Sec. 6014. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7037 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Public works assistance account—state: For transfer

to the water pollution control revolving account, up to

$6,000,000 for fiscal year 2016 and up to $6,000,000 for

fiscal year 2017. . . .$12,000,000

Public works assistance account—state: For transfer

to the drinking water assistance account, up to $4,000,000

for fiscal year 2016 and up to $4,000,000 for fiscal

year 2017. . . .$8,000,000

Pollution liability insurance program trust

account—state: For transfer to the underground storage

tank revolving account. . . .$10,005,000

Sec. 6015. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
STATE TREASURER TRANSFER AUTHORITY

State toxics control account: For transfer to the

environmental legacy ((trust)) stewardship account. . . .$24,000,000

Local toxics control account: For transfer to the

environmental legacy ((trust)) stewardship account. . . .$30,000,000

(1) As directed by the department of ecology in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer amounts among the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account as needed during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium to maintain positive account balances in all three accounts.

(2) As directed by the department of ecology in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer amounts from the cleanup settlement account established in RCW 70.105D.130 to the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account to maintain positive account balances up to an amount not to exceed (($13,000,000)) $23,000,000 that must be considered an inter fund loan that must be repaid with interest to the cleanup settlement account in three equal repayments in fiscal years ((2018,)) 2019, ((and)) 2020, and 2021.

(3) If, after using the inter-fund transfer authority granted in this section, the department of ecology determines that further reductions are needed to maintain positive account balances in the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account, the department is authorized to delay the start of clean-up projects based on acuity of need, readiness to proceed, cost-efficiency, or need to ensure geographic distribution. ((If the department uses this authority,))

(4) By June 30, 2017, the department must submit a ((prioritized)) list of projects that ((may be)) were delayed to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6016. A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

The dairy nutrient infrastructure account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from repayment of loans made by the state conservation commission for dairy nutrient management demonstration projects must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for dairy nutrient management demonstration projects.

Sec. 6017. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

House of Representatives Interim Task Force on Washington Waters (91000002)

(1) The house of representatives finds that low water supply in portions of eastern Washington, catastrophic flood damage, and storm water runoff polluting state waterways have reached crisis levels, endangering the health and safety of our citizens and the environment.

(2) The house of representatives interim task force on Washington waters is established to build upon the foundation of Senate Bill No. 5628 that was introduced in the 2015 regular session and provided for storm water, flood control, and water supply infrastructure in the state. The objective of the task force is to prepare a report and draft legislation for consideration in the 2016 legislative session that:

(a) Quantifies the level of funding needed through fiscal year 2026 to address the three water priorities;

(b) Develops and recommends state funding options that address the three water priorities equally;

(c) Develops and recommends local funding options that generate revenues from municipal and agricultural beneficiaries;

(d) Develops and recommends criteria and mechanisms for managing, prioritizing and distributing the funding;

(e) Analyzes and reports on the metrics and variables associated with water market pricing, including the costs per acre-foot of water supply developed and delivered for irrigation; and

(f) Addresses other relevant issues as determined by the task force.

(3) The house of representatives interim task force on Washington waters must consist of ten members:

(a) Five members from the majority caucus appointed by the speaker of the house, including the chair of the capital budget committee; one member each from the appropriations, finance, and transportation committees; and one member at large; and

(b) Five members from the minority caucus appointed by the minority leader, including the ranking minority member of the capital budget committee; one member each from the appropriations, finance, and transportation committees; and one member at large.

(c) The chair and the ranking minority member of the capital budget committee shall cochair the task force.

(d) Appointments to the task force must be completed within fifteen days of the effective date of this section.

(4) Principal staff support for the task force must be provided by the house of representatives office of program research. The task force may:

(a) Request the participation of the office of financial management and other relevant executive branch agencies;

(b) Enter into contracts with persons who have specific technical expertise; and

(c) Solicit information and perspectives from representatives of public and private organizations.

(5) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the house of representatives executive rules committee, or its successor committee.

(6) The task force must report its findings and recommendations to appropriate legislative committees by November 15, 2015.

(7) The task force expires on June 30, 2016.

(((8) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for any technical research and analysis required to carry out the task force objectives in subsection (2) of this section.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,000))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6018. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:

(1) The legislature intends to consider forming a joint legislative task force on school construction in 2017. To prepare for the work of such a task force, the legislature desires input and data collection from a school construction technical work group as described in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The school construction technical work group consists of fiscal or related staff from the office of program research of the house of representatives, senate committee services, and the office of financial management, in consultation with the office of superintendent of public instruction, and the citizen advisory panel and technical advisory group as established in RCW 28A.525.025.

(3) The technical work group shall monitor the progress and status of the following work underway during 2016:

(a) The status of implementing chapter 41, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., including recommendations for modifying the formula to fund K-3 classrooms due to the legislature by December 1, 2016;

(b) The findings and results from the work performed by the Washington State University energy office, including verification of K-12 building condition and classroom counts, and measuring school sizes in a sample of schools due to the legislature by December 1, 2016;

(c) The findings and results from the work by educational service district 112, including the major causes of variations in the cost of construction of schools due to the legislature by September 1, 2016; and

(d) The status of implementing capital grants to improve facilities for science, technology, engineering, and math education (STEM), including how the grants interact with the school construction assistance program due to the legislature by June 30, 2016.

(4) Based on the findings and results of the work underway in subsection (3) of this section and recommendations made by previous task forces, the technical work group shall compile key elements and identify issues for the legislature to consider to improve how state assistance is provided to school districts to design, build, and maintain public schools. The key elements compiled and issues identified may include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Education specifications recognized by the state for effective and efficient school design and construction for the purpose of providing guidance to school districts when designing school construction projects;

(b) A capital asset model for K-12 school construction that considers space and usage needs to calculate construction assistance for:

(i) New schools to accommodate enrollment growth;

(ii) Major modernization projects to address aging facilities;

(iii) Replacement and renewal of major building systems based on achieving lowest life-cycle building costs, provided that standards of routine maintenance are achieved by local districts;

(iv) Specialized facility improvements, such as STEM facilities and vocational facilities such as skills centers;

(c) Transparency when districts are proposing local bond issues and capital levies for school construction;

(d) Equity in allocating grants for school construction such that the share of school construction costs reflects the relative ability to raise necessary property taxes to pay for the local share; and

(e) An alternative process for projecting enrollment growth to allow for incremental growth.

(5) The technical work group shall:

(a) Periodically report its progress and findings to members of the senate ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital budget committee; and

(b) Make an initial report to the appropriate committees of the legislature during 2016 interim committee assembly. A final report is due to the legislature by January 15, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6019. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:

BELATED CLAIMS. The agencies and institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act, upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6020. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:

The office of financial management shall analyze and make recommendations on strategies to stabilize revenue and provide more reliable funding for the purposes under RCW 70.105D.070. The agency must consult with the department of revenue, the department of ecology, fiscal and budget staff of the house of representatives and the senate, and independent policy experts and practitioners. A report must be submitted to the legislature no later than November 1, 2016, and must include the following information:

(1) Historic spending rates and trends for cleaning up toxic sites, preventing and controlling pollution, and splits between operating and capital spending;

(2) Recommendations on prioritizing funding under RCW 70.105D.070 and budget strategies to meet existing and projected needs;

(3) An evaluation of options to increase the sustainability and decrease the volatility of the revenue from the hazardous substance tax;

(4) An analysis of revenue for toxic cleanup and prevention purposes in other states; and

(5) Measures to improve transparency, efficiency, and budget accountability.

Sec. 6021. RCW 43.84.180 and 2003 c 150 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The proportionate share of earnings based on the average daily balance in the public works assistance account shall be placed in the public facilities construction loan revolving fund, provided that during the 2015-2017 biennium the public works assistance account must retain its own interest earnings and costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6022. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1072 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6023. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---