BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. INTENT. (1) The legislature finds that recruiting and retaining highly qualified teachers is necessary for providing Washington students the opportunity to obtain a world class basic education. The legislature finds that many factors have impacted the teacher shortage including the economic downturn, high new teacher attrition, high rates of retirement, K-3 class size reduction, and fewer teacher candidates entering the profession. In the past five years, the professional educator standards board reported a two hundred fifty percent increase in demand for new teachers.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature to promote alternate routes to teacher certification as the first step to a desirable and meaningful career in teaching. It is also the intent of the legislature to remove barriers to entering the teaching profession and obtaining certification. It is additionally the intent of the legislature to support alternate route teacher candidates during the certification process.

(3) The legislature finds that districts must coordinate with universities and colleges to provide quality programs and support for alternate route teacher candidates. Highly qualified candidates will have difficulty seeking employment at districts that do not engage in alternate route programs. It is the intent of the legislature to strengthen and encourage the coordination between Washington state colleges and universities and local school districts. The legislature also intends to encourage colleges and universities to seek professional educator standards board approval for alternate route programs and implement these programs.

(4) Finally, the legislature intends to improve retention of alternate route teacher candidates by expanding mentoring programs to increase competence and professional support.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. AWARENESS CAMPAIGN. (1) The workforce training and education coordinating board, in collaboration with the professional educator standards board, shall work with the student achievement council, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, school districts, educational service districts, the state board for community and technical colleges, the institutions of higher education, major employers, and other parties to develop and disseminate information designed to increase recruitment into approved residency teacher preparation programs at public and private institutions of higher education and alternate route teacher certification programs. The information must be disseminated statewide through the workforce training and education coordinating board and other existing channels.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. ADDRESSING BARRIERS. (1) The professional educator standards board shall coordinate meetings between the school districts that do not have approved alternate route teacher certification programs and the nearest public or private institution of higher education with a professional educator standards board-approved teacher preparation program. The purpose of the meetings is to determine whether the districts and institutions can partner to apply to the professional educator standards board to operate an alternate route teacher certification program.

(2) All professional educator standards board-approved residency teacher preparation programs at institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 not currently a partner in an alternative route program must seek approval from the professional educator standards board to offer an alternate route program by submitting the proposal developed under RCW 28A.410.290, or an updated version of the proposal, by September 1, 2016. If approved, the institution of higher education must implement an alternate route program according to a timeline suggested by the professional educator standards board.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2017.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.415.265 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The educator support program is established to provide professional development and mentor support for beginning educators, candidates in alternate route teacher programs under RCW 28A.660.040, and educators on probation under RCW 28A.405.100, to be composed of the beginning educator support team for beginning educators and continuous improvement coaching for educators on probation, as provided in this section.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall notify school districts about the educator support program and encourage districts to apply for program funds.

(2)(a) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate funds for the beginning educator support team on a competitive basis to individual school districts or consortia of districts. School districts are encouraged to include educational service districts in creating regional consortia. In allocating funds, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall give priority to school districts with low-performing schools identified under RCW 28A.657.020 as being challenged schools in need of improvement. A portion of the appropriated funds may be used for program coordination and provision of statewide or regional professional development through the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(b) A beginning educator support team must include the following components:

(i) A paid orientation or individualized assistance before the start of the school year for beginning educators;

(ii) Assignment of a trained and qualified mentor for the first three years for beginning educators, with intensive support in the first year and decreasing support over the following years depending on the needs of the beginning educator;

(iii) Professional development for beginning educators that is designed to meet their unique needs for supplemental training and skill development;

(iv) Professional development for mentors;

(v) Release time for mentors and their designated educators to work together, as well as time for educators to observe accomplished peers; and

(vi) A program evaluation using a standard evaluation tool provided from the office of the superintendent of public instruction that measures increased knowledge, skills, and positive impact on student learning for program participants.

(3) Subject to funds separately appropriated for this specific purpose, the beginning educator support team components under subsection (2) of this section may be provided for continuous improvement coaching to support educators on probation under RCW 28A.405.100.

--- END ---