BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 39.26 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All contracts entered into and purchases made under this chapter are subject to the requirements established under RCW 19.06.020.

(2) This section is not intended to create an entitlement to an individual or class of individuals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 39.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All purchases made by a public agency are subject to the requirements established under RCW 19.06.020.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "public agency" means those agencies subject to RCW 19.06.020.

(3) This section is not intended to create an entitlement to an individual or class of individuals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Nothing in this act requires the department of enterprise services or any other public agency to breach an existing contract or dispose of stock that has been ordered or is in the possession of the department or other agency as of the effective date of this section.

--- END ---