BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter is applicable to steel slag that is a primary product of production in the electric arc steel-making process, produced to specification, managed as an item of commercial value, and placed in commerce for general public consumption, provided that such steel slag material is not abandoned, discarded, or placed in the solid waste stream.

--- END ---