BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department shall develop the following resources regarding Down syndrome:

(i) Up-to-date, evidence-based, written information about Down syndrome and people born with Down syndrome that has been reviewed by medical experts and national Down syndrome organizations; and

(ii) Contact information regarding support services, including information hotlines specific to Down syndrome, resource centers or clearinghouses, national and local Down syndrome organizations, and other education and support programs.

(b) The resources prepared by the department must:

(i) Be culturally and linguistically appropriate for expectant parents receiving a positive prenatal diagnosis or for the parents of a child receiving a postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome; and

(ii) Include: Physical, developmental, educational, and psychosocial outcomes; life expectancy; clinical course; and intellectual and functional development and therapy options.

(2) The department shall make the information described in this section available to any person who renders prenatal care, postnatal care, or genetic counseling to expectant parents receiving a positive prenatal diagnosis or to the parents of a child receiving a postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "Down syndrome" means a chromosomal condition that results in the presence of an extra whole or partial copy of chromosome 21.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.50 RCW to read as follows:

A midwife who provides a parent with a positive prenatal or postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome shall provide the parent with the information prepared by the department under section 1 of this act at the time the midwife provides the parent with the Down syndrome diagnosis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 18.57 RCW to read as follows:

An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter who provides a parent with a positive prenatal or postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome shall provide the parent with the information prepared by the department under section 1 of this act at the time the physician provides the parent with the Down syndrome diagnosis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 18.57A RCW to read as follows:

An osteopathic physician's assistant who provides a parent with a positive prenatal or postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome shall provide the parent with the information prepared by the department under section 1 of this act at the time the osteopathic physician's assistant provides the parent with the Down syndrome diagnosis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:

A physician licensed under this chapter who provides a parent with a positive prenatal or postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome shall provide the parent with the information prepared by the department under section 1 of this act at the time the physician provides the parent with the Down syndrome diagnosis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 18.71A RCW to read as follows:

A physician assistant who provides a parent with a positive prenatal or postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome shall provide the parent with the information prepared by the department under section 1 of this act at the time the physician assistant provides the parent with the Down syndrome diagnosis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:

A nurse who provides a parent with a positive prenatal or postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome shall provide the parent with the information prepared by the department under section 1 of this act at the time the nurse provides the parent with the Down syndrome diagnosis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 18.290 RCW to read as follows:

A genetic counselor who provides a parent with a positive prenatal or postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome shall provide the parent with the information prepared by the department under section 1 of this act at the time the genetic counselor provides the parent with the Down syndrome diagnosis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:

A hospital that provides a parent with a positive prenatal or postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome shall provide the parent with the information prepared by the department under section 1 of this act at the time the hospital provides the parent with the Down syndrome diagnosis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 18.46 RCW to read as follows:

A birthing center that provides a parent with a positive prenatal or postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome shall provide the parent with the information prepared by the department under section 1 of this act at the time the birthing center provides the parent with the Down syndrome diagnosis.

--- END ---