BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.44.073 and 1988 c 145 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of rape of a child in the first degree when the person has sexual intercourse with another who is less than twelve years old ((and not married to the perpetrator)) and the perpetrator is at least twenty-four months older than the victim.

(2) Rape of a child in the first degree is a class A felony.

--- END ---