BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction must develop and implement a process for ensuring that school districts are able to provide students and their parents or guardians with the results of state assessments no later than the subsequent June 15th after the student takes the assessment. This section applies to each of the following statewide high school assessments if taken during or after the 2016-17 school year:

(a) The tenth grade English language arts assessment developed by the superintendent of public instruction using resources from the multistate consortium;

(b) The English language arts assessment developed with the multistate consortium; and

(c) The comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with the multistate consortium.

(2) In accordance with subsection (1) of this section, school districts must provide students and their parents or guardians with the results of state assessments no later than the subsequent June 15th after the student takes the assessment.

--- END ---