BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.57 RCW to read as follows:

(1) To implement an impaired osteopathic practitioner program as authorized by RCW 18.130.175, the board shall enter into a contract with a voluntary substance abuse monitoring program. The impaired osteopathic practitioner program may include any or all of the following:

(a) Contracting with providers of treatment programs;

(b) Receiving and evaluating reports of suspected impairment from any source;

(c) Intervening in cases of verified impairment;

(d) Referring impaired osteopathic practitioners to treatment programs;

(e) Monitoring the treatment and rehabilitation of impaired osteopathic practitioners including those ordered by the board;

(f) Providing education, prevention of impairment, posttreatment monitoring, and support of rehabilitated impaired osteopathic practitioners; and

(g) Performing other related activities as determined by the board.

(2) A contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section shall be financed by a surcharge of fifty dollars on each license issuance or renewal to be collected by the department from every osteopathic practitioner licensed under this chapter. These moneys shall be placed in the health professions account to be used solely for the implementation of the impaired osteopathic practitioner program.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.57A.020 and 2015 c 252 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall adopt rules fixing the qualifications and the educational and training requirements for licensure as an osteopathic physician assistant or for those enrolled in any physician assistant training program. The requirements shall include completion of an accredited physician assistant training program approved by the board and within one year successfully take and pass an examination approved by the board, providing such examination tests subjects substantially equivalent to the curriculum of an accredited physician assistant training program. An interim permit may be granted by the department of health for one year provided the applicant meets all other requirements. Physician assistants licensed by the board of osteopathic medicine as of July 1, 1999, shall continue to be licensed.

(2)(a) The board shall adopt rules governing the extent to which:

(i) Physician assistant students may practice medicine during training; and

(ii) Physician assistants may practice after successful completion of a training course.

(b) Such rules shall provide:

(i) That the practice of an osteopathic physician assistant shall be limited to the performance of those services for which he or she is trained; and

(ii) That each osteopathic physician assistant shall practice osteopathic medicine only under the supervision and control of an osteopathic physician licensed in this state, but such supervision and control shall not be construed to necessarily require the personal presence of the supervising physicians at the place where services are rendered. The board may authorize the use of alternative supervisors who are licensed either under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

(3) Applicants for licensure shall file an application with the board on a form prepared by the secretary with the approval of the board, detailing the education, training, and experience of the physician assistant and such other information as the board may require. The application shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. A surcharge of ((twenty-five)) fifty dollars per year ((may)) shall be charged on each license renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by the department of health and placed in the health professions account for physician assistant participation in an impaired practitioner program. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of the following:

(a) That the applicant has completed an accredited physician assistant program approved by the board and is eligible to take the examination approved by the board;

(b) That the applicant is of good moral character; and

(c) That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of practicing osteopathic medicine as an osteopathic physician assistant with reasonable skill and safety. The board may require any applicant to submit to such examination or examinations as it deems necessary to determine an applicant's physical and/or mental capability to safely practice as an osteopathic physician assistant.

(4) The board may approve, deny, or take other disciplinary action upon the application for a license as provided in the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW. The license shall be renewed as determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(5) The board must request licensees to submit information about their current professional practice at the time of license renewal and licensees must provide the information requested. This information may include practice setting, medical specialty, board certification, or other relevant data determined by the board.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.92.047 and 1991 c 3 s 241 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To implement an impaired veterinarian program as authorized by RCW 18.130.175, the veterinary board of governors shall enter into a contract with a voluntary substance abuse monitoring program. The impaired veterinarian program may include any or all of the following:

(a) Contracting with providers of treatment programs;

(b) Receiving and evaluating reports of suspected impairment from any source;

(c) Intervening in cases of verified impairment;

(d) Referring impaired veterinarians to treatment programs;

(e) Monitoring the treatment and rehabilitation of impaired veterinarians including those ordered by the board;

(f) Providing education, prevention of impairment, posttreatment monitoring, and support of rehabilitated impaired veterinarians; and

(g) Performing other related activities as determined by the board.

(2) A contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section shall be financed by a surcharge of ((up to)) twenty-five dollars on each license issuance or renewal of a new license to be collected by the department of health from every veterinarian licensed under chapter 18.92 RCW. These moneys shall be placed in the health professions account to be used solely for the implementation of the impaired veterinarian program.

--- END ---