BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.60.235 and 2011 c 10 s 62 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county auditor shall prepare((, make publicly available at the auditor's office or on the auditor's web site, and submit)) at the time of certification an election reconciliation report that discloses the following information:

(((1))) (a) The number of registered voters;

(((2))) (b) The number of ballots issued;

(((3))) (c) The number of ballots received;

(((4))) (d) The number of ballots counted;

(((5))) (e) The number of ballots rejected;

(((6))) (f) The number of provisional ballots issued;

(((7))) (g) The number of provisional ballots received;

(((8))) (h) The number of provisional ballots counted;

(((9))) (i) The number of provisional ballots rejected;

(((10))) (j) The number of federal write-in ballots received;

(((11))) (k) The number of federal write-in ballots counted;

(((12))) (l) The number of federal write-in ballots rejected;

(((13))) (m) The number of overseas and service ballots issued;

(((14))) (n) The number of overseas and service ballots received;

(((15))) (o) The number of overseas and service ballots counted;

(((16))) (p) The number of overseas and service ballots rejected;

(((17))) (q) The number of voters credited with voting; and

(((18))) (r) Any other information the auditor or secretary of state deems necessary to reconcile the number of ballots counted with the number of voters credited with voting.

(2) The county auditor must make the report available to the public at the auditor's office and must publish the report on the auditor's web site at the time of certification. The county auditor must submit the report to the secretary of state at the time of certification in any form determined by the secretary of state.

(3)(a) The secretary of state must collect the reconciliation reports from each county auditor and prepare a statewide reconciliation report for each state primary and general election. The report may be produced in the form determined by the secretary of state that includes the information as described in this subsection (3). The report must be prepared and published on the secretary of state's web site within two months after the last county's election results have been certified.

(b) The state report must include a comparison among counties on rates of votes received, counted, and rejected, including provisional, write-in, and overseas ballots. The comparison information may be in the form of rankings, percentages, or other relevant quantifiable data that can be used to measure performance and trends.

(c) The state report also must include an analysis of the data that can be used to develop a better understanding of election administration and policy. The analysis should combine data over multiple years to provide broader comparisons and trends regarding voter registration and turnout and ballot counting. The analysis should also incorporate national election statistics to the extent the information is available.

--- END ---