BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that postsecondary educational institutions serve an important role in supporting K-12 student success. Partnerships between K-12 schools and postsecondary educational institutions effectively support academic achievement of K-12 students through college and university student engagement. Furthermore, the legislature finds that data is needed to improve and expand partnerships between K-12 schools and postsecondary educational institutions. The legislature intends to map and track partnerships between K-12 schools and postsecondary educational institutions to improve assessment, increase student engagement, support partnerships, and facilitate the dissemination of best practices for student success partnerships.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW to read as follows:

The Washington campus compact, a statewide consortium of public and private institutions of higher education hosted at Western Washington University, shall develop a statewide program to map, track, and improve partnerships between identified postsecondary educational institutions and K-12 schools. The program must:

(1) Map and track partnerships between postsecondary educational institutions, K-12 schools, and community-based organizations focused on student success and academic achievement;

(2) Document partnership goals, strategies, and intended outcomes;

(3) Advise postsecondary educational institutions on data collection systems;

(4) Train postsecondary educational institutions on building effective partnerships and improving assessment strategies;

(5) Develop a statewide database of student engagement and student social entrepreneurism;

(6) Promote and encourage student engagement across the state to improve student success partnerships; and

(7) Recognize student leaders engaged in service and social entrepreneurism.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. By July 1, 2017, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, Washington campus compact must submit a report to the legislature that details preliminary results and recommendations arising from the program outlined in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The sum of four hundred twenty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the general fund to Western Washington University for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---