BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. INTENT. (1) Washington has a chronic and acute teacher shortage. School districts across the state have struggled for years to find enough qualified teachers to fill vacancies in special education, math, and science, and a shortage of elementary teachers has emerged due, in part, to the state's recent efforts to lower class sizes in early elementary grades. Compounding the shortage is a failure to retain teachers once they enter the profession. Fully half of all teachers leave within five years on the job and twenty percent leave after their first year in the classroom.

(2) The legislature finds that attracting qualified college graduates to the teaching profession, supporting them during their first years on the job, and keeping them in the classroom for more than five years, has strong positive effects on student learning.

(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to raise the minimum base salary for beginning teachers to forty thousand dollars per year and increase by at least 1 percent the salary for all other teachers. The legislature further intends to support robust mentoring for beginning teachers to keep them in the classroom and to help them meet the needs of a diverse student population.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION. (1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW 28A.150.380 and under section 502, chapter 4, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.:

(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units are determined for each district by multiplying the district's certificated instructional total base salary from section 4 of this act by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated instructional staff in that school year, computed using the table of staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff in section 3 of this act; and

(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units and classified staff units for each district are determined based on the district's certificated administrative and classified salary allocation amounts from section 4 of this act.

(2) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary adjustments at a rate of 20.78 percent for school year 2016-17 for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 19.22 percent for the 2016-17 school year for classified staff.

(3)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary allocation schedule for certificated instructional staff is established for basic education salary allocations:

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff

For School Year 2016-17

*** Education Experience ***

Years

MA+90

of

OR

Service

BA

BA+15

BA+30

BA+45

BA+90

BA+135

MA

MA+45

Ph.D.

0

40,000

40,400

40,804

41,212

42,296

44,385

43,229

46,474

48,566

1

40,400

40,804

41,212

41,624

42,886

44,964

43,710

46,988

49,066

2

40,804

41,212

41,624

42,040

43,441

45,541

44,194

47,463

49,564

3

41,212

41,624

42,040

42,461

43,968

46,119

44,652

47,938

50,065

4

41,624

42,040

42,461

42,885

44,545

46,713

45,133

48,417

50,583

5

42,040

42,461

42,885

43,314

45,099

47,309

45,622

48,901

51,103

6

42,461

42,885

43,314

43,747

45,656

47,878

46,123

49,390

51,614

7

42,885

43,314

43,747

44,185

46,680

48,963

47,061

50,362

52,646

8

43,314

43,747

44,185

44,854

48,201

50,569

48,537

51,885

54,251

9

44,185

44,756

46,347

49,773

52,220

50,028

53,455

55,904

10

46,210

47,916

51,388

53,917

51,599

55,071

57,599

11

49,531

53,079

55,658

53,214

56,762

59,341

12

51,096

54,815

57,472

54,894

58,497

61,156

13

56,593

59,329

56,631

60,276

63,012

14

58,381

61,258

58,420

62,181

64,940

15

59,900

62,851

59,938

63,797

66,629

16 or more

61,098

64,107

61,137

65,073

67,961

(b) As used in this section, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate degree.

(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection, the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:

(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and

(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.

(4) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.

(b) "MA" means a masters degree.

(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.

(d) "Years of service" are calculated under the same rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.

(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and 28A.415.023.

(5) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule established in this section and sections 3 and 4 of this act, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a) The employee has a masters degree; or

(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations before January 1, 1992.

(6) The salary allocation schedule established in this section is for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. STAFF MIX FACTORS. The staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff according to education and years of experience shall be as follows:

Table of Staff Mix Factors For Certificated Instructional Staff

Years

MA+90

of

OR

Service

BA

BA+15

BA+30

BA+45

BA+90

BA+135

MA

MA+45

Ph.D.

0

1.00000

1.01000

1.02010

1.03030

1.05739

1.10964

1.08073

1.16185

1.21415

1

1.01000

1.02010

1.03030

1.04060

1.07214

1.12410

1.09274

1.17471

1.22665

2

1.02010

1.03030

1.04060

1.05101

1.08603

1.13852

1.10484

1.18657

1.23909

3

1.03030

1.04060

1.05101

1.06152

1.09921

1.15297

1.11630

1.19844

1.25162

4

1.04060

1.05101

1.06152

1.07214

1.11363

1.16781

1.12832

1.21042

1.26457

5

1.05101

1.06152

1.07214

1.08286

1.12746

1.18274

1.14054

1.22253

1.27757

6

1.06152

1.07214

1.08286

1.09369

1.14140

1.19695

1.15307

1.23475

1.29035

7

1.07214

1.08286

1.09369

1.10462

1.16700

1.22407

1.17652

1.25904

1.31616

8

1.08286

1.09369

1.10462

1.12135

1.20503

1.26422

1.21341

1.29712

1.35628

9

1.10462

1.11890

1.15867

1.24432

1.30550

1.25071

1.33638

1.39759

10

1.15524

1.19791

1.28469

1.34792

1.28997

1.37678

1.43998

11

1.23829

1.32696

1.39145

1.33035

1.41905

1.48351

12

1.27740

1.37037

1.43680

1.37234

1.46243

1.52889

13

1.41483

1.48324

1.41577

1.50689

1.57530

14

1.45953

1.53144

1.46051

1.55452

1.62350

15

1.49750

1.57128

1.49846

1.59492

1.66572

16 or more

1.52745

1.60267

1.52843

1.62683

1.69902

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. SCHOOL YEAR SALARY ALLOCATIONS. The school year salary allocations for certificated administrative staff and classified staff and derived and total base salaries for certificated instructional staff shall be as follows:

Base Salary Allocations for School Year 2016-17

School District

Certificated Instructional Staff

Administrative Staff

Classified Staff

01 109 Washtucna

40,000

69,442

33,746

01 122 Benge

40,000

61,409

34,327

01 147 Othello

40,000

61,409

33,746

01 158 Lind

40,000

76,812

33,746

01 160 Ritzville

40,000

66,389

33,785

02 250 Clarkston

40,000

62,531

33,746

02 420 Asotin-Anatone

40,000

61,409

33,746

03 017 Kennewick

40,000

61,409

33,746

03 050 Paterson

40,000

61,409

33,746

03 052 Kiona-Benton City

40,000

65,336

33,746

03 053 Finley

40,000

63,892

33,746

03 116 Prosser

40,000

66,529

33,746

03 400 Richland

40,000

62,319

33,746

04 019 Manson

40,000

69,107

33,746

04 069 Stehekin

40,000

70,749

33,746

04 127 Entiat

40,000

81,630

33,746

04 129 Lake Chelan

40,588

61,409

33,945

04 222 Cashmere

40,000

74,282

33,746

04 228 Cascade

40,000

66,891

33,746

04 246 Wenatchee

40,000

64,820

33,746

05 121 Port Angeles

40,000

65,528

33,746

05 313 Crescent

40,000

67,655

33,746

05 323 Sequim

40,000

61,409

33,746

05 401 Cape Flattery

40,000

65,705

33,746

05 402 Quillayute Valley

40,000

63,851

33,746

06 037 Vancouver

40,000

65,106

33,746

06 098 Hockinson

40,000

66,247

33,746

06 101 La Center

40,000

67,123

33,746

06 103 Green Mountain

40,000

84,747

33,746

06 112 Washougal

40,000

61,409

33,830

06 114 Evergreen (Clark)

40,000

61,409

33,746

06 117 Camas

40,000

69,013

33,845

06 119 Battle Ground

40,000

63,802

33,746

06 122 Ridgefield

40,000

67,060

33,746

07 002 Dayton

40,000

61,409

33,746

07 035 Starbuck

40,000

61,409

33,746

08 122 Longview

40,000

61,409

33,746

08 130 Toutle Lake

40,000

72,592

33,915

08 401 Castle Rock

40,000

61,409

34,425

08 402 Kalama

40,000

62,444

33,746

08 404 Woodland

40,000

62,597

33,746

08 458 Kelso

40,000

61,720

33,746

09 013 Orondo

41,904

61,409

33,746

09 075 Bridgeport

40,000

67,079

34,154

09 102 Palisades

40,000

61,409

33,746

09 206 Eastmont

40,000

65,020

33,746

09 207 Mansfield

40,000

81,570

34,179

09 209 Waterville

40,000

62,709

33,746

10 003 Keller

40,000

61,409

33,746

10 050 Curlew

40,000

81,555

33,746

10 065 Orient

40,000

75,603

33,746

10 070 Inchelium

40,000

71,089

33,746

10 309 Republic

40,000

61,409

33,746

11 001 Pasco

40,000

61,499

33,750

11 051 North Franklin

40,000

63,316

33,746

11 054 Star

40,000

61,409

33,746

11 056 Kahlotus

40,000

61,774

33,746

12 110 Pomeroy

40,000

67,949

33,812

13 073 Wahluke

40,000

73,481

33,746

13 144 Quincy

40,000

62,609

33,760

13 146 Warden

40,000

65,060

33,746

13 151 Coulee-Hartline

40,000

69,837

33,746

13 156 Soap Lake

40,000

61,409

33,746

13 160 Royal

40,000

62,230

33,746

13 161 Moses Lake

40,000

62,984

33,746

13 165 Ephrata

40,000

61,409

33,746

13 167 Wilson Creek

40,000

87,003

33,746

13 301 Grand Coulee Dam

40,000

61,409

33,746

14 005 Aberdeen

40,000

62,463

33,746

14 028 Hoquiam

40,000

64,876

33,746

14 064 North Beach

40,000

71,107

33,746

14 065 McCleary

40,000

66,388

35,060

14 066 Montesano

40,000

62,032

33,746

14 068 Elma

40,000

62,030

34,786

14 077 Taholah

40,000

79,394

33,746

14 097 Quinault

40,000

62,705

33,998

14 099 Cosmopolis

40,000

62,232

33,746

14 104 Satsop

40,000

61,409

33,746

14 117 Wishkah Valley

40,000

79,382

34,633

14 172 Ocosta

40,000

61,646

33,950

14 400 Oakville

40,000

85,208

34,809

15 201 Oak Harbor

40,260

61,409

33,746

15 204 Coupeville

40,000

61,409

33,746

15 206 South Whidbey

40,000

62,181

34,151

16 020 Queets-Clearwater

40,000

64,029

33,997

16 046 Brinnon

40,000

61,409

33,746

16 048 Quilcene

40,000

85,822

33,746

16 049 Chimacum

40,000

63,969

34,498

16 050 Port Townsend

40,000

61,409

33,746

17 001 Seattle

40,269

63,466

38,948

17 210 Federal Way

40,000

61,409

33,746

17 216 Enumclaw

40,000

61,541

33,746

17 400 Mercer Island

40,000

66,951

34,028

17 401 Highline

40,000

66,153

33,746

17 402 Vashon Island

40,000

68,756

33,746

17 403 Renton

40,000

61,918

33,746

17 404 Skykomish

40,000

89,342

33,951

17 405 Bellevue

40,000

64,844

36,544

17 406 Tukwila

40,000

74,180

33,746

17 407 Riverview

40,000

65,993

33,746

17 408 Auburn

40,000

61,409

33,746

17 409 Tahoma

40,000

61,409

33,922

17 410 Snoqualmie Valley

40,000

61,409

33,746

17 411 Issaquah

40,000

63,192

33,746

17 412 Shoreline

40,000

66,836

35,402

17 414 Lake Washington

40,000

64,774

33,746

17 415 Kent

40,000

61,409

33,746

17 417 Northshore

41,662

61,409

34,221

18 100 Bremerton

40,000

62,384

34,944

18 303 Bainbridge Island

40,000

64,226

33,746

18 400 North Kitsap

40,000

61,615

34,252

18 401 Central Kitsap

40,000

61,409

33,746

18 402 South Kitsap

40,000

62,927

33,863

19 007 Damman

40,000

61,409

33,746

19 028 Easton

40,000

61,409

33,746

19 400 Thorp

40,000

61,529

34,618

19 401 Ellensburg

40,000

62,795

33,746

19 403 Kittitas

40,000

62,891

33,746

19 404 Cle Elum-Roslyn

40,000

66,090

33,750

20 094 Wishram

40,000

76,562

33,746

20 203 Bickleton

40,000

76,517

33,746

20 215 Centerville

40,000

61,409

33,746

20 400 Trout Lake

40,000

67,659

33,746

20 401 Glenwood

40,000

68,152

33,746

20 402 Klickitat

40,000

74,046

33,746

20 403 Roosevelt

40,000

61,409

33,746

20 404 Goldendale

40,000

61,409

33,746

20 405 White Salmon

40,000

69,268

33,746

20 406 Lyle

40,000

69,558

33,746

21 014 Napavine

40,000

71,146

33,805

21 036 Evaline

40,000

61,409

33,746

21 206 Mossyrock

40,000

68,287

33,746

21 214 Morton

40,000

65,950

33,991

21 226 Adna

40,000

71,907

33,746

21 232 Winlock

40,000

64,577

33,746

21 234 Boistfort

40,000

63,624

33,746

21 237 Toledo

40,000

64,126

33,746

21 300 Onalaska

40,000

62,926

33,746

21 301 Pe Ell

40,000

70,620

34,387

21 302 Chehalis

40,000

61,409

33,746

21 303 White Pass

40,000

61,993

33,746

21 401 Centralia

40,000

66,793

33,746

22 008 Sprague

40,000

69,973

33,887

22 009 Reardan-Edwall

40,000

62,815

33,746

22 017 Almira

40,000

79,678

33,746

22 073 Creston

40,000

79,036

33,746

22 105 Odessa

40,000

66,151

33,746

22 200 Wilbur

40,000

75,994

33,746

22 204 Harrington

40,000

89,342

33,746

22 207 Davenport

40,000

67,284

33,746

23 042 Southside

40,604

61,409

33,746

23 054 Grapeview

40,000

66,495

33,746

23 309 Shelton

40,000

64,192

33,857

23 311 Mary M. Knight

40,000

78,659

34,317

23 402 Pioneer

40,000

61,409

33,746

23 403 North Mason

40,000

61,409

33,769

23 404 Hood Canal

40,000

64,121

35,035

24 014 Nespelem

40,000

72,100

33,746

24 019 Omak

40,000

66,742

33,746

24 105 Okanogan

40,000

63,182

34,146

24 111 Brewster

40,000

62,457

33,819

24 122 Pateros

40,000

62,739

33,746

24 350 Methow Valley

40,000

75,723

33,954

24 404 Tonasket

40,000

64,600

33,746

24 410 Oroville

40,000

61,910

34,441

25 101 Ocean Beach

40,000

69,234

33,746

25 116 Raymond

40,000

63,945

33,746

25 118 South Bend

40,000

61,409

33,746

25 155 Naselle-Grays River Valley

40,000

73,314

33,746

25 160 Willapa Valley

40,000

61,409

33,746

25 200 North River

40,000

69,941

33,746

26 056 Newport

40,000

61,481

33,746

26 059 Cusick

40,000

77,582

33,746

26 070 Selkirk

40,000

61,409

33,746

27 001 Steilacoom Historical

40,000

63,520

33,933

27 003 Puyallup

40,806

61,409

33,746

27 010 Tacoma

40,000

61,409

37,018

27 019 Carbonado

40,000

74,990

33,746

27 083 University Place

40,000

61,409

33,746

27 320 Sumner

40,000

62,688

33,746

27 343 Dieringer

40,000

67,168

33,746

27 344 Orting

40,000

63,223

33,746

27 400 Clover Park

40,000

62,891

33,746

27 401 Peninsula

40,000

64,470

33,762

27 402 Franklin Pierce

40,000

66,470

33,746

27 403 Bethel

40,000

63,371

33,746

27 404 Eatonville

40,000

61,409

33,746

27 416 White River

40,000

61,448

33,746

27 417 Fife

40,000

64,145

33,746

28 010 Shaw Island

40,763

61,409

35,720

28 137 Orcas Island

40,000

61,409

33,834

28 144 Lopez Island

40,435

66,467

33,746

28 149 San Juan Island

40,000

65,050

33,746

29 011 Concrete

40,000

67,624

33,746

29 100 Burlington-Edison

40,000

62,159

33,746

29 101 Sedro-Woolley

40,000

61,409

33,849

29 103 Anacortes

40,000

63,341

33,746

29 311 La Conner

40,000

69,634

33,746

29 317 Conway

40,000

66,352

33,746

29 320 Mount Vernon

40,000

61,409

33,746

30 002 Skamania

40,000

77,447

35,933

30 029 Mount Pleasant

40,000

61,409

37,291

30 031 Mill A

40,000

61,409

34,246

30 303 Stevenson-Carson

40,000

62,192

33,746

31 002 Everett

41,985

66,227

35,519

31 004 Lake Stevens

40,000

68,649

33,746

31 006 Mukilteo

40,478

64,946

33,746

31 015 Edmonds

40,000

63,968

33,746

31 016 Arlington

40,000

62,115

33,746

31 025 Marysville

41,542

61,602

33,746

31 063 Index

40,000

61,409

33,746

31 103 Monroe

40,000

63,971

33,746

31 201 Snohomish

40,000

65,304

33,746

31 306 Lakewood

40,000

61,409

33,746

31 311 Sultan

40,000

61,409

33,746

31 330 Darrington

40,000

71,576

33,746

31 332 Granite Falls

40,000

61,528

33,746

31 401 Stanwood

40,000

61,409

33,746

32 081 Spokane

40,000

61,409

33,746

32 123 Orchard Prairie

40,000

61,409

33,746

32 312 Great Northern

40,000

61,409

33,746

32 325 Nine Mile Falls

40,000

67,776

33,746

32 326 Medical Lake

40,000

61,409

33,746

32 354 Mead

40,000

61,409

33,746

32 356 Central Valley

40,000

61,409

34,107

32 358 Freeman

40,000

61,409

33,804

32 360 Cheney

40,000

63,039

33,746

32 361 East Valley (Spokane)

40,000

61,409

33,746

32 362 Liberty

40,000

63,787

33,746

32 363 West Valley (Spokane)

40,000

67,392

33,746

32 414 Deer Park

40,000

62,846

33,746

32 416 Riverside

40,000

63,133

33,746

33 030 Onion Creek

40,000

61,409

33,746

33 036 Chewelah

40,000

61,409

34,377

33 049 Wellpinit

40,000

79,320

33,746

33 070 Valley

40,000

68,263

33,746

33 115 Colville

40,000

61,409

33,746

33 183 Loon Lake

40,000

61,409

33,746

33 202 Summit Valley

40,000

61,409

33,746

33 205 Evergreen (Stevens)

40,000

61,409

33,746

33 206 Columbia (Stevens)

40,000

89,342

33,746

33 207 Mary Walker

40,000

68,836

33,746

33 211 Northport

40,000

72,946

33,746

33 212 Kettle Falls

40,000

61,409

34,051

34 002 Yelm

40,000

65,047

33,746

34 003 North Thurston

40,000

61,561

33,746

34 033 Tumwater

40,000

65,364

33,746

34 111 Olympia

40,000

63,397

33,763

34 307 Rainier

40,000

65,333

33,746

34 324 Griffin

40,000

61,409

33,746

34 401 Rochester

40,000

61,409

33,746

34 402 Tenino

40,000

61,409

33,746

35 200 Wahkiakum

40,000

61,409

33,746

36 101 Dixie

40,000

67,431

33,746

36 140 Walla Walla

40,000

61,818

33,746

36 250 College Place

40,000

63,159

33,746

36 300 Touchet

40,000

63,620

33,746

36 400 Columbia (Walla Walla)

40,000

61,409

33,746

36 401 Waitsburg

40,000

74,918

33,746

36 402 Prescott

40,000

72,876

34,997

37 501 Bellingham

40,000

62,056

33,746

37 502 Ferndale

40,000

64,581

33,746

37 503 Blaine

40,000

64,768

34,164

37 504 Lynden

40,000

61,409

33,746

37 505 Meridian

40,000

61,409

33,746

37 506 Nooksack Valley

40,000

61,409

33,766

37 507 Mount Baker

40,000

61,409

33,746

38 126 Lacrosse

40,000

73,899

34,126

38 264 Lamont

40,000

68,984

33,746

38 265 Tekoa

40,000

82,390

33,746

38 267 Pullman

40,000

61,409

33,923

38 300 Colfax

40,000

61,781

33,746

38 301 Palouse

40,000

73,282

34,128

38 302 Garfield

40,000

71,724

33,746

38 304 Steptoe

40,000

61,409

34,209

38 306 Colton

40,000

74,267

33,746

38 308 Endicott

40,000

82,420

33,746

38 320 Rosalia

40,000

77,733

33,804

38 322 St. John

40,000

89,342

33,746

38 324 Oakesdale

40,000

80,400

33,746

39 002 Union Gap

40,000

67,912

33,746

39 003 Naches Valley

40,000

66,113

33,746

39 007 Yakima

40,000

67,396

33,821

39 090 East Valley (Yakima)

40,000

62,350

34,064

39 119 Selah

40,000

66,320

33,746

39 120 Mabton

40,000

70,258

34,810

39 200 Grandview

40,000

63,581

33,746

39 201 Sunnyside

40,000

61,409

33,746

39 202 Toppenish

40,000

66,435

33,746

39 203 Highland

40,000

67,205

33,746

39 204 Granger

40,000

65,609

33,746

39 205 Zillah

40,000

64,987

33,746

39 207 Wapato

40,000

63,992

33,746

39 208 West Valley (Yakima)

40,000

61,409

33,746

39 209 Mount Adams

40,000

66,743

33,746

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. APPROPRIATION FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS. (1) The sum of seventy-one million seven hundred eighty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the education legacy trust account to the superintendent of public instruction for school employee compensation adjustments.

(2) The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Additional salary adjustments as necessary to fund the base salaries for certificated instructional staff as listed for each district in section 4 of this act.

(b) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary to fund the per full-time equivalent salary allocations for certificated administrative staff as listed for each district in section 4 of this act.

(c) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary to fund the per full-time equivalent salary allocations for classified staff as listed for each district in section 4 of this act.

(d) The appropriation in this section includes associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at 20.78 percent for the 2016-17 school year for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 19.22 percent for the 2016-17 school year for classified staff.

(e) The appropriation in this section includes the increased or decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of chapter 4, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. Changes for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary allocation schedules and methodology in sections 2, 3, and 4 of this act. Changes for special education result from changes in each district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for educational service districts and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections 2, 3, and 4 of this act.

(f) The appropriation in this section includes no salary adjustments for substitute teachers.

(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. APPROPRIATION FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE. (1) The sum of seven million eight hundred twenty-three thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the education legacy trust account to the superintendent of public instruction for local effort assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. APPROPRIATION FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION FOR A BEGINNING EDUCATOR SUPPORT PROGRAM. (1) The sum of five million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the education legacy trust account to the superintendent of public instruction for a beginning educator support program.

(2) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a beginning educator support program. The program shall prioritize first year teachers in the mentoring program. Either school districts, or regional consortia, or both may apply for grant funding.

(3) The program provided by either a district, or a regional consortia, or both shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning teacher aligned with professional certification; release time for mentors and new teachers to work together; and teacher observation time with accomplished peers. Funding may be used to provide statewide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. APPROPRIATION FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND. (1) The sum of forty four thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the education legacy trust account to the Washington state school for the blind.

(2) The appropriation in this section is sufficient to implement the salary adjustments necessary to fund the base salaries for certificated instructional staff and classified staff at the Washington state school for the blind.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. APPROPRIATION FOR THE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS. (1) The sum of twenty-three thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the education legacy trust account to the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss.

(2) The appropriation in this section is sufficient to implement the salary adjustments necessary to fund the base salaries for certificated instructional staff and classified staff at the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss.

--- END ---