BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW under the subchapter heading "plan 2" to read as follows, but because of its temporary nature is not codified:

(1) A plan 2 retiree whose retirement was effective before June 1, 2014, may purchase an annuity under this section between January 1, 2017, and June 1, 2017.

(2) Plan 2 retirees who meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section may purchase an optional actuarially equivalent life annuity benefit from the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 retirement fund established in RCW 41.50.075. A minimum payment of twenty-five thousand dollars is required.

(a) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a retiree purchasing an annuity under this section must pay all of the cost with an eligible rollover, direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible retirement plan.

(b) The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all eligible rollovers and transfers comply with the requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

(c) "Eligible retirement plan" means a tax qualified plan offered by a governmental employer.

--- END ---