BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that over five hundred thousand women in the United States are at risk of or have undergone female genital mutilation. The existence, incidence, and effects of female genital mutilation is often shrouded in secrecy. Federal law prohibits the performance of female genital mutilation in the United States. However, there are immigrants coming to the United States that have already been subjected to female genital mutilation and girls from communities that traditionally practice female genital mutilation that are at risk of being subjected to it on vacation in their parents' country of origin.

(2) The legislature finds that there is a general lack of information in the United States about female genital mutilation and its health and emotional effects in local communities, schools, government, and health institutions. The legislature intends to establish education and outreach initiatives to prevent female genital mutilation, provide information and awareness on female genital mutilation, and provide care for victims of female genital mutilation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of health shall design a plan for the prevention, education, and treatment of female genital mutilation by November 30, 2016. In developing the plan, the department shall seek the input of:

(a) The public;

(b) Community members from communities that traditionally practice female genital mutilation;

(c) Women's health groups and organizations;

(d) Educators;

(e) Relevant state agencies that provide services to persons at risk of female genital mutilation or persons who have been subjected to female genital mutilation;

(f) Local health departments; and

(g) Health care providers of services to persons at risk of female genital mutilation or persons who have been subjected to female genital mutilation.

(2) The department shall develop criteria to identify the communities described in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

(3) The plan must include implementation recommendations in the following areas:

(a) Female genital mutilation prevention and treatment strategies for groups at risk for female genital mutilation;

(b) Educational programs to promote public awareness about female genital mutilation;

(c) Education curricula for appropriate health and health-related providers covered by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(d) Training courses for persons providing counseling to individuals subjected to female genital mutilation; and

(e) Sources and availability of funding to implement the plan.

(4) The department shall submit the completed plan to the legislature by November 30, 2016. The department shall implement the plan no later than August 1, 2017. The department shall provide progress reports to the legislature beginning November 30, 2017, and every two years thereafter.

(5) For the purposes of this section, "female genital mutilation" means the excision or infibulation of the labia majora, labia minora, clitoris, or vulva, performed for nonmedical purposes.

(6) The department of health may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

--- END ---