BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of social and health services and the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall establish a work group to study and develop recommendations for methods and procedures for:

(a) Local jails to electronically transmit information about persons confined in jail to behavioral health organizations and managed care health systems within twelve hours of a person's confinement into jail;

(b) Behavioral health organizations and managed care health systems to receive information transmitted from a jail about a confined person and determine whether the person is a client; and

(c) Enabling a person's associated health care provider(s) to electronically communicate the person's health care information to the appropriate health care staff at the jail to ensure proper continuity of care for the incarcerated person.

(2) The recommendations of the work group must include recommendations for state funding necessary to achieve efficient, secure, and proper communications between local jails, behavioral health organizations and managed care health systems, and associated health care providers. The work group shall submit its recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2017.

--- END ---