BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that minimizing construction and long-term maintenance costs of buildings is in the public interest. The legislature further finds that providing flexibility in building construction methods can result in efficient, resilient, and sustainable buildings, help local communities achieve their goals of increasing affordable housing, and ease code administration and enforcement, all of which benefits the safety and welfare of building owners, occupants, and the general public. Providing the option for the citizens to benefit from the material and labor efficiencies provided by the international plumbing code is in line with Governor Inslee's Results Washington goal of improving nonelectrical energy efficiency of building and industrial processes to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.

Sec. 2. RCW 19.27.031 and 2015 c 11 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there shall be in effect in all counties and cities the state building code which shall consist of the following codes which are hereby adopted by reference:

(1)(a) The International Building Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc.;

(b) The International Residential Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc.;

(2) The International Mechanical Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc., except that the standards for liquefied petroleum gas installations shall be NFPA 58 (Storage and Handling of Liquefied Petroleum Gases) and ANSI Z223.1/NFPA 54 (National Fuel Gas Code);

(3) The International Fire Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc., including those standards of the National Fire Protection Association specifically referenced in the International Fire Code: PROVIDED, That, notwithstanding any wording in this code, participants in religious ceremonies shall not be precluded from carrying hand-held candles;

(4)(a) Except as provided in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform Plumbing Code and Uniform Plumbing Code Standards, published by the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials: PROVIDED, That any provisions of such code affecting sewers or fuel gas piping are not adopted; and

(b) As an alternative code, and not in addition to the code in (a) of this subsection, the International Plumbing Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc., with the exception of sections 104.4, 108.7, and 109 and Appendix A of such Code, which are not adopted;

(5) The rules adopted by the council establishing standards for making buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by individuals with disabilities or elderly persons as provided in RCW 70.92.100 through 70.92.160; and

(6) The state's climate zones for building purposes are designated in RCW 19.27A.020(3) and may not be changed through the adoption of a model code or rule.

In case of conflict among the codes enumerated in subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section, the first named code shall govern over those following.

The codes enumerated in this section shall be adopted by the council as provided in RCW 19.27.074. The council shall solicit input from first responders to ensure that firefighter safety issues are addressed during the code adoption process.

The council may issue opinions relating to the codes at the request of a local official charged with the duty to enforce the enumerated codes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The state building code council may not use any funding or resources to review or modify the 2015 version of the International Plumbing Code, published by the International Code Council, Inc.

--- END ---