BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.08.075 and 2014 c 48 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of this title or rules adopted under this title, "resident" means:

(1) A natural person who has maintained a permanent place of abode within the state for at least ((ninety)) thirty days immediately preceding an application for a license, has established by formal evidence an intent to continue residing within the state, is not licensed to hunt or fish as a resident in another state or country, and is not receiving resident benefits of another state or country.

(a) For purposes of this section, "permanent place of abode" means a residence in this state that a person maintains for personal use.

(b) A natural person can demonstrate that the person has maintained a permanent place of abode in Washington by showing that the person:

(i) Uses a Washington state address for federal income tax or state tax purposes;

(ii) Designates this state as the person's residence for obtaining eligibility to hold a public office or for judicial actions;

(iii) Is a registered voter in the state of Washington; or

(iv) Is a custodial parent with a child attending prekindergarten, kindergarten, elementary school, middle school, or high school in this state.

(c) A natural person can demonstrate the intent to continue residing within the state by showing that he or she:

(i) Has a valid Washington state driver's license; or

(ii) Has a valid Washington state identification card, if the person is not eligible for a Washington state driver's license; and

(iii) Has registered the person's vehicle or vehicles in Washington state;

(2) The spouse of a member of the United States armed forces if the member qualifies as a resident under subsection (1), (3), or (4) of this section, or a natural person age eighteen or younger who does not qualify as a resident under subsection (1) of this section, but who has a parent or legal guardian who qualifies as a resident under subsection (1), (3), or (4) of this section;

(3) A member of the United States armed forces temporarily stationed in Washington state on predeployment orders. A copy of the person's military orders is required to meet this condition;

(4) An active duty, nonretired member of the United States armed forces who is permanently stationed in Washington or who designates Washington on his or her military "state of legal residence certificate" or enlistment or reenlistment documents. A copy of the person's "state of legal residence certificate" or enlistment or reenlistment documents is required to meet the conditions of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The department of fish and wildlife may not issue refunds or price adjustments for any licenses affected by section 1 of this act purchased prior to April 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect April 1, 2017.

--- END ---