BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Economic development and in particular trade and international relations continue to be important to Washington and affect the state's employment, revenues, and general economic well-being. Additionally, economic trends are rapidly changing and the international marketplace has become increasingly competitive as states and countries seek to improve and safeguard their own economic well-being. The purpose of the joint legislative oversight committee on economic development, trade policy, and international relations is to streamline the state's economic development, trade, and international relations efforts and more efficiently use tax payer dollars by consolidating the legislative committee on economic development and international relations and the joint legislative oversight committee on trade policy. The legislature finds that this is the most efficient and effective method to continue responsive and consistent involvement by the legislature in economic development to maintain a healthy state economy and to provide employment opportunities to Washington residents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The joint legislative oversight committee on economic development, trade policy, and international relations is created, to consist of six senators and six representatives from the legislature and the lieutenant governor who shall serve as chair. The senate members of the committee shall be appointed by the president of the senate and the house of representatives members of the committee shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. Senate appointments must include three members from each of the largest two caucuses; each of whom must sit on the senate economic development committee. Two members from the senate must be the chair and ranking minority members of the senate economic development committee. House appointments must include three members from each of the largest two caucuses; each of whom must sit on the house economic development committee. Two members from the house must be the chair and ranking minority members of the house economic development committee. During odd-numbered years, the house of representatives economic development committee chair shall serve as first vice chair and the senate economic development committee chair shall serve as second vice chair. During even-numbered years, the senate economic development committee chair shall serve as first vice chair and the house economic development committee chair shall serve as second vice chair.

(2) The chair and vice chairs of the committee must jointly prepare meeting agendas. Meeting agendas must be approved by a majority of the committee before publishing the agenda. Electronic approval is permitted.

(3) A list of appointees must be submitted before the close of each regular legislative session during an odd-numbered year or any successive special session convened by the governor or the legislature before the close of such regular session or successive special sessions for confirmation of senate members, by the senate, and house of representatives members, by the house of representatives. A list reinstating or appointing new committee members for the first year of the committee shall be submitted by July 1, 2016. Vacancies occurring shall be filled by the appointing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The committee shall by majority vote establish subcommittees, and prescribe rules of procedure consistent with this chapter for itself and its subcommittees. The committee shall at a minimum establish subcommittees on economic development and international trade.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The committee must meet at least once per year. The committee or its subcommittees are authorized to study and review economic development, trade policy, and international relations issues to assist the legislature in developing a comprehensive and consistent economic development policy. The issues under review and tasks of the committee shall include, but are not limited to:

(1) Evaluating existing state policies, laws, and programs that promote or affect economic development and determine their cost-effectiveness and level of cooperation with other public and private agencies. The evaluation process must include review of milestones in existing state policies, laws, and programs;

(2) Monitoring economic development policies, laws, and programs of other states and nations, evaluating the effectiveness of their nascent economic development clusters, and developing for review by the legislature such appropriate state responses as may be deemed effective and appropriate. Nascent economic clusters of focus must include, but are not limited to, the aerospace, clean technology, information/communications technology, life science and global health, maritime, and military and defense sectors;

(3) Hearing public testimony and reporting to the legislative economic development committees on the actual and potential impacts of international trade agreements and negotiations on Washington state. The committee must also submit an annual report to the state trade representative's office and to the legislature providing recommendations on state support based on findings from the public testimony. The annual report must also include an assessment of the impacts of international trade agreements upon Washington and notification of any new international agreements impacting Washington state;

(4) Providing guidance to the legislature on economic development, trade, and international relations strategies and performance milestones to implement, including use of milestones recommended or used by Washington state's international trade offices and consultants;

(5) Examining any aspects of international trade, international economic integration, and trade agreements that the members deem appropriate;

(6) Assessing the need for and effect of federal, regional, and state cooperation in economic development policies and programs;

(7) Maintaining active communication with the state trade representative's office, the United States trade representative's office, Washington's congressional delegation, the national conference of state legislatures, and any other bodies the committee deems appropriate regarding ongoing developments in international trade agreements and policy; and

(8) Developing and evaluating legislative proposals concerning the issues specified in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) The committee shall receive the necessary staff support from both the senate and house of representatives staff resources.

(2) The members of the committee shall serve without additional compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses, in accordance with RCW 44.04.120, incurred while attending sessions of the committee or meetings of any subcommittee of the committee, while engaged on other committee business authorized by the committee, and while going to and coming from committee sessions or committee meetings.

(3) All expenses incurred by the committee, including salaries and expenses of employees, shall be paid upon voucher forms as provided by the auditor and signed by the chair or first vice chair of the committee and attested by the secretary of the committee, and the authority of the chair and secretary to sign vouchers shall continue until their successors are selected after each ensuing session of the legislature. Vouchers may be drawn on funds appropriated generally by the legislature for legislative expenses or upon any special appropriation which may be provided by the legislature for the expenses of the committee or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The committee shall cooperate, act, and function with legislative committees, executive agencies, and with the councils or committees of other states similar to this committee and with other interstate research organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.15.060 (Legislative committee on economic development and international relations—Purpose—Created—Membership) and 2003 c 347 s 1 & 1985 c 467 s 17;

(2) RCW 43.15.065 (Legislative committee on economic development and international relations—Subcommittees—Rules of procedure) and 1985 c 467 s 18;

(3) RCW 43.15.070 (Legislative committee on economic development and international relations—Powers—Study and review of economic issues) and 1985 c 467 s 19;

(4) RCW 43.15.075 (Legislative committee on economic development and international relations—Staff support) and 1985 c 467 s 20;

(5) RCW 43.15.080 (Legislative committee on economic development and international relations—Travel expenses) and 1985 c 467 s 21;

(6) RCW 43.15.085 (Legislative committee on economic development and international relations—Expenses) and 1985 c 467 s 22;

(7) RCW 43.15.090 (Legislative committee on economic development and international relations—Cooperation with committees, agencies, and councils) and 1985 c 467 s 23;

(8) RCW 44.55.010 (Findings—Intent) and 2003 c 404 s 1;

(9) RCW 44.55.020 (Committee membership) and 2003 c 404 s 2;

(10) RCW 44.55.030 (Chair—Officers—Rules) and 2003 c 404 s 3;

(11) RCW 44.55.040 (Powers, duties) and 2003 c 404 s 4;

(12) RCW 44.55.050 (Staff support) and 2003 c 404 s 5; and

(13) RCW 44.55.060 (Compensation) and 2003 c 404 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

--- END ---