BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.68A.107 and 2015 c 279 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to penalties set forth in ((RCW 9.68A.070)) this chapter, a person who is convicted of violating RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, or 9.68A.070 shall be assessed a fee of one thousand dollars for each ((depiction or image of visual or printed matter that constitutes a)) separate conviction.

(2) Fees assessed under this section shall be collected by the clerk of the court and remitted to the state treasurer for deposit into the child rescue fund created in RCW 9.68A.200.

--- END ---