BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preference contained in this act. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(1) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to provide tax relief for certain individuals, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(e).

(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to promote property tax equity by offering property tax relief, based on their ability to pay, to senior citizens, persons retired because of physical disability, qualifying veterans, and widows or widowers of veterans. It is the legislature's intent to index the qualifying income thresholds for property tax relief programs to inflation.

(3) To measure the effectiveness of this act in achieving the specific public policy objective described in subsection (2) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee must, at minimum, perform a comparison of the real-dollar value of each qualifying income threshold in fiscal year 2016 and in the fiscal year of evaluation.

(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review under this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may:

(a) Refer to the consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U) as published by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor;

(b) Refer to reports of senior and disabled relief for the county, provided by county assessors to the department of revenue; and

(c) In addition to the data sources described under this section, use any other data it deems necessary in performing the evaluation under subsection (3) of this section.

(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Qualifying income thresholds" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 84.36.383, 84.38.020, and 84.39.010.

(b) "Real-dollar value" means a dollar value that has been adjusted for inflation.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.36.381 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 30 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A person is exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a portion of the amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and payable in the year following the year in which a claim is filed, and thereafter, in accordance with the following:

(1) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence which was occupied by the person claiming the exemption as a principal place of residence as of the time of filing. However, any person who sells, transfers, or is displaced from his or her residence may transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement residence, but no claimant may receive an exemption on more than one residence in any year. Moreover, confinement of the person to a hospital, nursing home, assisted living facility, or adult family home does not disqualify the claim of exemption if:

(a) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;

(b) The residence is occupied by a spouse or a domestic partner and/or a person financially dependent on the claimant for support; or

(c) The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home, hospital, assisted living facility, or adult family home costs;

(2) The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership, such person must own a share therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by a marital community or state registered domestic partnership or owned by cotenants is deemed to be owned by each spouse or each domestic partner or each cotenant, and any lease for life is deemed a life estate;

(3)(a) The person claiming the exemption must be:

(i) Sixty-one years of age or older on December 31st of the year in which the exemption claim is filed, or must have been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason of disability; or

(ii) A veteran of the armed forces of the United States entitled to and receiving compensation from the United States department of veterans affairs at a total disability rating for a service-connected disability.

(b) However, any surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of a person who was receiving an exemption at the time of the person's death will qualify if the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements of this section;

(4) The amount that the person is exempt from an obligation to pay is calculated on the basis of combined disposable income, as defined in RCW 84.36.383. If the person claiming the exemption was retired for two months or more of the assessment year, the combined disposable income of such person must be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of such person during the months such person was retired by twelve. If the income of the person claiming exemption is reduced for two or more months of the assessment year by reason of the death of the person's spouse or the person's domestic partner, or when other substantial changes occur in disposable income that are likely to continue for an indefinite period of time, the combined disposable income of such person must be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of such person after such occurrences by twelve. If it is necessary to estimate income to comply with this subsection, the assessor may require confirming documentation of such income prior to May 31 of the year following application;

(5)(a) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income ((of forty thousand dollars or less)) equal to or less than income threshold 3 is exempt from all excess property taxes; and

(b)(i) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income ((of thirty-five thousand dollars or less but greater than thirty thousand dollars)) equal to or less than income threshold 2 but greater than income threshold 1 is exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater of fifty thousand dollars or thirty-five percent of the valuation of his or her residence, but not to exceed seventy thousand dollars of the valuation of his or her residence; or

(ii) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income ((of thirty thousand dollars or less)) equal to or less than income threshold 1 is exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater of sixty thousand dollars or sixty percent of the valuation of his or her residence;

(6)(a) For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income ((of forty thousand dollars or less)) equal to or less than income threshold 3, the valuation of the residence is the assessed value of the residence on the later of January 1, 1995, or January 1st of the assessment year the person first qualifies under this section. If the person subsequently fails to qualify under this section only for one year because of high income, this same valuation must be used upon requalification. If the person fails to qualify for more than one year in succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any other reason, the valuation upon requalification is the assessed value on January 1st of the assessment year in which the person requalifies. If the person transfers the exemption under this section to a different residence, the valuation of the different residence is the assessed value of the different residence on January 1st of the assessment year in which the person transfers the exemption.

(b) In no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater than the true and fair value of the residence on January 1st of the assessment year.

(c) This subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to the property in the year in which the improvements are made. Subsequent improvements to the property must be added to the value otherwise determined under this subsection at their true and fair value in the year in which they are made.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.36.383 and 2012 c 10 s 74 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:

(1) The term "residence" means a single-family dwelling unit whether such unit be separate or part of a multiunit dwelling, including the land on which such dwelling stands not to exceed one acre, except that a residence includes any additional property up to a total of five acres that comprises the residential parcel if this larger parcel size is required under land use regulations. The term also includes a share ownership in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership if the person claiming exemption can establish that his or her share represents the specific unit or portion of such structure in which he or she resides. The term also includes a single-family dwelling situated upon lands the fee of which is vested in the United States or any instrumentality thereof including an Indian tribe or in the state of Washington, and notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a residence is deemed real property.

(2) The term "real property" also includes a mobile home which has substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile home and placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe, connections with sewer, water, or other utilities. A mobile home located on land leased by the owner of the mobile home is subject, for tax billing, payment, and collection purposes, only to the personal property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.

(3) "Department" means the state department of revenue.

(4) "Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the person claiming the exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her spouse or domestic partner, and the disposable income of each cotenant occupying the residence for the assessment year, less amounts paid by the person claiming the exemption or his or her spouse or domestic partner during the assessment year for:

(a) Drugs supplied by prescription of a medical practitioner authorized by the laws of this state or another jurisdiction to issue prescriptions;

(b) The treatment or care of either person received in the home or in a nursing home, assisted living facility, or adult family home; and

(c) Health care insurance premiums for medicare under Title XVIII of the social security act.

(5) "Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in the federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989, or such subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose of this section, plus all of the following items to the extent they are not included in or have been deducted from adjusted gross income:

(a) Capital gains, other than gain excluded from income under section 121 of the federal internal revenue code to the extent it is reinvested in a new principal residence;

(b) Amounts deducted for loss;

(c) Amounts deducted for depreciation;

(d) Pension and annuity receipts;

(e) Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(f) Veterans benefits, other than:

(i) Attendant-care payments;

(ii) Medical-aid payments;

(iii) Disability compensation, as defined in Title 38, part 3, section 3.4 of the code of federal regulations, as of January 1, 2008; and

(iv) Dependency and indemnity compensation, as defined in Title 38, part 3, section 3.5 of the code of federal regulations, as of January 1, 2008;

(g) Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;

(h) Dividend receipts; and

(i) Interest received on state and municipal bonds.

(6) "Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming the exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.

(7) "Disability" has the same meaning as provided in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 423(d)(1)(A) as amended prior to January 1, 2005, or such subsequent date as the department may provide by rule consistent with the purpose of this section.

(8) "Income threshold 1" means a combined disposable income equal to thirty thousand dollars or less, annually adjusted for inflation beginning in calendar year 2017, as provided in RCW 84.36.385(7).

(9) "Income threshold 2" means a combined disposable income of thirty-five thousand dollars or less but greater than thirty thousand dollars, annually adjusted for inflation beginning in calendar year 2017, as provided in RCW 84.36.385(7).

(10) "Income threshold 3" means a combined disposable income of forty thousand dollars but less than thirty-five thousand dollars, annually adjusted for inflation beginning in calendar year 2017, as provided in RCW 84.36.385(7).

(11) "Consumer price index" means the consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U) as published by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.

Sec. 4. RCW 84.36.385 and 2011 c 174 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A claim for exemption under RCW 84.36.381 as now or hereafter amended, may be made and filed at any time during the year for exemption from taxes payable the following year and thereafter and solely upon forms as prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue. However, an exemption from tax under RCW 84.36.381 continues for no more than six years unless a renewal application is filed as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) A person granted an exemption under RCW 84.36.381 must inform the county assessor of any change in status affecting the person's entitlement to the exemption on forms prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.

(3) Each person exempt from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 in 1993 and thereafter((,)) must file with the county assessor a renewal application not later than December 31 of the year the assessor notifies such person of the requirement to file the renewal application. Renewal applications must be on forms prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.

(4) At least once every six years, the county assessor must notify those persons receiving an exemption from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 of the requirement to file a renewal application. The county assessor may also require a renewal application following an amendment of the income requirements set forth in RCW 84.36.381.

(5) If the assessor finds that the applicant does not meet the qualifications as set forth in RCW 84.36.381, as now or hereafter amended, the claim or exemption must be denied but such denial is subject to appeal under the provisions of RCW 84.48.010 and in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. If the applicant had received exemption in prior years based on erroneous information, the taxes must be collected subject to penalties as provided in RCW 84.40.130 for a period of not to exceed five years.

(6) The department and each local assessor is hereby directed to publicize the qualifications and manner of making claims under RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, through communications media, including such paid advertisements or notices as it deems appropriate. Notice of the qualifications, method of making applications, the penalties for not reporting a change in status, and availability of further information must be included on or with property tax statements and revaluation notices for all residential property including mobile homes, except rental properties.

(7) The department must annually publish updated income thresholds by January 1st of each year. The department must adjust income threshold 1, income threshold 2, and income threshold 3, to reflect the increase in the unadjusted consumer price index over the twelve-month period ending in September of the previous calendar year. The adjusted income thresholds apply for the applications submitted in the current calendar years. The adjusted thresholds must be rounded to the nearest one dollar. If the change in the consumer price index is less than one, the income threshold for the current year continues to apply.

Sec. 5. RCW 84.38.020 and 2006 c 62 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall have the following meanings:)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Claimant" means a person who either elects or is required under RCW 84.64.050 to defer payment of the special assessments and/or real property taxes accrued on the claimant's residence by filing a declaration to defer as provided by this chapter.

When two or more individuals of a household file or seek to file a declaration to defer, they may determine between them as to who the claimant shall be.

(2) "Department" means the state department of revenue.

(3) "Equity value" means the amount by which the fair market value of a residence as determined from the records of the county assessor exceeds the total amount of any liens or other obligations against the property.

(4) "Income threshold" means a combined disposable income of forty-five thousand dollars or less, annually adjusted for inflation beginning in calendar year 2017, as provided in RCW 84.36.385(7).

(5) "Local government" means any city, town, county, water-sewer district, public utility district, port district, irrigation district, flood control district, or any other municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other political subdivision authorized to levy special assessments.

(((5))) (6) "Real property taxes" means ad valorem property taxes levied on a residence in this state in the preceding calendar year.

(((6))) (7) "Residence" has the meaning given in RCW 84.36.383.

(((7))) (8) "Special assessment" means the charge or obligation imposed by a local government upon property specially benefited.

Sec. 6. RCW 84.38.030 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 30 s 3 and 2015 c 86 s 313 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

A claimant may defer payment of special assessments and/or real property taxes on up to eighty percent of the amount of the claimant's equity value in the claimant's residence if the following conditions are met:

(1) The claimant must meet all requirements for an exemption for the residence under RCW 84.36.381, other than the age and income limits under RCW 84.36.381.

(2) The claimant must be sixty years of age or older on December 31st of the year in which the deferral claim is filed, or must have been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason of disability as defined in RCW 84.36.383. However, any surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of a person who was receiving a deferral at the time of the person's death qualifies if the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements of this section.

(3) The claimant must have a combined disposable income, as defined in RCW 84.36.383, ((of forty-five thousand dollars or less)) less than or equal to the income threshold.

(4) The claimant must have owned, at the time of filing, the residence on which the special assessment and/or real property taxes have been imposed. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by a marital community, owned by domestic partners, or owned by cotenants is deemed to be owned by each spouse, each domestic partner, or each cotenant. A claimant who has only a share ownership in cooperative housing, a life estate, a lease for life, or a revocable trust does not satisfy the ownership requirement.

(5) The claimant must have and keep in force fire and casualty insurance in sufficient amount to protect the interest of the state in the claimant's equity value. However, if the claimant fails to keep fire and casualty insurance in force to the extent of the state's interest in the claimant's equity value, the amount deferred may not exceed one hundred percent of the claimant's equity value in the land or lot only.

(6) In the case of special assessment deferral, the claimant must have opted for payment of such special assessments on the installment method if such method was available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 84.38 RCW to read as follows:

The department must annually update the income threshold, following the requirements defined in RCW 84.36.385(7).

Sec. 8. RCW 84.39.010 and 2015 c 86 s 314 are each amended to read as follows:

A person is entitled to a property tax exemption in the form of a grant as provided in this chapter. The person is entitled to assistance for the payment of all or a portion of the amount of excess and regular real property taxes imposed on the person's residence in the year in which a claim is filed in accordance with the following:

(1) The claimant must meet all requirements for an exemption for the residence under RCW 84.36.381, other than the income limits under RCW 84.36.381.

(2)(a) The person making the claim must be:

(i) Sixty-two years of age or older on December 31st of the year in which the claim is filed, or must have been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason of disability; and

(ii) A widow or widower of a veteran who:

(A) Died as a result of a service-connected disability;

(B) Was rated as one hundred percent disabled by the United States veterans' administration for the ten years prior to his or her death;

(C) Was a former prisoner of war as substantiated by the United States veterans' administration and was rated as one hundred percent disabled by the United States veterans' administration for one or more years prior to his or her death; or

(D) Died on active duty or in active training status as a member of the United States uniformed services, reserves, or national guard; and

(b) The person making the claim must not have remarried.

(3) The claimant must have a combined disposable income ((of forty thousand dollars or less)) equal to or less than income threshold 3.

(4) The claimant must have owned, at the time of filing, the residence on which the real property taxes have been imposed. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by cotenants is deemed to be owned by each cotenant. A claimant who has only a share ownership in cooperative housing, a life estate, a lease for life, or a revocable trust does not satisfy the ownership requirement.

(5) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section is entitled to assistance in an amount equal to regular and excess property taxes imposed on the difference between the value of the residence eligible for exemption under RCW 84.36.381(5) and:

(a) The first one hundred thousand dollars of assessed value of the residence for a person who has a combined disposable income ((of thirty thousand dollars or less)) equal to or less than income threshold 1;

(b) The first seventy-five thousand dollars of assessed value of the residence for a person who has a combined disposable income ((of thirty-five thousand dollars or less but greater than thirty thousand dollars)) equal to or less than income threshold 2 but greater than income threshold 1; or

(c) The first fifty thousand dollars of assessed value of the residence for a person who has a combined disposable income ((of forty thousand dollars or less but greater than thirty-five thousand dollars.

(6) As used in this section:

(a))) equal to or less than income threshold 3 but greater than income threshold 2.

(6) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Income threshold 1" means a combined disposable income equal to thirty thousand dollars or less, annually adjusted for inflation beginning in calendar year 2017, as provided in RCW 84.36.385(7).

(b) "Income threshold 2" means a combined disposable income of thirty-five thousand dollars or less but greater than thirty thousand dollars, annually adjusted for inflation beginning in calendar year 2017, as provided in RCW 84.36.385(7).

(c) "Income threshold 3" means a combined disposable income of forty thousand dollars or less but greater than thirty-five thousand dollars, annually adjusted for inflation beginning in calendar year 2017, as provided in RCW 84.36.385(7).

(d) "Veteran" has the same meaning as provided under RCW 41.04.005.

(((b))) (e) The meanings attributed in RCW 84.36.383 to the terms "residence," "combined disposable income," "disposable income," and "disability" apply equally to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 84.39 RCW to read as follows:

The department must annually update income threshold 1, income threshold 2, and income threshold 3, following the requirements defined in RCW 84.36.385(7).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. This act is not subject to the expiration date requirements defined in RCW 82.32.805.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. This act applies to the taxes levied for collection in 2017 and thereafter.

--- END ---