BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Additive TBBPA" means the chemical tetrabromobisphenol A, chemical abstracts service number 79-94-7, as of the effective date of this section, in a form that has not undergone a reactive process and is not covalently bonded to a polymer in a product or product component.

(2) "Children's product" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.240.010.

(3) "Decabromodiphenyl ether" means the chemical decabromodiphenyl ether, chemical abstracts service number 1163-19-5, as of the effective date of this section.

(4) "HBCD" means the chemical hexabromocyclododecane, chemical abstracts service number 25637-99-4, as of the effective date of this section.

(5) "IPTPP" means the chemical isopropylated triphenyl phosphate, chemical abstracts service number 68937-41-7, as of the effective date of this section.

(6) "Manufacturer" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.240.010 and also includes a manufacturer of residential upholstered furniture.

(7) "Residential upholstered furniture" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.76.010.

(8) "TBB" means the chemical (2-ethylhexyl)-2,3,4,5-tetrabromobenzoate, chemical abstracts service number 183658-27-7, as of the effective date of this section.

(9) "TBPH" means the chemical bis (2-ethylhexyl)-2,3,4,5- tetrabromophthalate, chemical abstracts service number 26040-51-7, as of the effective date of this section.

(10) "TCEP" means the chemical (tris (2-chloroethyl) phosphate), chemical abstracts service number 115-96-8, as of the effective date of this section.

(11) "TCPP" means tris (1-20chloro-2-propyl) phosphate, the chemical abstracts service number 13674-84-5, as of the effective date of this section.

(12) "TDCPP" means the chemical (tris (1,3-dichloro-2-propyl) phosphate), chemical abstracts service number 13674-87-8, as of the effective date of this section.

(13) "TPP" means the chemical triphenyl phosphate, chemical abstracts service number 115-86-6, as of the effective date of this section.

(14) "V6" means the chemical bis(chloromethyl)propane-1,3-diyltetrakis (2-chloroethyl) bisphosphate, chemical abstracts service number 385051-10-4, as of the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Beginning July 1, 2017, no manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use in this state children's products or residential upholstered furniture containing any of the following flame retardants in amounts greater than one thousand parts per million in any product component:

(1) TDCPP;

(2) TCEP;

(3) Decabromodiphenyl ether;

(4) HBCD; or

(5) Additive TBBPA.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) By rule, the secretary of the department of health may prohibit the manufacture, sale, distribution for sale, or distribution for use in this state of residential upholstered furniture or children's products containing any of the following chemicals used as a flame retardant in any product component in amounts greater than one thousand parts per million:

(a) IPTPP;

(b) TBB;

(c) TBPH;

(d) TCPP;

(e) TPP; and

(f) V6.

(2) The department of health must create an external advisory committee for the rule development under subsection (1) of this section to provide early stakeholder input, expertise, and additional information. All advisory meetings must be open to the public. The advisory committee membership must include, but not be limited to, representatives from: Large and small business sectors; community, environmental, and public health advocacy groups; local governments; affected and interested businesses; groups representing firefighters; and public health agencies. State agencies and technical experts may be requested to participate.

(3) After January 1, 2016, a rule that restricts a flame retardant under subsection (1) of this section must be adopted prior to December 1st of any year and the restrictions under subsection (1) of this section do not take effect before the end of the regular legislative session in the next year.

(4) Before the secretary of the department of health may adopt a rule to restrict a flame retardant, the department of health must submit a report to the legislature no later than at the time of publication of the notice of a rule-making hearing required under RCW 34.05.320. The report to the legislature must contain:

(a) A determination by the department of health as to whether children or vulnerable populations are likely to be exposed to the chemical directly or indirectly from its use in products. The determination of the department of health must be made after an evaluation of available information on:

(i) Chemical name, properties, manufacturers, and production volumes;

(ii) Levels of the flame retardants in consumer products;

(iii) Migration of the flame retardants out of products during and after use; and

(iv) Levels of the flame retardants in humans and the environment, including but not limited to the home environment;

(b) A review of available toxicity data to evaluate the health concerns for children or vulnerable populations; and

(c) A determination of whether a safer alternative has been identified to meet applicable fire safety standards for residential furniture and children's products by evaluating existing chemical action plans and assessments of safer alternatives that have been completed for flame retardant chemicals.

(5) The department of health must identify the sources of information it relied upon in making the determination required in subsection (4) of this section, including peer-reviewed science.

(6) Violations of rules adopted pursuant to this chapter are subject to the penalties provided in RCW 70.240.050.

(7) The department of health may adopt rules as necessary for the purpose of implementing, administering, and enforcing this chapter.

(8) This section expires July 1, 2022.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.240.050 and 2008 c 288 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A manufacturer of products that are restricted under this chapter or chapter 70.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 5 of this act) must notify persons that sell the manufacturer's products in this state about the provisions of this chapter no less than ninety days prior to the effective date of the restrictions.

(2) A manufacturer that produces, sells, or distributes a product prohibited from manufacture, sale, or distribution in this state under this chapter or chapter 70.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 5 of this act) shall recall the product and reimburse the retailer or any other purchaser for the product.

(3) A manufacturer of ((children's)) products in violation of this chapter or chapter 70.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 5 of this act) is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars for each violation in the case of a first offense. Manufacturers who are repeat violators are subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each repeat offense. Penalties collected under this section must be deposited in the state toxics control account created in RCW 70.l05D.070.

(4) Retailers who unknowingly sell products that are restricted from sale under this chapter or chapter 70.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 5 of this act) are not liable under this chapter.

(5) The sale or purchase of any previously owned products containing a chemical restricted under this chapter or chapter 70.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 5 of this act) made in casual or isolated sales as defined in RCW 82.04.040, or by a nonprofit organization, is exempt from this chapter and chapter 70.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 5 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---