BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.20.100 and 2006 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governance of the University of Washington shall be vested in a board of regents to consist of ten members, one of whom shall be the immediate past chair of the University of Washington faculty senate and one of whom shall be a student. The governor shall select the student member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by the governing body of the associated students. ((They)) Except for the immediate past chair of the University of Washington faculty senate member, the other members shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, and, except for the student member, shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of October and until their successors shall be appointed and qualified. The student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from the first day of July until the first day of July of the following year or until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good standing at the university at the time of appointment.

(2) Six members of said board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In the case of a vacancy, or when an appointment is made after the date of the expiration of a term, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the regent whose office has become vacant or expired.

(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of September in any one year.

(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.

--- END ---