BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A joint legislative task force on jail standards is established, with members as provided in this subsection.

(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(c) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives jointly shall appoint twelve members representing the interests of: Prosecutors; defense attorneys; law enforcement; counties; cities; judicial administration; superior courts; district and municipal courts; a state designated protection and advocacy agency; medical and mental health service providers; and other entities involved with or interested in the operation of local jails.

(2) The legislative membership shall convene the initial meeting of the task force. The task force shall choose its chair from among its legislative membership.

(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate committee services and the house office of program research.

(4) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(5) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(6) The task force shall review the following issues:

(a) The adequacy of standards adopted and used by jails including, but not limited to, standards for conditions and operations, inspections, enforcement, and oversight;

(b) The current process used by cities and counties to develop standards;

(c) The general condition of jails including, but not limited to, safety and physical conditions, health and welfare, and activities and programming, and whether those conditions meet adopted standards;

(d) Inmates' access or lack thereof to medical, mental health, and substance abuse treatment in jails;

(e) The impact of fluctuating jail populations on jail conditions;

(f) The impact of fluctuating jail costs on jail conditions;

(g) The impact, if any, of competition between jails on jail conditions;

(h) Whether statewide jail standards, oversight, or other policy changes are necessary to ensure jail conditions meet constitutional standards and include adequate safety and welfare safeguards for incarcerated persons; and

(i) Other issues the task force deems relevant to the conditions of jails.

(7) The task force shall consult with organizations and entities with interest or experience in jail standards and operations including, but not limited to, treatment providers, victims' advocates, inmate advocates, organizations representing jail employees and officers, and other community organizations.

(8) The task force shall report findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018.

(9) This section expires July 1, 2019.

--- END ---