BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17A.245 and 2011 c 145 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each candidate or political committee ((that expended five thousand dollars or more in the preceding year or expects to expend five thousand dollars or more in the current year)) shall file all contribution reports and expenditure reports required by this chapter by the electronic alternative provided by the commission under RCW 42.17A.055. ((The commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis for candidates whose authorized committees lack the technological ability to file reports using the electronic alternative provided by the commission.))

(2) Each treasurer of a surplus funds account shall file all expenditure reports required by this chapter by the electronic alternative provided by the commission under RCW 42.17A.055.

(3) Beginning June 30, 2016, each candidate and political committee shall file all statements of organization required by this chapter by the electronic alternative provided by the commission.

(4) The commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis, for a person who demonstrates the technological inability to file reports using the electronic means provided or approved by the commission.

(5) Failure ((by a candidate or political committee)) to comply with this section is a violation of this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.17A.260 and 2010 c 204 s 413 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The sponsor of political advertising who, within twenty-one days of an election, publishes, mails, or otherwise presents to the public political advertising supporting or opposing a candidate or ballot proposition that qualifies as an independent expenditure with a fair market value of one thousand dollars or more shall ((deliver)) file, ((either)) electronically ((or in written form)), a special report to the commission within twenty-four hours of, or on the first working day after, the date the political advertising is first published, mailed, or otherwise presented to the public.

(2) If a sponsor is required to file a special report under this section, the sponsor shall also ((deliver to the commission)), within the delivery period established in subsection (1) of this section, file a special report for each subsequent independent expenditure of any size supporting or opposing the same candidate who was the subject of the previous independent expenditure, supporting or opposing that candidate's opponent, or supporting or opposing the same ballot proposition that was the subject of the previous independent expenditure.

(3) The special report must include:

(a) The name and address of the person making the expenditure;

(b) The name and address of the person to whom the expenditure was made;

(c) A detailed description of the expenditure;

(d) The date the expenditure was made and the date the political advertising was first published or otherwise presented to the public;

(e) The amount of the expenditure;

(f) The name of the candidate supported or opposed by the expenditure, the office being sought by the candidate, and whether the expenditure supports or opposes the candidate; or the name of the ballot proposition supported or opposed by the expenditure and whether the expenditure supports or opposes the ballot proposition; and

(g) Any other information the commission may require by rule.

(4) All persons required to report under RCW 42.17A.225, 42.17A.235, 42.17A.240, 42.17A.255, and 42.17A.305 are subject to the requirements of this section. The commission may determine that reports filed pursuant to this section also satisfy the requirements of RCW 42.17A.255.

(5) The sponsor of independent expenditures supporting a candidate or opposing that candidate's opponent required to report under this section shall file with each required report an affidavit or declaration of the person responsible for making the independent expenditure that the expenditure was not made in cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, the candidate, the candidate's authorized committee, or the candidate's agent, or with the encouragement or approval of the candidate, the candidate's authorized committee, or the candidate's agent.

Sec. 3. RCW 42.17A.055 and 2013 c 166 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall make available to candidates, public officials, and political committees that are required to file reports under this chapter an electronic filing alternative for submitting financial affairs reports, contribution reports, and expenditure reports.

(2) The commission shall make available to lobbyists and lobbyists' employers required to file reports under RCW 42.17A.600, 42.17A.615, 42.17A.625, or 42.17A.630 an electronic filing alternative for submitting these reports.

(3) ((State)) Agencies required to report under RCW 42.17A.635 must file all reports electronically.

(4) The commission shall make available to candidates, public officials, political committees, lobbyists, and lobbyists' employers an electronic copy of the appropriate reporting forms at no charge.

Sec. 4. RCW 42.17A.255 and 2011 c 60 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of this section the term "independent expenditure" means any expenditure that is made in support of or in opposition to any candidate or ballot proposition and is not otherwise required to be reported pursuant to RCW 42.17A.220, 42.17A.235, and 42.17A.240. "Independent expenditure" does not include: An internal political communication primarily limited to the contributors to a political party organization or political action committee, or the officers, management staff, and stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or the members of a labor organization or other membership organization; or the rendering of personal services of the sort commonly performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services," for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the individual is not compensated by any person.

(2) Within five days after the date of making an independent expenditure that by itself or when added to all other such independent expenditures made during the same election campaign by the same person equals one hundred dollars or more, or within five days after the date of making an independent expenditure for which no reasonable estimate of monetary value is practicable, whichever occurs first, the person who made the independent expenditure shall file with the commission an initial report of all independent expenditures made during the campaign prior to and including such date.

(3) At the following intervals each person who is required to file an initial report pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall file with the commission a further report of the independent expenditures made since the date of the last report:

(a) On the twenty-first day and the seventh day preceding the date on which the election is held; and

(b) On the tenth day of the first month after the election; and

(c) On the tenth day of each month in which no other reports are required to be filed pursuant to this section. However, the further reports required by this subsection (3) shall only be filed if the reporting person has made an independent expenditure since the date of the last previous report filed.

The report filed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall be the final report, and upon submitting such final report the duties of the reporting person shall cease, and there shall be no obligation to make any further reports.

(4) All reports filed pursuant to this section shall be certified as correct by the reporting person.

(5) Each report required by subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall disclose for the period beginning at the end of the period for the last previous report filed or, in the case of an initial report, beginning at the time of the first independent expenditure, and ending not more than one business day before the date the report is due:

(a) The name and address of the person filing the report;

(b) The name and address of each person to whom an independent expenditure was made in the aggregate amount of more than fifty dollars, and the amount, date, and purpose of each such expenditure. If no reasonable estimate of the monetary value of a particular independent expenditure is practicable, it is sufficient to report instead a precise description of services, property, or rights furnished through the expenditure and where appropriate to attach a copy of the item produced or distributed by the expenditure;

(c) The total sum of all independent expenditures made during the campaign to date; and

(d) Such other information as shall be required by the commission by rule in conformance with the policies and purposes of this chapter.

(6) Independent expenditures must be reported electronically using software provided or approved by the commission. The commission may make exceptions, on a case-by-case basis, for a person who demonstrates the technological inability to file reports using the electronic means provided or approved by the commission.

Sec. 5. RCW 42.17A.265 and 2010 c 204 s 414 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Treasurers shall ((prepare and deliver to)) electronically file with the commission a special report when a contribution or aggregate of contributions totals one thousand dollars or more, is from a single person or entity, and is received during a special reporting period.

(b) Treasurers shall electronically file with the commission a special report when a contribution of twenty-five thousand dollars or more is received from a single entity outside of a special reporting period.

(2)(a) A political committee shall ((prepare and deliver to)) electronically file with the commission a special report when it makes a contribution or an aggregate of contributions to a single entity that totals one thousand dollars or more during a special reporting period.

(b) A political committee shall electronically file with the commission a special report when it makes a contribution of twenty-five thousand dollars or more outside of a special reporting period.

(3) An aggregate of contributions includes only those contributions made to or received from a single entity during any one special reporting period. Any subsequent contribution of any size made to or received from the same person or entity during the special reporting period must also be reported.

(4) Special reporting periods, for purposes of this section, include:

(a) ((The period beginning on the day after the last report required by RCW 42.17A.235 and 42.17A.240 to be filed before a primary and concluding on the end of the day before that primary;

(b))) The period twenty-one days preceding a primary election or general election; and

(((c))) (b) An aggregate of contributions includes only those contributions received from a single entity during any one special reporting period or made by the contributing political committee to a single entity during any one special reporting period.

(5) If a campaign treasurer files a special report under this section for one or more contributions received from a single entity during a special reporting period, the treasurer shall also file a special report under this section for each subsequent contribution of any size which is received from that entity during the special reporting period. If a political committee files a special report under this section for a contribution or contributions made to a single entity during a special reporting period, the political committee shall also file a special report for each subsequent contribution of any size which is made to that entity during the special reporting period.

(6) ((Special reports required by this section shall be delivered electronically or in written form, including but not limited to mailgram, telegram, or nightletter. The special report may be transmitted orally by telephone to the commission if the written form of the report is postmarked and mailed to the commission or the electronic filing is transferred to the commission within the delivery periods established in (a) and (b) of this subsection.))

(a) The special report required of a contribution recipient under subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be ((delivered to)) electronically filed with the commission within forty-eight hours of the time, or on the first working day after: The contribution of one thousand dollars or more is received by the candidate or treasurer; the aggregate received by the candidate or treasurer first equals one thousand dollars or more; or any subsequent contribution from the same source is received by the candidate or treasurer.

(b) The special report required of a contributor under subsection (2)(a) of this section or RCW 42.17A.625 shall be ((delivered to)) electronically filed with the commission, and the candidate or political committee to whom the contribution or contributions are made, within twenty-four hours of the time, or on the first working day after: The contribution is made; the aggregate of contributions made first equals one thousand dollars or more; or any subsequent contribution to the same person or entity is made.

(7) The special report shall include:

(a) The amount of the contribution or contributions;

(b) The date or dates of receipt;

(c) The name and address of the donor;

(d) The name and address of the recipient; and

(e) Any other information the commission may by rule require.

(8) Contributions reported under this section shall also be reported as required by other provisions of this chapter.

(9) ((The commission shall prepare daily a summary of the special reports made under this section and RCW 42.17A.625.

(10))) Contributions governed by this section include, but are not limited to, contributions made or received indirectly through a third party or entity whether the contributions are or are not reported to the commission as earmarked contributions under RCW 42.17A.270.

Sec. 6. RCW 42.17A.600 and 2010 c 204 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before lobbying, or within thirty days after being employed as a lobbyist, whichever occurs first, a lobbyist shall register by filing with the commission a lobbyist registration statement, in such detail as the commission shall prescribe, that includes the following information:

(a) The lobbyist's name, permanent business address, and any temporary residential and business addresses in Thurston county during the legislative session;

(b) The name, address and occupation or business of the lobbyist's employer;

(c) The duration of the lobbyist's employment;

(d) The compensation to be received for lobbying, the amount to be paid for expenses, and what expenses are to be reimbursed;

(e) Whether the lobbyist is employed solely as a lobbyist or whether the lobbyist is a regular employee performing services for his or her employer which include but are not limited to the influencing of legislation;

(f) The general subject or subjects to be lobbied;

(g) A written authorization from each of the lobbyist's employers confirming such employment;

(h) The name and address of the person who will have custody of the accounts, bills, receipts, books, papers, and documents required to be kept under this chapter;

(i) If the lobbyist's employer is an entity (including, but not limited to, business and trade associations) whose members include, or which as a representative entity undertakes lobbying activities for, businesses, groups, associations, or organizations, the name and address of each member of such entity or person represented by such entity whose fees, dues, payments, or other consideration paid to such entity during either of the prior two years have exceeded five hundred dollars or who is obligated to or has agreed to pay fees, dues, payments, or other consideration exceeding five hundred dollars to such entity during the current year.

(2) Any lobbyist who receives or is to receive compensation from more than one person for lobbying shall file a separate notice of representation for each person. However, if two or more persons are jointly paying or contributing to the payment of the lobbyist, the lobbyist may file a single statement detailing the name, business address, and occupation of each person paying or contributing and the respective amounts to be paid or contributed.

(3) Whenever a change, modification, or termination of the lobbyist's employment occurs, the lobbyist shall file with the commission an amended registration statement within one week of the change, modification, or termination.

(4) Each registered lobbyist shall file a new registration statement, revised as appropriate, on the second Monday in January of each odd-numbered year. Failure to do so terminates the lobbyist's registration.

(5) Beginning January 1, 2017, each lobbyist shall file all registration statements by the electronic alternative provided by the commission.

Sec. 7. RCW 42.17A.615 and 2010 c 204 s 804 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any lobbyist registered under RCW 42.17A.600 and any person who lobbies shall file with the commission monthly reports of his or her lobbying activities. The reports shall be made in the form and manner prescribed by the commission and must be signed by the lobbyist. The monthly report shall be filed within fifteen days after the last day of the calendar month covered by the report.

(2) The monthly report shall contain:

(a) The totals of all expenditures for lobbying activities made or incurred by the lobbyist or on behalf of the lobbyist by the lobbyist's employer during the period covered by the report. Expenditure totals for lobbying activities shall be segregated according to financial category, including compensation; food and refreshments; living accommodations; advertising; travel; contributions; and other expenses or services. Each individual expenditure of more than twenty-five dollars for entertainment shall be identified by date, place, amount, and the names of all persons taking part in the entertainment, along with the dollar amount attributable to each person, including the lobbyist's portion.

(b) In the case of a lobbyist employed by more than one employer, the proportionate amount of expenditures in each category incurred on behalf of each of the lobbyist's employers.

(c) An itemized listing of each contribution of money or of tangible or intangible personal property, whether contributed by the lobbyist personally or delivered or transmitted by the lobbyist, to any candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition, or for or on behalf of any candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition. All contributions made to, or for the benefit of, any candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition shall be identified by date, amount, and the name of the candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition receiving, or to be benefited by each such contribution.

(d) The subject matter of proposed legislation or other legislative activity or rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW, the state administrative procedure act, and the state agency considering the same, which the lobbyist has been engaged in supporting or opposing during the reporting period, unless exempt under RCW 42.17A.610(2).

(e) A listing of each payment for an item specified in RCW 42.52.150(5) in excess of fifty dollars and each item specified in RCW 42.52.010(((10))) (9) (d) and (f) made to a state elected official, state officer, or state employee. Each item shall be identified by recipient, date, and approximate value of the item.

(f) The total expenditures paid or incurred during the reporting period by the lobbyist for lobbying purposes, whether through or on behalf of a lobbyist or otherwise, for (i) political advertising as defined in RCW 42.17A.005; and (ii) public relations, telemarketing, polling, or similar activities if the activities, directly or indirectly, are intended, designed, or calculated to influence legislation or the adoption or rejection of a rule, standard, or rate by an agency under the administrative procedure act. The report shall specify the amount, the person to whom the amount was paid, and a brief description of the activity.

(3) Lobbyists are not required to report the following:

(a) Unreimbursed personal living and travel expenses not incurred directly for lobbying;

(b) Any expenses incurred for his or her own living accommodations;

(c) Any expenses incurred for his or her own travel to and from hearings of the legislature;

(d) Any expenses incurred for telephone, and any office expenses, including rent and salaries and wages paid for staff and secretarial assistance.

(4) The commission may adopt rules to vary the content of lobbyist reports to address specific circumstances, consistent with this section. Lobbyist reports are subject to audit by the commission.

(5) Beginning January 1, 2017, each lobbyist shall file the monthly report by the electronic alternative provided by the commission.

Sec. 8. RCW 42.17A.630 and 2010 c 204 s 807 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every employer of a lobbyist registered under this chapter during the preceding calendar year and every person other than an individual that made contributions aggregating to more than sixteen thousand dollars or independent expenditures aggregating to more than eight hundred dollars during the preceding calendar year shall file with the commission on or before the last day of February of each year a statement disclosing for the preceding calendar year the following information:

(a) The name of each state elected official and the name of each candidate for state office who was elected to the office and any member of the immediate family of those persons to whom the person reporting has paid any compensation in the amount of eight hundred dollars or more during the preceding calendar year for personal employment or professional services, including professional services rendered by a corporation, partnership, joint venture, association, union, or other entity in which the person holds any office, directorship, or any general partnership interest, or an ownership interest of ten percent or more, the value of the compensation in accordance with the reporting provisions set out in RCW 42.17A.710(2), and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation.

(b) The name of each state elected official, successful candidate for state office, or members of his or her immediate family to whom the person reporting made expenditures, directly or indirectly, either through a lobbyist or otherwise, the amount of the expenditures and the purpose for the expenditures. For the purposes of this subsection, "expenditure" shall not include any expenditure made by the employer in the ordinary course of business if the expenditure is not made for the purpose of influencing, honoring, or benefiting the elected official, successful candidate, or member of his immediate family, as an elected official or candidate.

(c) The total expenditures made by the person reporting for lobbying purposes, whether through or on behalf of a registered lobbyist or otherwise.

(d) All contributions made to a political committee supporting or opposing a candidate for state office, or to a political committee supporting or opposing a statewide ballot proposition. Such contributions shall be identified by the name and the address of the recipient and the aggregate amount contributed to each such recipient.

(e) The name and address of each registered lobbyist employed by the person reporting and the total expenditures made by the person reporting for each lobbyist for lobbying purposes.

(f) The names, offices sought, and party affiliations of candidates for state offices supported or opposed by independent expenditures of the person reporting and the amount of each such expenditure.

(g) The identifying proposition number and a brief description of any statewide ballot proposition supported or opposed by expenditures not reported under (d) of this subsection and the amount of each such expenditure.

(h) Any other information the commission prescribes by rule.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, an employer of a lobbyist registered under this chapter shall file a special report with the commission if the employer makes a contribution or contributions aggregating more than one hundred dollars in a calendar month to any one of the following: A candidate, elected official, officer or employee of an agency, or political committee. The report shall identify the date and amount of each such contribution and the name of the candidate, elected official, agency officer or employee, or political committee receiving the contribution or to be benefited by the contribution. The report shall be filed on a form prescribed by the commission and shall be filed within fifteen days after the last day of the calendar month during which the contribution was made.

(b) The provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply to a contribution that is made through a registered lobbyist and reportable under RCW 42.17A.425.

(3) Beginning January 1, 2017, each employer of a lobbyist shall file reports using the electronic alternative provided by the commission.

Sec. 9. RCW 42.17A.700 and 2010 c 204 s 901 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After January 1st and before April 15th of each year, every elected official and every executive state officer shall file with the commission a statement of financial affairs for the preceding calendar year. However, any local elected official whose term of office ends on December 31st shall file the statement required to be filed by this section for the final year of his or her term.

(2) Within two weeks of becoming a candidate, every candidate shall file with the commission a statement of financial affairs for the preceding twelve months.

(3) Within two weeks of appointment, every person appointed to a vacancy in an elective office or executive state officer position shall file with the commission a statement of financial affairs for the preceding twelve months.

(4) A statement of a candidate or appointee filed during the period from January 1st to April 15th shall cover the period from January 1st of the preceding calendar year to the time of candidacy or appointment if the filing of the statement would relieve the individual of a prior obligation to file a statement covering the entire preceding calendar year.

(5) No individual may be required to file more than once in any calendar year.

(6) Each statement of financial affairs filed under this section shall be sworn as to its truth and accuracy.

(7) Every elected official and every executive state officer shall file with their statement of financial affairs a statement certifying that they have read and are familiar with RCW 42.17A.555 or 42.52.180, whichever is applicable.

(8) Beginning June 30, 2016, elected officials, executive state officers, appointees, and candidates shall file personal financial affairs statements by the electronic alternative provided by the commission. The commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis, for a person who demonstrates the technological inability to file reports using the electronic means provided or approved by the commission.

(9) For the purposes of this section, the term "executive state officer" includes those listed in RCW 42.17A.705.

(((9))) (10) This section does not apply to incumbents or candidates for a federal office or the office of precinct committee officer.

--- END ---