BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.08.0257 and 2014 c 140 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to ((auction)) sales made by or through auctioneers of personal property (including household goods) that has been used in conducting a farm activity, when the seller thereof is a farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213 ((and the sale is held or conducted upon a farm and not otherwise)). The exemption in this section does not apply to personal property used by the seller in the production of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.12.0258 and 2014 c 140 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of personal property (including household goods) that has been used in conducting a farm activity, if such property was purchased from a farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213 at ((an auction)) a sale held or conducted by an auctioneer ((upon a farm and not otherwise)). The exemption in this section does not apply to personal property used by the seller in the production of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act applies to the sale and use of personal property occurring on or after July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

--- END ---