BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The department of ecology shall contract with an eligible independent third party to update the October 2006 report to the state emergency response commission regarding statewide response to chemical, biological, radiological, nuclear, and explosive materials. The updated report must also include an update to appendix A of that report, which addresses the state's current hazardous materials response capabilities and that reviews the emergency response programs of other states. The contract for the updated report must give special emphasis to addressing recent changes to patterns of hazardous material transportation, including crude oil transportation, and the availability of resources to respond to incidents resulting from the transport of hazardous materials. The contract must require the updated report to be completed by June 30, 2017. This section expires June 30, 2019.

--- END ---