BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that as technology becomes more prevalent, students must learn how to thoughtfully, ethically, and responsibly use technology. The legislature intends to provide a process in which students, parents or guardians, teachers and other school employees, administrators, volunteers, and community representatives will engage in an ongoing discussion on safe technology use and digital citizenship.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.650 RCW to read as follows:

(1) As used in this section, "digital citizenship" means the norms of appropriate, responsible, and healthy behavior related to current technology use, including digital and media literacy, ethics, etiquette, and security. Digital citizenship includes the ability to access, analyze, evaluate, and interpret media.

(2)(a) By August 1, 2016, the Washington state school directors' association shall revise and distribute its model policy and procedure on electronic resources and internet safety to all school districts in the state.

(b) In revising its model policy and procedure, the Washington state school directors' association, with the assistance of the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall convene and consult with an advisory committee. The advisory committee must include experts in digital citizenship and media literacy along with other stakeholders, including parent associations, educators, and administrators.

(c) The model policy and procedure must address safe technology use and digital citizenship that empowers:

(i) A student to make smart media and online choices; and

(ii) A parent or guardian to know how to discuss safe technology use with the parent's or guardian's child.

(3) Beginning in the 2016-17 school year, each school district shall annually review and amend if necessary a policy and procedure that at a minimum incorporates the revised model policy and procedure provided under subsection (2) of this section. The policy and procedure must be reviewed or amended through a process that includes representation of students, parents or guardians, teachers and other school employees, administrators, volunteers, and community representatives.

(4) Each school district shall provide education that includes awareness of safe technology use, digital citizenship, and digital and media literacy.

--- END ---