BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.300.042 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 307 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the 2017-18 school year, and using the phase-in provided in subsection (2) of this section, the superintendent of public instruction must collect and school districts must submit all student-level data using the United States department of education 2007 race and ethnicity reporting guidelines, including the subracial and subethnic categories within those guidelines, with the following modifications:

(a) Further disaggregation of the Black category to differentiate students of African origin and students native to the United States with African ancestors;

(b) Further disaggregation of countries of origin for Asian students;

(c) Further disaggregation of the White category to include subethnic categories for Eastern European nationalities that have significant populations in Washington; and

(d) For students who report as multiracial, collection of their racial and ethnic combination of categories.

(2) Beginning with the 2017-18 school year, school districts shall collect student-level data as provided in subsection (1) of this section for all newly enrolled students, including transfer students. When the students enroll in a different school within the district, school districts shall resurvey the newly enrolled students for whom subracial and subethnic categories were not previously collected. School districts may resurvey other students.

(3) All student data-related reports required of the superintendent of public instruction in this title must be disaggregated by at least the following subgroups of students: White, Black, Hispanic, American Indian/Alaskan Native, Asian, Pacific Islander/Hawaiian Native, low income, transitional bilingual, migrant, special education, and students covered by section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794).

(((2))) (4) All student data-related reports ((required of)) prepared by the superintendent of public instruction regarding student suspensions and expulsions as required ((in RCW 28A.300.046)) under this title are subject to disaggregation by subgroups including:

(a) Gender;

(b) Foster care;

(c) Homeless, if known;

(d) School district;

(e) School;

(f) Grade level;

(g) Behavior infraction code, including:

(i) Bullying;

(ii) Tobacco;

(iii) Alcohol;

(iv) Illicit drug;

(v) Fighting without major injury;

(vi) Violence without major injury;

(vii) Violence with major injury;

(viii) Possession of a weapon; and

(ix) Other behavior resulting from a short-term or long-term suspension, expulsion, or interim alternative education setting intervention;

(h) Intervention applied, including:

(i) Short-term suspension;

(ii) Long-term suspension;

(iii) Emergency expulsion;

(iv) Expulsion;

(v) Interim alternative education settings;

(vi) No intervention applied; and

(vii) Other intervention applied that is not described in this subsection (((2))) (4)(h);

(i) Number of days a student is suspended or expelled, to be

counted in half or full days; and

(j) Any other categories added at a future date by the data governance group.

(((3))) (5) All student data-related reports required of the superintendent of public instruction regarding student suspensions and expulsions as required in RCW 28A.300.046 are subject to cross-tabulation at a minimum by the following:

(a) School and district;

(b) Race, low income, special education, transitional bilingual, migrant, foster care, homeless, students covered by section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), and categories to be added in the future;

(c) Behavior infraction code; and

(d) Intervention applied.

(6) The K-12 data governance group shall develop the data protocols and guidance for school districts in the collection of data as required under this section, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall modify the statewide student data system as needed. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall also incorporate training for school staff on best practices for collection of data on student race and ethnicity in other training or professional development related to data provided by the office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene a task force to review the United States department of education 2007 race and ethnicity reporting guidelines and develop race and ethnicity guidance for the state. The task force must include representatives from the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, the ethnic commissions, the governor's office of Indian affairs, and a diverse group of parents. The guidance must clarify for students and families why information about race and ethnicity is collected and how students and families can help school administrators properly identify them. The guidance must also describe the best practices for school administrators to use when identifying the race and ethnicity of students and families. The task force must use the United States census and the American community survey in the development of the guidance.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.300.505 and 2015 c 210 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop standards for school data systems that focus on validation and verification of data entered into the systems to ensure accuracy and compatibility of data. The standards shall address but are not limited to the following topics:

(a) Date validation;

(b) Code validation, which includes gender, race or ethnicity, and other code elements;

(c) Decimal and integer validation; and

(d) Required field validation as defined by state and federal requirements.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop a reporting format and instructions for school districts to collect and submit data that must include:

(a) Data on student demographics that is disaggregated ((by distinct ethnic categories within racial subgroups so that analyses may be conducted on student achievement using the disaggregated data)) as required by RCW 28A.300.042; and

(b) Starting no later than the 2016-17 school year, data on students from military families. The K-12 data governance group established in RCW 28A.300.507 must develop best practice guidelines for the collection and regular updating of this data on students from military families. Collection and updating of this data must use the United States department of education 2007 race and ethnicity reporting guidelines, including the subracial and subethnic categories within those guidelines, with the following modifications:

(i) Further disaggregation of the Black category to differentiate students of African origin and students native to the United States with African ancestors;

(ii) Further disaggregation of countries of origin for Asian students;

(iii) Further disaggregation of the White category to include subethnic categories for Eastern European nationalities that have significant populations in Washington; and

(iv) For students who report as multiracial, collection of their racial and ethnic combination of categories.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "students from military families" means the following categories of students, with data to be collected and submitted separately for each category:

(a) Students with a parent or guardian who is a member of the active duty United States armed forces; and

(b) Students with a parent or guardian who is a member of the reserves of the United States armed forces or a member of the Washington national guard.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) To increase the visibility of the opportunity gap in schools with small subgroups of students and to hold schools accountable to individual student-level support, by August 1, 2016, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in cooperation with the K-12 data governance group established within the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the education data center established within the office of financial management, and the state board of education, shall adopt a rule that the only student data that should not be reported for public reporting and accountability is data where the school or district has fewer than ten students in a grade level or student subgroup.

(2) This section expires August 1, 2017.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.300.507 and 2009 c 548 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A K-12 data governance group shall be established within the office of the superintendent of public instruction to assist in the design and implementation of a K-12 education data improvement system for financial, student, and educator data. It is the intent that the data system reporting specifically serve requirements for teachers, parents, superintendents, school boards, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the legislature, and the public.

(2) The K-12 data governance group shall include representatives of the education data center, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the professional educator standards board, the state board of education, and school district staff, including information technology staff. Additional entities with expertise in education data may be included in the K-12 data governance group.

(3) The K-12 data governance group shall:

(a) Identify the critical research and policy questions that need to be addressed by the K-12 education data improvement system;

(b) Identify reports and other information that should be made available on the internet in addition to the reports identified in subsection (5) of this section;

(c) Create a comprehensive needs requirement document detailing the specific information and technical capacity needed by school districts and the state to meet the legislature's expectations for a comprehensive K-12 education data improvement system as described under RCW 28A.655.210;

(d) Conduct a gap analysis of current and planned information compared to the needs requirement document, including an analysis of the strengths and limitations of an education data system and programs currently used by school districts and the state, and specifically the gap analysis must look at the extent to which the existing data can be transformed into canonical form and where existing software can be used to meet the needs requirement document;

(e) Focus on financial and cost data necessary to support the new K-12 financial models and funding formulas, including any necessary changes to school district budgeting and accounting, and on assuring the capacity to link data across financial, student, and educator systems; and

(f) Define the operating rules and governance structure for K-12 data collections, ensuring that data systems are flexible and able to adapt to evolving needs for information, within an objective and orderly data governance process for determining when changes are needed and how to implement them. Strong consideration must be made to the current practice and cost of migration to new requirements. The operating rules should delineate the coordination, delegation, and escalation authority for data collection issues, business rules, and performance goals for each K-12 data collection system, including:

(i) Defining and maintaining standards for privacy and confidentiality;

(ii) Setting data collection priorities;

(iii) Defining and updating a standard data dictionary;

(iv) Ensuring data compliance with the data dictionary;

(v) Ensuring data accuracy; and

(vi) Establishing minimum standards for school, student, financial, and teacher data systems. Data elements may be specified "to the extent feasible" or "to the extent available" to collect more and better data sets from districts with more flexible software. Nothing in RCW 43.41.400, this section, or RCW 28A.655.210 should be construed to require that a data dictionary or reporting should be hobbled to the lowest common set. The work of the K-12 data governance group must specify which data are desirable. Districts that can meet these requirements shall report the desirable data. Funding from the legislature must establish which subset data are absolutely required.

(4)(a) The K-12 data governance group shall provide updates on its work as requested by the education data center and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.

(b) The work of the K-12 data governance group shall be periodically reviewed and monitored by the educational data center and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.

(5) To the extent data is available, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make the following minimum reports available on the internet. The reports must either be run on demand against current data, or, if a static report, must have been run against the most recent data:

(a) The percentage of data compliance and data accuracy by school district;

(b) The magnitude of spending per student, by student estimated by the following algorithm and reported as the detailed summation of the following components:

(i) An approximate, prorated fraction of each teacher or human resource element that directly serves the student. Each human resource element must be listed or accessible through online tunneling in the report;

(ii) An approximate, prorated fraction of classroom or building costs used by the student;

(iii) An approximate, prorated fraction of transportation costs used by the student; and

(iv) An approximate, prorated fraction of all other resources within the district. District-wide components should be disaggregated to the extent that it is sensible and economical;

(c) The cost of K-12 basic education, per student, by student, by school district, estimated by the algorithm in (b) of this subsection, and reported in the same manner as required in (b) of this subsection;

(d) The cost of K-12 special education services per student, by student receiving those services, by school district, estimated by the algorithm in (b) of this subsection, and reported in the same manner as required in (b) of this subsection;

(e) Improvement on the statewide assessments computed as both a percentage change and absolute change on a scale score metric by district, by school, and by teacher that can also be filtered by a student's length of full-time enrollment within the school district;

(f) Number of K-12 students per classroom teacher on a per teacher basis;

(g) Number of K-12 classroom teachers per student on a per student basis;

(h) Percentage of a classroom teacher per student on a per student basis; ((and))

(i) Percentage of classroom teachers per school district and per school disaggregated as described in RCW 28A.300.042(1) for student-level data;

(j) Average length of service of classroom teachers per school district and per school disaggregated as described in RCW 28A.300.042(1) for student-level data; and

(k) The cost of K-12 education per student by school district sorted by federal, state, and local dollars.

(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a preliminary report to the legislature by November 15, 2009, including the analyses by the K-12 data governance group under subsection (3) of this section and preliminary options for addressing identified gaps. A final report, including a proposed phase-in plan and preliminary cost estimates for implementation of a comprehensive data improvement system for financial, student, and educator data shall be submitted to the legislature by September 1, 2010.

(7) All reports and data referenced in this section and RCW 43.41.400 and 28A.655.210 shall be made available in a manner consistent with the technical requirements of the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee and the education data center so that selected data can be provided to the legislature, governor, school districts, and the public.

(8) Reports shall contain data to the extent it is available. All reports must include documentation of which data are not available or are estimated. Reports must not be suppressed because of poor data accuracy or completeness. Reports may be accompanied with documentation to inform the reader of why some data are missing or inaccurate or estimated.

--- END ---