BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.44.041 and 1997 c 198 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no vehicle or combination of vehicles shall operate upon the public highways of this state with a gross load on any single axle in excess of twenty thousand pounds, or upon any group of axles in excess of that set forth in the following table, except that two consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry a gross load of thirty-four thousand pounds each, if the overall distance between the first and last axles of such consecutive sets of tandem axles is thirty-six feet or more.

Maximum load in pounds carried on any group of 2 or more consecutive axles

Distance in feet between the extremes of any group of 2 or more consecutive axles

2

3

4

5

6

7

8

9

axles

axles

axles

axles

axles

axles

axles

axles

4

34,000

5

34,000

6

34,000

7

34,000

8 & less

34,000

34,000

more than 8

38,000

42,000

9

39,000

42,500

10

40,000

43,500

11

44,000

12

45,000

50,000

13

45,500

50,500

14

46,500

51,500

15

47,000

52,000

16

48,000

52,500

58,000

17

48,500

53,500

58,500

18

49,500

54,000

59,000

19

50,000

54,500

60,000

20

51,000

55,500

60,500

66,000

21

51,500

56,000

61,000

66,500

22

52,500

56,500

61,500

67,000

23

53,000

57,500

62,500

68,000

24

54,000

58,000

63,000

68,500

74,000

25

54,500

58,500

63,500

69,000

74,500

26

55,500

59,500

64,000

69,500

75,000

27

56,000

60,000

65,000

70,000

75,500

28

57,000

60,500

65,500

71,000

76,500

82,000

29

57,500

61,500

66,000

71,500

77,000

82,500

30

58,500

62,000

66,500

72,000

77,500

83,000

31

59,000

62,500

67,500

72,500

78,000

83,500

32

60,000

63,500

68,000

73,000

78,500

84,500

90,000

33

64,000

68,500

74,000

79,000

85,000

90,500

34

64,500

69,000

74,500

80,000

85,500

91,000

35

65,500

70,000

75,000

80,500

86,000

91,500

36

66,000

70,500

75,500

81,000

86,500

92,000

37

66,500

71,000

76,000

81,500

87,000

93,000

38

67,500

71,500

77,000

82,000

87,500

93,500

39

68,000

72,500

77,500

82,500

88,500

94,000

40

68,500

73,000

78,000

83,500

89,000

94,500

41

69,500

73,500

78,500

84,000

89,500

95,000

42

70,000

74,000

79,000

84,500

90,000

95,500

43

70,500

75,000

80,000

85,000

90,500

96,000

44

71,500

75,500

80,500

85,500

91,000

96,500

45

72,000

76,000

81,000

86,000

91,500

97,500

46

72,500

76,500

81,500

87,000

92,500

98,000

47

73,500

77,500

82,000

87,500

93,000

98,500

48

74,000

78,000

83,000

88,000

93,500

99,000

49

74,500

78,500

83,500

88,500

94,000

99,500

50

75,500

79,000

84,000

89,000

94,500

100,000

51

76,000

80,000

84,500

89,500

95,000

100,500

52

76,500

80,500

85,000

90,500

95,500

101,000

53

77,500

81,000

86,000

91,000

96,500

102,000

54

78,000

81,500

86,500

91,500

97,000

102,500

55

78,500

82,500

87,000

92,000

97,500

103,000

56

79,500

83,000

87,500

92,500

98,000

103,500

57

80,000

83,500

88,000

93,000

98,500

104,000

58

84,000

89,000

94,000

99,000

104,500

59

85,000

89,500

94,500

99,500

105,500

60

85,500

90,000

95,000

100,500

105,500

61

86,000

90,500

95,500

101,000

105,500

62

86,500

91,000

96,000

101,500

105,500

63

87,500

92,000

96,500

102,000

105,500

64

88,000

92,500

97,500

102,500

105,500

65

88,500

93,000

98,000

103,000

105,500

66

89,000

93,500

98,500

103,500

105,500

67

90,000

94,000

99,000

104,500

105,500

68

90,500

95,000

99,500

105,000

105,500

69

91,000

95,500

100,000

105,500

105,500

70

91,500

96,000

101,000

105,500

105,500

71

92,500

96,500

101,500

105,500

105,500

72

93,000

97,000

102,000

105,500

105,500

73

93,500

98,000

102,500

105,500

105,500

74

94,000

98,500

103,000

105,500

105,500

75

95,000

99,000

103,500

105,500

105,500

76

95,500

99,500

104,500

105,500

105,500

77

96,000

100,000

105,000

105,500

105,500

78

96,500

101,000

105,500

105,500

105,500

79

97,500

101,500

105,500

105,500

105,500

80

98,000

102,000

105,500

105,500

105,500

81

98,500

102,500

105,500

105,500

105,500

82

99,000

103,000

105,500

105,500

105,500

83

100,000

104,000

105,500

105,500

105,500

84

104,500

105,500

105,500

105,500

85

105,000

105,500

105,500

105,500

86 or more

105,500

105,500

105,500

105,500

When inches are involved: Under six inches take lower, six inches or over take higher. The maximum load on any axle in any group of axles shall not exceed the single axle or tandem axle allowance as set forth in the table above.

The maximum axle and gross weights specified in this section are subject to the braking requirements set up for the service brakes upon any motor vehicle or combination of vehicles as provided by law.

Loads of not more than eighty thousand pounds which may be legally hauled in the state bordering this state which also has a sales tax, are legal in this state when moving to a port district within four miles of the bordering state except on the interstate system. This provision does not allow the operation of a vehicle combination consisting of a truck tractor and three trailers.

Notwithstanding anything contained herein, a vehicle or combination of vehicles in operation on January 4, 1975, may operate upon the public highways of this state, including the interstate system within the meaning of section 127 of Title 23, United States Code, with an overall gross weight upon a group of two consecutive sets of dual axles which was lawful in this state under the laws, regulations, and procedures in effect in this state on January 4, 1975.

(2) A vehicle or combination of vehicles may exceed the weight limits established under subsection (1) of this section by up to two thousand pounds when operating upon the public highways of this state that are not part of the federal-aid interstate system and carrying an agricultural commodity, as defined in RCW 17.21.020. The exemption provided in this subsection (2) does not allow a vehicle or combination of vehicles to exceed any posted weight limit for a bridge.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.44.091 and 2001 c 262 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, no special permit shall be issued for movement on any state highway or route of a state highway within the limits of any city or town where the gross weight, including load, exceeds the following limits:

(a) Twenty-two thousand pounds on a single axle or on dual axles with a wheelbase between the first and second axles of less than three feet six inches;

(b) Forty-three thousand pounds on dual axles having a wheelbase between the first and second axles of not less than three feet six inches but less than seven feet;

(c) On any group of axles or in the case of a vehicle employing two single axles with a wheel base between the first and last axle of not less than seven feet but less than ten feet, a weight in pounds determined by multiplying six thousand five hundred times the distance in feet between the center of the first axle and the center of the last axle of the group;

(d) On any group of axles with a wheel base between the first and last axle of not less than ten feet but less than thirty feet, a weight in pounds determined by multiplying two thousand two hundred times the sum of twenty and the distance in feet between the center of the first axle and the center of the last axle of the group;

(e) On any group of axles with a wheel base between the first and last axle of thirty feet or greater, a weight in pounds determined by multiplying one thousand six hundred times the sum of forty and the distance in feet between the center of the first axle and the center of the last axle of the group.

(2) The total weight of a vehicle or combination of vehicles allowable by special permit under subsection (1) of this section shall be governed by the lesser of the weights obtained by using the total number of axles as a group or any combination of axles as a group.

(3) The weight limitations pertaining to single axles may be exceeded to permit the movement of equipment operating upon single pneumatic tires having a rim width of twenty inches or more and a rim diameter of twenty-four inches or more or dual pneumatic tires having a rim width of sixteen inches or more and a rim diameter of twenty-four inches or more and specially designed vehicles manufactured and certified for special permits prior to July 1, 1975.

(4) Permits may be issued for weights in excess of the limitations contained in subsection (1) of this section on highways or sections of highways which have been designed and constructed for weights in excess of such limitations, or for any shipment duly certified as necessary by military officials, or by officials of public or private power facilities, or when in the opinion of the department of transportation the movement or action is a necessary movement or action: PROVIDED, That in the judgment of the department of transportation the structures and highway surfaces on the routes involved are capable of sustaining weights in excess of such limitations and it is not reasonable for economic or operational considerations to transport such excess weights by rail or water for any substantial distance of the total mileage applied for.

(5) Application shall be made in writing on special forms provided by the department of transportation and shall be submitted at least thirty-six hours in advance of the proposed movement. An application for a special permit for a gross weight of any combination of vehicles exceeding two hundred thousand pounds shall be submitted in writing to the department of transportation at least thirty days in advance of the proposed movement.

(6) A special permit is not required for a vehicle or combination of vehicles meeting the exemption under RCW 46.44.041(2).

Sec. 3. RCW 36.75.270 and 1963 c 4 s 36.75.270 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board of county commissioners of each county may by resolution limit or prohibit classes or types of vehicles on any county road or bridge and may limit the weight of vehicles which may travel thereon. Any such resolution shall be effective for a definite period of time which shall be stated in the resolution. If such resolution is published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county and if signs indicating such closure or limitation of traffic have been posted on such road or bridge, any person violating such resolution shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) However, a vehicle or combination of vehicles may exceed the weight limits established by a board of county commissioners under subsection (1) of this section by up to two thousand pounds when operating upon the public highways of the state and are carrying an agricultural commodity, as defined in RCW 17.21.020. The exemption provided in this subsection (2) does not allow a vehicle or combination of vehicles to exceed any posted weight limit for a bridge.

--- END ---