BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 53.08.245 and 2010 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be in the public purpose for all port districts to engage in economic development programs. In addition, port districts may contract with nonprofit corporations in furtherance of this and other acts relating to economic development.

(2)(a) Economic development programs may include those programs for job training and placement, preapprenticeship training or educational programs associated with port tenants, customers, and local economic development related to port activities that are sponsored by a port((,)) and operated by a nonprofit entity ((and are in existence on June 10, 2010)).

(b) As a contract condition, a sponsoring port must require any nonprofit entity that operates programs such as those described in (a) of this subsection to submit annually quantitative information on program outcomes including: The number of workers trained, recruited, and placed in jobs; the types of jobs and range of compensation; the number and types of businesses that are served; and any other tangible benefits realized by the port, the workers, businesses, and the public.

--- END ---