BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.15.568 and 2009 c 333 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of a secondary commercial fish receiver's failure to account for commercial harvest if:

(a) The person sells fish or shellfish at retail, stores or holds fish or shellfish for another in exchange for valuable consideration, ships fish or shellfish in exchange for valuable consideration, or brokers fish or shellfish in exchange for valuable consideration;

(b) The fish or shellfish were required to be entered on a Washington fish-receiving ticket or a Washington aquatic farm production annual report; and

(c) The person fails to maintain records of each receipt of fish or shellfish, as required under subsections (3) through (5) of this section, at:

(i) The location where the fish or shellfish are being sold((,)) or at the location where the fish or shellfish are being stored or held((,)); or ((at))

(ii) The principal place of business of the shipper or broker if the fish or shellfish are not in possession.

(2) This section applies to a wholesale fish dealer acting in the capacity of a broker. However, this section does not apply to a wholesale fish dealer acting in the capacity of a wholesale fish dealer, to a fisher selling under a direct retail sale endorsement, or to a registered aquatic farmer.

(3) Records of the receipt of fish or shellfish required to be kept under this section must be in the English language and be maintained for three years from the date fish or shellfish are received, shipped, or brokered.

(4) Records maintained by persons that retail or broker must include the following:

(a) The name, address, and phone number of the wholesale fish dealer, fisher selling under a direct retail sale endorsement, or aquatic farmer or shellstock shipper from whom the fish or shellfish were purchased or received;

(b) The Washington fish-receiving ticket number documenting original receipt or aquatic farm production quarterly report documenting production, if available;

(c) The date of purchase or receipt; and

(d) The amount and species of fish or shellfish purchased or received.

(5) Records maintained by persons that store, hold, or ship fish or shellfish for others must state the following:

(a) The name, address, and phone number of the person and business from whom the fish or shellfish were received;

(b) The date of receipt; and

(c) The amount and species of fish or shellfish received.

(6) A secondary commercial fish receiver's failure to account for commercial harvest is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---