BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that families put great trust in the school district and the state when sending their children to public schools. The legislature finds that six other states have enacted legislation to increase the safety of school bus riders through the installation of seat belts. The legislature further finds that given the mechanical and technological advances that are being made at such a rapid pace in so many fields, it is time that this state conduct a current review to determine whether Washington should join these other states and require that new school buses be equipped with seat belts. The legislature intends to direct a study to analyze the costs and the benefits of requiring that new school buses be equipped with seat belts, including the options available for school bus seat belts and safety harnesses, the potential benefits and detriments, and the financial costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct a study to analyze the costs and the benefits of requiring that each school bus, as defined in RCW 46.04.521, purchased after December 2017, be equipped with seat belts, safety harnesses, or other approved restraint systems for all passengers. The study must analyze the potential benefits, as well as detriments, if any, the feasibility, and the costs of, and funding options for, such a requirement. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit a report of the results of the study, including recommendations, to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 15, 2016.

--- END ---