BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.330.418 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 609 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor may take all appropriate steps to seek federal funding in order to maximize investment in broadband deployment and adoption in the state of Washington. Such steps may include the designation of a broadband deployment and adoption coordinator; review and prioritization of grant applications by public and private entities as directed by the national telecommunications and information administration, the rural utility services, and the federal communications commission; disbursement of block grant funding; and direction to state agencies to provide staffing as necessary to carry out this section. The authority for overseeing broadband adoption and deployment efforts on behalf of the state is vested in the department.

(2) The department may apply for federal funds and other grants or donations, ((may deposit such funds in the Washington community technology opportunity account created in RCW 43.330.415,)) may oversee implementation of federally funded or mandated broadband programs for the state, and may adopt rules to administer the programs. These programs may include but are not limited to the following:

(a) Engaging in periodic statewide surveys of residents, businesses, and nonprofit organizations concerning their use and adoption of high-speed internet, computer, and related information technology for the purpose of identifying barriers to adoption;

(b) Working with communities to identify barriers to the adoption of broadband service and related information technology services by individuals, nonprofit organizations, and businesses;

(c) Identifying broadband demand opportunities in communities by working cooperatively with local organizations, government agencies, and businesses;

(d) Creating, implementing, and administering programs to improve computer ownership, technology literacy, digital media literacy, and high-speed internet access for populations not currently served or underserved in the state. This may include programs to provide low-income families, community-based nonprofit organizations, nonprofit entities, and public entities that work in partnership with nonprofit entities to provide increased access to computers and broadband, with reduced cost internet access;

(e) Administering the community technology opportunity program under RCW 43.330.412 ((and 43.330.415));

(f) Creating additional programs to spur the development of high-speed internet resources in the state;

(g) Establishing technology literacy and digital inclusion programs and establishing low-cost hardware, software, and internet purchasing programs that may include allowing participation by community technology programs in state purchasing programs; and

(h) Developing technology loan programs targeting small businesses or businesses located in unserved and underserved areas.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.84.092 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 107 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust account, the diesel idle reduction account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle charging infrastructure account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, ((the public health services account,)) the high capacity transportation account, the state higher education construction account, ((the higher education construction account,)) the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the high occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the state wildlife account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, the state university permanent fund, and the state reclamation revolving account shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.63A.315 (Independent youth housing account) and 2007 c 316 s 7;

(2) RCW 43.72.902 (Public health services account) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 916, 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 913, 1995 c 43 s 12, & 1993 c 492 s 470;

(3) RCW 43.83.310 (Higher education construction account) and 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 26, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 8, 1985 c 57 s 13, & 1979 ex.s. c 253 s 4;

(4) RCW 43.83.320 (Higher education reimbursable short-term bond account) and 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 41, 2012 c 198 s 4, 1989 1st ex.s. c 14 s 13, 1988 c 36 s 22, 1986 c 103 s 1, & 1985 ex.s. c 4 s 2;

(5) RCW 43.83.370 (Fisheries capital projects account) and 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 37 & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 132 s 4;

(6) RCW 43.167.040 (Community preservation and development authority account) and 2007 c 501 s 7;

(7) RCW 43.330.415 (Washington community technology opportunity account) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 608, 2009 c 509 s 8, & 2008 c 262 s 8; and

(8) RCW 70.146.100 (Water quality capital account—Expenditures) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 948 & 2007 c 233 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Any residual balance of funds remaining in any account eliminated in this act on the effective date of this section shall be transferred to the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect June 30, 2016.

--- END ---