BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department is authorized to sell commercial advertising, including product placement, on department web sites and social media. In addition, the department is authorized to sell a version of its mobile application(s) to users who desire to have access to application(s) without advertising.

(2) The department shall deposit all moneys received from the sale of advertisements on web site and mobile applications into the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

(3) The department shall adopt standards for advertising, product placement, and other forms of commercial recognition that require the department to define and prohibit, at minimum, the content containing any of the following characteristics, which is not permitted:

(a) Obscene, indecent, or discriminatory content;

(b) Political or public issue advocacy content;

(c) Products, services, or other materials that are offensive, insulting, disparaging, or degrading; or

(d) Products, services, or messages that are contrary to the public interest, including any advertisement that encourages or depicts unsafe behaviors or encourages unsafe or prohibited driving activities. Alcohol, tobacco, and cannabis are included among the products prohibited.

--- END ---