BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1, 2017, an applicant for a new driver's license or identicard or driver's license or identicard renewal may request that the application designate whether the applicant:

(a) Has executed a health care declaration listed in RCW 70.122.130(2)(a); and

(b) Has executed a health care declaration listed in RCW 70.122.130(2)(a) that is stored in the health care declarations registry established in RCW 70.122.130.

(2)(a) When issuing or renewing a driver's license or identicard for a person who has indicated on his or her application that he or she has a health care declaration, the department shall issue an original or renewed driver's license or identicard that denotes the existence of a health care declaration through a symbol or abbreviation.

(b) When issuing or renewing a driver's license or identicard for a person who has indicated on his or her application that he or she has a health care declaration that is stored in the health care declarations registry, the department shall issue an original or renewed driver's license or identicard that denotes the existence of a health care declaration through a symbol or abbreviation as well as a code that, when electronically scanned, directs an authorized health care provider or facility to the person's health care declaration in the health care declarations registry.

(3) Specific medical treatment must not be imprinted on a driver's license or identicard issued under this section.

(4)(a) The department shall post several signs in each of its licensing service offices that clearly indicate that an applicant for a driver's license or identicard may request that the driver's license or identicard denote the existence of a health care declaration.

(b) The department shall modify its online and mail-in driver's license and identicard renewal forms to allow an applicant to request that the driver's license or identicard denote the existence of a health care declaration.

--- END ---