BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature declares and recognizes the importance of tribal cultural resources protection and intends to reinforce the obligations and commitments of the state made to tribal governments in the 1987 Washington state timber, fish, and wildlife agreement, the 1999 forests and fish report, and the cultural resource protection and management plans adopted by the participating caucuses of the timber, fish, and wildlife cultural resources roundtable.

(2) In order to assist in the fulfillment of the state's commitments to tribal cultural resources protection, the legislature recognizes that the department requires that a landowner must meet with a tribe upon the tribe's request and to incorporate into the application operational elements of protection that have been agreed upon between the landowner and the tribe.

(3) The legislature further recognizes that by incorporating the operational elements of the landowner and tribal agreement into the application, the department has enforcement authority over those conditions.

Sec. 2. RCW 76.09.010 and 2010 c 188 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature hereby finds and declares that the forest land resources are among the most valuable of all resources in the state; that a viable forest products industry is of prime importance to the state's economy; that it is in the public interest for public and private commercial forest lands to be managed consistent with sound policies of natural resource protection; that coincident with maintenance of a viable forest products industry, it is important to afford protection to forest soils, fisheries, wildlife, water quantity and quality, air quality, recreation, tribal cultural resources, and scenic beauty.

(2) The legislature further finds and declares it to be in the public interest of this state to create and maintain through the adoption of this chapter a comprehensive statewide system of laws and forest practices rules which will achieve the following purposes and policies:

(a) Afford protection to, promote, foster and encourage timber growth, and require such minimum reforestation of commercial tree species on forest lands as will reasonably utilize the timber growing capacity of the soil following current timber harvest;

(b) Afford protection to forest soils ((and)), public resources, and tribal cultural resources by utilizing all reasonable methods of technology in conducting forest practices;

(c) Recognize both the public and private interest in the profitable growing and harvesting of timber;

(d) Promote efficiency by permitting maximum operating freedom consistent with the other purposes and policies stated herein;

(e) Provide for regulation of forest practices so as to avoid unnecessary duplication in such rules;

(f) Provide for interagency input and intergovernmental and tribal coordination and cooperation;

(g) Achieve compliance with all applicable requirements of federal and state law with respect to nonpoint sources of water pollution from forest practices;

(h) To consider reasonable land use planning goals and concepts contained in local comprehensive plans and zoning regulations;

(i) Foster cooperation among managers of public resources, forest landowners, Indian tribes and the citizens of the state;

(j) Develop a watershed analysis system that addresses the cumulative effect of forest practices on, at a minimum, the public resources of fish, water, tribal cultural resources, and public capital improvements of the state and its political subdivisions; and

(k) Assist forest landowners in accessing market capital and financing for the ecosystem services provided to the public as a result of the protection of public resources.

(3) The legislature further finds and declares that it is also in the public interest of the state to encourage forest landowners to undertake corrective and remedial action to reduce the impact of mass earth movements and fluvial processes.

(4) The legislature further finds and declares that it is in the public interest that the applicants for state forest practices permits should assist in paying for the cost of review and permitting necessary for the environmental protection of these resources.

Sec. 3. RCW 76.09.020 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 1 s 212 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to test the results of actions taken so that the management and related policy can be changed promptly and appropriately.

(2) "Appeals board" means the pollution control hearings board created by RCW 43.21B.010.

(3) "Application" means the application required pursuant to RCW 76.09.050.

(4) "Aquatic resources" includes water quality, salmon, other species of the vertebrate classes Cephalaspidomorphi and Osteichthyes identified in the forests and fish report, the Columbia torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton kezeri), the Cascade torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton cascadae), the Olympic torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton olympian), the Dunn's salamander (Plethodon dunni), the Van Dyke's salamander (Plethodon vandyke), the tailed frog (Ascaphus truei), and their respective habitats.

(5) "Board" means the forest practices board created in RCW 76.09.030.

(6) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.

(7) "Contiguous" means land adjoining or touching by common corner or otherwise. Land having common ownership divided by a road or other right-of-way shall be considered contiguous.

(8) "Conversion to a use other than commercial timber operation" means a bona fide conversion to an active use which is incompatible with timber growing and as may be defined by forest practices rules.

(9) "Date of receipt" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 43.21B.001.

(10) "Department" means the department of natural resources.

(11) "Ecosystem services" means the benefits that the public enjoys as a result of natural processes and biological diversity.

(12) "Ecosystem services market" means a system in which providers of ecosystem services can access financing or market capital to protect, restore, and maintain ecological values, including the full spectrum of regulatory, quasiregulatory, and voluntary markets.

(13) "Fill" means the placement of earth material or aggregate for road or landing construction or other similar activities.

(14) "Fish passage barrier" means any artificial instream structure that impedes the free passage of fish.

(15) "Forest land" means all land which is capable of supporting a merchantable stand of timber and is not being actively used for a use which is incompatible with timber growing. Forest land does not include agricultural land that is or was enrolled in the conservation reserve enhancement program by contract if such agricultural land was historically used for agricultural purposes and the landowner intends to continue to use the land for agricultural purposes in the future. As it applies to the operation of the road maintenance and abandonment plan element of the forest practices rules on small forest landowners, the term "forest land" excludes:

(a) Residential home sites, which may include up to five acres; and

(b) Cropfields, orchards, vineyards, pastures, feedlots, fish pens, and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the production, preparation, or sale of crops, fruit, dairy products, fish, and livestock exist.

(16) "Forest landowner" means any person in actual control of forest land, whether such control is based either on legal or equitable title, or on any other interest entitling the holder to sell or otherwise dispose of any or all of the timber on such land in any manner. However, any lessee or other person in possession of forest land without legal or equitable title to such land shall be excluded from the definition of "forest landowner" unless such lessee or other person has the right to sell or otherwise dispose of any or all of the timber located on such forest land.

(17) "Forest practice" means any activity conducted on or directly pertaining to forest land and relating to growing, harvesting, or processing timber, including but not limited to:

(a) Road and trail construction, including forest practices hydraulic projects that include water crossing structures, and associated activities and maintenance;

(b) Harvesting, final and intermediate;

(c) Precommercial thinning;

(d) Reforestation;

(e) Fertilization;

(f) Prevention and suppression of diseases and insects;

(g) Salvage of trees; and

(h) Brush control.

"Forest practice" shall not include preparatory work such as tree marking, surveying and road flagging, and removal or harvesting of incidental vegetation from forest lands such as berries, ferns, greenery, mistletoe, herbs, mushrooms, and other products which cannot normally be expected to result in damage to forest soils, timber, or public resources.

(18) "Forest practices hydraulic project" means a hydraulic project, as defined under RCW 77.55.011, that requires a forest practices application or notification under this chapter.

(19) "Forest practices rules" means any rules adopted pursuant to RCW 76.09.040.

(20) "Forest road," as it applies to the operation of the road maintenance and abandonment plan element of the forest practices rules on small forest landowners, means a road or road segment that crosses land that meets the definition of forest land, but excludes residential access roads.

(21) "Forest trees" does not include hardwood trees cultivated by agricultural methods in growing cycles shorter than fifteen years if the trees were planted on land that was not in forest use immediately before the trees were planted and before the land was prepared for planting the trees. "Forest trees" includes Christmas trees, but does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods, as that term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.

(22) "Forests and fish report" means the forests and fish report to the board dated April 29, 1999.

(23) "Operator" means any person engaging in forest practices except an employee with wages as his or her sole compensation.

(24) "Person" means any individual, partnership, private, public, or municipal corporation, county, the department or other state or local governmental entity, or association of individuals of whatever nature.

(25) "Public resources" means water, fish and wildlife, and in addition shall mean capital improvements of the state or its political subdivisions.

(26) "Small forest landowner" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 76.09.450.

(27) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, of a commercial species, including Christmas trees. However, "timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods, as that term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.

(28) "Timber owner" means any person having all or any part of the legal interest in timber. Where such timber is subject to a contract of sale, "timber owner" shall mean the contract purchaser.

(29) "Tribal cultural resources" means the ancient and spiritual, present and future cultural materials, objects, or sites that are significant to and perpetuate the living culture and history of federally recognized tribes as identified by the tribe.

(30) "Unconfined channel migration zone" means the area within which the active channel of an unconfined stream is prone to move and where the movement would result in a potential near-term loss of riparian forest adjacent to the stream. Sizeable islands with productive timber may exist within the zone.

(((30))) (31) "Unconfined stream" means generally fifth order or larger waters that experience abrupt shifts in channel location, creating a complex floodplain characterized by extensive gravel bars, disturbance species of vegetation of variable age, numerous side channels, wall-based channels, oxbow lakes, and wetland complexes. Many of these streams have dikes and levees that may temporarily or permanently restrict channel movement.

Sec. 4. RCW 76.09.060 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 1 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall prescribe the form and contents of the notification and application. The forest practices rules shall specify by whom and under what conditions the notification and application shall be signed or otherwise certified as acceptable. Activities conducted by the department or a contractor under the direction of the department under the provisions of RCW 76.04.660, shall be exempt from the landowner signature requirement on any forest practices application required to be filed. The application or notification shall be delivered in person to the department, sent by first-class mail to the department or electronically filed in a form defined by the department. The form for electronic filing shall be readily convertible to a paper copy, which shall be available to the public pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW. The information required may include, but is not limited to:

(a) Name and address of the forest landowner, timber owner, and operator;

(b) Description of the proposed forest practice or practices to be conducted;

(c) Legal description and tax parcel identification numbers of the land on which the forest practices are to be conducted;

(d) Planimetric and topographic maps showing location and size of all lakes and streams and other public waters in and immediately adjacent to the operating area and showing all existing and proposed roads and major tractor roads;

(e) Description of the silvicultural, harvesting, or other forest practice methods to be used, including the type of equipment to be used and materials to be applied;

(f) For an application or notification submitted on or after July 10, 2012, that includes a forest practices hydraulic project, plans and specifications for the forest practices hydraulic project to ensure the proper protection of fish life;

(g) Proposed plan for reforestation and for any revegetation necessary to reduce erosion potential from roadsides and yarding roads, as required by the forest practices rules;

(h) Soil, geological, and hydrological data with respect to forest practices;

(i) The expected dates of commencement and completion of all forest practices specified in the application;

(j) Provisions for continuing maintenance of roads and other construction or other measures necessary to afford protection to public resources;

(k) An affirmation that the statements contained in the notification or application are true; and

(l) All necessary application or notification fees.

(2) Long range plans may be submitted to the department for review and consultation.

(3) The application for a forest practice or the notification of a forest practice is subject to the reforestation requirement of RCW 76.09.070.

(a) If the application states that any land will be or is intended to be converted:

(i) The reforestation requirements of this chapter and of the forest practices rules shall not apply if the land is in fact converted unless applicable alternatives or limitations are provided in forest practices rules issued under RCW 76.09.070;

(ii) Completion of such forest practice operations shall be deemed conversion of the lands to another use for purposes of chapters 84.33 and 84.34 RCW unless the conversion is to a use permitted under a current use tax agreement permitted under chapter 84.34 RCW;

(iii) The forest practices described in the application are subject to applicable county, city, town, and regional governmental authority permitted under RCW 76.09.240 as well as the forest practices rules.

(b) Except as provided elsewhere in this section, if the landowner harvests without an approved application or notification or the landowner does not state that any land covered by the application or notification will be or is intended to be converted, and the department or the county, city, town, or regional governmental entity becomes aware of conversion activities to a use other than commercial timber operations, as that term is defined in RCW 76.09.020, then the department shall send to the department of ecology and the appropriate county, city, town, and regional governmental entities the following documents:

(i) A notice of a conversion to nonforestry use;

(ii) A copy of the applicable forest practices application or notification, if any; and

(iii) Copies of any applicable outstanding final orders or decisions issued by the department related to the forest practices application or notification.

(c) Failure to comply with the reforestation requirements contained in any final order or decision shall constitute a removal of designation under the provisions of RCW 84.33.140, and a change of use under the provisions of RCW 84.34.080, and, if applicable, shall subject such lands to the payments and/or penalties resulting from such removals or changes.

(d) Conversion to a use other than commercial forest product operations within six years after approval of the forest practices application or notification without the consent of the county, city, or town shall constitute a violation of each of the county, municipal city, town, and regional authorities to which the forest practice operations would have been subject if the application had stated an intent to convert.

(e) Land that is the subject of a notice of conversion to a nonforestry use produced by the department and sent to the department of ecology and a local government under this subsection is subject to the development prohibition and conditions provided in RCW 76.09.460.

(f) Landowners who have not stated an intent to convert the land covered by an application or notification and who decide to convert the land to a nonforestry use within six years of receiving an approved application or notification must do so in a manner consistent with RCW 76.09.470.

(g) The application or notification must include a statement requiring an acknowledgment by the forest landowner of his or her intent with respect to conversion and acknowledging that he or she is familiar with the effects of this subsection.

(4) Whenever an approved application authorizes a forest practice which, because of soil condition, proximity to a water course or other unusual factor, has a potential for causing material damage to a public resource, as determined by the department, the applicant shall, when requested on the approved application, notify the department two days before the commencement of actual operations.

(5) Before the operator commences any forest practice in a manner or to an extent significantly different from that described in a previously approved application or notification, there shall be submitted to the department a new application or notification form in the manner set forth in this section.

(6)(a) Except as provided in RCW 76.09.350(4), the notification to or the approval given by the department to an application to conduct a forest practice shall be effective for a term of three years from the date of approval or notification.

(b) A notification or application may be renewed for an additional three-year term by the filing and approval of a notification or application, as applicable, prior to the expiration of the original application or notification. A renewal application or notification is subject to the forest practices rules in effect at the time the renewal application or notification is filed. Nothing in this section precludes the applicant from applying for a new application or notification after the renewal period has lapsed.

(c) At the option of the applicant, an application or notification may be submitted to cover a single forest practice or a number of forest practices within reasonable geographic or political boundaries as specified by the department. An application or notification that covers more than one forest practice may have an effective term of more than three years.

(d) The board shall adopt rules that establish standards and procedures for approving an application or notification that has an effective term of more than three years. Such rules shall include extended time periods for application or notification approval or disapproval. The department may require the applicant to provide advance notice before commencing operations on an approved application or notification.

(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no prior application or notification shall be required for any emergency forest practice necessitated by fire, flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other emergency as defined by the board, but the operator shall submit an application or notification, whichever is applicable, to the department within forty-eight hours after commencement of such practice or as required by local regulations.

(8) Forest practices applications or notifications are not required for forest practices conducted to control exotic forest insect or disease outbreaks, when conducted by or under the direction of the department of agriculture in carrying out an order of the governor or director of the department of agriculture to implement pest control measures as authorized under chapter 17.24 RCW, and are not required when conducted by or under the direction of the department in carrying out emergency measures under a forest health emergency declaration by the commissioner of public lands as provided in RCW 76.06.130.

(a) For the purposes of this subsection, exotic forest insect or disease has the same meaning as defined in RCW 76.06.020.

(b) In order to minimize adverse impacts to public resources, control measures must be based on integrated pest management, as defined in RCW 17.15.010, and must follow forest practices rules relating to road construction and maintenance, timber harvest, and forest chemicals, to the extent possible without compromising control objectives.

(c) Agencies conducting or directing control efforts must provide advance notice to the appropriate regulatory staff of the department of the operations that would be subject to exemption from forest practices application or notification requirements.

(d) When the appropriate regulatory staff of the department are notified under (c) of this subsection, they must consult with the landowner, interested agencies, and affected tribes, and assist the notifying agencies in the development of integrated pest management plans that comply with forest practices rules as required under (b) of this subsection.

(e) Nothing under this subsection relieves agencies conducting or directing control efforts from requirements of the federal clean water act as administered by the department of ecology under RCW 90.48.260.

(f) Forest lands where trees have been cut as part of an exotic forest insect or disease control effort under this subsection are subject to reforestation requirements under RCW 76.09.070.

(g) The exemption from obtaining approved forest practices applications or notifications does not apply to forest practices conducted after the governor, the director of the department of agriculture, or the commissioner of public lands have declared that an emergency no longer exists because control objectives have been met, that there is no longer an imminent threat, or that there is no longer a good likelihood of control.

(9) A forest practice is subject to the operational elements of protection that have been agreed upon between the landowner and the tribe.

Sec. 5. RCW 76.09.080 and 2010 c 210 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall have the authority to serve upon an operator a stop work order which shall be a final order of the department if:

(a) There is any violation of the provisions of this chapter or the forest practices regulations; or

(b) There is a deviation from the approved application; or

(c) Immediate action is necessary to prevent continuation of or to avoid material damage to a public resource; or

(d) Immediate action is necessary to cease disturbance of or to protect the area containing tribal cultural resources.

(2) The stop work order shall set forth:

(a) The specific nature, extent, and time of the violation, deviation, damage, or potential damage;

(b) An order to stop all work connected with the violation, deviation, damage, or potential damage;

(c) The specific course of action needed to correct such violation or deviation or to prevent damage and to correct and/or compensate for damage to public resources which has resulted from any violation, unauthorized deviation, or willful or negligent disregard for potential damage to a public resource; and/or those courses of action necessary to prevent continuing damage to public resources where the damage is resulting from the forest practice activities but has not resulted from any violation, unauthorized deviation, or negligence; ((and))

(d)(i) The specific course of action needed to enforce the operational elements of any plan between a landowner and tribe that resulted from the required meetings between a tribe and landowner under RCW 76.09.060(9) to the extent necessary to protect tribal cultural resources;

(ii) The department's authority under this subsection is limited to enforcement of the operational elements of a written agreement that are shared with the department by the landowner or the tribe; and

(e) The right of the operator to a hearing before the appeals board.

The department shall immediately file a copy of such order with the appeals board and mail a copy thereof to the timber owner and forest land owner at the addresses shown on the application. The operator, timber owner, or forest land owner may commence an appeal to the appeals board within thirty days from the date of receipt of the order by the operator. If such appeal is commenced, a hearing shall be held not more than twenty days after copies of the notice of appeal were filed with the appeals board. Such proceeding shall be an adjudicative proceeding within the meaning of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act. The operator shall comply with the order of the department immediately upon being served, but the appeals board if requested shall have authority to continue or discontinue in whole or in part the order of the department under such conditions as it may impose pending the outcome of the proceeding.

Sec. 6. RCW 76.09.090 and 2010 c 210 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

If a violation, a deviation, material damage or potential for material damage to a public resource or a violation or deviation of the operational elements of a landowner and tribal plan to protect tribal cultural resource has occurred and the department determines that a stop work order is unnecessary, then the department shall issue and serve upon the operator or land owner a notice, which shall clearly set forth:

(1)(a) The specific nature, extent, and time of failure to comply with the approved application; or identifying the damage or potential damage; and/or

(b) The relevant provisions of this chapter or of the forest practice regulations relating thereto;

(2) The right of the operator or land owner to a hearing before the department; and

(3) The specific course of action ordered by the department to be followed by the operator to protect the area containing tribal cultural resources and enforce the operational elements of the landowner and tribe plan that resulted from the required meetings under RCW 76.09.060(9) or to correct such failure to comply and to prevent, correct and/or compensate for material damage to public resources which resulted from any violation, unauthorized deviation, or willful or negligent disregard for potential damage to a public resource; and/or those courses of action necessary to prevent continuing damage to public resources where the damage is resulting from the forest practice activities but has not resulted from any violation, unauthorized deviation, or negligence.

The department shall mail a copy thereof to the forest land owner and the timber owner at the addresses shown on the application, showing the date of service upon the operator. Such notice to comply shall become a final order of the department: PROVIDED, That no direct appeal to the appeals board will be allowed from such final order. Such operator shall undertake the course of action so ordered by the department unless, within fifteen days after the date of service of such notice to comply, the operator, forest land owner, or timber owner, shall request the department in writing to schedule a hearing. If so requested, the department shall schedule a hearing on a date not more than twenty days after receiving such request. Within ten days after such hearing, the department shall issue a final order either withdrawing its notice to comply or clearly setting forth the specific course of action to be followed by such operator. Such operator shall undertake the course of action so ordered by the department unless within thirty days after the date of receipt of such final order, the operator, forest land owner, or timber owner appeals such final order to the appeals board.

No person shall be under any obligation under this section to prevent, correct, or compensate for any damage to public resources which occurs more than one year after the date of completion of the forest practices operations involved exclusive of reforestation, unless such forest practices were not conducted in accordance with forest practices rules and regulations: PROVIDED, That this provision shall not relieve the forest land owner from any obligation to comply with forest practices rules and regulations pertaining to providing continuing road maintenance. No action to recover damages shall be taken under this section more than two years after the date the damage involved occurs.

Sec. 7. RCW 42.56.300 and 2014 c 165 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Records, maps, or other information identifying the location of archaeological sites in order to avoid the looting or depredation of such sites are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

(2) Records, maps, and other information, acquired ((during watershed analysis pursuant to the forests and fish report)) under ((RCW 76.09.370)) chapter 76.09 RCW, that identify the location of archaeological sites, historic sites, artifacts, or the sites of traditional religious, ceremonial, or social uses and activities of affected Indian tribes, are exempt from disclosure under this chapter in order to prevent the looting or depredation of such sites.

(3) Any site form, report, specific fields and tables relating to site form data within a database, or geographic information systems spatial layer obtained by any state agency or local government, or shared between any state agency, local government, or tribal government, is exempt from disclosure under this chapter, if the material is related to:

(a) An archaeological site as defined in RCW 27.53.030;

(b) ((Historical [Historic])) Historic archaeological resources as defined in RCW 27.53.030; or

(c) Traditional cultural places.

(4) The local government or agency shall respond to requests from the owner of the real property for public records exempt under subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section by providing information to the requestor on how to contact the department of archaeology and historic preservation to obtain available locality information on archaeological and cultural resources.

--- END ---