BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 42.56.480 (Inactive programs) and 2005 c 274 s 428; and

(2) RCW 66.16.090 (Record of individual purchases confidential—Penalty for disclosure) and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 89.

--- END ---