BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that the effects of a sedentary lifestyle, which includes obesity, type 2 diabetes, and cardiorespiratory diseases, can be avoided and reversed through participation in a comprehensive health and fitness program taught by a teacher certified or endorsed in physical education. It is understood that other content areas or activities do not suitably address the knowledge and skills needed to live a healthy lifestyle.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.230.040 and 2006 c 263 s 415 are each amended to read as follows:

Every pupil attending grades one through eight of the public schools shall receive instruction in physical education as prescribed by rule of the superintendent of public instruction: PROVIDED, That individual pupils or students may be excused on account of physical disability((,)) or religious belief((, or participation in directed athletics)).

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.230.050 and 2006 c 263 s 416 are each amended to read as follows:

All high schools of the state shall emphasize the work of physical education, and carry into effect all physical education requirements established by rule of the superintendent of public instruction: PROVIDED, That individual students may be excused from participating in physical education otherwise required under this section on account of physical disability((, employment,)) or religious belief((, or because of participation in directed athletics or military science and tactics or for other good cause)).

--- END ---