BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that state route number 26 is an important corridor that connects state route number 90 and state route number 195. The current roadway is two lanes through much of its length and often inadequate for the traveling public, especially when there are significant events at the Washington State University campus in Pullman.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. To address the needs on the state route number 26 corridor, the legislature directs the department of transportation to undertake a feasibility study within its existing resources. The study must identify improvements that will increase safety and mobility for all users of the corridor, and must consider the feasibility of ultimately expanding the state route number 26 roadway to four lanes between Vantage and Pullman. In preparing the study, the department must consult with representatives from cities and towns along the state route number 26 corridor as well as Washington State University. The results of the feasibility study must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2016.

--- END ---