BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that students' ability to graduate is often seriously impacted by the lack of access to advising, degree completion tools, the lack of capacity or availability of required courses needed for degree completion, and the lack of information about specific degree or program requirements and when those are offered. In addition, student indebtedness may be increased and students may lose limited financial aid when they are not able to graduate in four years. The legislature finds that there are software and advising programs available that can reduce the likelihood of these impacts.

(2) The legislature commends Central Washington University's willingness to guarantee that any student in a four-year degree program who commits to following a pathway outlined by advisors and degree-planner software, but does not graduate in four years, will be able to enroll in his or her remaining required courses for free in the fifth year. The legislature supports this promise and intends for it to serve as an innovative pilot for other institutions of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Central Washington University is authorized to offer a program that promises that a student enrolled in a four-year baccalaureate degree program will graduate within four years or Central Washington University will allow the student to enroll in his or her remaining required courses for free in the fifth year, as long as the student:

(a) Commits to following a degree pathway developed in conjunction with his or her advisor and degree-planner software;

(b) Attempts to enroll in courses required for his or her degree program pursuant to the plan developed in (a) of this subsection when those courses are offered; and

(c) Maintains satisfactory academic progress.

(2) Central Washington University shall use local funds to support its commitment to provide free enrollment in remaining courses for a student meeting the description in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Subject to an appropriation provided for this subsection, Central Washington University shall purchase a degree-planner software package that provides students and staff with an online interface to track degree requirements, student progress, and forecast personnel, lab, and classroom space needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing board of Central Washington University may waive all or a portion of the tuition fees and services and activities fees for students qualifying for Central Washington University's fifth year promise, as authorized in section 2 of this act.

--- END ---