BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.28A.320 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby established in the custody of the state ((treasury)) treasurer the 24/7 sobriety account. The account shall be maintained and administered by the criminal justice training commission to reimburse the state for costs associated with establishing and operating the 24/7 sobriety program and the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for ongoing 24/7 sobriety program administration costs. An appropriation is not required for expenditures and the account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. Funds in the account may not lapse and must carry forward from biennium to biennium. Interest earned by the account must be retained in the account. The criminal justice training commission may accept for deposit in the account money from donations, gifts, grants, participation fees, and user fees or payments.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2013 c 251 s 5 and 2013 c 88 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.

(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.

(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The 24/7 sobriety account, the Washington promise scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the accessible communities account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the county enhanced 911 excise tax account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the multiagency permitting team account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar pool account, the regional transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss account, the school for the blind account, the Millersylvania park trust fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, and the radiation perpetual maintenance fund.

(c) The following accounts and funds must receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.01.260 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the director may destroy applications for vehicle registrations, copies of vehicle registrations issued, applications for drivers' licenses, copies of issued drivers' licenses, certificates of title and registration or other documents, and records or supporting papers on file in the department that have been microfilmed or photographed or are more than five years old. The director may destroy applications for vehicle registrations that are renewal applications when the computer record of the applications has been updated.

(2)(a) The director shall not destroy records of convictions or adjudications of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, 46.61.504, 46.61.520, and 46.61.522, ((or)) records of deferred prosecutions granted under RCW 10.05.120, or any other records of a prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055 and shall maintain such records permanently on file.

(b) ((The director shall not, within fifteen years from the date of conviction or adjudication, destroy records if the offense was originally charged as one of the offenses designated in (a) of this subsection, convictions or adjudications of the following offenses: RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.5249 or any other violation that was originally charged as one of the offenses designated in (a) of this subsection.)) After fifteen years from the date of conviction or adjudication, the director shall destroy all records of the conviction if the offense was originally charged as one of the offenses designated in (a) of this subsection and the court entered written findings of fact and conclusions of law holding that the person was not intoxicated by liquor, marijuana, or a controlled substance under chapter 69.50 RCW unless the person had a valid prescription for such drug.

(c) For purposes of RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.130, offenses subject to this subsection shall be considered "alcohol-related" offenses.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.64.025 and 2012 c 82 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever any person served with a traffic citation or a traffic-related criminal complaint willfully fails to appear at a requested hearing for a moving violation or fails to comply with the terms of a notice of traffic citation for a moving violation or a traffic-related criminal complaint, the court in which the defendant failed to appear shall promptly give notice of such fact to the department of licensing. Whenever thereafter the case in which the defendant failed to appear is adjudicated, the court hearing the case shall promptly file with the department a certificate showing that the case has been adjudicated. For the purposes of this section, "moving violation" is defined by rule pursuant to RCW 46.20.2891.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.20.291 and 2007 c 393 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is authorized to suspend the license of a driver upon a showing by its records or other sufficient evidence that the licensee:

(1) Has committed an offense for which mandatory revocation or suspension of license is provided by law;

(2) Has, by reckless or unlawful operation of a motor vehicle, caused or contributed to an accident resulting in death or injury to any person or serious property damage;

(3) Has been convicted of offenses against traffic regulations governing the movement of vehicles, or found to have committed traffic infractions, with such frequency as to indicate a disrespect for traffic laws or a disregard for the safety of other persons on the highways;

(4) Is incompetent to drive a motor vehicle under RCW 46.20.031(3);

(5) Has failed to respond to a notice of traffic infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing, violated a written promise to appear in court, or has failed to comply with the terms of a notice of traffic infraction, criminal complaint, or citation, as provided in RCW 46.20.289;

(6) Is subject to suspension under RCW 46.20.305 or 9A.56.078;

(7) Has committed one of the prohibited practices relating to drivers' licenses defined in RCW 46.20.0921; or

(8) Has been certified by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a child support order or a residential or visitation order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.20.289 and 2012 c 82 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall suspend all driving privileges of a person when the department receives notice from a court under RCW 46.63.070(6), 46.63.110(6), or 46.64.025 that the person has failed to respond to a notice of traffic infraction for a moving violation, failed to appear at a requested hearing for a moving violation, violated a written promise to appear in court for a notice of infraction for a moving violation, or has failed to comply with the terms of a notice of traffic infraction, criminal complaint, or citation for a moving violation, or when the department receives notice from another state under Article IV of the nonresident violator compact under RCW 46.23.010 or from a jurisdiction that has entered into an agreement with the department under RCW 46.23.020, other than for a standing, stopping, or parking violation, provided that the traffic infraction or traffic offense is committed on or after July 1, 2005. A suspension under this section takes effect pursuant to the provisions of RCW 46.20.245, and remains in effect until the department has received a certificate from the court showing that the case has been adjudicated, and until the person meets the requirements of RCW 46.20.311. In the case of failure to respond to a traffic infraction issued under RCW 46.55.105, the department shall suspend all driving privileges until the person provides evidence from the court that all penalties and restitution have been paid. A suspension under this section does not take effect if, prior to the effective date of the suspension, the department receives a certificate from the court showing that the case has been adjudicated.

Sec. 7. RCW 9.94A.533 and 2015 c 134 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.

(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by seventy-five percent.

(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:

(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(((3))) (1)(c); or

(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;

(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony;

(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:

(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(((3))) (1)(c); or

(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;

(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony;

(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility, and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section:

(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) or (b) or 69.50.410;

(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2) (c), (d), or (e);

(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.

For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part of that facility or county jail.

(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter 69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or 9.94A.827. All enhancements under this subsection shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.

(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all impaired driving enhancements under this subsection ((shall be)) are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other impaired driving enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.

An offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c).

(8)(a) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed on or after July 1, 2006, if the offense was committed with sexual motivation, as that term is defined in RCW 9.94A.030. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the sexual motivation enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a sexual motivation enhancement. If the offender committed the offense with sexual motivation and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(i) Two years for any felony defined under the law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both;

(ii) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both;

(iii) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both;

(iv) If the offender is being sentenced for any sexual motivation enhancements under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any sexual motivation enhancements on or after July 1, 2006, under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection, all sexual motivation enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all sexual motivation enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other sexual motivation enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:

(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(((3))) (1)(c); or

(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;

(c) The sexual motivation enhancements in this subsection apply to all felony crimes;

(d) If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a sexual motivation enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced;

(e) The portion of the total confinement sentence which the offender must serve under this subsection shall be calculated before any earned early release time is credited to the offender;

(f) Nothing in this subsection prevents a sentencing court from imposing a sentence outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW 9.94A.535.

(9) An additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence range for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089 committed on or after July 22, 2007, if the offender engaged, agreed, or offered to engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the one-year enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to the enhancement. If the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089, and the offender attempted, solicited another, or conspired to engage, agree, or offer to engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee, an additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section. For purposes of this subsection, "sexual conduct" means sexual intercourse or sexual contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.

(10)(a) For a person age eighteen or older convicted of any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which the person compensated, threatened, or solicited a minor in order to involve the minor in the commission of the felony offense, the standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by one hundred twenty-five percent. If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence is the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender.

(b) This subsection does not apply to any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which involving a minor in the commission of the felony offense is an element of the offense.

(c) The increased penalty specified in (a) of this subsection is unavailable in the event that the prosecution gives notice that it will seek an exceptional sentence based on an aggravating factor under RCW 9.94A.535.

(11) An additional twelve months and one day shall be added to the standard sentence range for a conviction of attempting to elude a police vehicle as defined by RCW 46.61.024, if the conviction included a finding by special allegation of endangering one or more persons under RCW 9.94A.834.

(12) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW 9.94A.831.

(13) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.520 or for vehicular assault committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.522, or for any felony driving under the influence (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or felony physical control under the influence (RCW 46.61.504(6)) for each child passenger under the age of sixteen who is an occupant in the defendant's vehicle. These enhancements shall be mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions. If the addition of a minor child enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(14) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW 9.94A.832.

Sec. 8. RCW 46.61.506 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by any person while driving or in actual physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, if the person's alcohol concentration is less than 0.08 or the person's THC concentration is less than 5.00, it is evidence that may be considered with other competent evidence in determining whether the person was under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.

(2)(a) The breath analysis of the person's alcohol concentration shall be based upon grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of breath.

(b) The blood analysis of the person's THC concentration shall be based upon nanograms per milliliter of whole blood.

(c) The foregoing provisions of this section shall not be construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing upon the question whether the person was under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.

(3) Analysis of the person's blood or breath to be considered valid under the provisions of this section or RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 shall have been performed according to methods approved by the state toxicologist and by an individual possessing a valid permit issued by the state toxicologist for this purpose. The state toxicologist is directed to approve satisfactory techniques or methods, to supervise the examination of individuals to ascertain their qualifications and competence to conduct such analyses, and to issue permits which shall be subject to termination or revocation at the discretion of the state toxicologist.

(4)(a) A breath test performed by any instrument approved by the state toxicologist shall be admissible at trial or in an administrative proceeding if the prosecution or department produces prima facie evidence of the following:

(i) The person who performed the test was authorized to perform such test by the state toxicologist;

(ii) The person being tested did not vomit or have anything to eat, drink, or smoke for at least fifteen minutes prior to administration of the test;

(iii) The person being tested did not have any foreign substances, not to include dental work, fixed or removable, in his or her mouth at the beginning of the fifteen-minute observation period;

(iv) Prior to the start of the test, the temperature of any liquid simulator solution utilized as an external standard, as measured by a thermometer approved of by the state toxicologist was thirty-four degrees centigrade plus or minus 0.3 degrees centigrade;

(v) The internal standard test resulted in the message "verified";

(vi) The two breath samples agree to within plus or minus ten percent of their mean to be determined by the method approved by the state toxicologist;

(vii) The result of the test of the liquid simulator solution external standard or dry gas external standard result did lie between .072 to .088 inclusive; and

(viii) All blank tests gave results of .000.

(b) For purposes of this section, "prima facie evidence" is evidence of sufficient circumstances that would support a logical and reasonable inference of the facts sought to be proved. In assessing whether there is sufficient evidence of the foundational facts, the court or administrative tribunal is to assume the truth of the prosecution's or department's evidence and all reasonable inferences from it in a light most favorable to the prosecution or department.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prevent the subject of the test from challenging the reliability or accuracy of the test, the reliability or functioning of the instrument, or any maintenance procedures. Such challenges, however, shall not preclude the admissibility of the test once the prosecution or department has made a prima facie showing of the requirements contained in (a) of this subsection. Instead, such challenges may be considered by the trier of fact in determining what weight to give to the test result.

(5) When a blood test is administered under the provisions of RCW 46.20.308, the withdrawal of blood for the purpose of determining its alcoholic or drug content may be performed only by a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; an osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW; an advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic licensed under chapter 18.73 RCW; until July 1, 2016, a health care assistant certified under chapter 18.135 RCW; or a medical assistant-certified or medical assistant-phlebotomist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW. Proof of qualification to draw blood may be established through the department of health's provider credential search. This limitation shall not apply to the taking of breath specimens.

(6) The person tested may have a licensed or certified health care provider listed in subsection (5) of this section, or a qualified technician, chemist, or other qualified person of his or her own choosing administer one or more tests in addition to any administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer. The test will be admissible if the person establishes the general acceptability of the testing technique or method. The failure or inability to obtain an additional test by a person shall not preclude the admission of evidence relating to the test or tests taken at the direction of a law enforcement officer.

(7) Upon the request of the person who shall submit to a test or tests at the request of a law enforcement officer, full information concerning the test or tests shall be made available to him or her or his or her attorney.

Sec. 9. RCW 10.31.100 and 2014 c 202 s 307, 2014 c 100 s 2, and 2014 c 5 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest the person without a warrant. A police officer may arrest a person without a warrant for committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor only when the offense is committed in the presence of an officer, except as provided in subsections (1) through (11) of this section.

(1) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor, involving physical harm or threats of harm to any person or property or the unlawful taking of property or involving the use or possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition, possession, or consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one years under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070 or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.

(2) A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that:

(a) An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under RCW 26.44.063, or chapter 7.92, 7.90, 9A.46, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, 26.50, or 74.34 RCW restraining the person and the person has violated the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or threats of violence, or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location or, in the case of an order issued under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other restrictions or conditions upon the person; or

(b) A foreign protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has been issued of which the person under restraint has knowledge and the person under restraint has violated a provision of the foreign protection order prohibiting the person under restraint from contacting or communicating with another person, or excluding the person under restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location, or a violation of any provision for which the foreign protection order specifically indicates that a violation will be a crime; or

(c) The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding four hours has assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW 10.99.020 and the officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has occurred; (ii) an assault has occurred which has resulted in bodily injury to the victim, whether the injury is observable by the responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical action has occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to fear imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the officer has probable cause to believe that family or household members have assaulted each other, the officer is not required to arrest both persons. The officer shall arrest the person whom the officer believes to be the primary physical aggressor. In making this determination, the officer shall make every reasonable effort to consider: (i) The intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW 10.99.010; (ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of domestic violence of each person involved, including whether the conduct was part of an ongoing pattern of abuse.

(3) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a violation of any of the following traffic laws shall have the authority to arrest the person:

(a) RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car or other property;

(b) RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;

(c) RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or racing of vehicles;

(d) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(e) RCW 46.61.503 or 46.25.110, relating to persons having alcohol or THC in their system;

(f) RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while operator's license is suspended or revoked;

(g) RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a negligent manner.

(4) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the driver has committed in connection with the accident a violation of any traffic law or regulation.

(5)(a) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor vessel accident may arrest the operator of a motor vessel involved in the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the operator has committed, in connection with the accident, a criminal violation of chapter 79A.60 RCW.

(b) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor vessel accident may issue a citation for an infraction to the operator of a motor vessel involved in the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the operator has committed, in connection with the accident, a violation of any boating safety law of chapter 79A.60 RCW.

(6) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a violation of RCW 79A.60.040 shall have the authority to arrest the person.

(7) An officer may act upon the request of a law enforcement officer in whose presence a traffic infraction was committed, to stop, detain, arrest, or issue a notice of traffic infraction to the driver who is believed to have committed the infraction. The request by the witnessing officer shall give an officer the authority to take appropriate action under the laws of the state of Washington.

(8) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing any act of indecent exposure, as defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may arrest the person.

(9) A police officer may arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that an order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated the terms of that order.

(10) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has, within twenty-four hours of the alleged violation, committed a violation of RCW 9A.50.020 may arrest such person.

(11) A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person illegally possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm or other dangerous weapon on private or public elementary or secondary school premises shall have the authority to arrest the person.

For purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the meaning defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).

(12) A law enforcement officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed a violation under RCW 77.15.160(4) may issue a citation for an infraction to the person in connection with the violation.

(13) A law enforcement officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed a criminal violation under RCW 77.15.809 or 77.15.811 may arrest the person in connection with the violation.

(14) Except as specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4), and (7) of this section, nothing in this section extends or otherwise affects the powers of arrest prescribed in Title 46 RCW.

(15) No police officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for making an arrest pursuant to subsection (2) or (9) of this section if the police officer acts in good faith and without malice.

(16)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a police officer shall arrest and keep in custody, until release by a judicial officer on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that the person has violated RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance and the police officer has knowledge that the person has a prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055 within ten years.

(b) A police officer is not required to keep in custody a person under (a) of this subsection if the person requires immediate medical attention and is admitted to a hospital.

Sec. 10. RCW 10.01.230 and 2011 c 293 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington traffic safety commission may develop and maintain a registry of qualified victim impact panels. When imposing a requirement that an offender attend a victim impact panel under RCW 46.61.5152, the court may refer the offender to a victim impact panel that is listed in the registry. The Washington traffic safety commission may consult with victim impact panel organizations to develop and maintain a registry.

(2) To be listed on the registry, the victim impact panel must meet the following minimum standards:

(a) The victim impact panel must address the effects of driving while impaired on individuals and families and address alternatives to drinking and driving and drug use and driving;

(b) The victim impact panel ((should strive to)) shall have at least two different speakers, one of whom is a victim survivor of an impaired driving crash, to present their stories in person. A victim survivor may be the panel facilitator. The victim impact panel should be a minimum of sixty minutes of presentation, not including registration and administration time;

(c) The victim impact panel shall have policies and procedures to recruit, screen, train, and provide feedback and ongoing support to the panelists. The panel shall take reasonable steps to verify the authenticity of each panelist's story;

(d) Pursuant to (b) of this subsection, the victim impact panel shall use in-person speakers for each presentation for a minimum of sixty minutes of presentation. The victim impact panel may supplement the in-person presentations with prerecorded videos, but in no case shall the videos shown exceed fifteen minutes of presentation;

(e) The victim impact panel shall charge a reasonable fee to all persons required to attend, unless otherwise ordered by the court;

(((e))) (f) The victim impact panel shall have a policy to prohibit admittance of anyone under the influence of alcohol or drugs, or anyone whose actions or behavior are otherwise inappropriate. The victim impact panel may institute additional admission requirements;

(((f))) (g) The victim impact panel shall maintain attendance records for at least five years;

(((g))) (h) The victim impact panel shall make reasonable efforts to use a facility that meets standards established by the Americans with disabilities act;

(((h))) (i) The victim impact panel may provide referral information to other community services; and

(((i))) (j) The victim impact panel shall have a designated facilitator who is responsible for the compliance with these minimum standards and who is responsible for maintaining appropriate records and communication with the referring courts and probationary departments regarding attendance or nonattendance.

Sec. 11. RCW 10.05.140 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition, the court shall order that the petitioner shall not operate a motor vehicle upon the public highways without a valid operator's license and proof of liability insurance. The amount of liability insurance shall be established by the court at not less than that established by RCW 46.29.490. As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition on any alcohol-dependency based case, the court shall also order the installation of an ignition interlock under RCW 46.20.720. The required periods of use of the interlock shall be not less than the periods provided for in RCW 46.20.720(((3))). As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition, the court may order the petitioner to make restitution and to pay costs as defined in RCW 10.01.160. To help ensure continued sobriety and reduce the likelihood of reoffense, the court may order reasonable conditions during the period of the deferred prosecution including, but not limited to, attendance at self-help recovery support groups for alcoholism or drugs, complete abstinence from alcohol and all nonprescribed mind-altering drugs, periodic urinalysis or breath analysis, and maintaining law-abiding behavior. The court may terminate the deferred prosecution program upon violation of the deferred prosecution order.

Sec. 12. RCW 46.20.311 and 2006 c 73 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department shall not suspend a driver's license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways for a fixed period of more than one year, except as specifically permitted under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.342, or other provision of law.

(b) Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.289, 46.20.291(5), 46.61.740, or 74.20A.320, whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is suspended by reason of a conviction, a finding that a traffic infraction has been committed, pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the suspension shall remain in effect until the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29 RCW.

(c) If the suspension is the result of a nonfelony violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by the alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny reinstatement until enrollment and participation in an approved program has been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), the department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by the alcohol or drug dependency agency required under RCW 46.61.524 and shall deny reinstatement until satisfactory progress in an approved program has been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, and the person is required pursuant to RCW 46.20.720 to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock, the department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon written verification by a company doing business in the state that it has installed the required device on a vehicle owned or operated by the person seeking reinstatement. The department may waive the requirement for written verification under this subsection if it determines to its satisfaction that a device previously verified as having been installed on a vehicle owned or operated by the person is still installed and functioning or as permitted by RCW 46.20.720(8). If, based upon notification from the interlock provider or otherwise, the department determines that an interlock required under RCW 46.20.720 is no longer installed or functioning as required, the department shall suspend the person's license or privilege to drive. Whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is suspended or revoked as a result of noncompliance with an ignition interlock requirement, the suspension shall remain in effect until the person provides notice issued by a company doing business in the state that a vehicle owned or operated by the person is equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device.

(d) Whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is suspended as a result of certification of noncompliance with a child support order under chapter 74.20A RCW ((or a residential or visitation order)), the suspension shall remain in effect until the person provides a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

(e)(i) The department shall not issue to the person a new, duplicate, or renewal license until the person pays a reissue fee of seventy-five dollars.

(ii) If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars.

(2)(a) Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways has been revoked, unless the revocation was for a cause which has been removed, is not entitled to have the license or privilege renewed or restored until: (i) After the expiration of one year from the date the license or privilege to drive was revoked; (ii) after the expiration of the applicable revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.3101 or 46.61.5055; (iii) after the expiration of two years for persons convicted of vehicular homicide; or (iv) after the expiration of the applicable revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.265.

(b)(i) After the expiration of the appropriate period, the person may make application for a new license as provided by law together with a reissue fee in the amount of seventy-five dollars.

(ii) If the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.20.308, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars. If the revocation is the result of a nonfelony violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by the alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit, or privilege to drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program has been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), the department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by the alcohol or drug dependency agency required under RCW 46.61.524 and shall deny reinstatement until satisfactory progress in an approved program has been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, and the person is required pursuant to RCW 46.20.720 to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other biological or technical device, the department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon written verification by a company doing business in the state that it has installed the required device on a vehicle owned or operated by the person applying for a new license. The department may waive the requirement for written verification under this subsection if it determines to its satisfaction that a device previously verified as having been installed on a vehicle owned or operated by the person is still installed and functioning or as permitted by RCW 46.20.720(8). If, following issuance of a new license, the department determines, based upon notification from the interlock provider or otherwise, that an interlock required under RCW 46.20.720 is no longer functioning, the department shall suspend the person's license or privilege to drive until the department has received written verification from an interlock provider that a functioning interlock is installed.

(c) Except for a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not then issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways, and until the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29 RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.

(3)(a) Whenever the driver's license of any person is suspended pursuant to Article IV of the nonresident violators compact or RCW 46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or 46.20.291(5), the department shall not issue to the person any new or renewal license until the person pays a reissue fee of seventy-five dollars.

(b) If the suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of this or any other state, province, or other jurisdiction involving (i) the operation or physical control of a motor vehicle upon the public highways while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or (ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical test of the driver's blood alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars.

Sec. 13. RCW 46.20.385 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any person licensed under this chapter or who has a valid driver's license from another state, who is convicted of: (i) A violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local or out-of-state statute or ordinance, or (ii) a violation of RCW 46.61.520(1)(a) or an equivalent local or out-of-state statute or ordinance, or (iii) a conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520(1) (b) or (c) if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), or (iv) RCW 46.61.522(1)(b) or an equivalent local or out-of-state statute or ordinance, or (v) RCW 46.61.522(1) (a) or (c) if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.522(1)(b) committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or (vi) who has had or will have his or her license suspended, revoked, or denied under RCW 46.20.3101, or who is otherwise permitted under subsection (8) of this section, may submit to the department an application for an ignition interlock driver's license. The department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee and upon determining that the petitioner is eligible to receive the license, may issue an ignition interlock driver's license.

(b) A person may apply for an ignition interlock driver's license anytime, including immediately after receiving the notices under RCW 46.20.308 or after his or her license is suspended, revoked, or denied.

(c) An applicant under this subsection shall provide proof to the satisfaction of the department that a functioning ignition interlock device has been installed on all vehicles operated by the person.

(i) The department shall require the person to maintain the device on all vehicles operated by the person and shall restrict the person to operating only vehicles equipped with the device, for the remainder of the period of suspension, revocation, or denial, unless otherwise permitted under RCW 46.20.720(6). ((Subject to the provisions of RCW 46.20.720(3)(b)(ii), the installation of an ignition interlock device is not necessary on vehicles owned, leased, or rented by a person's employer and on those vehicles whose care and/or maintenance is the temporary responsibility of the employer, and driven at the direction of a person's employer as a requirement of employment during working hours. The person must provide the department with a declaration pursuant to RCW 9A.72.085 from his or her employer stating that the person's employment requires the person to operate a vehicle owned by the employer or other persons during working hours.))

(ii) Subject to any periodic renewal requirements established by the department under this section and subject to any applicable compliance requirements under this chapter or other law, an ignition interlock driver's license granted upon a suspension or revocation under RCW 46.61.5055 or 46.20.3101 extends through the remaining portion of any concurrent or consecutive suspension or revocation that may be imposed as the result of administrative action and criminal conviction arising out of the same incident.

(((iii) The time period during which the person is licensed under this section shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is required under RCW 46.20.720, 46.61.5055, 10.05.140, 46.61.500(3), and 46.61.5249(4). Beginning with incidents occurring on or after September 1, 2011, when calculating the period of time for the restriction under RCW 46.20.720 (2) or (3), the department must also give the person a day-for-day credit for the time period, beginning from the date of the incident, during which the person kept an ignition interlock device installed on all vehicles the person operates. For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c)(iii), the term "all vehicles" does not include vehicles that would be subject to the employer exception under RCW 46.20.720(3).))

(2) An applicant for an ignition interlock driver's license who qualifies under subsection (1) of this section is eligible to receive a license only if the applicant files satisfactory proof of financial responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW.

(3) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an ignition interlock driver's license granted under this subsection no longer has a functioning ignition interlock device installed on all vehicles operated by the driver, the director shall give written notice by first-class mail to the driver that the ignition interlock driver's license shall be canceled. If at any time before the cancellation goes into effect the driver submits evidence that a functioning ignition interlock device has been installed on all vehicles operated by the driver, the cancellation shall be stayed. If the cancellation becomes effective, the driver may obtain, at no additional charge, a new ignition interlock driver's license upon submittal of evidence that a functioning ignition interlock device has been installed on all vehicles operated by the driver.

(4) A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the application for an ignition interlock driver's license may request a hearing as provided by rule of the department.

(5) The director shall cancel an ignition interlock driver's license after receiving notice that the holder thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of its restrictions, no longer meets the eligibility requirements, or has been convicted of or found to have committed a separate offense or any other act or omission that under this chapter would warrant suspension or revocation of a regular driver's license. The department must give notice of the cancellation as provided under RCW 46.20.245. A person whose ignition interlock driver's license has been canceled under this section may reapply for a new ignition interlock driver's license if he or she is otherwise qualified under this section and pays the fee required under RCW 46.20.380.

(6)(a) Unless costs are waived by the ignition interlock company or the person is indigent under RCW 10.101.010, the applicant shall pay the cost of installing, removing, and leasing the ignition interlock device and shall pay an additional fee of twenty dollars per month. Payments shall be made directly to the ignition interlock company. The company shall remit the additional twenty dollar fee to the department.

(b) The department shall deposit the proceeds of the twenty dollar fee into the ignition interlock device revolving account. Expenditures from the account may be used only to administer and operate the ignition interlock device revolving account program. The department shall adopt rules to provide monetary assistance according to greatest need and when funds are available.

(7) The department shall adopt rules to implement ignition interlock licensing. The department shall consult with the administrative office of the courts, the state patrol, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, ignition interlock companies, and any other organization or entity the department deems appropriate.

(8)(a) Any person licensed under this chapter who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.500 when the charge was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, may submit to the department an application for an ignition interlock driver's license under this section.

(b) A person who does not have any driver's license under this chapter, but who would otherwise be eligible under this section to apply for an ignition interlock license, may submit to the department an application for an ignition interlock license. The department may require the person to take any driver's licensing examination under this chapter and may require the person to also apply and qualify for a temporary restricted driver's license under RCW 46.20.391.

Sec. 14. RCW 46.20.720 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The court may order that after a period of suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges, and for up to as long as the court has jurisdiction, any person convicted of any offense involving the use, consumption, or possession of alcohol while operating a motor vehicle may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock. The court shall establish a specific calibration setting at which the interlock will prevent the vehicle from being started. The court shall also establish the period of time for which interlock use will be required.

(2) Under RCW 46.61.5055 and subject to the exceptions listed in that statute, the court shall order any person convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance to comply with the rules and requirements of the department regarding the installation and use of a functioning ignition interlock device installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person. The court shall order any person participating in a deferred prosecution program under RCW 10.05.020 for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance to have a functioning ignition interlock device installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person.

(3)(a) The department shall require that, after any applicable period of suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges, a person may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device if the person is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local or out-of-state statute or ordinance. The department shall require that a person may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device if the person is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.5249 or 46.61.500 and is required under RCW 46.61.5249(4) or 46.61.500(3) (a) or (b) to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person.

(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, the installation of an ignition interlock device is not necessary on vehicles owned, leased, or rented by a person's employer and on those vehicles whose care and/or maintenance is the temporary responsibility of the employer, and driven at the direction of a person's employer as a requirement of employment during working hours. The person must provide the department with a declaration pursuant to RCW 9A.72.085 from his or her employer stating that the person's employment requires the person to operate a vehicle owned by the employer or other persons during working hours.

(ii) The employer exemption does not apply:

(A) When the employer's vehicle is assigned exclusively to the restricted driver and used solely for commuting to and from employment;

(B) For the first thirty days after an ignition interlock device has been installed as the result of a first conviction of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local or out-of-state statute or ordinance; or

(C) For the first three hundred sixty-five days after an ignition interlock device has been installed as the result of a second or subsequent conviction of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local or out-of-state statute or ordinance.

(c) The ignition interlock device shall be calibrated to prevent the motor vehicle from being started when the breath sample provided has an alcohol concentration of 0.025 or more. Subject to the provisions of subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the period of time of the restriction will be no less than:

(i) For a person who has not previously been restricted under this section, a period of one year;

(ii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (c)(i) of this subsection, a period of five years;

(iii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (c)(ii) of this subsection, a period of ten years.

(4) A restriction imposed under subsection (3) of this section shall remain in effect until the department receives a declaration from the person's ignition interlock device vendor, in a form provided or approved by the department, certifying that there have been none of the following incidents in the four consecutive months prior to the date of release:

(a) Any attempt to start the vehicle with a breath alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more unless a subsequent test performed within ten minutes registers a breath alcohol concentration lower than 0.04 and the digital image confirms the same person provided both samples;

(b) Failure to take any random test unless a review of the digital image confirms that the vehicle was not occupied by the driver at the time of the missed test;

(c) Failure to pass any random retest with a breath alcohol concentration of 0.025 or lower unless a subsequent test performed within ten minutes registers a breath alcohol concentration lower than 0.025, and the digital image confirms the same person provided both samples; or

(d) Failure of the person to appear at the ignition interlock device vendor when required for maintenance, repair, calibration, monitoring, inspection, or replacement of the device.

(5) For a person required to install an ignition interlock device pursuant to RCW 46.61.5249(4) or 46.61.500(3), the period of time of the restriction shall be for six months and shall be subject to subsection (4) of this section.

(6) In addition to any other costs associated with the use of an ignition interlock device imposed on the person restricted under this section, the person shall pay an additional fee of twenty dollars per month. Payments must be made directly to the ignition interlock company. The company shall remit the additional twenty dollar fee to the department to be deposited into the ignition interlock device revolving account.)) Ignition interlock restriction. The department shall require that a person may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device:

(a) Pretrial release. Upon receipt of notice from a court that an ignition interlock device restriction has been imposed under RCW 10.21.055;

(b) Ignition interlock driver's license. As required for issuance of an ignition interlock driver's license under RCW 46.20.385;

(c) Deferred prosecution. Upon receipt of notice from a court that the person is participating in a deferred prosecution program under RCW 10.05.020 for a violation of:

(i) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance; or

(ii) RCW 46.61.5249 or 46.61.500 or an equivalent local ordinance if the person would be required under RCW 46.61.5249(4) or 46.61.500(3) (a) or (b) to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person in the event of a conviction;

(d) Post conviction. After any applicable period of suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges:

(i) Due to a conviction of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local or out-of-state statute or ordinance; or

(ii) Due to a conviction of a violation of RCW 46.61.5249 or 46.61.500 or an equivalent local ordinance if the person is required under RCW 46.61.5249(4) or 46.61.500(3) (a) or (b) to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person; or

(e) Court order. Upon receipt of an order by a court having jurisdiction that a person charged or convicted of any offense involving the use, consumption, or possession of alcohol while operating a motor vehicle may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock. The court shall establish a specific calibration setting at which the ignition interlock will prevent the vehicle from being started. The court shall also establish the period of time for which ignition interlock use will be required.

(2) Calibration. Unless otherwise specified by the court for a restriction imposed under subsection (1)(e) of this section, the ignition interlock device shall be calibrated to prevent the motor vehicle from being started when the breath sample provided has an alcohol concentration of 0.025 or more.

(3) Duration of restriction. A restriction imposed under:

(a) Subsection (1)(a) of this section shall remain in effect until:

(i) The court has authorized the removal of the device under RCW 10.21.055; or

(ii) The department has imposed a restriction under subsection (1)(b), (c), or (d) of this section arising out of the same incident.

(b) Subsection (1)(b) of this section remains in effect during the validity of any ignition interlock driver's license that has been issued to the person.

(c) Subsection (1)(c)(i) or (d)(i) of this section shall be for no less than:

(i) For a person who has not previously been restricted under this subsection, a period of one year;

(ii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (c)(ii) of this subsection, a period of five years;

(iii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (c)(ii) of this subsection, a period of ten years.

The restriction of a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance and who committed the offense while a passenger under the age of sixteen was in the vehicle shall be extended for an additional six-month period as required by RCW 46.61.5055(6)(a).

(d) Subsection (1)(c)(ii) or (d)(ii) of this section shall be for a period of no less than six months.

(e) Subsection (1)(e) of this section shall remain in effect for the period of time specified by the court.

The period of restriction under (c) and (d) of this subsection based on incidents occurring on or after the effective date of this section must be tolled for any period in which the person does not have an ignition interlock device installed on a vehicle owned or operated by the person.

(4) Requirements for removal. A restriction imposed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section shall remain in effect until the department receives a declaration from the person's ignition interlock device vendor, in a form provided or approved by the department, certifying that there have been none of the following incidents in the four consecutive months prior to the date of release:

(a) Any attempt to start the vehicle with a breath alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more unless a subsequent test performed within ten minutes registers a breath alcohol concentration lower than 0.04 and the digital image confirms the same person provided both samples;

(b) Failure to take any random test unless a review of the digital image confirms that the vehicle was not occupied by the driver at the time of the missed test;

(c) Failure to pass any random retest with a breath alcohol concentration of 0.025 or lower unless a subsequent test performed within ten minutes registers a breath alcohol concentration lower than 0.025, and the digital image confirms the same person provided both samples; or

(d) Failure of the person to appear at the ignition interlock device vendor when required for maintenance, repair, calibration, monitoring, inspection, or replacement of the device.

(5) Day-for-day credit. (a) The time period during which a person has an ignition interlock device installed in order to meet the requirements of subsection (1)(b) of this section shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is imposed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section arising out of the same incident.

(b) The department must also give the person a day-for-day credit for any time period, beginning from the date of the incident, during which the person kept an ignition interlock device installed on all vehicles the person operates, other than those subject to the employer exemption under subsection (6) of this section.

(c) If the day-for-day credit granted under this subsection equals or exceeds the period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is imposed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section arising out of the same incident, and the person has already met the requirements for removal of the device under subsection (4) of this section, the department may waive the requirement that a device be installed or that the person again meet the requirements for removal.

(6) Employer exemption. (a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the installation of an ignition interlock device is not necessary on vehicles owned, leased, or rented by a person's employer and on those vehicles whose care and/or maintenance is the temporary responsibility of the employer, and driven at the direction of a person's employer as a requirement of employment during working hours. The person must provide the department with a declaration pursuant to RCW 9A.72.085 from his or her employer stating that the person's employment requires the person to operate a vehicle owned by the employer or other persons during working hours.

(b) The employer exemption does not apply when the employer's vehicle is assigned exclusively to the restricted driver and used solely for commuting to and from employment.

(7) Ignition interlock device revolving account. In addition to any other costs associated with the use of an ignition interlock device imposed on the person restricted under this section, the person shall pay an additional fee of twenty dollars per month. Payments must be made directly to the ignition interlock company. The company shall remit the additional twenty dollar fee to the department to be deposited into the ignition interlock device revolving account. The department may waive the monthly fee if the person is indigent under RCW 10.101.010.

(8) Foreign jurisdiction. For a person restricted under this section who is residing outside of the state of Washington, the department may accept verification of installation of an ignition interlock device by an ignition interlock company authorized to do business in the jurisdiction in which the person resides, provided the device meets any applicable requirements of that jurisdiction. The department may waive the monthly fee required by subsection (7) of this section if collection of the fee would be impractical in the case of a person residing in another jurisdiction.

Sec. 15. RCW 46.20.308 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW 46.61.506, to a test or tests of his or her breath for the purpose of determining the alcohol concentration in his or her breath if arrested for any offense where, at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or was in violation of RCW 46.61.503.

(2) The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person to have been driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or the person to have been driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having alcohol in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her system and being under the age of twenty-one. Prior to administering a breath test pursuant to this section, the officer shall inform the person of his or her right under this section to refuse the breath test, and of his or her right to have additional tests administered by any qualified person of his or her choosing as provided in RCW 46.61.506. The officer shall warn the driver, in substantially the following language, that:

(a) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive will be revoked or denied for at least one year; and

(b) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's refusal to take the test may be used in a criminal trial; and

(c) If the driver submits to the test and the test is administered, the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive will be suspended, revoked, or denied for at least ninety days if:

(i) The driver is age twenty-one or over and the test indicates either that the alcohol concentration of the driver's breath is 0.08 or more; or

(ii) The driver is under age twenty-one and the test indicates either that the alcohol concentration of the driver's breath is 0.02 or more; or

(iii) The driver is under age twenty-one and the driver is in violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504; and

(d) If the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive is suspended, revoked, or denied the driver may be eligible to immediately apply for an ignition interlock driver's license.

(3) If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under subsection (2) of this section, the person arrested exercises the right, granted herein, by refusing upon the request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a test or tests of his or her breath, no test shall be given except as otherwise authorized by law.

(4) Nothing in subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section precludes a law enforcement officer from obtaining a person's blood to test for alcohol, marijuana, or any drug, pursuant to a search warrant, a valid waiver of the warrant requirement, when exigent circumstances exist, or under any other authority of law. Any blood drawn for the purpose of determining the person's alcohol, marijuana levels, or any drug, is drawn pursuant to this section when the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person is in physical control or driving a vehicle under the influence or in violation of RCW 46.61.503.

(5) If, after arrest and after any other applicable conditions and requirements of this section have been satisfied, a test or tests of the person's blood or breath is administered and the test results indicate that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood is 0.08 or more, or the THC concentration of the person's blood is 5.00 or more, if the person is age twenty-one or over, or that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood is 0.02 or more, or the THC concentration of the person's blood is above 0.00, if the person is under the age of twenty-one, or the person refuses to submit to a test, the arresting officer or other law enforcement officer at whose direction any test has been given, or the department, where applicable, if the arrest results in a test of the person's blood, shall:

(a) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the department of its intention to suspend, revoke, or deny the person's license, permit, or privilege to drive as required by subsection (6) of this section;

(b) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the department of his or her right to a hearing, specifying the steps he or she must take to obtain a hearing as provided by subsection (7) of this section;

(c) Serve notice in writing that the license or permit, if any, is a temporary license that is valid for ((sixty)) thirty days from the date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event notice is given by the department following a blood test, or until the suspension, revocation, or denial of the person's license, permit, or privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, whichever occurs first. No temporary license is valid to any greater degree than the license or permit that it replaces; and

(d) Immediately notify the department of the arrest and transmit to the department within seventy-two hours, except as delayed as the result of a blood test, a sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 that states:

(i) That the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or was under the age of twenty-one years and had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having an alcohol or THC concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503;

(ii) That after receipt of any applicable warnings required by subsection (2) of this section the person refused to submit to a test of his or her breath, or a test was administered and the results indicated that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.08 or more, or the THC concentration of the person's blood was 5.00 or more, if the person is age twenty-one or over, or that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.02 or more, or the THC concentration of the person's blood was above 0.00, if the person is under the age of twenty-one; and

(iii) Any other information that the director may require by rule.

(6) The department of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under subsection (5)(d) of this section, shall suspend, revoke, or deny the person's license, permit, or privilege to drive or any nonresident operating privilege, as provided in RCW 46.20.3101, such suspension, revocation, or denial to be effective beginning ((sixty)) thirty days from the date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event notice is given by the department following a blood test, or when sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, whichever occurs first.

(7) A person receiving notification under subsection (5)(b) of this section may, within ((twenty)) seven days after the notice has been given, request in writing a formal hearing before the department. The person shall pay a fee of three hundred seventy-five dollars as part of the request. If the request is mailed, it must be postmarked within ((twenty)) seven days after receipt of the notification. Upon timely receipt of such a request for a formal hearing, including receipt of the required three hundred seventy-five dollar fee, the department shall afford the person an opportunity for a hearing. The department may waive the required three hundred seventy-five dollar fee if the person is an indigent as defined in RCW 10.101.010. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the hearing is subject to and shall be scheduled and conducted in accordance with RCW 46.20.329 and 46.20.332. The hearing shall be conducted in the county of the arrest, except that all or part of the hearing may, at the discretion of the department, be conducted by telephone or other electronic means. The hearing shall be held within ((sixty)) thirty days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, following the date of timely receipt of such request for a formal hearing before the department or thirty days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays following ((the arrest or following)) the date notice has been given in the event notice is given by the department following a blood test, unless otherwise agreed to by the department and the person, in which case the action by the department shall be stayed, and any valid temporary license under subsection (5) of this section extended, if the person is otherwise eligible for licensing. Unless otherwise agreed to by the department and the person, the department must give five days notice of the hearing to the person. For the purposes of this section, the scope of the hearing shall cover the issues of whether a law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her system in a concentration of 0.02 or more, or THC in his or her system in a concentration above 0.00, if the person was under the age of twenty-one, whether the person was placed under arrest, and (a) whether the person refused to submit to the test or tests upon request of the officer after having been informed that such refusal would result in the revocation of the person's license, permit, or privilege to drive, or (b) if a test or tests were administered, whether the applicable requirements of this section were satisfied before the administration of the test or tests, whether the person submitted to the test or tests, or whether a test was administered pursuant to a search warrant, a valid waiver of the warrant requirement, when exigent circumstances exist, or under any other authority of law as permitted under this section, and whether the test or tests indicated that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.08 or more, or the THC concentration of the person's blood was 5.00 or more, if the person was age twenty-one or over at the time of the arrest, or that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.02 or more, or the THC concentration of the person's blood was above 0.00, if the person was under the age of twenty-one at the time of the arrest. Where a person is found to be in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or was under the age of twenty-one at the time of the arrest and was in physical control of a motor vehicle while having alcohol in his or her system in a concentration of 0.02 or THC concentration above 0.00, the person may petition the hearing officer to apply the affirmative defense found in RCW 46.61.504(3) and 46.61.503(2). The driver has the burden to prove the affirmative defense by a preponderance of the evidence. The sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 submitted by a law enforcement officer is prima facie evidence that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her system in a concentration of 0.02 or more, or THC in his or her system in a concentration above 0.00, and was under the age of twenty-one and that the officer complied with the requirements of this section.

A hearing officer shall conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, and shall administer oaths to witnesses. The hearing officer shall not issue a subpoena for the attendance of a witness at the request of the person unless the request is accompanied by the fee required by RCW 5.56.010 for a witness in district court. The sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 of the law enforcement officer and any other evidence accompanying the report shall be admissible without further evidentiary foundation and the certifications authorized by the criminal rules for courts of limited jurisdiction shall be admissible without further evidentiary foundation. The person may be represented by counsel, may question witnesses, may present evidence, and may testify. The department shall order that the suspension, revocation, or denial either be rescinded or sustained.

(8) If the suspension, revocation, or denial is sustained after such a hearing, the person whose license, privilege, or permit is suspended, revoked, or denied has the right to file a petition in the superior court of the county of arrest to review the final order of revocation by the department in the same manner as an appeal from a decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal must be filed within thirty days after the date the final order is served or the right to appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ 1.1, or other statutes or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal shall be limited to a review of the record of the administrative hearing. The appellant must pay the costs associated with obtaining the record of the hearing before the hearing officer. The filing of the appeal does not stay the effective date of the suspension, revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection must include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the department's final order of suspension, revocation, or denial as expeditiously as possible. The review must be limited to a determination of whether the department has committed any errors of law. The superior court shall accept those factual determinations supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be inferred from the final order of the department. The superior court may reverse, affirm, or modify the decision of the department or remand the case back to the department for further proceedings. The decision of the superior court must be in writing and filed in the clerk's office with the other papers in the case. The court shall state the reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a stay or other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is likely to prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant will suffer irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension, revocation, or denial it may impose conditions on such stay.

(9)(a) If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive has been or will be suspended, revoked, or denied under subsection (6) of this section, other than as a result of a breath test refusal, and who has not committed an offense for which he or she was granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW, petitions a court for a deferred prosecution on criminal charges arising out of the arrest for which action has been or will be taken under subsection (6) of this section, or notifies the department of licensing of the intent to seek such a deferred prosecution, then the license suspension or revocation shall be stayed pending entry of the deferred prosecution. The stay shall not be longer than one hundred fifty days after the date charges are filed, or two years after the date of the arrest, whichever time period is shorter. If the court stays the suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose conditions on such stay. If the person is otherwise eligible for licensing, the department shall issue a temporary license, or extend any valid temporary license under subsection (5) of this section, for the period of the stay. If a deferred prosecution treatment plan is not recommended in the report made under RCW 10.05.050, or if treatment is rejected by the court, or if the person declines to accept an offered treatment plan, or if the person violates any condition imposed by the court, then the court shall immediately direct the department to cancel the stay and any temporary license or extension of a temporary license issued under this subsection.

(b) A suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section, other than as a result of a breath test refusal, shall be stayed if the person is accepted for deferred prosecution as provided in chapter 10.05 RCW for the incident upon which the suspension, revocation, or denial is based. If the deferred prosecution is terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is completed, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial canceled.

(c) The provisions of (b) of this subsection relating to a stay of a suspension, revocation, or denial and the cancellation of any suspension, revocation, or denial do not apply to the suspension, revocation, denial, or disqualification of a person's commercial driver's license or privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle.

(10) When it has been finally determined under the procedures of this section that a nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state has been suspended, revoked, or denied, the department shall give information in writing of the action taken to the motor vehicle administrator of the state of the person's residence and of any state in which he or she has a license.

Sec. 16. RCW 10.21.055 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) When any person charged with a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.61.520, or 46.61.522, in which the person has a prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055 and the current offense involves alcohol, is released from custody at arraignment or trial on bail or personal recognizance, the court authorizing the release shall require, as a condition of release that person comply with one of the following four requirements:

(i) Have a functioning ignition interlock device installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person, with proof of installation filed with the court by the person or the certified interlock provider within five business days of the date of release from custody or as soon thereafter as determined by the court based on availability within the jurisdiction; or

(ii) Comply with 24/7 sobriety program monitoring, as defined in RCW 36.28A.330; or

(iii) Have an ignition interlock device on all motor vehicles operated by the person pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection and submit to 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to (a)(ii) of this subsection, if available, or alcohol monitoring, at the expense of the person, as provided in RCW 46.61.5055(5) (b) and (c); or

(iv) Have an ignition interlock device on all motor vehicles operated by the person and that such person agrees not to operate any motor vehicle without an ignition interlock device as required by the court. Under this subsection (1)(a)(iv), the person must file a sworn statement with the court upon release at arraignment that states the person will not operate any motor vehicle without an ignition interlock device while the ignition interlock restriction is imposed by the court. Such person must also submit to 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to (a)(ii) of this subsection, if available, or alcohol monitoring, at the expense of the person, as provided in RCW 46.61.5055(5) (b) and (c).

(b) The court shall immediately notify the department of licensing when an ignition interlock restriction is imposed: (i) As a condition of release pursuant to (a) of this subsection; or (ii) in instances where a person is charged with, or convicted of, a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.61.520, or 46.61.522, and the offense involves alcohol. If the court imposes an ignition interlock restriction, the department of licensing shall attach or imprint a notation on the driving record of any person restricted under this section stating that the person may operate only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device.

(2)(a) Upon acquittal or dismissal of all pending or current charges relating to a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.61.520, or 46.61.522, or equivalent local ordinance, the court shall authorize removal of the ignition interlock device and lift any requirement to comply with electronic alcohol/drug monitoring imposed under subsection (1) of this section. Nothing in this section limits the authority of the court or department under RCW 46.20.720.

(b) If the court authorizes removal of an ignition interlock device imposed under (((a) of)) this ((subsection[,])) section, the court shall immediately notify the department of licensing regarding the lifting of the ignition interlock restriction and the department of licensing shall release any attachment, imprint, or notation on such person's driving record relating to the ignition interlock requirement imposed under this section.

(3) When an ignition interlock restriction imposed as a condition of release is canceled, the court shall provide a defendant with a written order confirming release of the restriction. The written order shall serve as proof of release of the restriction until which time the department of licensing updates the driving record.

Sec. 17. RCW 46.61.5055 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No prior offenses in seven years. Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than three hundred sixty-four days. Twenty-four consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be suspended unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension and the facts upon which the suspension is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(a)(i), the court may order not less than fifteen days of electronic home monitoring or a ninety day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program monitoring as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device or other separate alcohol monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than three hundred sixty-four days. Forty-eight consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be suspended unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension and the facts upon which the suspension is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court may order not less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring or a one hundred twenty day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program testing as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(2) One prior offense in seven years. Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than three hundred sixty-four days and sixty days of electronic home monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of sixty days electronic home monitoring, the court may order at least an additional four days in jail or, if available in that county or city, a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390, and the court shall order an expanded alcohol assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension and the facts upon which the suspension is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than three hundred sixty-four days and ninety days of electronic home monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of ninety days electronic home monitoring, the court may order at least an additional six days in jail or, if available in that county or city, a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390, and the court shall order an expanded alcohol assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of imprisonment and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension and the facts upon which the suspension is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(3) Two or three prior offenses in seven years. Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has two or three prior offenses within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than three hundred sixty-four days, if available in that county or city, a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390, and one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring, the court may order at least an additional eight days in jail. The court shall order an expanded alcohol assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Ninety days of imprisonment and one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension and the facts upon which the suspension is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor more than three hundred sixty-four days, if available in that county or city, a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390, and one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring, the court may order at least an additional ten days in jail. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The court shall order an expanded alcohol assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension and the facts upon which the suspension is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(4) Four or more prior offenses in ten years. A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 shall be punished under chapter 9.94A RCW if:

(a) The person has four or more prior offenses within ten years; or

(b) The person has ever previously been convicted of:

(i) A violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(ii) A violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(iii) An out-of-state offense comparable to the offense specified in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection; or

(iv) A violation of RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6).

(5) Monitoring.

(a) Ignition interlock device. The court shall require any person convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance to comply with the rules and requirements of the department regarding the installation and use of a functioning ignition interlock device installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person.

(b) Monitoring devices. If the court orders that a person refrain from consuming any alcohol, the court may order the person to submit to alcohol monitoring through an alcohol detection breathalyzer device, transdermal sensor device, or other technology designed to detect alcohol in a person's system. The person shall pay for the cost of the monitoring, unless the court specifies that the cost of monitoring will be paid with funds that are available from an alternative source identified by the court. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost.

(c) ((Ignition interlock device substituted for)) 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In any county or city where a 24/7 sobriety program is available and verified by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the court shall:

(i) Order the person to install and use a functioning ignition interlock or other device in lieu of such period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring;

(ii) Order the person to a period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this section; or

(iii) Order the person to install and use a functioning ignition interlock or other device in addition to a period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this section.

(6) Penalty for having a minor passenger in vehicle. If a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 committed the offense while a passenger under the age of sixteen was in the vehicle, the court shall:

(a) Order the use of an ignition interlock or other device for an additional six months;

(b) In any case in which the person has no prior offenses within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), order an additional twenty-four hours of imprisonment and a fine of not less than one thousand dollars and not more than five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent;

(c) In any case in which the person has one prior offense within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), order an additional five days of imprisonment and a fine of not less than two thousand dollars and not more than five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent;

(d) In any case in which the person has two or three prior offenses within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), order an additional ten days of imprisonment and a fine of not less than three thousand dollars and not more than ten thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(7) Other items courts must consider while setting penalties. In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly consider the following:

(a) Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was responsible for injury or damage to another or another's property;

(b) Whether at the time of the offense the person was driving or in physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers;

(c) Whether the driver was driving in the opposite direction of the normal flow of traffic on a multiple lane highway, as defined by RCW 46.04.350, with a posted speed limit of forty-five miles per hour or greater; and

(d) Whether a child passenger under the age of sixteen was an occupant in the driver's vehicle.

(8) Treatment and information school. An offender punishable under this section is subject to the alcohol assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.

(9) Driver's license privileges of the defendant. The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person convicted of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:

(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be suspended or denied by the department for ninety days or until the person is evaluated by an alcoholism agency or probation department pursuant to RCW 46.20.311 and the person completes or is enrolled in a ninety day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In no circumstances shall the license suspension be for fewer than two days;

(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for two years; or

(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years;

(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15:

(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for one year or until the person is evaluated by an alcoholism agency or probation department pursuant to RCW 46.20.311 and the person completes or is enrolled in a one hundred twenty day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In no circumstances shall the license revocation be for fewer than four days;

(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for nine hundred days; or

(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years; or

(c) Penalty for refusing to take test. If by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308, there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) Where there have been no prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for two years;

(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years; or

(iii) Where there have been two or more previous offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years.

The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under this subsection for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under RCW 46.20.3101 arising out of the same incident.

Upon receipt of a notice from the court under RCW 36.28A.390 that a participant has been removed from a 24/7 sobriety program, the department must resume any suspension, revocation, or denial that had been terminated early under this subsection due to participation in the program, granting credit on a day-for-day basis for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under RCW 46.20.3101 or this section arising out of the same incident.

Upon its own motion or upon motion by a person, a court may find, on the record, that notice to the department under RCW 46.20.270 has been delayed for three years or more as a result of a clerical or court error. If so, the court may order that the person's license, permit, or nonresident privilege shall not be revoked, suspended, or denied for that offense. The court shall send notice of the finding and order to the department and to the person. Upon receipt of the notice from the court, the department shall not revoke, suspend, or deny the license, permit, or nonresident privilege of the person for that offense.

For purposes of this subsection (9), the department shall refer to the driver's record maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the existence of prior offenses.

(10) Probation of driving privilege. After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive required by this section, the department shall place the offender's driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.

(11) Conditions of probation. (a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence required by this section, whenever the court imposes up to three hundred sixty-four days in jail, the court shall also suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not exceeding five years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that include: (i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this state without a valid license to drive; (ii) not driving a motor vehicle within this state without proof of liability insurance or other financial responsibility for the future pursuant to RCW 46.30.020; (iii) not driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more or a THC concentration of 5.00 nanograms per milliliter of whole blood or higher, within two hours after driving; (iv) not refusing to submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol or drug concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to believe the person was driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drug; and (v) not driving a motor vehicle in this state without a functioning ignition interlock device as required by the department under RCW 46.20.720(((3))). The court may impose conditions of probation that include nonrepetition, installation of an ignition interlock device on the probationer's motor vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment, supervised probation, or other conditions that may be appropriate. The sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of probation during the suspension period.

(b) For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this subsection, the court shall order the convicted person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be suspended or deferred.

(c) For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory condition of probation imposed under this subsection, the license, permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be suspended by the court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or privilege to drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the finding of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall notify the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any extension of a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection.

(12) Waiver of electronic home monitoring. A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements of this chapter when:

(a) The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or any other necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system. However, if a court determines that an alcohol monitoring device utilizing wireless reporting technology is reasonably available, the court may require the person to obtain such a device during the period of required electronic home monitoring;

(b) The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or

(c) The court determines that there is reason to believe that the offender would violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring penalty.

Whenever the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring is waived, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the waiver and the facts upon which the waiver is based, and shall impose an alternative sentence with similar punitive consequences. The alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to, use of an ignition interlock device, the 24/7 sobriety program monitoring, additional jail time, work crew, or work camp.

Whenever the combination of jail time and electronic home monitoring or alternative sentence would exceed three hundred sixty-four days, the offender shall serve the jail portion of the sentence first, and the electronic home monitoring or alternative portion of the sentence shall be reduced so that the combination does not exceed three hundred sixty-four days.

(13) Extraordinary medical placement. An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an extraordinary medical placement by the jail administrator subject to the standards and limitations set forth in RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c).

(14) Definitions. For purposes of this section and RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504:

(a) A "prior offense" means any of the following:

(i) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(iii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.25.110 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(iv) A conviction for a violation of RCW 79A.60.040(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;

(v) A conviction for a violation of RCW 79A.60.040(1) or an equivalent local ordinance committed in a reckless manner if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 79A.60.040(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;

(vi) A conviction for a violation of RCW 47.68.220 or an equivalent local ordinance committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(vii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 47.68.220 or an equivalent local ordinance committed in a careless or reckless manner if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 47.68.220 or an equivalent local ordinance while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(viii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.09.470(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ix) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.10.490(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;

(x) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed in a reckless manner or with the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(xi) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed in a reckless manner or with the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(xii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050 or an equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

(xiii) An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of (a)(i), (ii), (x), (xi), or (xii) of this subsection if committed in this state;

(xiv) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance;

(xv) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred prosecution was granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

(xvi) A deferred prosecution granted in another state for a violation of driving or having physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the out-of-state deferred prosecution is equivalent to the deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW, including a requirement that the defendant participate in a chemical dependency treatment program; or

(xvii) A deferred sentence imposed in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred sentence was imposed was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or a violation of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

If a deferred prosecution is revoked based on a subsequent conviction for an offense listed in this subsection (14)(a), the subsequent conviction shall not be treated as a prior offense of the revoked deferred prosecution for the purposes of sentencing;

(b) "Treatment" means alcohol or drug treatment approved by the department of social and health services;

(c) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense occurred within seven years before or after the arrest for the current offense; and

(d) "Within ten years" means that the arrest for a prior offense occurred within ten years before or after the arrest for the current offense.

(15) All fines imposed by this section apply to adult offenders only.

Sec. 18. RCW 46.20.3101 and 2013 c 3 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

Pursuant to RCW 46.20.308, the department shall suspend, revoke, or deny the arrested person's license, permit, or privilege to drive as follows:

(1) In the case of a person who has refused a test or tests:

(a) For a first refusal within seven years, where there has not been a previous incident within seven years that resulted in administrative action under this section, revocation or denial for one year;

(b) For a second or subsequent refusal within seven years, or for a first refusal where there has been one or more previous incidents within seven years that have resulted in administrative action under this section, revocation or denial for two years or until the person reaches age twenty-one, whichever is longer.

(2) In the case of an incident where a person has submitted to or been administered a test or tests indicating that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.08 or more, or that the THC concentration of the person's blood was 5.00 or more:

(a) For a first incident within seven years, where there has not been a previous incident within seven years that resulted in administrative action under this section, suspension for ninety days, unless the person successfully completes or is enrolled in a pretrial 24/7 sobriety program;

(b) For a second or subsequent incident within seven years, revocation or denial for two years.

(3) In the case of an incident where a person under age twenty-one has submitted to or been administered a test or tests indicating that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.02 or more, or that the THC concentration of the person's blood was above 0.00:

(a) For a first incident within seven years, suspension or denial for ninety days;

(b) For a second or subsequent incident within seven years, revocation or denial for one year or until the person reaches age twenty-one, whichever is longer.

(4) The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under this section for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under RCW 46.61.5055 arising out of the same incident.

Sec. 19. RCW 36.28A.390 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A general authority Washington peace officer, as defined in RCW 10.93.020, who has probable cause to believe that a participant has violated the terms of participation in the 24/7 sobriety program may immediately take the participant into custody and cause him or her to be held until an appearance before a judge on the next judicial day.

(2) A participant who violates the terms of participation in the 24/7 sobriety program or does not pay the required fees or associated costs pretrial or posttrial shall, at a minimum:

(a) Receive a written warning notice for a first violation;

(b) Serve ((the lesser of two days imprisonment or if posttrial, the entire remaining sentence imposed by the court)) a minimum of one day imprisonment for a second violation;

(c) Serve ((the lesser of five days imprisonment or if posttrial, the entire remaining sentence imposed by the court)) a minimum of three days imprisonment for a third violation;

(d) Serve ((the lesser of ten days imprisonment or if posttrial, the entire remaining sentence imposed by the court)) a minimum of five days imprisonment for a fourth violation; and

(e) Serve a minimum of seven days imprisonment for a fifth or subsequent violation ((pretrial, the participant shall abide by the order of the court. For posttrial participants, the participant shall serve the entire remaining sentence imposed by the court)).

(3) The court may remove a participant from the 24/7 sobriety program at any time for noncompliance with the terms of participation. If a participant is removed from the 24/7 sobriety program, the court shall send written notice to the department of licensing within five business days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. RCW 36.28A.310 (24/7 sobriety program pilot project) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 24 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. Section 15 of this act takes effect January 1, 2019.

--- END ---