BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.170 and 2014 c 105 s 1 and 2014 c 27 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) There ((shall be)) is a license for domestic wineries; fee to be computed only on the liters manufactured: Less than two hundred fifty thousand liters per year, one hundred dollars per year; and two hundred fifty thousand liters or more per year, four hundred dollars per year.

(2) The license allows for the manufacture of wine in Washington state from grapes or other agricultural products.

(3) Any domestic winery licensed under this section may also act as a retailer of wine of its own production. Any domestic winery licensed under this section may act as a distributor of its own production. Notwithstanding any language in this title to the contrary, a domestic winery may use a common carrier to deliver up to one hundred cases of its own production, in the aggregate, per month to licensed Washington retailers. A domestic winery may not arrange for any such common carrier shipments to licensed retailers of wine not of its own production. Except as provided in this section, any winery operating as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection must comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers, except that a winery operating as a distributor may maintain a warehouse off the premises of the winery for the distribution of wine of its own production provided that: (a) The warehouse has been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; and (b) the number of warehouses off the premises of the winery does not exceed one.

(4) A domestic winery licensed under this section, at locations separate from any of its production or manufacturing sites, may serve samples of its own products, with or without charge, may sell wine of its own production at retail, and may sell for off-premises consumption wines of its own production in kegs or sanitary containers meeting the applicable requirements of federal law brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap at the time of sale, provided that: (a) Each additional location has been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; (b) the total number of additional locations does not exceed two; (c) a winery may not act as a distributor at any such additional location; and (d) any person selling or serving wine at an additional location for ((on-premise [on-premises])) on-premises consumption must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server permit. Each additional location is deemed to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. At additional locations operated by multiple wineries under this section, if the board cannot connect a violation of RCW 66.44.200 or 66.44.270 to a single licensee, the board may hold all licensees operating the additional location jointly liable. Nothing in this subsection may be construed to prevent a domestic winery from holding multiple domestic winery licenses.

(5)(a) A domestic winery licensed under this section may apply to the board for an endorsement to sell wine of its own production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars. An endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection does not count toward the two additional retail locations limit specified in this section.

(b) For each month during which a domestic winery will sell wine at a qualifying farmers market, the winery must provide the board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled wine may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board before the winery may offer wine for sale at a qualifying farmers market.

(c) The wine sold at qualifying farmers markets must be made entirely from grapes grown in a recognized Washington appellation or from other agricultural products grown in this state.

(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection include tasting or sampling privileges subject to the conditions pursuant to RCW 66.24.175. The winery may not store wine at a farmers market beyond the hours that the winery offers bottled wine for sale. The winery may not act as a distributor from a farmers market location.

(e) Before a winery may sell bottled wine at a qualifying farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization for any winery with an endorsement approved under this subsection to sell bottled wine at retail at the farmers market. This application ((shall)) must include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved winery may sell bottled wine; and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify the locations at which bottled wine may be sold. Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved winery to sell bottled wine at retail at its farmers market location, the board ((shall)) must notify the persons or entities of such application for authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under this subsection (5)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.

(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be necessary to implement this section.

(g) For the purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following minimum requirements:

(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers selling their own agricultural products;

(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are processors or resellers. However, if a farmers market does not satisfy this subsection (5)(g)(i)(B), a farmers market is still considered a "qualifying farmers market" if the total combined gross annual sales of farmers and processors at the farmers market is one million dollars or more;

(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;

(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor is prohibited; and

(E) No vendor is a franchisee.

(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.

(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.

(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the consumer.

(6)(a) During an event held by a not-for-profit society or organization holding a special occasion license issued under RCW 66.24.380, a domestic winery licensed under this section may take purchase orders, either in writing or electronically, and accept payment for wines of its own production and for off-premises consumption, subject to the following conditions:

(i) Wine produced by the domestic winery may be served for on-premises consumption by the special occasion licensee at the event for which the license was issued;

(ii) Any wine purchased from the domestic winery under this subsection must be delivered to the consumer on a date subsequent to the conclusion of the special occasion event;

(iii) Any wine purchased from the domestic winery under this subsection must be delivered to the purchaser at a location other than the location at which the special occasion event was held;

(iv) The domestic winery must comply with all requirements under chapter 66.20 RCW regarding the direct sale of wine to consumers; and

(v) The wine sold under this subsection is not subject to resale.

(b) A domestic winery that conducts sales of wine under (a) of this subsection is entitled to all proceeds from such sales, but may enter into an agreement to share sales proceeds with the not-for-profit entity holding the special occasion license under RCW 66.24.380.

(7) Wine produced in Washington state by a domestic winery licensee may be shipped out-of-state for the purpose of making it into sparkling wine and then returned to such licensee for resale. Such wine ((shall be)) is deemed wine manufactured in the state of Washington for the purposes of RCW 66.24.206, and ((shall)) may not require a special license.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.24.380 and 2012 c 2 s 112 are each amended to read as follows:

There is a retailer's license to be designated as a special occasion license to be issued to a not-for-profit society or organization to sell spirits, beer, and wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified event, such as at picnics or other special occasions, at a specified date and place; fee sixty dollars per day.

(1) The not-for-profit society or organization is limited to sales of no more than twelve calendar days per year. For the purposes of this subsection, special occasion licensees that are "agricultural area fairs" or "agricultural county, district, and area fairs," as defined by RCW 15.76.120, that receive a special occasion license may, once per calendar year, count as one event fairs that last multiple days, so long as alcohol sales are at set dates, times, and locations, and the board receives prior notification of the dates, times, and locations. The special occasion license applicant will pay the sixty dollars per day for this event.

(2) The licensee may sell spirits, beer, and/or wine in original, unopened containers for off-premises consumption if permission is obtained from the board prior to the event.

(3) In addition to offering the sale of wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption, the licensee may sell wine in original, unopened containers for on-premises consumption if permission is obtained from the board prior to the event.

(4) Sale, service, and consumption of spirits, beer, and wine is to be confined to specified premises or designated areas only.

(((4))) (5) Liquor sold under this special occasion license must be purchased from a licensee of the board.

(((5))) (6) Any violation of this section is a class 1 civil infraction having a maximum penalty of two hundred fifty dollars as provided for in chapter 7.80 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 66.12.110 and 2012 c 117 s 272 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person twenty-one years of age or over may bring into the state from without the United States, free of tax and markup, for his or her personal or household use such alcoholic beverages as have been declared and permitted to enter the United States duty free under federal law.

(2) Such entry of alcoholic beverages in excess of that herein provided may be authorized by the board upon payment of an equivalent ((markup and)) tax as would be applicable to the purchase of the same or similar liquor at retail ((from a Washington state liquor store)) in this state. The board ((shall)) must adopt appropriate regulations pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section. The board may issue a spirits, beer, and wine private club license to a charitable or nonprofit corporation of the state of Washington, the majority of the officers and directors of which are United States citizens and the minority of the officers and directors of which are citizens of the Dominion of Canada, and where the location of the premises for such spirits, beer, and wine private club license is not more than ten miles south of the border between the United States and the province of British Columbia.

Sec. 4. RCW 66.12.120 and 1995 c 100 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title ((66 RCW)), a person twenty-one years of age or over may, free of tax ((and markup)), for personal or household use, bring into the state of Washington from another state no more than once per calendar month up to two liters of spirits or wine or two hundred eighty-eight ounces of beer. Additionally, such person may be authorized by the board to bring into the state of Washington from another state a reasonable amount of alcoholic beverages in excess of that provided in this section for personal or household use only upon payment of an equivalent ((markup and)) tax as would be applicable to the purchase of the same or similar liquor at retail ((from a state liquor store)) in this state. The board ((shall)) must adopt appropriate regulations pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 66.12.240 and 2009 c 361 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this title applies to or prevents a wedding boutique or art gallery from offering or supplying without charge wine or beer by the individual glass to a customer for consumption on the premises. However, the customer must be at least twenty-one years of age and may only be offered one glass of wine or beer, and wine or beer served or consumed ((shall)) must be purchased from a Washington state licensed retailer ((or a Washington state liquor store or agency)) at full retail price. A wedding boutique or art gallery offering wine or beer without charge may not advertise the service of complimentary wine or beer and may not sell wine or beer in any manner. Any employee involved in the service of wine or beer must complete a board-approved limited alcohol server training program.

(2) ((For the purposes of this section:)) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Art gallery" means a room or building devoted to the exhibition and/or sale of the works of art.

(b) "Wedding boutique" means a business primarily engaged in the sale of wedding merchandise.

Sec. 6. RCW 66.20.010 and 2015 c 195 s 1, 2015 c 194 s 3, and 2015 c 59 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Upon application in the prescribed form being made to any employee authorized by the board to issue permits, accompanied by payment of the prescribed fee, and upon the employee being satisfied that the applicant should be granted a permit under this title, the employee must issue to the applicant under such regulations and at such fee as may be prescribed by the board a permit of the class applied for, as follows:

(1) Where the application is for a special permit by a physician or dentist, or by any person in charge of an institution regularly conducted as a hospital or sanitorium for the care of persons in ill health, or as a home devoted exclusively to the care of aged people, a special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);

(2) Where the application is for a special permit by a person engaged within the state in mechanical or manufacturing business or in scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein, or by any private individual, a special permit to purchase alcohol for the purpose named in the permit, except that the governor may waive the requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);

(3) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor at a banquet, at a specified date and place, a special permit to purchase liquor for consumption at such banquet, to such applicants as may be fixed by the board;

(4) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor on the premises of a business not licensed under this title, a special permit to purchase liquor for consumption thereon for such periods of time and to such applicants as may be fixed by the board;

(5) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer to import or purchase within the state alcohol, malt, and other materials containing alcohol to be used in the manufacture of liquor, or other products, a special permit;

(6) Where the application is for a special permit by a person operating a drug store to purchase liquor at retail prices only, to be thereafter sold by such person on the prescription of a physician, a special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);

(7) Where the application is for a special permit by an authorized representative of a military installation operated by or for any of the armed forces within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington, a special permit to purchase liquor for use on such military installation;

(8) Where the application is for a special permit by a vendor that manufactures or sells a product which cannot be effectively presented to potential buyers without serving it with liquor or by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of licensees of the board, when the said liquor is served in a hospitality room or from a booth in a board-approved suppliers' display room at the convention, and when the liquor so served is for consumption in the said hospitality room or display room during the convention, anything in this title to the contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.290, and 66.24.210;

(9) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to donate liquor for a reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner for delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of licensees of the board, when the liquor so donated is for consumption at the said reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner during the convention, anything in this title to the contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.290, and 66.24.210;

(10) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to donate and/or serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at an international trade fair, show, or exposition held under the auspices of a federal, state, or local governmental entity or organized and promoted by a nonprofit organization, anything in this title to the contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a liquor spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.290, and 66.24.210;

(11) Where the application is for an annual special permit by a person operating a bed and breakfast lodging facility to donate or serve wine or beer without charge to overnight guests of the facility if the wine or beer is for consumption on the premises of the facility. "Bed and breakfast lodging facility," as used in this subsection, means a facility offering from one to eight lodging units and breakfast to travelers and guests;

(12) Where the application is for a special permit to allow tasting of alcohol by persons at least eighteen years of age under the following circumstances:

(a) The application is from a community or technical college as defined in RCW 28B.50.030, a regional university, or a state university;

(b) The person who is permitted to taste under this subsection is enrolled as a student in a required or elective class that is part of a culinary, sommelier, wine business, enology, viticulture, wine technology, beer technology, or spirituous technology-related degree program;

(c) The alcohol served to any person in the degree-related programs under (b) of this subsection is tasted but not consumed for the purposes of educational training as part of the class curriculum with the approval of the educational provider;

(d) The service and tasting of alcoholic beverages is supervised by a faculty or staff member of the educational provider who is twenty-one years of age or older. The supervising faculty or staff member ((shall)) must possess a class 12 or 13 alcohol server permit under the provisions of RCW 66.20.310;

(e) The enrolled student permitted to taste the alcoholic beverages does not purchase the alcoholic beverages; and

(f) The permit fee for the special permit provided for in this subsection (12) must be waived by the board;

(13) Where the application is for a special permit by a distillery or craft distillery for an event not open to the general public to be held or conducted at a specific place, including at the licensed premise of the applying distillery or craft distillery, upon a specific date for the purpose of tasting and selling spirits of its own production. The distillery or craft distillery must obtain a permit for a fee of ten dollars per event. An application for the permit must be submitted for private banquet permits prior to the event and, once issued, must be posted in a conspicuous place at the premises for which the permit was issued during all times the permit is in use. No licensee may receive more than twelve permits under this subsection (13) each year;

(14) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer of wine for an event not open to the general public to be held or conducted at a specific place upon a specific date for the purpose of tasting and selling wine of its own production. The winery must obtain a permit for a fee of ten dollars per event. An application for the permit must be submitted at least ten days before the event and once issued, must be posted in a conspicuous place at the premises for which the permit was issued during all times the permit is in use. No more than twelve events per year may be held by a single manufacturer under this subsection;

(15) Where the application is for a special permit by an individual or business to sell a private collection of wine or spirits to an individual or business. The seller must obtain a permit at least five business days before the sale, for a fee of twenty-five dollars per sale. The seller must provide an inventory of products sold and the agreed price on a form provided by the board. The seller must submit the report and taxes due to the board no later than twenty calendar days after the sale. A permit may be issued under this section to allow the sale of a private collection to licensees, but may not be issued to a licensee to sell to a private individual or business which is not otherwise authorized under the license held by the seller. If the liquor is purchased by a licensee, all sales are subject to taxes assessed as on liquor acquired from any other source. The board may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 7. RCW 66.20.170 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

A card of identification may for the purpose of this title and for the purpose of procuring liquor, be accepted as an identification card by any licensee ((or store employee)) and as evidence of legal age of the person presenting such card, provided the licensee ((or store employee)) complies with the conditions and procedures prescribed herein and such regulations as may be made by the board.

Sec. 8. RCW 66.20.180 and 2005 c 151 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

A card of identification ((shall)) must be presented by the holder thereof upon request of any licensee, ((store employee, contract liquor store manager, contract liquor store employee,)) peace officer, or enforcement officer of the board for the purpose of aiding the licensee, ((store employee, contract liquor store manager, contract liquor store employee,)) peace officer, or enforcement officer of the board to determine whether or not such person is of legal age to purchase liquor when such person desires to procure liquor from a licensed establishment ((or state liquor store or contract liquor store)).

Sec. 9. RCW 66.20.190 and 2012 c 117 s 280 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the presentation by the holder and verification by the licensee ((or store employee)) of such card of identification, the licensee ((or store employee)) who is still in doubt about the true age of the holder ((shall)) must require the person whose age may be in question to sign a certification card and record an accurate description and serial number of his or her card of identification thereon. Such statement ((shall)) must be upon a five-inch by eight-inch file card, which card ((shall)) must be filed alphabetically by the licensee ((or store employee)) at or before the close of business on the day on which the statement is executed, in the file box containing a suitable alphabetical index and the card ((shall)) must be subject to examination by any peace officer or agent or employee of the board at all times. The certification card ((shall)) must also contain in bold-face type a statement stating that the signer understands that conviction for unlawful purchase of alcoholic beverages or misuse of the certification card may result in criminal penalties including imprisonment or fine or both.

Sec. 10. RCW 66.20.200 and 2003 c 53 s 295 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It ((shall be)) is unlawful for the owner of a card of identification to transfer the card to any other person for the purpose of aiding such person to procure alcoholic beverages from any licensee ((or store employee)). Any person who ((shall)) permits his or her card of identification to be used by another or transfer such card to another for the purpose of aiding such transferee to obtain alcoholic beverages from a licensee ((or store employee)) or gain admission to a premises or portion of a premises classified by the board as off-limits to persons under twenty-one years of age, ((shall be)) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars ((shall)) must be imposed and any sentence requiring community restitution ((shall)) must require not fewer than twenty-five hours of community restitution.

(2) Any person not entitled thereto who unlawfully procures or has issued or transferred to him or her a card of identification, and any person who possesses a card of identification not issued to him or her, and any person who makes any false statement on any certification card required by RCW 66.20.190, to be signed by him or her, ((shall be)) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars ((shall)) must be imposed and any sentence requiring community restitution ((shall)) must require not fewer than twenty-five hours of community restitution.

Sec. 11. RCW 66.20.210 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No licensee or the agent or employee of the licensee((, or store employee, shall)) may be prosecuted criminally or be sued in any civil action for serving liquor to a person under legal age to purchase liquor if such person has presented a card of identification in accordance with RCW 66.20.180, and has signed a certification card as provided in RCW 66.20.190.

(2) Such card in the possession of a licensee may be offered as a defense in any hearing held by the board for serving liquor to the person who signed the card and may be considered by the board as evidence that the licensee acted in good faith.

Sec. 12. RCW 66.24.210 and 2012 c 20 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby imposed upon all wines except cider sold to wine distributors ((and the Washington state liquor control board,)) within the state a tax at the rate of twenty and one-fourth cents per liter. Any domestic winery or certificate of approval holder acting as a distributor of its own production ((shall)) must pay taxes imposed by this section. There is hereby imposed on all cider sold to wine distributors ((and the Washington state liquor control board)) within the state a tax at the rate of three and fifty-nine one-hundredths cents per liter. However, wine sold or shipped in bulk from one winery to another winery ((shall)) is not ((be)) subject to such tax.

(a) The tax provided for in this section ((shall)) must be collected by direct payments based on wine purchased by wine distributors.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, every person purchasing wine under the provisions of this section ((shall)) must on or before the twentieth day of each month report to the board all purchases during the preceding calendar month in such manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board, and with such report ((shall)) must pay the tax due from the purchases covered by such report unless the same has previously been paid. Any such purchaser of wine whose applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of purchase will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent a month or fraction thereof. The board may require that every such person ((shall)) must execute to and file with the board a bond to be approved by the board, in such amount as the board may fix, securing the payment of the tax. If any such person fails to pay the tax when due, the board may ((forthwith)) suspend or cancel the license until all taxes are paid.

(c) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase wine from a certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement or a domestic winery ((shall)) must make monthly reports to the liquor ((control)) and cannabis board on wine purchased during the preceding calendar month in the manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board.

(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this section. All revenues collected during any month from this additional tax ((shall)) must be transferred to the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.

(3) An additional tax is imposed on wines subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section, at the rate of one-fourth of one cent per liter for wine sold after June 30, 1987. After June 30, 1996, such additional tax does not apply to cider. An additional tax of five one-hundredths of one cent per liter is imposed on cider sold after June 30, 1996. All revenues collected under this subsection (3) ((shall)) must be disbursed quarterly to the Washington wine commission for use in carrying out the purposes of chapter 15.88 RCW.

(4) An additional tax is imposed on all wine subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to twenty-three and forty-four one-hundredths cents per liter on fortified wine as defined in RCW 66.04.010 when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer, one cent per liter on all other wine except cider, and eighteen one-hundredths of one cent per liter on cider. All revenues collected during any month from this additional tax ((shall)) must be deposited in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.

(5)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all cider subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to two and four one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1996, and before July 1, 1997, and is equal to four and seven one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1997.

(b) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under this subsection (5) ((shall)) must be deposited in the state general fund.

(6) For the purposes of this section, "cider" means table wine that contains not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and not more than seven percent of alcohol by volume and is made from the normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe apples or pears. "Cider" includes, but is not limited to, flavored, sparkling, or carbonated cider and cider made from condensed apple or pear must.

(7) For the purposes of this section, out-of-state wineries ((shall)) must pay taxes under this section on wine sold and shipped directly to Washington state residents in a manner consistent with the requirements of a wine distributor under subsections (1) through (4) of this section, except wineries ((shall be)) are responsible for the tax and not the resident purchaser.

(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any domestic winery or wine certificate of approval holder acting as a distributor of its own production that had total taxable sales of wine in Washington state of six thousand gallons or less during the calendar year preceding the date on which the tax would otherwise be due is not required to pay taxes under this section more often than annually.

Sec. 13. RCW 66.28.030 and 2012 c 2 s 113 are each amended to read as follows:

Every domestic distillery, brewery, and microbrewery, domestic winery, certificate of approval holder, licensed ((liquor)) spirits importer, licensed wine importer, and licensed beer importer is responsible for the conduct of any licensed spirits, beer, or wine distributor in selling, or contracting to sell, to retail licensees, spirits, beer, or wine manufactured by such domestic distillery, brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, manufacturer holding a certificate of approval, sold by an authorized representative holding a certificate of approval, or imported by such ((liquor)) spirits, beer, or wine importer. Where the board finds that any licensed spirits, beer, or wine distributor has violated any of the provisions of this title or of the regulations of the board in selling or contracting to sell spirits, beer, or wine to retail licensees, the board may, in addition to any punishment inflicted or imposed upon such distributor, prohibit the sale of the brand or brands of spirits, beer, or wine involved in such violation to any or all retail licensees within the trade territory usually served by such distributor for such period of time as the board may fix, irrespective of whether the distiller manufacturing such spirits or the ((liquor)) spirits importer importing such spirits, brewer manufacturing such beer or the beer importer importing such beer, or the domestic winery manufacturing such wine or the wine importer importing such wine or the certificate of approval holder manufacturing such spirits, beer, or wine or acting as authorized representative actually participated in such violation.

Sec. 14. RCW 66.28.035 and 2012 c 39 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By the ((15th)) 20th day of each month, all spirits certificate of approval holders must file with the board, in a form and manner required by the board, a report of all spirits delivered to purchasers in this state during the preceding month ((along with a copy)). Copies of the invoices for all such purchases or other information required by the board that would disclose the identity of the purchasers must be made available upon request.

(2) A spirits certificate of approval holder may not ship or cause to be transported into this state any spirits unless the purchaser to whom the spirits are to be delivered is:

(a) Licensed by the board to sell spirits in this state, and the license is in good standing; or

(b) Otherwise legally authorized to sell spirits in this state.

(3) The liquor ((control)) and cannabis board must maintain on its web site a list of all purchasers that meet the conditions of subsection (2) of this section.

(4) A violation of this section is grounds for suspension of a spirits certificate of approval license in accordance with RCW 66.08.150, in addition to any punishment as may be authorized by RCW 66.28.030.

Sec. 15. RCW 66.28.040 and 2014 c 92 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as permitted by the board under RCW 66.20.010, no domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, distiller, domestic winery, importer, rectifier, certificate of approval holder, or other manufacturer of liquor may, within the state of Washington, give to any person any liquor; but nothing in this section nor in RCW 66.28.305 prevents a domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, domestic winery, distiller, certificate of approval holder, or importer from furnishing samples of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to authorized licensees for the purpose of negotiating a sale, in accordance with regulations adopted by the liquor ((control)) and cannabis board, provided that the samples are subject to taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210; nothing in this section prevents a domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery, certificate of approval holder, or distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or spirituous liquor for instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150; nothing in this section prevents a domestic winery, certificate of approval holder, or distributor from furnishing wine without charge, subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a not-for-profit group organized and operated solely for the purpose of enology or the study of viticulture which has been in existence for at least six months and that uses wine so furnished solely for such educational purposes or a domestic winery, or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing wine without charge or a domestic brewery, or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing beer without charge, subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, or a domestic distiller licensed under RCW 66.24.140 or an accredited representative of a distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor licensed under RCW 66.24.310, from furnishing spirits without charge, to a nonprofit charitable corporation or association exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or (6) of the internal revenue code of 1986 for use consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling it to such exemption; nothing in this section prevents a domestic brewery or microbrewery from serving beer without charge, on the brewery premises; nothing in this section prevents donations of wine for the purposes of RCW 66.12.180; nothing in this section prevents a domestic winery from serving wine without charge, on the winery premises; and nothing in this section prevents a craft distillery from serving spirits, on the distillery premises subject to RCW 66.24.145.

Sec. 16. RCW 66.44.350 and 2014 c 29 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding provisions of RCW 66.44.310, employees of businesses holding beer and/or wine restaurant; beer and/or wine private club; snack bar; spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; catering; and sports entertainment facility licenses who are ((licensees)) between eighteen and twenty-one years of age ((and over)) may take orders for, serve, and sell liquor in any part of the licensed premises except cocktail lounges, bars, or other areas classified by the Washington state liquor ((control)) and cannabis board as off-limits to persons under twenty-one years of age: PROVIDED, That such employees may enter such restricted areas to perform work assignments including picking up liquor for service in other parts of the licensed premises, performing clean up work, setting up and arranging tables, delivering supplies, delivering messages, serving food, and seating patrons: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such employees ((shall)) remain in the areas off-limits to minors no longer than is necessary to carry out their aforementioned duties: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such employees ((shall)) are not be permitted to perform activities or functions of a bartender.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. RCW 66.24.440 (Liquor by the drink, spirits, beer, and wine restaurant, spirits, beer, and wine private club, hotel, spirits, beer, and wine nightclub, sports entertainment facility, and VIP airport lounge license—Purchase of liquor by licensees—Discount) and 2011 c 325 s 3, 2009 c 271 s 8, 2007 c 370 s 20, 1998 c 126 s 8, 1997 c 321 s 29, & 1949 c 5 s 5 are each repealed.

--- END ---