BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state ferry system may not fly a flag on any vessel or terminal that it operates, other than the flag of the United States, the flag of Washington state, or a maritime flag.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "maritime flag" means a flag that is flown as part of the international code of signals for the purpose of communication between vessels.

--- END ---