BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.280 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of crime victims advocacy shall study the availability of sexual assault nurse examiners throughout the state. The study must include:

(a) An identification of areas of the state that have an adequate number of sexual assault nurse examiners;

(b) An identification of areas of the state that have an inadequate number of sexual assault nurse examiners;

(c) A list of available resources for facilities in need of sexual assault nurse examiners or sexual assault nurse examiner training; and

(d) Strategies for increasing the availability of sexual assault nurse examiners in underserved areas.

(2) When identifying strategies for increasing the availability of sexual assault nurse examiners in underserved areas, the office of crime victims advocacy shall, at a minimum, consider:

(a) Remote training or consultation via electronic means;

(b) Mobile teams of sexual assault nurse examiners;

(c) Costs and reimbursement rates for sexual assault nurse examiners; and

(d) Funding options.

(3) When performing the study under this section, the office of crime victims advocacy shall consult with experts on sexual assault victims' advocacy, experts on sexual assault investigation, and providers including, but not limited to:

(a) The department of health;

(b) The Washington coalition of sexual assault programs;

(c) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(d) The Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(e) The Washington state hospital association;

(f) The Harborview center for sexual assault and traumatic stress;

(g) The nursing care quality assurance commission; and

(h) The Washington state nurses association.

(4) The office of crime victims advocacy shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2016.

(5) This section expires July 31, 2017.

--- END ---