BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that public works contracting agencies need a streamlined and effective method for delivering small public works projects. The legislature further finds that small, mini, and microbusinesses are essential to a robust and high-functioning economy and that small and limited public works processes support small contractors and provide work to many citizens throughout the state. Therefore, the legislature intends to update and revise the small and limited works roster process to encourage greater participation by small contractors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) State agencies and any expressly authorized local government may use a uniform small works roster to award contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, repair, or improvement of real property with an estimated cost of five hundred thousand dollars or less.

(2) A state agency or authorized local government may create a single general small works roster, or may create a small works roster for different specialties or categories of anticipated work. Where applicable, small works rosters may make distinctions between contractors based on the different geographic areas served by the contractors.

(3) The small works roster or rosters shall consist of all responsible contractors who have requested to be on the list, and where required by law, are properly licensed or registered to perform such work in this state.

(a) A state agency or local government establishing a small works roster or rosters may require eligible contractors desiring to be placed on the roster or rosters to keep current records of any applicable licenses, certifications, registrations, bonding, insurance, or other appropriate matters on file with the state agency or local government as a condition of being placed on the roster.

(b) At least once a year, the state agency or local government must publish in a newspaper of general circulation a notice of the existence of the roster or rosters and solicit the names of contractors for the roster or rosters.

(c) Responsible contractors must be added to an appropriate roster or rosters at any time they submit a written request and the necessary records.

(4) For the purposes of this section and sections 3 through 5 of this act:

(a) "Equitably distributes" means that a state agency or authorized local government may not favor certain contractors on the appropriate small works roster over other contractors on the same roster who perform similar services.

(b) "State agency" means the department of enterprise services, the state parks and recreation commission, the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of transportation, any institution of higher education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated authority by the department of enterprise services to engage in construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, improvement, or repair activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) State agencies and authorized local governments using small works rosters must establish procedures for securing written or electronic quotations from contractors on the appropriate small works roster to assure that a competitive price is established and to award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder.

(2) Invitations for quotations must include, at a minimum, an estimate of the scope and nature of the work to be performed as well as the materials and equipment to be furnished. Detailed plans and specifications need not be included in the invitation. This subsection does not eliminate other requirements for architectural or engineering approvals as to quality and compliance with building codes.

(3) Invitations for quotations must be extended to at least five contractors on the appropriate small works roster who have indicated the capability to perform the kind of work being contracted in a manner that equitably distributes the opportunities for the contractors on the appropriate small works roster that are willing to perform in the geographic area of the work.

(4) If the appropriate small works roster has fewer than five contractors, an invitation to bid must be extended to all contractors on the appropriate roster who have indicated the capability to perform the kind of work being contracted.

(5) If the estimated cost of work is from one hundred fifty thousand dollars to five hundred thousand dollars, a state agency or local government that chooses to invite quotations from fewer than all the appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works roster must also notify the remaining contractors on the appropriate small works roster that quotations on the work are being sought.

(6) Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained must be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by electronic request.

(7) For projects awarded under the small works roster process established under sections 2 and 3 of this act, a state agency or authorized local government may waive the retainage requirements of chapter 60.28 RCW, thereby assuming the liability for contractor's nonpayment of laborers, mechanics, subcontractors, materialpersons, suppliers, and taxes imposed under Title 82 RCW that may be due from the contractor for the project. However, the state agency or local government has the right of recovery against the contractor for any payments made on the contractor's behalf.

(8) A state agency or authorized local government may use the small works roster process established in sections 2 and 3 of this act to solicit and award small works roster contracts to small businesses as defined under RCW 39.26.010 that are registered contractors, as well as businesses that are certified with the department of veterans affairs under chapter 43.60A RCW that are registered contractors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) In lieu of awarding contracts under sections 2 and 3 of this act, a state agency or local government that is authorized to award contracts using the small works roster process may award contracts using the limited public works process authorized under this section for work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement projects estimated to cost less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars.

(2) Public works projects under this section are exempt from other requirements of the small works roster process provided under sections 2 and 3 of this act and from the requirement that contracts be awarded after advertisement as provided under RCW 39.04.010.

(3) For limited public works projects, a state agency or authorized local government shall solicit electronic or written quotations from a minimum of three contractors from the appropriate small works roster in a manner that equitably distributes the opportunities for the contractors on the appropriate small works roster that are willing to perform in the geographic area of the work. The agency or authorized local government must award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(4) Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained must be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by electronic request.

(5) For limited public works projects awarded under this section, a state agency or authorized local government may waive the payment and performance bond requirements of chapter 39.08 RCW and the retainage requirements of chapter 60.28 RCW, thereby assuming the liability for the contractor's nonpayment of laborers, mechanics, subcontractors, materialpersons, suppliers, and taxes imposed under Title 82 RCW that may be due from the contractor for the limited public works project. However, the state agency or local government has the right of recovery against the contractor for any payments made on the contractor's behalf.

(6) A state agency or authorized local government must maintain a list of the contractors contacted and the contracts awarded during the previous twenty-four months under the limited public works process, including:

(a) Name of the contractor;

(b) Contractor's registration number;

(c) Amount of the contract;

(d) Brief description of the type of work performed; and

(e) Date the contract was awarded.

(7) A state agency or authorized local government may use the limited public works process in this section to solicit and award small works roster contracts to minibusinesses and microbusinesses as defined under RCW 39.26.010 that are registered contractors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) A state agency establishing a small works roster or rosters must adopt rules implementing sections 2 through 4 of this act. A local government establishing a small works roster or rosters must adopt an ordinance or resolution implementing sections 2 through 4 of this act.

(2) Procedures included in the rules adopted by the department of enterprise services in implementing sections 2 through 4 of this act must be included in any rules providing for small works roster or rosters that is adopted by another state agency, if the authority for that state agency to engage in these activities has been delegated to it by the department of enterprise services.

(3) An interlocal contract or agreement between two or more state agencies or local governments establishing a small works roster or rosters to be used by the parties to the agreement or contract must clearly identify the lead entity that is responsible for implementing the provisions of sections 2 through 4 of this act.

(4) The department of enterprise services shall work with the municipal research and services center to notify local governments authorized to use small works rosters of this authority and to provide guidance on how to use the authority. The guidance may take the form of a manual provided to local governments.

(5) The breaking of any project into units or accomplishing any project by phases is prohibited if it is done for the purposes of avoiding the maximum dollar amount of a contract that may be let using the small works roster process or the limited public works process.

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.335.190 and 2013 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When, in the opinion of the board of directors of any school district, the cost of any furniture, supplies, equipment, building, improvements, or repairs, or other work or purchases, except books, will equal or exceed the threshold levels specified in subsections (2) and (4) of this section, complete plans and specifications for such work or purchases shall be prepared and notice by publication given in at least one newspaper of general circulation within the district, once each week for two consecutive weeks, of the intention to receive bids and that specifications and other information may be examined at the office of the board or any other officially designated location. The cost of any public work, improvement, or repair for the purposes of this section shall be the aggregate of all amounts to be paid for labor, material, and equipment on one continuous or interrelated project where work is to be performed simultaneously or in close sequence. The bids shall be in writing and shall be opened and read in public on the date and in the place named in the notice and after being opened shall be filed for public inspection.

(2) Every purchase of furniture, equipment, or supplies, except books, the cost of which is estimated to be in excess of forty thousand dollars, shall be on a competitive basis. The board of directors shall establish a procedure for securing telephone and/or written quotations for such purchases. Whenever the estimated cost is from forty thousand dollars up to seventy-five thousand dollars, the procedure shall require quotations from at least three different sources to be obtained in writing or by telephone, and recorded for public perusal. Whenever the estimated cost is in excess of seventy-five thousand dollars, the public bidding process provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be followed.

(3) Any school district may purchase goods produced or provided in whole or in part from class II inmate work programs operated by the department of corrections pursuant to RCW 72.09.100, including but not limited to furniture, equipment, or supplies. School districts are encouraged to set as a target to contract, beginning after June 30, 2006, to purchase up to one percent of the total goods required by the school districts each year, goods produced or provided in whole or in part from class II inmate work programs operated by the department of corrections.

(4) The board may make improvements or repairs to the property of the district through a department within the district without following the public bidding process provided in subsection (1) of this section when the total of such improvements or repairs does not exceed the sum of seventy-five thousand dollars. Whenever the estimated cost of a building, improvement, repair, or other public works project is one hundred thousand dollars or more, the public bidding process provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be followed unless the contract is let using the small works roster process in ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act or under any other procedure authorized for school districts. One or more school districts may authorize an educational service district to establish and operate a small works roster for the school district under the provisions of ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act.

(5) The contract for the work or purchase shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder as described in RCW 39.26.160(2) but the board may by resolution reject any and all bids and make further calls for bids in the same manner as the original call. On any work or purchase the board shall provide bidding information to any qualified bidder or the bidder's agent, requesting it in person.

(6) In the event of any emergency when the public interest or property of the district would suffer material injury or damage by delay, upon resolution of the board declaring the existence of such an emergency and reciting the facts constituting the same, the board may waive the requirements of this section with reference to any purchase or contract: PROVIDED, That an "emergency," for the purposes of this section, means a condition likely to result in immediate physical injury to persons or to property of the school district in the absence of prompt remedial action.

(7) This section does not apply to the direct purchase of school buses by school districts and educational services in accordance with RCW 28A.160.195.

(8) This section does not apply to the purchase of Washington grown food.

(9) At the discretion of the board, a school district may develop and implement policies and procedures to facilitate and maximize to the extent practicable, purchases of Washington grown food including, but not limited to, policies that permit a percentage price preference for the purpose of procuring Washington grown food.

(10) As used in this section, "Washington grown" has the definition in RCW 15.64.060.

(11) As used in this section, "price percentage preference" means the percent by which a responsive bid from a responsible bidder whose product is a Washington grown food may exceed the lowest responsive bid submitted by a responsible bidder whose product is not a Washington grown food.

Sec. 7. RCW 28B.10.350 and 2009 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When the cost to The Evergreen State College or any regional or state university of any building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition, other than maintenance or repairs, will equal or exceed the sum of ninety thousand dollars, or forty-five thousand dollars if the work involves one trade or craft area, complete plans and specifications for the work shall be prepared, the work shall be put out for public bid, and the contract shall be awarded to the responsible bidder who submits the lowest responsive bid.

(2) Any building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition project that exceeds the dollar amounts in subsection (1) of this section is subject to the provisions of chapter 39.12 RCW.

(3) The Evergreen State College or any regional or state university may require a project to be put to public bid even when it is not required to do so under subsection (1) of this section. Any project publicly bid under this subsection is subject to the provisions of chapter 39.12 RCW.

(4) Where the estimated cost of any building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition is less than ninety thousand dollars or the contract is awarded by the small works roster procedure authorized in ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act, the publication requirements of RCW 39.04.020 do not apply.

(5) In the event of any emergency when the public interest or property of The Evergreen State College or a regional or state university would suffer material injury or damage by delay, the president of such college or university may declare the existence of an emergency and, reciting the facts constituting the same, may waive the requirements of this section with reference to any contract in order to correct the condition causing the emergency. For the purposes of this section, "emergency" means a condition likely to result in immediate physical injury to persons or to property of the college or university in the absence of prompt remedial action or a condition which immediately impairs the institution's ability to perform its educational obligations.

(6) This section does not apply when a contract is awarded by the small works roster procedure authorized in ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act or under any other procedure authorized for an institution of higher education.

Sec. 8. RCW 28B.50.330 and 2009 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The boards of trustees of college districts are empowered in accordance with the provisions of this chapter to provide for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, demolition, and major alterations of buildings and other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements, or appurtenances for the use of the aforementioned colleges as authorized by the college board in accordance with RCW 28B.50.140; to be financed by bonds payable out of special funds from revenues hereafter derived from income received from such facilities, gifts, bequests, or grants, and such additional funds as the legislature may provide, and payable out of a bond retirement fund to be established by the respective district boards in accordance with rules of the state board. With respect to building, improvements, or repairs, or other work, where the estimated cost exceeds ninety thousand dollars, or forty-five thousand dollars if the work involves one trade or craft area, complete plans and specifications for the work shall be prepared, the work shall be put out for a public bid, and the contract shall be awarded to the responsible bidder who submits the lowest responsive bid. Any project regardless of dollar amount may be put to public bid.

(2) This section does not apply when a contract is awarded by the small works roster procedure authorized in ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act.

(3) Where the estimated cost to any college of any building, improvements, or repairs, or other work, is less than ninety thousand dollars, or forty-five thousand dollars if the work involves one trade or craft area, the publication requirements of RCW 39.04.020 do not apply.

Sec. 9. RCW 35.22.620 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 5 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this section, the term "public works" means as defined in RCW 39.04.010.

(2) A first-class city may have public works performed by contract pursuant to public notice and call for competitive bids. As limited by subsection (3) of this section, a first-class city may have public works performed by city employees in any annual or biennial budget period equal to a dollar value not exceeding ten percent of the public works construction budget, including any amount in a supplemental public works construction budget, over the budget period. The amount of public works that a first-class city has a county perform for it under RCW 35.77.020 shall be included within this ten percent limitation.

If a first-class city has public works performed by public employees in any budget period that are in excess of this ten percent limitation, the amount in excess of the permitted amount shall be reduced from the otherwise permitted amount of public works that may be performed by public employees for that city in its next budget period. Twenty percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to that city shall be withheld if two years after the year in which the excess amount of work occurred, the city has failed to so reduce the amount of public works that it has performed by public employees. The amount so withheld shall be distributed to the city when it has demonstrated in its reports to the state auditor that the amount of public works it has performed by public employees has been so reduced.

Whenever a first-class city has had public works performed in any budget period up to the maximum permitted amount for that budget period, all remaining public works within that budget period shall be done by contract pursuant to public notice and call for competitive bids.

The state auditor shall report to the state treasurer any first-class city that exceeds this amount and the extent to which the city has or has not reduced the amount of public works it has performed by public employees in subsequent years.

(3) In addition to the percentage limitation provided in subsection (2) of this section, a first-class city shall not have public employees perform a public works project in excess of ninety thousand dollars if more than a single craft or trade is involved with the public works project, or a public works project in excess of forty-five thousand dollars if only a single craft or trade is involved with the public works project or the public works project is street signalization or street lighting. A public works project means a complete project. The restrictions in this subsection do not permit the division of the project into units of work or classes of work to avoid the restriction on work that may be performed by day labor on a single project.

(4) In addition to the accounting and recordkeeping requirements contained in RCW 39.04.070, every first-class city annually may prepare a report for the state auditor indicating the total public works construction budget and supplemental public works construction budget for that year, the total construction costs of public works performed by public employees for that year, and the amount of public works that is performed by public employees above or below ten percent of the total construction budget. However, if a city budgets on a biennial basis, this annual report may indicate the amount of public works that is performed by public employees within the current biennial period that is above or below ten percent of the total biennial construction budget.

Each first-class city with a population of one hundred fifty thousand or less shall use the form required by RCW 43.09.205 to account and record costs of public works in excess of five thousand dollars that are not let by contract.

(5) The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs of materials, supplies, equipment, and labor on the construction of that project. The value of the public works budget shall be the value of all the separate public works projects within the budget.

(6) The competitive bidding requirements of this section may be waived by the city legislative authority pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the work or contract.

(7) In lieu of the procedures of subsections (2) and (6) of this section, a first-class city may let contracts using the small works roster process in ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act.

Whenever possible, the city shall invite at least one proposal from a minority or woman contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this section.

(8) The allocation of public works projects to be performed by city employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining agreement.

(9) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A RCW.

(10) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any first-class city from allowing for preferential purchase of products made from recycled materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

Sec. 10. RCW 35.23.352 and 2009 c 229 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any second-class city or any town may construct any public works, as defined in RCW 39.04.010, by contract or day labor without calling for bids therefor whenever the estimated cost of the work or improvement, including cost of materials, supplies and equipment will not exceed the sum of sixty-five thousand dollars if more than one craft or trade is involved with the public works, or forty thousand dollars if a single craft or trade is involved with the public works or the public works project is street signalization or street lighting. A public works project means a complete project. The restrictions in this subsection do not permit the division of the project into units of work or classes of work to avoid the restriction on work that may be performed by day labor on a single project.

Whenever the cost of the public work or improvement, including materials, supplies and equipment, will exceed these figures, the same shall be done by contract. All such contracts shall be let at public bidding upon publication of notice calling for sealed bids upon the work. The notice shall be published in the official newspaper, or a newspaper of general circulation most likely to bring responsive bids, at least thirteen days prior to the last date upon which bids will be received. The notice shall generally state the nature of the work to be done that plans and specifications therefor shall then be on file in the city or town hall for public inspections, and require that bids be sealed and filed with the council or commission within the time specified therein. Each bid shall be accompanied by a bid proposal deposit in the form of a cashier's check, postal money order, or surety bond to the council or commission for a sum of not less than five percent of the amount of the bid, and no bid shall be considered unless accompanied by such bid proposal deposit. The council or commission of the city or town shall let the contract to the lowest responsible bidder or shall have power by resolution to reject any or all bids and to make further calls for bids in the same manner as the original call.

When the contract is let then all bid proposal deposits shall be returned to the bidders except that of the successful bidder which shall be retained until a contract is entered into and a bond to perform the work furnished, with surety satisfactory to the council or commission, in accordance with RCW 39.08.030. If the bidder fails to enter into the contract in accordance with his or her bid and furnish a bond within ten days from the date at which he or she is notified that he or she is the successful bidder, the check or postal money order and the amount thereof shall be forfeited to the council or commission or the council or commission shall recover the amount of the surety bond. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project.

If no bid is received on the first call the council or commission may readvertise and make a second call, or may enter into a contract without any further call or may purchase the supplies, material or equipment and perform the work or improvement by day labor.

(2) The allocation of public works projects to be performed by city or town employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining agreement.

(3) In lieu of the procedures of subsection (1) of this section, a second-class city or a town may let contracts using the small works roster process provided in ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act.

Whenever possible, the city or town shall invite at least one proposal from a minority or woman contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this section.

(4) The form required by RCW 43.09.205 shall be to account and record costs of public works in excess of five thousand dollars that are not let by contract.

(5) The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs of the materials, equipment, supplies, and labor on that construction project.

(6) Any purchase of supplies, material, or equipment, except for public work or improvement, where the cost thereof exceeds seven thousand five hundred dollars shall be made upon call for bids.

(7) Bids shall be called annually and at a time and in the manner prescribed by ordinance for the publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or town of all notices or newspaper publications required by law. The contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder.

(8) For advertisement and formal sealed bidding to be dispensed with as to purchases with an estimated value of fifteen thousand dollars or less, the council or commission must authorize by resolution, use of the uniform procedure provided in RCW 39.04.190.

(9) The city or town legislative authority may waive the competitive bidding requirements of this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.

(10) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A RCW.

(11) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any second class city or any town from allowing for preferential purchase of products made from recycled materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

Sec. 11. RCW 35.61.135 and 2009 c 229 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All work ordered, the estimated cost of which is in excess of twenty thousand dollars, shall be let by contract and competitive bidding. Before awarding any such contract the board of park commissioners shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation where the district is located at least once thirteen days before the last date upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for such work, plans, and specifications which must at the time of publication of such notice be on file in the office of the board of park commissioners subject to the public inspection. The notice shall state generally the work to be done and shall call for proposals for doing the same to be sealed and filed with the board of park commissioners on or before the day and hour named therein.

Each bid shall be accompanied by a certified or cashier's check or postal money order payable to the order of the metropolitan park district for a sum not less than five percent of the amount of the bid, or accompanied by a bid bond in an amount not less than five percent of the bid with a corporate surety licensed to do business in the state, conditioned that the bidder will pay the metropolitan park district as liquidated damages the amount specified in the bond, unless the bidder enters into a contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and no bid shall be considered unless accompanied by such check, cash, or bid bond. At the time and place named such bids shall be publicly opened and read and the board of park commissioners shall proceed to canvass the bids and may let such contract to the lowest responsible bidder upon plans and specifications on file or to the best bidder submitting the bidder's own plans and specifications. The board of park commissioners may reject all bids for good cause and readvertise and in such case all checks, cash, or bid bonds shall be returned to the bidders. If the contract is let, then all checks, cash, or bid bonds shall be returned to the bidders, except that of the successful bidder, which shall be retained until a contract is entered into for doing the work, and a bond to perform such work furnished with sureties satisfactory to the board of park commissioners in the full amount of the contract price between the bidder and the metropolitan park district in accordance with the bid. If the bidder fails to enter into the contract in accordance with the bid and furnish the bond within ten days from the date at which the bidder is notified that the bidder is the successful bidder, the check, cash, or bid bonds and the amount thereof shall be forfeited to the metropolitan park district. If the bidder fails to enter into a contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and the board of park commissioners deems it necessary to take legal action to collect on any bid bond required by this section, then the metropolitan park district is entitled to collect from the bidder any legal expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees occasioned thereby. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project.

(2) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (1) of this section, a metropolitan park district may let contracts using the small works roster process under ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act.

(3) Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an estimated cost in excess of forty thousand dollars, shall be by contract. Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an estimated cost of less than fifty thousand dollars shall be made using the process provided in RCW 39.04.190. Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment with an estimated cost of fifty thousand dollars or more shall be made by competitive bidding following the procedure for letting contracts for projects under subsection (1) of this section.

(4) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (3) of this section, a metropolitan park district may let contracts for purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment with the suppliers designated on current state agency, county, city, or town purchasing rosters for the materials, supplies, or equipment, when the roster has been established in accordance with the competitive bidding law for purchases applicable to the state agency, county, city, or town. The price and terms for purchases shall be as described on the applicable roster.

(5) The park board may waive the competitive bidding requirements of this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within RCW 39.04.280 applies to the purchase or public work.

Sec. 12. RCW 35.82.076 and 2000 c 138 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

A housing authority may establish and use a small works roster for awarding contracts under ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act.

Sec. 13. RCW 36.32.235 and 2009 c 229 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In each county with a population of four hundred thousand or more which by resolution establishes a county purchasing department, the purchasing department shall enter into leases of personal property on a competitive basis and purchase all supplies, materials, and equipment on a competitive basis, for all departments of the county, as provided in this chapter and chapter 39.04 RCW, except that the county purchasing department is not required to make purchases that are paid from the county road fund or equipment rental and revolving fund.

(2) As used in this section, "public works" has the same definition as in RCW 39.04.010.

(3) Except as otherwise specified in this chapter or in chapter 36.77 RCW, all counties subject to these provisions shall contract on a competitive basis for all public works after bids have been submitted to the county upon specifications therefor. Such specifications shall be in writing and shall be filed with the clerk of the county legislative authority for public inspection.

(4) An advertisement shall be published in the county official newspaper stating the time and place where bids will be opened, the time after which bids will not be received, the character of the work to be done, the materials and equipment to be furnished, and that specifications therefor may be seen at the office of the clerk of the county legislative authority. An advertisement shall also be published in a legal newspaper of general circulation in or as near as possible to that part of the county in which such work is to be done. If the county official newspaper is a newspaper of general circulation covering at least forty percent of the residences in that part of the county in which such public works are to be done, then the publication of an advertisement of the applicable specifications in the county official newspaper is sufficient. Such advertisements shall be published at least once at least thirteen days prior to the last date upon which bids will be received.

(5) The bids shall be in writing, shall be filed with the clerk, shall be opened and read in public at the time and place named therefor in the advertisements, and after being opened, shall be filed for public inspection. No bid may be considered for public work unless it is accompanied by a bid deposit in the form of a surety bond, postal money order, cash, cashier's check, or certified check in an amount equal to five percent of the amount of the bid proposed.

(6) The contract for the public work shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder. Any or all bids may be rejected for good cause. The county legislative authority shall require from the successful bidder for such public work a contractor's bond in the amount and with the conditions imposed by law.

(7) If the bidder to whom the contract is awarded fails to enter into the contract and furnish the contractor's bond as required within ten days after notice of the award, exclusive of the day of notice, the amount of the bid deposit shall be forfeited to the county and the contract awarded to the next lowest and best bidder. The bid deposit of all unsuccessful bidders shall be returned after the contract is awarded and the required contractor's bond given by the successful bidder is accepted by the county legislative authority. Immediately after the award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded and open to public inspection and shall be available by telephone inquiry.

(8) As limited by subsection (10) of this section, a county subject to these provisions may have public works performed by county employees in any annual or biennial budget period equal to a dollar value not exceeding ten percent of the public works construction budget, including any amount in a supplemental public works construction budget, over the budget period.

Whenever a county subject to these provisions has had public works performed in any budget period up to the maximum permitted amount for that budget period, all remaining public works except emergency work under subsection (12) of this section within that budget period shall be done by contract pursuant to public notice and call for competitive bids as specified in subsection (3) of this section. The state auditor shall report to the state treasurer any county subject to these provisions that exceeds this amount and the extent to which the county has or has not reduced the amount of public works it has performed by public employees in subsequent years.

(9) If a county subject to these provisions has public works performed by public employees in any budget period that are in excess of this ten percent limitation, the amount in excess of the permitted amount shall be reduced from the otherwise permitted amount of public works that may be performed by public employees for that county in its next budget period. Ten percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to that county shall be withheld if two years after the year in which the excess amount of work occurred, the county has failed to so reduce the amount of public works that it has performed by public employees. The amount withheld shall be distributed to the county when it has demonstrated in its reports to the state auditor that the amount of public works it has performed by public employees has been reduced as required.

(10) In addition to the percentage limitation provided in subsection (8) of this section, counties subject to these provisions containing a population of four hundred thousand or more shall not have public employees perform a public works project in excess of ninety thousand dollars if more than a single craft or trade is involved with the public works project, or a public works project in excess of forty-five thousand dollars if only a single craft or trade is involved with the public works project. A public works project means a complete project. The restrictions in this subsection do not permit the division of the project into units of work or classes of work to avoid the restriction on work that may be performed by public employees on a single project.

The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs of materials, supplies, equipment, and labor on the construction of that project. The value of the public works budget shall be the value of all the separate public works projects within the budget.

(11) In addition to the accounting and recordkeeping requirements contained in chapter 39.04 RCW, any county which uses public employees to perform public works projects under RCW 36.32.240(1) shall prepare a year-end report to be submitted to the state auditor indicating the total dollar amount of the county's public works construction budget and the total dollar amount for public works projects performed by public employees for that year.

The year-end report submitted pursuant to this subsection to the state auditor shall be in accordance with the standard form required by RCW 43.09.205.

(12) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, counties may use public employees without any limitation for emergency work performed under an emergency declared pursuant to RCW 36.32.270, and any such emergency work shall not be subject to the limitations of this section. Publication of the description and estimate of costs relating to correcting the emergency may be made within seven days after the commencement of the work. Within two weeks of the finding that such an emergency existed, the county legislative authority shall adopt a resolution certifying the damage to public facilities and costs incurred or anticipated relating to correcting the emergency. Additionally this section shall not apply to architectural and engineering or other technical or professional services performed by public employees in connection with a public works project.

(13) In lieu of the procedures of subsections (3) through (11) of this section, a county may let contracts using the small works roster process provided in ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act.

Whenever possible, the county shall invite at least one proposal from a minority or woman contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this section.

(14) The allocation of public works projects to be performed by county employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining agreement.

(15) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A RCW.

(16) Nothing in this section prohibits any county from allowing for preferential purchase of products made from recycled materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

(17) This section does not apply to contracts between the public stadium authority and a team affiliate under RCW 36.102.060(4), or development agreements between the public stadium authority and a team affiliate under RCW 36.102.060(7) or leases entered into under RCW 36.102.060(8).

Sec. 14. RCW 36.32.250 and 2009 c 229 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

No contract for public works may be entered into by the county legislative authority or by any elected or appointed officer of the county until after bids have been submitted to the county upon specifications therefor. Such specifications shall be in writing and shall be filed with the clerk of the county legislative authority for public inspection. An advertisement shall be published in the county official newspaper stating the time and place where bids will be opened, the time after which bids will not be received, the character of the work to be done, the materials and equipment to be furnished, and that specifications therefor may be seen at the office of the clerk of the county legislative authority. An advertisement shall also be published in a legal newspaper of general circulation in or as near as possible to that part of the county in which such work is to be done. If the county official newspaper is a newspaper of general circulation covering at least forty percent of the residences in that part of the county in which such public works are to be done, then the publication of an advertisement of the applicable specifications in the county official newspaper shall be sufficient. Such advertisements shall be published at least once at least thirteen days prior to the last date upon which bids will be received. The bids shall be in writing, shall be filed with the clerk, shall be opened and read in public at the time and place named therefor in the advertisements, and after being opened, shall be filed for public inspection. No bid may be considered for public work unless it is accompanied by a bid deposit in the form of a surety bond, postal money order, cash, cashier's check, or certified check in an amount equal to five percent of the amount of the bid proposed. The contract for the public work shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder. Any or all bids may be rejected for good cause. The county legislative authority shall require from the successful bidder for such public work a contractor's bond in the amount and with the conditions imposed by law. If the bidder to whom the contract is awarded fails to enter into the contract and furnish the contractor's bond as required within ten days after notice of the award, exclusive of the day of notice, the amount of the bid deposit shall be forfeited to the county and the contract awarded to the next lowest and best bidder. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project. The bid deposit of all unsuccessful bidders shall be returned after the contract is awarded and the required contractor's bond given by the successful bidder is accepted by the county legislative authority. In the letting of any contract for public works involving less than forty thousand dollars, advertisement and competitive bidding may be dispensed with on order of the county legislative authority. Immediately after the award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded and open to public inspection and shall be available by telephone inquiry.

As an alternative to requirements under this section, a county may let contracts using the small works roster process under ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act.

This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A RCW.

Sec. 15. RCW 36.77.075 and 2000 c 138 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

In lieu of the procedure for awarding contracts that is provided in RCW 36.77.020 through 36.77.040, a county may award contracts for public works projects on county roads using the small works roster process under ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act.

Sec. 16. RCW 39.04.010 and 2008 c 130 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Award" means the formal decision by the state or municipality notifying a responsible bidder with the lowest responsive bid of the state's or municipality's acceptance of the bid and intent to enter into a contract with the bidder.

(2) "Contract" means a contract in writing for the execution of public work for a fixed or determinable amount duly awarded after advertisement and competitive bid, or a contract awarded under the small works roster process in ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act.

(3) "Municipality" means every city, county, town, port district, district, or other public agency authorized by law to require the execution of public work, except drainage districts, diking districts, diking and drainage improvement districts, drainage improvement districts, diking improvement districts, consolidated diking and drainage improvement districts, consolidated drainage improvement districts, consolidated diking improvement districts, irrigation districts, or other districts authorized by law for the reclamation or development of waste or undeveloped lands.

(4) "Public work" means all work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement other than ordinary maintenance, executed at the cost of the state or of any municipality, or which is by law a lien or charge on any property therein. All public works, including maintenance when performed by contract shall comply with chapter 39.12 RCW. "Public work" does not include work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement performed under contracts entered into under RCW 36.102.060(4) or under development agreements entered into under RCW 36.102.060(7) or leases entered into under RCW 36.102.060(8).

(5) "Responsible bidder" means a contractor who meets the criteria in RCW 39.04.350.

(6) "State" means the state of Washington and all departments, supervisors, commissioners, and agencies of the state.

Sec. 17. RCW 39.04.200 and 2000 c 138 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

Any local government using the uniform process established in RCW 39.04.190 to award contracts for purchases must post a list of the contracts awarded under that process at least once every two months. Any state agency or local government using the small works roster process established in ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act to award contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, repair, or improvement of real property must make available a list of the contracts awarded under that process at least once every year. The list shall contain the name of the contractor or vendor awarded the contract, the amount of the contract, a brief description of the type of work performed or items purchased under the contract, and the date it was awarded. The list shall also state the location where the bid quotations for these contracts are available for public inspection.

Sec. 18. RCW 39.04.380 and 2015 c 225 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of enterprise services must conduct a survey and compile the results into a list of which states provide a bidding preference on public works contracts for their resident contractors. The list must include details on the type of preference, the amount of the preference, and how the preference is applied. The list must be updated periodically as needed. The initial survey must be completed by November 1, 2011, and by December 1, 2011, the department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the results of the survey. The report must include the list and recommendations necessary to implement the intent of this section and section 2, chapter 345, Laws of 2011.

(2) The department of enterprise services must distribute the report, along with the requirements of this section and section 2, chapter 345, Laws of 2011, to all state and local agencies with the authority to procure public works. The department may adopt rules and procedures to implement the reciprocity requirements in subsection (3) of this section. However, subsection (3) of this section does not take effect until the department of enterprise services has adopted the rules and procedures for reciprocity under this subsection or announced that it will not be issuing rules or procedures pursuant to this section.

(3) In any bidding process for public works in which a bid is received from a nonresident contractor from a state that provides a percentage bidding preference, a comparable percentage disadvantage must be applied to the bid of that nonresident contractor. This subsection does not apply until the department of enterprise services has adopted the rules and procedures for reciprocity under subsection (2) of this section, or has determined and announced that rules are not necessary for implementation.

(4) A nonresident contractor from a state that provides a percentage bid preference means a contractor that:

(a) Is from a state that provides a percentage bid preference to its resident contractors bidding on public works contracts; and

(b) At the time of bidding on a public works project, does not have a physical office located in Washington.

(5) The state of residence for a nonresident contractor is the state in which the contractor was incorporated or, if not a corporation, the state where the contractor's business entity was formed.

(6) This section does not apply to public works procured pursuant to ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act, RCW 39.04.280, or any other procurement exempt from competitive bidding.

Sec. 19. RCW 39.12.040 and 2013 c 113 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before payment is made by or on behalf of the state, or any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, of any sum or sums due on account of a public works contract, it is the duty of the officer or person charged with the custody and disbursement of public funds to require the contractor and each and every subcontractor from the contractor or a subcontractor to submit to such officer a "Statement of Intent to Pay Prevailing Wages". For a contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, the statement of intent to pay prevailing wages must include:

(i) The contractor's registration certificate number; and

(ii) The prevailing rate of wage for each classification of workers entitled to prevailing wages under RCW 39.12.020 and the estimated number of workers in each classification.

(b) Each statement of intent to pay prevailing wages must be approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries before it is submitted to the disbursing officer. Unless otherwise authorized by the department of labor and industries, each voucher claim submitted by a contractor for payment on a project estimate must state that the prevailing wages have been paid in accordance with the prefiled statement or statements of intent to pay prevailing wages on file with the public agency. Following the final acceptance of a public works project, it is the duty of the officer charged with the disbursement of public funds, to require the contractor and each and every subcontractor from the contractor or a subcontractor to submit to such officer an affidavit of wages paid before the funds retained according to the provisions of RCW 60.28.011 are released to the contractor. On a public works project where no retainage is withheld pursuant to RCW 60.28.011(1)(b), the affidavit of wages paid must be submitted to the state, county, municipality, or other public body charged with the duty of disbursing or authorizing disbursement of public funds prior to final acceptance of the public works project. If a subcontractor performing work on a public works project fails to submit an affidavit of wages paid form, the contractor or subcontractor with whom the subcontractor had a contractual relationship for the project may file the forms on behalf of the nonresponsive subcontractor. Affidavit forms may only be filed on behalf of a nonresponsive subcontractor who has ceased operations or failed to file as required by this section. The contractor filing the affidavit must accept responsibility for payment of prevailing wages unpaid by the subcontractor on the project pursuant to RCW 39.12.020 and 39.12.065. Intentionally filing a false affidavit on behalf of a subcontractor subjects the filer to the same penalties as are provided in RCW 39.12.050. Each affidavit of wages paid must be certified by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries before it is submitted to the disbursing officer.

(2) As an alternate to the procedures provided for in subsection (1) of this section, for public works projects of two thousand five hundred dollars or less and for projects where the limited public works process under ((RCW 39.04.155(3))) section 4 of this act is followed:

(a) An awarding agency may authorize the contractor or subcontractor to submit the statement of intent to pay prevailing wages directly to the officer or person charged with the custody or disbursement of public funds in the awarding agency without approval by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries. The awarding agency must retain such statement of intent to pay prevailing wages for a period of not less than three years.

(b) Upon final acceptance of the public works project, the awarding agency must require the contractor or subcontractor to submit an affidavit of wages paid. Upon receipt of the affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency may pay the contractor or subcontractor in full, including funds that would otherwise be retained according to the provisions of RCW 60.28.011. Within thirty days of receipt of the affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency must submit the affidavit of wages paid to the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries for approval.

(c) A statement of intent to pay prevailing wages and an affidavit of wages paid must be on forms approved by the department of labor and industries.

(d) In the event of a wage claim and a finding for the claimant by the department of labor and industries where the awarding agency has used the alternative process provided for in this subsection (2), the awarding agency must pay the wages due directly to the claimant. If the contractor or subcontractor did not pay the wages stated in the affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency may take action at law to seek reimbursement from the contractor or subcontractor of wages paid to the claimant, and may prohibit the contractor or subcontractor from bidding on any public works contract of the awarding agency for up to one year.

(e) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to allow an awarding agency to subdivide any public works project of more than two thousand five hundred dollars for the purpose of circumventing the procedures required by subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 20. RCW 52.14.110 and 2009 c 229 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Insofar as practicable, purchases and any public works by the district shall be based on competitive bids. A formal sealed bid procedure shall be used as standard procedure for purchases and contracts for purchases executed by the board of commissioners. Formal sealed bidding shall not be required for:

(1) The purchase of any materials, supplies, or equipment if the cost will not exceed the sum of ten thousand dollars. However, whenever the estimated cost does not exceed fifty thousand dollars, the commissioners may by resolution use the process provided in RCW 39.04.190 to award contracts;

(2) Contracting for work to be done involving the construction or improvement of a fire station or other buildings where the estimated cost will not exceed the sum of twenty thousand dollars, which includes the costs of labor, material, and equipment;

(3) Contracts using the small works roster process under ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act; and

(4) Any contract for purchases or public work pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.

Sec. 21. RCW 53.08.120 and 2009 c 74 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All material and work required by a port district not meeting the definition of public work in RCW 39.04.010(4) may be procured in the open market or by contract and all work ordered may be done by contract or day labor.

(2)(a) All such contracts for work meeting the definition of "public work" in RCW 39.04.010(4), the estimated cost of which exceeds three hundred thousand dollars, shall be awarded using a competitive bid process. The contract must be awarded at public bidding upon notice published in a newspaper of general circulation in the district at least thirteen days before the last date upon which bids will be received, calling for bids upon the work, plans and specifications for which shall then be on file in the office of the commission for public inspection. The same notice may call for bids on such work or material based upon plans and specifications submitted by the bidder. The competitive bidding requirements for purchases or public works may be waived pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.

(b) For all contracts related to work meeting the definition of "public work" in RCW 39.04.010(4) ((that are estimated at three hundred thousand dollars or less)), a port district may let contracts using the small works roster process under ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act in lieu of advertising for bids. Whenever possible, the managing official shall invite at least one proposal from a minority contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this section.

When awarding such a contract for work, when utilizing proposals from the small works roster, the managing official shall give weight to the contractor submitting the lowest and best proposal, and whenever it would not violate the public interest, such contracts shall be distributed equally among contractors, including minority contractors, on the small works roster.

Sec. 22. RCW 54.04.070 and 2008 c 216 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any item, or items of the same kind of materials, equipment, or supplies purchased, the estimated cost of which is in excess of fifteen thousand dollars, exclusive of sales tax, shall be by contract. However, a district may make purchases of the same kind of items of materials, equipment, and supplies not exceeding seven thousand five hundred dollars in any calendar month without a contract, purchasing any excess thereof over seven thousand five hundred dollars by contract.

(2) Any work ordered by a district commission, the estimated cost of which is in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars, exclusive of sales tax, shall be by contract. However, a district commission may have its own regularly employed personnel perform work which is an accepted industry practice under prudent utility management without a contract. For purposes of this section, "prudent utility management" means performing work with regularly employed personnel utilizing material of a worth not exceeding one hundred fifty thousand dollars in value without a contract. This limit on the value of material being utilized in work being performed by regularly employed personnel shall not include the value of individual items of equipment purchased or acquired and used as one unit of a project.

(3) Before awarding a contract required under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the commission shall publish a notice once or more in a newspaper of general circulation in the district at least thirteen days before the last date upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for the work or materials. Plans and specifications for the work or materials shall at the time of publication be on file at the office of the district and subject to public inspection. Any published notice ordering work to be performed for the district shall be mailed at the time of publication to any established trade association which files a written request with the district to receive such notices. The commission may, at the same time and as part of the same notice, invite tenders for the work or materials upon plans and specifications to be submitted by the bidders.

(4) As an alternative to the competitive bidding requirements of this section and RCW 54.04.080, a district may let contracts using the small works roster process under ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act.

(5) Whenever equipment or materials required by a district are held by a governmental agency and are available for sale but such agency is unwilling to submit a proposal, the commission may ascertain the price of such items and file a statement of such price supported by the sworn affidavit of one member of the commission, and may consider such price as a bid without a deposit or bond.

(6) Pursuant to RCW 39.04.280, the commission may waive the competitive bidding requirements of this section and RCW 54.04.080 if an exemption contained within RCW 39.04.280 applies to the purchase or public work.

Sec. 23. RCW 57.08.050 and 2015 c 136 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All work ordered, the estimated cost of which is in excess of fifty thousand dollars, shall be let by contract and competitive bidding. Before awarding any such contract the board of commissioners shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation where the district is located at least once thirteen days before the last date upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for such work, plans and specifications which must at the time of publication of such notice be on file in the office of the board of commissioners subject to the public inspection. The notice shall state generally the work to be done and shall call for proposals for doing the same to be sealed and filed with the board of commissioners on or before the day and hour named therein.

Each bid shall be accompanied by a certified or cashier's check or postal money order payable to the order of the county treasurer for a sum not less than five percent of the amount of the bid, or accompanied by a bid bond in an amount not less than five percent of the bid with a corporate surety licensed to do business in the state, conditioned that the bidder will pay the district as liquidated damages the amount specified in the bond, unless the bidder enters into a contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and no bid shall be considered unless accompanied by such check, cash or bid bond. At the time and place named such bids shall be publicly opened and read and the board of commissioners shall proceed to canvass the bids and may let such contract to the lowest responsible bidder upon plans and specifications on file or to the best bidder submitting the bidder's own plans and specifications. The board of commissioners may reject all bids for good cause and readvertise and in such case all checks, cash or bid bonds shall be returned to the bidders. If the contract is let, then all checks, cash, or bid bonds shall be returned to the bidders, except that of the successful bidder, which shall be retained until a contract shall be entered into for doing the work, and a bond to perform such work furnished with sureties satisfactory to the board of commissioners in the full amount of the contract price between the bidder and the commission in accordance with the bid. If the bidder fails to enter into the contract in accordance with the bid and furnish the bond within ten days from the date at which the bidder is notified that the bidder is the successful bidder, the check, cash, or bid bonds and the amount thereof shall be forfeited to the district. If the bidder fails to enter into a contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and the board of commissioners deems it necessary to take legal action to collect on any bid bond required by this section, then the district shall be entitled to collect from the bidder any legal expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees occasioned thereby. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project.

(2) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (1) of this section, a water-sewer district may let contracts using the small works roster process under ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act.

(3) Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an estimated cost in excess of forty thousand dollars, shall be by contract. Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an estimated cost of less than fifty thousand dollars shall be made using the process provided in RCW 39.04.190. Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment with an estimated cost of fifty thousand dollars or more shall be made by competitive bidding following the procedure for letting contracts for projects under subsection (1) of this section.

(4) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (3) of this section, a water-sewer district may let contracts for purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment with the suppliers designated on current state agency, county, city, or town purchasing rosters for the materials, supplies, or equipment, when the roster has been established in accordance with the competitive bidding law for purchases applicable to the state agency, county, city, or town. The price and terms for purchases shall be as described on the applicable roster.

(5) The board may waive the competitive bidding requirements of this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.

Sec. 24. RCW 70.44.140 and 2009 c 229 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All materials purchased and work ordered, the estimated cost of which is in excess of seventy-five thousand dollars, shall be by contract. Before awarding any such contract, the commission shall publish a notice at least thirteen days before the last date upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for such work. The plans and specifications must at the time of the publication of such notice be on file at the office of the public hospital district, subject to public inspection: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the commission may at the same time, and as part of the same notice, invite tenders for the work or materials upon plans and specifications to be submitted by bidders. The notice shall state generally the work to be done, and shall call for proposals for doing the same, to be sealed and filed with the commission on or before the day and hour named therein. Each bid shall be accompanied by bid proposal security in the form of a certified check, cashier's check, postal money order, or surety bond made payable to the order of the commission, for a sum not less than five percent of the amount of the bid, and no bid shall be considered unless accompanied by such bid proposal security. At the time and place named, such bids shall be publicly opened and read, and the commission shall proceed to canvass the bids, and may let such contract to the lowest responsible bidder upon plans and specifications on file, or to the best bidder submitting his or her own plans and specifications: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no contract shall be let in excess of the estimated cost of the materials or work, or if, in the opinion of the commission, all bids are unsatisfactory, they may reject all of them and readvertise, and in such case all bid proposal security shall be returned to the bidders. If the contract is let, then all bid proposal security shall be returned to the bidders, except that of the successful bidder, which is retained until a contract shall be entered into for the purchase of such materials for doing such work, and a bond to perform such work furnished, with sureties satisfactory to the commission, in an amount to be fixed by the commission, not less than twenty-five percent of contract price in any case, between the bidder and commission, in accordance with the bid. If such bidder fails to enter into the contract in accordance with the bid and furnish such bond within ten days from the date at which the bidder is notified that he or she is the successful bidder, the bid proposal security and the amount thereof shall be forfeited to the public hospital district. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project.

(2) As an alternative to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, a public hospital district may let contracts using the small works roster process under ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act.

(3) Any purchases with an estimated cost of up to fifteen thousand dollars may be made using the process provided in RCW 39.04.190.

(4) The commission may waive the competitive bidding requirements of this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.

Sec. 25. RCW 87.03.436 and 2010 c 201 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

All contract projects((, the estimated cost of which is less than three hundred thousand dollars,)) may be awarded using the small works roster process under ((RCW 39.04.155)) sections 2 through 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26. Sections 2 through 5 of this act are each added to chapter 39.04 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 39.04.155 (Small works roster contract procedures—Limited public works process—Definition) and 2015 c 225 s 33, 2009 c 74 s 1, & 2008 c 130 s 17; and

(2) RCW 39.04.156 (Small works roster manual—Notification to local governments) and 2000 c 138 s 104.

--- END ---