BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds and declares that privately operated transportation services are a vital part of the transportation system within the state, providing prearranged and on-demand transportation services for compensation to state residents, tourists, and out-of-state business people throughout the state. Consequently, the setting of uniform requirements for surety bonds and insurance for privately operated transportation services and their motor vehicles is a matter of statewide importance.

Therefore, the state of Washington fully occupies and preempts the entire field of regulation over the provision of surety bonds and public liability insurance for motor vehicles offered for hire and for hire operators as regulated under chapter 46.72 RCW, taxicab companies as regulated under chapter 81.72 RCW, and personal vehicles used to provide commercial transportation services as regulated under chapter 48.177 RCW.

(2) Cities, towns, counties, port districts, any other municipalities, and agencies of the state of Washington may enact only those laws, ordinances, and rules relating to a showing of compliance with insurance requirements for: For hire operators and vehicles operated for hire under chapter 46.72 RCW, taxicabs under chapter 81.72 RCW, or personal vehicles used to provide commercial transportation services under chapter 48.177 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.72.040 and 2010 c 8 s 9089 are each amended to read as follows:

Before a permit is issued, every for hire operator shall be required to deposit and thereafter keep on file with the director a surety bond running to the state of Washington covering each and every ((for hire)) vehicle as may be owned or leased by him or her and used in the conduct of his or her business as a for hire operator. Such bond shall be in the sum of one hundred thousand dollars for any recovery for death or personal injury by one person, and three hundred thousand dollars for all persons killed or receiving personal injury by reason of one act of negligence, and twenty-five thousand dollars for damage to property of any person other than the assured, with a good and sufficient surety company licensed to do business in this state as surety and to be approved by the director, conditioned for the faithful compliance by the principal of said bond with the provisions of this chapter, and to pay all damages which may be sustained by any person injured by reason of any careless negligence or unlawful act on the part of said principal, his or her agents or employees in the conduct of said business or in the operation of any motor propelled vehicle used in transporting passengers for compensation on any public highway of this state.

Sec. 3. RCW 81.72.210 and 1984 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

To protect the public health, safety, and welfare, cities, towns, counties, and port districts of the state may license, control, and regulate privately operated taxicab transportation services operating within their respective jurisdictions. The power to regulate includes:

(1) Regulating entry into the business of providing taxicab transportation services;

(2) Requiring a license to be purchased as a condition of operating a taxicab and the right to revoke, cancel, or refuse to reissue a license for failure to comply with regulatory requirements;

(3) Controlling the rates charged for providing taxicab transportation service and the manner in which rates are calculated and collected, including the establishment of zones as the basis for rates;

(4) Regulating the routes of taxicabs, including restricting access to airports;

(5) Establishing safety((,)) and equipment((, and insurance)) requirements; and

(6) Any other requirements adopted to ensure safe and reliable taxicab service.

--- END ---