BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that there is great value to the services provided by kenneling and boarding facilities and that agriculturally zoned land is an appropriate venue for locating these facilities. The legislature intends to limit potential barriers to the location of canine kenneling and equine boarding facilities on agriculturally zoned land.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Counties must allow canine kenneling and equine boarding on land zoned for agriculture. A county may adopt and apply other development regulations that do not have the effect of precluding the siting of canine kenneling and equine boarding services and facilities in areas where that use is allowed.

(2) For the purposes of this section "canine kenneling" means the private or commercial temporary housing of dogs.

--- END ---