BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The governor is strongly encouraged to prioritize gender equality when making appointments or reappointments to state boards, commissions, councils, or similar entities.

(2) By December 1, 2018, the governor must report to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature on progress made towards the goal of fifty percent female membership on state boards, commissions, councils, and other similar entities for which the governor is the appointing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Nothing in this act may be construed to prohibit any person serving as a member of an entity upon the effective date of this section from completing the term for which the person was appointed.

--- END ---