BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.17.040 and 2014 c 59 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall collect a service fee of:

(a) Twelve dollars for changes in a certificate of title, with or without registration renewal, or for verification of record and preparation of an affidavit of lost title other than at the time of the certificate of title application or transfer; and

(b) Five dollars for a registration renewal, issuing a transit permit, or any other service under this section.

(2) Service fees collected under this section by the department or county auditor or other agent appointed by the director must be distributed as follows: (a) Any fees associated with vehicles registered under RCW 46.17.350(1) (i) and (s) to be deposited into the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account under RCW 46.09.510; (b) any fees associated with vehicles registered under RCW 46.17.350(1) (l) and (m) to be deposited into the snowmobile account under RCW 46.68.350; and (c) the remaining fees to be credited to the capital vessel replacement account under RCW 47.60.322.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.60.322 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 213 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The capital vessel replacement account is created in the motor vehicle fund. All revenues generated from the vessel replacement surcharge under RCW 47.60.315(7) and service fees collected by the department of licensing or county auditor or other agent appointed by the director under RCW 46.17.040(2)(c), 46.17.050, and 46.17.060 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the construction or purchase of ferry vessels and to pay the principal and interest on bonds authorized for the construction or purchase of ferry vessels. However, expenditures from the account must first be used to support the construction or purchase, including any applicable financing costs, of a ferry vessel with a carrying capacity of at least one hundred forty-four cars.

(2) The state treasurer may transfer moneys from the capital vessel replacement account to the transportation 2003 account (nickel account) for debt service on bonds issued for the construction of 144-car class ferry vessels.

(3) The legislature may transfer from the capital vessel replacement account to the connecting Washington account created under RCW 46.68.395 such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the capital vessel replacement account to be used for ferry terminal construction and preservation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2016.

--- END ---