BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.83.020 and 2014 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be the duty of the department of health to require screening tests of all newborn infants born in any setting upon receiving consent from a parent or legal guardian as provided in subsection (3) of this section. Each hospital or health care provider attending a birth outside of a hospital shall collect and submit a sample blood specimen for all newborns no more than forty-eight hours following birth. The department of health shall conduct screening tests of samples for the detection of phenylketonuria and other heritable or metabolic disorders leading to intellectual disabilities or physical defects as defined by the state board of health: PROVIDED, That no such tests shall be given to any newborn infant whose parents or guardian object thereto on the grounds that such tests conflict with their religious tenets and practices.

(2) The sample required in subsection (1) of this section must be received by the department (([of health])) of health within seventy-two hours of the collection of the sample, excluding any day that the Washington state public health laboratory is closed.

(3) A hospital or health care provider attending a birth outside of a hospital must obtain the written consent of a parent or legal guardian prior to the collection of a sample blood specimen. The consent form must be developed by the department of health and include:

(a) A brief, single-page, plain language explanation of, and the purpose for, the blood specimen screening and retention of the blood specimens collected pursuant to this chapter;

(b) An explanation that the blood specimen will be destroyed no later than the date that the person who is the subject of the blood specimen is eighteen years old;

(c) A statement that signing the form is a verification of the parent's or legal guardian's consent for the hospital or health care provider attending the birth outside of a hospital to collect a sample blood specimen and submit it to the department of health's newborn screening program; and

(d) A space for the parent or legal guardian of the newborn to sign and date the form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 70.83 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of health shall destroy any blood specimen no later than the date that the person who is the subject of that specimen is eighteen years old.

(2) The department of health shall adopt a procedure and timetable for the destruction of blood specimens collected pursuant to this chapter. The timetable must ensure that any blood specimen is destroyed no later than the date that the person who is the subject of the blood specimen is eighteen years old. The procedure must be available to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect January 1, 2017.

--- END ---