BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

A transportation project proposed by the department of transportation must evaluate environmental impacts under the processes required by RCW 43.21C.030 to the public transit operations of a transit authority. For purposes of this section, "transit authority" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 9.91.025.

--- END ---