BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.57A.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 44 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any conference which finds it desirable to establish a public transportation benefit area or change the boundaries of any existing public transportation benefit area shall fix a date for a public hearing thereon, or the legislative bodies of any two or more component cities or the county legislative body by resolution may require the public transportation improvement conference to fix a date for a public hearing thereon. Prior to the convening of the public hearing, the county governing body shall delineate the area of the county proposed to be included within the transportation benefit area, and shall furnish a copy of such delineation to each incorporated city within such area. Each city shall advise the county governing body, on a preliminary basis, of its desire to be included or excluded from the transportation benefit area by means of an ordinance adopted by the legislative body of that city. The county governing body shall cause the delineations to be revised to reflect the wishes of such incorporated cities. This delineation shall be considered by the conference at the public hearing for inclusion in the public transportation benefit area.

Notice of such hearing shall be published once a week for at least four consecutive weeks in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the area. The notice shall contain a description and map of the boundaries of the proposed public transportation benefit area and shall state the time and place of the hearing and the fact that any changes in the boundaries of the public transportation benefit area will be considered at such time and place. At such hearing or any continuation thereof, any interested person may appear and be heard on all matters relating to the effect of the formation of the proposed public transportation benefit area.

The conference may make such changes in the boundaries of the public transportation benefit area as they shall deem reasonable and proper, but may not delete any portion of the proposed area which will create an island of included or excluded lands, and may not delete a portion of any city. If the conference shall determine that any additional territory should be included in the public transportation benefit area, a second hearing shall be held and notice given in the same manner as for the original hearing. The conference may adjourn the hearing on the formation of a public transportation benefit area from time to time not exceeding thirty days in all.

Following the conclusion of such hearing the conference shall adopt a resolution fixing the boundaries of the proposed public transportation benefit area, declaring that the formation of the proposed public transportation benefit area will be conducive to the welfare and benefit of the persons and property therein.

Within thirty days of the adoption of such conference resolution, the county legislative authority of each county wherein a conference has established proposed boundaries of a public transportation benefit area, may by resolution, upon making a legislative finding that the proposed benefit area includes portions of the county which could not be reasonably expected to benefit from such benefit area or excludes portions of the county which could be reasonably expected to benefit from its creation, disapprove and terminate the establishment of such public transportation benefit area within such county.

--- END ---