BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.17.005 and 2010 c 161 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who applies for a vehicle registration or for any other right to operate a vehicle on the highways of this state shall pay a ((three)) four dollar and fifty cent filing fee in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.

(2) A person who applies for a certificate of title shall pay a ((four)) five dollar and fifty cent filing fee in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.

(3) The filing fees established in this section must be distributed under RCW 46.68.400.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.17.040 and 2014 c 59 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall collect a service fee of:

(a) ((Twelve)) Eighteen dollars for changes in a certificate of title, with or without registration renewal, or for verification of record and preparation of an affidavit of lost title other than at the time of the certificate of title application or transfer; and

(b) ((Five)) Nine dollars for a registration renewal, issuing a transit permit, or any other service under this section.

(2) Service fees collected under this section by the department or county auditor or other agent appointed by the director must be credited to the capital vessel replacement account under RCW 47.60.322.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.68.400 and 2010 c 161 s 819 are each amended to read as follows:

A filing fee established in RCW 46.17.005 must be distributed as follows:

(1) If paid to the county auditor or other agent or subagent appointed by the director, the fee must be distributed to the county treasurer and credited to the county current expense fund except that fifty cents of the fee must be distributed at least quarterly by the department to each county in the state equally.

(2) If the fee is paid to another agent of the director, the fee must be used by the agent to defray his or her expenses in handling the application.

(3) If the fee is collected by the state patrol as agent for the director, the fee must be certified to the state treasurer and deposited to the credit of the state patrol highway account.

(4) If the fee is collected by the department of transportation as agent for the director, the fee must be certified to the state treasurer and deposited to the credit of the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

(5) If the fee is collected by the director or branches of the department, the fee must be certified to the state treasurer and deposited to the credit of the highway safety fund, except that two dollars of the fee must be deposited into the multimodal transportation account if the fee is collected in conjunction with RCW 46.17.350(1) (c) or (k) or 46.17.355.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect January 1, 2017.

--- END ---