BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.10.420 and 2013 c 222 s 18 and 2013 c 186 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The following public bodies of the state of Washington are authorized to award job order contracts and use the job order contracting procedure:

(a) The department of enterprise services;

(b) The state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College;

(c) Sound transit (central Puget Sound regional transit authority);

(d) Every city with a population greater than seventy thousand and any public authority chartered by such city under RCW 35.21.730 through 35.21.755;

(e) Every county with a population greater than four hundred fifty thousand;

(f) Every port district with total revenues greater than fifteen million dollars per year;

(g) Every public utility district with revenues from energy sales greater than twenty-three million dollars per year;

(h) Every school district;

(i) The state ferry system; ((and))

(j) The Washington state department of transportation, for the administration of building improvement, replacement, and renovation projects only; and

(k) Every public hospital district with total revenues greater than fifteen million dollars per year.

(2)(a) The department of enterprise services may issue job order contract work orders for Washington state parks department projects and public hospital districts.

(b) The department of enterprise services, the University of Washington, and Washington State University may issue job order contract work orders for the state regional universities and The Evergreen State College.

(3) Public bodies may use a job order contract for public works projects when a determination is made that the use of job order contracts will benefit the public by providing an effective means of reducing the total lead-time and cost for the construction of public works projects for repair and renovation required at public facilities through the use of unit price books and work orders by eliminating time-consuming, costly aspects of the traditional public works process, which require separate contracting actions for each small project.

--- END ---