BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This 2016 act constitutes the alternative to Initiative Measure No. 732, which has been proposed to the legislature. The secretary of the state is directed to place this 2016 act on the ballot in conjunction with Initiative Measure No. 732, pursuant to Article II, section 1(a) of the state Constitution.

--- END ---