BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act may be known and cited as the Washington gender privacy protection act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this chapter or in any other provision of state law grants the right to any person who possesses male anatomy or male deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) to enter into or use a public or private facility that is open to the public and is or has been segregated by gender for the private use of those who possess female anatomy or female deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) including, but not limited to, a bathroom, restroom, toilet, shower, locker room, or sauna.

(2) Nothing in this chapter or in any other provision of state law grants the right to any person who possesses female anatomy or female deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) to enter into or use a public or private facility that is open to the public and is or has been segregated by gender for the use of those who possess male anatomy or male deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) including, but not limited to, a bathroom, restroom, toilet, shower, locker room, or sauna.

--- END ---