BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The state Constitution requires five justices on the state supreme court. The people want a constitutional court that is accountable to the people. Let us always remember: We are a government of, for, and by the people.

Sec. 2. RCW 2.04.070 and 1909 c 24 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The supreme court, from and after ((February 26, 1909)) the effective date of this section, shall consist of ((nine)) five judges as required by Article 4, section 2 of the state Constitution.

Sec. 3. RCW 2.04.071 and 1971 c 81 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the next general election, and at each ((biennial)) general election every six years thereafter, there shall be elected ((three)) five justices of the supreme court, to hold for the full term of six years, unless provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section, and until their successors are elected and qualified, commencing with the second Monday in January succeeding their election.

(2)(a) At the next general election after the effective date of this section, any of the current nine justices on the state supreme court may run for any of the five seats set forth in RCW 2.04.070.

(b) The current term of any justice on the state supreme court who is not elected at the general election under (a) of this subsection expires on the second Monday in January following such election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act may be known and cited as the we want a constitutional court act.

--- END ---