BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2016 c 1 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 1366) (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) Section 2 of this act takes effect April 15, 2016, unless the contingency in subsection (2) of this section occurs.

(2) If the legislature, prior to April 15, 2016, refers to the ballot for a vote a constitutional amendment requiring two-thirds legislative approval or voter approval to raise taxes as defined by voter-approved Initiatives 960, 1053, and 1185 and section 6 of this act ((and majority legislative approval for fee increases as required by voter-approved Initiatives 960, 1053, and 1185 and codified in RCW 43.135.055 and further defined by subsection (a) of this section)), section 2 of this act expires on April 14, 2016.

(((a) "Majority legislative approval for fee increases" means only the legislature may set a fee increase's amount and must list it in a bill so it can be subject to the ten-year cost projection and other accountability procedures required by RCW 43.135.031.)) (3) For the purposes of this section, "raise taxes" has the same meaning as "raises taxes" in RCW 43.135.033.

--- END ---