BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 1.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any codified law or administrative law, including, but not limited to, any statute or regulation that is enacted, adopted, or otherwise established and made binding within the boundaries of the state of Washington that is irrelevant, outdated, overridden by more current law, in conflict with other provisions of law, or validly deemed unenforceable by a court of law with jurisdiction over any such laws may be brought before the legislature and removed from current law and repealed by a constitutional majority vote of both the house of representatives and the senate.

(2) Any such codified law or administrative law may be brought forth by a legislator, an attorney, or a citizen of the state of Washington no less than sixty days prior to the beginning of any regular session requesting that the law be removed and repealed, and the law shall be placed upon a list that must be made available to all legislators for review during the interim. For each law submitted for removal and repeal the person submitting the law shall provide a detailed explanation describing in full why the specific law should be removed and repealed.

(3) No legislative committee may be used to make any determination on the removal and repeal of such laws; however, the appropriate committee staff shall review the explanation given for such removal and repeal and provide legislators an objective, impartial analysis of the request but shall not provide a recommendation whether or not the law should be removed and repealed.

(4) The list of such laws must be brought before the rules committee in the house or senate, as appropriate, in a timely manner and the committee must vote whether or not to move the list to the floor for a vote during a regularly scheduled meeting of the house or senate. The list of such laws may be voted upon as a whole or in part as determined by the house or senate; provided that if there is no agreement between the house and senate as to whether the list of such laws will be voted upon as a whole or in part the list shall be voted upon in part as originally submitted section by section, chapter by chapter, or otherwise as submitted.

(5) Any such laws that the house and the senate have voted to be removed and repealed must have an immediate effective date and, unless there is an executive veto, such laws shall be removed from the books no later than one hundred twenty days from the date the act became law.

(6) Any codified law or administrative law, including, but not limited to, any statute or regulation, that has been removed by this procedure cannot be reintroduced or adopted in any form in the future other than as legislation that must be duly adopted through the legislative process.

--- END ---