BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.03.560 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 5 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When requested by a municipal water supplier or when processing a change or amendment to the right, the department shall amend the water right documents and related records to ensure that water rights that are for municipal water supply purposes((, as defined in RCW 90.03.015,)) are correctly identified as being for municipal water supply purposes. This section authorizes a water right or portion of a water right held or acquired by a municipal water supplier that is for municipal water supply purposes ((as defined in RCW 90.03.015)) to be identified as being a water right for municipal water supply purposes. However, it does not authorize any other water right or other portion of a right held or acquired by a municipal water supplier to be so identified without the approval of a change or transfer of the right or portion of the right for such a purpose.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "municipal water supply purposes" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 90.03.015 and includes irrigation or agricultural irrigation purpose of use water rights, and dairy purpose of use water rights, held or acquired by a municipal water supplier.

--- END ---