BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.15.380 and 2015 c 46 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall exempt the following students from the payment of all tuition fees and services and activities fees:

(1) Children of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.24 RCW, highway worker, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full-time or volunteer fire department in this state, or was a highway worker while either employed by a general contractor or subcontractor, on a transportation project or employed by a transportation agency: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the exemption only if they begin their course of study at a state-supported college or university within ten years of their graduation from high school; and

(2) Surviving spouses of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.24 RCW, highway worker, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full-time or volunteer fire department in this state, or was a highway worker while either employed by a general contractor or subcontractor, on a transportation project or employed by a transportation agency.

(3) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall report to the education data center on the annual cost of tuition fees and services and activities fees waived for surviving spouses and children under this section. The education data center shall consolidate the reports of the waived fees and annually report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature.

(4) As used in this section, "transportation agency" means any agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of local government in this state, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the construction and maintenance of the highways and roads within the state of Washington. Such an agency, department, or division is distinguished from a transit agency having as one of its functions the highway maintenance, including but not limited to the state department of transportation. A transportation agency under this section does not include a government contractor.

--- END ---