BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.28.031 and 1993 c 275 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Prior to January 1st of each year, the director shall obtain an authentic copy of the national electrical code, latest revision. The department, after consulting with the board and receiving the board's recommendations, shall adopt reasonable rules in furtherance of safety to life and property. The department must adopt the nonadministrative portion of the electrical rules through a process in which the department, the Washington cities electrical committee, and the technical advisory committee have an equal vote in the adoption of the rules. All rules shall be kept on file by the department. Compliance with the rules shall be prima facie evidence of compliance with this chapter. The department upon request shall deliver to all persons, firms, partnerships, corporations, or other entities licensed under this chapter a copy of the rules.

(2) The department shall also obtain and keep on file an authentic copy of any applicable regulations and standards of any electrical product testing laboratory which is accredited by the department prescribing rules, regulations, and standards for electrical materials, devices, appliances, and equipment, including any modifications and changes that have been made during the previous year.

--- END ---