BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is a wine retailer reseller endorsement to a beer and/or wine specialty shop license issued under RCW 66.24.371, to sell wine at retail in original containers to retailers licensed to sell wine for consumption on the premises, for resale at their licensed premises according to the terms of the license. However, no single sale may exceed twenty-four liters, unless the sale is made by a licensee that was a former state liquor store or contract liquor store at the location from which such sales are made. For the purposes of this title, a beer and/or wine specialty shop license is a retail license, and a sale by a beer and/or wine specialty shop license with a reseller endorsement is a retail sale only if not for resale. The annual fee for the wine retailer reseller endorsement is one hundred ten dollars for each store.

(2) A beer and/or wine specialty shop licensee with a wine retailer reseller endorsement issued under this section may accept delivery of wine at its licensed premises or at one or more warehouse facilities registered with the board, which facilities may also warehouse and distribute nonliquor items, and from which it may deliver to its own licensed premises and, pursuant to sales permitted by this title, to other licensed premises, to other registered facilities, or to lawful purchasers outside the state. Facilities may be registered and utilized by associations, cooperatives, or comparable groups of beer and/or wine specialty shop licensees.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.28.340 and 2012 c 2 s 123 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A retailer authorized to sell wine may accept delivery of wine at its licensed premises or at one or more warehouse facilities registered with the board, which facilities may also warehouse and distribute nonliquor items, and from which it may deliver to its own licensed premises and, pursuant to sales permitted by this title, to other licensed retailers, to other registered facilities, or to lawful purchasers outside the state; such facilities may be registered and utilized by associations, cooperatives, or comparable groups of retailers including at least one retailer licensed to sell wine. A restaurant retailer authorized to sell spirits may accept delivery of spirits at its licensed premises or at one or more warehouse facilities registered with the board, which facilities may also warehouse and distribute nonliquor items, from which it may deliver to its own licensed premises and, pursuant to sales permitted by this title, to other licensed retailers, to other registered facilities, or to lawful purchasers outside the state; such facilities may be registered and utilized by associations, cooperatives, or comparable groups of retailers including at least one restaurant retailer licensed to sell spirits. Nothing in this section authorizes sales of spirits or wine by a retailer holding only an on-sale privilege to another retailer.

(2) A retailer authorized to sell both wine and spirits for consumption off the licensed premises may accept delivery of wine and spirits at its licensed premises, at another licensed premises as designated by the retailer, or at one or more warehouse facilities registered with the board, which facilities may also warehouse and distribute nonliquor items, and from which it may deliver to its own licensed premises and, pursuant to sales permitted by this title, to other licensed retailers, to other registered facilities, or to lawful purchasers outside the state. Such warehouse facilities may be registered and utilized by associations, cooperatives, or comparable groups of retailers including at least one retailer licensed to sell both spirits and wine. For purposes of negotiating volume discounts, a group of individual retailers authorized to sell both wine and spirits for consumption off the licensed premises may accept delivery of wine and spirits at their individual licensed premises or at any one of the individual licensee's premises, or at a warehouse facility registered with the board.

--- END ---