BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must establish a competitive grant program to award grants to school districts for the promotion of confidence, public speaking, and leadership skills in students in grades two through five. The grant program must be developed according to a schedule that provides school districts with sufficient time to apply for and receive grants in the 2016-17 school year.

(2) Grants awarded under this section must be for school districts proposing to collaborate with a partner school district for the purpose of replicating an implemented after-school program that: Promotes confidence, public speaking, and leadership skills in students in grades two through five; and is fully or partially administered and funded with private funds.

(3) School districts applying for or receiving grants under this section are encouraged to seek partnerships with public and private entities for the purpose of enhancing student benefits and minimizing costs to recipient districts and schools.

(4) By December 1, 2018, the superintendent of public instruction must report findings and recommendations for the grant program and an assessment of whether the program accomplished established goals and should be renewed. The report required by this subsection must be submitted to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate in accordance with RCW 43.01.036.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act may be known and cited as the little toasters act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire on June 20, 2019.

--- END ---