BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preferences contained in sections 2 and 3 of this act. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(2) The legislature categorizes the tax preference in sections 2 and 3 of this act as one intended to create jobs, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(c).

(3) At the end of the third year after an aircraft maintenance and repair station is operationally complete, the joint legislative audit and review committee must evaluate, at a minimum:

(a) Whether a taxpayer claiming this tax preference is on target to reach the employment levels and average annualized wages under section 2 of this act by the end of the aircraft maintenance and repair station's fourth year of operation; and

(b) Whether the average annualized wages for employees are on a par with industry standards for the sector.

(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review, the joint legislative audit and review committee may refer to the annual report and annual survey for tax preferences that federal aviation administration part 145 repair stations are required to file with the department and to employment data available from the employment security department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the requirements of this section, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:

(a) Charges for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing of new buildings, made to: (i) An eligible maintenance repair operator engaged in the maintenance of airplanes; or (ii) a port district, political subdivision, or municipal corporation, if the new building is to be leased to an eligible maintenance repair operator engaged in the maintenance of airplanes;

(b) Sales of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of such buildings during the course of the constructing; or

(c) Charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing, during the course of constructing such buildings, building fixtures not otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW 82.08.02565.

(2)(a) The exemption in this section is in the form of a remittance. A buyer claiming an exemption from the tax in the form of a remittance under this section must pay all applicable state and local sales taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020 and chapter 82.14 RCW on all purchases qualifying for the exemption.

(b) The department must determine eligibility under this section based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other administrative records. The buyer may on a quarterly basis submit an application, in a form and manner as required by the department by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is claimed. The buyer must retain, in adequate detail to enable the department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents describing the location and size of new structures; and construction invoices and documents.

(c) The department must on a quarterly basis remit exempted amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications during the previous quarter.

(d) A person may request a remittance for state sales and use taxes after the aircraft maintenance and repair station has been operationally complete for four years, but not sooner than December 1, 2021. However, the department may not remit the state portion of sales and use taxes if the person did not report at least one hundred average employment positions to the employment security department for September 1, 2020, through September 1, 2021, with an average annualized wage of eighty thousand dollars. A person must provide the department with the unemployment insurance number provided to the employment security department for the establishment.

(e) A person may request a remittance for local sales and use taxes on or after the effective date of this section.

(3) In order to qualify under this section before starting construction, the port district, political subdivision, or municipal corporation must have entered into an agreement with an eligible maintenance repair operator to build such a facility. A person claiming the exemption under this section is subject to all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In addition, the person must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Eligible maintenance repair operator" means a person classified by the federal aviation administration as a federal aviation regulation part 145 certificated repair station and located in an international airport owned by a county with a population greater than one million five hundred thousand.

(b) "Operationally complete" means constructed to the point of being functionally capable of hosting the repair and maintenance of airplanes.

(5) This section expires January 1, 2027.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of:

(a) Tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component in constructing new buildings for: (i) An eligible maintenance repair operator; or (ii) a port district, political subdivision, or municipal corporation, to be leased to an eligible maintenance repair operator; or

(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing, during the course of constructing such buildings, building fixtures not otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW 82.08.02565.

(2) The eligibility requirements, conditions, and definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section, including the filing of a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(3) This section expires January 1, 2027.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.14.050 and 2014 c 216 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The counties, cities, and transportation authorities under RCW 82.14.045, public facilities districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57 RCW, public transportation benefit areas under RCW 82.14.440, regional transportation investment districts, and transportation benefit districts under chapter 36.73 RCW must contract, prior to the effective date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use tax, the administration and collection to the state department of revenue, which must deduct a percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected for administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. The remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter that is collected by the department of revenue must be deposited by the state department of revenue in the local sales and use tax account hereby created in the state treasury. Beginning January 1, 2013, the department of revenue must make deposits in the local sales and use tax account on a monthly basis on the last business day of the month in which distributions required in (a) of this subsection are due. Moneys in the local sales and use tax account may be withdrawn only for:

(a) Distribution to counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities districts, public transportation benefit areas, regional transportation investment districts, and transportation benefit districts imposing a sales and use tax; and

(b) Making refunds of taxes imposed under the authority of this chapter and RCW 81.104.170 and exempted under RCW 82.08.962, 82.12.962, 82.08.02565, ((and)) 82.12.02565, or section 2 or 3 of this act.

(2) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended, insofar as they are applicable to state sales and use taxes, are applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter.

(3) Counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities districts, and regional transportation investment districts may not conduct independent sales or use tax audits of sellers registered under the streamlined sales tax agreement.

(4) Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190 and subsection (5) of this section, all earnings of investments of balances in the local sales and use tax account must be credited to the local sales and use tax account and distributed to the counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities districts, public transportation benefit areas, regional transportation investment districts, and transportation benefit districts monthly.

(5) Beginning January 1, 2013, the state treasurer must determine the amount of earnings on investments that would have been credited to the local sales and use tax account if the collections had been deposited in the account over the prior month. When distributions are made under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the state treasurer must transfer this amount from the state general fund to the local sales and use tax account and must distribute such sums to the counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities districts, public transportation benefit areas, regional transportation investment districts, and transportation benefit districts.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.14.060 and 2014 c 216 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute from the local sales and use tax account to the counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities districts, and transportation benefit districts the amount of tax collected on behalf of each taxing authority, less:

(i) The deduction provided for in RCW 82.14.050; and

(ii) The amount of any refunds of local sales and use taxes exempted under RCW 82.08.962, 82.12.962, 82.08.02565, ((and)) 82.12.02565, or section 2 or 3 of this act, which must be made without appropriation.

(b) The state treasurer must make the distribution under this section without appropriation.

(2) In the event that any ordinance or resolution imposes a sales and use tax at a rate in excess of the applicable limits contained herein, such ordinance or resolution may not be considered void in toto, but only with respect to that portion of the rate which is in excess of the applicable limits contained herein.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect July 1, 2016.

--- END ---