BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.343.400 and 1987 c 307 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each member of the board of directors of a school district may receive compensation ((of fifty dollars per day or portion thereof)) for attending board meetings and for performing other services on behalf of the school district((, not to exceed four thousand eight hundred dollars per year,)) if the district board of directors has authorized by board resolution, at a regularly scheduled meeting, the provision of such compensation. The amount of compensation authorized by a resolution adopted under this section may not, on a per year basis, exceed an amount equaling fifty percent of the annual salary of a beginning certificated teacher, as determined by the board, in the district.

(2) A board of directors of a school district may authorize such compensation only from locally collected excess levy funds available for that purpose, and compensation for board members shall not cause the state to incur any present or future funding obligation.

(3) Any director may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the district as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the director's election and before the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

(4) The compensation provided in this section shall be in addition to any reimbursement for expenses paid to such directors by the school district.

(5) Compensation increases authorized under this section may not take effect before the January 1st subsequent to the adoption of the resolution and the election of one or more district directors.

(6) Beginning August 1, 2017, and every two years thereafter, each board of directors authorizing compensation under this section must report the annual amount of their directors' compensation to the Washington state school directors' association established in RCW 28A.345.010.

--- END ---