BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.83B.430 and 2011 c 5 s 911 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state drought preparedness account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from appropriated funds designated for the account and funds transferred from the state emergency water projects revolving account must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for drought preparedness. ((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state drought preparedness account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.))

(2) Moneys in the state drought preparedness account must be used consistent with either emergency or permanent rules adopted by the department of ecology under RCW 43.83B.420.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.83B.420 and 1989 c 171 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of ecology shall adopt ((such)) rules as ((are)) necessary to ensure the successful implementation of this chapter.

(2) The department of ecology must consider and make provisions relating to the following when adopting either emergency or permanent rules related to the provision of funds for drinking water supply projects from the state drought preparedness account created in RCW 43.83B.430:

(a) The time required for a project sponsor to complete the project given the unique complexity of drinking water projects when considering if a project can be completed in a timely fashion, including the permit requirements of both the department of ecology and the department of health;

(b) The benefit of the project from the completion of the project extending beyond the time when a drought condition order issued under RCW 43.83B.405 terminates, including but not limited to the time when the project sponsor's water supply is projected to return to normal, nondrought conditions;

(c) Project benefits that provide both short-term relief from a current drought and long-term solutions for preempting and managing undue hardships related to future or persistent low water supply events.

--- END ---