BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the legislature to recruit and retain the highest qualified commissioned officers of the Washington state patrol appointed under RCW 43.43.020. The "Joint Transportation Committee Recruitment and Retention Study" dated January 7, 2016, outlines several recommendations to fulfill this intent. The study recommendations were broken down into several areas, with the Washington state patrol, office of financial management, select committee on pension policy, and the legislature all supporting their respective authorizations and control over their respective areas of responsibility and accountability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The office of financial management must perform an organization study through a third-party independent consultant to implement the changes in the "Joint Transportation Committee Recruitment and Retention Study" dated January 7, 2016, affecting each organization in the study. Washington state patrol management must work actively with the independent consultant to implement the recommended changes. An implementation report must be delivered to the transportation committees of the house of representatives and senate by September 1, 2016.

(2) The Washington state patrol must develop an action plan and implementation strategy for each of the recommendations that are outlined in the study with a report due to the transportation committees of the house of representatives and senate by November 15, 2016.

(3) The select committee on pension policy must review the pension-related items in the study and make recommendations to the governor's office and the legislature by November 1, 2016, on pension policy that will assist in recruiting and retaining state patrol commissioned officers.

(4) The legislature, in support of the study, must provide different funding options to start implementing the study recommendations.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.43.380 and 1965 c 8 s 43.43.380 are each amended to read as follows:

The minimum monthly salary paid to ((state patrol officers shall)) troopers and sergeants must be ((as follows: Officers, three hundred dollars; staff or technical sergeants, three hundred twenty-five dollars; line sergeants, three hundred fifty dollars; lieutenants, three hundred seventy-five dollars; captains, four hundred twenty-five dollars)) competitive with law enforcement agencies within the boundaries of the state of Washington effective July 1, 2016. The salary levels on July 1, 2016, must be the average of compensation paid to the corresponding rank from the Seattle police department, King county sheriff's office, Tacoma police department, Snohomish county sheriff's office, Spokane police department, and Vancouver police department. Compensation must be calculated using base salary, premium pay (a pay received by more than a majority of employees), education pay, and longevity pay. The collective bargaining units of the Washington state patrol and the office of financial management must open up collective bargaining on the effective date of this section and agree upon an addendum to the existing contract to implement this section with funds provided by the legislature in the 2016 omnibus transportation appropriations act solely for the implementation of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

To ensure that it is adequately and thoroughly reaching potential recruits, the Washington state patrol must develop a comprehensive outreach and marketing strategic plan that expands on the success of current strategies and looks for ways to tap into groups or individuals that do not currently show an interest in the state patrol or law enforcement as a career. The plan must include, but is not limited to, expanding marketing and outreach efforts online and through other media outlets and expanding recruitment relationships in respective communities. The plan must also include polling applicants about their application. Results from the polling must be tracked to determine the success of each outreach method.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---