BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.04 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning February 1, 2017, the department must expand the dates it distributes supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits from the first through the tenth of every month, to the first through the twentieth of every month.

--- END ---