BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. INTENT. (1) The legislature recognizes that lower class sizes are an essential element of the constitutional rights of students, as recognized by the supreme court in McCleary v. Washington, 173 Wn.2d 477 (2012). In addition, the legislature finds that research strongly demonstrates that well qualified teachers and paraeducators are critical for improving student outcomes. Consequently, the benefits of smaller class sizes are undermined when the certification standards, mentoring, and training of teachers is lowered. Unfortunately, the legislature also finds that school districts in Washington are experiencing a crisis of being unable to fill vacant positions with qualified teachers and paraeducators.

(2) The legislature finds that the state and school districts cannot meet the constitutional requirement to lower class sizes without addressing the current severe shortage of teachers and paraeducators.

(3) With respect to teacher retention, the legislature finds that:

(a) Approximately fifty percent of new teachers leave their jobs within five years;

(b) Compensation and health care costs are important factors in teacher retention rates; and

(c) The state will be unable to sustain an increased number of classrooms if teacher retention is not addressed as part of a comprehensive approach.

(4) With respect to the capacity of state institutions of higher education with teacher and paraeducator preparation programs, the legislature finds that:

(a) The capacity of these institutions and programs is inadequate to produce enough new teachers and paraeducators to meet current demand; and

(b) The capacity of these institutions will not be adequate to produce the number of new teachers and paraeducators needed to lower class sizes pursuant to the supreme court ruling in McCleary v. Washington, 173 Wn.2d 477 (2012), chapter 236, Laws of 2010, and Initiative Measure No. 1351 (2014).

(5) With respect to diversity among teachers, the legislature finds that the cost of teaching degrees, alternate route teacher certification programs, and student indebtedness have a significant impact on diversity. Thus, programs to provide support for degree completion, certification, and mentoring are vitally important to diversity of the state's teacher corps.

(6) It is the intent of the legislature to create a plan and provide for the initial implementation needed to supply the teachers necessary to lower class sizes. Using the funding that the Washington supreme court ordered to be set aside, the legislature intends to provide for new supports for basic education, including the programs adopted in this act, to increase the number of qualified teachers and lower class sizes. While the legislature is committed to addressing these complex issues in separate legislation, this act represents the commitment of the legislature and includes a long-term plan to increase teacher education programs and alternate route certifications by lowering financial obstacles to becoming a teacher or paraeducator.

PART I

TEACHER AND PARAEDUCATOR TRAINING

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. A new section is added to chapter 28B.102 RCW to read as follows:

TEACHER SHORTAGE CONDITIONAL GRANT PROGRAM. (1) Established within the future teachers conditional scholarship and loan repayment program is a subprogram called the teacher shortage conditional grant program, to be administered by the office. To be eligible for the teacher shortage conditional grant, a student needs to submit an application to the office and must:

(a) Be seeking a bachelor's degree through an accredited teacher preparation program and be classified as a junior or senior;

(b) Be seeking a master's degree through an accredited teacher preparation program while completing a student teaching residency; or

(c) Be seeking a master's degree through an accredited teacher preparation program while working in a school district as a paraeducator, and commit to working in the employing district after obtaining teacher certification.

(2) As part of the application, an eligible student must meet the following conditions:

(a) Complete the free application for federal student aid (FAFSA) or the Washington application for state financial aid;

(b) Agree to obtain a Washington state residency teacher certificate;

(c) Commit to obtaining an endorsement in a subject or geographic endorsement shortage area, as defined by the professional educator standards board; and

(d) Commit to teach for five school years in an approved education program with a need for a teacher with such an endorsement at the time of hire.

(3) The office shall prioritize applicants in the following order:

(a) An applicant who is eligible for, but did not receive, the state need grant established in chapter 28B.92 RCW;

(b) An applicant who has a family income below one hundred seventy-five percent of median family income, adjusted for family size, as documented by the free application for federal student aid (FAFSA) or the Washington application for state financial aid, and who:

(i) Can certify that neither parent or guardian completed a postsecondary degree or certificate; or

(ii) Is from a traditionally underrepresented group among teachers in Washington when compared to the common school population.

(4)(a) An applicant selected for a teacher shortage conditional grant who meets the eligibility requirements in subsections (1)(a) and (2) of this section must:

(i) Receive a grant to cover the cost of resident undergraduate tuition fees, defined in RCW 28B.15.020, for up to two academic years of full-time study at an institution of higher education; or

(ii) Receive a grant to cover the cost of resident undergraduate tuition fees, defined in RCW 28B.15.020, for up to two academic years of full-time study at the most expensive regional university if enrolled in an accredited teacher preparation program at a private, not-for-profit institution of higher education.

(b) If a recipient of a conditional grant who qualified for the grant under subsection (1)(a) of this section is unable to earn a bachelor's degree after two years of full-time study due to the unavailability of required courses, the recipient must be able to receive a conditional grant for two additional quarters or semesters as long as he or she maintains satisfactory academic progress and successfully completes a student teaching residency.

(5) An applicant selected for a teacher shortage conditional grant who meets the eligibility requirements in subsections (1)(b) and (2) of this section must receive a grant to cover resident graduate tuition fees, defined in RCW 28B.15.020, for up to two years of full-time study at an institution of higher education plus an additional grant of two thousand dollars for each-six month period that the student is completing a student teaching residency.

(6) An applicant selected for a teacher shortage conditional grant who meets the eligibility requirements in subsections (1)(c) and (2) of this section must receive a grant to cover resident graduate tuition fees, defined in RCW 28B.15.020, for up to two years of full-time study at an institution of higher education plus an additional grant of sixteen thousand five hundred dollars for each year that the student is completing a student teaching residency.

(7) In order to receive a teacher shortage conditional grant under subsections (4) through (6) of this section, a student must sign a contract to affirm his or her intent to graduate from a teacher preparation program, obtain certification, obtain an endorsement in a subject or geographic endorsement shortage area as defined by the professional educator standards board, and teach for five school years in an approved education program with a need for a teacher with such an endorsement at the time of hire. The conditions of the contract must include the following:

(a) If a student does not (i) obtain a Washington state residency teaching certificate with an endorsement in a subject or geographic endorsement shortage area as defined by the professional educator standards board within six months of graduation and (ii) sign a contract to teach in an approved education program with a need for a teacher with such an endorsement within fifteen months of graduation, then the conditional grant will be converted into a loan with interest rates set by the office.

(b) If a student does not complete the contractual obligation of five school years of teaching in an approved education program with a need for a teacher with an endorsement in a subject or geographic endorsement shortage area as defined by the professional educator standards board, the conditional grant will be converted into a loan with the following repayment requirements:

(i) For less than one school year of teaching completed, the loan obligation is eighty-five percent of the conditional grant the student received, plus interest and an equalization fee;

(ii) For less than two school years of teaching completed, the loan obligation is seventy percent of the conditional grant the student received, plus interest and an equalization fee;

(iii) For less than three school years of teaching completed, the loan obligation is fifty-five percent of the conditional grant the student received, plus interest and an equalization fee; and

(iv) For less than four school years of teaching completed, the loan obligation is forty percent of the conditional grant the student received, plus interest and an equalization fee.

(c) For a conditional grant that is converted into a loan under (b) of this subsection, the terms and conditions of the loan must follow the interest rate and repayment terms of the federal direct subsidized loan program.

(8) A teacher shortage conditional grant received under subsections (4) through (6) of this section must not result in a reduction of federal or state grant aid, including Pell grants, state need grants, college bound scholarships, or opportunity scholarships.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102. A new section is added to chapter 28A.630 RCW to read as follows:

AFFORDABILITY OF CERTIFICATION AND ENDORSEMENTS. (1) Subject to funds specifically appropriated for this purpose, the teacher endorsement and certification help project, known as the TEACH project, is created. The scale of the TEACH project is dependent on the level of funding appropriated.

(2) The student achievement council, after consultation with the professional educator standards board, shall have the power and duty to develop and adopt rules as necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW to administer the project described in this section. The rules, which must be adopted by August 1, 2016, must include:

(a) A TEACH grant application process;

(b) A financial need verification process;

(c) The order of priority in which the applications will be approved; and

(d) A process for disbursing TEACH grant awards to selected applicants.

(3) A student seeking a TEACH grant to cover the costs of basic skills and content tests required for teacher certification and endorsement shall submit an application to the student achievement council, following the rules developed under this section.

(4) To qualify for financial assistance, an applicant must meet the following criteria:

(a) Be enrolled in, have applied to, or have completed a teacher preparation program approved by the professional educator standards board;

(b) Show a financial need, as demonstrated by the student's eligibility to receive the state need grant under RCW 28B.92.080;

(c) Apply for a TEACH grant under this section; and

(d) Register for an endorsement competency test in endorsement shortage areas.

(5) Beginning September 1, 2016, the student achievement council, in collaboration with the professional educator standards board, shall award a TEACH grant to a student who meets the qualifications provided in this section and in rules developed under this section. The TEACH grant award must cover the costs of basic skills and content tests required for teacher certification. The council shall prioritize TEACH grant awards first to applicants registered for competency tests in endorsement shortage areas and second to applicants with greatest financial need. The council shall scale the number of TEACH grant awards to the amount of funds appropriated for this purpose.

(6) The student achievement council and the professional educator standards board shall include information about the TEACH project in materials distributed to schools and students.

(7) By December 31, 2018, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the student achievement council, in collaboration with the professional educator standards board, shall submit a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that details the effectiveness and costs of the project. The preliminary report must (a) compare the numbers and demographic information of students taking and passing tests in the endorsement shortage areas before and after implementation of the project, and (b) determine the amount of TEACH grant award financial assistance awarded each year and per student.

(8) By December 31, 2020, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the student achievement council, in collaboration with the professional educator standards board, shall submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that details the effectiveness and costs of the project. In addition to updating the preliminary report, the final report must (a) compare the numbers and demographic information of students obtaining teaching certificates with endorsement competencies in the endorsement shortage areas before and after implementation of the project, and (b) recommend whether the project should be modified, continued, and expanded.

Sec. 103. RCW 28B.145.005 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP ACT FINDING AND INTENT. The legislature finds that, despite increases in degree production, there remain acute shortages in high employer demand programs of study, particularly in the science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM), education, and health care fields of study. According to the workforce training and education coordinating board, seventeen percent of Washington businesses had difficulty finding job applicants in 2010. Eleven thousand employers did not fill a vacancy because they lacked qualified job applicants. Fifty-nine percent of projected job openings in Washington state from now until 2017 will require some form of postsecondary education and training.

It is the intent of the legislature to provide jobs and opportunity by making Washington the place where the world's most productive companies find the world's most talented people. The legislature intends to accomplish this through the creation of the opportunity scholarship and the opportunity expansion programs to help mitigate the impact of tuition increases, increase the number of baccalaureate degrees in high employer demand programs, educator preparation programs with science, technology, engineering, and mathematics endorsements, and other programs, and invest in programs and students to meet market demands for a knowledge-based economy while filling middle-income jobs with a sufficient supply of skilled workers.

Beginning in the 2016-17 academic year, the legislature intends that appropriations that exceed the appropriation provided for the programs in chapter 4, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. are to be provided to increase scholarships awarded to students enrolled in educator preparation programs with science, technology, engineering, and mathematics endorsements.

Sec. 104. RCW 28B.145.010 and 2014 c 208 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP ACT DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the opportunity scholarship board.

(2) "Council" means the student achievement council.

(3) "Eligible education programs" means high employer demand programs, educator preparation programs with science, technology, engineering, and mathematics endorsements, and other programs of study as determined by the board.

(4) "Eligible expenses" means reasonable expenses associated with the costs of acquiring an education such as tuition, books, equipment, fees, room and board, and other expenses as determined by the program administrator in consultation with the council and the state board for community and technical colleges.

(5) "Eligible student" means a resident student who received his or her high school diploma or high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536 in Washington and who:

(a)(i) Has been accepted at a four-year institution of higher education into an eligible education program leading to a baccalaureate degree; or

(ii) Will attend a two-year institution of higher education and intends to transfer to an eligible education program at a four-year institution of higher education;

(b) Declares an intention to obtain a baccalaureate degree; and

(c) Has a family income at or below one hundred twenty-five percent of the state median family income at the time the student applies for an opportunity scholarship.

(6) "High employer demand program of study" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 28B.50.030.

(7) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received a scholarship under the opportunity scholarship program.

(8) "Program administrator" means a college scholarship organization that is a private nonprofit corporation registered under Title 24 RCW and qualified as a tax-exempt entity under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, with expertise in managing scholarships and college advising.

(9) "Resident student" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 28B.15.012.

Sec. 105. RCW 28B.145.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM EXPANSION. (1) The opportunity scholarship program is established.

(2) The purpose of this scholarship program is to provide scholarships that will help low and middle-income Washington residents earn baccalaureate degrees in high employer demand and other programs of study and encourage them to remain in the state to work. The program must be designed for both students starting at two-year institutions of higher education and intending to transfer to four-year institutions of higher education and students starting at four-year institutions of higher education.

(3) The opportunity scholarship board shall determine which programs of study, including but not limited to high employer demand programs, and educator preparation programs with science, technology, engineering, and mathematics endorsements are eligible for purposes of the opportunity scholarship.

(4) The source of funds for the program shall be a combination of private grants and contributions and state matching funds. A state match may be earned under this section for private contributions made on or after June 6, 2011. A state match, up to a maximum of fifty million dollars annually, shall be provided beginning the later of January 1, 2014, or January 1st next following the end of the fiscal year in which collections of state retail sales and use tax, state business and occupation tax, and state public utility tax exceed, by ten percent the amounts collected from these tax resources in the fiscal year that ended June 30, 2008, as determined by the department of revenue.

Sec. 106. RCW 28B.145.070 and 2014 c 208 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM REPORTS TO THE LEGISLATURE. (1) Annually each December 1st, the board, together with the program administrator, shall report to the council, the governor, and the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the opportunity scholarship and opportunity expansion programs, including but not limited to:

(a) Which education programs the board determined were eligible for purposes of the opportunity scholarship;

(b) The number of applicants for the opportunity scholarship, disaggregated, to the extent possible, by race, ethnicity, gender, county of origin, age, and median family income;

(c) The number of participants in the opportunity scholarship program, disaggregated, to the extent possible, by race, ethnicity, gender, county of origin, age, and median family income;

(d) The number and amount of the scholarships actually awarded, and whether the scholarships were paid from the scholarship account or the endowment account;

(e) The institutions and eligible education programs in which opportunity scholarship participants enrolled, together with data regarding participants' completion and graduation;

(f) The total amount of private contributions and state match moneys received for the opportunity scholarship program, how the funds were distributed between the scholarship and endowment accounts, the interest or other earnings on the accounts, and the amount of any administrative fee paid to the program administrator; ((and))

(g) Identification of the programs the board selected to receive opportunity expansion awards and the amount of such awards; and

(h) The number and percent of scholarships awarded to students enrolled in educator preparation programs with science, technology, engineering, and mathematics endorsements.

(2) In the next succeeding legislative session following receipt of a report required under subsection (1) of this section, the appropriate committees of the legislature shall review the report and consider whether any legislative action is necessary with respect to either the opportunity scholarship program or the opportunity expansion program, including but not limited to consideration of whether any legislative action is necessary with respect to the nature and level of focus on high employer demand fields and the number and amount of scholarships.

PART II

TEACHER RECRUITMENT STRATEGY

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. A new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

RECRUITMENT SPECIALISTS. Subject to an appropriation of up to six hundred thousand dollars specifically provided for this purpose, the institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, with professional educator standards board-approved residency teacher preparation programs must employ, or contract, with recruitment specialists that focus on recruitment of individuals who are from a traditionally underrepresented group among teachers in Washington when compared to the common school population into the teacher preparation programs, and development and implementation of programs to encourage students to enroll in teacher preparation programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

RECRUITMENT TO SMALL DISTRICTS. Subject to an appropriation of up to four hundred thousand dollars specifically provided for these purposes, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(1) Develop and implement a statewide campaign to encourage qualified individuals to apply for teaching positions in small school districts; and

(2) Implement a statewide central depository for the applications of individuals interested in applying for teaching positions that can be accessed by small school districts in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

CENTRALIZED HIRING PORTAL. Subject to an appropriation of up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars specifically provided for these purposes, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and implement a centralized hiring portal for school districts hiring fewer than five teachers per year on average over the prior five years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

CAREERS IN EDUCATION TRAINING. (1) Subject to an appropriation of up to seventy-five thousand dollars specifically provided for these purposes, during fiscal year 2017 the Western Washington University's Woodring school of education must develop a model curriculum on how to encourage careers in education, and share it with the public and private schools of education in Washington.

(2) If a model curriculum is developed and shared under subsection (1) of this section:

(a) The institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, with professional educator standards board-approved residency teacher preparation programs must include training for education degree candidates on how to encourage careers in education; and

(b) The private institutions of higher education with professional educator standards board-approved residency teacher preparation programs are encouraged to include training for education degree candidates on how to encourage careers in education.

PART III

SUBSTITUTE TEACHER AND MENTOR SHORTAGE

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable to plan 2 and plan 3" to be codified between RCW 41.32.141 and 41.32.215 to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the postretirement employment options available in RCW 41.32.802 or 41.32.862, and only until August 1, 2019, a teacher in plan 2 or plan 3 that has retired under the alternate early retirement provisions of RCW 41.32.765(3)(b) or 41.32.875(3)(b) may be employed with an employer that has documented a shortage of certified substitute teachers for up to six hundred thirty hours per school year without suspension of his or her benefit, provided that: (1) The retired teacher reenters employment more than one calendar month after his or her accrual date and after the effective date of this section, and (2) the retired teacher is employed exclusively as a substitute teacher as defined in RCW 41.32.010(48)(a) in an instructional capacity, as opposed to other capacities identified in RCW 41.32.010(49).

(2) In addition to the postretirement employment options available in RCW 41.32.802 or 41.32.862, and only until August 1, 2019, a teacher in plan 2 or plan 3 who has retired under the alternate early retirement provisions of RCW 41.32.765(3)(b) or 41.32.875(3)(b) may be employed with an employer as a mentor for up to six hundred thirty hours per school year without suspension of his or her benefit, if: (a) The retired teacher reenters employment more than one calendar month after his or her accrual date and after the effective date of this section, and (b) the retired teacher is employed exclusively as a mentor, which is an educator who has achieved appropriate training as defined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

PART IV

ALTERNATE ROUTES TO TEACHER CERTIFICATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401. AWARENESS CAMPAIGN. (1) The workforce training and education coordinating board, in collaboration with the professional educator standards board, shall work with the student achievement council, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, school districts, educational service districts, the state board for community and technical colleges, the institutions of higher education, major employers, and other parties to develop and implement a statewide public awareness campaign designed to increase recruitment into approved residency teacher preparation programs at public and private institutions of higher education and alternate route teacher certification programs.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402. ADDRESSING BARRIERS. (1) The professional educator standards board shall coordinate meetings between the school districts that do not have approved alternate route teacher certification programs and the nearest public or private institution of higher education with a professional educator standards board-approved teacher preparation program. The purpose of the meetings is to determine whether the districts and institutions can partner to apply to the professional educator standards board to operate an alternate route teacher certification program.

(2) All professional educator standards board-approved residency teacher preparation programs at institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 not currently a partner in an alternative route program must seek approval from the professional educator standards board to offer an alternate route program by submitting the proposal developed under RCW 28A.410.290, or an updated version of the proposal, by September 1, 2016. If approved, the institution of higher education must implement an alternate route program according to a timeline suggested by the professional educator standards board.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

PLACEMENT OF RESIDENT TEACHERS PLANS. (1) Beginning January 1, 2017, each institution of higher education with a professional educator standards board-approved residency teacher preparation program is encouraged to develop a plan describing how the institution of higher education will partner with school districts in the general geographic region of the school, or where its programs are offered, regarding placement of resident teachers who are obtaining a master's degree through an accredited teacher preparation program. The plans must be developed in collaboration with school districts desiring to partner with the institutions of higher education, and may include use of unexpended federal or state funds to support residencies and mentoring for students who are likely to continue teaching in the district in which they have a supervised student teaching residency.

(2) The plans required under subsection (1) of this section must be updated at least biennially.

PART V

MENTORING

Sec. 501. RCW 28A.415.265 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

BEGINNING EDUCATOR SUPPORT TEAM. (1) For the purposes of this section, a mentor is defined as an educator who has achieved appropriate training as defined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, such as national board certification or other specialized training.

(2)(a) The educator support program is established to provide professional development and mentor support for beginning educators, candidates in alternate route teacher programs under RCW 28A.660.040, and educators on probation under RCW 28A.405.100, to be composed of the beginning educator support team for beginning educators and continuous improvement coaching for educators on probation, as provided in this section.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall notify school districts about the educator support program and encourage districts to apply for program funds.

(((2))) (3)(a) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate funds for the beginning educator support team on a competitive basis to individual school districts or consortia of districts. School districts are encouraged to include educational service districts in creating regional consortia. In allocating funds, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall give priority to:

(i) School districts with low-performing schools identified under RCW 28A.657.020 as being challenged schools in need of improvement; and

(ii) Beginning with the state's largest school districts, school districts with a large influx of new teachers.

(b) The office may fund up to one mentor per twelve new teachers expected to be hired for the next school year, up to a maximum of five mentors per district.

(4) A portion of the appropriated funds may be used for program coordination and provision of statewide or regional professional development through the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(((b))) (5) A beginning educator support team must include the following components:

(((i))) (a) A paid orientation or individualized assistance before the start of the school year for beginning educators;

(((ii))) (b) Assignment of a trained and qualified mentor for the first three years for beginning educators, with intensive support in the first year and decreasing support over the following years depending on the needs of the beginning educator;

(((iii))) (c) A goal to provide new teachers from underrepresented populations with a mentor who has strong ties to underrepresented populations;

(d) Professional development for beginning educators that is designed to meet their unique needs for supplemental training and skill development;

(((iv))) (e) Professional development for mentors;

(((v))) (f) Release time for mentors and their designated educators to work together, as well as time for educators to observe accomplished peers; and

(((vi))) (g) A program evaluation using a standard evaluation tool provided from the office of the superintendent of public instruction that measures increased knowledge, skills, and positive impact on student learning for program participants.

(((3))) (6) Subject to funds separately appropriated for this specific purpose, the beginning educator support team components under subsection (((2))) (3) of this section may be provided for continuous improvement coaching to support educators on probation under RCW 28A.405.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502. A new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

SUCCESSFUL MENTORS. (1) To aid in the distribution of funds under the educator support program established under RCW 28A.415.265, school districts that project to hire at least twelve new teachers for the next school year shall report the number of projected new teacher hires to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by June 15th of each year.

(2) If the retention rates and the evaluation performance ratings under RCW 28A.405.100 for mentored teachers are not significantly higher than for teachers without mentors, then the districts must submit an improvement plan that includes a plan to train mentors to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503. MENTOR TRAINING AND CERTIFICATION. (1) In fiscal year 2017, the institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, with professional educator standards board-approved residency teacher preparation programs are encouraged to submit proposals to develop and implement mentor training programs to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must review proposals received under subsection (1) of this section and may include the proposals in its budget request.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2019.

PART VI

APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNSEL. (1) The sum of three hundred eighty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the general fund—state account to the office of student financial assistance. The appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for additional state need grants to be awarded to eligible students enrolled in a teacher education program. The office of student financial assistance is expected to provide an additional fifty grants to Western Washington University students enrolled in special education or elementary education teacher preparation programs at the Everett site.

(2) The sum of ten million five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the general fund—state account to the office of student financial assistance for the teacher shortage conditional grant program under section 101 of this act. Of this amount, five hundred thousand dollars is provided solely for the office to administer the program. The office is expected to provide up to seven hundred conditional grants to applicants meeting the eligibility requirements in section 101(1)(a) of this act. The office is expected to provide up to one hundred eighty conditional grants to applicants meeting the eligibility requirements in section 101(1) (b) and (c) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602. UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON. The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the general fund—state account to the University of Washington. The appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the expansion of enrollments in the teacher preparation programs at the University of Washington Bothell and Tacoma sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603. WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY. The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the general fund—state account to Washington State University. The appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the expansion of enrollments in elementary education teacher preparation programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY. (1) The sum of one million eighty-nine thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the general fund—state account to Western Washington University. The appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the expansion of enrollments in teacher preparation programs with science, technology, mathematics, and engineering endorsements.

(2) The sum of three hundred fifty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the general fund—state account to Western Washington University. The appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the expansion of enrollments in special education, elementary education, and early childhood education teacher preparation programs. Western Washington University is expected to enroll an additional twenty-four students in the early childhood education program, twenty-five students in the dual special education elementary education program at the north Seattle site, and twenty-five students in the dual special education elementary education program at the Everett site.

(3) The sum of one hundred fifty-eight thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the general fund—state account to Western Washington University. The appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for diversity outreach and recruitment of already admitted students into teacher preparation programs. The university is expected to increase the number of students in teacher preparation programs by two hundred fifty-three students above current levels.

(4) The sum of seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the general fund—state account to Western Washington University. The appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the development of the model curriculum required in section 204 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605. OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION. (1) The sum of four hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the general fund—state account to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the statewide campaign and statewide central depository required in section 202 of this act.

(2) The sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the general fund—state account to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the centralized hiring portal required in section 203 of this act.

(3) The sum of two hundred twenty-five million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2017, from the general fund—state account to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for additional mentors in educator support program required in section 501 of this act.

--- END ---