BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 10.93 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By January 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, all general authority Washington law enforcement agencies must report to the office of the attorney general regarding the occasions of justifiable homicide or use of deadly force by a public officer, peace officer, or person aiding under RCW 9A.16.040. The report must include the following:

(a) The number of incidents in which peace officers discharged firearms at citizens;

(b) The demographic characteristics of the officers and citizens involved in each incident, including sex, age, race, and ethnicity;

(c) The agency or agencies employing the involved officers and location of each incident;

(d) The particular weapon(s) used by peace officers and citizens; and

(e) The injuries, if any, suffered by officers and citizens.

(2) By July 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, the office of the attorney general must compile and make public the data collected under this section.

--- END ---