BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.28.095 and 2003 c 399 s 602 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The scope of work for the equipment repair specialty involves servicing, maintaining, repairing, or replacing utilization equipment or wiring, appliances, devices, or equipment as specified by rule of the department.

(2) "Utilization equipment" means equipment that is: (a) Self-contained on a single skid or frame; (b) factory built to standardized sizes or types; (c) listed or field evaluated by a laboratory or approved by the department under WAC 296-46B-030; and (d) connected as a single unit to a single source of electrical power limited to a maximum of six hundred volts. The equipment may also be connected to a separate single source of electrical control power limited to a maximum of two hundred fifty volts. Utilization equipment does not include devices used for occupant space heating by industrial, commercial, hospital, educational, public, and private commercial buildings, and other end users.

(3) "Servicing, maintaining, repairing, or replacing utilization equipment" includes:

(a) The like-in-kind replacement of the equipment if the same unmodified electrical circuit is used to supply the equipment being replaced;

(b) The like-in-kind replacement or repair of remote control components that are integral to the operation of the equipment;

(c) The like-in-kind replacement or repair of electrical components within the equipment; and

(d) The disconnection, replacement, and reconnection of low-voltage control and line voltage supply whips not over six feet in length provided there are no modifications to the characteristics of the branch circuit.

(4) "Servicing, maintaining, repairing, or replacing utilization equipment" does not include:

(a) The installation, repair, or modification of wiring that interconnects equipment and/or remote components, branch circuit conductors, services, feeders, panelboards, disconnect switches, motor control centers, remote magnetic starters/contactors, or raceway/conductor systems interconnecting multiple equipment or other electrical components;

(b) Any work providing electrical feeds into the power distribution unit or installation of conduits and raceways; or

(c) Any electrical work governed under article(s) 500, 501, 502, 503, 504, 505, 510, 511, 513, 514, 515, or 516 NEC (i.e., classified locations), except for electrical work in sewage pumping stations.

Sec. 2. RCW 19.28.191 and 2014 c 156 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receipt of the application, the department shall review the application and determine whether the applicant is eligible to take an examination for the master journey level electrician, journey level electrician, master specialty electrician, or specialty electrician certificate of competency.

(a) Before July 1, 2005, an applicant who possesses a valid journey level electrician certificate of competency in effect for the previous four years and a valid general administrator's certificate may apply for a master journey level electrician certificate of competency without examination.

(b) Before July 1, 2005, an applicant who possesses a valid specialty electrician certificate of competency, in the specialty applied for, for the previous two years and a valid specialty administrator's certificate, in the specialty applied for, may apply for a master specialty electrician certificate of competency without examination.

(c) Before December 1, 2003, the following persons may obtain an equipment repair specialty electrician certificate of competency without examination:

(i) A person who has successfully completed an apprenticeship program approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the machinist trade; and

(ii) A person who provides evidence in a form prescribed by the department affirming that: (A) He or she was employed as of April 1, 2003, by a factory-authorized equipment dealer or service company; and (B) he or she has worked in equipment repair for a minimum of four thousand hours.

(d) To be eligible to take the examination for a master journey level electrician certificate of competency, the applicant must have possessed a valid journey level electrician certificate of competency for four years.

(e) To be eligible to take the examination for a master specialty electrician certificate of competency, the applicant must have possessed a valid specialty electrician certificate of competency, in the specialty applied for, for two years.

(f) To be eligible to take the examination for a journey level certificate of competency, the applicant must have:

(i) Worked in the electrical construction trade for a minimum of eight thousand hours, of which four thousand hours shall be in industrial or commercial electrical installation under the supervision of a master journey level electrician or journey level electrician and not more than a total of four thousand hours in all specialties under the supervision of a master journey level electrician, journey level electrician, master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty. Specialty electricians with less than a four thousand hour work experience requirement cannot credit the time required to obtain that specialty towards qualifying to become a journey level electrician; or

(ii) Successfully completed an apprenticeship program approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the electrical construction trade.

(g)(i) To be eligible to take the examination for a specialty electrician certificate of competency, the applicant must have:

(A) Worked in the residential (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(a)), pump and irrigation (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(b)), sign (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(d)), limited energy (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(e)), nonresidential maintenance (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(g)), or other new nonresidential specialties as determined by the department in rule under the supervision of a master journey level electrician, journey level electrician, master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty for a minimum of four thousand hours;

(B) Worked in the appliance repair specialty as determined by the department in rule, restricted nonresidential maintenance as determined by the department in rule, the equipment repair specialty as determined by the department in rule, the pump and irrigation specialty other than as defined by (g)(i)(A) of this subsection or domestic pump specialty as determined by the department in rule, or a specialty other than the designated specialties in (g)(i)(A) of this subsection for a minimum of the initial ninety days, or longer if set by rule by the department. The restricted nonresidential maintenance specialty is limited to a maximum of 277 volts and 20 amperes for lighting branch circuits and/or a maximum of 250 volts and 60 amperes for other circuits((, but excludes)) excluding the replacement or repair of circuit breakers. The department may alter the scope of work for the restricted nonresidential maintenance specialty by rule. The initial period must be spent under one hundred percent supervision of a master journey level electrician, journey level electrician, master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty. After this initial period, a person may take the specialty examination. If the person passes the examination, the person may work unsupervised for the balance of the minimum hours required for certification. A person may not be certified as a specialty electrician in the appliance repair specialty or in a specialty other than the designated specialties in (g)(i)(A) of this subsection, however, until the person has worked a minimum of two thousand hours in that specialty, or longer if set by rule by the department; or

(C) Successfully completed an approved apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04 RCW for the applicant's specialty in the electrical construction trade.

(ii) In meeting the training requirements for the pump and irrigation or domestic pump specialties, the individual shall be allowed to obtain the experience required by this section at the same time the individual is meeting the experience required by RCW 18.106.040(1)(c). After meeting the training requirements provided in this section, the individual may take the examination and upon passing the examination, meeting additional training requirements as may still be required for those seeking a pump and irrigation, or a domestic pump specialty certificate as defined by rule, and paying the applicable fees, the individual must be issued the appropriate certificate. The department may include an examination for specialty plumbing certificate defined in RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) with the examination required by this section. The department, by rule and in consultation with the electrical board, may establish additional equivalent ways to gain the experience requirements required by this subsection. Individuals who are able to provide evidence to the department, prior to January 1, 2007, that they have been employed as a pump installer in the pump and irrigation or domestic pump business by an appropriately licensed electrical contractor, registered general contractor defined by chapter 18.27 RCW, or appropriate general specialty contractor defined by chapter 18.27 RCW for not less than eight thousand hours in the most recent six calendar years shall be issued the appropriate certificate by the department upon receiving such documentation and applicable fees. The department shall establish a single document for those who have received both an electrical specialty certification as defined by this subsection and have also met the certification requirements for the specialty plumber as defined by RCW 18.106.010(10)(c), showing that the individual has received both certifications. No other experience or training requirements may be imposed.

(iii) Before July 1, 2015, an applicant possessing an electrical training certificate issued by the department is eligible to apply one hour of every two hours of unsupervised telecommunications system installation work experience toward eligibility for examination for a limited energy system certificate of competency (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(e)), if:

(A) The telecommunications work experience was obtained while employed by a contractor licensed under this chapter as a general electrical contractor (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(1)) or limited energy system specialty contractor (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(e)); and

(B) Evidence of the telecommunications work experience is submitted in the form of an affidavit prescribed by the department.

(h) Any applicant for a journey level electrician certificate of competency who has successfully completed a two-year program in the electrical construction trade at public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally accredited technical or trade schools licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may substitute up to two years of the technical or trade school program for two years of work experience under a master journey level electrician or journey level electrician. The applicant shall obtain the additional two years of work experience required in industrial or commercial electrical installation prior to the beginning, or after the completion, of the technical school program. Any applicant who has received training in the electrical construction trade in the armed service of the United States may be eligible to apply armed service work experience towards qualification to take the examination for the journey level electrician certificate of competency.

(i) An applicant for a specialty electrician certificate of competency who, after January 1, 2000, has successfully completed a two-year program in the electrical construction trade at a public community or technical college, or a not-for-profit nationally accredited technical or trade school licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may substitute up to one year of the technical or trade school program for one year of work experience under a master journey level electrician, journey level electrician, master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty. Any applicant who has received training in the electrical construction trade in the armed services of the United States may be eligible to apply armed service work experience towards qualification to take the examination for an appropriate specialty electrician certificate of competency.

(j) The department must determine whether hours of training and experience in the armed services or school program are in the electrical construction trade and appropriate as a substitute for hours of work experience. The department must use the following criteria for evaluating the equivalence of classroom electrical training programs and work in the electrical construction trade:

(i) A two-year electrical training program must consist of three thousand or more hours.

(ii) In a two-year electrical training program, a minimum of two thousand four hundred hours of student/instructor contact time must be technical electrical instruction directly related to the scope of work of the electrical specialty. Student/instructor contact time includes lecture and in-school lab.

(iii) The department may not allow credit for a program that accepts more than one thousand hours transferred from another school's program.

(iv) Electrical specialty training school programs of less than two years will have all of the above student/instructor contact time hours proportionately reduced. Such programs may not apply to more than fifty percent of the work experience required to attain certification.

(v) Electrical training programs of less than two years may not be credited towards qualification for journey level electrician unless the training program is used to gain qualification for a four thousand hour electrical specialty.

(k) No other requirement for eligibility may be imposed.

(2) The department shall establish reasonable rules for the examinations to be given applicants for certificates of competency. In establishing the rules, the department shall consult with the board. Upon determination that the applicant is eligible to take the examination, the department shall so notify the applicant, indicating the time and place for taking the examination.

(3) No noncertified individual may work unsupervised more than one year beyond the date when the trainee would be eligible to test for a certificate of competency if working on a full-time basis after original application for the trainee certificate. For the purposes of this section, "full-time basis" means two thousand hours.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.28.400 and 2014 c 156 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the electrical board under RCW 19.28.311.

(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department or the director's designee.

(4) "Telecommunications administrator" means a person designated by a telecommunications contractor to supervise the installation of telecommunications systems in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

(5) "Telecommunications backbone cabling systems" means a system that provides interconnections between telecommunications closets, equipment rooms, and entrance facilities in the telecommunications cabling system structure. Backbone cabling consists of the backbone cables, intermediate and main cross-connects, mechanical terminations, and patch cords or jumpers used for backbone to backbone cross-connection. Backbone cabling also includes cabling between buildings.

(6) "Telecommunications closet" means a room for housing telecommunications equipment, cable terminations, and cross-connect wiring that serve that particular floor. The closet is the recognized transition point between the backbone and horizontal cabling systems.

(7) "Telecommunications contractor" means a person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity that advertises, offers to undertake, undertakes, submits a bid for, or does the work of installing or maintaining telecommunications systems.

(8) "Telecommunications horizontal cabling systems" means the portions of the telecommunications cabling system that extend from the work area telecommunications outlet or connector to the telecommunications closet. The horizontal cabling includes the horizontal cables, the telecommunications outlet or connector in the work area, the mechanical termination, and horizontal cross-connections located in the telecommunications closet.

(9) "Telecommunications network demarcation point" means the point or interconnection between the service provider's communications cabling, terminal equipment, and protective apparatus and the customer's premises telecommunications cabling system. The location of this point for regulated carriers is determined by federal and state regulations. The carrier should be contacted to determine the location policies in effect in the area.

(10) "Telecommunications scope of work" means the work of a telecommunications contractor as defined in this section and as specified by rule of the department. This includes, but is not limited to, the installation, maintenance, and testing of telecommunications systems, equipment, and associated hardware, pathway systems, and cable management systems, which excludes cable tray and conduit raceway systems. The scope also includes installation of open wiring systems of telecommunications cables, surface nonmetallic raceways designated and used exclusively for telecommunications, optical fiber innerduct raceway, underground raceways designated and used exclusively for telecommunications and installed for additions or extensions to existing telecommunications systems not to exceed fifty feet inside the building, and incidental short sections of circular or surface metal raceway, not to exceed ten feet, for access or protection of telecommunications cabling and installation of cable trays and ladder racks in telecommunications service entrance rooms, spaces, or closets.

(11) "Telecommunications service entrance room or space" means a room or space used as the building serving facility in which the joining of inter-building and intra-building backbone facilities takes place. The service entrance room may also house electronic equipment serving any telecommunications function.

(12) A "telecommunications structured cabling system" is the complete collective configuration of cabling and associated hardware at a given site and installed to perform specific telecommunications functions.

(13) "Telecommunications systems" means structured cabling systems that begin at the demarcation point between the local service provider and the customer's premises structured cabling system or the wiring, appliances, devices, or equipment as specified by rule of the department.

(a) Telecommunications systems ((encompass)) include, but are not limited to, all forms of information generation, processing, and transporting of signals conveyed electronically or optically within or between buildings, including voice, data, video, and audio.

(b) Telecommunications systems include, but are not limited to, structured cabling systems, compatible connecting hardware, telecommunications equipment, premises switching equipment providing operational power to the telecommunications device, infrared, fiber optic, radio-frequency, power distribution associated with telecommunications systems, and other limited-energy interconnections associated with telecommunications systems or appliances.

(c) Telecommunications systems do not include horizontal cabling used for fire protection signaling systems, intrusion alarms, access control systems, patient monitoring systems, energy management control systems, industrial and automation control systems, HVAC/refrigeration control systems, lighting or lighting control systems, and stand-alone amplified sound or public address systems.

(d) Telecommunications systems may interface with other building signal systems including security, alarms, and energy management at cross-connection junctions within telecommunications closets or at extended points of demarcation. Horizontal cabling for a telecommunications outlet, necessary to interface with any of these systems outside of a telecommunications closet, is the work of the telecommunications contractor. Telecommunications systems do not include the installation or termination of premises line voltage service, feeder, or branch circuit conductors or equipment.

(14) "Telecommunications worker" means a person primarily and regularly engaged in the installation and/or maintenance of telecommunications systems, equipment, and infrastructure as defined in this chapter.

(15) "Telecommunications workstation" means a building space where the occupant normally interacts with telecommunications equipment. The telecommunications outlet in the work area is the point at which end-user equipment plugs into the building telecommunications utility formed by the pathway, space, and building wiring system.

--- END ---