BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.343.390 and 1994 c 223 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A majority of all members of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum. Absence of any board member from four consecutive regular meetings of the board, unless on account of sickness or authorized by resolution of the board, shall be sufficient cause for the remaining members of the board to declare by resolution that such board member position is vacated. In addition, vacancies shall occur as provided in RCW 42.12.010.

(2) If a board member will be unable to attend a regular meeting because of a temporary absence resulting from travel for work, duties as an elected or appointed official, or military service, the member and the board must use available and sufficient electronic remote access means for allowing the member to participate in the meeting. If no arrangements can be made for the board member's participation in the meeting through remote access means, and if the temporarily absent board member is otherwise available to participate in the meeting, the board member's absence must be excused and may not be considered for purposes of declaring a board member position vacated. For purposes of this subsection, "remote access means" include, but are not limited to, conference calls and internet-based communication technologies that include audio or audio and video connections.

--- END ---