BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.18.220 and 2011 c 243 s 1 and 2011 c 171 s 70 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A registered owner may apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for a collector vehicle license plate for a motor vehicle that is at least thirty years old. The motor vehicle must be operated primarily as a collector vehicle and be in good running order. The applicant for the collector vehicle license plate shall:

(a) Purchase a registration for the motor vehicle as required under chapters 46.16A and 46.17 RCW; and

(b) Pay the special license plate fee established under RCW 46.17.220(1)(((d))) (f), in addition to any other fees or taxes required by law.

(2)(a) A person applying for a collector vehicle license plate for a vehicle manufactured in or before 1986 may:

(((a))) (i) Receive a collector vehicle license plate assigned by the department; or

(((b))) (ii) Provide an actual Washington state issued license plate designated for general use in the year of the vehicle's manufacture.

(b) A person applying for a collector vehicle license plate for a vehicle manufactured in or after 1987 must be issued a collector vehicle license plate assigned by the department.

(3) Collector vehicle license plates:

(a) Are valid for the life of the motor vehicle;

(b) Are not required to be renewed; and

(c) Must be displayed on the rear of the motor vehicle.

(4) A collector vehicle registered under this section may only be used for participation in club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades, and occasional pleasure driving.

(5) Collector vehicle license plates under subsection (2)(b) of this section may be transferred from one motor vehicle to another motor vehicle described in subsection (1) of this section upon application to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director.

(6) Any person who knowingly provides a false or facsimile license plate under subsection (2)(((b))) (a)(ii) of this section is subject to a traffic infraction and fine in an amount equal to the monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.16A.200(7)(b). Additionally, the person must pay for the cost of a collector vehicle license plate as listed in RCW 46.17.220(1)(((d))) (f), unless already paid.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.18.220 and 2015 c 200 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A registered owner may apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for a collector vehicle license plate for a motor vehicle or travel trailer that is at least thirty years old. The motor vehicle must be operated primarily as a collector vehicle and be in good running order. The applicant for the collector vehicle license plate shall:

(a) Purchase a registration for the motor vehicle or travel trailer as required under chapters 46.16A and 46.17 RCW; and

(b) Pay the special license plate fee established under RCW 46.17.220(1)(f), in addition to any other fees or taxes required by law.

(2)(a) A person applying for a collector vehicle license plate for a vehicle manufactured in or before 1986 may:

(((a))) (i) Receive a collector vehicle license plate assigned by the department; or

(((b))) (ii) Provide an actual Washington state issued license plate designated for general use in the year of the vehicle's manufacture.

(b) A person applying for a collector vehicle license plate for a vehicle manufactured in or after 1987 must be issued a collector vehicle license plate assigned by the department.

(3) Collector vehicle license plates:

(a) Are valid for the life of the motor vehicle or travel trailer;

(b) Are not required to be renewed; and

(c) Must be displayed on the rear of the motor vehicle or travel trailer.

(4) A collector vehicle registered under this section may only be used for participation in club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades, and occasional pleasure driving.

(5) Collector vehicle license plates under subsection (2)(((b))) (a)(ii) of this section may be transferred from one vehicle to another vehicle described in subsection (1) of this section upon application to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director.

(6) Any person who knowingly provides a false or facsimile license plate under subsection (2)(b) of this section is subject to a traffic infraction and fine in an amount equal to the monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.16A.200(7)(b). Additionally, the person must pay for the cost of a collector vehicle license plate as listed in RCW 46.17.220(1)(f), unless already paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act expires January 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act takes effect January 1, 2017.

--- END ---