BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.83.010 and 1961 c 12 s 46.83.010 are each amended to read as follows:

Any city ((or)), town ((and the)), or county ((in which it is located are authorized, as may be agreed between the respective governing bodies of the city or town and county, to)) may establish a traffic school for the purposes and under the conditions set forth in this chapter. ((Such)) A city ((or)), town ((and)), or county traffic school may be ((effected)) established whenever the governing body of the city ((or)), town ((shall pass)), or county adopts an ordinance ((and the board of commissioners of the county shall pass)) or a resolution declaring the intention to organize and operate a traffic school in accordance with ((agreements had between them as to)) the financing, organization, and operation ((thereof)) of the traffic school as described in the ordinance or resolution.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.83.020 and 1961 c 12 s 46.83.020 are each amended to read as follows:

A traffic school established under this chapter shall be under the control and supervision of the ((board of county commissioners)) governing body of the city, town, or county that has established the traffic school, through such agents, assistants, or instructors as the ((board)) governing body may designate((, and)). The traffic school of a city, town, or county shall be conducted with the assistance of ((the county sheriff and)) the police department of the city or town or with the assistance of the county sheriff.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.83.030 and 1961 c 12 s 46.83.030 are each amended to read as follows:

All funds appropriated by the city ((or)), town ((and)), or county to the operation of the traffic school shall be deposited with the city, town, or county treasurer and shall be administered by the ((board of county commissioners)) governing body of the city, town, or county. The governing bodies of every city ((or)), town ((and)), or county participating in the operation of traffic schools are authorized to make such appropriations by ordinance or resolution, as the case may be, as they shall determine for the establishment and operation of traffic schools, and they are further authorized to accept and expend gifts, donations, and any other money from any source, private or public, given for the purpose of said schools.

--- END ---