BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW to read as follows:

The human rights commission shall repeal the rule currently codified at WAC 162-32-060 in its entirety. The human rights commission may not thereafter initiate any rule-making procedure that involves the subject of gender segregated facilities.

--- END ---