BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.325.110 and 2007 c 348 s 408 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The vehicle electrification demonstration grant program is established within the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce. The director may establish policies and procedures necessary for processing, reviewing, and approving applications made under this chapter.

(2) The director may approve an application for a vehicle electrification demonstration project only if the director finds:

(a) The applicant is a state agency, public school district, public utility district, or a political subdivision of the state, including port districts, counties, cities, towns, special purpose districts, and other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations or a state institution of higher education;

(b) The project partially funds the purchase of or conversion of existing vehicles to plug-in hybrid electric vehicles or battery electric vehicles for use in the applicant's fleet or operations;

(c) The project partners with an electric utility and demonstrates technologies to allow controlled vehicle charging, including the use of power electronics or wireless technologies, to regulate time-of-day and duration of charging;

(d) The project provides matching resources; and

(e) The project provides evaluation of fuel savings, greenhouse gas reductions, battery capabilities, energy management system, charge controlling technologies, and other relevant information determined on the advice of the vehicle electrification work group.

(3) The director may approve an application for a vehicle electrification demonstration project if the project, in addition to meeting the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, also demonstrates charging using on-site renewable resources or vehicle-to-grid capabilities that enable the vehicle to discharge electricity into the grid.

Sec. 2. 2015 c 65 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(((1))) Section 16 of this act expires July 1, 2020.

(((2) Section 41 of this act expires June 30, 2016.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.325.050 (Director's report) and 2009 c 518 s 20 & 2006 c 171 s 7;

(2) RCW 43.325.100 (Framework to mitigate climate change—Report) and 2007 c 348 s 403;

(3) RCW 43.325.900 (Expiration date—Transfer of moneys—2006 c 171 ss 1-7) and 2006 c 171 s 11;

(4) 2015 3rd sp.s c 4 s 980 (uncodified);

(5) 2015 c 225 s 129 (uncodified);

(6) 2013 2nd sp.s c 4 s 1906 (uncodified);

(7) 2009 c 564 s 963 (uncodified); and

(8) 2009 c 451 s 10 (uncodified).

--- END ---