BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that in the more than twenty-five years since its original enactment, the growth management act has significantly changed the processes and results of planning decisions and land use practices in Washington. Between 1990 and 2015, the population of Washington significantly increased from four million eight hundred seventy thousand to over seven million. In 2012, the office of financial management estimated that the state will nearly double its population, reaching eight million eight hundred thousand residents by 2040. It is the intent of the legislature to review the growth management act to identify areas of the law that may benefit from modification to better ensure that Washington's land use practices align with the needs of current and future residents.

(2) A legislative task force on the growth management act is established, with members as provided in this subsection. All member appointments or selections must be made by July 1, 2016.

(a) The majority and minority leaders of the senate shall appoint two members from each of the relevant caucuses of the senate.

(b) The majority and minority leaders of the house of representatives shall appoint two members from each of the relevant caucuses of the house of representatives.

(c) The governor shall appoint:

(i) One member who represents the department of commerce;

(ii) One member who represents the Washington state department of transportation;

(iii) One member who represents environmental concerns;

(iv) One member who represents the building industry;

(v) One member who represents property owners;

(vi) One member who represents buyers and sellers of real property;

(vii) Two members who represent rural economic interests, with one member residing east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range and the other residing west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range; and

(viii) Two members who represent urban economic interests, with one member residing east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range and the other residing west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range.

(d) An association representing Washington cities shall appoint two members who are elected members of the legislative bodies of cities or towns or mayors of cities or towns, with one member residing east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range and the other residing west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range.

(e) An association representing Washington counties shall appoint two members who are elected members of a county legislative body or elected executives of a county, with one member residing east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range and the other residing west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range.

(f) An association representing Washington state school directors shall appoint one member who represents Washington state school directors.

(g) An association representing Washington state county and regional planning directors shall appoint one member who represents county and regional planning directors.

(3) The chair of the house of representatives local government committee shall be the chair of the task force. The chair shall convene at least three meetings of the task force.

(4) The task force shall review the growth management act and provide recommendations, if any, for modifications of the act that will help ensure that Washington's land use practices align with the needs of current and future residents of the state. In conducting its review, the task force may consider issues including land management, school siting, short line railroads, economic development, fiscal impacts of the growth management act on local government revenue and infrastructure expenses, and other issues identified by the task force.

(5) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research.

(6) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(7) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(8) By November 1, 2016, the task force must submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, a summary of the task force's discussions and recommendations, if any.

(9) This section expires January 1, 2017.

--- END ---