BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that high school programs that combine academic and technical curricula around a career theme and that establish partnerships with local employers to provide work-integrated and career-related learning opportunities produce higher earnings gains for students who complete the programs than for students who do not complete the programs.

(2) Creating opportunities for students to have work-integrated experiences during high school can produce substantial and sustained improvements in the labor market and improve the students' transitions to adulthood.

(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to increase the career and college readiness of high school students in Washington by establishing the career and college-ready lighthouse pilot project and advisory committee to inform the legislature about the best practices in work-integrated and career-related instructional programs and the barriers to statewide adoption of these programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.630 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, the career and college-ready lighthouse pilot project is established. The purpose of the pilot project is to provide an opportunity for students to:

(a) Explore and understand a wide range of career opportunities through applied learning;

(b) Engage with industry mentors; and

(c) Plan for career and college success.

(2) The advisory committee established under section 3 of this act must select, in cooperation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction:

(a) Two innovative high schools to act as lighthouse mentors: One with an aviation theme and a solid partnership with the aviation industry, and one with a health and bioscience theme and a solid partnership with the health and bioscience industries;

(b) Four schools seeking to pilot innovative work-integrated and career-related instructional programs similar to those offered by the lighthouse mentors: One in southwest Washington, one in central Washington, one in Eastern Washington, and one in the Seattle area of the Puget Sound region.

(3)(a) Beginning in the 2017-18 school year, the pilot schools selected under subsection (2) of this section must implement a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics curriculum, developed in collaboration with the lighthouse mentors and the advisory committee, that can be delivered in the context of employment opportunities in one or more industry clusters, including manufacturing, building and construction, aerospace and maritime, and health and bioscience.

(b) The three main features of the instructional program are:

(i) An external mentor for each student;

(ii) Academic curricula delivered in a work-integrated and career-related manner; and

(iii) Opportunities for work-integrated learning experiences, prioritizing paid internship and apprenticeship opportunities.

(4) The schools selected as lighthouses under this section must serve as resources and examples of how to deliver academic content in a project-based career-related manner, as well as best practices for connecting students to external mentors, and offering work-integrated learning experiences in partnership with industry and community members.

(5) By August 1, 2018, and August 1, 2019, the school district selected to participate under subsection (2) of this section must submit to the workforce training and education coordinating board an interim and end-of-project report, respectively, that includes an evaluation of the effect of the instructional program on high school graduation rates, state test scores, industry and community partnerships, work-integrated learning experiences, and any other relevant data.

(6) This section expires July 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The board shall convene a career and college readiness advisory committee to advise the education and workforce sectors, and the legislature, on how to create opportunities for students to: Explore and understand a wide range of career-related opportunities through applied learning, engage with industry mentors, and plan for career and college success.

(2) The committee shall:

(a) Select, in cooperation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, schools to act as lighthouse mentors and schools to pilot science, technology, engineering, and mathematics curricula that can be delivered in the context of employment opportunities in one or more industry clusters, as required under section 2 of this act;

(b) Advise the superintendent of public instruction and school districts on the development and implementation of work-integrated instructional programs;

(c) Review the instructional programs of the lighthouse and pilot schools, as required under section 4 of this act, using data and methodology guidance from the board; and

(d) Recommend policies to implement work-integrated and career-related strategies that increase college and career readiness of students statewide.

(3) The committee must consult with individuals from the public and private sector with expertise in career and technical education and work-integrated training, including representatives of labor unions, professional technical organizations, and business and industry.

(4) The committee must, at a minimum, be composed of the following members:

(a) The majority and minority leaders of the senate shall each appoint one member from the relevant caucuses of the senate;

(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(c) One educator representing the K-12 career and technical education sector appointed by the superintendent of public instruction, based on the recommendations of the association for career and technical education;

(d) One school counselor appointed by the superintendent of public instruction, based on the recommendations of the school counselor association;

(e) One educator representing the community and technical colleges appointed by the state board for community and technical colleges;

(f) One member of the governor's office specializing in career and technical education and workforce needs, appointed by the governor;

(g) One member of the workforce training and education coordinating board; and

(h) Other members with specialized expertise, determined by the committee.

(5) The chair or cochairs of the committee must be selected by the members of the committee.

(6) Staff support for the committee must be provided by the board.

(7) The committee shall report its findings, including a review of the evaluation of the instructional programs, required under section 4 of this act, and an analysis of barriers to statewide adoption of work-integrated and career-related learning opportunities and instructional programs, and recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction, the appropriate committees of the legislature, and the state board for community and technical colleges by November 1, 2019, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036.

(8) This section expires July 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The board, in consultation with the advisory group created under section 3 of this act, must use the reports submitted under section 2(5) of this act, along with historical data from those schools, to evaluate the instructional programs of the lighthouse and pilot schools selected under section 2 of this act, to determine:

(i) The impact on in-school progress, high school graduation rates, and other indicators of career and college readiness, both overall and in reducing opportunity gaps;

(ii) Best practices for partnering with industry and the local community to create opportunities for applied learning through internships, apprenticeships, and mentorships; and

(iii) Ways to link high school and beyond plans to work-integrated and career-related learning opportunities.

(b) The evaluation must be completed in time for the results to be reviewed and incorporated into the report of the advisory committee required under section 3 of this act.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2020.

--- END ---