BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The Washington state institute for public policy must, either directly or through contract with a third party with expertise in economic analysis, produce a report to the legislature that estimates the loss in value of private property in the state that is a direct or proximate result of the inability to access water and develop land because of instream flow rules adopted by the department of ecology.

(2) The Washington state institute for public policy may conduct the study required by this section, or have the study conducted, using any effective economic analysis available to estimate the consequences on landowners and local governments of adopted instream flow rules, including any appropriate differences-in-differences analysis.

(3) The study required by this section may be limited to representative regional analyses, as opposed to a statewide analysis, if the time and budget for the study is found by the institute to limit the effectiveness or accuracy of a statewide analysis.

(4) The study required by this section must be completed by December 31, 2018.

(5) This section expires July 31, 2019.

--- END ---