BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All public high schools in the state must offer their juniors and seniors the opportunity to take the SAT or ACT once per school year.

(2) The tests must be given during the school day on a date to be determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) The tests must be free of charge to all students.

--- END ---