BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All public high school students in the state shall receive five hundred dollars in vouchers to be used towards examination fees and exam reporting fees for end-of-course high school examinations that have a cost to students or their parents or guardians.

(2) The vouchers in subsection (1) of this section shall be allotted to school districts. School districts must distribute the vouchers in accordance with rules established for their distribution.

(3) The vouchers may be used to pay for the cost of AP examinations.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---