BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART 1

LEGISLATIVE INTENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. The legislature intends to provide one billion dollars in state funding from fiscal years 2016 to 2025 to assist school districts in financing public school facilities necessary to support state-funded all-day kindergarten and class size reduction in kindergarten through third grade.

PART 2

BUDGET STABILIZATION ACCOUNT TRANSFER PLAN

Sec. 201. RCW 43.79.495 and 2012 c 187 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The budget stabilization account is governed by the provisions in Article VII, section 12 and this section.

(2) By June 30th of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer an amount equal to one percent of the general state revenues for that fiscal year to the budget stabilization account.

(3) For the purposes of Article VII, section 12, this section, and RCW 82.33.050, the state employment growth forecast shall be based on the total nonfarm payroll employment data series.

(4) The legislature intends that:

(a) Beginning with fiscal year 2016 and ending with fiscal year 2025, on June 30th of each fiscal year, pursuant to appropriation, the state treasurer shall transfer into the education construction fund an amount equal to one-half of the one percent of general state revenues for that fiscal year transferred into the budget stabilization account.

(b) In each omnibus capital appropriations act, the amount appropriated into the education construction fund under (a) of this subsection must be appropriated from the education construction fund to the office of the superintendent of public instruction solely for grants to school districts to construct, modernize, or replace public school facilities to support state-funded all-day kindergarten and class size reduction in kindergarten through third grade.

PART 3

BUDGET STABILIZATION ACCOUNT APPROPRIATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. Budget stabilization account: For expenditure into the education construction fund to be used solely to fund the K-3 class size reduction construction grant program established in chapter 41, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.:

Appropriation:

Budget Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation (FY 2016). . . .$91,795,000

Budget Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation (FY 2017). . . .$94,832,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$186,627,000

PART 4

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---