BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 64.06.080 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any ordinance, resolution, or policy adopted by a city or county that imposes a requirement on landlords or sellers of real property, or their agents, to provide information to a buyer or tenant pertaining to the subject property or the surrounding area is effective only after:

(a) A summary of the ordinance, resolution, or policy is posted electronically in accordance with RCW 43.110.030(2)(e); and

(b) An internet link to the ordinance, resolution, or policy, or the relevant portion of the actual language of the ordinance, resolution, or policy, is posted electronically in accordance with RCW 43.110.030(2)(e).

(2) If, prior to September 26, 2015, a city or county adopted an ordinance, resolution, or policy that imposes a requirement on landlords or sellers of real property, or their agents, to provide information to a buyer or tenant pertaining to the subject property or the surrounding area, the city or county must cause, within ninety days of September 26, 2015:

(a) A summary of the ordinance, resolution, or policy to be posted electronically in accordance with RCW 43.110.030(2)(e); and

(b) An internet link to the ordinance, resolution, or policy, or the relevant portion of the actual language of the ordinance, resolution, or policy, to be posted electronically in accordance with RCW 43.110.030(2)(e) ((within ninety days of September 26, 2015, or the requirement shall)). If the requirement is not electronically posted as required by this subsection, the requirement must thereafter cease to be in effect.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.110.030 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of commerce must contract for the provision of municipal research and services to cities, towns, and counties. Contracts for municipal research and services must be made with state agencies, educational institutions, or private consulting firms, that in the judgment of the department are qualified to provide such research and services. Contracts for staff support may be made with state agencies, educational institutions, or private consulting firms that in the judgment of the department are qualified to provide such support.

(2) Municipal research and services consists of:

(a) Studying and researching city, town, and county government and issues relating to city, town, and county government;

(b) Acquiring, preparing, and distributing publications related to city, town, and county government and issues relating to city, town, and county government;

(c) Providing educational conferences relating to city, town, and county government and issues relating to city, town, and county government;

(d) Furnishing legal, technical, consultative, and field services to cities, towns, and counties concerning planning, public health, utility services, fire protection, law enforcement, public works, and other issues relating to city, town, and county government; and

(e) ((Providing a list of all requirements imposed by all cities, towns, and counties)) (i) For any ordinance, resolution, or policy adopted by a city, town, or county that imposes a requirement on landlords or sellers of real property to provide information to a buyer or tenant pertaining to the subject property or the surrounding area((. The list)), posting:

(A) A summary of the ordinance, resolution, or policy; and

(B) An internet link to the ordinance, resolution, or policy, or the relevant portion of the actual language of the ordinance, resolution, or policy.

(ii) Information provided by cities, towns, and counties regarding an ordinance, resolution, or policy under (e)(i) of this subsection must be posted in a specific section on a web site maintained by the entity with which the department of commerce contracts for the provision of municipal research and services under this section, and must list by jurisdiction all applicable requirements. Cities, towns, and counties must provide information for posting on the web site in accordance with RCW 64.06.080.

(3) Requests for legal services by county officials must be sent to the office of the county prosecuting attorney. Responses by the department of commerce to county requests for legal services must be provided to the requesting official and the county prosecuting attorney.

(4) The department of commerce must coordinate with the association of Washington cities and the Washington state association of counties in carrying out the activities in this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.46.015 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A city or county that meets the requirements of subsection (2) of this section may use the greater of one hundred thousand dollars or twenty-five percent of available funds, but not to exceed one million dollars per year, from revenues collected under RCW 82.46.010 for the maintenance of capital projects, as defined in RCW 82.46.010(6)(b).

(2) A city or county may use revenues pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if:

(a) The city or county prepares a written report demonstrating that it has or will have adequate funding from all sources of public funding to pay for all capital projects, as defined in RCW 82.46.010, identified in its capital facilities plan for the succeeding two-year period. Cities or counties not required to prepare a capital facilities plan may satisfy this provision by using a document that, at a minimum, identifies capital project needs and available public funding sources for the succeeding two-year period; and

(b)(i) The city or county has not enacted, after September 26, 2015((,)): Any requirement on the listing((, leasing,)) or sale of real property((, unless the requirement is either)); or any requirement on landlords, at the time of executing a lease, to perform or provide physical improvements or modifications to real property or fixtures, except if necessary to address an immediate threat to health or safety; or

(ii) Any local requirement adopted by the city or county under (b)(i) of this subsection is: Specifically authorized by RCW 35.80.030, 35A.11.020, chapter 7.48 RCW, or chapter 19.27 RCW; specifically authorized by other state or federal law; or ((is)) a seller or landlord disclosure requirement pursuant to RCW 64.06.080.

(3) The report prepared under subsection (2)(a) of this section must: (a) Include information necessary to determine compliance with the requirements of subsection (2)(a) of this section; (b) identify how revenues collected under RCW 82.46.010 were used by the city or county during the prior two-year period; (c) identify how funds authorized under subsection (1) of this section will be used during the succeeding two-year period; and (d) identify what percentage of funding for capital projects within the city or county is attributable to revenues under RCW 82.46.010 compared to all other sources of capital project funding. The city or county must prepare and adopt the report as part of its regular, public budget process.

(4) The authority to use funds as authorized in this section is in addition to the authority to use funds pursuant to RCW 82.46.010(7), which remains in effect through December 31, 2016.

(5) For purposes of this section, "maintenance" means the use of funds for labor and materials that will preserve, prevent the decline of, or extend the useful life of a capital project. "Maintenance" does not include labor or material costs for routine operations of a capital project.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.46.037 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A city or county that meets the requirements of subsection (2) of this section may use the greater of one hundred thousand dollars or twenty-five percent of available funds, but not to exceed one million dollars per year, from revenues collected under RCW 82.46.035 for:

(a) The maintenance of capital projects, as defined in RCW 82.46.035(5); or

(b) The planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement, rehabilitation, improvement, or maintenance of capital projects as defined in RCW 82.46.010(6)(b) that are not also included within the definition of capital projects in RCW 82.46.035(5).

(2) A city or county may use revenues pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if:

(a) The city or county prepares a written report demonstrating that it has or will have adequate funding from all sources of public funding to pay for all capital projects, as defined in RCW 82.46.035(5), identified in its capital facilities plan for the succeeding two-year period; and

(b)(i) The city or county has not enacted, after September 26, 2015, any requirement on the listing((, leasing,)) or sale of real property((, unless the requirement is either)); or any requirement on landlords, at the time of executing a lease, to perform or provide physical improvements or modifications to real property or fixtures, except if necessary to address an immediate threat to health or safety; or

(ii) Any local requirement adopted by the city or county under (b)(i) of this subsection is: Specifically authorized by RCW 35.80.030, 35A.11.020, chapter 7.48 RCW, or chapter 19.27 RCW; specifically authorized by other state or federal law; or ((is)) a seller or landlord disclosure requirement pursuant to RCW 64.06.080.

(3) The report prepared under subsection (2)(a) of this section must: (a) Include information necessary to determine compliance with the requirements of subsection (2)(a) of this section; (b) identify how revenues collected under RCW 82.46.035 were used by the city or county during the prior two-year period; (c) identify how funds authorized under subsection (1) of this section will be used during the succeeding two-year period; and (d) identify what percentage of funding for capital projects within the city or county is attributable to revenues under RCW 82.46.035 compared to all other sources of capital project funding. The city or county must prepare and adopt the report as part of its regular, public budget process.

(4) The authority to use funds as authorized in this section is in addition to the authority to use funds pursuant to RCW 82.46.035(7), which remains in effect through December 31, 2016.

(5) For purposes of this section, "maintenance" means the use of funds for labor and materials that will preserve, prevent the decline of, or extend the useful life of a capital project. "Maintenance" does not include labor or material costs for routine operations of a capital project.

--- END ---