BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the state Constitution vests in the legislature both the power and the duty to authorize expenditures from public moneys in the state treasury. For this reason, the legislature considers it more fiscally responsible to use the appropriations process to budget for costs of firefighting expenditures, rather than authorizing expenditures without an appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 43.88.550 (Forest firefighting expenses—Transfers to Clarke-McNary fund) and 1989 c 362 s 3 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2016.

--- END ---