BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.525.055 and 2006 c 263 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction for determining eligibility for state assistance for new construction shall exclude from the inventory of available educational space those spaces that have been:

(a) Constructed for educational and community activities from grants received from other public or private entities; or

(b) Vacated by new construction in lieu of modernization; and

(i) Used for purposes of supporting state-funded all-day kindergarten or class size reduction in kindergarten through third grade, if the lack of district facilities warrants such a use; or

(ii) The district is experiencing a short-term special school housing burden due to enrollment growth and failed school construction bond elections.

(2) The exclusion in subsection (1)(b) of this section applies for state assistance for new construction awarded from July 1, 2016, through June 30, 2021.

--- END ---