BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the 2015 wildfires constituted a catastrophic event that resulted in a state of emergency. The legislature intends to make appropriations from the budget stabilization account to address this emergency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES—FIRES. The sum of $154,966,000 is appropriated from the budget stabilization account for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, and is provided solely for fire suppression costs incurred by the department of natural resources during the 2015 fire season. Amounts provided in this section may not be used to pay for the department's indirect and administrative expenses. For purposes of RCW 43.88.055(4), the appropriation in this section does not suspend the requirements of RCW 43.88.055(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE—FIRES. The sum of $155,000 is appropriated from the budget stabilization account for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, and is provided solely for the fire suppression costs incurred by the department of fish and wildlife during the 2015 fire suppression season. Amounts provided in this section may not be used to pay for the department's indirect and administrative expenses. For purposes of RCW 43.88.055(4), the appropriation in this section does not suspend the requirements of RCW 43.88.055(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL—FIRES. The sum of $34,365,000 is appropriated from the budget stabilization account for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, and is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. For purposes of RCW 43.88.055(4), the appropriation in this section does not suspend the requirements of RCW 43.88.055(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---