BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Quality educational staff are the heart of Washington's public education system. The Washington state legislature has enhanced the program of basic education to include the funding of full-day kindergarten and significant K-3 class size reductions. These enhancements require hiring several thousand new teachers in the next few years.

(2) Unfortunately, schools in every region of the state are facing a shortage of qualified teachers and substitutes, leading to overcrowding and a lack of consistency for public school students. This shortage is especially severe in lower-income schools and the central region of our state, where it is more difficult to attract and retain teachers.

(3) The Washington state legislature intends to make needed investments to improve recruitment and retention of qualified K-12 school staff. To address this need, the legislature intends to narrow or eliminate tax preferences whose benefit to taxpayers no longer outweighs the economic harm of delaying investments in reducing class sizes and expanding all-day kindergarten.

PART I

Eliminating the Preferential Business and Occupation Tax Rate for Travel Agents

Sec. 101. RCW 82.04.260 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 602 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 205 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:

(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;

(b) Beginning July 1, 2025, seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;

(c)(i) Beginning July 1, 2025, dairy products; or selling dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products" means:

(A) Products, not including any marijuana-infused product, that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and

(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by weight or volume.

(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy product;

(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2025, fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products;

(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and

(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(5) ((Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(6))) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(((7))) (6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.

(((8))) (7)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.

(b) If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.

(((9))) (8) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(((10))) (9) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent thereafter.

(((11))) (10)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:

(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and

(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (((11))) (10) and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection (((11))) (10), "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.

(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (((11))) (10) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(e)(i) Except as provided in (e)(ii) of this subsection (((11))) (10), this subsection (((11))) (10) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.

(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this subsection (((11))) (10) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited outside the state of Washington. This subsection (((11))) (10)(e)(ii) only applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850.

(((12))) (11)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i) Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent. For purposes of this subsection (((12))) (11)(d), "selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after severance.

(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:

(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.

(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue; kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard, liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of printed materials.

(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer waste. For purposes of this subsection (((12))) (11)(e)(iii), "postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.

(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035.

(v) "Timber products" means:

(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;

(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered paper or paper products; and

(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of biocomposite surface products.

(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood windows; and biocomposite surface products.

(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (((12))) (11) must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.

(((13))) (12) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(((14))) (13)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.35 percent until July 1, 2024, and 0.484 percent thereafter.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (((14))) (13) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

PART II

Eliminating the Sales and Use Tax Exemption for Bottled Water

Sec. 201. RCW 82.08.0293 and 2014 c 140 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of food and food ingredients. "Food and food ingredients" means substances, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed for their taste or nutritional value. "Food and food ingredients" does not include:

(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by volume;

(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco; and

(c) Marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft drinks, bottled water, or dietary supplements. ((For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:)) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Bottled water" means water that is placed in a safety sealed container or package for human consumption. Bottled water is calorie free and does not contain sweeteners or other additives except that it may contain: (i) Antimicrobial agents; (ii) fluoride; (iii) carbonation; (iv) vitamins, minerals, and electrolytes; (v) oxygen; (vi) preservatives; and (vii) only those flavors, extracts, or essences derived from a spice or fruit. "Bottled water" includes water that is delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water.

(b) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco, intended to supplement the diet that:

(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients:

(A) A vitamin;

(B) A mineral;

(C) An herb or other botanical;

(D) An amino acid;

(E) A dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by increasing the total dietary intake; or

(F) A concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination of any ingredient described in this subsection;

(ii) Is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel, gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such form, is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and

(iii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement, identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003.

(((b))) (c)(i) "Prepared food" means:

(A) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;

(B) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller, including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to transport the food; or

(C) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a single item, except:

(I) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller; or

(II) Raw eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the federal food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The Food Code, published by the food and drug administration, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness.

(ii) "Prepared food" does not include the following food or food ingredients, if the food or food ingredients are sold without eating utensils provided by the seller:

(A) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American industry classification system (NAICS) classification is manufacturing in sector 311, except subsector 3118 (bakeries), as provided in the "North American industry classification system—United States, 2002";

(B) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single item; or

(C) Bakery items. The term "bakery items" includes bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, or tortillas.

(((c))) (d) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages that contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice by volume.

(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section applies to food and food ingredients that are furnished, prepared, or served as meals:

(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW 74.38.040(6);

(b) That are provided to senior citizens, individuals with disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or

(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income senior housing facility" means a facility:

(i) That meets the definition of a qualified low-income housing project under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue code, as existing on August 1, 2009;

(ii) That has been partially funded under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1485; and

(iii) For which the lessor or operator has at any time been entitled to claim a federal income tax credit under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue code.

(4)(a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail sale of food and food ingredients is subject to sales tax under RCW 82.08.020 if the food and food ingredients are sold through a vending machine. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the selling price of food and food ingredients sold through a vending machine for purposes of RCW 82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.

(b) For soft drinks and hot prepared food and food ingredients, other than food and food ingredients which are heated after they have been dispensed from the vending machine, the selling price is the total gross receipts of such sales divided by the sum of one plus the sales tax rate expressed as a decimal.

(c) For tax collected under this subsection (4), the requirements that the tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be stated as a separate item are waived.

Sec. 202. RCW 82.12.0293 and 2011 c 2 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of food and food ingredients for human consumption. "Food and food ingredients" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft drinks, bottled water, or dietary supplements. "Prepared food," "soft drinks," "bottled water," and "dietary supplements" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.08.0293.

(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section applies to food and food ingredients which are furnished, prepared, or served as meals:

(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW 74.38.040(6);

(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, individuals with disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or

(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income senior housing facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the conditions in this section, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of bottled water dispensed or to be dispensed to patients, pursuant to a prescription for use in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease or other medical condition.

(2) For purposes of this section, "prescription" means an order, formula, or recipe issued in any form of oral, written, electronic, or other means of transmission by a duly licensed practitioner authorized by the laws of this state to prescribe.

(3) Except for sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, sellers must collect tax on sales subject to this exemption. Any buyer that has paid at least twenty-five dollars in state and local sales taxes on purchases of bottled water subject to this exemption may apply for a refund of the taxes directly from the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The department must deny any refund application if the amount of the refund requested is less than twenty- five dollars. No refund may be made for taxes paid more than four years after the end of the calendar year in which the tax was paid to the seller.

(4) The provisions of RCW 82.32.060 apply to refunds authorized under this section.

(5) With respect to sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, buyers claiming the exemption provided in this section must provide the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of bottled water dispensed or to be dispensed to patients, pursuant to a prescription for use in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease or medical condition.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "prescription" has the same meaning as provided in section 203 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to the conditions in this section, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of bottled water to persons whose primary source of drinking water is unsafe.

(b) For purposes of this subsection and section 206 of this act, a person's primary source of drinking water is unsafe if:

(i) The public water system providing the drinking water has issued a public notification that the drinking water may pose a health risk, and the notification is still in effect on the date that the bottled water was purchased;

(ii) Test results on the person's drinking water, which are no more than twelve months old, from a laboratory certified to perform drinking water testing show that the person's drinking water does not meet safe drinking water standards applicable to public water systems; or

(iii) The person otherwise establishes, to the department's satisfaction, that the person's drinking water does not meet safe drinking water standards applicable to public water systems.

(2) Except for sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, sellers must collect tax on sales subject to this exemption. Any buyer that has paid at least twenty-five dollars in state and local sales taxes on purchases of bottled water subject to this exemption may apply for a refund of the taxes directly from the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The department must deny any refund application if the amount of the refund requested is less than twenty-five dollars. No refund may be made for taxes paid more than four years after the end of the calendar year in which the tax was paid to the seller.

(3) The provisions of RCW 82.32.060 apply to refunds authorized under this section.

(4)(a) With respect to sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, buyers claiming the exemption provided in this section must provide the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(b) The department may waive the requirement for an exemption certificate in the event of disaster or similar circumstance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of bottled water by persons whose primary source of drinking water is unsafe as provided in section 205 of this act.

PART III

Repealing the Nonresident Sales and Use Tax Exemption

Sec. 301. RCW 82.08.0273 and 2014 c 140 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the conditions and limitations in this section, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((does not apply to)) in the form of a remittance from the department is provided for sales to nonresidents of this state of tangible personal property, digital goods, and digital codes((, when)). The exemption only applies if:

(a) The property is for use outside this state;

(b) The purchaser is a bona fide resident of a province or territory of Canada or a state, territory, or possession of the United States, other than the state of Washington; and

(i) Such state, possession, territory, or province does not impose, or have imposed on its behalf, a generally applicable retail sales tax, use tax, value added tax, gross receipts tax on retailing activities, or similar generally applicable tax, of three percent or more; or

(ii) If imposing a tax described in (b)(i) of this subsection, provides an exemption for sales to Washington residents by reason of their residence; and

(c) The purchaser agrees, when requested, to grant the department of revenue access to such records and other forms of verification at ((his or her)) the purchaser's place of residence to assure that such purchases are not first used substantially in the state of Washington.

(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if parts or other tangible personal property are installed by the seller during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving motor vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a separate charge for the tangible personal property, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the separately stated charge to a nonresident purchaser for the tangible personal property but only if the separately stated charge does not exceed either the seller's current publicly stated retail price for the tangible personal property or, if no publicly stated retail price is available, the seller's cost for the tangible personal property. However, the exemption provided by this section does not apply if tangible personal property is installed by the seller during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving motor vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a single nonitemized charge for providing the tangible personal property and service. All of the ((requirements)) provisions in subsections (1) and (3) through (((6))) (7) of this section apply to this subsection.

(3)(a) Any person claiming exemption from retail sales tax under the provisions of this section must ((display proof of his or her current nonresident status as provided in this section)) pay the state and local sales tax to the seller at the time of purchase and then request a remittance from the department in accordance with this subsection and subsection (4) of this section. A request for remittance must include proof of the person's status as a nonresident at the time of the purchase for which a remittance is requested. The request for a remittance must also include any additional information and documentation as required by the department, which may include a description of the item purchased for which a remittance is requested, the sales price of the item, the amount of state sales tax paid on the item, the date of the purchase, the name of the seller and the physical address where the sale took place, and copies of sales receipts showing the qualified purchases.

(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident person's status includes one piece of identification such as a valid driver's license from the jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid identification card which has a photograph of the holder and is issued by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification under this subsection (3)(b) must show the holder's residential address and have as one of its legal purposes the establishment of residency in that out-of-state jurisdiction.

(c) In lieu of furnishing proof of a person's nonresident status under (b) of this subsection (3), a person claiming exemption from retail sales tax under the provisions of this section may provide the seller with an exemption certificate in compliance with subsection (4)(b) of this section.

(4)(a) ((Nothing in this section requires the vendor to make tax exempt retail sales to nonresidents. A vendor may choose to make sales to nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount of sales tax collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If the vendor chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting the sales tax, the vendor must examine the purchaser's proof of nonresidence, determine whether the proof is acceptable under subsection (3)(b) of this section, and maintain records for each nontaxable sale which must show the type of proof accepted, including any identification numbers where appropriate, and the expiration date, if any.

(b) In lieu of using the method provided in (a) of this subsection to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may accept from the purchaser a properly completed uniform exemption certificate approved by the streamlined sales and use tax agreement governing board or any other exemption certificate as may be authorized by the department and properly completed by the purchaser. A nonresident purchaser who uses an exemption certificate authorized in this subsection (4)(b) must include the purchaser's driver's license number or other state-issued identification number and the state of issuance.

(c) In lieu of using the methods provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.

(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements, which includes the offer of fraudulent identification or fraudulently procured identification to a vendor, in order to purchase goods without paying retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

(b) Any person making tax exempt purchases under this section by displaying proof of identification not his or her own, or counterfeit identification, with intent to violate the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the tax due on such purchases.

(6)(a) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the tax and who fails to maintain records of sales to nonresidents as provided in this section is personally liable for the amount of tax due.

(b) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the retail sales tax under this section and who has actual knowledge that the purchaser's proof of identification establishing out-of-state residency is fraudulent is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one thousand dollars or the tax due on such sales. In addition, both the purchaser and the vendor are liable for any penalties and interest assessable under chapter 82.32 RCW)) (i) Beginning January 1, 2017, through December 31, 2017, a person may request a remittance from the department for state sales taxes paid by the person on qualified retail purchases made in Washington between July 1, 2016, and December 31, 2016.

(ii) Beginning January 1, 2018, a person may request a remittance from the department during any calendar year for state sales taxes paid by the person on qualified retail purchases made in Washington during the immediately preceding calendar year only. No application may be made with respect to purchases made before the immediately preceding calendar year.

(b) The remittance request, including proof of nonresident status and any other documentation and information required by the department, must be made using an electronic application process as prescribed by the department. Only one remittance request may be made by a person per calendar year.

(c) The total amount of a remittance request must be at least twenty-five dollars. The department must deny any request for a remittance that is less than twenty-five dollars.

(d) The department will examine the applicant's proof of nonresident status and any other documentation and information as required in the application to determine whether the applicant is entitled to a remittance under this section.

(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements to the department, which includes the offer of fraudulent or fraudulently procured identification or fraudulent sales receipts, in order to receive a remittance of retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

(b) Any person requesting a remittance of sales tax from the department by providing proof of identification or sales receipts not the person's own, or counterfeit identification or sales receipts, with intent to violate the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the tax due on such purchases.

(6) The exemption provided by this section is for state sales taxes.

(7) A nonresident who receives a refund of sales tax from the seller for any reason with respect to a purchase made in this state is not entitled to a remittance for the tax paid on the purchase. A person who receives both a remittance under this section and a refund from the seller with respect to the same purchase must immediately repay the remittance to the department. Interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW applies to amounts due under this section from the date that the department made the remittance until the amount due under this subsection is paid to the department. A person who receives a remittance with respect to a purchase for which the person had, at the time the person submitted the application for a remittance, already received a refund of sales tax from the seller is also liable for the evasion penalty in RCW 82.32.090(7) and is ineligible to receive any further remittances from the department under this section.

(((7))) (8) The exemption in this section does not apply to sales of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

PART IV

Repealing the Preferential B&O Tax Rate for Sellers of Prescription Drugs

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401. RCW 82.04.272 (Tax on warehousing and reselling prescription drugs) and 2013 c 19 s 127, 2003 c 168 s 401, & 1998 c 343 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402. Section 401 of this act applies to taxes due for reporting periods beginning on or after the effective date of section 401 of this act.

PART V

Real Estate Excise Tax on Foreclosures

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. The legislature finds that the existing real estate excise tax exemption for transfers occurring in the context of bank foreclosures and the enforcement of judgments by creditors does not benefit distressed homeowners except in limited circumstances. The exemption has been broadly used to exempt sales made to third-party buyers by combining an unrelated sales transaction into the foreclosure proceeding. In addition, there have been questions raised in litigation whether the exemption applies to orders of sales arising in any court context, rather than those expressly identified in the existing exemption. It is the intent of the legislature to (1) eliminate the real estate excise tax exemption for transfers that occur in foreclosures except in circumstances where the tax would impact the owner of the property, and (2) restructure the existing statute to preserve the exemption for deeds given in lieu of the foreclosure process and transfers made to extinguish existing security interests. Because this restructuring is intended only to clarify and preserve existing exemptions, the legislature does not intend for the provisions of RCW 82.32.805 or 82.32.808 to apply to this act.

Sec. 502. RCW 82.45.010 and 2014 c 58 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" has its ordinary meaning and includes any conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein or other contract under which possession of the property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of improvements constructed upon leased land.

(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition within any twelve-month period of a controlling interest in any entity with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable consideration.

(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or acquired within a twelve-month period, the date that the option agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons acting in concert must be aggregated for purposes of determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest has taken place. The department must adopt standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a rule for this purpose, the department must consider the following:

(i) Persons must be treated as acting in concert when they have a relationship with each other such that one person influences or controls the actions of another through common ownership; and

(ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they must be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other purchasers, then the acquisitions are considered separate acquisitions.

(3) The term "sale" does not include:

(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.

(b) A transfer by transfer on death deed, to the extent that it is not in satisfaction of a contractual obligation of the decedent owed to the recipient of the property.

(c) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type mentioned above.

(d) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of ((a mortgage)) either a mortgage or deed of trust, except to the extent of any additional consideration provided to the grantor.

(e) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or as the result of a court decree.

(f) The assignment of property or interest in property from one spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.

(g) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.

(h) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.

(i) A mortgage, deed of trust, or other transfer of an interest in real property merely to secure a debt, or the assignment, reconveyance, or release thereof.

(j) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a foreclosure of a mortgage or deed of trust, or an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment((, or deed in lieu of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust)) pursuant to chapter 6.17 RCW, when:

(i) The transfer or conveyance is to other than the mortgagee, beneficiary of the deed of trust, lienholder, or judgment creditor, and the selling price exceeds the amount of the lien, security interest, or judgment that is the subject of the foreclosure or execution; or

(ii) The transfer or conveyance is to the United States, this state, or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.

(k) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or veterans administration.

(l) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax was first imposed.

(m) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.

(n) A sale by the United States, this state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.

(o) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW 81.112.300.

(p) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner. However, if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (i) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (iii) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, within three years of the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid within sixty days of becoming due, excise taxes become due and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.

(q)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation, liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.

(ii) However, the transfer described in (q)(i) of this subsection cannot be preceded or followed within a twelve-month period by another transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise exempt transfer or transfers described in (q)(i) of this subsection, results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert hold in the entity. This subsection (3) (q)(ii) does not apply to that part of the transfer involving property received that is the real property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under this subsection (3)(q)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who previously held a controlling interest in the entity.

(r) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, that takes place on or after June 12, 2008, but before December 31, 2018.

Sec. 503. RCW 82.45.080 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 210 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the tax levied under this chapter is the obligation of the seller and the department may, at the department's option, enforce the obligation through an action of debt against the seller or the department may proceed in the manner prescribed for the foreclosure of mortgages. The department's use of one course of enforcement is not an election not to pursue the other.

(2) When a transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure of a mortgage, deed of trust, lien, or enforcement of a judgment is subject to tax under this chapter, and notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the tax levied under this chapter is the obligation of the transferee or grantee, and provisions of this chapter applicable to the seller apply to the transferee or grantee. The department may enforce the obligation against the transferee or grantee as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) For purposes of this section and notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the seller is the parent corporation of a wholly owned subsidiary, when such subsidiary is the transferor to a third-party transferee and the subsidiary is dissolved before paying the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to sections 501 and 502 of this act.

PART VI

Eliminating the Preferential Business and Occupation Tax Rate for

International Investment Management Services

Sec. 601. RCW 82.04.290 and 2014 c 97 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of providing international investment management services, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.

(2)))(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business activity other than or in addition to an activity taxed explicitly under another section in this chapter or subsection (((1) or (3))) (2) of this section; as to such persons the amount of tax on account of such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.

(b) This subsection (((2))) (1) includes, among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials used in the performance of such business passes to another by accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to an agent by his or her principal or supplier to be used for informational, educational, and promotional purposes is not considered a part of the agent's remuneration or commission and is not subject to taxation under this section.

(((3))) (2)(a) Until July 1, 2040, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of performing aerospace product development for others, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by a rate of 0.9 percent.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (((3))) (2) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(c) "Aerospace product development" has the meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.4461.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602. RCW 82.04.293 (International investment management services—Definitions) and 1997 c 7 s 3 & 1995 c 229 s 1 are each repealed.

PART VII

Transfers to Education Legacy Trust Account

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By the last workday of the second and fourth calendar quarters, the state treasurer must transfer the amount specified in subsection (2) of this section from the general fund to the education legacy trust account. The first transfer under this subsection (1) must occur by December 31, 2016.

(2) By December 15th and by June 15th of each year, the department must estimate the increase in state general fund revenues from the changes made under parts I through VI of this act for the current and prior calendar quarters and notify the state treasurer of the increase.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702. A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

RCW 43.135.034(4) does not apply to the transfers under section 701 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703. A new section is added to chapter 39.42 RCW to read as follows:

The purpose of repealing or narrowing tax preferences in parts I through VI of this act is to support education-related expenditures from the education legacy trust account. For this reason, general state revenues transferred to the education legacy trust account under section 701 of this act are excluded from the calculation of general state revenues for purposes of Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution and RCW 39.42.130 and 39.42.140.

PART VIII

Technical Amendments

Sec. 801. RCW 82.04.440 and 2011 c 2 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person engaged in activities that are subject to tax under two or more provisions of RCW 82.04.230 through 82.04.298, inclusive, is taxable under each provision applicable to those activities.

(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.2909(2), 82.04.250, 82.04.270, 82.04.294(2), or 82.04.260 (1)(b), (c), or (d), (4), (((11), or (12))) (10), or (11) with respect to selling products in this state, including those persons who are also taxable under RCW 82.04.261, are allowed a credit against those taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of products so sold in this state, and/or (b) extracting taxes paid with respect to the extracting of products so sold in this state or ingredients of products so sold in this state. Extracting taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of this section may also be taken under this subsection, if otherwise allowable under this subsection. The amount of the credit may not exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter with respect to the sale of those products.

(3) Persons taxable as manufacturers under RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260 (1)(b) or (((12))) (11), including those persons who are also taxable under RCW 82.04.261, are allowed a credit against those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with respect to extracting the ingredients of the products so manufactured in this state. The amount of the credit may not exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing of those products.

(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1), 82.04.294(1), 82.04.2404, or 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (((11), or (12))) (10), or (11), including those persons who are also taxable under RCW 82.04.261, with respect to extracting or manufacturing products in this state are allowed a credit against those taxes for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to another state with respect to the sales of the products so extracted or manufactured in this state, (ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of products using ingredients so extracted in this state, or (iii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing activities completed in another state for products so manufactured in this state. The amount of the credit may not exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter with respect to the extraction or manufacturing of those products.

(5) For the purpose of this section:

(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:

(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the tax an income tax or value added tax; and

(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately stated from the sales price.

(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign country or political subdivision thereof.

(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240, 82.04.2404, 82.04.2909(1), 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (((11), and (12))) (10), and (11), and 82.04.294(1); (ii) the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who are engaged in business as a manufacturer; and (iii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to other states.

(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes (i) the tax imposed on extractors in RCW 82.04.230 and 82.04.260(((12))) (11); (ii) the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who are engaged in business as an extractor; and (iii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to other states.

(e) "Business," "manufacturer," "extractor," and other terms used in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through ((82.04.212 [82.04.217])) 82.04.217, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of describing taxes imposed by other states.

PART IX

Miscellaneous Technical Provisions

NEW SECTION. Sec. 901. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902. This act takes effect July 1, 2016.

--- END ---