BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.57A.080 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 270 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the powers specifically granted by this chapter a public transportation benefit area shall have all powers which are necessary to carry out the purposes of the public transportation benefit area. A public transportation benefit area may contract with the United States or any agency thereof, any state or agency thereof, any other public transportation benefit area, any county, city, metropolitan municipal corporation, special district, or governmental agency, within or without the state, and any private person, firm or corporation for the purpose of receiving gifts or grants or securing loans or advances for preliminary planning and feasibility studies, or for the design, construction or operation of transportation facilities. In addition a public transportation benefit area may contract with any governmental agency or with any private person, firm or corporation for the use by either contracting party of all or any part of the facilities, structures, lands, interests in lands, air rights over lands and rights-of-way of all kinds which are owned, leased or held by the other party and for the purpose of planning, constructing or operating any facility or performing any service which the public transportation benefit area may be authorized to operate or perform, on such terms as may be agreed upon by the contracting parties. Before any contract for the lease or operation of any public transportation benefit area facilities shall be let to any private person, firm or corporation, a general schedule of rental rates for bus equipment with or without drivers shall be publicly posted applicable to all private certificated carriers, and for other facilities competitive bids shall first be called upon such notice, bidder qualifications and bid conditions as the public transportation benefit area authority shall determine.

(2) A public transportation benefit area may sue and be sued in its corporate capacity in all courts and in all proceedings.

(3) Prior to entering into a contract or any other agreement with an adjoining state or any state agency, county, city, metropolitan municipal corporation, special district, or other governmental agency in an adjoining state, as allowed under subsection (1) of this section, a public transportation benefit area must submit an authorizing proposition to the voters or include such authorization in a proposition to the voters, and may enter into the contract or other agreement only if the authorizing proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting on the proposition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2016.

--- END ---