BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to adopt legislation relating to modifying high school graduation requirements by adding additional course-based alternatives for earning a certificate of academic achievement, eliminating the end-of-course biology assessment, and enhancing high school and beyond plans.

--- END ---