BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) After the effective date of this section, state agencies may not purchase land lying, in whole or in part, within an urban growth area designated in accordance with this chapter in a county located east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range.

(2) For purposes of this section, "state agency" includes every state agency, department, office, officer, board, commission, bureau, division, and institution of the state. For purposes of this section, "state agency" does not include any public school as defined in RCW 28A.150.010 or any institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

--- END ---