BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.150.205 and 1992 c 141 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definition in this section applies throughout RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.295.

"Instructional hours" means those hours students are provided the opportunity to engage in educational activity planned by and under the direction of school district staff, as directed by the administration and board of directors of the district, inclusive of intermissions for class changes, recess, and teacher/parent-guardian conferences that are planned and scheduled by the district for the purpose of discussing students' educational needs or progress, and exclusive of time actually spent for meals. However, when students are provided the opportunity to engage in an educational activity concurrently with the consumption of meals, and the provision of the meal allows the regular instructional program to continue functioning, the period of time that students are provided access to morning food programs must be considered part of the instructional hours.

--- END ---