BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.225.280 and 2006 c 263 s 903 are each amended to read as follows:

Eligibility of transfer students under RCW 28A.225.220 and 28A.225.225 for participation in extracurricular activities shall be subject to rules adopted by the Washington interscholastic activities association. The Washington interscholastic activities association may not require a transfer student who is a child of an active duty military family to meet continuous enrollment prerequisites before becoming eligible for varsity-level extracurricular activities.

--- END ---