BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the policy of requiring state credentialing authorities to suspend a person's occupational credential, such as a license, certification, or registration, if the person has been certified by a lending agency and reported to the state credentialing authority for nonpayment or default on a federally or state-guaranteed education loan or service-conditional scholarship is misguided because losing an occupational credential may make it more difficult for the worker to repay a student loan. Further, as found by the July 2015 White House Report titled, Occupational Licensing: A Framework for Policymakers, this policy affects a large segment of the population because the student loan market has increased by one hundred seventy percent in inflation-adjusted terms between the years 2000 and 2015, with roughly 1.1 trillion dollars in outstanding balances held by over forty-one million individuals as of the beginning of 2015. As of 2016, there is roughly 1.3 trillion dollars in such outstanding balances held by over forty-four million individuals.

(2) The legislature finds that other states, including Montana and Iowa, have recently passed legislation or considered legislation to repeal their statutes that allow nonpayment or default of certain education loans to result in the suspension of a person's occupational credential. It is time for Washington to do the same.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 2.48.165 (Disbarment or license suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 1;

(2) RCW 18.04.420 (License or certificate suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 2;

(3) RCW 18.08.470 (Certificate or registration suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 3;

(4) RCW 18.11.270 (License, certificate, or registration suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 4;

(5) RCW 18.16.230 (License suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 5;

(6) RCW 18.20.200 (License suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 6;

(7) RCW 18.27.360 (Certificate of registration suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 7;

(8) RCW 18.39.465 (License suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 9;

(9) RCW 18.43.160 (Certificate of registration or license suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 10;

(10) RCW 18.44.460 (License suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1999 c 30 s 15 & 1996 c 293 s 11;

(11) RCW 18.46.055 (License suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 12;

(12) RCW 18.76.100 (Certificate suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 13;

(13) RCW 18.85.341 (License suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 2008 c 23 s 30 & 1996 c 293 s 14;

(14) RCW 18.96.190 (Certificate of licensure suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 2009 c 370 s 16 & 1996 c 293 s 15;

(15) RCW 18.104.115 (License suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 16;

(16) RCW 18.106.290 (Certificate or permit suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 17;

(17) RCW 18.130.125 (License suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 18;

(18) RCW 18.140.200 (Certificate, license, or registration suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 2005 c 339 s 16 & 1996 c 293 s 19;

(19) RCW 18.145.125 (Certificate suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 20;

(20) RCW 18.160.085 (Certificate suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 21;

(21) RCW 18.165.280 (License or certificate suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 22;

(22) RCW 18.170.163 (License or certificate suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 23;

(23) RCW 18.180.050 (Registration suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 25;

(24) RCW 18.185.055 (License suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 26; and

(25) RCW 28A.410.105 (Certificate or permit suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996 c 293 s 27.

Sec. 3. RCW 67.08.100 and 2012 c 99 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department upon receipt of a properly completed application and payment of a nonrefundable fee, may grant an annual license to an applicant for the following: (a) Promoter; (b) manager; (c) boxer; (d) second; (e) wrestling participant; (f) inspector; (g) judge; (h) timekeeper; (i) announcer; (j) event physician; (k) event chiropractor; (l) referee; (m) matchmaker; (n) kickboxer; (o) martial arts participant; (p) training facility; and (q) amateur sanctioning organization.

(2) The application for the following types of licenses shall include a physical performed by a physician, as defined in RCW 67.08.002, which was performed by the physician with a time period preceding the application as specified by rule: (a) Boxer; (b) wrestling participant; (c) kickboxer; (d) martial arts participant; and (e) referee.

(3) An applicant for the following types of licenses for the sports of boxing, kickboxing, and martial arts shall provide annual proof of certification as having adequate experience, skill, and training from an organization approved by the department, including, but not limited to, the association of boxing commissions, the international boxing federation, the international boxing organization, the Washington state association of professional ring officials, the world boxing association, the world boxing council, or the world boxing organization for boxing officials, and the united full contact federation for kickboxing and martial arts officials: (a) Judge; (b) referee; (c) inspector; (d) timekeeper; or (e) other officials deemed necessary by the department.

(4) No person shall participate or serve in any of the above capacities unless licensed as provided in this chapter.

(5) The referees, judges, timekeepers, event physicians, chiropractors, and inspectors for any boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts event shall be designated by the department from among licensed officials.

(6) The referee for any wrestling event shall be provided by the promoter and shall be licensed as a wrestling participant.

(7) The department shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

(8) ((The director shall suspend the license of any person who has been certified by a lending agency and reported to the director for nonpayment or default on a federally or state-guaranteed educational loan or service-conditional scholarship. Prior to the suspension, the agency must provide the person an opportunity for a brief adjudicative proceeding under RCW 34.05.485 through 34.05.494 and issue a finding of nonpayment or default on a federally or state-guaranteed educational loan or service-conditional scholarship. The person's license may not be reissued until the person provides the director a written release issued by the lending agency stating that the person is making payments on the loan in accordance with a repayment agreement approved by the lending agency. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for licensure during the suspension, reinstatement is automatic upon receipt of the notice and payment of any reinstatement fee the director may impose.

(9))) A person may not be issued a license if the person has an unpaid fine outstanding to the department.

(((10))) (9) A person may not be issued a license unless they are at least eighteen years of age.

(((11))) (10) This section shall not apply to contestants or participants in events at which only amateurs are engaged in contests and/or fraternal organizations and/or veterans' organizations chartered by congress or the defense department excluding any recognized amateur sanctioning body recognized by the department. Upon request of the department, a promoter, contestant, or participant shall provide sufficient information to reasonably determine whether this chapter applies.

--- END ---