BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall use the King county classification for the purposes of determining the benchmark rate in Snohomish county for:

(a) Supported living services;

(b) Group homes, which are facilities licensed as either an assisted living facility or adult family home, as both defined in RCW 74.39A.009;

(c) Group training homes as defined in RCW 71A.22.020; or

(d) Licensed staffed residential homes as licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.

(2) "Benchmark rate" as used in this section means the rate at which direct care staff hours are paid, specific to a county classification.

--- END ---