BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 7.75.035 and 1990 c 172 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A county legislative authority may impose a surcharge of up to ((ten)) twenty dollars on each civil filing fee in district court ((and)), a surcharge of up to ((fifteen)) twenty dollars on each filing fee for small claims actions, and a surcharge of up to twenty dollars on each civil filing fee in superior court for the purpose of funding dispute resolution centers established under this chapter. No surcharge may be imposed on actions or proceedings exempt from a filing fee. A person filing an action under chapter 59.20 RCW who pays or is charged the annual assessment for the manufactured/mobile home communities dispute resolution program under RCW 59.30.050 is exempt from a surcharge on superior court civil filing fees imposed under this section.

(2) Any surcharge imposed shall be collected by the clerk of the court and remitted to the county treasurer for deposit in a separate account to be used solely for dispute resolution centers established under this chapter. Money received under this section is not subject to RCW 3.62.020(2) or 3.62.090. The accounts created pursuant to this subsection shall be audited by the state auditor in accordance with RCW 43.09.260.

--- END ---