BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.80.060 and 2002 c 217 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No later than December 31, 2004, the state board of health shall promulgate rules for the safe receipt, preparation, and handling by distributing organizations of food accepted from donors in order to facilitate the donation of food, free of charge, and to protect the health and safety of needy people.

(2) No later than December 31, 2004, the department of health, in consultation with the state board of health, shall develop educational materials for donors containing recommended health and safety guidelines for the preparation and handling of food donated to distributing organizations.

(3) No later than June 30, 2018, the state board of health shall adopt rules that permit distributing organizations to accept the donation of foods prepared in a private residence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2017, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---