BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.376.050 and 2012 c 122 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At least once a year, the governor and other statewide elected officials must meet with leaders of Indian tribes to address issues of mutual concern.

(2) The governor must maintain for public reference an updated list of the names and contact information for the individuals designated as tribal liaisons and the names and contact information for tribal leadership as submitted by an Indian tribe.

(3) The governing body of a federally recognized tribe may request a consultation with the governor and the fish and wildlife commission regarding any specific fish and wildlife department policy, rule, or action that affects tribal hunting activities. The governor must convene a meeting within thirty days of receiving such a request. The fish and wildlife commission must attend the meeting, or delegate this responsibility to the director of the department of fish and wildlife, when agreed upon by the requesting tribe. Any meeting convened pursuant to this section is not subject to the requirements of the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.04.055 and 2000 c 107 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In establishing policies to preserve, protect, and perpetuate wildlife, fish, and wildlife and fish habitat, the commission shall meet annually with the governor to:

(a) Review and prescribe basic goals and objectives related to those policies; and

(b) Review the performance of the department in implementing fish and wildlife policies.

The commission shall maximize fishing, hunting, and outdoor recreational opportunities compatible with healthy and diverse fish and wildlife populations.

(2) The commission shall establish hunting, trapping, and fishing seasons and prescribe the time, place, manner, and methods that may be used to harvest or enjoy game fish and wildlife.

(3) The commission shall establish provisions regulating food fish and shellfish as provided in RCW 77.12.047.

(4) The commission shall have final approval authority for tribal, interstate, international, and any other department agreements relating to fish and wildlife.

(5) The commission must agree to consult with the governor and tribal governments, pursuant to RCW 43.376.050.

(6) The commission shall adopt rules to implement the state's fish and wildlife laws.

(((6))) (7) The commission shall have final approval authority for the department's budget proposals.

(((7))) (8) The commission shall select its own staff and shall appoint the director of the department. The director and commission staff shall serve at the pleasure of the commission.

--- END ---