BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)(a) If, by January 1, 2018, a local government that has not adopted an ordinance or resolution, then in effect, that expressly prohibits the siting and operation of state-licensed marijuana retail outlets within the local government's jurisdiction refuses to issue, upon application, to a person, business, or nonprofit entity that holds a marijuana retailer's license issued under RCW 69.50.325, any license, permit, or other authorization required under a local ordinance or resolution to lawfully operate a business within the local government's jurisdiction that the person, business, or nonprofit entity would otherwise be eligible to receive if engaged in a lawful business not related to marijuana sales, then the local government forfeits seventy percent of the local government's share of liquor revenue distributions that the local government would otherwise receive pursuant to RCW 66.24.065 and 66.08.190. A city, town, or county with an ordinance or regulation that allows the siting and operation of state-licensed marijuana retail outlets, but which limits the number of such outlets that may be located within its jurisdictional boundaries to a number that is less than the total number of outlets allotted or approved by the board for location within that jurisdiction is subject to the revenue forfeiture provisions of this section.

(b) A local government that forfeits seventy percent of the local government's share of liquor revenue distributions that the local government would otherwise receive pursuant to RCW 66.24.065 and 66.08.190, as provided in (a) of this subsection, also forfeits all moneys the local government would otherwise receive pursuant to a distribution in accordance with RCW 69.50.540(2)(g).

(2) The amount of money that is equal to seventy percent of a local government's share of liquor revenue distributions that the local government would otherwise receive pursuant to RCW 66.24.065 and 66.08.190, and all of the moneys that the local government would otherwise receive pursuant to RCW 69.50.540(2)(g)(i), but that is forfeited pursuant to this section, may be transferred to the state general fund.

(3) A modification to liquor revenue distributions and marijuana excise tax distributions pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section is effective until:

(a) The date a local government has in effect an ordinance or resolution expressly prohibiting the siting and operation of state-licensed marijuana retail outlets within the local government's jurisdiction; or

(b) The local government issues, upon application, to any person, business, or nonprofit entity that holds a marijuana retailer's license issued under RCW 69.50.325, any license, permit, and other authorization required under a local ordinance or resolution to lawfully operate a business within the local government's jurisdiction that the person, business, or nonprofit entity would otherwise be eligible to receive if engaged in a lawful business not related to marijuana sales.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "local government" means a county, city, or town.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.08.190 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Prior to making distributions described in subsection (2) of this section, amounts must be retained to support allotments under RCW 43.88.110 from any legislative appropriation for municipal research and services. The legislative appropriation for such services must be in the amount specified under RCW 66.24.065.

(2) When excess funds are distributed during the months of June, September, December, and March of each year, all moneys subject to distribution must be disbursed to border areas, counties, cities, and towns as provided in RCW 66.24.065.

(3) The amount remaining after distributions under subsections (1) and (2) of this section must be deposited into the general fund.

(4) Distributions made pursuant to this section are subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3. RCW 66.24.065 and 2012 c 2 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The distribution of spirits license fees under RCW 66.24.630 and 66.24.055 through the liquor revolving fund to border areas, counties, cities, towns, and the municipal research center must be made in a manner that provides that each category of recipients receive, in the aggregate, no less than it received from the liquor revolving fund during comparable periods prior to December 8, 2011, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section. An additional distribution of ten million dollars per year from the spirits license fees must be provided to border areas, counties, cities, and towns through the liquor revolving fund for the purpose of enhancing public safety programs, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Distributions made pursuant to this section are subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4. RCW 69.50.540 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 967 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature must annually appropriate moneys in the dedicated marijuana account created in RCW 69.50.530 as follows:

(1) For the purposes listed in this subsection (1), the legislature must appropriate to the respective agencies amounts sufficient to make the following expenditures on a quarterly basis:

(a) Beginning July 1, 2015, one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars to the department of social and health services to design and administer the Washington state healthy youth survey, analyze the collected data, and produce reports, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, department of health, department of commerce, family policy council, and state liquor and cannabis board. The survey must be conducted at least every two years and include questions regarding, but not necessarily limited to, academic achievement, age at time of substance use initiation, antisocial behavior of friends, attitudes toward antisocial behavior, attitudes toward substance use, laws and community norms regarding antisocial behavior, family conflict, family management, parental attitudes toward substance use, peer rewarding of antisocial behavior, perceived risk of substance use, and rebelliousness. Funds disbursed under this subsection may be used to expand administration of the healthy youth survey to student populations attending institutions of higher education in Washington;

(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, fifty thousand dollars to the department of social and health services for the purpose of contracting with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct the cost-benefit evaluation and produce the reports described in RCW 69.50.550. This appropriation ends after production of the final report required by RCW 69.50.550;

(c) Beginning July 1, 2015, five thousand dollars to the University of Washington alcohol and drug abuse institute for the creation, maintenance, and timely updating of web-based public education materials providing medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use;

(d) An amount not less than one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the state liquor and cannabis board for administration of this chapter as appropriated in the omnibus appropriations act;

(e) Twenty-three thousand seven hundred fifty dollars to the department of enterprise services provided solely for the state building code council established under RCW 19.27.070, to develop and adopt fire and building code provisions related to marijuana processing and extraction facilities. The distribution under this subsection (1)(e) is for fiscal year 2016 only;

(2) From the amounts in the dedicated marijuana account after appropriation of the amounts identified in subsection (1) of this section, the legislature must appropriate for the purposes listed in this subsection (2) as follows:

(a)(i) Up to fifteen percent to the department of social and health services division of behavioral health and recovery for the development, implementation, maintenance, and evaluation of programs and practices aimed at the prevention or reduction of maladaptive substance use, substance use disorder, substance abuse or substance dependence, as these terms are defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, among middle school and high school-age students, whether as an explicit goal of a given program or practice or as a consistently corresponding effect of its implementation, mental health services for children and youth, and services for pregnant and parenting women; PROVIDED, That:

(A) Of the funds appropriated under (a)(i) of this subsection for new programs and new services, at least eighty-five percent must be directed to evidence-based or research-based programs and practices that produce objectively measurable results and, by September 1, 2020, are cost-beneficial; and

(B) Up to fifteen percent of the funds appropriated under (a)(i) of this subsection for new programs and new services may be directed to proven and tested practices, emerging best practices, or promising practices.

(ii) In deciding which programs and practices to fund, the secretary of the department of social and health services must consult, at least annually, with the University of Washington's social development research group and the University of Washington's alcohol and drug abuse institute.

(iii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of twenty-seven million seven hundred eighty-six thousand dollars, and for each subsequent fiscal year thereafter, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of twenty-five million five hundred thirty-six thousand dollars under this subsection (2)(a);

(b)(i) Up to ten percent to the department of health for the following, subject to (b)(ii) of this subsection (2):

(A) Creation, implementation, operation, and management of a marijuana education and public health program that contains the following:

(I) A marijuana use public health hotline that provides referrals to substance abuse treatment providers, utilizes evidence-based or research-based public health approaches to minimizing the harms associated with marijuana use, and does not solely advocate an abstinence-only approach;

(II) A grants program for local health departments or other local community agencies that supports development and implementation of coordinated intervention strategies for the prevention and reduction of marijuana use by youth; and

(III) Media-based education campaigns across television, internet, radio, print, and out-of-home advertising, separately targeting youth and adults, that provide medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use;

(B) The Washington poison control center; and

(C) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the funds appropriated under this subsection (2)(b) may be used for prevention activities that target youth and populations with a high incidence of tobacco use.

(ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of seven million five hundred thousand dollars and for each subsequent fiscal year thereafter, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of nine million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars under this subsection (2)(b);

(c)(i) Up to six-tenths of one percent to the University of Washington and four-tenths of one percent to Washington State University for research on the short and long-term effects of marijuana use, to include but not be limited to formal and informal methods for estimating and measuring intoxication and impairment, and for the dissemination of such research.

(ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of two hundred seven thousand dollars and for each subsequent fiscal year, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of one million twenty-one thousand dollars to the University of Washington. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of one hundred thirty-eight thousand dollars and for each subsequent fiscal year thereafter, a minimum of six hundred eighty-one thousand dollars to Washington State University under this subsection (2)(c);

(d) Fifty percent to the state basic health plan trust account to be administered by the Washington basic health plan administrator and used as provided under chapter 70.47 RCW;

(e) Five percent to the Washington state health care authority to be expended exclusively through contracts with community health centers to provide primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity health care services as provided under RCW 41.05.220;

(f)(i) Up to three-tenths of one percent to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to fund grants to building bridges programs under chapter 28A.175 RCW.

(ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, and each subsequent fiscal year, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of five hundred eleven thousand dollars to the office of the superintendent of public instruction under this subsection (2)(f); ((and))

(g) At the end of each fiscal year, the treasurer must transfer any amounts in the dedicated marijuana account that are not appropriated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and this subsection (2) into the general fund, except as provided in (g)(i) of this subsection (2).

(i) Beginning in fiscal year 2018, if marijuana excise tax collections deposited into the general fund in the prior fiscal year exceed twenty-five million dollars, then each fiscal year the legislature must, except as provided in (h) of this subsection, appropriate an amount equal to thirty percent of all marijuana excise taxes deposited into the general fund the prior fiscal year to the treasurer for distribution to counties, cities, and towns as follows:

(A) Thirty percent must be distributed to counties, cities, and towns where licensed marijuana retailers are physically located. Each jurisdiction must receive a share of the revenue distribution under this subsection (2)(g)(i)(A) based on the proportional share of the total revenues generated in the individual jurisdiction from the taxes collected under RCW 69.50.535, from licensed marijuana retailers physically located in each jurisdiction. For purposes of this subsection (2)(g)(i)(A), one hundred percent of the proportional amount attributed to a retailer physically located in a city or town must be distributed to the city or town.

(B) Seventy percent must be distributed to counties, cities, and towns ratably on a per capita basis. Counties must receive sixty percent of the distribution, which must be disbursed based on each county's total proportional population. Funds may only be distributed to jurisdictions that do not prohibit the siting of any state licensed marijuana producer, processor, or retailer, and the receipt of funds is subject to section 1 of this act.

(ii) Distribution amounts allocated to each county, city, and town must be distributed in four installments by the last day of each fiscal quarter.

(iii) By September 15th of each year, the state liquor and cannabis board must provide the state treasurer the annual distribution amount, if any, for each county and city as determined in (g)(i) of this subsection (2).

(iv) The total share of marijuana excise tax revenues distributed to counties and cities in (g)(i) of this subsection (2) may not exceed fifteen million dollars in fiscal years 2018 and 2019 and twenty million dollars per fiscal year thereafter; and

(h) All distributions to counties, cities, and towns under (g)(i) of this subsection are subject to section 1 of this act.

For the purposes of this section, "marijuana products" means "useable marijuana," "marijuana concentrates," and "marijuana-infused products" as those terms are defined in RCW 69.50.101.

--- END ---