BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.85.011 and 2015 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Advertising" means any attempt by publication or broadcast, whether oral, written, or otherwise, to induce a person to use the services of a real estate firm, broker, managing broker, or designated broker.

(2) "Broker" means a natural person acting on behalf of a real estate firm to perform real estate brokerage services under the supervision of a designated broker or managing broker.

(3) "Business opportunity" means and includes business, business entity, and good will of an existing business or any one or combination thereof when the transaction or business includes an interest in real property.

(4) "Clear and conspicuous" in an advertising statement means the representation or term being used is of such a color, contrast, size, or audibility, and presented in a manner so as to be readily noticed and understood.

(5) "Clock hours of instruction" means actual hours spent in classroom instruction in any tax supported, public technical college, community college, or any other institution of higher learning or a correspondence course from any of the aforementioned institutions certified by such institution as the equivalent of the required number of clock hours, and the real estate commission may certify courses of instruction other than in the aforementioned institutions.

(6) "Commercial real estate" means any parcel of real estate in this state other than real estate containing one to four residential units. "Commercial real estate" does not include a single-family residential lot or single-family residential units such as condominiums, townhouses, manufactured homes, or homes in a subdivision when sold, leased, or otherwise conveyed on a unit-by-unit basis, even when those units are part of a larger building or parcel of real estate, unless the property is sold or leased for a commercial purpose.

(7) "Commission" means the real estate commission of the state of Washington.

(8) "Controlling interest" means the ability to control either the operational or financial, or both, decisions of a firm.

(9) "Department" means the Washington department of licensing.

(10) "Designated broker" means:

(a) A natural person who owns a sole proprietorship real estate firm; or

(b) A natural person with a controlling interest in the firm who is designated by a legally recognized business entity such as a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or partnership real estate firm, to act as a designated broker on behalf of the real estate firm, and whose managing broker's license receives an endorsement from the department of "designated broker."

(11) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.

(12) "Inactive license" means the status of a license that is not expired and is not affiliated with a firm.

(13) "Independent contractor relationship" means a relationship between a broker or managing broker and a real estate firm that satisfies both of the following conditions: (a) No written agreement with the broker or managing broker provides that the broker or managing broker is an employee of the firm; and (b) substantially all of the broker's or managing broker's compensation is for services related to real estate brokerage services provided by the firm. Nothing in this subsection is intended to relieve the managing broker or real estate firm of the supervisory duties identified in this chapter.

(14) "Licensee" means a person holding a license as a real estate firm, managing broker, or broker.

(((14))) (15) "Managing broker" means a natural person acting on behalf of a real estate firm to perform real estate brokerage services under the supervision of the designated broker, and who may supervise other brokers or managing brokers licensed to the firm.

(((15))) (16) "Person" includes a natural person, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, partnership, or public or private organization or entity of any character, except where otherwise restricted.

(((16))) (17) "Real estate brokerage services" means any of the following services offered or rendered directly or indirectly to another, or on behalf of another for compensation or the promise or expectation of compensation, or by a licensee on the licensee's own behalf:

(a) Listing, selling, purchasing, exchanging, optioning, leasing, renting of real estate, or any real property interest therein; or any interest in a cooperative; or any interest in a floating home or floating on-water residence, as defined in RCW 90.58.270;

(b) Negotiating or offering to negotiate, either directly or indirectly, the purchase, sale, exchange, lease, or rental of real estate, or any real property interest therein; or any interest in a cooperative; or any interest in a floating home or floating on-water residence, as defined in RCW 90.58.270;

(c) Listing, selling, purchasing, exchanging, optioning, leasing, renting, or negotiating the purchase, sale, lease, or exchange of a manufactured or mobile home in conjunction with the purchase, sale, lease, exchange, or rental of the land upon which the manufactured or mobile home is or will be located;

(d) Advertising or holding oneself out to the public by any solicitation or representation that one is engaged in real estate brokerage services;

(e) Advising, counseling, or consulting buyers, sellers, landlords, or tenants in connection with a real estate transaction;

(f) Issuing a broker's price opinion. For the purposes of this chapter, "broker's price opinion" means an oral or written report of property value that is prepared by a licensee under this chapter and is not an appraisal as defined in RCW 18.140.010 unless it complies with the requirements established under chapter 18.140 RCW;

(g) Collecting, holding, or disbursing funds in connection with the negotiating, listing, selling, purchasing, exchanging, optioning, leasing, or renting of real estate or any real property interest; and

(h) Performing property management services, which includes with no limitation: Marketing; leasing; renting; the physical, administrative, or financial maintenance of real property; or the supervision of such actions.

(((17))) (18) "Real estate firm" or "firm" means a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other legally recognized business entity conducting real estate brokerage services in this state and licensed by the department as a real estate firm.

--- END ---