BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) So that the timely investigation of a death will not be prevented, hindered or impeded, when a coroner is at the scene of a death in the performance of his or her duties as coroner, the coroner may lawfully order persons at the scene to vacate the scene of the death until such time as the coroner has completed his or her duties at the scene.

(2) Failure to comply with the lawful order of a coroner to vacate the scene of a death under subsection (1) of this section is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---