BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Any charter, ordinance, regulation, rule, or resolution enacted by any city, town, county, or port district and regulating hours of work, work schedule, or work schedule changes must apply equally to both unionized and nonunionized employers.

(2) No charter, ordinance, regulation, rule, or resolution enacted by any city, town, county, or port district and regulating hours of work, work schedule, or work schedule changes may permit its requirements to be waived, in whole or in part, in collective bargaining.

(3) Any provision of any charter, ordinance, regulation, rule, or resolution enacted before or after the effective date of this section that conflicts with subsections (1) and (2) of this section may not be adopted or agree to and is preempted and unenforceable.

(4) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Work schedule" means the hours, days, and times, including regular and on-call shifts, when the employee is required by the employer to perform duties of employment for which the employee will receive compensation for a given period of time; and

(b) "Work schedule changes" means any modification to the employee's work schedule including, but not limited to: The addition or reduction of hours, cancellation of a work shift or portion of a work shift, a change in the date or time of the work shift, or scheduling the employee for an on-call shift for which the employee does not need to report to work.

(5) This section does not impair any provision of a collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

Section 1 of this act governs the authority of a city or town to regulate private employers and to contract regarding hours of work, work schedule, or work schedule changes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

Section 1 of this act governs the authority of a code city to regulate private employers and to contract regarding hours of work, work schedule, or work schedule changes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

Section 1 of this act governs the authority of a county to regulate private employers and to contract regarding hours of work, work schedule, or work schedule changes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

Section 1 of this act governs the authority of a port district to regulate private employers and to contract regarding hours of work, work schedule, or work schedule changes.

--- END ---