BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.05.203 and 2015 c 258 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department and each regional support network or agency employing designated mental health professionals shall publish information in an easily accessible format describing the process for an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator to petition for court review of a detention decision under RCW 71.05.201.

(2) A designated mental health professional or designated mental health professional agency that receives a request for investigation for possible detention under this chapter must inquire whether the request comes from an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator who would be eligible to petition under RCW 71.05.201. If the designated mental health professional decides not to detain the person for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or forty-eight hours have elapsed since the request for investigation was received and the designated mental health professional has not taken action to have the person detained, the designated mental health professional or designated mental health professional agency must ((inform)) provide the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator who made the request for investigation with written information about the process to petition for court review under RCW 71.05.201 and document the date on which the written information was provided to the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.05.203 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 223 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department and each behavioral health organization or agency employing designated crisis responders shall publish information in an easily accessible format describing the process for an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator to petition for court review of a detention decision under RCW 71.05.201.

(2) A designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency that receives a request for investigation for possible detention under this chapter must inquire whether the request comes from an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator who would be eligible to petition under RCW 71.05.201. If the designated crisis responder decides not to detain the person for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or forty-eight hours have elapsed since the request for investigation was received and the designated crisis responder has not taken action to have the person detained, the designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency must ((inform)) provide the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator who made the request for investigation with written information about the process to petition for court review under RCW 71.05.201 and document the date on which the written information was provided to the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act expires April 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act takes effect April 1, 2018.

--- END ---