BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every licensed pharmacy must display, in a location that is visible to patients, a statement that informs customers, in clear language, of the tax exemption that is available for over-the-counter drugs that are dispensed pursuant to a prescription as provided in RCW 82.08.940.

(2) The commission, in consultation with the department of revenue, shall establish guidelines for the content and location of the statement required under subsection (1) of this section. The guidelines must include a sample of a statement that may be used by a pharmacy. The guidelines must be made available on the commission's web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2018.

--- END ---