BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of commerce, in consultation with the department of health and the department of ecology, is directed to complete a study by September 1, 2019, regarding air quality implications of air traffic at the international airport in Washington with the highest number of total annual departures and arrivals.

(2)(a) The study must consist of an assessment, to be completed by the University of Washington school of public health, of the concentrations of ultrafine particulate matter, barium, aluminum, radioactive thorium, cadmium, chromium, and ethylene dibromide in areas surrounding and directly impacted by air traffic generated by the airport. For purposes of this section, the areas near the airport that are described as the focus of various components of the study and the potential second phase of the study must encompass areas within ten miles of the airport in the directions of aircraft flight paths and areas within ten miles of the airport where public agencies operate an existing air monitoring station. The assessment must:

(i) Monitor and evaluate the concentrations and characteristics of ultrafine particulate matter and the substances listed in (a) of this subsection in areas impacted by high volumes of airport traffic, including the patterns of spatial distribution of ultrafine particulate matter and the substances listed in (a) of this subsection. To the extent practicable, the assessment must attempt to distinguish between ultrafine particulate matter and the substances listed in (a) of this subsection that is attributable to aircraft sources and ultrafine particulate matter and the substances listed in (a) of this subsection that originates with other sources;

(ii) Compare concentrations of ultrafine particulate matter and the substances listed in (a) of this subsection in areas surrounding or directly impacted by high volumes of airport traffic against concentrations of ultrafine particulate matter and the substances listed in (a) of this subsection in locations in the ambient environment that share similar characteristics, but that are not surrounding or directly impacted by high volumes of airport traffic; and

(iii) Analyze the gaps and uncertainties in health information associated with ultrafine particulate matter and the substances listed in (a) of this subsection and whether sufficient information is available to support a second phase of the study described in (b) of this subsection being completed in a manner that provides informational value.

(b) The department of commerce must coordinate with local governments in the areas addressed by the study to share the study results and to solicit public feedback in a manner that is inclusive of community members. The department of commerce must, after evaluating the results of the study in (a) of this subsection, consider whether to recommend proceeding with a second phase of the study, which would include:

(i) An analysis of options to reduce or mitigate emissions or public health impacts of ultrafine particulate matter and the substances listed in (a) of this subsection from aircraft, including but not limited to the use of alternative fuel sources or particulate filters by aircraft, building insulation, air filtration, and education. In evaluating emission reduction or mitigation options, the department of commerce must consider the anticipated costs and feasibility of each option, including the potential role of the federal aviation administration;

(ii) An analysis of the rates of exposure to ultrafine particulate matter and the substances listed in (a) of this subsection by low-income residents, communities of color, senior citizens, port employees who work at the airport, and other communities that may be disproportionately impacted by ultrafine particulate matter and the substances listed in (a) of this subsection pollution. This analysis must consider public health data maintained by the department of health or local health jurisdiction, to the extent such information is available;

(iii) An analysis of the scope of risks posed by ultrafine particulate matter and the substances listed in (a) of this subsection air pollution in communities adjacent to and directly impacted by the airport and air traffic in both absolute terms and relative to the risks posed by other types or sources of air pollution or other pathways of exposure to pollutants in the environment; and

(iv) An analysis of other direct and indirect environmental impacts to the areas surrounding the airport that are attributable to increased volumes of air traffic, including noise pollution, aesthetic impacts, and the loss of habitat.

(3) Consistent with RCW 43.01.036, the department of commerce must report its findings from the study to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019. The report must include a summary of findings on the prevalence of ultrafine particulate matter, barium, aluminum, radioactive thorium, cadmium, chromium, and ethylene dibromide pollution in areas surrounding and directly impacted by the airport, and a recommendation regarding whether sufficient ultrafine particulate matter, barium, aluminum, radioactive thorium, cadmium, chromium, and ethylene dibromide information is available to validate proceeding with a second phase of the study.

(4) This section expires June 30, 2022.

--- END ---