BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.108.050 and 2012 c 137 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter does not apply to:

(1) An individual giving massage or reflexology to members of his or her immediate family;

(2) The practice of a profession by individuals who are licensed, certified, or registered under other laws of this state and who are performing services within their authorized scope of practice;

(3) Massage or reflexology practiced at the athletic department of:

(a) Any institution maintained by the public funds of the state, or any of its political subdivisions;

(b) Any primary or secondary school or institution of higher education;

(c) Any school or college approved by the department of health by rule using recognized national professional standards; or

(d) Any nonprofit organization licensed under RCW 66.24.400 and 66.24.450;

(4) Students enrolled in an approved massage school, approved program, or approved apprenticeship program, practicing massage techniques, incidental to the massage school or program and supervised by the approved school or program. Students must identify themselves as a student when performing massage services on members of the public. Students may not be compensated for the massage services they provide;

(5) Students enrolled in an approved reflexology school, approved program, or approved apprenticeship program, practicing reflexology techniques, incidental to the reflexologist school or program and supervised by the approved school or program. Students must identify themselves as a student when performing reflexology services on members of the public. Students may not be compensated for the reflexology services they provide; or

(6)(a) Individuals who have completed a somatic education training program approved by the secretary.

(b) For purposes of this subsection (6), "somatic education" means: Using minimal touch, words, and directed movement to deepen awareness of existing patterns of movement and suggest new possibilities of movement; and using minimal touch over specific points of the body to facilitate balance in the nervous system. It includes: (i) Any somatic education training program approved by the secretary as of the effective date of this section; (ii) the practice of ortho-bionomy; and (iii) the Feldenkrais method of somatic education.

--- END ---