BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.41.129 and 2005 c 274 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of licensing may keep copies or records of applications for concealed pistol licenses provided for in RCW 9.41.070((,)) and copies or records of applications for alien firearm licenses((, copies or records of applications to purchase pistols provided for in RCW 9.41.090, and copies or records of pistol transfers)) provided for in RCW ((9.41.110)) 9.41.173. The copies and records shall not be disclosed except as provided in RCW 42.56.240(4).

(2) The department of licensing shall not keep copies or records of applications to purchase pistols provided for in RCW 9.41.090 or copies or records of pistol transfers provided for in RCW 9.41.110. The department of licensing shall eliminate from any of its databases any copies or records of pistol purchase applications or pistol transfers maintained by the department of licensing.

--- END ---