BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By October 1, 2017, the department shall establish up to three pilot projects to offer respite services to primary caregivers of people with severe mental illness. The respite services must be provided by individuals qualified to meet the needs of the person receiving care, as determined by the department. Respite services may be provided on either a planned or emergent basis and may be provided in the home of the primary caregiver, the home of the person receiving care, or in the facility of a mental health service provider.

(2) The three participating counties must be willing to participate and be:

(a) A county with a population of at least four hundred thousand located in a behavioral health organization that is an early adopter of fully integrated purchasing of medical and behavioral health services under RCW 71.24.380(6);

(b) A county with a population of at least four hundred thousand located in a behavioral health organization that is comprised of at least seven counties; and

(c) A county with a population between one hundred thousand and two hundred fifty thousand that is part of a behavioral health organization with fewer than five counties that borders the Puget Sound.

(3) The department shall submit a report on the results of the pilot projects to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2019. The report must summarize findings, including the number of individuals served, the number of caregivers receiving support, and the characteristics and needs of individuals served. The report must also identify any recommendations related to the benefits of respite services to primary caregivers and to persons receiving care, the most appropriate use and cost-effectiveness of different care settings, and a summary of the cost of the program and any estimated savings and an estimate of the costs and savings associated with making the program available statewide.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "respite services" means services that provide observation, direct support, and monitoring to meet the physical, emotional, social, and mental health needs of a person receiving care by individuals providing temporary care other than the primary caregivers.

(5) This section expires June 30, 2020.

--- END ---