BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. RCW 83.100.040 (Estate tax imposed—Amount of tax) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 4, 2010 c 106 s 234, 2005 c 516 s 3, 1988 c 64 s 4, & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.040 (Initiative Measure No. 402) are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act applies to estates of decedents dying on or after August 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect August 1, 2017.

--- END ---