BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.710.300 and 2016 c 241 s 129 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The eligibility of a charter school student to participate in interschool athletic activities or other interschool extracurricular activities governed by the Washington interscholastic activities association is subject to rules adopted by the Washington interscholastic activities association. ((The rules must provide that, unless approved by a nonresident school district or the Washington interscholastic activities association, a student attending a charter school may only participate in interschool athletic activities or other interschool extracurricular activities offered by the student's resident school district.))

(2) A proposal by a charter school to regulate the conduct of interschool athletic activities or other interschool extracurricular activities governed by the Washington interscholastic activities association is subject to rules adopted by the Washington interscholastic activities association.

(3) The ((rules adopted by the Washington interscholastic activities association under this section must provide that it is the responsibility of the)) charter school ((to pay)) is responsible for the full cost, minus any student participation fee, for any student who participates in interschool athletic activities or other interschool extracurricular activities governed by the Washington interscholastic activities association.

--- END ---