BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.10.030 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.030 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every board of trustees or board of regents shall cause a United States flag being in good condition to be displayed on the campus of their respective state institution of higher education during the hours of nine o'clock a.m. and four o'clock p.m. on school days, except during inclement weather.

(2) An institution of higher education may not fly a flag on any campus of its institution of higher education other than the United States flag as described in subsection (1) of this section, the Washington state flag, the national league of families POW/MIA flag, or the respective institution of higher education's flag.

--- END ---