BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that as one of the nation's first states to adopt an electronic waste recycling program that collects old computers and televisions, Washington has long been a pioneer in encouraging recycling and reducing public exposure to the toxic substances contained in those electronics. In less than a decade of operations, Washington's electronic waste recycling program has been successful at keeping hundreds of millions of pounds of electronic waste out of landfills. However, in spite of the program's successes, a significant volume of electronic waste in Washington is still not recycled through the electronic product recycling program under chapter 70.95N RCW, and is instead sent to landfills, dumped illegally, or meets other environmentally unfriendly fates. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to improve the collection rate in the state's electronic waste recycling program by directing the program to take better advantage of existing solid waste collection infrastructure, including the establishment of convenient, curbside collection of electronic wastes.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.95N.090 and 2013 c 305 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A program must provide collection services for covered electronic products of all product types and produced by any manufacturer that are reasonably convenient and available to all citizens of the state residing within its geographic boundaries, including both rural and urban areas. Each program must provide collection service in every county of the state. A program may provide collection services jointly with another plan or plans.

(a) For any city or town with a population of greater than ten thousand, each program shall provide a minimum of one collection site or alternate collection service described in subsection (3) of this section or a combination of sites and alternate service that together provide at least one collection opportunity for all product types. A collection site for a county may be the same as a collection site for a city or town in the county.

(b) Collection sites may include electronics recyclers and repair shops, recyclers of other commodities, reuse organizations, charities, retailers, government recycling sites, or other suitable locations.

(c) Collection sites must be staffed, open to the public at a frequency adequate to meet the needs of the area being served, and on an ongoing basis.

(2) A program may limit the number of covered electronic products or covered electronic products by product type accepted per customer per day or per delivery at a collection site or service. All covered entities may use a collection site as long as the covered entities adhere to any restrictions established in the plans.

(3) A program ((may)) must provide collection services in forms different than or supplemental to collection sites, ((such as)) including curbside services((, if)) where curbside recycling services are already provided by a solid waste collection company regulated under chapter 81.77 RCW, and other alternate services if the inclusion of those alternate services would provide equal or better convenience to citizens and equal or increased recovery of unwanted covered electronic products.

(4) For rural areas without commercial centers or areas with widely dispersed population, a program may provide collection at the nearest commercial centers or solid waste sites, collection events, mail-back systems, or a combination of these options.

(5) For small businesses, small governments, charities, and school districts that may have large quantities of covered electronic products that cannot be handled at collection sites or curbside services, a program may provide alternate services. At a minimum, a program must provide for processing of these large quantities of covered electronic products at no charge to the small businesses, small governments, charities, and school districts.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.95N.280 and 2006 c 183 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington materials management and financing authority is established as a public body corporate and politic, constituting an instrumentality of the state of Washington exercising essential governmental functions.

(2) The authority shall plan and implement a collection, transportation, and recycling program for manufacturers that have registered with the department their intent to participate in the standard program as required under RCW 70.95N.040.

(3) Membership in the authority is comprised of registered participating manufacturers. Any registered manufacturer who does not qualify or is not approved to submit an independent plan, or whose independent plan has not been approved by the department, is a member of the authority. All new entrants and white box manufacturers are also members of the authority.

(4) The authority shall act as a business management organization on behalf of the citizens of the state to manage financial resources and contract for services for collection, transportation, and recycling of covered electronic products.

(5) The authority's standard plan is responsible for collecting, transporting, and recycling the sum of the equivalent shares of each participating manufacturer.

(6) The authority shall accept into the standard program covered electronic products from any registered collector who meets the requirements of this chapter. The authority shall compensate registered collectors for the reasonable costs associated with collection, ((but is not required to compensate nor restricted from compensating the additional)) including collection costs resulting from the additional convenience offered to customers through premium and curbside services.

(7) The authority shall accept and utilize in the standard program any registered processor meeting the requirements of this chapter and any requirements described in the authority's operating plan or through contractual arrangements. Processors utilized by the standard plan shall provide documentation to the authority at least annually regarding how they are meeting the requirements in RCW 70.95N.250 ((and section 26 of this act)), including enough detail to allow the standard plan to meet its reporting requirements in RCW 70.95N.140(2)(c) ((and (d))), and must submit to audits conducted by or for the authority. The authority shall compensate such processors for the reasonable costs, as determined by the authority, associated with processing unwanted electronic products. Such processors must demonstrate that the unwanted electronic products have been received from registered collectors or transporters, and provide other documentation as may be required by the authority.

(8) Except as specifically allowed in this chapter, the authority shall operate without using state funds or lending the credit of the state or local governments.

(9) The authority shall develop innovative approaches to improve materials management efficiency in order to ensure and increase the use of secondary material resources within the economy.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.95N.310 and 2006 c 183 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall use any funds legally available to it for any purpose specifically authorized by this chapter to:

(a) Contract and pay for collecting, transporting, and recycling of covered electronic products and education and other services as identified in the standard plan;

(b) Pay for the expenses of the authority including, but not limited to, salaries, benefits, operating costs and consumable supplies, equipment, office space, and other expenses related to the costs associated with operating the authority;

(c) Pay into the electronic products recycling account amounts billed by the department to the authority for any deficit in reaching the standard plan's equivalent share as required under RCW 70.95N.220; and

(d) Pay the department for the fees for submitting the standard plan and any plan revisions.

(2) If practicable, the authority shall avoid creating new infrastructure or solid waste collection services already available through private industry in the state.

(3) The authority may not receive an appropriation of state funds, other than:

(a) Funds that may be provided as a one-time loan to cover administrative costs associated with start-up of the authority, such as electing the board of directors and conducting the public hearing for the operating plan, provided that no appropriated funds may be used to pay for collection, transportation, or recycling services; and

(b) Funds received from the department from the electronic products recycling account for exceeding the standard plan's equivalent share.

(4) The authority may receive additional sources of funding that do not obligate the state to secure debt.

(5) All funds collected by the authority under this chapter, including interest, dividends, and other profits, are and must remain under the complete control of the authority and its board of directors, be fully available to achieve the intent of this chapter, and be used for the sole purpose of achieving the intent of this chapter.

--- END ---