BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.390.060 and 2016 c 183 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A continuing care retirement community must prepare a disclosure statement that includes the following information:

(a) The names of the individual or individuals who constitute the continuing care retirement community and each of the officers, directors, trustees, or managing general partners of the legal entity and a description of each individual's duties on behalf of the legal entity;

(b) The business address of the continuing care retirement community;

(c) The type of ownership, the names of the continuing care retirement community's owner and operator, and the names of any affiliated facilities;

(d) The names and business addresses of any individual having any more than a ten percent direct or indirect ownership or beneficial interest in the continuing care retirement community, the percentage of the direct or indirect ownership or beneficial interest, and a description of each individual's interest in or occupation with the continuing care retirement community;

(e) The location and general description of the continuing care retirement community, including:

(i) The year the continuing care retirement community opened;

(ii) The location and number of living units, licensed assisted living facility beds, and nursing beds considered part of the continuing care retirement community;

(iii) The average annual occupancy rate for the prior three fiscal years for each type of unit or bed; and

(iv) Any other care facilities owned or operated by the owner of the continuing care retirement community;

(f) An explanation of the continuing care retirement community's policy regarding placement in off-campus assisted living facilities and nursing homes and the payment responsibilities of the continuing care retirement community and the resident in the event of off-campus placement;

(g) The number of residents who were placed off-site in the previous three years for assisted living and nursing services due to the lack of available capacity at the continuing care retirement community;

(h) An explanation of all types of fees charged by the continuing care retirement community, how each type of fee is determined, current ranges for each type of fee, and refund policies for each type of fee;

(i) Statements describing the continuing care retirement community's policy for notifying residents of fee increases, including the amount of prior notification that is provided;

(j) Statements describing the continuing care retirement community's policy related to changes in levels of care and any associated fees;

(k) Statements describing the continuing care retirement community's policy for the termination of a contract, including the return of any fees or deposits pursuant to the residency agreement;

(l) A description of services provided or proposed to be provided by the continuing care retirement community under its residency agreements, including:

(i) The extent to which care, long-term care, or health-related services are provided. If the services are provided at a facility that is not ((certified)) registered as part of the continuing care retirement community's campus, the disclosure statement must identify the location where the services are provided and any additional fees associated with the services; and

(ii) The services made available by the continuing care retirement community for an additional charge; and

(m)(i) The continuing care retirement community's two most recent annual audited financial statements prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles by a certified public accountant and the actuarial summary of the most recent annual actuarial analysis prepared in accordance with generally accepted actuarial principles by a qualified actuary. The most recently audited financial statement may not have been prepared more than eighteen months prior to the date that the continuing care retirement community applied for its current registration; or

(ii) If the continuing care retirement community is new and:

(A) Has obtained financing, but does not have two years of audited financial statements as required under (m)(i) of this subsection, an independent accountant's report opinion letter that has evaluated the financial feasibility of the continuing care retirement community; or

(B) Has not obtained financing, a summary of the actuarial analysis for the new continuing care retirement community stating that the continuing care retirement community is in satisfactory actuarial balance.

(2) The disclosure statement must be written in understandable language and a clear format.

(3) Prior to entering into a residency agreement with, or accepting an entrance fee from, any prospective resident, a continuing care retirement community must deliver to the prospective resident a copy of the disclosure statement most recently submitted to the department.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.390.070 and 2016 c 183 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A prospective resident may visit each of the different care levels of the continuing care retirement community, assisted living facility, and nursing home, and may inspect the most recent inspection reports and findings of complaint investigations related to the assisted living and nursing home components covering a period of not less than two years, as available, prior to signing a residency agreement.

(2) All residents of a continuing care retirement community in a living unit that is not used exclusively for assisted living or nursing services have the following expectations:

(a) Transparency regarding the financial stability of the provider operating the facility;

(b) Timely notifications of developments affecting the facility, including ownership changes of the provider operating the facility, a change in the financial condition of the provider operating the facility, and construction and renovation at the facility. The management of the continuing care retirement community may deem certain information to be confidential if it is of a sensitive nature such that disclosure of the information would materially harm the position of the continuing care retirement community;

(c) Reasonable accommodations for persons with disabilities;

(d) The opportunity to participate freely in the operation of independent resident organizations and associations;

(e) The opportunity to seek independent counsel review of all contracts, including residency agreements, prior to executing the residency agreement; ((and))

(f) The assurance that all requests for donations, contributions, and gifts, when made by residents to the continuing care retirement community, are voluntary and may not be used as a condition of residency; and

(g) The receipt, upon request, of a copy of the current disclosure statement prepared under RCW 18.390.060 and any agreement most recently filed with the department under RCW 18.390.030.

(3) The continuing care retirement community shall:

(a) Provide a copy of the expectations specified in this section to each prospective resident prior to signing a residency agreement; and

(b) Make copies of the expectations specified in this section publicly available in areas accessible to the independent residents and visitors. The copies of the expectations must also state that independent residents have the right, as an affected party, to file a complaint with the attorney general for violations of this chapter that may constitute a violation of the consumer protection act and contain information explaining how and where a complaint may be filed.

--- END ---