BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Agency rule making is suspended until July 1, 2018, except in the following cases:

(a) A rule is needed to implement a federal law;

(b) A rule is needed to implement the terms of a state of emergency declared by the governor;

(c) A rule is needed by the department of health to respond to a public health emergency; or

(d) Legislation enacted after January 1, 2017, specifically directs that rule making with explicit, unambiguous parameters be undertaken.

(2) Agency rules must be derived from a clear grant of unambiguous authority directing an agency to adopt rules for a specific purpose. Beginning July 1, 2018, the final adoption of a rule may not occur until the rule has been approved by the legislature as provided in section 3 of this act.

(3) This section does not prohibit an agency from repealing rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each agency must immediately perform a review of existing agency rules. The review must identify: (a) Agency rules adopted under clear authority delegated by the legislature for a specific purpose, (b) agency rules adopted under general agency rule-making authority, and (c) the citation of statutory authority under which each rule was adopted.

(2) Agencies must report the result of their rules review to the office of financial management by November 1, 2017, for compilation into a report to the legislature. The compiled rules review report must include: (a) The citations of statutory authority identified by each agency for the adoption of each rule, (b) recommendations for rules to be enacted into law or extended beyond July 1, 2018, and (c) an identification of rules to be repealed or allowed to expire. The office of financial management must submit the compiled rules review report to the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 by December 1, 2017.

(3) Agencies must set for expiration any rule not reported to the legislature for an extension or enactment into law as described in this section. All such rules must expire no later than July 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature may approve or disapprove a proposed or adopted agency rule. The appropriate standing committees of the legislature must consider, in a public hearing, whether or not the rule is within the intent of the legislature as expressed in the statute which the rule implements, and whether an agency adopted a rule in accordance with all applicable provisions of law. If the legislature does not disapprove of a rule through the passage of a bill by the adjournment of the regular session in which the rule was considered, the rule is considered adopted and becomes effective.

(2) The speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate must notify the office of the code reviser and the rules review committee of the final dispensation of each rule considered under this section. If a rule is disapproved by the legislature through the passage of a bill, the rule immediately expires.

Sec. 4. RCW 34.05.310 and 2011 c 298 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this section are subject to sections 1, 2, and 3 of this act.

(2)(a) To meet the intent of providing greater public access to administrative rule making and to promote consensus among interested parties, agencies must solicit comments from the public on a subject of possible rule making before filing with the code reviser a notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320. The agency must prepare a statement of inquiry that:

(i) Identifies the specific statute or statutes authorizing the agency to adopt rules on this subject;

(ii) Discusses why rules on this subject may be needed and what they might accomplish;

(iii) Identifies other federal and state agencies that regulate this subject, and describes the process whereby the agency would coordinate the contemplated rule with these agencies;

(iv) Discusses the process by which the rule might be developed, including, but not limited to, negotiated rule making, pilot rule making, or agency study;

(v) Specifies the process by which interested parties can effectively participate in the decision to adopt a new rule and formulation of a proposed rule before its publication.

(b) The statement of inquiry must be filed with the code reviser for publication in the state register at least thirty days before the date the agency files notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320 and the statement, or a summary of the information contained in that statement, must be sent to any party that has requested receipt of the agency's statements of inquiry.

(((2))) (3) Agencies are encouraged to develop and use new procedures for reaching agreement among interested parties before publication of notice and the adoption hearing on a proposed rule. Examples of new procedures include, but are not limited to:

(a) Negotiated rule making by which representatives of an agency and of the interests that are affected by a subject of rule making, including, where appropriate, county and city representatives, seek to reach consensus on the terms of the proposed rule and on the process by which it is negotiated; and

(b) Pilot rule making which includes testing the feasibility of complying with or administering draft new rules or draft amendments to existing rules through the use of volunteer pilot groups in various areas and circumstances, as provided in RCW 34.05.313 or as otherwise provided by the agency.

(((3))) (4)(a) An agency must make a determination whether negotiated rule making, pilot rule making, or another process for generating participation from interested parties prior to development of the rule is appropriate.

(b) An agency must include a written justification in the rule-making file if an opportunity for interested parties to participate in the rule-making process prior to publication of the proposed rule has not been provided.

(((4))) (5) This section does not apply to:

(a) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;

(b) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;

(c) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;

(d) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its effect;

(e) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute;

(f) Rules that set or adjust fees under the authority of RCW 19.02.075 or that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative standards, including fees set or adjusted under the authority of RCW 19.80.045; or

(g) Rules that adopt, amend, or repeal:

(i) A procedure, practice, or requirement relating to agency hearings; or

(ii) A filing or related process requirement for applying to an agency for a license or permit.

Sec. 5. RCW 34.05.313 and 1995 c 403 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this section are subject to sections 1, 2, and 3 of this act.

(2) During the development of a rule or after its adoption, an agency may develop methods for measuring or testing the feasibility of complying with or administering the rule and for identifying simple, efficient, and economical alternatives for achieving the goal of the rule. A pilot project shall include public notice, participation by volunteers who are or will be subject to the rule, a high level of involvement from agency management, reasonable completion dates, and a process by which one or more parties may withdraw from the process or the process may be terminated. Volunteers who agree to test a rule and attempt to meet the requirements of the draft rule, to report periodically to the proposing agency on the extent of their ability to meet the requirements of the draft rule, and to make recommendations for improving the draft rule shall not be obligated to comply fully with the rule being tested nor be subject to any enforcement action or other sanction for failing to comply with the requirements of the draft rule.

(((2))) (3) An agency conducting a pilot rule project authorized under subsection (((1))) (2) of this section may waive one or more provisions of agency rules otherwise applicable to participants in such a pilot project if the agency first determines that such a waiver is in the public interest and necessary to conduct the project. Such a waiver may be only for a stated period of time, not to exceed the duration of the project.

(((3))) (4) The findings of the pilot project should be widely shared and, where appropriate, adopted as amendments to the rule.

(((4))) (5) If an agency conducts a pilot rule project in lieu of meeting the requirements of the regulatory fairness act, chapter 19.85 RCW, the agency shall ensure the following conditions are met:

(a) If over ten small businesses are affected, there shall be at least ten small businesses in the test group and at least one-half of the volunteers participating in the pilot test group shall be small businesses.

(b)(i) If there are at least one hundred businesses affected, the participation by small businesses in the test group shall be as follows:

(A) Not less than twenty percent of the small businesses must employ twenty-six to fifty employees;

(B) Not less than twenty percent of the small businesses must employ eleven to twenty-six employees; and

(C) Not less than twenty percent of the small businesses must employ zero to ten employees.

(ii) If there do not exist a sufficient number of small businesses in each size category set forth in (b)(i) of this subsection willing to participate in the pilot project to meet the minimum requirements of that subsection, then the agency must comply with this section to the maximum extent practicable.

(c) The agency may not terminate the pilot project before completion.

(d) Before filing the notice of proposed rule making pursuant to RCW 34.05.320, the agency must prepare a report of the pilot rule project that includes:

(i) A description of the difficulties small businesses had in complying with the pilot rule;

(ii) A list of the recommended revisions to the rule to make compliance with the rule easier or to reduce the cost of compliance with the rule by the small businesses participating in the pilot rule project;

(iii) A written statement explaining the options it considered to resolve each of the difficulties described and a statement explaining its reasons for not including a recommendation by the pilot test group to revise the rule; and

(iv) If the agency was unable to meet the requirements set forth in (b)(i) of this subsection, a written explanation of why it was unable to do so and the steps the agency took to include small businesses in the pilot project.

Sec. 6. RCW 34.05.320 and 2012 c 210 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this section are subject to sections 1, 2, and 3 of this act.

(2) At least twenty days before the rule-making hearing at which the agency receives public comment regarding adoption of a rule, the agency shall cause notice of the hearing to be published in the state register. The publication constitutes the proposal of a rule. The notice shall include all of the following:

(a) A title, a description of the rule's purpose, and any other information which may be of assistance in identifying the rule or its purpose;

(b) Citations of the statutory authority for adopting the rule and the specific statute the rule is intended to implement;

(c) A short explanation of the rule, its purpose, and anticipated effects, including in the case of a proposal that would modify existing rules, a short description of the changes the proposal would make, and a statement of the reasons supporting the proposed action;

(d) The agency personnel, with their office location and telephone number, who are responsible for the drafting, implementation, and enforcement of the rule;

(e) The name of the person or organization, whether private, public, or governmental, proposing the rule;

(f) Agency comments or recommendations, if any, regarding statutory language, implementation, enforcement, and fiscal matters pertaining to the rule;

(g) Whether the rule is necessary as the result of federal law or federal or state court action, and if so, a citation to such law or court decision;

(h) When, where, and how persons may present their views on the proposed rule;

(i) The date on which the agency intends to adopt the rule;

(j) A copy of the small business economic impact statement prepared under chapter 19.85 RCW, or a copy of the school district fiscal impact statement under RCW 28A.305.135 in the case of the state board of education, or an explanation for why the agency did not prepare the statement;

(k) A statement indicating whether RCW 34.05.328 applies to the rule adoption; and

(l) If RCW 34.05.328 does apply, a statement indicating that a copy of the preliminary cost-benefit analysis described in RCW 34.05.328(((1))) (2)(c) is available.

(((2)(a))) (3) Upon filing notice of the proposed rule with the code reviser, the adopting agency ((shall)) must have copies of the notice on file and available for public inspection. ((Except as provided in (b) of this subsection,)) The agency ((shall)) must forward three copies of the notice to the rules review committee and to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature.

(((b) A pilot of at least ten agencies, including the departments of labor and industries, fish and wildlife, revenue, ecology, retirement systems, and health, shall file the copies required under this subsection, as well as under RCW 34.05.350 and 34.05.353, with the rules review committee electronically for a period of four years from June 10, 2004. The office of regulatory assistance shall negotiate the details of the pilot among the agencies, the legislature, and the code reviser.

(3))) (4) No later than three days after its publication in the state register, the agency shall cause either a copy of the notice of proposed rule adoption, or a summary of the information contained on the notice, to be mailed to each person, city, and county that has made a request to the agency for a mailed copy of such notices. An agency may charge for the actual cost of providing a requesting party mailed copies of these notices.

(((4))) (5) In addition to the notice required by subsections (((1) and)) (2) and (3) of this section, an institution of higher education shall cause the notice to be published in the campus or standard newspaper of the institution at least seven days before the rule-making hearing.

Sec. 7. RCW 34.05.322 and 1995 c 403 s 118 are each amended to read as follows:

((For rules implementing statutes enacted after July 23, 1995,)) (1) An agency may not rely solely on the section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose, or on the enabling provisions of the statute establishing the agency, or on any combination of such provisions, for its statutory authority to adopt the rule. An agency may use the statement of intent or purpose or the agency enabling provisions to interpret ambiguities in a statute's other provisions.

(2) When delegating rule-making authority to an agency through legislation, the legislature, unless it specifically states otherwise, limits its delegation of authority to the minimum delegation necessary to administer the legislation's clear and specific directives.

Sec. 8. RCW 34.05.328 and 2011 c 298 s 21 and 2011 c 149 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this section are subject to sections 1, 2, and 3 of this act.

(2) Before adopting a rule described in subsection (((5))) (6) of this section, an agency must:

(a) Clearly state in detail the general goals and specific objectives of the statute that the rule implements;

(b) Determine that the rule is needed to achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection, and analyze alternatives to rule making and the consequences of not adopting the rule;

(c) Provide notification in the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320 that a preliminary cost-benefit analysis is available. The preliminary cost-benefit analysis must fulfill the requirements of the cost-benefit analysis under (d) of this subsection. If the agency files a supplemental notice under RCW 34.05.340, the supplemental notice must include notification that a revised preliminary cost-benefit analysis is available. A final cost-benefit analysis must be available when the rule is adopted under RCW 34.05.360;

(d) Determine that the probable benefits of the rule are greater than its probable costs, taking into account both the qualitative and quantitative benefits and costs and the specific directives of the statute being implemented;

(e) Determine, after considering alternative versions of the rule and the analysis required under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection, that the rule being adopted is the least burdensome alternative for those required to comply with it that will achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection;

(f) Determine that the rule does not require those to whom it applies to take an action that violates requirements of another federal or state law;

(g) Determine that the rule does not impose more stringent performance requirements on private entities than on public entities unless required to do so by federal or state law;

(h) Determine if the rule differs from any federal regulation or statute applicable to the same activity or subject matter and, if so, determine that the difference is justified by the following:

(i) A state statute that explicitly allows the agency to differ from federal standards; or

(ii) Substantial evidence that the difference is necessary to achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection; and

(i) Coordinate the rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with other federal, state, and local laws applicable to the same activity or subject matter.

(((2))) (3) In making its determinations pursuant to subsection (((1))) (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the agency must place in the rule-making file documentation of sufficient quantity and quality so as to persuade a reasonable person that the determinations are justified.

(((3))) (4) Before adopting rules described in subsection (((5))) (6) of this section, an agency must place in the rule-making file a rule implementation plan for rules filed under each adopting order. The plan must describe how the agency intends to:

(a) Implement and enforce the rule, including a description of the resources the agency intends to use;

(b) Inform and educate affected persons about the rule;

(c) Promote and assist voluntary compliance; and

(d) Evaluate whether the rule achieves the purpose for which it was adopted, including, to the maximum extent practicable, the use of interim milestones to assess progress and the use of objectively measurable outcomes.

(((4))) (5) After adopting a rule described in subsection (((5))) (6) of this section regulating the same activity or subject matter as another provision of federal or state law, an agency must do all of the following:

(a) Coordinate implementation and enforcement of the rule with the other federal and state entities regulating the same activity or subject matter by making every effort to do one or more of the following:

(i) Deferring to the other entity;

(ii) Designating a lead agency; or

(iii) Entering into an agreement with the other entities specifying how the agency and entities will coordinate implementation and enforcement.

If the agency is unable to comply with this subsection (((4))) (5)(a), the agency must report to the legislature pursuant to (b) of this subsection;

(b) Report to the joint administrative rules review committee:

(i) The existence of any overlap or duplication of other federal or state laws, any differences from federal law, and any known overlap, duplication, or conflict with local laws; and

(ii) Make recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary to eliminate or mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap, duplication, or difference.

(((5))) (6)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this section applies to:

(i) Significant legislative rules of the departments of ecology, labor and industries, health, revenue, social and health services, and natural resources, the employment security department, the forest practices board, the office of the insurance commissioner, and to the legislative rules of the department of fish and wildlife implementing chapter 77.55 RCW; and

(ii) Any rule of any agency, if this section is voluntarily made applicable to the rule by the agency, or is made applicable to the rule by a majority vote of the joint administrative rules review committee within forty-five days of receiving the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320.

(b) This section does not apply to:

(i) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;

(ii) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;

(iii) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;

(iv) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its effect;

(v) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute;

(vi) Rules that set or adjust fees under the authority of RCW 19.02.075 or that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative standards, including fees set or adjusted under the authority of RCW 19.80.045;

(vii) Rules of the department of social and health services relating only to client medical or financial eligibility and rules concerning liability for care of dependents; or

(viii) Rules of the department of revenue that adopt a uniform expiration date for reseller permits as authorized in RCW 82.32.780 and 82.32.783.

(c) For purposes of this subsection:

(i) A "procedural rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals (A) any procedure, practice, or requirement relating to any agency hearings; (B) any filing or related process requirement for making application to an agency for a license or permit; or (C) any policy statement pertaining to the consistent internal operations of an agency.

(ii) An "interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does not subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the agency's interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.

(iii) A "significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a procedural or interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions of law pursuant to delegated legislative authority, the violation of which subjects a violator of such rule to a penalty or sanction; (B) establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification or standard for the issuance, suspension, or revocation of a license or permit; or (C) adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a policy or regulatory program.

(d) In the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an agency must state whether this section applies to the proposed rule pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection, or if the agency will apply this section voluntarily.

(((6))) (7) By ((January 31, 1996, and by)) January 31st of each even-numbered year ((thereafter)), the office of regulatory assistance, after consulting with state agencies, counties, and cities, and business, labor, and environmental organizations, must report to the governor and the legislature regarding the effects of this section on the regulatory system in this state. The report must document:

(a) The rules proposed to which this section applied and to the extent possible, how compliance with this section affected the substance of the rule, if any, that the agency ultimately adopted;

(b) The costs incurred by state agencies in complying with this section;

(c) Any legal action maintained based upon the alleged failure of any agency to comply with this section, the costs to the state of such action, and the result;

(d) The extent to which this section has adversely affected the capacity of agencies to fulfill their legislatively prescribed mission;

(e) The extent to which this section has improved the acceptability of state rules to those regulated; and

(f) Any other information considered by the office of financial management to be useful in evaluating the effect of this section.

Sec. 9. RCW 34.05.335 and 1989 c 175 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A proposed rule may be withdrawn by the proposing agency at any time before adoption. A withdrawn rule may not be adopted unless it is again proposed in accordance with RCW 34.05.320.

(2) Before adopting a rule, an agency shall consider the written and oral submissions, or any memorandum summarizing oral submissions.

(3) Rules not adopted and filed with the code reviser within ((one hundred eighty)) two hundred seventy days after publication of the text as last proposed in the register shall be regarded as withdrawn. An agency may not thereafter adopt the proposed rule without refiling it in accordance with RCW 34.05.320. The code reviser shall give notice of the withdrawal in the register.

(4) An agency may not adopt a rule before the time established in the published notice, or such later time established on the record or by publication in the state register.

Sec. 10. RCW 34.05.360 and 1988 c 288 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

The order of adoption by which each rule is adopted by an agency shall contain all of the following:

(1) The date the agency adopted the rule;

(2) A concise statement of the purpose of the rule;

(3) A reference to all rules repealed, amended, or suspended by the rule;

(4) A reference to the specific statutory or other authority authorizing adoption of the rule;

(5) Any findings required by any provision of law as a precondition to adoption or effectiveness of the rule; ((and))

(6) The date the legislature took action to approve the rule; and

(7) The effective date of the rule if other than that specified in RCW 34.05.380(2).

Sec. 11. RCW 43.17.060 and 2009 c 549 s 5061 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of each department may prescribe rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, for the government of his or her department, the conduct of its subordinate officers and employees, the disposition and performance of its business, and the custody, use, and preservation of the records, papers, books, documents, and property pertaining thereto.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 12. RCW 43.21C.110 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 1 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the duty and function of the department of ecology:

(1) To adopt and amend rules of interpretation and implementation of this chapter, subject to the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW, for the purpose of providing uniform rules and guidelines to all branches of government including state agencies, political subdivisions, public and municipal corporations, and counties. The proposed rules shall be subject to full public hearings requirements associated with rule adoption. Suggestions for modifications of the proposed rules shall be considered on their merits, and the department shall have the authority and responsibility for full and appropriate independent adoption of rules, assuring consistency with this chapter as amended and with the preservation of protections afforded by this chapter. The rule-making powers authorized in this section shall include((, but shall not be limited to,)) the following phases of interpretation and implementation of this chapter:

(a) Categories of governmental actions which are not to be considered as potential major actions significantly affecting the quality of the environment, including categories pertaining to applications for water right permits pursuant to chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW. The types of actions included as categorical exemptions in the rules shall be limited to those types which are not major actions significantly affecting the quality of the environment. The rules shall provide for certain circumstances where actions which potentially are categorically exempt require environmental review. An action that is categorically exempt under the rules adopted by the department may not be conditioned or denied under this chapter.

(b) Rules for criteria and procedures applicable to the determination of when an act of a branch of government is a major action significantly affecting the quality of the environment for which a detailed statement is required to be prepared pursuant to RCW 43.21C.030.

(c) Rules and procedures applicable to the preparation of detailed statements and other environmental documents, including but not limited to rules for timing of environmental review, obtaining comments, data and other information, and providing for and determining areas of public participation which shall include the scope and review of draft environmental impact statements.

(d) Scope of coverage and contents of detailed statements assuring that such statements are simple, uniform, and as short as practicable; statements are required to analyze only reasonable alternatives and probable adverse environmental impacts which are significant, and may analyze beneficial impacts.

(e) Rules and procedures for public notification of actions taken and documents prepared.

(f) Definition of terms relevant to the implementation of this chapter including the establishment of a list of elements of the environment. Analysis of environmental considerations under RCW 43.21C.030(2) may be required only for those subjects listed as elements of the environment (or portions thereof). The list of elements of the environment shall consist of the "natural" and "built" environment. The elements of the built environment shall consist of public services and utilities (such as water, sewer, schools, fire and police protection), transportation, environmental health (such as explosive materials and toxic waste), and land and shoreline use (including housing, and a description of the relationships with land use and shoreline plans and designations, including population).

(g) Rules for determining the obligations and powers under this chapter of two or more branches of government involved in the same project significantly affecting the quality of the environment.

(h) Methods to assure adequate public awareness of the preparation and issuance of detailed statements required by RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).

(i) To prepare rules for projects setting forth the time limits within which the governmental entity responsible for the action shall comply with the provisions of this chapter.

(j) Rules for utilization of a detailed statement for more than one action and rules improving environmental analysis of nonproject proposals and encouraging better interagency coordination and integration between this chapter and other environmental laws.

(k) Rules relating to actions which shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter in situations of emergency.

(l) Rules relating to the use of environmental documents in planning and decision making and the implementation of the substantive policies and requirements of this chapter, including procedures for appeals under this chapter.

(m) Rules and procedures that provide for the integration of environmental review with project review as provided in RCW 43.21C.240. The rules and procedures shall be jointly developed with the department of commerce and shall be applicable to the preparation of environmental documents for actions in counties, cities, and towns planning under RCW 36.70A.040. The rules and procedures shall also include procedures and criteria to analyze planned actions under RCW 43.21C.440 and revisions to the rules adopted under this section to ensure that they are compatible with the requirements and authorizations of chapter 347, Laws of 1995, as amended by chapter 429, Laws of 1997. Ordinances or procedures adopted by a county, city, or town to implement the provisions of chapter 347, Laws of 1995 prior to the effective date of rules adopted under this subsection (1)(m) shall continue to be effective until the adoption of any new or revised ordinances or procedures that may be required. If any revisions are required as a result of rules adopted under this subsection (1)(m), those revisions shall be made within the time limits specified in RCW 43.21C.120.

(2) In exercising its powers, functions, and duties under this section, the department may:

(a) Consult with the state agencies and with representatives of science, industry, agriculture, labor, conservation organizations, state and local governments, and other groups, as it deems advisable; and

(b) Utilize, to the fullest extent possible, the services, facilities, and information (including statistical information) of public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals, in order to avoid duplication of effort and expense, overlap, or conflict with similar activities authorized by law and performed by established agencies.

(3) Rules adopted pursuant to this section shall be subject to the review procedures of chapter 34.05 RCW. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 13. RCW 18.04.055 and 2016 c 127 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board may adopt and amend rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the orderly conduct of its affairs. The board ((shall)) may prescribe the following rules consistent with this chapter ((as necessary to implement this chapter. Included may be)):

(((1))) (a) Rules of procedure to govern the conduct of matters before the board;

(((2))) (b) Rules of professional conduct for all licensees, certificate holders, and nonlicensee owners of licensed firms, in order to establish and maintain high standards of competence and ethics including rules dealing with independence, integrity, objectivity, and freedom from conflicts of interest;

(((3))) (c) Rules specifying actions and circumstances deemed to constitute holding oneself out as a licensee in connection with the practice of public accountancy;

(((4))) (d) Rules specifying the manner and circumstances of the use of the titles "certified public accountant" and "CPA," by holders of certificates who do not also hold licenses under this chapter;

(((5))) (e) Rules specifying the educational requirements to take the certified public accountant examination;

(((6))) (f) Rules designed to ensure that licensees' "reports" meet the definitional requirements for that term as specified in RCW 18.04.025;

(((7))) (g) Requirements for CPE to maintain or improve the professional competence of licensees as a condition to maintaining their license and certificate holders as a condition to maintaining their certificate under RCW 18.04.215;

(((8))) (h) Rules governing firms issuing or offering to issue reports using the title "certified public accountant" or "CPA" including, but not limited to, rules concerning their style, name, title, and affiliation with any other organization, and establishing reasonable practice and ethical standards to protect the public interest;

(((9))) (i) The board may by rule implement a quality assurance review program as a means to monitor licensees' quality of practice and compliance with professional standards. The board may exempt from such program, licensees who undergo periodic peer reviews in programs of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, NASBA, or other programs recognized and approved by the board;

(((10))) (j) The board may by rule require licensed firms to obtain professional liability insurance if in the board's discretion such insurance provides additional and necessary protection for the public;

(((11))) (k) Rules specifying the experience requirements in order to qualify for a license;

(((12))) (l) Rules specifying the requirements for certificate holders to qualify for a license under this chapter which must include provisions for meeting CPE and experience requirements prior to application for licensure;

(((13))) (m) Rules specifying the registration requirements, including ethics examination and fee requirements, for resident nonlicensee partners, shareholders, and managers of licensed firms;

(((14))) (n) Rules specifying the ethics CPE requirements for certificate holders and owners of licensed firms, including the process for reporting compliance with those requirements;

(((15))) (o) Rules specifying the experience and CPE requirements for licensees offering or issuing reports((; and

(16) Any other rule which the board finds necessary or appropriate to implement this chapter)).

(2) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 14. RCW 34.12.030 and 1981 c 67 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The chief administrative law judge shall appoint administrative law judges to fulfill the duties prescribed in this chapter. All administrative law judges shall have a demonstrated knowledge of administrative law and procedures. The chief administrative law judge may establish different levels of administrative law judge positions.

(2) The chief administrative law judge may also contract with qualified individuals to serve as administrative law judges for specified hearings. Such individuals shall be compensated for their services on a contractual basis for each hearing, in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW. The chief administrative law judge may not contract with any individual who is at that time an employee of the state.

(3) The chief administrative law judge may appoint such clerical and other specialized or technical personnel as may be necessary to carry on the work of this chapter.

(4) The administrative law judges appointed under subsection (1) of this section are subject to discipline and termination, for cause, by the chief administrative law judge. Upon written request by the person so disciplined or terminated, the chief administrative law judge shall forthwith put the reasons for such action in writing. The person affected has a right of review by the superior court of Thurston county on petition for reinstatement or other remedy filed within thirty days of receipt of such written reasons.

(5) All employees of the office except the chief administrative law judge and the administrative law judges are subject to chapter 41.06 RCW.

(6) The office may adopt rules for its own operation and in furtherance of this chapter in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 15. RCW 28B.95.030 and 2016 c 69 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program shall be administered by the committee on advanced tuition payment which shall be chaired by the director of the office. The committee shall be supported by staff of the office.

(2)(a) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program shall consist of the sale of tuition units, which may be redeemed by the beneficiary at a future date for an equal number of tuition units regardless of any increase in the price of tuition, that may have occurred in the interval, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(b) Each purchase shall be worth a specific number of or fraction of tuition units at each state institution of higher education as determined by the governing body, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(c) The number of tuition units necessary to pay for a full year's, full-time undergraduate tuition and fee charges at a state institution of higher education shall be set by the governing body at the time a purchaser enters into a tuition unit contract, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(d) The governing body may limit the number of tuition units purchased by any one purchaser or on behalf of any one beneficiary, however, no limit may be imposed that is less than that necessary to achieve four years of full-time, undergraduate tuition charges at a state institution of higher education. The governing body also may, at its discretion, limit the number of participants, if needed, to ensure the actuarial soundness and integrity of the program.

(e) While the Washington advanced college tuition payment program is designed to help all citizens of the state of Washington, the governing body may determine residency requirements for eligible purchasers and eligible beneficiaries to ensure the actuarial soundness and integrity of the program.

(3)(a) No tuition unit may be redeemed until two years after the purchase of the unit.

(b) Units may be redeemed for enrollment at any institution of higher education that is recognized by the internal revenue service under chapter 529 of the internal revenue code. Units may also be redeemed to pay for dual credit fees.

(c) Units redeemed at a nonstate institution of higher education or for graduate enrollment shall be redeemed at the rate for state public institutions in effect at the time of redemption.

(4) The governing body shall determine the conditions under which the tuition benefit may be transferred to another family member. In permitting such transfers, the governing body may not allow the tuition benefit to be bought, sold, bartered, or otherwise exchanged for goods and services by either the beneficiary or the purchaser.

(5) The governing body shall administer the Washington advanced college tuition payment program in a manner reasonably designed to be actuarially sound, such that the assets of the trust will be sufficient to defray the obligations of the trust including the costs of administration. The governing body may, at its discretion, discount the minimum purchase price for certain kinds of purchases such as those from families with young children, as long as the actuarial soundness of the account is not jeopardized.

(6) The governing body shall annually determine current value of a tuition unit.

(7) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 academic years only, the governing body shall set the payout value for units redeemed during that academic year only at one hundred seventeen dollars and eighty-two cents per unit. For academic years after the 2016-17 academic year, the governing body shall make program adjustments it deems necessary and appropriate to ensure that the total payout value of each account on October 9, 2015, is not decreased or diluted as a result of the initial application of any changes in tuition under section 3, chapter 36, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. In the event the committee or governing body provides additional units under chapter 36, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., the committee and governing body shall also increase the maximum number of units that can be redeemed in any year to mitigate the reduction in available account value during any year as a result of chapter 36, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. The governing body must notify holders of tuition units after the adjustment in this subsection is made and must include a statement concerning the adjustment.

(8) The governing body shall promote, advertise, and publicize the Washington advanced college tuition payment program. Materials and online publications advertising the Washington advanced college tuition payment program shall include a disclaimer that the Washington advanced college tuition payment program's guarantee is that one hundred tuition units will equal one year of full-time, resident, undergraduate tuition at the most expensive state institution of higher education, and that if resident, undergraduate tuition is reduced, a tuition unit may lose monetary value.

(9) In addition to any other powers conferred by this chapter, the governing body may:

(a) Impose reasonable limits on the number of tuition units or units that may be used in any one year;

(b) Determine and set any time limits, if necessary, for the use of benefits under this chapter;

(c) Impose and collect administrative fees and charges in connection with any transaction under this chapter;

(d) Appoint and use advisory committees and the state actuary as needed to provide program direction and guidance;

(e) Formulate and adopt all other policies ((and rules)) necessary for the efficient administration of the program;

(f) Consider the addition of an advanced payment program for room and board contracts and also consider a college savings program;

(g) Purchase insurance from insurers licensed to do business in the state, to provide for coverage against any loss in connection with the account's property, assets, or activities or to further insure the value of the tuition units;

(h) Make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and other instruments necessary to the exercise and discharge of its powers and duties under this chapter;

(i) Contract for the provision for all or part of the services necessary for the management and operation of the program with other state or nonstate entities authorized to do business in the state;

(j) Contract for other services or for goods needed by the governing body in the conduct of its business under this chapter;

(k) Contract with financial consultants, actuaries, auditors, and other consultants as necessary to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter;

(l) Solicit and accept cash donations and grants from any person, governmental agency, private business, or organization; and

(m) Perform all acts necessary and proper to carry out the duties and responsibilities of this program under this chapter.

(10) The governing body may adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. Beginning July 1, 2018, the rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 16. RCW 15.49.310 and 1981 c 297 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall administer, enforce, and carry out the provisions of this chapter and may adopt regulations necessary to carry out its purpose. The adoption of regulations shall be subject to a public hearing and all other applicable provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW (Administrative Procedure Act), as enacted and hereafter amended. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

The department when adopting regulations in respect to the seed industry shall consult with affected parties, such as growers, conditioners, and distributors of seed. Any final regulation adopted shall be based upon the requirements and conditions of the industry and shall be for the purpose of promoting the well-being of the purchasers and users of seed as well as the members of the seed industry.

When seed labeling, terms, methods of sampling and analysis, and tolerances are not specifically stated in this chapter or otherwise designated by the department, the department shall, in order to promote uniformity, be guided by officially recognized associations, or regulations under The Federal Seed Act.

Sec. 17. RCW 15.24.070 and 2004 c 178 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington apple commission is hereby declared and created an agency of the Washington state government. The powers and duties of the commission shall include the following:

(1) To elect a chair and such other officers as it deems advisable; and to adopt, rescind, and amend rules and orders for the exercise of its powers under this chapter, which shall have the force and effect of the law when not inconsistent with existing laws;

(2) To administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter, and do all things reasonably necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

(3) To employ and at its pleasure discharge a manager, secretary, agents, attorneys, and employees as it deems necessary, and to prescribe their duties and powers and fix their compensation;

(4) To establish offices and incur expense and enter into contracts and to create such liabilities as may be reasonable for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter. Expenses may include reasonable, prudent use of promotional hosting to benefit the purposes of this chapter;

(5) To investigate and prosecute violations of this chapter;

(6) To conduct scientific research to develop and discover the health, food, therapeutic, and dietetic value of apples and apple products;

(7) To keep accurate record of all of its dealings, which shall be open to inspection and audit by the state auditor;

(8) To sue and be sued and have all of the powers of an agency;

(9) To expend funds for commodity-related education, training, and leadership programs as the commission deems expedient;

(10) To borrow money and incur indebtedness;

(11) To accept gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises, of real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange, invest, or expend these donations or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income from the donations on any appropriate activity of the commission except as limited by the donor's terms. The commission shall adopt rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits, and income of all such gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises. The authority to make expenditures granted by this subsection includes the authority to make expenditures to provide scholarships or financial assistance to persons as defined in RCW 1.16.080 or entities associated with the apple industry, but is not limited to the authority to make expenditures for such a purpose;

(12) To engage in appropriate fund-raising activities for the purpose of supporting the activities of the commission authorized by this chapter;

(13) To retain, discharge, or contract with, at its pleasure, accountants, marketing agencies, and other professional consultants as necessary, under procedures for hiring, discharging, and review as adopted by the commission;

(14) To maintain, protect, acquire, or own intellectual property rights, including without limitation, licenses, trademarks, copyrights, artwork, or patents and to sell or license any or all of such rights and collect royalties therefrom and from commission-funded research related to apples;

(15) To apply for and administer federal market access programs and/or similar programs or projects and provide matching funds as may be necessary;

(16) With oversight by the director, provide funding and support to organizations providing general support and leadership to and representation of the apple industry;

(17) With oversight by the director, to speak on behalf of the Washington state government on a nonexclusive basis with regard to apples and apple-related issues, including but not limited to trade negotiations, market access negotiations, and the like, and to fund industry organizations engaging in such activities;

(18) To fund, conduct, or otherwise participate in scientific research relating to apples, including without limitation research regarding pests, pesticides, food safety, irrigation, transportation, and environmental stewardship;

(19) To provide services relating to the production, promotion, sale and/or distribution of Washington apples on a fee-for-services basis. However, (a) the product of such services shall belong to the funding party, and (b) the fees for such services shall include a reasonable charge for the commission's overhead expenses as determined by the commission; ((and))

(20) To gather, maintain, and distribute data relating to the production, processing, shipment, and sales of apples, in connection with its ordinary operations and collection of assessments and particularly in connection with services provided on a fee-for-service basis; and

(2) To adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the office.

Sec. 18. RCW 27.34.220 and 1997 c 145 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The director or the director's designee is authorized:

(1) To promulgate and maintain the Washington heritage register of districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects significant in American or Washington state history, architecture, archaeology, and culture, and to prepare comprehensive statewide historic surveys and plans and research and evaluation of surveyed resources for the preparation of nominations to the Washington heritage register and the national register of historic places, in accordance with criteria approved by the advisory council established under RCW 27.34.250. Nominations to the national register of historic places shall comply with any standards and regulations promulgated by the United States secretary of the interior for the preservation, acquisition, and development of such properties. Nominations to the Washington heritage register shall comply with rules adopted under this chapter.

(2) To establish a program of matching grants-in-aid to public agencies, public or private organizations, or individuals for projects having as their purpose the preservation for public benefit of properties that are significant in American or Washington state history, architecture, archaeology, and culture.

(3) To promote historic preservation efforts throughout the state, including private efforts and those of city, county, and state agencies.

(4) To enhance the effectiveness of the state preservation program through the initiation of legislation, the use of varied funding sources, the creation of special purpose programs, and contact with state, county, and city officials, civic groups, and professionals.

(5) To spend funds, subject to legislative appropriation and the availability of funds, where necessary to assist the Indian tribes of Washington state in removing prehistoric human remains for scientific examination and reburial, if the human remains have been unearthed inadvertently or through vandalism and if no other public agency is legally responsible for their preservation.

(6) To consult with the governor and the legislature on issues relating to the conservation of the man-made environment and their impact on the well-being of the state and its citizens.

(7) To charge fees for professional and clerical services provided by the ((office)) department.

(8) To adopt such rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, as are necessary to carry out RCW 27.34.200 through 27.34.280. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 19. RCW 27.53.140 and 1995 c 399 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

((The department shall have such rule-making authority as is necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.)) The department may adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the department.

Sec. 20. RCW 43.117.050 and 2009 c 549 s 5172 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall:

(((1))) (a) Elect one of its members to serve as chair; and also such other officers as necessary to form an executive committee;

(((2) Adopt rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW;

(3))) (b) Meet at the call of the chair or the call of a majority of its members, but in no case less often than once during any three month period;

(((4))) (c) Be authorized to appoint such citizen task force as it deems appropriate.

(2) The commission may adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the commission.

Sec. 21. RCW 16.67.090 and 2011 c 336 s 436 are each amended to read as follows:

The powers and duties of the commission shall include the following:

(1) To administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter, and do all things reasonably necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

(2) To elect a chair and such other officers as it deems advisable;

(3) To employ and discharge at its discretion a manager, secretary, and such other personnel, including attorneys engaged in the private practice of law subject to the review of the attorney general, as the commission determines are necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and to prescribe their duties and powers and fix their compensation;

(4) To adopt, rescind, and amend rules, regulations, and orders for the exercise of its powers hereunder subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, except that rule-making proceedings conducted under this chapter are exempt from compliance with RCW 34.05.310, the provisions of chapter 19.85 RCW, the regulatory fairness act, and the provisions of RCW 43.135.055 when adoption of the rule is determined by a referendum vote of the affected parties. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(5) To establish by resolution, a headquarters which shall continue as such unless and until so changed by the commission. All records, books, and minutes of the commission shall be kept at such headquarters;

(6) To require a bond of all commission members and employees of the commission in a position of trust in the amount the commission shall deem necessary. The premium for such bond or bonds shall be paid by the commission from assessments collected. Such bond shall not be necessary if any such commission member or employee is covered by any blanket bond covering officials or employees of the state of Washington;

(7) To establish a beef commission revolving fund, such fund to be deposited in a bank or banks or financial institution or institutions, approved for the deposit of state funds, in which all money received by the commission, except an amount of petty cash for each day's needs not to exceed one hundred dollars, shall be deposited each day or as often during the day as advisable; none of the provisions of RCW 43.01.050 as now or hereafter amended shall apply to money collected under this chapter;

(8) To prepare a budget or budgets covering anticipated income and expenses to be incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter during each fiscal year;

(9) To incur expense and enter into contracts and to create such liabilities as may be reasonable for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter;

(10) To borrow money, not in excess of its estimate of its revenue from the current year's contributions;

(11) To keep or cause to be kept in accordance with accepted standards of good accounting practice, accurate records of all assessments, expenditures, moneys, and other financial transactions made and done pursuant to this chapter. Such records, books, and accounts shall be audited at least every five years subject to procedures and methods lawfully prescribed by the state auditor. Such books and accounts shall be closed as of the last day of each fiscal year. A copy of such audit shall be delivered within thirty days after completion thereof to the director, the state auditor, and the commission. On such years and in such event the state auditor is unable to audit the records, books, and accounts within six months following the close of the audit period it shall be mandatory that the commission employ a private auditor to make such audit;

(12) To sue and be sued as a commission, without individual liability for acts of the commission within the scope of the powers conferred upon it by this chapter;

(13) To cooperate with any other local, state, or national commission, organization, or agency, whether voluntary or established by state or federal law, including recognized livestock groups, engaged in work or activities similar to the work and activities of the commission created by this chapter and make contracts and agreements with such organizations or agencies for carrying on joint programs beneficial to the beef industry;

(14) To accept grants, donations, contributions, or gifts from any governmental agency or private source for expenditures for any purpose consistent with the provisions of this chapter; and

(15) To operate jointly with beef commissions or similar agencies established by state laws in adjoining states.

Sec. 22. RCW 72.40.022 and 2002 c 209 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any other powers and duties prescribed by law, the superintendent of the state school for the blind:

(1) Shall have full control of the school and the property of various kinds.

(2) May establish criteria, in addition to state certification, for teachers at the school.

(3) Shall employ members of the faculty, administrative officers, and other employees, who shall all be subject to chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, unless specifically exempted by other provisions of law.

(4) Shall establish the course of study including vocational training, with the assistance of the faculty and the advice of the board of trustees.

(5) May establish new facilities as needs demand.

(6) May adopt rules, under chapter 34.05 RCW, as deemed necessary for the government, management, and operation of the housing facilities.

(7) Shall control the use of the facilities and authorize the use of the facilities for night school, summer school, public meetings, or other purposes consistent with the purposes of the school.

(8) May adopt rules for pedestrian and vehicular traffic on property owned, operated, and maintained by the school.

(9) Shall purchase all supplies and lease or purchase equipment and other personal property needed for the operation or maintenance of the school.

(10) Except as otherwise provided by law, may enter into contracts as the superintendent deems essential to the purpose of the school.

(11) May receive gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests of real or personal property from whatever source, as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and conditions will aid in carrying out the programs of the school; sell, lease or exchange, invest, or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof except as limited by the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt rules to govern the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof.

(12) May, except as otherwise provided by law, enter into contracts the superintendent deems essential for the operation of the school.

(13) May adopt rules providing for the transferability of employees between the ((school for the deaf)) Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss and the school for the blind consistent with collective bargaining agreements in effect.

(14) Shall prepare and administer the school's budget consistent with RCW 43.88.160 and the budget and accounting act, chapter 43.88 RCW generally, as applicable.

(15) May adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other acts not forbidden by law as the superintendent deems necessary or appropriate to the administration of the school. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 23. RCW 72.40.0191 and 2009 c 381 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any other powers and duties prescribed by law, the director of the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss:

(1) Shall be responsible for the supervision and management of the center, including the state school for the deaf, and the property of various kinds. The director may designate an individual to oversee the day-to-day operation and supervision of students at the school;

(2) Shall employ members of the faculty, administrative officers, and other employees, who shall all be subject to chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, unless specifically exempted by other provisions of law;

(3) Shall provide technical assistance and support as appropriate to local and regional efforts to build critical mass and communication-rich networking opportunities for children who are deaf or hard of hearing and their families;

(4) Shall establish the course of study including vocational training, with the assistance of the faculty and the approval of the board of trustees;

(5) Shall, as approved by the board of trustees, control and authorize the use of the facilities for night school, summer school, public meetings, applied research and training for the instruction of students who are deaf or hard of hearing, outreach and support to families of children who are deaf or hard of hearing, or other purposes consistent with the purposes of the center;

(6) Shall purchase all supplies and lease or purchase equipment and other personal property needed for the operation or maintenance of the center;

(7) Shall prepare, submit to the board of trustees for approval, and administer the budget consistent with RCW 43.88.160 and the budget and accounting act, chapter 43.88 RCW generally, as applicable;

(8) Shall provide technical assistance and support to educational service districts for the regional delivery of a full range of educational services to students who are deaf or hard of hearing, including but not limited to services relying on American Sign Language, auditory oral education, total communication, and signed exact English;

(9) As requested by educational service districts, shall recruit, employ, and deploy itinerant teachers to provide in-district services to children who are deaf or hard of hearing;

(10) May establish criteria, in addition to state certification, for the teachers at the school and employees of the center;

(11) May establish, with the approval of the board of trustees, new facilities as needs demand;

(12) May adopt rules, under chapter 34.05 RCW, as approved by the board of trustees and as deemed necessary for the governance, management, and operation of the center;

(13) May adopt rules, as approved by the board of trustees, for pedestrian and vehicular traffic on property owned, operated, and maintained by the center;

(14) Except as otherwise provided by law, may enter into contracts as the director deems essential to the purpose of the center;

(15) May receive gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests of real or personal property from whatever source, as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and conditions will aid in carrying out the programs of the center; sell, lease, or exchange, invest, or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof except as limited by the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt rules to govern the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof;

(16) May adopt rules, as approved by the board of trustees, providing for the transferability of employees between the center and the school for the blind consistent with collective bargaining agreements in effect; and

(17) May adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW, as approved by the board of trustees, and perform all other acts not forbidden by law as the director deems necessary or appropriate to the administration of the center. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 24. RCW 34.05.385 and 1988 c 288 s 316 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The code reviser may adopt rules for carrying out the provisions of this chapter relating to the filing and publication of rules and notices of intention to adopt rules, including the form and style to be employed by the various agencies in the drafting of such rules and notices.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 25. RCW 41.16.040 and 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall have such general powers as are vested in it by the provisions of this chapter, and in addition thereto, the power to:

(1) Generally supervise and control the administration of this chapter and the firefighters' pension fund created hereby.

(2) Pass upon and allow or disallow all applications for pensions or other benefits provided by this chapter.

(3) Provide for payment from said fund of necessary expenses of maintenance and administration of said pension system and fund.

(4) Invest the moneys of the fund in a manner consistent with the investment policies outlined in RCW 35.39.060. Authorized investments shall include investment grade securities issued by the United States, state, municipal corporations, other public bodies, corporate bonds, and other investments authorized by RCW 35.39.030, 35.58.510, 35.81.070, 35.82.070, 36.29.020, 39.58.020, 39.58.080, 39.58.130, 39.60.010, 39.60.020, 68.52.060, and 68.52.065.

(5) Employ such agents, employees and other personnel as the board may deem necessary for the proper administration of this chapter.

(6) Compel witnesses to appear and testify before it, in the same manner as is or may be provided by law for the taking of depositions in the superior court. Any member of the board may administer oaths to witnesses who testify before the board of a nature and in a similar manner to oaths administered by superior courts of the state of Washington.

(7) Issue vouchers approved by the chairperson and secretary and to cause warrants therefor to be issued and paid from said fund for the payment of claims allowed by it.

(8) Keep a record of all its proceedings, which record shall be public; and prepare and file with the city treasurer and city clerk or comptroller prior to the date when any payments are to be made from the fund, a list of all persons entitled to payment from the fund, stating the amount and purpose of such payment, said list to be certified to and signed by the chairperson and secretary of the board and attested under oath.

(9) Make rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter for the purpose of carrying out and effecting the same. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

(10) Appoint one or more duly licensed and practicing physicians who shall examine and report to the board upon all applications for relief and pension under this chapter. Such physicians shall visit and examine all sick firefighters and firefighters who are disabled when, in their judgment, the best interests of the relief and pension fund require it or when ordered by the board. They shall perform all operations on such sick and injured firefighters and render all medical aid and care necessary for the recovery of such firefighters on account of sickness or disability received while in the performance of duty as defined in this chapter. Such physicians shall be paid from said fund, the amount of said fees or salary to be set and agreed upon by the board and the physicians. No physician not regularly appointed or specially appointed and employed, as hereinafter provided, shall receive or be entitled to any fees or compensation from said fund as attending physician to a sick or injured firefighter. If any sick or injured firefighter refuses the services of the appointed physicians, or the specially appointed and employed physician, he or she shall be personally liable for the fees of any other physician employed by him or her. No person shall have a right of action against the board or the municipality for negligence of any physician employed by it. The board shall have the power and authority to select and employ, besides the regularly appointed physician, such other physician, surgeon or specialist for consultation with, or assistance to the regularly appointed physician, or for the purpose of performing operations or rendering services and treatment in particular cases, as it shall deem advisable, and to pay fees for such services from said fund. Said board shall hear and decide all applications for such relief or pensions under this chapter, and its decisions on such applications shall be final and conclusive and not subject to revision or reversal except by the board.

Sec. 26. RCW 43.97.015 and 1987 c 499 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature of the State of Washington hereby ratifies the Columbia River Gorge Compact set forth below, and the provisions of such compact hereby are declared to be the law of this state upon such compact becoming effective as provided in Article III.

A compact is entered into by and between the states of Washington and Oregon, signatories hereto, with the consent of the Congress of the United States of America, granted by an Act entitled, "The Columbia River Gorge National Scenic Area Act," P.L. 99-663.

ARTICLE I

COLUMBIA GORGE COMMISSION ESTABLISHED

a. The States of Oregon and Washington establish by way of this interstate compact a regional agency known as the Columbia River Gorge Commission. The commission established in accordance with this compact shall have the power and authority to perform all functions and responsibilities in accordance with the provisions of this compact and of the Columbia River Gorge National Scenic Area Act (the federal Act), which is incorporated by this specific reference in this agreement. The commission's powers shall include, but not be limited to:

1. The power to sue and be sued.

2. The power to disapprove a land use ordinance enacted by a county if the ordinance is inconsistent with the management plan, as provided in P.L. 96-663, Sec. 7(b)(3)(B).

3. The power to enact a land use ordinance setting standards for the use of nonfederal land in a county within the scenic area if the county fails to enact land use ordinances consistent with the management plan, as provided in P.L. 99-663, Sec. 7(c).

4. According to the provisions of P.L. 99-663, Sec. 10(c), the power to review all proposals for major development action and new residential development in each county in the scenic area, except urban areas, and the power to disapprove such development if the commission finds the development is inconsistent with the purposes of P.L. 99-663.

b. The commission shall appoint and remove or discharge such personnel as may be necessary for the performance of the commission's functions, irrespective of the civil service, personnel or other merit system laws of any of the party states.

c. The commission may establish and maintain, independently or in conjunction with any one or more of the party states, a suitable retirement system for its full-time employees. Employees of the commission shall be eligible for social security coverage in respect of old age and survivors insurance provided that the commission takes such steps as may be necessary pursuant to federal law to participate in such program of insurance as a governmental agency or unit. The commission may establish and maintain or participate in such additional programs of employee benefits as may be appropriate.

d. The commission shall obtain the services of such professional, technical, clerical and other personnel as may be deemed necessary to enable it to carry out its functions under this compact. The commission may borrow, accept, or contract for the services of personnel from any state of the United States or any subdivision or agency thereof, from any interstate agency, or from any institution, person, firm or corporation.

e. Funds necessary to fulfill the powers and duties imposed upon and entrusted to the commission shall be provided as appropriated by the legislatures of the states in accordance with Article IV. The commission may also receive gifts, grants, endowments and other funds from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the commission and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, endowments or other funds.

f. The commission may establish and maintain such facilities as may be necessary for the transacting of its business. The commission may acquire, hold and convey real and personal property and any interest therein.

g. The commission shall adopt bylaws, rules, and regulations for the conduct of its business, and shall have the power to amend and rescind these bylaws, rules and regulations. The commission shall publish its bylaws, rules and regulations in convenient form and shall file a copy thereof and of any amendment thereto, with the appropriate agency or officer in each of the party states. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

ARTICLE II

THE COMMISSION MEMBERSHIP

a. The commission shall be made up of twelve voting members appointed by the states, as set forth herein, and one non-voting member appointed by the U.S. Secretary of Agriculture.

b. Each state governor shall appoint the members of the commission as provided in the federal Act (three members who reside in the State of Oregon, including one resident of the scenic area, to be appointed by the Governor of Oregon, and three members who reside in the State of Washington, including one resident of the scenic area, appointed by the Governor of Washington).

c. One additional member shall be appointed by the governing body of each of the respective counties of Clark, Klickitat, and Skamania in Washington, and Hood River, Multnomah, and Wasco in Oregon, provided that in the event the governing body of a county fails to make such an appointment, the Governor of the state in which the county is located shall appoint such a member.

d. The terms of the members and procedure for filling vacancies shall all be as set forth in the federal Act.

ARTICLE III

EFFECTIVE DATE OF COMPACT AND COMMISSION

This compact shall take effect, and the commission may exercise its authorities pursuant to the compact and pursuant to the Columbia River Gorge National Scenic Area Act when it has been ratified by both states and upon the appointment of four initial members from each state. The date of this compact shall be the date of the establishment of the commission.

ARTICLE IV

FUNDING

a. The States of Washington and Oregon hereby agree to provide by separate agreement or statute of each state for funding necessary to effectuate the commission, including the establishment of compensation or expenses of commission members from each state which shall be paid by the state of origin.

b. The commission shall submit to the Governor or designated officer or officers of each party state a budget of its estimated expenditures for such period as may be required by the laws of that jurisdiction for presentation to the legislature thereof.

c. Subject to appropriation by their respective legislatures, the commission shall be provided with such funds by each of the party states as are necessary to provide the means of establishing and maintaining facilities, a staff of personnel, and such activities as may be necessary to fulfill the powers and duties imposed upon and entrusted to the commission.

d. The commission's proposed budget and expenditures shall be apportioned equally between the states.

e. The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission shall be audited yearly by the appropriate state auditing official and the report of the audit shall be included in and become a part of the annual report of the commission.

f. The accounts of the commission shall be open at any reasonable time for inspection by the public.

ARTICLE V

SEVERABILITY

If any provision of this compact, or its application to any person or circumstance, is held to be invalid, all other provisions of this compact, and the application of all of its provisions to all other persons and circumstances, shall remain valid, and to this end the provisions of this compact are severable.

Sec. 27. RCW 43.330.040 and 2016 sp.s. c 12 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall supervise and administer the activities of the department and shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to community and economic development matters affecting the state.

(2) In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director, the director shall have the following powers and duties:

(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(b) Act for the state in the initiation of or participation in any multigovernmental program relative to the purpose of this chapter;

(c) Accept and expend gifts and grants, whether such grants be of federal or other funds;

(d) Appoint such deputy directors, assistant directors, and up to seven special assistants as may be needed to administer the department. These employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(e) Prepare and submit budgets for the department for executive and legislative action;

(f) Submit recommendations for legislative actions as are deemed necessary to further the purposes of this chapter;

(g) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other functions necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(h) Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for efficient administration, but the director shall be responsible for the official acts of the officers and employees of the department; and

(i) Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3) When federal or other funds are received by the department, they shall be promptly transferred to the state treasurer and thereafter expended only upon the approval of the director. The department must track the amount of federal economic development funding received and disbursed along with any required state, local, or other matching requirements and annually provide the information to the economic development committees of the house of representatives and the senate.

(4) The director may request information and assistance from all other agencies, departments, and officials of the state, and may reimburse such agencies, departments, or officials if such a request imposes any additional expenses upon any such agency, department, or official.

(5) The director shall, in carrying out the responsibilities of office, consult with governmental officials, private groups, and individuals and with officials of other states. All state agencies and their officials and the officials of any political subdivision of the state shall cooperate with and give such assistance to the department, including the submission of requested information, to allow the department to carry out its purposes under this chapter.

(6) The director may establish additional advisory or coordinating groups with the legislature, within state government, with state and other governmental units, with the private sector and nonprofit entities or in specialized subject areas as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(7) The internal affairs of the department shall be under the control of the director in order that the director may manage the department in a flexible and intelligent manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically limited by law, the director shall have complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The director may create such administrative structures as the director deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law, and the director may employ such personnel as may be necessary in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

Sec. 28. RCW 43.160.050 and 2008 c 327 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may:

(1) Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business.

(2) Adopt an official seal and alter the seal at its pleasure.

(3) Utilize the services of other governmental agencies.

(4) Accept from any federal agency loans or grants for the planning or financing of any project and enter into an agreement with the agency respecting the loans or grants.

(5) Conduct examinations and investigations and take testimony at public hearings of any matter material for its information that will assist in determinations related to the exercise of the board's lawful powers.

(6) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms and conditions which are not in conflict with this chapter.

(7) Enter into agreements or other transactions with and accept grants and the cooperation of any governmental agency in furtherance of this chapter.

(8) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW ((as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter)). Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

(9) Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted or implied under this chapter.

Sec. 29. RCW 43.21F.045 and 2015 c 225 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall supervise and administer energy-related activities as specified in RCW 43.330.904 and shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to energy matters affecting the state.

(2) In addition to other powers and duties granted to the department, the department shall have the following powers and duties:

(a) Prepare and update contingency plans for implementation in the event of energy shortages or emergencies. The plans shall conform to chapter 43.21G RCW and shall include procedures for determining when these shortages or emergencies exist, the state officers and agencies to participate in the determination, and actions to be taken by various agencies and officers of state government in order to reduce hardship and maintain the general welfare during these emergencies. The department shall coordinate the activities undertaken pursuant to this subsection with other persons. The components of plans that require legislation for their implementation shall be presented to the legislature in the form of proposed legislation at the earliest practicable date. The department shall report to the governor and the legislature on probable, imminent, and existing energy shortages, and shall administer energy allocation and curtailment programs in accordance with chapter 43.21G RCW.

(b) Establish and maintain a central repository in state government for collection of existing data on energy resources, including:

(i) Supply, demand, costs, utilization technology, projections, and forecasts;

(ii) Comparative costs of alternative energy sources, uses, and applications; and

(iii) Inventory data on energy research projects in the state conducted under public and/or private auspices, and the results thereof.

(c) Coordinate federal energy programs appropriate for state-level implementation, carry out such energy programs as are assigned to it by the governor or the legislature, and monitor federally funded local energy programs as required by federal or state regulations.

(d) Develop energy policy recommendations for consideration by the governor and the legislature.

(e) Provide assistance, space, and other support as may be necessary for the activities of the state's two representatives to the Pacific northwest electric power and conservation planning council. To the extent consistent with federal law, the director shall request that Washington's councilmembers request the administrator of the Bonneville power administration to reimburse the state for the expenses associated with the support as provided in the Pacific Northwest Electric Power Planning and Conservation Act (P.L. 96-501).

(f) Cooperate with state agencies, other governmental units, and private interests in the prioritization and implementation of the state energy strategy elements and on other energy matters.

(g) Serve as the official state agency responsible for coordinating implementation of the state energy strategy.

(h) No later than December 1, 1982, and by December 1st of each even-numbered year thereafter, prepare and transmit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a report on the implementation of the state energy strategy and other important energy issues, as appropriate.

(i) Provide support for increasing cost-effective energy conservation, including assisting in the removal of impediments to timely implementation.

(j) Provide support for the development of cost-effective energy resources including assisting in the removal of impediments to timely construction.

(k) Adopt rules((,)) under chapter 34.05 RCW((, necessary to carry out the powers and duties enumerated in this chapter)). Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

(l) Provide administrative assistance, space, and other support as may be necessary for the activities of the energy facility site evaluation council, as provided for in RCW 80.50.030.

(m) Appoint staff as may be needed to administer energy policy functions and manage energy facility site evaluation council activities. These employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW.

(3) To the extent the powers and duties set out under this section relate to energy education, applied research, and technology transfer programs they are transferred to Washington State University.

(4) To the extent the powers and duties set out under this section relate to energy efficiency in public buildings they are transferred to the department of enterprise services.

Sec. 30. RCW 43.155.040 and 1985 c 446 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may:

(1) Accept from any state or federal agency, loans or grants for the planning or financing of any public works project and enter into agreements with any such agency concerning the loans or grants;

(2) Provide technical assistance to local governments;

(3) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms and conditions which are not in conflict with this chapter;

(4) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW ((as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;)). Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions; and

(5) Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted or implied under this chapter.

Sec. 31. RCW 43.12.045 and 1995 c 403 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

((For rules adopted after July 23, 1995, the commissioner of public lands may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose, on the enabling provisions of the statute establishing the agency, or on any combination of such provisions, for statutory authority to adopt any rule.))

For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter, beginning July 1, 2018, the commissioner may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 32. RCW 89.08.040 and 2009 c 55 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall be entitled to travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 incurred in the discharge of their duties.

(2) The commission shall keep a record of its official actions, shall adopt a seal, which shall be judicially noticed, and may perform such acts, hold such public hearings, and adopt ((such)) rules ((as may be necessary for the execution of its functions under chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess)). The state department of ecology is empowered to pay the travel expenses of the elected and appointed members of the state conservation commission, and the salaries, wages and other expenses of such administrative officers or other employees as may be required under the provisions of this chapter.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 33. RCW 43.105.057 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 807 are each amended to read as follows:

The agency ((shall)) may adopt rules ((as necessary)) under chapter 34.05 RCW to implement the provisions of this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 34. RCW 72.01.090 and 1959 c 28 s 72.01.090 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department is authorized to ((make its own)) adopt rules for the proper execution of its powers((. It shall also have the power)) and to adopt rules and regulations for the government of the public institutions placed under its control, and shall therein prescribe, in a manner consistent with the provisions of this title, the duties of the persons connected with the management of such public institutions.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 35. RCW 36.78.050 and 1993 c 65 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall meet at least once quarterly and ((shall)) may from time to time adopt rules and regulations for its own government ((and as may be necessary for it to discharge its duties and exercise its powers under this chapter)). The board shall elect a chair from its own membership who shall hold office for one year. Election as chair does not affect the member's right to vote on all matters before the board.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 36. RCW 43.101.080 and 2015 c 225 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall have all of the following powers:

(1) To meet at such times and places as it may deem proper;

(2) To adopt ((any)) rules and regulations ((as it may deem necessary)) when delegated specific authority to do so by the legislature;

(3) To contract for services as it deems necessary in order to carry out its duties and responsibilities;

(4) To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of any department, agency, or instrumentality in state, county, and city government, and other commissions affected by or concerned with the business of the commission;

(5) To do any and all things necessary or convenient to enable it fully and adequately to perform its duties and to exercise the power granted to it;

(6) To select and employ an executive director, and to empower him or her to perform such duties and responsibilities as it may deem necessary;

(7) To assume legal, fiscal, and program responsibility for all training conducted by the commission;

(8) To establish, by rule and regulation, standards for the training of criminal justice personnel where such standards are not prescribed by statute;

(9) To own, establish, and operate, or to contract with other qualified institutions or organizations for the operation of, training and education programs for criminal justice personnel and to purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire, subject to the approval of the department of enterprise services, a training facility or facilities necessary to the conducting of such programs;

(10) To establish, by rule and regulation, minimum curriculum standards for all training programs conducted for employed criminal justice personnel;

(11) To review and approve or reject standards for instructors of training programs for criminal justice personnel, and to employ personnel on a temporary basis as instructors without any loss of employee benefits to those instructors;

(12) To direct the development of alternative, ((innovate [innovative])) innovative, and interdisciplinary training techniques;

(13) To review and approve or reject training programs conducted for criminal justice personnel and rules establishing and prescribing minimum training and education standards recommended by the training standards and education boards;

(14) To allocate financial resources among training and education programs conducted by the commission;

(15) To allocate training facility space among training and education programs conducted by the commission;

(16) To issue diplomas certifying satisfactory completion of any training or education program conducted or approved by the commission to any person so completing such a program;

(17) To provide for the employment of such personnel as may be practical to serve as temporary replacements for any person engaged in a basic training program as defined by the commission;

(18) To establish rules and regulations recommended by the training standards and education boards prescribing minimum standards relating to physical, mental and moral fitness which shall govern the recruitment of criminal justice personnel where such standards are not prescribed by statute or constitutional provision;

(19) To require county, city, or state law enforcement agencies that make a conditional offer of employment to an applicant as a fully commissioned peace officer or a reserve officer to administer a background investigation including a check of criminal history, a psychological examination, and a polygraph test or similar assessment to each applicant, the results of which shall be used by the employer to determine the applicant's suitability for employment as a fully commissioned peace officer or a reserve officer. The background investigation, psychological examination, and the polygraph examination shall be administered in accordance with the requirements of RCW 43.101.095(2). The employing county, city, or state law enforcement agency may require that each peace officer or reserve officer who is required to take a psychological examination and a polygraph or similar test pay a portion of the testing fee based on the actual cost of the test or four hundred dollars, whichever is less. County, city, and state law enforcement agencies may establish a payment plan if they determine that the peace officer or reserve officer does not readily have the means to pay for his or her portion of the testing fee;

(20) To promote positive relationships between law enforcement and the citizens of the state of Washington by allowing commissioners and staff to participate in the "chief for a day program." The executive director shall designate staff who may participate. In furtherance of this purpose, the commission may accept grants of funds and gifts and may use its public facilities for such purpose. At all times, the participation of commissioners and staff shall comply with chapter 42.52 RCW and chapter 292-110 WAC.

All rules and regulations adopted by the commission shall be adopted and administered pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 37. RCW 43.215.070 and 2006 c 265 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to other duties under this chapter, the director shall actively participate in a nongovernmental private-public partnership focused on supporting government's investments in early learning and ensuring that every child in the state is prepared to succeed in school and in life. Except for licensing as required by Washington state law and to the extent permitted by federal law, the director of the department of early learning shall grant waivers from the rules of state agencies for the operation of early learning programs requested by the nongovernmental private-public partnership to allow for flexibility to pursue market-based approaches to achieving the best outcomes for children and families.

(2) In addition to other powers granted to the director, the director may:

(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the department to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(b) Accept gifts, grants, or other funds for the purposes of this chapter; and

(c) Adopt, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, ((rules necessary to implement this chapter, including)) rules governing child day care and early learning programs under this chapter. This section does not expand the rule-making authority of the director beyond that necessary to implement and administer programs and services existing July 1, 2006, as transferred to the department of early learning under section 501, chapter 265, Laws of 2006. The rule-making authority does not include any authority to set mandatory curriculum or establish what must be taught in child day care centers or by family day care providers. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 38. RCW 43.21A.080 and 1995 c 403 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

((The director of the department of ecology is authorized to adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter: PROVIDED, That)) (1) The director may adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the department.

(2) The director may not adopt rules after July 23, 1995, that are based solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose, on the enabling provisions of the statute establishing the agency, or on any combination of such provisions, for statutory authority to adopt the rule.

Sec. 39. RCW 70.95N.230 and 2013 c 305 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall adopt rules to determine the process for manufacturers to change plans under RCW 70.95N.080.

(2) The department shall establish annual registration and plan review fees for administering this chapter. An initial fee schedule must be established by rule and be adjusted no more often than once every two years. All fees charged must be based on factors relating to administering this chapter and be based on a sliding scale that is representative of annual sales of covered electronic products in the state, either by weight or unit, or by representative market share. Fees must be established in amounts to fully recover and not to exceed expenses incurred by the department to implement this chapter.

(3) The department shall establish an annual process for local governments and local communities to report their satisfaction with the services provided by plans under this chapter. This information must be used by the department in reviewing plan updates and revisions.

(4) The department may adopt rules ((as necessary)) for the purpose of implementing, administering, and enforcing this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 40. RCW 43.21I.030 and 2000 c 69 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any other powers granted the director, the director may:

(1) Adopt, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, rules ((necessary)) to carry out the provisions of this chapter and chapter 88.46 RCW. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(2) Appoint such advisory committees as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and chapter 88.46 RCW. Members of such advisory committees are authorized to receive travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The director shall review each advisory committee within the jurisdiction of the program and each statutory advisory committee on a biennial basis to determine if such advisory committee is needed. The criteria specified in RCW 43.131.070 shall be used to determine whether or not each advisory committee shall be continued;

(3) Undertake studies, research, and analysis necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and chapter 88.46 RCW;

(4) Delegate powers, duties, and functions of the program to employees of the department as the director deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and chapter 88.46 RCW;

(5) Enter into contracts on behalf of the department to carry out the purposes of this chapter and chapter 88.46 RCW;

(6) Act for the state in the initiation of, or the participation in, any intergovernmental program for the purposes of this chapter and chapter 88.46 RCW; or

(7) Accept gifts, grants, or other funds.

Sec. 41. RCW 39.110.045 and 2012 c 193 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to carrying out the economic development finance activities and programs specifically authorized in this chapter, an authority may:

(1) Maintain an office or offices;

(2) Sue and be sued in its own name, and plead and be impleaded;

(3) Engage consultants, agents, attorneys, and advisers, contract with federal, state, and local governmental entities for services, and hire such employees, agents, and other personnel as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(4) Make and execute all manner of contracts, agreements and instruments, and financing documents with public and private parties as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(5) Acquire and hold real or personal property, or any interest therein, in the name of the authority, and to sell, assign, lease, encumber, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of the same in such manner as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(6) Open and maintain accounts in qualified public depositaries and otherwise provide for the investment of any funds not required for immediate disbursement, and provide for the selection of investments;

(7) Appear in its own behalf before boards, commissions, departments, or agencies of federal, state, or local government;

(8) Procure such insurance in such amounts and from such insurers as the authority deems desirable including, but not limited to, insurance against any loss or damage to its property or other assets, public liability insurance for injuries to persons or property, and directors and officers liability insurance;

(9) Apply for and accept subventions, grants, loans, advances, and contributions from any source of money, property, labor, or other things of value, to be held, used, and applied as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(10) Establish guidelines for the participation by eligible banking organizations in programs conducted by the authority under this chapter;

(11) Act as an agent, by agreement, for federal, state, or local governmental entities to carry out the programs authorized in this chapter;

(12) Establish, revise, and collect such fees and charges as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(13) Make such expenditures as are appropriate for paying the administrative costs and expenses of the authority in carrying out the provisions of this chapter;

(14) Establish such reserves and special funds, and controls on deposits to and disbursements from them, as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(15) Prepare, publish, and distribute, with or without charge, such studies, reports, bulletins, and other material as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(16) Delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with the purposes of this chapter;

(17) Adopt rules concerning its exercise of the powers authorized by this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions; and

(18) Exercise any other power the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes and exercise the powers expressly granted in this chapter.

Sec. 42. RCW 50.12.040 and 1995 c 403 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Permanent and emergency rules shall be adopted, amended, or repealed by the commissioner in accordance with the provisions of Title 34 RCW and the rules adopted pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That the commissioner may not adopt rules after July 23, 1995, that are based solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose, on the enabling provisions of the statute establishing the agency, or on any combination of such provisions, for statutory authority to adopt any rule.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 43. RCW 50.12.010 and 2010 c 8 s 13013 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commissioner shall administer this title. He or she shall have the power and authority to adopt, amend, or rescind such rules and regulations, to employ such persons, make such expenditures, require such reports, make such investigations, and take such other action as he or she deems necessary or suitable to that end. Such rules and regulations shall be effective upon publication and in the manner, not inconsistent with the provisions of this title, which the commissioner shall prescribe. The commissioner, in accordance with the provisions of this title, shall determine the organization and methods of procedure of the divisions referred to in this title, and shall have an official seal which shall be judicially noticed. The commissioner shall submit to the governor a report covering the administration and operation of this title during the preceding fiscal year, July 1st through June 30th, and shall make such recommendations for amendments to this title as he or she deems proper. Such report shall include a balance sheet of the moneys in the fund in which there shall be provided, if possible, a reserve against the liability in future years to pay benefits in excess of the then current contributions, which reserve shall be set up by the commissioner in accordance with accepted actuarial principles on the basis of statistics of employment, business activity, and other relevant factors for the longest possible period. Whenever the commissioner believes that a change in contribution or benefit rates will become necessary to protect the solvency of the fund, he or she shall promptly so inform the governor and legislature and make recommendations with respect thereto.

(2) There is established a unit within the department for the purpose of detection and investigation of fraud under this title. The department will employ supervisory and investigative personnel for the program, who must be qualified by training and experience.

(3) The commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized designee is authorized to receive criminal history record information that includes nonconviction data for any purpose associated with the investigation for abuse or fraud under chapter 50.20 RCW. Dissemination or use of nonconviction data for purposes other than that authorized in this section is prohibited.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 44. RCW 80.50.040 and 2001 c 214 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The council shall have the following powers:

(1) To adopt, promulgate, amend, or rescind suitable rules and regulations, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, to carry out the provisions of this chapter((, and the policies and practices of the council in connection therewith)). Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(2) To develop and apply environmental and ecological guidelines in relation to the type, design, location, construction, and operational conditions of certification of energy facilities subject to this chapter;

(3) To establish rules of practice for the conduct of public hearings pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, as found in chapter 34.05 RCW;

(4) To prescribe the form, content, and necessary supporting documentation for site certification;

(5) To receive applications for energy facility locations and to investigate the sufficiency thereof;

(6) To make and contract, when applicable, for independent studies of sites proposed by the applicant;

(7) To conduct hearings on the proposed location of the energy facilities;

(8) To prepare written reports to the governor which shall include: (a) A statement indicating whether the application is in compliance with the council's guidelines, (b) criteria specific to the site and transmission line routing, (c) a council recommendation as to the disposition of the application, and (d) a draft certification agreement when the council recommends approval of the application;

(9) To prescribe the means for monitoring of the effects arising from the construction and the operation of energy facilities to assure continued compliance with terms of certification and/or permits issued by the council pursuant to chapter 90.48 RCW or subsection (12) of this section: PROVIDED, That any on-site inspection required by the council shall be performed by other state agencies pursuant to interagency agreement: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the council may retain authority for determining compliance relative to monitoring;

(10) To integrate its site evaluation activity with activities of federal agencies having jurisdiction in such matters to avoid unnecessary duplication;

(11) To present state concerns and interests to other states, regional organizations, and the federal government on the location, construction, and operation of any energy facility which may affect the environment, health, or safety of the citizens of the state of Washington;

(12) To issue permits in compliance with applicable provisions of the federally approved state implementation plan adopted in accordance with the Federal Clean Air Act, as now existing or hereafter amended, for the new construction, reconstruction, or enlargement or operation of energy facilities: PROVIDED, That such permits shall become effective only if the governor approves an application for certification and executes a certification agreement pursuant to this chapter: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That all such permits be conditioned upon compliance with all provisions of the federally approved state implementation plan which apply to energy facilities covered within the provisions of this chapter; and

(13) To serve as an interagency coordinating body for energy-related issues.

Sec. 45. RCW 43.19.011 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of enterprise services shall supervise and administer the activities of the department of enterprise services and shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to matters under the jurisdiction of the department.

(2) In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director, the director shall have the following powers and duties:

(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(b) Accept and expend gifts and grants that are related to the purposes of this chapter, whether such grants be of federal or other funds;

(c) Appoint deputy and assistant directors and such other special assistants as may be needed to administer the department. These employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(d) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other functions necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(e) Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for efficient administration, but the director shall be responsible for the official acts of the officers and employees of the department;

(f) Apply for grants from public and private entities, and receive and administer any grant funding received for the purpose and intent of this chapter; and

(g) Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3) The director may establish additional advisory groups as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 46. RCW 36.70A.270 and 2010 c 211 s 6 and 2010 c 210 s 16 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The growth management hearings board shall be governed by the following rules on conduct and procedure:

(1) Any board member may be removed for inefficiency, malfeasance, and misfeasance in office, under specific written charges filed by the governor. The governor shall transmit such written charges to the member accused and the chief justice of the supreme court. The chief justice shall thereupon designate a tribunal composed of three judges of the superior court to hear and adjudicate the charges. Removal of any member of the board by the tribunal shall disqualify such member for reappointment.

(2) Each board member shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in the discharge of his or her duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Each member shall receive an annual salary to be determined by the governor pursuant to RCW 43.03.040. The principal office of the board shall be located in Olympia.

(3) Each board member shall not: (a) Be a candidate for or hold any other public office or trust; (b) engage in any occupation or business interfering with or inconsistent with his or her duty as a board member; and (c) for a period of one year after the termination of his or her board membership, act in a representative capacity before the board on any matter.

(4) A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for adopting rules necessary for the conduct of its powers and duties or transacting other official business, and may act even though one position of the board is vacant. One or more members may hold hearings and take testimony to be reported for action by the board when authorized by rule or order of the board. The board shall perform all the powers and duties specified in this chapter or as otherwise provided by law.

(5) The board may use one or more hearing examiners to assist the board in its hearing function, to make conclusions of law and findings of fact and, if requested by the board, to make recommendations to the board for decisions in cases before the board. Such hearing examiners must have demonstrated knowledge of land use planning and law. The board shall specify in its rules of practice and procedure, as required by subsection (7) of this section, the procedure and criteria to be employed for designating hearing examiners as a presiding officer. Hearing examiners used by the board shall meet the requirements of subsection (3) of this section. The findings and conclusions of the hearing examiner shall not become final until they have been formally approved by the board. This authorization to use hearing examiners does not waive the requirement of RCW 36.70A.300 that final orders be issued within one hundred eighty days of board receipt of a petition.

(6) The board shall make findings of fact and prepare a written decision in each case decided by it, and such findings and decision shall be effective upon being signed by two or more members of the regional panel deciding the particular case and upon being filed at the board's principal office, and shall be open for public inspection at all reasonable times.

(7) All proceedings before the board, any of its members, or a hearing examiner appointed by the board shall be conducted in accordance with such administrative rules of practice and procedure as the board prescribes. The board shall develop and adopt rules of practice and procedure, including rules regarding expeditious and summary disposition of appeals and the assignment of cases to regional panels. The board shall publish such rules and decisions it renders and arrange for the reasonable distribution of the rules and decisions. Except as it conflicts with specific provisions of this chapter, the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and specifically including the provisions of RCW 34.05.455 governing ex parte communications, shall govern the practice and procedure of the board. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

(8) A board member or hearing examiner is subject to disqualification under chapter 34.05 RCW. The rules of practice of the board shall establish procedures by which a party to a hearing conducted before the board may file with the board a motion to disqualify, with supporting affidavit, against a board member or hearing examiner assigned to preside at the hearing.

(9) All members of the board shall meet on at least an annual basis with the objective of sharing information that promotes the goals and purposes of this chapter.

(10) The board shall annually elect one of its members to be the board administrative officer. The duties and responsibilities of the administrative officer include handling day-to-day administrative, budget, and personnel matters on behalf of the board, together with making case assignments to board members in accordance with the board's rules of procedure in order to achieve a fair and balanced workload among all board members. The administrative officer of the board may carry a reduced caseload to allow time for performing the administrative work functions.

Sec. 47. RCW 43.21B.090 and 1990 c 65 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The principal office of the hearings board shall be at the state capitol, but it may sit or hold hearings at any other place in the state. A majority of the hearings board shall constitute a quorum for making orders or decisions, promulgating rules and regulations ((necessary for the conduct of its powers and duties)), or transacting other official business, and may act though one position of the hearings board be vacant. One or more members may hold hearings and take testimony to be reported for action by the hearings board when authorized by rule or order of the hearings board. The hearings board shall perform all the powers and duties specified in this chapter or as otherwise provided by law.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 48. RCW 90.58.175 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 203 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The shorelines hearings board may adopt rules and regulations governing the administrative practice and procedure in and before the board.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 49. RCW 42.52.360 and 2013 c 190 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The executive ethics board shall enforce this chapter and rules adopted under it with respect to statewide elected officers and all other officers and employees in the executive branch, boards and commissions, and institutions of higher education.

(2) The executive ethics board shall enforce this chapter with regard to the activities of university research employees as provided in this subsection.

(a) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.030, 42.52.110, 42.52.130, 42.52.140, and 42.52.150, the administrative process shall be consistent with and adhere to no less than the current standards in regulations of the United States public health service and the office of the secretary of the department of health and human services in Title 42 C.F.R. Part 50, Subpart F relating to promotion of objectivity in research.

(b) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.040, 42.52.080, and 42.52.120, the administrative process shall include a comprehensive system for the disclosure, review, and approval of outside work activities by university research employees while assuring that such employees are fulfilling their employment obligations to the university.

(c) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.160, the administrative process shall include a reasonable determination by the university of acceptable private uses having de minimis costs to the university and a method for establishing fair and reasonable reimbursement charges for private uses the costs of which are in excess of de minimis.

(3) The executive ethics board shall:

(a) Develop educational materials and training;

(b) Adopt rules and policies governing the conduct of business by the board, and adopt rules defining working hours for purposes of RCW 42.52.180 and where otherwise authorized under chapter 154, Laws of 1994. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(c) Issue advisory opinions;

(d) Investigate, hear, and determine complaints by any person or on its own motion;

(e) Impose sanctions including reprimands and monetary penalties;

(f) Recommend to the appropriate authorities suspension, removal from position, prosecution, or other appropriate remedy; and

(g) Establish criteria regarding the levels of civil penalties appropriate for violations of this chapter and rules adopted under it.

(4) The board may:

(a) Issue subpoenas for the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence relating to any matter under examination by the board or involved in any hearing;

(b) Administer oaths and affirmations;

(c) Examine witnesses; and

(d) Receive evidence.

(5) The board shall not delegate to the board's executive director its authority to issue advisories, advisory letters, or opinions.

(6) Except as provided in RCW 42.52.220, the executive ethics board may review and approve agency policies as provided for in this chapter.

(7) This section does not apply to state officers and state employees of the judicial branch.

Sec. 50. RCW 43.06A.030 and 2013 c 23 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

The ombuds shall perform the following duties:

(1) Provide information as appropriate on the rights and responsibilities of individuals receiving family and children's services, and on the procedures for providing these services;

(2) Investigate, upon his or her own initiative or upon receipt of a complaint, an administrative act alleged to be contrary to law, rule, or policy, imposed without an adequate statement of reason, or based on irrelevant, immaterial, or erroneous grounds; however, the ombuds may decline to investigate any complaint as provided by rules adopted under this chapter;

(3) Monitor the procedures as established, implemented, and practiced by the department to carry out its responsibilities in delivering family and children's services with a view toward appropriate preservation of families and ensuring children's health and safety;

(4) Review periodically the facilities and procedures of state institutions serving children, and state-licensed facilities or residences;

(5) Recommend changes in the procedures for addressing the needs of families and children;

(6) Submit annually to the committee and to the governor by November 1st a report analyzing the work of the office, including recommendations;

(7) Grant the committee access to all relevant records in the possession of the ombuds unless prohibited by law; and

(8) Adopt rules ((necessary to implement this chapter)) derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 51. RCW 39.94.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 726 and 2011 c 151 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in RCW 28B.10.022, the state may not enter into any financing contract for itself if the aggregate principal amount payable thereunder is greater than an amount to be established from time to time by the state finance committee or participate in a program providing for the issuance of certificates of participation, including any contract for credit enhancement, without the prior approval of the state finance committee. Except as provided in RCW 28B.10.022, the state finance committee shall approve the form of all financing contracts or a standard format for all financing contracts. The state finance committee also may:

(a) Consolidate existing or potential financing contracts into master financing contracts with respect to property acquired by one or more agencies, departments, instrumentalities of the state, the state board for community and technical colleges, or a state institution of higher learning; or to be acquired by another agency;

(b) Approve programs providing for the issuance of certificates of participation in master financing contracts for the state or for other agencies;

(c) Enter into agreements with trustees relating to master financing contracts; and

(d) Make appropriate rules for the performance of its duties under this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

(2) In the performance of its duties under this chapter, the state finance committee may consult with representatives from the department of general administration, the office of financial management, and the office of the chief information officer.

(3) With the approval of the state finance committee, the state also may enter into agreements with trustees relating to financing contracts and the issuance of certificates of participation.

(4) Except for financing contracts for real property used for the purposes described under chapter 28B.140 RCW, the state may not enter into any financing contract for real property of the state without prior approval of the legislature. For the purposes of this requirement, a financing contract must be treated as used for real property if it is being entered into by the state for the acquisition of land; the acquisition of an existing building; the construction of a new building; or a major remodeling, renovation, rehabilitation, or rebuilding of an existing building. Prior approval of the legislature is not required under this chapter for a financing contract entered into by the state under this chapter for energy conservation improvements to existing buildings where such improvements include: (a) Fixtures and equipment that are not part of a major remodeling, renovation, rehabilitation, or rebuilding of the building, or (b) other improvements to the building that are being performed for the primary purpose of energy conservation. Such energy conservation improvements must be determined eligible for financing under this chapter by the office of financial management in accordance with financing guidelines established by the state treasurer, and are to be treated as personal property for the purposes of this chapter.

(5) The state may not enter into any financing contract on behalf of another agency without the approval of such a financing contract by the governing body of the other agency.

Sec. 52. RCW 43.320.040 and 1993 c 472 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of financial institutions may adopt ((any)) rules, under chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to implement the powers and duties of the director under this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 53. RCW 31.04.165 and 2010 c 35 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director has the power, and broad administrative discretion, to administer and interpret this chapter to facilitate the delivery of financial services to the citizens of this state by consumer loan companies, residential mortgage loan servicers, and mortgage loan originators subject to this chapter. The director ((shall)) may adopt ((all)) rules necessary to administer this chapter and to ensure complete and full disclosure by licensees of lending transactions governed by this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

(2) If it appears to the director that a licensee is conducting business in an injurious manner or is violating any provision of this chapter, the director may order or direct the discontinuance of any such injurious or illegal practice.

(3) For purposes of this section, "conducting business in an injurious manner" means conducting business in a manner that violates any provision of this chapter, or that creates the reasonable likelihood of a violation of any provision of this chapter.

(4) The director or designated persons, with or without prior administrative action, may bring an action in superior court to enjoin the acts or practices that constitute violations of this chapter and to enforce compliance with this chapter or any rule or order made under this chapter. Upon proper showing, injunctive relief or a temporary restraining order shall be granted. The director shall not be required to post a bond in any court proceedings.

Sec. 54. RCW 31.45.200 and 1994 c 92 s 291 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director has the power((, and broad administrative discretion,)) to administer and interpret the provisions of this chapter to ensure the protection of the public.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 55. RCW 21.20.450 and 1994 c 256 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The administration of the provisions of this chapter shall be under the department of financial institutions. The director may from time to time make, amend, and repeal such rules, forms, and orders as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including rules defining any term, whether or not such term is used in the Washington securities law. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions. The director may classify securities, persons, and matters within the director's jurisdiction, and prescribe different requirements for different classes. No rule, form, or order may be made unless the director finds that the action is necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors and consistent with the purposes fairly intended by the policy and provisions of this chapter. In prescribing rules and forms the director may cooperate with the securities administrators of the other states and the securities and exchange commission with a view to effectuating the policy of this statute to achieve maximum uniformity in the form and content of registration statements, applications, and reports wherever practicable. All rules and forms of the director shall be published.

(2) To encourage uniform interpretation and administration of this chapter and effective securities regulation and enforcement, the director may cooperate with the securities agencies or administrators of one or more states, Canadian provinces or territories, or another country, the securities and exchange commission, the commodity futures trading commission, the securities investor protection corporation, any self-regulatory organization, any national or international organization of securities officials or agencies, and any governmental law enforcement or regulatory agency.

(3) The cooperation authorized by subsection (2) of this section includes:

(a) Establishing a central depository for licensing or registration under this chapter and for documents or records required or allowed to be maintained under this chapter;

(b) Making a joint license or registration examination or investigation;

(c) Holding a joint administrative hearing;

(d) Filing and prosecuting a joint civil or administrative hearing;

(e) Sharing and exchanging personnel;

(f) Sharing and exchanging information and documents; and

(g) Formulating under chapter 34.05 RCW, rules or proposed rules on matters such as statements of policy, guidelines, and interpretative opinions and releases.

Sec. 56. RCW 77.04.055 and 2000 c 107 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In establishing policies to preserve, protect, and perpetuate wildlife, fish, and wildlife and fish habitat, the commission shall meet annually with the governor to:

(a) Review and prescribe basic goals and objectives related to those policies; and

(b) Review the performance of the department in implementing fish and wildlife policies.

The commission shall maximize fishing, hunting, and outdoor recreational opportunities compatible with healthy and diverse fish and wildlife populations.

(2) The commission shall establish hunting, trapping, and fishing seasons and prescribe the time, place, manner, and methods that may be used to harvest or enjoy game fish and wildlife.

(3) The commission shall establish provisions regulating food fish and shellfish as provided in RCW 77.12.047.

(4) The commission shall have final approval authority for tribal, interstate, international, and any other department agreements relating to fish and wildlife.

(5) The commission ((shall)) may adopt rules to implement the state's fish and wildlife laws. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

(6) The commission shall have final approval authority for the department's budget proposals.

(7) The commission shall select its own staff and shall appoint the director of the department. The director and commission staff shall serve at the pleasure of the commission.

Sec. 57. RCW 43.103.090 and 2007 c 200 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The council may:

(a) Meet at such times and places as may be designated by a majority vote of the councilmembers or, if a majority cannot agree, by the chair;

(b) Adopt rules governing the council and the conduct of its meetings;

(c) Require reports from the chief of the Washington state patrol on matters pertaining to the bureau of forensic laboratory services;

(d) Authorize the expenditure of up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars per biennium from the council's death investigations account appropriation for the purpose of assisting local jurisdictions in the investigation of multiple deaths involving unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic events, or involving multiple jurisdictions. The council shall adopt rules consistent with this subsection for the purposes of authorizing expenditure of the funds;

(e) Authorize the expenditure of up to twenty-five thousand dollars per biennium from the council's death investigations account appropriation for the purpose of assisting local jurisdictions to secure forensic anthropology services or other testing, to determine the identity of human remains upon a showing of financial need. The council shall adopt rules consistent with this subsection for the purposes of authorizing expenditure of the funds;

(f) Do anything, necessary or convenient, which enables the council to perform its duties and to exercise its powers; and

(g) Be actively involved in the preparation of the bureau of forensic laboratory services budget and approve the bureau of forensic laboratory services budget prior to formal submission to the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.030.

(2) The council shall:

(a) Prescribe qualifications for the position of director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services, after consulting with the chief of the Washington state patrol. The council shall submit to the chief of the Washington state patrol a list containing the names of up to three persons who the council believes meet its qualifications to serve as director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services. Minimum qualifications for the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services must include successful completion of a background investigation and polygraph examination. If requested by the chief of the Washington state patrol, the forensic investigations council shall submit one additional list of up to three persons who the forensic investigations council believes meet its qualifications. The appointment must be from one of the lists of persons submitted by the forensic investigations council, and the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services shall report to the office of the chief of the Washington state patrol;

(b) After consulting with the chief of the Washington state patrol and the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services, the council shall appoint a toxicologist as state toxicologist, who shall report to the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services. The appointee shall meet the minimum standards for employment with the Washington state patrol including successful completion of a background investigation and polygraph examination;

(c) Establish, after consulting with the chief of the Washington state patrol, the policies, objectives, and priorities of the bureau of forensic laboratory services, to be implemented and administered within constraints established by budgeted resources by the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services;

(d) Set the salary for the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services; and

(e) Set the salary for the state toxicologist.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 58. RCW 76.09.040 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 1 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Where necessary to accomplish the purposes and policies stated in RCW 76.09.010, and to implement the provisions of this chapter, the board shall adopt forest practices rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW and in accordance with the procedures enumerated in this section that:

(i) Establish minimum standards for forest practices;

(ii) Provide procedures for the voluntary development of resource management plans which may be adopted as an alternative to the minimum standards in (a)(i) of this subsection if the plan is consistent with the purposes and policies stated in RCW 76.09.010 and the plan meets or exceeds the objectives of the minimum standards;

(iii) Set forth necessary administrative provisions;

(iv) Establish procedures for the collection and administration of forest practice fees as set forth by this chapter; and

(v) Allow for the development of watershed analyses.

(b) Forest practices rules pertaining to water quality protection shall be adopted by the board after reaching agreement with the director of the department of ecology or the director's designee on the board with respect to these rules. All other forest practices rules shall be adopted by the board.

(c) Forest practices rules shall be administered and enforced by either the department or the local governmental entity as provided in this chapter. Such rules shall be adopted and administered so as to give consideration to all purposes and policies set forth in RCW 76.09.010.

(2)(a) The board shall prepare proposed forest practices rules consistent with this section and chapter 34.05 RCW. In addition to any forest practices rules relating to water quality protection proposed by the board, the department of ecology may submit to the board proposed forest practices rules relating to water quality protection.

(b)(i) The board shall hold one or more hearings on the proposed rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. Any county representative may propose specific forest practices rules relating to problems existing within the county at the hearings.

(ii) The board may adopt and the department of ecology may approve such proposals if they find the proposals are consistent with the purposes and policies of this chapter.

(3)(a) The board shall incorporate into the forest practices rules those fish protection standards in the rules adopted under chapter 77.55 RCW, as the rules existed on July 10, 2012, that are applicable to activities regulated under the forest practices rules. If fish protection standards are incorporated by reference, the board shall minimize administrative processes by utilizing the exception from the administrative procedures controlling significant legislative rules under RCW 34.05.328(((5))) (6)(b)(iii) for the incorporation of rules adopted by other state agencies.

(b) Thereafter, the board shall incorporate into the forest practices rules any changes to those fish protection standards in the rules adopted under chapter 77.55 RCW that are: (i) Adopted consistent with RCW 77.55.361; and (ii) applicable to activities regulated under the forest practices rules. If fish protection standards are incorporated by reference, the board shall minimize administrative processes by utilizing the exception from the administrative procedures controlling significant legislative rules under RCW 34.05.328(((5))) (6)(b)(iii) for the incorporation of rules adopted by other state agencies.

(c) The board shall establish and maintain technical guidance in the forest practices board manual, as provided under WAC 222-12-090 as it existed on July 10, 2012, to assist with implementation of the standards incorporated into the forest practices rules under this section. The guidance must include best management practices and standard techniques to ensure fish protection.

(d) The board must complete the requirements of (a) of this subsection and establish initial technical guidance under (c) of this subsection by December 31, 2013.

(4)(a) The board shall establish by rule a program for the acquisition of riparian open space and critical habitat for threatened or endangered species as designated by the board. Acquisition must be a conservation easement. Lands eligible for acquisition are forestlands within unconfined channel migration zones or forestlands containing critical habitat for threatened or endangered species as designated by the board. Once acquired, these lands may be held and managed by the department, transferred to another state agency, transferred to an appropriate local government agency, or transferred to a private nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW 64.04.130, in fee or transfer of management obligation. The board shall adopt rules governing the acquisition by the state or donation to the state of such interest in lands including the right of refusal if the lands are subject to unacceptable liabilities. The rules shall include definitions of qualifying lands, priorities for acquisition, and provide for the opportunity to transfer such lands with limited warranties and with a description of boundaries that does not require full surveys where the cost of securing the surveys would be unreasonable in relation to the value of the lands conveyed. The rules shall provide for the management of the lands for ecological protection or fisheries enhancement. For the purposes of conservation easements entered into under this section, the following apply:

(i) For conveyances of a conservation easement in which the landowner conveys an interest in the trees only, the compensation must include the timber value component, as determined by the cruised volume of any timber located within the channel migration zone or critical habitat for threatened or endangered species as designated by the board, multiplied by the appropriate quality code stumpage value for timber of the same species shown on the appropriate table used for timber harvest excise tax purposes under RCW 84.33.091;

(ii) For conveyances of a conservation easement in which the landowner conveys interests in both land and trees, the compensation must include the timber value component in (a)(i) of this subsection plus such portion of the land value component as determined just and equitable by the department. The land value component must be the acreage of qualifying channel migration zone or critical habitat for threatened or endangered species as determined by the board, to be conveyed, multiplied by the average per acre value of all commercial forestland in western Washington or the average for eastern Washington, whichever average is applicable to the qualifying lands. The department must determine the western and eastern Washington averages based on the land value tables established by RCW 84.33.140 and revised annually by the department of revenue.

(b) Subject to appropriations sufficient to cover the cost of such an acquisition program and the related costs of administering the program, the department must establish a conservation easement in land that an owner tenders for purchase; provided that such lands have been taxed as forestlands and are located within an unconfined channel migration zone or contain critical habitat for threatened or endangered species as designated by the board. Lands acquired under this section shall become riparian or habitat open space. These acquisitions shall not be deemed to trigger the compensating tax of chapters 84.33 and 84.34 RCW.

(c) Instead of offering to sell interests in qualifying lands, owners may elect to donate the interests to the state.

(d) Any acquired interest in qualifying lands by the state under this section shall be managed as riparian open space or critical habitat.

(5) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 59. RCW 47.06A.020 and 2013 c 104 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall:

(a) Adopt rules and procedures necessary to implement the freight mobility strategic investment program;

(b) Solicit from public entities proposed projects that meet eligibility criteria established in accordance with subsection (4) of this section; and

(c) Review and evaluate project applications based on criteria established under this section, and prioritize and select projects comprising a portfolio to be funded in part with grants from state funds appropriated for the freight mobility strategic investment program. In determining the appropriate level of state funding for a project, the board shall ensure that state funds are allocated to leverage the greatest amount of partnership funding possible. The board shall ensure that projects included in the portfolio are not more appropriately funded with other federal, state, or local government funding mechanisms or programs. The board shall reject those projects that appear to improve overall general mobility with limited enhancement for freight mobility.

The board shall provide periodic progress reports on its activities to the office of financial management and the senate and house transportation committees.

(2) The board may:

(a) Accept from any state or federal agency, loans or grants for the financing of any transportation project and enter into agreements with any such agency concerning the loans or grants;

(b) Provide technical assistance to project applicants;

(c) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or financial, or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms and conditions which are not in conflict with this chapter;

(d) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions; and

(e) Do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted or implied under this chapter.

(3) The board shall designate strategic freight corridors within the state. The board shall update the list of designated strategic corridors not less than every two years, and shall establish a method of collecting and verifying data, including information on city and county-owned roadways.

(4) The board shall utilize threshold project eligibility criteria that, at a minimum, includes the following:

(a) The project must be on a strategic freight corridor;

(b) The project must meet one of the following conditions:

(i) It is primarily aimed at reducing identified barriers to freight movement with only incidental benefits to general or personal mobility; or

(ii) It is primarily aimed at increasing capacity for the movement of freight with only incidental benefits to general or personal mobility; or

(iii) It is primarily aimed at mitigating the impact on communities of increasing freight movement, including roadway/railway conflicts; and

(c) The project must have a total public benefit/total public cost ratio of equal to or greater than one.

(5) From June 11, 1998, through the biennium ending June 30, 2001, the board shall use the multicriteria analysis and scoring framework for evaluating and ranking eligible freight mobility and freight mitigation projects developed by the freight mobility project prioritization committee and contained in the January 16, 1998, report entitled "Project Eligibility, Priority and Selection Process for a Strategic Freight Investment Program." The prioritization process shall measure the degree to which projects address important program objectives and shall generate a project score that reflects a project's priority compared to other projects. The board shall assign scoring points to each criterion that indicate the relative importance of the criterion in the overall determination of project priority. After June 30, 2001, the board may supplement and refine the initial project priority criteria and scoring framework developed by the freight mobility project prioritization committee as expertise and experience is gained in administering the freight mobility program.

(6) It is the intent of the legislature that each freight mobility project contained in the project portfolio approved by the board utilize the greatest amount of nonstate funding possible. The board shall adopt rules that give preference to projects that contain the greatest levels of financial participation from nonprogram fund sources. The board shall consider twenty percent as the minimum partnership contribution, but shall also ensure that there are provisions allowing exceptions for projects that are located in areas where minimal local funding capacity exists or where the magnitude of the project makes the adopted partnership contribution financially unfeasible.

(7) The board shall develop and recommend policies that address operational improvements that primarily benefit and enhance freight movement, including, but not limited to, policies that reduce congestion in truck lanes at border crossings and weigh stations and provide for access to ports during nonpeak hours.

Sec. 60. RCW 15.28.100 and 2010 c 8 s 6038 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state fruit commission is hereby declared and created a corporate body. The commission has power:

(1) To exercise all of the powers of a corporation;

(2) To elect a chair and such other officers as it may deem advisable;

(3) To adopt, amend, or repeal, from time to time, necessary and proper rules, regulations, and orders for the performance of its duties, which rules, regulations, and orders shall have the force of laws when not inconsistent with existing laws. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(4) To employ, and at its pleasure discharge, such attorneys, advertising manager, agents or agencies, clerks and employees, as it deems necessary and fix their compensation;

(5) To establish offices, and incur such expenses, enter into such contracts, and create such liabilities, as it deems reasonably necessary for the proper administration of this chapter;

(6) To accept contributions of, or match private, state, or federal funds available for research, and make contributions to persons or state or federal agencies conducting such research;

(7) To administer and enforce this chapter, and do and perform all acts and exercise all powers deemed reasonably necessary, proper, or advisable to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, and to perpetuate and promote the general welfare of the soft tree fruit industry of this state;

(8) To sue and be sued.

Sec. 61. RCW 9.46.070 and 2012 c 116 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations approved by the commission meeting the requirements of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto permitting said organizations to conduct bingo games, raffles, amusement games, and social card games, to utilize punchboards and pull-tabs in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto and to revoke or suspend said licenses for violation of any provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That the commission shall not deny a license to an otherwise qualified applicant in an effort to limit the number of licenses to be issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission or director shall not issue, deny, suspend, or revoke any license because of considerations of race, sex, creed, color, or national origin: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final action by the commission;

(2) To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to any person, association, or organization operating a business primarily engaged in the selling of items of food or drink for consumption on the premises, approved by the commission meeting the requirements of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto permitting said person, association, or organization to utilize punchboards and pull-tabs and to conduct social card games as a commercial stimulant in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto and to revoke or suspend said licenses for violation of any provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That the commission shall not deny a license to an otherwise qualified applicant in an effort to limit the number of licenses to be issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final action by the commission;

(3) To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to any person, association, or organization approved by the commission meeting the requirements of this chapter and meeting the requirements of any rules and regulations adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter as now or hereafter amended, permitting said person, association, or organization to conduct or operate amusement games in such manner and at such locations as the commission may determine. The commission may authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final action by the commission;

(4) To authorize, require, and issue, for a period not to exceed one year, such licenses as the commission may by rule provide, to any person, association, or organization to engage in the selling, distributing, or otherwise supplying or in the manufacturing of devices for use within this state for those activities authorized by this chapter. The commission may authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final action by the commission;

(5) To establish a schedule of annual license fees for carrying on specific gambling activities upon the premises, and for such other activities as may be licensed by the commission, which fees shall provide to the commission not less than an amount of money adequate to cover all costs incurred by the commission relative to licensing under this chapter and the enforcement by the commission of the provisions of this chapter and rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That all licensing fees shall be submitted with an application therefor and such portion of said fee as the commission may determine, based upon its cost of processing and investigation, shall be retained by the commission upon the withdrawal or denial of any such license application as its reasonable expense for processing the application and investigation into the granting thereof: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if in a particular case the basic license fee established by the commission for a particular class of license is less than the commission's actual expenses to investigate that particular application, the commission may at any time charge to that applicant such additional fees as are necessary to pay the commission for those costs. The commission may decline to proceed with its investigation and no license shall be issued until the commission has been fully paid therefor by the applicant: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may establish fees for the furnishing by it to licensees of identification stamps to be affixed to such devices and equipment as required by the commission and for such other special services or programs required or offered by the commission, the amount of each of these fees to be not less than is adequate to offset the cost to the commission of the stamps and of administering their dispersal to licensees or the cost of administering such other special services, requirements or programs;

(6) To prescribe the manner and method of payment of taxes, fees and penalties to be paid to or collected by the commission;

(7) To require that applications for all licenses contain such information as may be required by the commission: PROVIDED, That all persons (a) having a managerial or ownership interest in any gambling activity, or the building in which any gambling activity occurs, or the equipment to be used for any gambling activity, or (b) participating as an employee in the operation of any gambling activity, shall be listed on the application for the license and the applicant shall certify on the application, under oath, that the persons named on the application are all of the persons known to have an interest in any gambling activity, building, or equipment by the person making such application: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission shall require fingerprinting and national criminal history background checks on any persons seeking licenses, certifications, or permits under this chapter or of any person holding an interest in any gambling activity, building, or equipment to be used therefor, or of any person participating as an employee in the operation of any gambling activity. All national criminal history background checks shall be conducted using fingerprints submitted to the United States department of justice-federal bureau of investigation. The commission must establish rules to delineate which persons named on the application are subject to national criminal history background checks. In identifying these persons, the commission must take into consideration the nature, character, size, and scope of the gambling activities requested by the persons making such applications;

(8) To require that any license holder maintain records as directed by the commission and submit such reports as the commission may deem necessary;

(9) To require that all income from bingo games, raffles, and amusement games be recorded and reported as established by rule or regulation of the commission to the extent deemed necessary by considering the scope and character of the gambling activity in such a manner that will disclose gross income from any gambling activity, amounts received from each player, the nature and value of prizes, and the fact of distributions of such prizes to the winners thereof;

(10) To regulate and establish maximum limitations on income derived from bingo. In establishing limitations pursuant to this subsection the commission shall take into account (a) the nature, character, and scope of the activities of the licensee; (b) the source of all other income of the licensee; and (c) the percentage or extent to which income derived from bingo is used for charitable, as distinguished from nonprofit, purposes. However, the commission's powers and duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not mandatory;

(11) To regulate and establish the type and scope of and manner of conducting the gambling activities authorized by this chapter, including but not limited to, the extent of wager, money, or other thing of value which may be wagered or contributed or won by a player in any such activities;

(12) To regulate the collection of and the accounting for the fee which may be imposed by an organization, corporation, or person licensed to conduct a social card game on a person desiring to become a player in a social card game in accordance with RCW 9.46.0282;

(13) To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of county, city, and other local or state agencies in investigating any matter within the scope of its duties and responsibilities;

(14) In accordance with RCW 9.46.080, to adopt ((such)) rules and regulations ((as are deemed necessary)) to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter. All rules and regulations shall be adopted pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(15) To set forth for the perusal of counties, city-counties, cities and towns, model ordinances by which any legislative authority thereof may enter into the taxing of any gambling activity authorized by this chapter;

(16)(a) To establish and regulate a maximum limit on salaries or wages which may be paid to persons employed in connection with activities conducted by bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations and authorized by this chapter, where payment of such persons is allowed, and to regulate and establish maximum limits for other expenses in connection with such authorized activities, including but not limited to rent or lease payments. However, the commissioner's powers and duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not mandatory.

(b) In establishing these maximum limits the commission shall take into account the amount of income received, or expected to be received, from the class of activities to which the limits will apply and the amount of money the games could generate for authorized charitable or nonprofit purposes absent such expenses. The commission may also take into account, in its discretion, other factors, including but not limited to, the local prevailing wage scale and whether charitable purposes are benefited by the activities;

(17) To authorize, require, and issue for a period not to exceed one year such licenses or permits, for which the commission may by rule provide, to any person to work for any operator of any gambling activity authorized by this chapter in connection with that activity, or any manufacturer, supplier, or distributor of devices for those activities in connection with such business. The commission may authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final action by the commission. The commission shall not require that persons working solely as volunteers in an authorized activity conducted by a bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organization, who receive no compensation of any kind for any purpose from that organization, and who have no managerial or supervisory responsibility in connection with that activity, be licensed to do such work. The commission may require that licensees employing such unlicensed volunteers submit to the commission periodically a list of the names, addresses, and dates of birth of the volunteers. If any volunteer is not approved by the commission, the commission may require that the licensee not allow that person to work in connection with the licensed activity;

(18) To publish and make available at the office of the commission or elsewhere to anyone requesting it a list of the commission licensees, including the name, address, type of license, and license number of each licensee;

(19) To establish guidelines for determining what constitutes active membership in bona fide nonprofit or charitable organizations for the purposes of this chapter;

(20) To renew the license of every person who applies for renewal within six months after being honorably discharged, removed, or released from active military service in the armed forces of the United States upon payment of the renewal fee applicable to the license period, if there is no cause for denial, suspension, or revocation of the license;

(21) To issue licenses under subsections (1) through (4) of this section that are valid for a period of up to eighteen months, if it chooses to do so, in order to transition to the use of the business licensing services program through the department of revenue; and

(22) To perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 62. RCW 41.05.160 and 1988 c 107 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrator may promulgate and adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority and consistent with this chapter ((to carry out the purposes of this chapter)). All rules shall be adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 63. RCW 70.37.050 and 2012 c 117 s 374 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall establish rules concerning its exercise of the powers authorized by this chapter. The authority shall receive from applicants requests for the providing of bonds for financing of health care facilities and shall investigate and determine the need and the feasibility of providing such bonds. Whenever the authority deems it necessary or advisable for the benefit of the public health to provide financing for a health care facility, it shall adopt a financing plan therefor and shall declare the estimated cost thereof, as near as may be, including as part of such cost funds necessary for the expenses incurred in the financing as well as in the construction or purchase or other acquisition or in connection with the rental or other payment for the use thereof, interest during construction, reserve funds and any funds necessary for initial start-up costs, and shall issue and sell its bonds for the purposes of carrying out the proposed financing plan: PROVIDED, That if a certificate of need is required for the proposed project, no such financing plan shall be adopted until such certificate has been issued pursuant to chapter 70.38 RCW by the secretary of the department of social and health services. The authority shall have power as a part of such plan to create a special fund or funds for the purpose of defraying the cost of such project and for other projects of the same participant subsequently or at the same time approved by it and for their maintenance, improvement, reconstruction, remodeling, and rehabilitation, into which special fund or funds it shall obligate and bind the participant to set aside and pay from the gross revenues of the project or from other sources an amount sufficient to pay the principal and interest of the bonds being issued, reserves and other requirements of the special fund and to issue and sell bonds payable as to both principal and interest out of such fund or funds relating to the project or projects of such participant.

(2) Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, be in such denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, or both, as provided in RCW 39.46.030, carry such registration privileges, be made transferable, exchangeable, and interchangeable, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, be subject to such terms of redemption, bear such fixed or variable rate or rates of interest, and be sold in such manner, at such price, as the authority shall determine. Such bonds shall be executed by the chair, by either its duly elected secretary or its executive director, and by the trustee if the authority determines to utilize a trustee for the bonds. Execution of the bonds may be by manual or facsimile signature: PROVIDED, That at least one signature placed thereon shall be manually subscribed. Any interest coupons appurtenant to the bonds shall be executed by facsimile or manual signature or signatures, as the authority shall determine.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 64. RCW 43.70.040 and 2005 c 32 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any other powers granted the secretary, the secretary may:

(1) Adopt, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, rules necessary to carry out the provisions of chapter 9, Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess.: PROVIDED, That for rules adopted after July 23, 1995, the secretary may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose, on the enabling provisions of the statute establishing the agency, or on any combination of such provisions, for statutory authority to adopt any rule. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(2) Appoint such advisory committees as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of chapter 9, Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess. Members of such advisory committees are authorized to receive travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The secretary and the board of health shall review each advisory committee within their jurisdiction and each statutory advisory committee on a biennial basis to determine if such advisory committee is needed;

(3) Undertake studies, research, and analysis necessary to carry out the provisions of chapter 9, Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess. in accordance with RCW 43.70.050;

(4) Delegate powers, duties, and functions of the department to employees of the department as the secretary deems necessary to carry out the provisions of chapter 9, Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess.;

(5) Enter into contracts and enter into and distribute grants on behalf of the department to carry out the purposes of chapter 9, Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess. The department must report to the legislature a summary of the grants distributed under this authority, for each year of the first biennium after the department receives authority to distribute grants under this section, and make it electronically available;

(6) Act for the state in the initiation of, or the participation in, any intergovernmental program to the purposes of chapter 9, Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess.; or

(7) Solicit and accept gifts, grants, bequests, devises, or other funds from public and private sources.

Sec. 65. RCW 43.115.040 and 2009 c 549 s 5170 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) Elect one of its members to serve as chair;

(2) Adopt rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(3) Examine and define issues pertaining to the rights and needs of Hispanics, and make recommendations to the governor and state agencies for changes in programs and laws;

(4) Advise the governor and state agencies on the development and implementation of policies, plans, and programs that relate to the special needs of Hispanics;

(5) Advise the legislature on issues of concern to the Hispanic community;

(6) Establish relationships with state agencies, local governments, and private sector organizations that promote equal opportunity and benefits for Hispanics; and

(7) Receive gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources that are made for the use or benefit of the commission and expend, without appropriation, the same or any income from the gifts, grants, or endowments according to their terms.

Sec. 66. RCW 84.26.120 and 1985 c 449 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The state review board ((shall)) may adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The rules ((shall)) may include rehabilitation and maintenance standards for historic properties to be used as minimum requirements by local review boards to ensure that the historic property is safe and habitable, including but not limited to:

(1) Elimination of visual blight due to past neglect of maintenance and repair to the exterior of the building, including replacement of broken or missing doors and windows, repair of deteriorated architectural features, and painting of exterior surfaces;

(2) Correction of structural defects and hazards;

(3) Protection from weather damage due to defective roofing, flashings, glazing, caulking, or lack of heat; and

(4) Elimination of any condition on the premises which could cause or augment fire or explosion.

Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 67. RCW 27.34.070 and 2005 c 333 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each state historical society is designated a trustee for the state whose powers and duties include but are not limited to the following:

(a) To collect, catalog, preserve, and interpret objects, manuscripts, sites, photographs, and other materials illustrative of the cultural, artistic, and natural history of this state;

(b) To operate state museums and assist and encourage cultural and historical studies and museum interpretive efforts throughout the state, including those sponsored by local historical organizations, and city, county, and state agencies;

(c) To engage in cultural, artistic, and educational activities, including classes, exhibits, seminars, workshops, and conferences if these activities are related to the basic purpose of the society;

(d) To plan for and conduct celebrations of significant events in the history of the state of Washington and to give assistance to and coordinate with state agencies, local governments, and local historical organizations in planning and conducting celebrations;

(e) To create one or more classes of membership in the society;

(f) To engage in the sale of various articles which are related to the basic purpose of the society;

(g) To engage in appropriate fund-raising activities for the purpose of increasing the self-support of the society;

(h) To accept gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises, of real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange, invest, or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income therefrom except as limited by the donor's terms. The governing boards of the state historical societies shall adopt rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits, and income of all such gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(i) To accept on loan or lend objects of historical interest, and sell, exchange, divest itself of, or refuse to accept, items which do not enhance the collection; and

(j) To charge general or special admission fees to its museums or exhibits and to waive or decrease such fees as it finds appropriate.

(2) All objects, sites, manuscripts, photographs, and all property, including real property, now held or hereafter acquired by the state historical societies shall be held by the societies in trust for the use and benefit of the people of Washington state.

Sec. 68. RCW 43.180.040 and 1995 c 399 s 98 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby established a public body corporate and politic, with perpetual corporate succession, to be known as the Washington state housing finance commission. The commission is an instrumentality of the state exercising essential government functions and, for purposes of the code, acts as a constituted authority on behalf of the state when it issues bonds pursuant to this chapter. The commission is a "public body" within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.

(2) The commission shall consist of the following voting members:

(a) The state treasurer, ex officio;

(b) The director of community, trade, and economic development, ex officio;

(c) An elected local government official, ex officio, with experience in local housing programs, who shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate;

(d) A representative of housing consumer interests, appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate;

(e) A representative of labor interests, appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, after consultation with representatives of organized labor;

(f) A representative of low-income persons, appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate;

(g) Five members of the public appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, on the basis of geographic distribution and their expertise in housing, real estate, finance, energy efficiency, or construction, one of whom shall be appointed by the governor as chair of the commission and who shall serve on the commission and as chair of the commission at the pleasure of the governor.

The term of the persons appointed by the governor, other than the chair, shall be four years from the date of their appointment, except that the terms of three of the initial appointees shall be for two years from the date of their appointment. The governor shall designate the appointees who will serve the two-year terms. An appointee may be removed by the governor for cause pursuant to RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080. The governor shall fill any vacancy in an appointed position by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term. If the department of community development is abolished, the resulting vacancy shall be filled by a state official who shall be appointed to the commission by the governor. If this official occupies an office or position for which senate confirmation is not required, then his or her appointment to the commission shall be subject to the consent of the senate. The members of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and may be reimbursed, solely from the funds of the commission, for expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. A majority of the commission constitutes a quorum. Designees shall be appointed in such manner and shall exercise such powers as are specified by the rules of the commission.

(3) The commission may adopt an official seal and may select from its membership a vice chair, a secretary, and a treasurer. The commission ((shall)) may establish rules concerning its exercise of the powers authorized by this chapter. The rules shall be adopted in conformance with chapter 34.05 RCW. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 69. RCW 49.60.120 and 2007 c 187 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall have the functions, powers, and duties:

(1) To appoint an executive director and chief examiner, and such investigators, examiners, clerks, and other employees and agents as it may deem necessary, fix their compensation within the limitations provided by law, and prescribe their duties.

(2) To obtain upon request and utilize the services of all governmental departments and agencies.

(3) To adopt, amend, and rescind suitable rules to carry out the provisions of this chapter, and the policies and practices of the commission in connection therewith. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

(4) To receive, impartially investigate, and pass upon complaints alleging unfair practices as defined in this chapter.

(5) To issue such publications and results of investigations and research as in its judgment will tend to promote good will and minimize or eliminate discrimination because of sex, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, marital status, age, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability.

(6) To make such technical studies as are appropriate to effectuate the purposes and policies of this chapter and to publish and distribute the reports of such studies.

(7) To cooperate and act jointly or by division of labor with the United States or other states, with other Washington state agencies, commissions, and other government entities, and with political subdivisions of the state of Washington and their respective human rights agencies to carry out the purposes of this chapter. However, the powers which may be exercised by the commission under this subsection permit investigations and complaint dispositions only if the investigations are designed to reveal, or the complaint deals only with, allegations which, if proven, would constitute unfair practices under this chapter. The commission may perform such services for these agencies and be reimbursed therefor.

(8) To foster good relations between minority and majority population groups of the state through seminars, conferences, educational programs, and other intergroup relations activities.

Sec. 70. RCW 9.95.150 and 1999 c 143 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The board ((shall)) may make ((all necessary)) rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter ((not inconsistent therewith, and may provide the forms of all documents necessary therefor)). Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 71. RCW 51.52.020 and 1961 c 23 s 51.52.020 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may make rules and regulations concerning its functions and procedure, which shall have the force and effect of law until altered, repealed, or set aside by the board: PROVIDED, That the board may not delegate to any other person its duties of interpreting the testimony and making the final decision and order on appeal cases. All rules and regulations adopted by the board shall be printed and copies thereof shall be readily available to the public. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 72. RCW 48.02.060 and 2010 c 27 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commissioner has the authority expressly conferred upon him or her by or reasonably implied from the provisions of this code.

(2) The commissioner must execute his or her duties and must enforce the provisions of this code.

(3) The commissioner may:

(a) Make reasonable rules for effectuating any provision of this code, except those relating to his or her election, qualifications, or compensation. Rules are not effective prior to their being filed for public inspection in the commissioner's office.

(b) Conduct investigations to determine whether any person has violated any provision of this code.

(c) Conduct examinations, investigations, hearings, in addition to those specifically provided for, useful and proper for the efficient administration of any provision of this code.

(4) When the governor proclaims a state of emergency under RCW 43.06.010(12), the commissioner may issue an order that addresses any or all of the following matters related to insurance policies issued in this state:

(a) Reporting requirements for claims;

(b) Grace periods for payment of insurance premiums and performance of other duties by insureds;

(c) Temporary postponement of cancellations and nonrenewals; and

(d) Medical coverage to ensure access to care.

(5) An order by the commissioner under subsection (4) of this section may remain effective for not more than sixty days unless the commissioner extends the termination date for the order for an additional period of not more than thirty days. The commissioner may extend the order if, in the commissioner's judgment, the circumstances warrant an extension. An order of the commissioner under subsection (4) of this section is not effective after the related state of emergency is terminated by proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.210. The order must specify, by line of insurance:

(a) The geographic areas in which the order applies, which must be within but may be less extensive than the geographic area specified in the governor's proclamation of a state of emergency and must be specific according to an appropriate means of delineation, such as the United States postal service zip codes or other appropriate means; and

(b) The date on which the order becomes effective and the date on which the order terminates.

(6) The commissioner may adopt rules that establish general criteria for orders issued under subsection (4) of this section and may adopt emergency rules applicable to a specific proclamation of a state of emergency by the governor.

(7) The rule-making authority set forth in subsection (6) of this section does not limit or affect the rule-making authority otherwise granted to the commissioner by law. However, beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 73. RCW 43.33A.110 and 1994 c 154 s 310 are each amended to read as follows:

The state investment board may make appropriate rules and regulations for the performance of its duties. The board shall establish investment policies and procedures designed exclusively to maximize return at a prudent level of risk. However, in the case of the department of labor and industries' accident, medical aid, and reserve funds, the board shall establish investment policies and procedures designed to attempt to limit fluctuations in industrial insurance premiums and, subject to this purpose, to maximize return at a prudent level of risk. The board shall adopt rules to ensure that its members perform their functions in compliance with chapter 42.52 RCW. Rules adopted by the board shall be adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 74. RCW 49.17.040 and 1973 c 80 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall make, adopt, modify, and repeal rules and regulations governing safety and health standards for conditions of employment as authorized by this chapter after a public hearing in conformance with the administrative procedure act and the provisions of this chapter. At least thirty days prior to such public hearing, the director shall cause public notice of such hearing to be made in newspapers of general circulation in this state, of the date, time, and place of such public hearing, along with a general description of the subject matter of the proposed rules and information as to where copies of any rules and regulations proposed for adoption may be obtained and with a solicitation for recommendations in writing or suggestions for inclusion or changes in such rules to be submitted not later than five days prior to such public hearing. Any preexisting rules adopted by the department of labor and industries relating to health and safety standards in workplaces subject to the jurisdiction of the department shall remain effective insofar as such rules are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 75. RCW 51.04.020 and 2000 c 5 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall:

(1) Establish and adopt rules governing the administration of this title. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(2) Ascertain and establish the amounts to be paid into and out of the accident fund;

(3) Regulate the proof of accident and extent thereof, the proof of death and the proof of relationship and the extent of dependency;

(4) Supervise the medical, surgical, and hospital treatment to the intent that it may be in all cases efficient and up to the recognized standard of modern surgery;

(5) Issue proper receipts for moneys received and certificates for benefits accrued or accruing;

(6) Investigate the cause of all serious injuries and report to the governor from time to time any violations or laxity in performance of protective statutes or regulations coming under the observation of the department;

(7) Compile statistics which will afford reliable information upon which to base operations of all divisions under the department;

(8) Make an annual report to the governor of the workings of the department;

(9) Be empowered to enter into agreements with the appropriate agencies of other states relating to conflicts of jurisdiction where the contract of employment is in one state and injuries are received in the other state, and insofar as permitted by the Constitution and laws of the United States, to enter into similar agreements with the provinces of Canada; and

(10) Designate a medical director who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

Sec. 76. RCW 68.05.100 and 2009 c 102 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may establish necessary rules for the enforcement of this title and the laws subject to its jurisdiction. The board shall prescribe the application forms and reports provided for in this title. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 77. RCW 67.08.017 and 2012 c 99 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the powers described in RCW 18.235.030 and 18.235.040, the director or the director's designee has the following authority in administering this chapter:

(1) Adopt, amend, and rescind rules ((as deemed necessary)) to carry out this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(2) Adopt standards of professional and amateur conduct or practice;

(3) Enter into an assurance of discontinuance in lieu of issuing a statement of charges or conducting a hearing. The assurance shall consist of a statement of the law in question and an agreement not to violate the stated provision. The applicant or license holder shall not be required to admit to any violation of the law, and the assurance shall not be construed as such an admission. Violation of an assurance under this subsection is grounds for disciplinary action;

(4) Establish and assess fines for violations of this chapter that may be subject to payment from a contestant's purse;

(5) Establish licensing requirements; and

(6) Adopt rules regarding whether or not specific martial arts are mixed martial arts for the purpose of applying licensing provisions.

Sec. 78. RCW 43.350.040 and 2005 c 424 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority has all the general powers necessary to carry out its purposes and duties and to exercise its specific powers. In addition to other powers specified in this chapter, the authority may: (1) Sue and be sued in its own name; (2) make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments, with any public or private person or entity, in accordance with this chapter; (3) employ, contract with, or engage independent counsel, financial advisors, auditors, other technical or professional assistants, and such other personnel as are necessary or desirable to implement this chapter; (4) establish such special funds, and controls on deposits to and disbursements from them, as it finds convenient for the implementation of this chapter; (5) enter into contracts with public and private entities for life sciences research to be conducted in the state; (6) adopt rules, consistent with this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions; (7) delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with the purposes of this chapter; (8) exercise any other power reasonably required to implement the purposes of this chapter; and (9) hire staff and pay administrative costs.

Sec. 79. RCW 66.08.0501 and 1997 c 321 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

The liquor ((control)) and cannabis board may adopt appropriate rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of chapter 321, Laws of 1997. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 80. RCW 67.70.040 and 2006 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall have the power, and it shall be its duty:

(1) To adopt rules governing the establishment and operation of a state lottery ((as it deems necessary and desirable in order that such a lottery be initiated at the earliest feasible and practicable time, and)) in order that such lottery produce the maximum amount of net revenues for the state consonant with the dignity of the state and the general welfare of the people. Such rules shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(a) The type of lottery to be conducted which may include the selling of tickets or shares, but such tickets or shares may not be sold over the internet. The use of electronic or mechanical devices or video terminals which allow for individual play against such devices or terminals shall be prohibited. An affirmative vote of sixty percent of both houses of the legislature is required before offering any game allowing or requiring a player to become eligible for a prize or to otherwise play any portion of the game by interacting with any device or terminal involving digital, video, or other electronic representations of any game of chance, including scratch tickets, pull-tabs, bingo, poker or other cards, dice, roulette, keno, or slot machines. Approval of the legislature shall be required before entering any agreement with other state lotteries to conduct shared games;

(b) The price, or prices, of tickets or shares in the lottery;

(c) The numbers and sizes of the prizes on the winning tickets or shares;

(d) The manner of selecting the winning tickets or shares, except as limited by (a) of this subsection;

(e) The manner and time of payment of prizes to the holder of winning tickets or shares which, at the director's option, may be paid in lump sum amounts or installments over a period of years;

(f) The frequency of the drawings or selections of winning tickets or shares. Approval of the legislature is required before conducting any online game in which the drawing or selection of winning tickets occurs more frequently than once every twenty-four hours;

(g) Without limit as to number, the type or types of locations at which tickets or shares may be sold;

(h) The method to be used in selling tickets or shares, except as limited by (a) of this subsection;

(i) The licensing of agents to sell or distribute tickets or shares, except that a person under the age of eighteen shall not be licensed as an agent;

(j) The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid licensed sales agents necessary to provide for the adequate availability of tickets or shares to prospective buyers and for the convenience of the public;

(k) The apportionment of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares and from all other sources among: (i) The payment of prizes to the holders of winning tickets or shares, which shall not be less than forty-five percent of the gross annual revenue from such lottery, (ii) transfers to the lottery administrative account created by RCW 67.70.260, and (iii) transfer to the state's general fund. Transfers to the state general fund shall be made in compliance with RCW 43.01.050;

(l) Such other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and economical operation and administration of the lottery and for the convenience of the purchasers of tickets or shares and the holders of winning tickets or shares.

(2) To ensure that in each place authorized to sell lottery tickets or shares, on the back of the ticket or share, and in any advertising or promotion there shall be conspicuously displayed an estimate of the probability of purchasing a winning ticket.

(3) To amend, repeal, or supplement any such rules from time to time as it deems necessary or desirable.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

(5) To advise and make recommendations to the director for the operation and administration of the lottery.

Sec. 81. RCW 38.52.050 and 1997 c 49 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor, through the director, shall have general supervision and control of the emergency management functions in the department, and shall be responsible for the carrying out of the provisions of this chapter, and in the event of disaster beyond local control, may assume direct operational control over all or any part of the emergency management functions within this state.

(2) In performing his or her duties under this chapter, the governor is authorized to cooperate with the federal government, with other states, and with private agencies in all matters pertaining to the emergency management of this state and of the nation.

(3) In performing his or her duties under this chapter and to effect its policy and purpose, the governor is further authorized and empowered:

(a) To make, amend, and rescind the necessary orders, rules, and regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter within the limits of the authority conferred upon him (([or her])) or her herein, with due consideration of the plans of the federal government;

(b) On behalf of this state, to enter into mutual aid arrangements with other states and territories, or provinces of the Dominion of Canada and to coordinate mutual aid interlocal agreements between political subdivisions of this state;

(c) To delegate any administrative authority vested in him (([or her])) or her under this chapter, and to provide for the subdelegation of any such authority;

(d) To appoint, with the advice of local authorities, metropolitan or regional area coordinators, or both, when practicable;

(e) To cooperate with the president and the heads of the armed forces, the emergency management agency of the United States, and other appropriate federal officers and agencies, and with the officers and agencies of other states in matters pertaining to the emergency management of the state and nation.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 82. RCW 43.30.215 and 2011 c 355 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall:

(1) Perform duties relating to appraisal, appeal, approval, and hearing functions as provided by law;

(2) Establish policies to ensure that the acquisition, management, and disposition of all lands and resources within the department's jurisdiction are based on sound principles designed to achieve the maximum effective development and use of such lands and resources consistent with laws applicable thereto;

(3) Constitute the board of appraisers provided for in Article 16, section 2 of the state Constitution;

(4) Constitute the commission on harbor lines provided for in Article 15, section 1 of the state Constitution as amended;

(5) Constitute the board on geographic names as provided for in RCW 43.30.291 through 43.30.295; and

(6) Adopt and enforce rules ((as may be deemed necessary and proper)) for carrying out the powers, duties, and functions ((imposed upon it by)) under this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 83. RCW 43.200.070 and 1989 c 322 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ecology ((shall)) may adopt ((such)) rules ((as are necessary)) to carry out responsibilities under this chapter((. The department of ecology is authorized to adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out its responsibilities under)) and chapter 43.145 RCW. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 84. RCW 41.06.133 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 407 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter and with the best standards of personnel administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:

(a) The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an employee;

(b) Training and career development;

(c) Probationary periods of six to twelve months and rejections of probationary employees, depending on the job requirements of the class, except as follows:

(i) Entry-level state park rangers shall serve a probationary period of twelve months; and

(ii) The probationary period of campus police officer appointees who are required to attend the Washington state criminal justice training commission basic law enforcement academy shall extend from the date of appointment until twelve months from the date of successful completion of the basic law enforcement academy, or twelve months from the date of appointment if academy training is not required. The director shall adopt rules to ensure that employees promoting to campus police officer who are required to attend the Washington state criminal justice training commission basic law enforcement academy shall have the trial service period extend from the date of appointment until twelve months from the date of successful completion of the basic law enforcement academy, or twelve months from the date of appointment if academy training is not required;

(d) Transfers;

(e) Promotional preferences;

(f) Sick leaves and vacations;

(g) Hours of work;

(h) Layoffs when necessary and subsequent reemployment, except for the financial basis for layoffs;

(i) The number of names to be certified for vacancies;

(j) Subject to RCW 41.04.820, adoption and revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the prevailing rates in Washington state private industries and other governmental units. The rates in the salary schedules or plans shall be increased if necessary to attain comparable worth under an implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and, for institutions of higher education and related boards, shall be competitive for positions of a similar nature in the state or the locality in which an institution of higher education or related board is located. Such adoption and revision is subject to approval by the director of financial management in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW;

(k) Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay grade based on length of service for all employees whose standards of performance are such as to permit them to retain job status in the classified service. From February 18, 2009, through June 30, 2013, a salary or wage increase shall not be granted to any exempt position under this chapter, except that a salary or wage increase may be granted to employees pursuant to collective bargaining agreements negotiated under chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 47.64, or 41.76 RCW, and except that increases may be granted for positions for which the employer has demonstrated difficulty retaining qualified employees if the following conditions are met:

(i) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources;

(ii) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of client services; and

(iii) For any state agency of the executive branch, not including institutions of higher education, the salary increase is approved by the director of the office of financial management;

Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010, through June 30, 2011, to a position exempt under this chapter shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than July 31, 2011, detailing the positions for which salary increases were granted, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the increases;

Any agency granting a salary increase from July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2013, to a position exempt under this chapter shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 31, 2012, and July 31, 2013, detailing the positions for which salary increases were granted during the preceding fiscal year, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the increases;

(l) Optional lump sum relocation compensation approved by the agency director, whenever it is reasonably necessary that a person make a domiciliary move in accepting a transfer or other employment with the state. An agency must provide lump sum compensation within existing resources. If the person receiving the relocation payment terminates or causes termination with the state, for reasons other than layoff, disability separation, or other good cause as determined by an agency director, within one year of the date of the employment, the state is entitled to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the person;

(m) Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing statutes, with recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and subsequent reemployment for veterans and their surviving spouses by giving such eligible veterans and their surviving spouses additional credit in computing their seniority by adding to their unbroken state service, as defined by the director, the veteran's service in the military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section, "veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active military service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability incurred in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the government and who, upon termination of such service, has received an honorable discharge, a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record, or a release from active military service with evidence of service other than that for which an undesirable, bad conduct, or dishonorable discharge shall be given. However, the surviving spouse of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of this section regardless of the veteran's length of active military service. For the purposes of this section, "veteran" does not include any person who has voluntarily retired with twenty or more years of active military service and whose military retirement pay is in excess of five hundred dollars per month.

(2) Rules adopted under this section by the director shall provide for local administration and management by the institutions of higher education and related boards, subject to periodic audit and review by the director.

(3) Rules adopted by the director under this section may be superseded by the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130. The supersession of such rules shall only affect employees in the respective collective bargaining units.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

(5)(a) The director shall require that each state agency report annually the following data:

(i) The number of classified, Washington management service, and exempt employees in the agency and the change compared to the previous report;

(ii) The number of bonuses and performance-based incentives awarded to agency staff and the base wages of such employees; and

(iii) The cost of each bonus or incentive awarded.

(b) A report that compiles the data in (a) of this subsection for all agencies will be provided annually to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature and must be posted for the public on the office of financial management's agency web site.

(((5) From February 15, 2010, until June 30, 2013, no monetary performance-based awards or incentives may be granted by the director or employers to employees covered by rules adopted under this section. This subsection does not prohibit the payment of awards provided for in chapter 41.60 RCW.

From July 1, 2011, until June 30, 2013, no performance-based awards or incentives may be granted by the director or employers to employees pursuant to a performance management confirmation granted by the department of personnel under WAC 357-37-055.))

Sec. 85. RCW 78.52.050 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 818 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may make such reasonable rules, regulations, and orders as may be necessary from time to time for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter. Unless otherwise required by law or by this chapter or by rules of procedure made under this chapter, the department may make such rules, regulations, and orders, after notice, as the basis therefor. The notice may be given by publication in some newspaper of general circulation in the state in a manner and form which may be prescribed by the department by general rule. The public hearing shall be at the time and in the manner and at the place prescribed by the department, and any person having any interest in the subject matter of the hearing shall be entitled to be heard. In addition, written notice shall be mailed to all interested persons who have requested, in writing, notice of department hearings, rulings, policies, and orders. The department shall establish and maintain a mailing list for this purpose. Substantial compliance with these mailing requirements is deemed compliance with this section. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 86. RCW 79A.05.030 and 2016 c 103 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall:

(1) Have the care, charge, control, and supervision of all parks and parkways acquired or set aside by the state for park or parkway purposes.

(2) Adopt policies, and adopt, issue, and enforce rules pertaining to the use, care, and administration of state parks and parkways. The commission shall cause a copy of the rules to be kept posted in a conspicuous place in every state park to which they are applicable, but failure to post or keep any rule posted shall be no defense to any prosecution for the violation thereof. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

(3) Permit the use of state parks and parkways by the public under such rules as shall be adopted.

(4) Clear, drain, grade, seed, and otherwise improve or beautify parks and parkways, and erect structures, buildings, fireplaces, and comfort stations and build and maintain paths, trails, and roadways through or on parks and parkways.

(5) Grant concessions or leases in state parks and parkways upon such rentals, fees, or percentage of income or profits and for such terms, in no event longer than fifty years, except for a lease associated with land or property described in RCW 79A.05.025(2)(b) which may not exceed sixty-two years, and upon such conditions as shall be approved by the commission.

(a) Leases exceeding a twenty-year term, or the amendment or modification of these leases, shall require a vote consistent with RCW 79A.05.025(2).

(b) If, during the term of any concession or lease, it is the opinion of the commission that it would be in the best interest of the state, the commission may, with the consent of the concessionaire or lessee, alter and amend the terms and conditions of such concession or lease.

(c) Television station leases shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 79A.05.085.

(d) The rates of concessions or leases shall be renegotiated at five-year intervals. No concession shall be granted which will prevent the public from having free access to the scenic attractions of any park or parkway.

(6) Employ such assistance as it deems necessary. Commission expenses relating to its use of volunteer assistance shall be limited to premiums or assessments for the insurance of volunteers by the department of labor and industries, compensation of staff who assist volunteers, materials and equipment used in authorized volunteer projects, training, reimbursement of volunteer travel as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and other reasonable expenses relating to volunteer recognition. The commission, at its discretion, may waive commission fees otherwise applicable to volunteers. The commission shall not use volunteers to replace or supplant classified positions. The use of volunteers may not lead to the elimination of any employees or permanent positions in the bargaining unit.

(7) By majority vote of its authorized membership, select and purchase or obtain options upon, lease, or otherwise acquire for and in the name of the state such tracts of land, including shore and tide lands, for park and parkway purposes as it deems proper. If the commission cannot acquire any tract at a price it deems reasonable, it may, by majority vote of its authorized membership, obtain title thereto, or any part thereof, by condemnation proceedings conducted by the attorney general as provided for the condemnation of rights-of-way for state highways. Option agreements executed under authority of this subsection shall be valid only if:

(a) The cost of the option agreement does not exceed one dollar; and

(b) Moneys used for the purchase of the option agreement are from (i) funds appropriated therefor, or (ii) funds appropriated for undesignated land acquisitions, or (iii) funds deemed by the commission to be in excess of the amount necessary for the purposes for which they were appropriated; and

(c) The maximum amount payable for the property upon exercise of the option does not exceed the appraised value of the property.

(8) Cooperate with the United States, or any county or city of this state, in any matter pertaining to the acquisition, development, redevelopment, renovation, care, control, or supervision of any park or parkway, and enter into contracts in writing to that end. All parks or parkways, to which the state contributed or in whose care, control, or supervision the state participated pursuant to the provisions of this section, shall be governed by the provisions hereof.

(9) Within allowable resources, maintain policies that increase the number of people who have access to free or low-cost recreational opportunities for physical activity, including noncompetitive physical activity.

(10) Adopt rules establishing the requirements for a criminal history record information search for the following: Job applicants, volunteers, and independent contractors who have unsupervised access to children or vulnerable adults, or who will be responsible for collecting or disbursing cash or processing credit/debit card transactions. These background checks will be done through the Washington state patrol criminal identification section and may include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which shall be through the submission of fingerprints. A permanent employee of the commission, employed as of July 24, 2005, is exempt from the provisions of this subsection.

Sec. 87. RCW 79A.05.070 and 2012 c 261 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission may:

(1) Make rules and regulations for the proper administration of its duties. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(2) Accept any grants of funds made with or without a matching requirement by the United States, or any agency thereof, for purposes in keeping with the purposes of this chapter; accept gifts, bequests, devises and endowments for purposes in keeping with such purposes; enter into cooperative agreements with and provide for private nonprofit groups to use state park property and facilities to raise money to contribute gifts, grants, and support to the commission for the purposes of this chapter. The commission may assist the nonprofit group in a cooperative effort by providing necessary agency personnel and services, if available. However, none of the moneys raised may inure to the benefit of the nonprofit group, except in furtherance of its purposes to benefit the commission as provided in this chapter. The agency and the private nonprofit group must agree on the nature of any project to be supported by such gift or grant prior to the use of any agency property or facilities for raising money. Any such gifts may be in the form of recreational facilities developed or built in part or in whole for public use on agency property, provided that the facility is consistent with the purposes of the agency;

(3) Require certification by the commission of all parks and recreation workers employed in state aided or state controlled programs;

(4) Act jointly, when advisable, with the United States, any other state agencies, institutions, departments, boards, or commissions in order to carry out the objectives and responsibilities of this chapter;

(5) Grant franchises and easements for any legitimate purpose on parks or parkways, for such terms and subject to such conditions and considerations as the commission shall specify;

(6) Charge fees for services, utilities, and use of facilities as the commission shall deem proper. The commission may utilize unstaffed collection stations to collect any fees or distribute any permits necessary for access to state parks, including discover passes and day-use permits as those terms are defined in RCW 79A.80.010;

(7) Enter into agreements whereby individuals or companies may rent undeveloped parks or parkway land for grazing, agricultural, or mineral development purposes upon such terms and conditions as the commission shall deem proper, for a term not to exceed forty years;

(8) Determine the qualifications of and employ a director of parks and recreation who must receive a salary as fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040 and determine the qualifications and salary of and employ such other persons as may be needed to carry out the provisions hereof; and

(9) Utilize such other powers as in the judgment of a majority of its members are deemed necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. However, the commission does not have power to supervise directly any local park or recreation district, and no funds shall be made available for such purpose.

Sec. 88. RCW 88.16.035 and 2009 c 496 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board of pilotage commissioners shall:

(a) Adopt rules, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary for the enforcement and administration of this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(b)(i) Issue training licenses and pilot licenses to pilot applicants meeting the qualifications provided for in RCW 88.16.090 and such additional qualifications as may be determined by the board;

(ii) Establish a comprehensive training program to assist in the training and evaluation of pilot applicants before final licensing; and

(iii) Establish additional training requirements, including a program of continuing education developed after consultation with pilot organizations, including those located within the state of Washington, as required to maintain a competent pilotage service;

(c) Maintain a register of pilots, records of pilot accidents, and other history pertinent to pilotage;

(d) Determine from time to time the number of pilots necessary to be licensed in each district of the state to optimize the operation of a safe, fully regulated, efficient, and competent pilotage service in each district;

(e) Annually fix the pilotage tariffs for pilotage services provided under this chapter: PROVIDED, That the board may fix extra compensation for extra services to vessels in distress, for awaiting vessels, for all vessels in direct transit to or from a Canadian port where Puget Sound pilotage is required for a portion of the voyage, or for being carried to sea on vessels against the will of the pilot, and for such other services as may be determined by the board: PROVIDED FURTHER, That as an element of the Puget Sound pilotage district tariff, the board may consider pilot retirement plan expenses incurred in the prior year in either pilotage district. However, under no circumstances shall the state be obligated to fund or pay for any portion of retirement payments for pilots or retired pilots;

(f) File annually with the governor and the chairs of the transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives a report which includes, but is not limited to, the following: The number, names, ages, pilot license number, training license number, and years of service as a Washington licensed pilot of any person licensed by the board as a Washington state pilot or trainee; the names, employment, and other information of the members of the board; the total number of pilotage assignments by pilotage district, including information concerning the various types and sizes of vessels and the total annual tonnage; the annual earnings or stipends of individual pilots and trainees before and after deduction for expenses of pilot organizations, including extra compensation as a separate category; the annual expenses of private pilot associations, including personnel employed and capital expenditures; the status of pilotage tariffs, extra compensation, and travel; the retirement contributions paid to pilots and the disposition thereof; the number of groundings, marine occurrences, or other incidents which are reported to or investigated by the board, and which are determined to be accidents, as defined by the board, including the vessel name, location of incident, pilot's or trainee's name, and disposition of the case together with information received before the board acted from all persons concerned, including the United States coast guard; the names, qualifications, time scheduled for examinations, and the district of persons desiring to apply for Washington state pilotage licenses; summaries of dispatch records, quarterly reports from pilots, and the bylaws and operating rules of pilotage organizations; the names, sizes in deadweight tons, surcharges, if any, port of call, name of the pilot or trainee, and names and horsepower of tug boats for any and all oil tankers subject to the provisions of RCW 88.16.190 together with the names of any and all vessels for which the United States coast guard requires special handling pursuant to their authority under the Ports and Waterways Safety Act of 1972; the expenses of the board; and any and all other information which the board deems appropriate to include;

(g) Make available information that includes the pilotage act and other statutes of Washington state and the federal government that affect pilotage, including the rules of the board, together with such additional information as may be informative for pilots, agents, owners, operators, and masters;

(h) Appoint advisory committees and employ marine experts as necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter;

(i) Provide for the maintenance of efficient and competent pilotage service on all waters covered by this chapter; and do such other things as are reasonable, necessary, and expedient to insure proper and safe pilotage upon the waters covered by this chapter and facilitate the efficient administration of this chapter.

(2) The board may pay stipends to pilot trainees under subsection (1)(b) of this section.

Sec. 89. RCW 70.148.040 and 1990 c 64 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The director may adopt rules consistent with this chapter to carry out the purposes of this chapter. All rules shall be adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 90. RCW 41.60.020 and 1999 c 50 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall formulate, establish, and maintain a statewide employee suggestion program and adopt rules to allow for agency unique suggestion programs. Employee suggestion programs are developed to encourage and reward meritorious suggestions by state employees that will promote efficiency and economy in the performance of any function of state government: PROVIDED, That the program shall include provisions for the processing of suggestions having multiagency impact and post-implementation auditing of suggestions for fiscal accountability.

(2) The board shall adopt rules necessary or appropriate for the proper administration and for the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter. These rules shall include the adoption of a payment award schedule that establishes the criteria for determining the amounts of any financial or other awards under this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 91. RCW 28A.410.210 and 2009 c 531 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The purpose of the professional educator standards board is to establish policies and requirements for the preparation and certification of educators that provide standards for competency in professional knowledge and practice in the areas of certification; a foundation of skills, knowledge, and attitudes necessary to help students with diverse needs, abilities, cultural experiences, and learning styles meet or exceed the learning goals outlined in RCW 28A.150.210; knowledge of research-based practice; and professional development throughout a career. The Washington professional educator standards board shall:

(1) Establish policies and practices for the approval of programs of courses, requirements, and other activities leading to educator certification including teacher, school administrator, and educational staff associate certification;

(2) Establish policies and practices for the approval of the character of work required to be performed as a condition of entrance to and graduation from any educator preparation program including teacher, school administrator, and educational staff associate preparation program as provided in subsection (1) of this section;

(3) Establish a list of accredited institutions of higher education of this and other states whose graduates may be awarded educator certificates as teacher, school administrator, and educational staff associate and establish criteria and enter into agreements with other states to acquire reciprocal approval of educator preparation programs and certification, including teacher certification from the national board for professional teaching standards;

(4) Establish policies for approval of nontraditional educator preparation programs;

(5) Conduct a review of educator program approval standards at least every five years, beginning in 2006, to reflect research findings and assure continued improvement of preparation programs for teachers, administrators, and school specialized personnel;

(6) Specify the types and kinds of educator certificates to be issued and conditions for certification in accordance with subsection (1) of this section and RCW 28A.410.010;

(7) Apply for and receive federal or other funds on behalf of the state for purposes related to the duties of the board;

(8) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that are necessary for the ((effective and efficient)) implementation of this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(9) Maintain data concerning educator preparation programs and their quality, educator certification, educator employment trends and needs, and other data deemed relevant by the board;

(10) Serve as an advisory body to the superintendent of public instruction on issues related to educator recruitment, hiring, mentoring and support, professional growth, retention, educator evaluation including but not limited to peer evaluation, and revocation and suspension of licensure;

(11) Submit, by October 15th of each even-numbered year, a joint report with the state board of education to the legislative education committees, the governor, and the superintendent of public instruction. The report shall address the progress the boards have made and the obstacles they have encountered, individually and collectively, in the work of achieving the goals set out in RCW 28A.150.210;

(12) Establish the prospective teacher assessment system for basic skills and subject knowledge that shall be required to obtain residency certification pursuant to RCW 28A.410.220 through 28A.410.240;

(13) By January 2010, set performance standards and develop, pilot, and implement a uniform and externally administered professional-level certification assessment based on demonstrated teaching skill. In the development of this assessment, consideration shall be given to changes in professional certification program components such as the culminating seminar; and

(14) Conduct meetings under the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 92. RCW 42.17A.110 and 2015 c 225 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission may:

(1) Adopt, amend, and rescind suitable administrative rules to carry out the policies and purposes of this chapter, which rules shall be adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. Any rule relating to campaign finance, political advertising, or related forms that would otherwise take effect after June 30th of a general election year shall take effect no earlier than the day following the general election in that year. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(2) Appoint an executive director and set, within the limits established by the office of financial management under RCW 43.03.028, the executive director's compensation. The executive director shall perform such duties and have such powers as the commission may prescribe and delegate to implement and enforce this chapter efficiently and effectively. The commission shall not delegate its authority to adopt, amend, or rescind rules nor may it delegate authority to determine whether an actual violation of this chapter has occurred or to assess penalties for such violations;

(3) Prepare and publish reports and technical studies as in its judgment will tend to promote the purposes of this chapter, including reports and statistics concerning campaign financing, lobbying, financial interests of elected officials, and enforcement of this chapter;

(4) Conduct, as it deems appropriate, audits and field investigations;

(5) Make public the time and date of any formal hearing set to determine whether a violation has occurred, the question or questions to be considered, and the results thereof;

(6) Administer oaths and affirmations, issue subpoenas, and compel attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any records relevant to any investigation authorized under this chapter, or any other proceeding under this chapter;

(7) Adopt a code of fair campaign practices;

(8) Adopt rules relieving candidates or political committees of obligations to comply with the election campaign provisions of this chapter, if they have not received contributions nor made expenditures in connection with any election campaign of more than five thousand dollars;

(9) Adopt rules prescribing reasonable requirements for keeping accounts of, and reporting on a quarterly basis, costs incurred by state agencies, counties, cities, and other municipalities and political subdivisions in preparing, publishing, and distributing legislative information. For the purposes of this subsection, "legislative information" means books, pamphlets, reports, and other materials prepared, published, or distributed at substantial cost, a substantial purpose of which is to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation. The state auditor in his or her regular examination of each agency under chapter 43.09 RCW shall review the rules, accounts, and reports and make appropriate findings, comments, and recommendations concerning those agencies; and

(10) Develop and provide to filers a system for certification of reports required under this chapter which are transmitted by facsimile or electronically to the commission. Implementation of the program is contingent on the availability of funds.

Sec. 93. RCW 41.05.055 and 2009 c 537 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The public employees' benefits board is created within the authority. The function of the board is to design and approve insurance benefit plans for employees and to establish eligibility criteria for participation in insurance benefit plans.

(2) The board shall be composed of nine members appointed by the governor as follows:

(a) Two representatives of state employees, one of whom shall represent an employee union certified as exclusive representative of at least one bargaining unit of classified employees, and one of whom is retired, is covered by a program under the jurisdiction of the board, and represents an organized group of retired public employees;

(b) Two representatives of school district employees, one of whom shall represent an association of school employees and one of whom is retired, and represents an organized group of retired school employees;

(c) Four members with experience in health benefit management and cost containment; and

(d) The administrator.

(3) The member who represents an association of school employees and one member appointed pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section shall be nonvoting members until such time that there are no less than twelve thousand school district employee subscribers enrolled with the authority for health care coverage.

(4) The governor shall appoint the initial members of the board to staggered terms not to exceed four years. Members appointed thereafter shall serve two-year terms. Members of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses while on official business in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board ((shall)) may prescribe rules for the conduct of its business. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions. The administrator shall serve as chair of the board. Meetings of the board shall be at the call of the chair.

Sec. 94. RCW 41.58.050 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall have authority from time to time to make, amend, and rescind, in the manner prescribed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, ((such)) rules and regulations ((as may be)) necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 95. RCW 41.56.090 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission ((shall)) may promulgate, revise, or rescind ((such)) rules and regulations ((as it may deem necessary or appropriate)) to administer the provisions of this chapter ((in conformity with the intent and purpose of this chapter and)), consistent with the best standards of labor-management relations. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 96. RCW 28A.150.290 and 1992 c 141 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall have the power and duty to make such rules and regulations as are necessary for the proper administration of this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.220, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010 not inconsistent with the provisions thereof, and in addition to require such reports as may be necessary to carry out his or her duties under this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.220, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall have the authority to make rules and regulations which establish the terms and conditions for allowing school districts to receive state basic education moneys as provided in RCW 28A.150.250 when said districts are unable to fulfill for one or more schools as officially scheduled the requirement of a full school year of one hundred eighty days or the annual average total instructional hour offering imposed by RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.260 due to one or more of the following conditions:

(a) An unforeseen natural event, including, but not necessarily limited to, a fire, flood, explosion, storm, earthquake, epidemic, or volcanic eruption that has the direct or indirect effect of rendering one or more school district facilities unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible, or inoperable; and

(b) An unforeseen mechanical failure or an unforeseen action or inaction by one or more persons, including negligence and threats, that (i) is beyond the control of both a school district board of directors and its employees and (ii) has the direct or indirect effect of rendering one or more school district facilities unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible, or inoperable. Such actions, inactions or mechanical failures may include, but are not necessarily limited to, arson, vandalism, riots, insurrections, bomb threats, bombings, delays in the scheduled completion of construction projects, and the discontinuance or disruption of utilities such as heating, lighting and water: PROVIDED, That an unforeseen action or inaction shall not include any labor dispute between a school district board of directors and any employee of the school district.

A condition is foreseeable for the purposes of this subsection to the extent a reasonably prudent person would have anticipated prior to August first of the preceding school year that the condition probably would occur during the ensuing school year because of the occurrence of an event or a circumstance which existed during such preceding school year or a prior school year. A board of directors of a school district is deemed for the purposes of this subsection to have knowledge of events and circumstances which are a matter of common knowledge within the school district and of those events and circumstances which can be discovered upon prudent inquiry or inspection.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall make every effort to reduce the amount of paperwork required in administration of this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.220, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010; to simplify the application, monitoring and evaluation processes used; to eliminate all duplicative requests for information from local school districts; and to make every effort to integrate and standardize information requests for other state education acts and federal aid to education acts administered by the superintendent of public instruction so as to reduce paperwork requirements and duplicative information requests.

Sec. 97. RCW 90.71.230 and 2007 c 341 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The leadership council shall have the power and duty to:

(a) Provide leadership and have responsibility for the functions of the partnership, including adopting, revising, and guiding the implementation of the action agenda, allocating funds for Puget Sound recovery, providing progress and other reports, setting strategic priorities and benchmarks, adopting and applying accountability measures, and making appointments to the board and panel;

(b) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(c) Create subcommittees and advisory committees as appropriate to assist the council;

(d) Enter into, amend, and terminate contracts with individuals, corporations, or research institutions to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

(e) Make grants to governmental and nongovernmental entities to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

(f) Receive such gifts, grants, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the partnership to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

(g) Promote extensive public awareness, education, and participation in Puget Sound protection and recovery;

(h) Work collaboratively with the Hood Canal coordinating council established in chapter 90.88 RCW on Hood Canal-specific issues;

(i) Maintain complete and consolidated financial information to ensure that all funds received and expended to implement the action agenda have been accounted for; and

(j) Exercise such other powers and duties as are necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(2) The council may delegate functions to the chair and to the executive director, however the council may not delegate its decisional authority regarding developing or amending the action agenda.

(3) The council shall work closely with existing organizations and all levels of government to ensure that the action agenda and its implementation are scientifically sound, efficient, and achieve necessary results to accomplish recovery of Puget Sound to health by 2020.

(4) The council shall support, engage, and foster collaboration among watershed groups to assist in the recovery of Puget Sound.

(5) When working with federally recognized Indian tribes to develop and implement the action agenda, the council shall conform to the procedures and standards required in a government-to-governmental relationship with tribes under the 1989 Centennial Accord between the state of Washington and the sovereign tribal governments in the state of Washington.

(6) Members of the council shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.220 and be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 98. RCW 77.85.120 and 2007 c 241 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The salmon recovery funding board is responsible for making grants and loans for salmon habitat projects and salmon recovery activities from the amounts appropriated to the board for this purpose. To accomplish this purpose the board may:

(a) Provide assistance to grant applicants regarding the procedures and criteria for grant and loan awards;

(b) Make and execute all manner of contracts and agreements with public and private parties as the board deems necessary, consistent with the purposes of this chapter;

(c) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms that are not in conflict with this chapter;

(d) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW ((as)) necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions; and

(e) Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted or implied under this chapter.

(2) The recreation and conservation office shall provide all necessary grants and loans administration assistance to the board, and shall distribute funds as provided by the board in RCW 77.85.130.

Sec. 99. RCW 41.50.050 and 1995 c 239 s 317 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall:

(1) Have the authority to organize the department into not more than four divisions, each headed by an assistant director;

(2) Have free access to all files and records of various funds assigned to the department and inspect and audit the files and records as deemed necessary;

(3) Employ personnel to carry out the general administration of the department;

(4) Submit an annual written report of the activities of the department to the governor and the chairs of the appropriate legislative committees with one copy to the staff of each of the committees, including recommendations for statutory changes the director believes to be desirable;

(5) Adopt ((such)) rules and regulations ((as are necessary)) to carry out the powers, duties, and functions of the department, pursuant to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 100. RCW 82.32.300 and 1997 c 420 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The administration of this and chapters 82.04 through 82.27 RCW of this title is vested in the department of revenue which shall prescribe forms and rules of procedure for the determination of the taxable status of any person, for the making of returns and for the ascertainment, assessment and collection of taxes and penalties imposed thereunder.

(2) The department of revenue shall make and publish rules and regulations, not inconsistent therewith, necessary to enforce provisions of this chapter and chapters 82.02 through 82.23B and 82.27 RCW, and the liquor ((control)) and cannabis board shall make and publish rules necessary to enforce chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW, which shall have the same force and effect as if specifically included therein, unless declared invalid by the judgment of a court of record not appealed from.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

(4) The department may employ such clerks, specialists, and other assistants as are necessary. Salaries and compensation of such employees shall be fixed by the department and shall be charged to the proper appropriation for the department.

(5) The department shall exercise general supervision of the collection of taxes and, in the discharge of such duty, may institute and prosecute such suits or proceedings in the courts as may be necessary and proper.

Sec. 101. RCW 82.01.060 and 2011 c 298 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of revenue, hereinafter in chapter 26, Laws of 1967 ex. sess. referred to as the director, through the department of revenue, hereinafter in chapter 26, Laws of 1967 ex. sess. referred to as the department, must:

(1) Assess and collect all taxes and administer all programs relating to taxes which are the responsibility of the tax commission at the time chapter 26, Laws of 1967 ex. sess. takes effect or which the legislature may hereafter make the responsibility of the director or of the department;

(2) Make, adopt, and publish ((such)) rules ((as he or she may deem necessary or desirable)) to carry out the powers and duties imposed upon him or her or the department by the legislature. However, the director may not adopt rules after July 23, 1995, that are based solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose, on the enabling provisions of the statute establishing the agency, or on any combination of such provisions, for statutory authority to adopt any rule. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(3) Rules adopted by the tax commission before July 23, 1995, remain in force until such time as they may be revised or rescinded by the director;

(4) Provide by general regulations for an adequate system of departmental review of the actions of the department or of its officers and employees in the assessment or collection of taxes;

(5) Maintain a tax research section with sufficient technical, clerical and other employees to conduct constant observation and investigation of the effectiveness and adequacy of the revenue laws of this state and of the sister states in order to assist the governor, the legislature and the director in estimation of revenue, analysis of tax measures, and determination of the administrative feasibility of proposed tax legislation and allied problems;

(6) Recommend to the governor such amendments, changes in, and modifications of the revenue laws as seem proper and requisite to remedy injustice and irregularities in taxation, and to facilitate the assessment and collection of taxes in the most economical manner;

(7) Provide the opportunity for any person feeling aggrieved by any action taken against the person by the department in the administration of chapters 19.02, 19.80, and 59.30 RCW to request a review of the department's action. Such review may be conducted as a brief adjudicative proceeding under RCW 34.05.485 through 34.05.494.

Sec. 102. RCW 84.08.070 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 151 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of revenue ((shall)) may make ((such)) rules and regulations ((as may be necessary)) to carry out the powers granted by this chapter, and for conducting hearings and other proceedings before it. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 103. RCW 29A.04.611 and 2011 c 10 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state as chief election officer shall make reasonable rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW not inconsistent with the federal and state election laws to effectuate any provision of this title and to facilitate the execution of its provisions in an orderly, timely, and uniform manner relating to any federal, state, county, city, town, and district elections. To that end the secretary shall assist local election officers by devising uniform forms and procedures. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

In addition to the rule-making authority granted otherwise by this section, the secretary of state shall make rules governing the following provisions:

(1) The maintenance of voter registration records;

(2) The preparation, maintenance, distribution, review, and filing of precinct maps;

(3) Standards for the design, layout, and production of ballots;

(4) The examination and testing of voting systems for certification;

(5) The source and scope of independent evaluations of voting systems that may be relied upon in certifying voting systems for use in this state;

(6) Standards and procedures for the acceptance testing of voting systems by counties;

(7) Standards and procedures for testing the programming of vote tallying software for specific primaries and elections;

(8) Standards and procedures for the preparation and use of each type of certified voting system including procedures for the operation of counting centers where vote tallying systems are used;

(9) Standards and procedures to ensure the accurate tabulation and canvassing of ballots;

(10) Consistency among the counties of the state in the preparation of ballots, the operation of vote tallying systems, and the canvassing of primaries and elections;

(11) Procedures to ensure the secrecy of a voter's ballot when a small number of ballots are counted;

(12) The use of substitute devices or means of voting when a voting device is found to be defective, the counting of votes cast on the defective device, the counting of votes cast on the substitute device, and the documentation that must be submitted to the county auditor regarding such circumstances;

(13) Procedures for the transportation of sealed containers of voted ballots or sealed voting devices;

(14) The acceptance and filing of documents via electronic transmission;

(15) Voter registration applications and records;

(16) The use of voter registration information in the conduct of elections;

(17) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter registration records accepted by driver licensing agents or the department of licensing;

(18) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter registration records accepted by agencies designated by the governor to provide voter registration services;

(19) Procedures to receive and distribute voter registration applications by mail;

(20) Procedures for a voter to change his or her voter registration address within a county by telephone;

(21) Procedures for a voter to change the name under which he or she is registered to vote;

(22) Procedures for canceling dual voter registration records and for maintaining records of persons whose voter registrations have been canceled;

(23) Procedures for the electronic transfer of voter registration records between county auditors and the office of the secretary of state;

(24) Procedures and forms for declarations of candidacy;

(25) Procedures and requirements for the acceptance and filing of declarations of candidacy by electronic means;

(26) Procedures for the circumstance in which two or more candidates have a name similar in sound or spelling so as to cause confusion for the voter;

(27) Filing for office;

(28) The order of positions and offices on a ballot;

(29) Sample ballots;

(30) Independent evaluations of voting systems;

(31) The testing, approval, and certification of voting systems;

(32) The testing of vote tallying software programming;

(33) Standards and procedures to prevent fraud and to facilitate the accurate processing and canvassing of ballots, including standards for the approval and implementation of hardware and software for automated signature verification systems;

(34) Standards and procedures to guarantee the secrecy of ballots;

(35) Uniformity among the counties of the state in the conduct of elections;

(36) Standards and procedures to accommodate overseas voters and service voters;

(37) The tabulation of paper ballots;

(38) The accessibility of voting centers;

(39) The aggregation of precinct results if reporting the results of a single precinct could jeopardize the secrecy of a person's ballot;

(40) Procedures for conducting a statutory recount;

(41) Procedures for filling vacancies in congressional offices if the general statutory time requirements for availability of ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures cannot be met;

(42) Procedures for the statistical sampling of signatures for purposes of verifying and canvassing signatures on initiative, referendum, and recall election petitions;

(43) Standards and deadlines for submitting material to the office of the secretary of state for the voters' pamphlet;

(44) Deadlines for the filing of ballot titles for referendum bills and constitutional amendments if none have been provided by the legislature;

(45) Procedures for the publication of a state voters' pamphlet;

(46) Procedures for conducting special elections regarding nuclear waste sites if the general statutory time requirements for availability of ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures cannot be met;

(47) Procedures for conducting partisan primary elections;

(48) Standards and procedures for the proper conduct of voting on accessible voting devices;

(49) Standards for voting technology and systems used by the state or any political subdivision to be accessible for individuals with disabilities, including nonvisual accessibility for the blind and visually impaired, in a manner that provides the same opportunity for access and participation, including privacy and independence, as other voters;

(50) All data formats for transferring voter registration data on electronic or machine-readable media for the purpose of administering the statewide voter registration list required by the Help America Vote Act (P.L. 107-252);

(51) Defining the interaction of electronic voter registration election management systems employed by each county auditor to maintain a local copy of each county's portion of the official state list of registered voters;

(52) Provisions and procedures to implement the state-based administrative complaint procedure as required by the Help America Vote Act (P.L. 107-252);

(53) Facilitating the payment of local government grants to local government election officers or vendors; and

(54) Standards for the verification of signatures on ballot declarations.

Sec. 104. RCW 74.18.060 and 2003 c 409 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall:

(1) Serve as the sole agency of the state for contracting for and disbursing all federal and state funds appropriated for programs established by and within the jurisdiction of this chapter, and make reports and render accounting as may be required;

(2) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(3) Negotiate agreements with other state agencies to provide services so that individuals of any age who are blind or are both blind and otherwise disabled receive the most beneficial services.

Sec. 105. RCW 74.08.090 and 1969 ex.s. c 173 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is hereby authorized to make rules and regulations ((not inconsistent with)) to implement the provisions of this title to the end that this title shall be administered uniformly throughout the state, and that the spirit and purpose of this title may be complied with. The department shall have the power to compel compliance with the rules and regulations established by it. Such rules and regulations shall be filed in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, as it is now or hereafter amended, and copies shall be available for public inspection in the office of the department and in each county office. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 106. RCW 71A.12.030 and 1988 c 176 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary is authorized to provide, or arrange with others to provide, all services and facilities that are necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this title, and to take all actions that are necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this title. The secretary ((shall)) may adopt rules under the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, ((as are appropriate)) to carry out this title. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 107. RCW 39.58.040 and 2009 c 9 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall have the power and broad administrative discretion:

(((1))) (a) To make and enforce regulations necessary and proper to the full and complete performance of its functions under this chapter;

(((2))) (b) To require any public depositary to furnish such information dealing with public deposits and the exact status of its capitalization, collateral, liquidity, and net worth as the commission shall request;

(((3))) (c) To take such action as it deems best for the protection, collection, compromise or settlement of any claim arising in case of loss;

(((4))) (d) To fix by rule or resolution, consistent with this chapter, the requirements for initial and continued qualification of financial institutions as public depositaries on the basis of a depositary's financial condition, including its capitalization, collateral, liquidity, and net worth, and fixing other terms and conditions consistent with this chapter, under which public deposits may be received and held;

(((5))) (e) To make and enforce rules setting forth criteria for the establishment by policy of standards governing matters that are subject to the commission's powers to fix requirements, terms, and conditions under (d) of this subsection (((4) of this section)) for a public depositary, and, if these standards are not met, providing for additional collateral or other conditional or unconditional requirements or restrictions applicable to the public depositary's right to receive or hold public deposits;

(((6))) (f) To require additional or different types and amounts of collateral, or to restrict a public depositary's right to receive or hold public deposits if the standards for the financial condition of public depositaries are not met;

(((7))) (g) To fix the official date on which any loss shall be deemed to have occurred taking into consideration the orders, rules, and regulations of the supervisory authority of a public depositary's primary regulatory authority and federal deposit insurer as they affect the failure or inability of a public depositary to repay public deposits in full;

(((8))) (h) In case loss occurs in more than one public depositary, to determine the allocation and time of payment of any sums due to public depositors under this chapter; and

(((9))) (i) To make and enforce sanctions against a public depositary for noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter and rules or policies of the commission.

(2) The commission may adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the commission.

Sec. 108. RCW 43.340.030 and 2002 c 365 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority has all the general powers necessary to carry out its purposes and duties and to exercise its specific powers. In addition to other powers specified in this chapter, the authority may:

(a) Sue and be sued in its own name;

(b) Make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments, with any public or private person, in accordance with this chapter;

(c) Employ, contract with, or engage independent counsel, bond counsel, other attorneys, financial advisors, investment bankers, auditors, other technical or professional assistants, and such other personnel as are necessary and recommended by the state housing finance commission staff;

(d) Invest or deposit moneys of the authority in any manner determined by the authority and enter into hedge agreements, swap agreements, or other financial products, including payment agreements defined under RCW 39.96.020(5). The authority is not a governmental entity for purposes of chapter 39.96 RCW;

(e) Establish such special funds, and controls on deposits to and disbursements from them, as it finds convenient for the implementation of this chapter;

(f) Procure insurance, other credit enhancements, and other financing arrangements for its bonds to fulfill its purposes under this chapter, including but not limited to municipal bond insurance and letters of credit;

(g) Accept appropriations, gifts, grants, loans, or other aid from public or private entities;

(h) Adopt rules, consistent with this chapter((, as the board determines necessary)). Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(i) Delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with the purposes of this chapter; and

(j) Exercise any other power reasonably required to implement the purposes of this chapter.

(2) The authority does not have the power of eminent domain and does not have the power to levy taxes of any kind.

Sec. 109. RCW 43.59.070 and 1967 ex.s. c 147 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall be secretary of the commission and shall be responsible for carrying into effect the commission's orders and rules and regulations promulgated by the commission. The director shall also be authorized to employ such staff as is necessary pursuant to the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW. The commission shall adopt such rules and regulations as shall be necessary to carry into effect the purposes of this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 110. RCW 47.01.071 and 2016 c 35 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The transportation commission shall have the following functions, powers, and duties:

(1) To propose policies to be adopted by the governor and the legislature designed to assure the development and maintenance of a comprehensive and balanced statewide transportation system which will meet the needs of the people of this state for safe and efficient transportation services. Wherever appropriate, the policies shall provide for the use of integrated, intermodal transportation systems. The policies must be aligned with the goals established in RCW 47.04.280. To this end the commission shall:

(a) Develop transportation policies which are based on the policies, goals, and objectives expressed and inherent in existing state laws;

(b) Inventory the adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the local and area-wide governmental bodies of the state and define the role of the state, regional, and local governments in determining transportation policies, in transportation planning, and in implementing the state transportation plan;

(c) Establish a procedure for review and revision of the state transportation policy and for submission of proposed changes to the governor and the legislature; and

(d) Integrate the statewide transportation plan with the needs of the elderly and persons with disabilities, and coordinate federal and state programs directed at assisting local governments to answer such needs;

(2) To provide for the effective coordination of state transportation planning with national transportation policy, state and local land use policies, and local and regional transportation plans and programs;

(3) In conjunction with the provisions under RCW 47.01.075, to provide for public involvement in transportation designed to elicit the public's views both with respect to adequate transportation services and appropriate means of minimizing adverse social, economic, environmental, and energy impact of transportation programs;

(4) By December 2010, to prepare a comprehensive and balanced statewide transportation plan consistent with the state's growth management goals and based on the transportation policy goals provided under RCW 47.04.280 and applicable state and federal laws. The plan must reflect the priorities of government developed by the office of financial management and address regional needs, including multimodal transportation planning. The plan must, at a minimum: (a) Establish a vision for the development of the statewide transportation system; (b) identify significant statewide transportation policy issues; and (c) recommend statewide transportation policies and strategies to the legislature to fulfill the requirements of subsection (1) of this section. The plan must be the product of an ongoing process that involves representatives of significant transportation interests and the general public from across the state. Every four years, the plan shall be reviewed and revised, and submitted to the governor and the house of representatives and senate standing committees on transportation.

The plan shall take into account federal law and regulations relating to the planning, construction, and operation of transportation facilities;

(5) To propose to the governor and the legislature prior to the convening of each regular session held in an odd-numbered year a recommended budget for the operations of the commission as required by RCW 47.01.061;

(6) To adopt ((such)) rules ((as may be)) necessary to carry out reasonably and properly those functions expressly vested in the commission by statute. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(7) To contract with the office of financial management or other appropriate state agencies for administrative support, accounting services, computer services, and other support services necessary to carry out its other statutory duties;

(8) To conduct transportation-related studies and policy analysis to the extent directed by the legislature or governor in the biennial transportation budget act, or as otherwise provided in law, and subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose; and

(9) To exercise such other specific powers and duties as may be vested in the transportation commission by this or any other provision of law.

Sec. 111. RCW 47.26.160 and 1995 c 269 s 2607 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The transportation improvement board shall:

(((1))) (a) Adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of chapter 47.66 RCW and this chapter relating to the allocation of funds;

(((2))) (b) Adopt reasonably uniform design standards for city and county arterials.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 112. RCW 47.01.101 and 2006 c 334 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall have the authority and it shall be his or her duty:

(1) To serve as chief executive officer of the department with full administrative authority to direct all its activities;

(2) To organize the department as he or she may deem necessary to carry out the work and responsibilities of the department effectively;

(3) To designate and establish such transportation district, region, or branch offices as may be necessary or convenient, and to appoint assistants and delegate any powers, duties, and functions to them or any officer or employee of the department as deemed necessary to administer the department efficiently;

(4) To direct and coordinate the programs of the various divisions of the department to assure that they achieve the greatest possible mutual benefit, produce a balanced overall effort, and eliminate unnecessary duplication of activity;

(5) To adopt all department rules that are subject to the adoption procedures contained in the state administrative procedure act, except rules subject to adoption by the commission pursuant to statute. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(6) To maintain and safeguard the official records of the department, including the commission's recorded resolutions and orders;

(7) To provide, under contract or interagency agreement, staff support to the commission, including long-term technical and administrative support as needed, to assist it in carrying out its functions, powers, and duties;

(8) To execute and implement the biennial operating budget for the operation of the department in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW and with legislative appropriation;

(9) To advise the governor and the legislature with respect to matters under the jurisdiction of the department; and

(10) To exercise all other powers and perform all other duties as are now or hereafter provided by law.

Sec. 113. RCW 80.01.040 and 2007 c 234 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The utilities and transportation commission shall:

(1) Exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed by this title and by Title 81 RCW, or by any other law.

(2) Regulate in the public interest, as provided by the public service laws, all persons engaging in the transportation of persons or property within this state for compensation.

(3) Regulate in the public interest, as provided by the public service laws, the rates, services, facilities, and practices of all persons engaging within this state in the business of supplying any utility service or commodity to the public for compensation.

(4) Make rules and regulations necessary to carry out its other powers and duties. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 114. RCW 43.60A.070 and 1989 c 175 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to other powers and duties, the director is authorized:

(1) To cooperate with officers and agencies of the United States in all matters affecting veterans affairs;

(2) To accept grants, donations, and gifts on behalf of this state for veterans affairs from any person, corporation, government, or governmental agency, made for the benefit of a former member of the armed forces of this or any other country;

(3) To be custodian of all the records and files of the selective service system in Washington that may be turned over to this state by the United States or any department, bureau, or agency thereof; and to adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary for the preservation of such records and the proper use thereof in keeping with their confidential nature;

(4) To act without bond as conservator of the estate of a beneficiary of the veterans administration when the director determines no other suitable person will so act;

(5) To extend on behalf of the state of Washington such assistance as the director shall determine to be reasonably required to any veteran and to the dependents of any such veteran;

(6) To adopt rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW((, the Administrative Procedure Act, with respect to all matters of administration to carry into effect the purposes of this section)). Such proposed rules shall be submitted by the department at the time of filing notice with the code reviser as required by RCW 34.05.320 to the respective legislative committees of the senate and of the house of representatives dealing with the subject of veteran affairs legislation through the offices of the secretary of the senate and chief clerk of the house of representatives. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions.

Sec. 115. RCW 41.24.290 and 1999 c 148 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The state board shall:

(1) Generally supervise and control the administration of this chapter;

(2) Promulgate, amend, or repeal rules and regulations ((not inconsistent with)) to implement this chapter ((for the purpose of effecting a uniform and efficient manner of carrying out the provisions of this chapter and the purposes to be accomplished thereby,)) and for the government of boards of trustees of the municipalities of this state in the discharge of their functions under this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(3) Review any action, and hear and determine any appeal which may be taken from the decision of the board of trustees of any municipality made pursuant to this chapter;

(4) Take such action as may be necessary to secure compliance of the municipalities governed by this chapter and to provide for the collection of all fees and penalties which are, or may be, due and delinquent from any such municipality;

(5) Review the action of the board of trustees of any municipality authorizing any pension as provided by this chapter; and authorize the regular issuance of monthly warrants in payment thereof without further action of the board of trustees of such municipality;

(6) Require periodic reports from the recipient of any benefits under this chapter for the purpose of determining their continued eligibility therefor;

(7) Maintain such records as may be necessary and proper for the proper maintenance and operation of the principal fund, including records of the names of every person enrolled under this chapter, and provide all necessary forms to enable local boards of trustees to effectively carry out their duties as provided by this chapter;

(8) Compel the taking of testimony from witnesses under oath before the state board, or any member or the secretary thereof, or before the local board of trustees or any member thereof, for the purpose of obtaining evidence, at any time, in connection with any claim or pension pending or authorized for payment. For such purpose the state board shall have the same power of subpoena as prescribed in RCW 51.52.100. Failure of any claimant to appear and give any testimony as herein provided shall suspend any rights or eligibility to receive payments for the period of such failure to appear and testify;

(9) Appoint a secretary to hold office at the pleasure of the state board, fix the secretary's compensation at such sum as it shall deem appropriate, and prescribe the secretary's duties not otherwise provided by this chapter.

Sec. 116. RCW 28C.10.040 and 2012 c 229 s 577 are each amended to read as follows:

The agency:

(1) Shall maintain a list of private vocational schools licensed under this chapter;

(2) ((Shall)) May adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW to carry out this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2018, rules adopted under this chapter must be derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent, purpose, or general enabling provisions;

(3) May investigate any entity the agency reasonably believes to be subject to the jurisdiction of this chapter. In connection with the investigation, the agency may administer oaths and affirmations, issue subpoenas and compel attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memorandums, or other records which the agency deems relevant or material to the investigation. The agency, including its staff and any other authorized persons, may conduct site inspections and examine records of all schools subject to this chapter;

(4) Shall develop an interagency agreement with the student achievement council to regulate degree-granting private vocational schools with respect to degree and nondegree programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---