BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.119A RCW to read as follows:

(1) A purveyor may not intentionally fluoridate water supplied by a public water system to a level that exceeds 0.7 milligrams of fluoride per liter of water. Activities that constitute intentional fluoridation by a purveyor include, but are not limited to, the addition to a public water system of fluorosilicic acid or hydrofluorosilicate, sodium fluorosilicate, or sodium fluoride.

(2) A purveyor that intentionally fluoridates water supplied by a public water system must monitor fluoride concentrations to ensure that samples or measurements do not exceed 0.7 milligrams per liter. A purveyor must take appropriate action to reduce fluoride concentrations in the event that a sample or measurement exceeds 0.7 milligrams of fluoride per liter.

(3) Nothing in this section requires a purveyor to treat or remove fluoride from water that has naturally occurring concentrations of fluoride that exceed 0.7 milligrams of fluoride per liter of water.

--- END ---