BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 72.09.111 and 2011 c 282 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall deduct taxes and legal financial obligations from the ((gross)) wages, gratuities, or workers' compensation benefits payable directly to the inmate under chapter 51.32 RCW, of each inmate working in correctional industries work programs, or otherwise receiving such wages, gratuities, or benefits. The secretary shall also deduct child support payments from the gratuities of each inmate working in class II through class IV correctional industries work programs. The secretary shall develop a formula for the distribution of offender wages, gratuities, and benefits. The formula shall not reduce the inmate account below the indigency level, as defined in RCW 72.09.015.

(a) The formula shall include the following ((minimum)) maximum allowable deductions from class I ((gross)) wages and from all others earning at least minimum wage:

(i) Five percent to the crime victims' compensation account provided in RCW 7.68.045;

(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;

(iii) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration;

(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any Washington state superior court; and

(v) Twenty percent for payment of any civil judgment for assault for inmates who are subject to a civil judgment for assault in any Washington state court or federal court.

(b) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from class II gross gratuities:

(i) Five percent to the crime victims' compensation account provided in RCW 7.68.045;

(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;

(iii) Fifteen percent to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration;

(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any Washington state superior court;

(v) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support order; and

(vi) Fifteen percent for payment of any civil judgment for assault for inmates who are subject to a civil judgment for assault in any Washington state court or federal court.

(c) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from any workers' compensation benefits paid pursuant to RCW 51.32.080:

(i) Five percent to the crime victims' compensation account provided in RCW 7.68.045;

(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;

(iii) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration; and

(iv) An amount equal to any legal financial obligations owed by the inmate established by an order of any Washington state superior court up to the total amount of the award.

(d) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from class III gratuities:

(i) Five percent for the crime victims' compensation account provided in RCW 7.68.045;

(ii) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support order; and

(iii) Fifteen percent for payment of any civil judgment for assault for inmates who are subject to a civil judgment for assault in any Washington state court or federal court.

(e) The formula shall include the following minimum deduction from class IV gross gratuities:

(i) Five percent to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration;

(ii) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support order; and

(iii) Fifteen percent for payment of any civil judgment for assault for inmates who are subject to a civil judgment for assault in any Washington state court or federal court.

(2) Any person sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility of release or parole under chapter 10.95 RCW or sentenced to death shall be exempt from the requirement under subsection (1)(a)(ii), (b)(ii), or (c)(ii).

(3)(a) The department personal inmate savings account, together with any accrued interest, may be made available to an inmate at the following times:

(i) During confinement to pay for accredited postsecondary educational expenses;

(ii) Prior to the release from confinement to pay for department-approved reentry activities that promote successful community reintegration; or

(iii) When the secretary determines that an emergency exists for the inmate.

(b) The secretary shall establish guidelines for the release of funds pursuant to (a) of this subsection, giving consideration to the inmate's need for resources at the time of his or her release from confinement.

(c) Any funds remaining in an offender's personal inmate savings account shall be made available to the offender at the time of his or her release from confinement.

(4) The management of classes I, II, and IV correctional industries may establish an incentive payment for offender workers based on productivity criteria. This incentive shall be paid separately from the hourly wage/gratuity rate and shall not be subject to the specified deduction for cost of incarceration.

(5) In the event that the offender worker's wages, gratuity, or workers' compensation benefit is subject to garnishment for support enforcement, the crime victims' compensation account, savings, and cost of incarceration deductions shall be calculated on the net wages after taxes, legal financial obligations, and garnishment.

(6) The department shall explore other methods of recovering a portion of the cost of the inmate's incarceration and for encouraging participation in work programs, including development of incentive programs that offer inmates benefits and amenities paid for only from wages earned while working in a correctional industries work program.

(7) The department shall develop the necessary administrative structure to recover inmates' wages and keep records of the amount inmates pay for the costs of incarceration and amenities. All funds deducted from inmate wages under subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of contributions to the cost of incarceration shall be deposited in a dedicated fund with the department and shall be used only for the purpose of enhancing and maintaining correctional industries work programs.

(8) It shall be in the discretion of the secretary to apportion the inmates between class I and class II depending on available contracts and resources.

(9) Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the department of social and health services division of child support from taking collection action against an inmate's moneys, assets, or property pursuant to chapter 26.23, 74.20, or 74.20A RCW.

(10) For purposes of this section, "wages" means monetary compensation due to an offender worker by reason of his or her participation in a class I work program, subject to allowable deductions.

--- END ---