BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.357 and 2016 c 171 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Retail outlets may not sell products or services other than marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or paraphernalia intended for the storage or use of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

(b) Retail outlets may donate, at no cost, to adults age twenty-one years and over, to qualifying patients age eighteen years and over, and to designated providers a lockable box intended for the secure storage of marijuana products and paraphernalia and literature about such a lockable box intended for the secure storage of marijuana products and paraphernalia. Retail outlets may receive the lockable boxes and literature as a donation from another entity or person that is not a licensed marijuana producer, processor, or retailer, to be passed along, at no cost, to adults age twenty-one years and over, to qualifying patients age eighteen years and over, and to designated providers consistent with this subsection (1)(b). Retail outlets may not charge a fee for a lockable box or literature that a retail outlet received as a donation from another entity or person to be passed along, at no cost, to adults age twenty-one years and over, to qualifying patients age eighteen years and over, and to designated providers consistent with this subsection (1)(b). Retail outlets may not condition the donation of a lockable box or literature on the recipient's purchase of a marijuana product or paraphernalia from the retail outlet or use the donation of lockable boxes and literature as an incentive to sell marijuana products or paraphernalia. This subsection (1)(b) does not limit the authority of a retail outlet to sell a lockable box as paraphernalia intended for the storage or use of marijuana products pursuant to (a) of this subsection provided that the retail outlet did not receive the lockable box as a donation and the retail outlet does not sell the lockable box for less than the cost of acquisition.

(2) Licensed marijuana retailers may not employ persons under twenty-one years of age or allow persons under twenty-one years of age to enter or remain on the premises of a retail outlet. However, qualifying patients between eighteen and twenty-one years of age with a recognition card may enter and remain on the premises of a retail outlet holding a medical marijuana endorsement and may purchase products for their personal medical use. Qualifying patients who are under the age of eighteen with a recognition card and who accompany their designated providers may enter and remain on the premises of a retail outlet holding a medical marijuana endorsement, but may not purchase products for their personal medical use.

(3)(a) Licensed marijuana retailers must ensure that all employees are trained on the rules adopted to implement this chapter, identification of persons under the age of twenty-one, and other requirements adopted by the state liquor and cannabis board to ensure that persons under the age of twenty-one are not permitted to enter or remain on the premises of a retail outlet.

(b) Licensed marijuana retailers with a medical marijuana endorsement must ensure that all employees are trained on the subjects required by (a) of this subsection as well as identification of authorizations and recognition cards. Employees must also be trained to permit qualifying patients who hold recognition cards and are between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one to enter the premises and purchase marijuana for their personal medical use and to permit qualifying patients who are under the age of eighteen with a recognition card to enter the premises if accompanied by their designated providers.

(4) Licensed marijuana retailers may not display any signage outside of the licensed premises, other than two signs identifying the retail outlet by the licensee's business or trade name. Each sign must be no larger than one thousand six hundred square inches, be permanently affixed to a building or other structure, and be posted not less than one thousand feet from any elementary school, secondary school, or playground.

(5) Except for the purposes of disposal as authorized by the state liquor and cannabis board, no licensed marijuana retailer or employee of a retail outlet may open or consume, or allow to be opened or consumed, any marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product on the outlet premises.

(6) The state liquor and cannabis board must fine a licensee one thousand dollars for each violation of any subsection of this section. Fines collected under this section must be deposited into the dedicated marijuana account created under RCW 69.50.530.

--- END ---