BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act may be known and cited as the Travis alert act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, the state fire marshal's office, the superintendent of public instruction, and the Washington state council of firefighters, must review existing local training programs and training programs being used in other states and design a statewide training program that will familiarize fire department and emergency medical service personnel with the techniques, procedures, and protocols for best handling situations in which persons with disabilities are present at the scene of an emergency in order to maximize the safety of persons with disabilities, minimize the likelihood of injury to persons with disabilities, and promote the safety of all persons present. The program must include a checklist of disabilities, symptoms of such disabilities, and things to do and not to do relevant to a particular disability so fire department and emergency medical services personnel can easily and quickly determine the specific scenario into which they are entering. The department must make the training program available on the department's web site for use by all fire departments and emergency medical service agencies in the state. The department must include on its web site a list of public and private nonprofit disability-related agencies and organizations and the contact information of each agency and organization. Fire departments and emergency medical service agencies must ensure their employees are adequately trained in and familiarized with techniques, procedures, and protocols for best handling situations in which persons with particular disabilities are present at the scene of an emergency.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the criminal justice training commission, in consultation with the Washington state patrol and other stakeholders, must examine existing training programs and curricula related to law enforcement officers responding to an emergency where a person with a disability may be present, to ensure that those programs and curricula are consistent with best practices.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) Both "accident" and "emergency" mean an unforeseen combination of circumstances or a resulting situation that results in a need for assistance or relief and calls for immediate action; and

(b) "Persons with disabilities" means individuals who have been diagnosed medically to have a physical, mental, emotional, intellectual, behavioral, developmental, or sensory disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the director, through the state enhanced 911 coordinator, and in collaboration with the department of health, the department of social and health services, the Washington state patrol, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington council of police and sheriffs, the state fire marshal's office, a representative of a first responder organization with experience in addressing the needs of a person with a disability, and other individuals and entities at the discretion of the director, must assess, and report back to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018, regarding:

(a) The resources, capabilities, techniques, protocols, and procedures available or required in order to include as part of the enhanced 911 emergency service the ability to allow an immediate display on the screen indicating that a person with a disability may be present at the scene of an emergency, the caller's identification, location, phone number, address, and if made available, additional information on the person with a disability that would assist the first responder in the emergency response;

(b) How best to acquire, implement, and safeguard a secure web site and the information in the system provided by a person with a disability, or a parent, guardian, or caretaker of a person with a disability in order to make such information directly available to first responders at the scene of an emergency or on the way to the scene of an emergency;

(c) What information provided by a person must remain confidential under state or federal law, or otherwise should remain confidential without written permission to release it for purposes of this act or the information is otherwise releasable or available under other provisions of law; and

(d) The need to provide various agencies and employees that are first responders and emergency personnel immunity from civil liability for acts or omissions in the performance of their duties, and what standard should apply, such as if the act or omission is the result of simple negligence, gross negligence, or willful misconduct.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Both "accident" and "emergency" mean an unforeseen combination of circumstances or a resulting situation that results in a need for assistance or relief and calls for immediate action; and

(b) "Person with a disability" means an individual who has been diagnosed medically to have a physical, mental, emotional, intellectual, behavioral, developmental, or sensory disability.

--- END ---