BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the requirements under RCW 46.61.581, each accessible parking space reserved for a person with a physical disability and designated as "van accessible" under the Americans with disabilities act must have a ninety-six inch or greater adjacent access aisle. The adjacent access aisle space must be in addition to the adjacent van parking space. Two van accessible parking spaces may share a common adjacent access aisle.

(2) A sign must be erected at the head of each access aisle that prohibits parking in any access aisle located adjacent to an accessible parking space reserved for a person with a physical disability. The sign may include additional language such as, but not limited to, an indication of any penalty for parking in an access aisle.

(3) By January 1, 2018, the building code council shall adopt rules to implement in the building code the access aisle width and access aisle marking requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2018.

--- END ---