BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the Americans with disabilities act requires public accommodations to provide goods and services to people with disabilities on an equal basis with the rest of the general public. The legislature finds that businesses can often take advantage of federal tax incentives, such as the disabled access credit and other business expense tax deductions for costs of removing barriers in facilities, which are available to eligible businesses to help cover the costs of making access improvements for customers with disabilities. It is the intent of the legislature to try to provide every individual the opportunity to benefit from Washington's businesses and services, and to afford businesses and services the opportunity to benefit from the patronage from all persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, effective January 1, 2019, at least one exterior door at accessible public entrances in state building code groups A, B, E, I, and M must be:

(a) A fully powered automatic door actuated by either a push button or a motion sensor; or

(b) Wired with a door bell, buzzer, chime, or other device that can be rung by a push button, and which emits a mechanical sound announcing one's presence.

(2) This section applies to any business that is five hundred square feet or more and is:

(a) A new construction built on or after the effective date of this section; or

(b) Renovated, remodeled, altered, improved, or repaired, on or after the effective date of this section, unless the cost of adding a powered automatic door is greater than twenty percent of the cost of the portion of the renovation that impacts usability. Plumbing and electrical repairs or alterations are excluded and are not considered a building renovation, remodel, improvement, or repair for purposes of this section.

(3) The building code council shall adopt rules by January 1, 2019, to implement this section.

--- END ---