BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.149.010 and 1995 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the legislature to establish a temporary regulatory program to assist owners and operators of ((heating oil tanks)) petroleum storage tank systems. The legislature finds that it is in the best interests of all citizens for ((heating oil tanks)) petroleum storage tank systems to be operated safely and for tank leaks or spills to be dealt with expeditiously. The legislature further finds that it is necessary to protect tank owners from the financial hardship related to damaged heating oil tanks. The problem is especially acute because owners and operators of heating oil tanks used for space heating have been unable to obtain pollution liability insurance or insurance has been unaffordable.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.149.020 and 1995 c 20 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter may be known and cited as the Washington state ((heating oil)) pollution liability protection act.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.149.030 and 1995 c 20 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Accidental release" means a sudden or nonsudden release of heating oil, occurring after July 23, 1995, from operating a heating oil tank that results in bodily injury, property damage, or a need for corrective action, neither expected nor intended by the owner or operator.

(2) "Bodily injury" means bodily injury, sickness, or disease sustained by a person, including death at any time, resulting from the injury, sickness, or disease.

(3)(a) "Corrective action" means those actions reasonably required to be undertaken by the insured to remove, treat, neutralize, contain, or clean up an accidental release in order to comply with a statute, ordinance, rule, regulation, directive, order, or similar legal requirement, in effect at the time of an accidental release, of the United States, the state of Washington, or a political subdivision of the United States or the state of Washington. "Corrective action" includes, where agreed to in writing, in advance by the insurer, action to remove, treat, neutralize, contain, or clean up an accidental release to avert, reduce, or eliminate the liability of the insured for corrective action, bodily injury, or property damage. "Corrective action" also includes actions reasonably necessary to monitor, assess, and evaluate an accidental release.

(b) "Corrective action" does not include:

(i) Replacement or repair of heating oil tanks or other receptacles; or

(ii) Replacement or repair of piping, connections, and valves of tanks or other receptacles.

(4) "Defense costs" include the costs of legal representation, expert fees, and related costs and expenses incurred in defending against claims or actions brought by or on behalf of:

(a) The United States, the state of Washington, or a political subdivision of the United States or state of Washington to require corrective action or to recover costs of corrective action; or

(b) A third party for bodily injury or property damage caused by an accidental release.

(5) "Director" means the director of the Washington state pollution liability insurance agency or the director's appointed representative.

(6) "Environmental covenant" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 64.70.020.

(7) "Facility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.105D.020.

(8) "Heating oil" means any petroleum product used for space heating in oil-fired furnaces, heaters, and boilers, including stove oil, diesel fuel, or kerosene. "Heating oil" does not include petroleum products used as fuels in motor vehicles, marine vessels, trains, buses, aircraft, or any off-highway equipment not used for space heating, or for industrial processing or the generation of electrical energy.

(((7))) (9) "Heating oil tank" means a tank and its connecting pipes, whether above or below ground, or in a basement, with pipes connected to the tank for space heating of human living or working space on the premises where the tank is located. "Heating oil tank" does not include a decommissioned or abandoned heating oil tank, or a tank used solely for industrial process heating purposes or generation of electrical energy.

(((8))) (10) "Independent remedial action" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.105D.020.

(11) "Occurrence" means an accident, including continuous or repeated exposure to conditions, that results in a release from a heating oil tank.

(((9))) (12) "Owner or operator" means a person in control of, or having responsibility for, the daily operation of a ((heating oil tank)) petroleum storage tank system.

(((10))) (13) "Petroleum" means any petroleum-based substance including crude oil or any fraction that is liquid at standard conditions of temperature and pressure. The term "petroleum" includes, but is not limited to, petroleum and petroleum-based substances comprised of a complex blend of hydrocarbons, such as motor fuels, jet fuels, distillate fuel oils, residual fuel oils, lubricants, petroleum solvents, used oils, and heating oils. The term "petroleum" does not include propane, asphalt, or any other petroleum product that is not liquid at standard conditions of temperature and pressure. Standard conditions of temperature and pressure are at sixty degrees Fahrenheit and 14.7 pounds per square inch absolute.

(14) "Petroleum storage tank system" means a storage tank system that contains petroleum or a mixture of petroleum with de minimis quantities of other substances. The systems include those containing motor fuels, jet fuels, distillate fuel oils, residual fuel oils, lubricants, petroleum solvents, used oils, and heating oils. "Petroleum storage tank system" does not include any storage tank system regulated under chapter 70.105 RCW.

(15) "Pollution liability insurance agency" means the Washington state pollution liability insurance agency.

(((11))) (16) "Property damage" means:

(a) Physical injury to, destruction of, or contamination of tangible property, including the loss of use of the property resulting from the injury, destruction, or contamination; or

(b) Loss of use of tangible property that has not been physically injured, destroyed, or contaminated but has been evacuated, withdrawn from use, or rendered inaccessible because of an accidental release.

(((12))) (17) "Release" means a spill, leak, emission, escape, or leaching into the environment.

(((13))) (18) "Remedial action" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.105D.020.

(19) "Remedial action costs" means reasonable costs that are attributable to or associated with a remedial action.

(((14))) (20) "Tank" means a stationary device, designed to contain an accumulation of heating oil, that is constructed primarily of nonearthen materials such as concrete, steel, fiberglass, or plastic that provides structural support.

(((15))) (21) "Third-party liability" means the liability of a heating oil tank owner to another person due to property damage or personal injury that results from a leak or spill.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.149.040 and 2009 c 560 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall:

(1) Design a program, consistent with RCW 70.149.120, for providing pollution liability insurance for heating oil tanks that provides up to sixty thousand dollars per occurrence coverage and aggregate limits, and protects the state of Washington from unwanted or unanticipated liability for accidental release claims;

(2) Administer, implement, and enforce the provisions of this chapter. To assist in administration of the program, the director is authorized to appoint up to two employees who are exempt from the civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, and who shall serve at the pleasure of the director;

(3) Administer the heating oil pollution liability trust account, as established under RCW 70.149.070;

(4) Employ and discharge, at his or her discretion, agents, attorneys, consultants, companies, organizations, and employees as deemed necessary, and to prescribe their duties and powers, and fix their compensation;

(5) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;

(6) Design and from time to time revise a reinsurance contract providing coverage to an insurer or insurers meeting the requirements of this chapter. The director is authorized to provide reinsurance through the pollution liability insurance program trust account;

(7) Solicit bids from insurers and select an insurer to provide pollution liability insurance for third-party bodily injury and property damage, and corrective action to owners and operators of heating oil tanks;

(8) Register, and design a means of accounting for, operating heating oil tanks;

(9) Implement a program to provide advice and technical assistance ((to owners and operators of active and abandoned heating oil tanks if contamination from an active or abandoned heating oil tank is suspected. Advice and assistance regarding administrative and technical requirements may include observation of testing or site assessment and review of the results of reports. If the director finds that contamination is not present or that the contamination is apparently minor and not a threat to human health or the environment, the director may provide written opinions and conclusions on the results of the investigation to owners and operators of active and abandoned heating oil tanks)) on the administrative and technical requirements of this chapter and chapter 70.105D RCW to persons who are conducting or otherwise interested in independent remedial actions at facilities where there is a suspected or confirmed release from the following petroleum storage tank systems: A heating oil tank; a decommissioned heating oil tank; an abandoned heating oil tank; or a petroleum storage tank system identified by the department of ecology based on the relative risk posed by the release to human health and the environment, as determined under chapter 70.105D RCW, or other factors identified by the department of ecology.

(a) Such advice or assistance is advisory only, and is not binding on the pollution liability insurance agency or the department of ecology. As part of this advice and assistance, the pollution liability insurance agency may provide written opinions on whether independent remedial actions or proposals for these actions meet the substantive requirements of chapter 70.105D RCW, or whether the pollution liability insurance agency believes further remedial action is necessary at the facility. As part of this advice and assistance, the pollution liability insurance agency may also observe independent remedial actions.

(b) The agency is authorized to collect, from persons requesting advice and assistance, the costs incurred by the agency in providing such advice and assistance. The costs may include travel costs and expenses associated with review of reports and preparation of written opinions and conclusions. Funds from cost reimbursement must be deposited in the heating oil pollution liability trust account.

(c) The state of Washington, the pollution liability insurance agency, and its officers and employees are immune from all liability, and no cause of action arises from any act or omission in providing, or failing to provide, such advice, opinion, conclusion, or assistance;

(10) Establish a public information program to provide information regarding liability, technical, and environmental requirements associated with active and abandoned heating oil tanks;

(11) Monitor agency expenditures and seek to minimize costs and maximize benefits to ensure responsible financial stewardship;

(12) Study if appropriate user fees to supplement program funding are necessary and develop recommendations for legislation to authorize such fees;

(13) Establish requirements, including deadlines not to exceed ninety days, for reporting to the pollution liability insurance agency a suspected or confirmed release from a heating oil tank, including a decommissioned or abandoned heating oil tank, that may pose a threat to human health or the environment by the owner or operator of the heating oil tank or the owner of the property where the release occurred;

(14) Within ninety days of receiving information and having a reasonable basis to believe that there may be a release from a heating oil tank, including decommissioned or abandoned heating oil tanks, that may pose a threat to human health or the environment, perform an initial investigation to determine at a minimum whether such a release has occurred and whether further remedial action is necessary under chapter 70.105D RCW. The initial investigation may include, but is not limited to, inspecting, sampling, or testing. The director may retain contractors to perform an initial investigation on the agency's behalf;

(15) For any written opinion issued under subsection (9) of this section requiring an environmental covenant as part of the remedial action, consult with, and seek comment from, a city or county department with land use planning authority for real property subject to the environmental covenant prior to the property owner recording the environmental covenant; and

(16) For any property where an environmental covenant has been established as part of the remedial action approved under subsection (9) of this section, periodically review the environmental covenant for effectiveness. The director shall perform a review at least once every five years after an environmental covenant is recorded.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.149.070 and 2004 c 203 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The heating oil pollution liability trust account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the pollution liability insurance fee collected under RCW 70.149.080 and reinsurance premiums shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes set out under this chapter. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures. ((Any residue in the account in excess of funds needed to meet administrative costs for January of the following year shall be transferred at the end of the calendar year to the pollution liability insurance program trust account.))

(2) Money in the account may be used by the director for the following purposes:

(a) Corrective action costs;

(b) Third-party liability claims;

(c) Costs associated with claims administration;

(d) Purchase of an insurance policy to cover all registered heating oil tanks, and reinsurance of the policy; and

(e) Administrative expenses of the program, including personnel, equipment, supplies, and providing advice and technical assistance.

Sec. 6. RCW 64.70.020 and 2007 c 104 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Activity or use limitations" means restrictions or obligations created under this chapter with respect to real property.

(2) "Agency" means either the department of ecology, the pollution liability insurance agency, or the United States environmental protection agency, whichever determines or approves the environmental response project pursuant to which the environmental covenant is created.

(3)(a) "Common interest community" means a condominium, cooperative, or other real property with respect to which a person, by virtue of the person's ownership of a parcel of real property, is obligated to pay property taxes or insurance premiums, or for maintenance, or improvement of other real property described in a recorded covenant that creates the common interest community.

(b) "Common interest community" includes but is not limited to:

(i) An association of apartment owners as defined in RCW 64.32.010;

(ii) A unit owners' association as defined in RCW 64.34.020 and organized under RCW 64.34.300;

(iii) A master association as provided in RCW 64.34.276;

(iv) A subassociation as provided in RCW 64.34.278; and

(v) A homeowners' association as defined in RCW 64.38.010.

(4) "Environmental covenant" means a servitude arising under an environmental response project that imposes activity or use limitations.

(5) "Environmental response project" means a plan or work performed for environmental remediation of real property and conducted:

(a) Under a federal or state program governing environmental remediation of real property, including chapters 43.21C, 64.44, 70.95, 70.98, 70.105, 70.105D, 90.48, and 90.52 RCW;

(b) Incident to closure of a solid or hazardous waste management unit, if the closure is conducted with approval of an agency; or

(c) Under the state voluntary clean-up program authorized under chapter 70.105D RCW or technical assistance program authorized under chapter 70.149 RCW.

(6) "Holder" means the grantee of an environmental covenant as specified in RCW 64.70.030(1).

(7) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(8) "Record," used as a noun, means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(9) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. To ensure the adoption of rules will not delay the implementation of remedial actions, the pollution liability insurance agency may implement the technical advice and assistance program expansion to include petroleum storage tank systems through interpretive guidance pending adoption of rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. The pollution liability insurance agency may not expand the technical advice and assistance program to include petroleum storage tank systems until January 1, 2018. The pollution liability insurance agency may include heating oil tanks, including abandoned and decommissioned tanks, in the technical advice and assistance program as of the effective date of this section.

--- END ---