BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.21C.480 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The repair or replacement of a state bridge deemed structurally deficient, as defined in RCW 47.04.010, is exempt from compliance with this chapter as long as the action occurs within the existing right-of-way, except that the repair or replacement may occur outside the existing right-of-way as needed to meet current engineering standards or state or local environmental permit requirements for highway construction as long as the repair or replacement does not result in additional lanes for automobiles. The issuance of applicable state and local agency permits or approvals associated with the repair or replacement of such bridges is also included in this exemption from compliance with this chapter.

(2) The construction or addition to a road of pedestrian walks, paths, sidewalks, and sidewalk extensions is exempt from compliance with this chapter, as long as the construction or addition does not result in additional lanes for automobiles.

--- END ---