BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that the ability of school employees to instantly communicate school emergencies to 911, first responders, and other school employees is a paramount public safety objective. Furthermore, the legislature finds that the personal mobile telephones of school employees can be used to instantaneously provide 911, first responders, and other school employees with comprehensive emergency information through the press of a button and without voice communication. It is the intent of this section to have all school districts replicate the goals of the panic button programs that are currently operational in Snohomish county and to develop panic button standards, efficiencies, and interoperability.

(2) By December 2017, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must develop a statewide panic button program that will be available to all school districts. At a minimum, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must complete the following activities when developing the statewide school panic button program:

(a) Secure a statewide contract with technology providers necessary to operate a statewide panic button program;

(b) Assume the costs of having the technology implemented in all school districts;

(c) Coordinate with 911 centers to facilitate implementing the panic button technology in the school districts within their jurisdiction, and assume any 911 center software costs necessary for this purpose; and

(d) Develop panic button minimum standards that include, at a minimum:

(i) Connecting the school employee to 911 while simultaneously notifying designated on-site personnel and first responders;

(ii) Providing the location of the caller to 911 and first responders;

(iii) Providing additional digital information to 911 or first responders that would be of significant value to 911 or first responders;

(iv) Ensuring interoperability between school districts and public safety jurisdictions; and

(v) Facilitating necessary training among school employees and first responders.

(3) Participation by school employees in a panic button program is voluntary. Nothing in this section requires a school employee to participate in the program or install a panic button application on his or her personal mobile telephone without the employee's consent.

--- END ---