BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.42.050 and 1989 c 358 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Every qualified interpreter appointed under this chapter in a judicial or administrative proceeding shall, ((before beginning to interpret)) upon receiving the interpreter's initial qualification from the office of the deaf and hard of hearing, take an oath that a true interpretation will be made to the person being examined of all the proceedings in a manner which the person understands, and that the interpreter will repeat the statements of the person being examined to the court or other agency conducting the proceedings, to the best of the interpreter's skill and judgment.

Sec. 2. RCW 2.43.050 and 2010 c 190 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon certification or registration ((and every two years thereafter)) with the administrative office of the courts, certified or registered interpreters shall take an oath, affirming that the interpreter will make a true interpretation to the person being examined of all the proceedings in a language which the person understands, and that the interpreter will repeat the statements of the person being examined to the court or agency conducting the proceedings, in the English language, to the best of the interpreter's skill and judgment. The administrative office of the courts shall maintain a record of the oath in the same manner that the list of certified and registered interpreters is maintained.

(2) Before any person serving as an interpreter for the court or agency begins to interpret, the appointing authority shall require the interpreter to state the ((person)) interpreter's name on the record and whether the ((person)) interpreter is a certified or registered interpreter. If the interpreter is not a certified or registered interpreter, the interpreter must submit the interpreter's qualifications on the record.

(3) Before beginning to interpret, every interpreter appointed under this chapter shall take an oath unless the interpreter is a certified or registered interpreter who has taken the oath ((within the last two years)) as required in subsection (1) of this section. The oath must affirm that the interpreter will make a true interpretation to the person being examined of all the proceedings in a language which the person understands, and that the interpreter will repeat the statements of the person being examined to the court or agency conducting the proceedings, in the English language, to the best of the interpreter's skill and judgment.

--- END ---