BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature stated in RCW 28A.150.210 that a "basic education is an evolving program of instruction that is intended to provide students with the opportunity to become responsible and respectful global citizens." In order to prepare students to be global citizens, the legislature intends to require that the superintendent of public instruction develop, and periodically update, a model ethnic studies curriculum for use in grades seven through twelve. The legislature also intends to encourage public schools with students in grades seven through twelve to offer an ethnic studies course that incorporates this curriculum.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By September 1, 2018, the superintendent of public instruction shall develop, and periodically update, a model ethnic studies curriculum for use in grades seven through twelve. The model curriculum must be designed to prepare students to be global citizens in a global society with an appreciation for the contributions of multiple cultures. The model curriculum must be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's web site.

(2) Public schools with students in grades seven through twelve are encouraged to offer an ethnic studies course that incorporates the curriculum developed under subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)(a) To aid in the development of the ethnic studies curriculum required under section 2 of this act, the superintendent of public instruction must establish an ethnic studies advisory committee.

(b) The ethnic studies advisory committee must advise, assist, and make recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction regarding the development of the model ethnic studies curriculum required under section 2 of this act.

(c) The ethnic studies advisory committee must be composed of a majority of educators with experience in teaching ethnic studies from public high schools and institutions of higher education, including educators representing the Washington state commissions on African-American affairs, Asian Pacific American affairs, and Hispanic affairs, and the governor's office of Indian affairs.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2019.

--- END ---