BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that zoological facilities in Washington serve a public purpose by providing educational and recreational opportunities for Washington citizens and spurring economic development in the state. The legislature also finds that private funds are critical to the survival of zoological facilities. The legislature intends to provide certain excise tax relief to such zoological facilities in order to further their public purpose and stimulate economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax those amounts received:

(a) By a zoological facility, which represents income derived from business activities conducted by the facility; or

(b) From the United States or any instrumentality thereof or from the state of Washington or any municipal corporation or subdivision thereof as compensation for, or to support zoological exhibitions, presentations, performances, or education programs provided by a zoological facility.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "zoological facility" means a nonprofit facility accredited by the association of zoos and aquariums.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect August 1, 2017.

--- END ---