BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The applied learning advisory committee is established to provide guidance to legislators, the superintendent of public instruction, the governor, and other policymakers on the improvement and expansion of applied learning opportunities in public schools. The committee shall be composed of the following members:

(i) The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee;

(ii) The governor or the governor's designee;

(iii) The chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate education committees or their designees;

(iv) The chair of the state board of education or the chair's designee;

(v) The chair of the workforce training and education coordinating board or the chair's designee;

(vi) A member of the student achievement council, or a designee of the council;

(vii) The chair of the state board for community and technical colleges or the chair's designee; and

(viii) The chair of the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee or the chair's designee.

(b) The committee must consist also of: (i) One member each appointed by the superintendent of public instruction from associations representing: Career and technical education; teachers; school administrators; principals; and school directors; and (ii) four members appointed jointly by the chair of the workforce training and education coordinating board and the superintendent of public instruction representing building and trades organizations and industrial manufacturers. Members appointed under this subsection (1)(b) must be selected from lists of recommended appointees provided to the superintendent by the applicable association or organization.

(c) The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee shall chair the committee. All members of the committee must be voting members.

(2) The committee shall:

(a) Examine applied learning programs operating in the state, inventory these programs, and review best practices;

(b) Examine career opportunities through applied learning opportunities;

(c) Examine methods for partnering, or expanding partnerships with industry for internships, the provision of equipment, and related public-private partnerships; and

(d) Develop, and periodically update, a coordinated plan for the statewide integration of applied learning opportunities into all public elementary schools, middle schools, and high schools.

(3) Staff support for the committee must be provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(4) The committee shall report its finding and recommendations to the governor and the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by June 30th in each even-numbered year.

--- END ---