BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.85 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Whenever there exists upon the right-of-way of any county road or bridge, or off the right-of-way thereof in sufficiently close proximity thereto, any object, device, or natural or artificial thing that imminently threatens to damage or endangers the county road or bridge infrastructure or any portion thereof, or that obstructs, blocks, or threatens normal use of the roadway thereon, the object, device, or natural or artificial thing is declared to be a public nuisance, and the county may take such action as may be necessary to effect its abatement. Any such object, device, or natural or artificial thing considered by the county to be immediately or eminently dangerous to travel upon a county road or bridge may be immediately removed, and the removal in no event constitutes a breach of the peace or trespass.

(2) Logs dumped on any county road or bridge or in any county road drainage ditch due to equipment failure or for any other reason must be removed immediately. Logs remaining within the county road or bridge or rights-of-way thereof for a period of thirty days must be confiscated and removed or disposed of as directed by the county.

--- END ---