BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that programs for electrification of transportation have the potential to allow electric utilities to optimize the use of electric grid infrastructure, improve the management of electric loads, and better manage the integration of variable renewable energy and energy storage resources. Transportation electrification programs can provide cost-effective energy efficiency through energy savings, more efficient use of energy resources, and more efficient use of electric distribution system resources and infrastructure. This cost-effective energy efficiency results in cost savings and benefits for all ratepayers. Additional potential benefits associated with transportation electrification include the environmental attributes associated with carbon reduction in the transportation sector.

The legislature further finds that the transportation sector is Washington's largest contributor to greenhouse gas emissions and hazardous air pollutants, as defined by federal national ambient air quality standards and mobile source air toxics rules, and that state policy can achieve the greatest return on investment in reducing greenhouse gas emissions and improving air quality by expediting the transition to alternative fuel vehicles and equipment, including electric vehicles and equipment.

The legislature finds that as with traditional energy conservation programs that provide financing for more efficient use of energy in existing buildings and structures, programs that directly provide for electrification of transportation or that provide financing of such electrification have the potential to enable utilities and their customers to achieve more efficient use of energy resources and electric distribution system infrastructure.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.92.355 and 1993 c 204 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The conservation of energy in all forms and by every possible means is found and declared to be a public purpose of highest priority. The legislature further finds and declares that all municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, and other political subdivisions of the state which are engaged in the generation, sale, or distribution of energy should be granted the authority to develop and carry out programs which will conserve resources, reduce waste, and encourage more efficient use of energy and energy infrastructure by consumers and utilities.

In order to establish the most effective statewide program for energy conservation and energy infrastructure efficiency, the legislature hereby encourages any company, corporation, or association engaged in selling or furnishing utility services to assist their customers in the acquisition and installation of materials and equipment, for compensation or otherwise, for the conservation ((or)) and more efficient use of energy and energy infrastructure, including electric vehicle supply equipment. The use of appropriate tree plantings for energy conservation is encouraged as part of these programs.

The legislature finds that utilities that are traditionally responsible for providing electric service to customers, and for understanding and engineering the electrical grid for safety and reliability, must be engaged in the electrification of the transportation system. The legislature further finds that it has given utilities other policy authority to promote energy conservation activities, which do not make the benefits of building out electric vehicle supply equipment, as well as any subsequent increase in energy consumption, readily apparent. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to provide clear authority for utilities to engage in and promote the build out of electric vehicle infrastructure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW to read as follows:

Any city or town engaged in the generation, sale, or distribution of energy and that has four hundred thousand or more customers may, within limits established by the Constitution of the state of Washington:

(1) Assist its customers in financing the acquisition and installation of materials and equipment, for compensation or otherwise, for the electrification of transportation; and

(2) Offer programs, services, or investments in the electrification of transportation for its customers in such a way as to benefit ratepayers, pursuant to an electrification of transportation plan adopted by the governing body of the city or town.

--- END ---