BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that:

(a) The Washington state health insurance pool currently provides subsidized health coverage to almost one thousand five hundred people in medicare supplemental plans and nonmedicare health plans;

(b) Enrollees in Washington state health insurance pool plans tend to have higher health care costs than enrollees in other types of health plans;

(c) Having a separate insurance pool for high-risk individuals benefits all purchasers of health insurance products by keeping premium costs down;

(d) The costs of subsidizing Washington state health insurance pool enrollees are borne disproportionately by purchasers of small group and individual market plans;

(e) The Washington state health insurance pool is scheduled to close its nonmedicare enrollment after December 31, 2017; and

(f) Uncertainty due to changes to the health care marketplace on the federal and state levels increases the necessity of keeping the Washington state health insurance pool open, at least in the short term.

(2) The legislature therefore intends to:

(a) Extend the expiration date for nonmedicare coverage in the Washington state health insurance pool; and

(b) Study:

(i) The necessity of continuing Washington state health insurance pool coverage in the short and long terms;

(ii) The role of the Washington state health insurance pool in light of the evolving health care landscape; and

(iii) The creation of a funding mechanism that equitably and broadly apportions Washington state health insurance pool costs across Washington's health care marketplace.

Sec. 2. RCW 48.41.100 and 2013 c 279 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The following persons who are residents of this state are eligible for pool coverage:

(i) Any resident of the state not eligible for medicare coverage or medicaid coverage, and residing in a county where an individual health plan other than a catastrophic health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 is not offered to the resident during defined open enrollment or special enrollment periods at the time of application to the pool, whether through the health benefit exchange operated pursuant to chapter 43.71 RCW or in the private insurance market, and who makes application to the pool for coverage prior to December 31, ((2017)) 2022;

(ii) Any resident of the state not eligible for medicare coverage, enrolled in the pool prior to December 31, 2013, shall remain eligible for pool coverage except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section through December 31, ((2017)) 2022;

(iii) Any person becoming eligible for medicare before August 1, 2009, who provides evidence of (A) a rejection for medical reasons, (B) a requirement of restrictive riders, (C) an up-rated premium, (D) a preexisting conditions limitation, or (E) lack of access to or for a comprehensive medicare supplemental insurance policy under chapter 48.66 RCW, the effect of any of which is to substantially reduce coverage from that received by a person considered a standard risk by at least one member within six months of the date of application; and

(iv) Any person becoming eligible for medicare on or after August 1, 2009, who does not have access to a reasonable choice of comprehensive medicare part C plans, as defined in (b) of this subsection, and who provides evidence of (A) a rejection for medical reasons, (B) a requirement of restrictive riders, (C) an up-rated premium, (D) a preexisting conditions limitation, or (E) lack of access to or for a comprehensive medicare supplemental insurance policy under chapter 48.66 RCW, the effect of any of which is to substantially reduce coverage from that received by a person considered a standard risk by at least one member within six months of the date of application.

(b) For purposes of (a)(i) of this subsection, by December 1, 2013, the board shall develop and implement a process to determine an applicant's eligibility based on the criteria specified in (a)(i) of this subsection.

(c) For purposes of (a)(iv) of this subsection (1), a person does not have access to a reasonable choice of plans unless the person has a choice of health maintenance organization or preferred provider organization medicare part C plans offered by at least three different carriers that have had provider networks in the person's county of residence for at least five years. The plan options must include coverage at least as comprehensive as a plan F medicare supplement plan combined with medicare parts A and B. The plan options must also provide access to adequate and stable provider networks that make up-to-date provider directories easily accessible on the carrier web site, and will provide them in hard copy, if requested. In addition, if no health maintenance organization or preferred provider organization plan includes the health care provider with whom the person has an established care relationship and from whom he or she has received treatment within the past twelve months, the person does not have reasonable access.

(2) The following persons are not eligible for coverage by the pool:

(a) Any person having terminated coverage in the pool unless (i) twelve months have lapsed since termination, or (ii) that person can show continuous other coverage which has been involuntarily terminated for any reason other than nonpayment of premiums. However, these exclusions do not apply to eligible individuals as defined in section 2741(b) of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-41(b));

(b) Inmates of public institutions and those persons who become eligible for medical assistance after June 30, 2008, as defined in RCW 74.09.010. However, these exclusions do not apply to eligible individuals as defined in section 2741(b) of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-41(b)).

(3) When a carrier or insurer regulated under chapter 48.15 RCW begins to offer an individual health benefit plan in a county where no carrier had been offering an individual health benefit plan:

(a) If the health benefit plan offered is other than a catastrophic health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005, any person enrolled in a pool plan pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section in that county shall no longer be eligible for coverage under that plan pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section; and

(b) The pool administrator shall provide written notice to any person who is no longer eligible for coverage under a pool plan under this subsection (3) within thirty days of the administrator's determination that the person is no longer eligible. The notice shall: (i) Indicate that coverage under the plan will cease ninety days from the date that the notice is dated; (ii) describe any other coverage options, either in or outside of the pool, available to the person; and (iii) describe the enrollment process for the available options outside of the pool.

Sec. 3. RCW 48.41.160 and 2013 c 279 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On or before December 31, 2007, the pool shall cancel all existing pool policies and replace them with policies that are identical to the existing policies except for the inclusion of a provision providing for a guarantee of the continuity of coverage consistent with this section. As a means to minimize the number of policy changes for enrollees, replacement policies provided under this subsection also may include the plan modifications authorized in RCW 48.41.100, 48.41.110, and 48.41.120.

(2) A pool policy shall contain a guarantee of the individual's right to continued coverage, subject to the provisions of subsections (4), (5), (7), and (8) of this section.

(3) The guarantee of continuity of coverage required by this section shall not prevent the pool from canceling or nonrenewing a policy for:

(a) Nonpayment of premium;

(b) Violation of published policies of the pool;

(c) Failure of a covered person who becomes eligible for medicare benefits by reason of age to apply for a pool medical supplement plan, or a medicare supplement plan or other similar plan offered by a carrier pursuant to federal laws and regulations;

(d) Failure of a covered person to pay any deductible or copayment amount owed to the pool and not the provider of health care services;

(e) Covered persons committing fraudulent acts as to the pool;

(f) Covered persons materially breaching the pool policy; or

(g) Changes adopted to federal or state laws when such changes no longer permit the continued offering of such coverage.

(4)(a) The guarantee of continuity of coverage provided by this section requires that if the pool replaces a plan, it must make the replacement plan available to all individuals in the plan being replaced. The replacement plan must include all of the services covered under the replaced plan, and must not significantly limit access to the kind of services covered under the replacement plan through unreasonable cost-sharing requirements or otherwise. The pool may also allow individuals who are covered by a plan that is being replaced an unrestricted right to transfer to a fully comparable plan.

(b) The guarantee of continuity of coverage provided by this section requires that if the pool discontinues offering a plan: (i) The pool must provide notice to each individual of the discontinuation at least ninety days prior to the date of the discontinuation; (ii) the pool must offer to each individual provided coverage under the discontinued plan the option to enroll in any other plan currently offered by the pool for which the individual is otherwise eligible; and (iii) in exercising the option to discontinue a plan and in offering the option of coverage under (b)(ii) of this subsection, the pool must act uniformly without regard to any health status-related factor of enrolled individuals or individuals who may become eligible for this coverage.

(c) The pool cannot replace or discontinue a plan under this subsection (4) until it has completed an evaluation of the impact of replacing the plan upon:

(i) The cost and quality of care to pool enrollees;

(ii) Pool financing and enrollment;

(iii) The board's ability to offer comprehensive and other plans to its enrollees;

(iv) Other items identified by the board.

In its evaluation, the board must request input from the constituents represented by the board members.

(d) The guarantee of continuity of coverage provided by this section does not apply if the pool has zero enrollment in a plan.

(5) The pool may not change the rates for pool policies except on a class basis, with a clear disclosure in the policy of the pool's right to do so.

(6) A pool policy offered under this chapter shall provide that, upon the death of the individual in whose name the policy is issued, every other individual then covered under the policy may elect, within a period specified in the policy, to continue coverage under the same or a different policy.

(7) All pool policies issued on or after January 1, 2014, must reflect the new eligibility requirements of RCW 48.41.100 and contain a statement of the intent to discontinue the pool coverage on December 31, ((2017)) 2022, under pool nonmedicare plans.

(8) Pool policies issued prior to January 1, 2014, shall be modified effective January 1, ((2013)) 2018, consistent with subsection (3)(g) of this section, and contain a statement of the intent to discontinue pool coverage on December 31, ((2017)) 2022, under pool nonmedicare plans.

(9) The pool shall discontinue all nonmedicare pool plans effective December 31, ((2017)) 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If specific funding for purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2017, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---