BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In order to prescribe an opioid drug, a practitioner must, on a one-time basis, complete continuing education regarding best practices in the prescribing of opioid drugs. The continuing education must be at least one hour in length. A disciplining authority may adopt additional continuing education requirements related to the prescribing of opioid drugs.

(2)(a) By July 1, 2018, each disciplining authority shall adopt rules establishing requirements for prescribing opioid drugs. The rules must be consistent with the interagency guideline for prescribing opioids for pain developed by the Washington state agency medical directors' group.

(b) A practitioner who violates the rules adopted by the disciplining authority under (a) of this subsection (2) commits unprofessional conduct in violation of RCW 18.130.180.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Disciplining authority" means the agency, board, or commission having the authority to take disciplinary action against a practitioner upon a finding of a violation of this chapter or a chapter specified under RCW 18.130.040.

(b) "Opioid drug" has the same meaning as "opiate" in RCW 69.50.101. It does not include opioid overdose medications or medications approved by the federal food and drug administration for the treatment of opioid use disorder.

(c) "Practitioner" means a health professional licensed under one of the chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040 who is authorized to prescribe opioid drugs.

--- END ---