BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.17.005 and 2010 c 161 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who applies for a vehicle registration or for any other right to operate a vehicle on the highways of this state shall pay a ((three)) four dollar and fifty cent filing fee in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.

(2) A person who applies for a certificate of title shall pay a ((four)) five dollar and fifty cent filing fee in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.

(3) The filing fees established in this section must be distributed under RCW 46.68.400.

--- END ---