BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 9.41.092 (Licensed dealer deliveries—Background checks) and 2015 c 1 s 4;

(2) RCW 9.41.113 (Firearm sales or transfers—Background checks—Requirements—Exceptions) and 2015 c 1 s 3;

(3) RCW 9.41.115 (Penalties—Violations of RCW 9.41.113) and 2015 c 1 s 9;

(4) RCW 9.41.137 (Department of licensing, authority to adopt rules—Reporting of violations—Authority to revoke licenses) and 2015 c 1 s 8;

(5) RCW 82.08.833 (Exemptions—Sales or transfers of firearms—Unlicensed persons—Background check requirements) and 2015 c 1 s 10;

(6) 2015 c 1 s 2;

(7) 2015 c 1 s 5;

(8) 2015 c 1 s 6;

(9) 2015 c 1 s 7;

(10) 2015 c 1 s 11; and

(11) 2015 c 1 s 1 (uncodified).

--- END ---