BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In absence of conclusive information to the contrary, there is a presumption that a groundwater withdrawal that is exempt from permitting requirements under RCW 90.44.050 will not affect or impair a minimum water flow or level of a surface water body established pursuant to chapter 90.22 RCW or a base flow protected consistent with RCW 90.54.020(3)(a).

(2) A demonstration of "conclusive information" sufficient to rebut the presumption in subsection (1) of this section must include, but is not limited to, site-specific groundwater testing data that demonstrates:

(a) The precise nature of any hydrological connection between the groundwater source and the surface water body whose minimum water flow or level would be impacted by groundwater withdrawal; and

(b) That a withdrawal of groundwater would cause a reduction in the flow or level of the surface water body that is capable of being measured with the use of professional equipment in the field.

(3) A person proposing to withdraw groundwater that is exempt from permitting under this chapter is not required to establish or provide data that would support or rebut the presumption established in subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 58.17.110 and 1995 c 32 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The city, town, or county legislative body shall inquire into the public use and interest proposed to be served by the establishment of the subdivision and dedication. It shall determine: (a) If appropriate provisions are made for, but not limited to, the public health, safety, and general welfare, for open spaces, drainage ways, streets or roads, alleys, other public ways, transit stops, potable water supplies, sanitary wastes, parks and recreation, playgrounds, schools and schoolgrounds, and shall consider all other relevant facts, including sidewalks and other planning features that assure safe walking conditions for students who only walk to and from school; and (b) whether the public interest will be served by the subdivision and dedication.

(2) A proposed subdivision and dedication shall not be approved unless the city, town, or county legislative body makes written findings that: (a) Appropriate provisions are made for the public health, safety, and general welfare and for such open spaces, drainage ways, streets or roads, alleys, other public ways, transit stops, potable water supplies, sanitary wastes, parks and recreation, playgrounds, schools and schoolgrounds and all other relevant facts, including sidewalks and other planning features that assure safe walking conditions for students who only walk to and from school; and (b) the public use and interest will be served by the platting of such subdivision and dedication. If it finds that the proposed subdivision and dedication make such appropriate provisions and that the public use and interest will be served, then the legislative body shall approve the proposed subdivision and dedication. Dedication of land to any public body, provision of public improvements to serve the subdivision, and/or impact fees imposed under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 may be required as a condition of subdivision approval. Dedications shall be clearly shown on the final plat. No dedication, provision of public improvements, or impact fees imposed under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 shall be allowed that constitutes an unconstitutional taking of private property. The legislative body shall not as a condition to the approval of any subdivision require a release from damages to be procured from other property owners.

(3) If the preliminary plat includes a dedication of a public park with an area of less than two acres and the donor has designated that the park be named in honor of a deceased individual of good character, the city, town, or county legislative body must adopt the designated name.

(4) A city, town, or county legislative body may not withhold or delay its approval of a subdivision and dedication under this section on the basis of not having sufficient evidence or information to rebut the presumption established in section 1(1) of this act.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.27.097 and 2015 c 225 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each applicant for a building permit of a building necessitating potable water shall provide evidence of an adequate water supply for the intended use of the building. Evidence may be in the form of a water right permit from the department of ecology, a letter from an approved water purveyor stating the ability to provide water, or another form sufficient to verify the existence of an adequate water supply. A city or county may not withhold or delay the approval of a building permit under this section on the basis of not having sufficient information or evidence to rebut the presumption established in section 1(1) of this act. In addition to other authorities, the county or city may impose conditions on building permits requiring connection to an existing public water system where the existing system is willing and able to provide safe and reliable potable water to the applicant with reasonable economy and efficiency. An application for a water right shall not be sufficient proof of an adequate water supply.

(2) Within counties not required or not choosing to plan pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040, the county and the state may mutually determine those areas in the county in which the requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply. The departments of health and ecology shall coordinate on the implementation of this section. Should the county and the state fail to mutually determine those areas to be designated pursuant to this subsection, the county may petition the department of enterprise services to mediate or, if necessary, make the determination.

(3) Buildings that do not need potable water facilities are exempt from the provisions of this section. The department of ecology, after consultation with local governments, may adopt rules to implement this section, which may recognize differences between high-growth and low-growth counties.

Sec. 4. RCW 35.63.090 and 1985 c 126 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

All regulations shall be worked out as parts of a comprehensive plan which each commission shall prepare for the physical and other generally advantageous development of the municipality and shall be designed, among other things, to encourage the most appropriate use of land throughout the municipality; to lessen traffic congestion and accidents; to secure safety from fire; to provide adequate light and air; to prevent overcrowding of land; to avoid undue concentration of population; to promote a coordinated development of the unbuilt areas; to encourage the formation of neighborhood or community units; to secure an appropriate allotment of land area in new developments for all the requirements of community life; to conserve and restore natural beauty and other natural resources; to encourage and protect access to direct sunlight for solar energy systems; and to facilitate the adequate provision of transportation, water, sewerage and other public uses and requirements, including protection of the quality and quantity of groundwater used for public water supplies in a manner consistent with section 1 of this act. Each plan shall include a review of drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or cleanse those discharges that pollute Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.

Sec. 5. RCW 35A.63.061 and 1985 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The comprehensive plan shall be in such form and of such scope as the code city's ordinance or charter may require. It may consist of a map or maps, diagrams, charts, reports and descriptive and explanatory text or other devices and materials to express, explain, or depict the elements of the plan; and it shall include a recommended plan, scheme, or design for each of the following elements:

(1) A land-use element that designates the proposed general distribution, general location, and extent of the uses of land. These uses may include, but are not limited to, agricultural, residential, commercial, industrial, recreational, educational, public, and other categories of public and private uses of land. The land-use element shall also include estimates of future population growth in, and statements of recommended standards of population density and building intensity for, the area covered by the comprehensive plan. The land use element shall also provide for protection of the quality and quantity of groundwater used for public water supplies in a manner consistent with section 1 of this act and shall review drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or cleanse those discharges that pollute Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.

(2) A circulation element consisting of the general location, alignment, and extent of existing and proposed major thoroughfares, major transportation routes, and major terminal facilities, all of which shall be correlated with the land-use element of the comprehensive plan.

Sec. 6. RCW 36.70.330 and 1985 c 126 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The comprehensive plan shall consist of a map or maps, and descriptive text covering objectives, principles and standards used to develop it, and shall include each of the following elements:

(1) A land use element which designates the proposed general distribution and general location and extent of the uses of land for agriculture, housing, commerce, industry, recreation, education, public buildings and lands, and other categories of public and private use of land, including a statement of the standards of population density and building intensity recommended for the various areas in the jurisdiction and estimates of future population growth in the area covered by the comprehensive plan, all correlated with the land use element of the comprehensive plan. The land use element shall also provide for protection of the quality and quantity of groundwater used for public water supplies in a manner consistent with section 1 of this act and shall review drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or cleanse those discharges that pollute Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound;

(2) A circulation element consisting of the general location, alignment and extent of major thoroughfares, major transportation routes, trunk utility lines, and major terminal facilities, all of which shall be correlated with the land use element of the comprehensive plan;

(3) Any supporting maps, diagrams, charts, descriptive material and reports necessary to explain and supplement the above elements.

--- END ---