BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28C.10.030 and 2014 c 11 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter does not apply to:

(1) Bona fide trade, business, professional, or fraternal organizations conducting educational programs primarily for that organization's membership or offered by that organization on a no-fee basis;

(2) Entities offering education that is exclusively avocational or recreational;

(3) Education not requiring payment of money or other consideration if this education is not advertised or promoted as leading toward educational credentials;

(4) Entities that are established, operated, and governed by this state or its political subdivisions under Title 28A or 28B RCW or this title;

(5) Degree-granting programs in compliance with the rules of the student achievement council;

(6) Any other entity to the extent that it has been exempted from some or all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW 28C.10.100;

(7) Entities not otherwise exempt that are of a religious character, but only as to those educational programs exclusively devoted to religious or theological objectives and represented accurately in institutional catalogs or other official publications;

(8) Entities offering only courses certified by the federal aviation administration;

(9) Barber and cosmetology schools licensed under chapter 18.16 RCW;

(10) Entities which only offer courses approved to meet the continuing education requirements for licensure under chapter 18.04, 18.79, or 48.17 RCW; ((and))

(11) Entities not otherwise exempt offering only workshops or seminars lasting no longer than three calendar days; and

(12) Entities related to the instruction or practice of yoga.

--- END ---