BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART 1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. The legislature finds that:

(1) Washington state government must be organized to be efficient, cost-effective, and responsive to its residents.

(2) Pursuant to existing legislative direction, Washington state continues to transform how it delivers behavioral health services by integrating the financing and delivery of behavioral and physical health care by 2020. Integration will improve prevention and treatment of behavioral health conditions. Integration, leading to better whole person care, should also enable many individuals to avoid commitment at the state psychiatric hospitals or divert from jails, and support them in leading healthy, productive lives.

(3) The responsibility for oversight, purchasing, and management of Washington state's community behavioral health system is currently split between the department of social and health services, which is the state's behavioral health authority, and the health care authority, which is the single state medicaid agency responsible for state health care purchasing.

(4) The health care authority is the state's primary health care purchaser. Integrating and consolidating the oversight and purchasing of state behavioral health care into a single state agency at the health care authority will align core operations and provide better, coordinated, and more cost-effective services, with the ultimate goal of achieving whole person care.

(5) The legislature therefore intends to consolidate state behavioral health care purchasing and oversight within the health care authority, positioning the state to use its full purchasing power to get the greatest value for its investment. The department of social and health services will continue to operate the state mental health institutions, with the intent of further analyzing the future proper alignment of these services.

(6) Similar to the issues with our disparate purchasing programs, the responsibility for licensing and certification of behavioral health providers and facilities is currently spread across multiple agencies, with the department of social and health services regulating some behavioral health providers and the department of health regulating others.

(7) The department of health is responsible for the majority of licensing and certification of health care providers and facilities. The state will best be able to ensure patient safety and reduce administrative burdens of licensing and certification of behavioral health providers and facilities by consolidating those functions within a single agency at the department of health. This change will streamline processes leading to improved patient safety outcomes.

(8) The legislature therefore intends to integrate and consolidate the behavioral health licensing and certification functions within the department of health.

PART 2

Sec. 2001. RCW 43.20A.025 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 415 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department of social and health services)) authority shall adopt rules defining "appropriately trained professional person" for the purposes of conducting mental health and chemical dependency evaluations under RCW 71.34.600(3) and 71.34.650(1).

Sec. 2002. RCW 43.20A.065 and 2002 c 290 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department of social and health services)) authority shall annually review and monitor the expenditures made by any county or group of counties which is funded, in whole or in part, with funds provided by chapter 290, Laws of 2002. Counties shall repay any funds that are not spent in accordance with the requirements of chapter 290, Laws of 2002.

Sec. 2003. RCW 43.20A.433 and 2005 c 504 s 802 are each amended to read as follows:

((Beginning July 1, 2007,)) The ((secretary)) director shall require, in the contracts the ((department)) authority negotiates pursuant to chapters 71.24 and 70.96A RCW, that any vendor rate increases provided for mental health and chemical dependency treatment providers or programs who are parties to the contract or subcontractors of any party to the contract shall be prioritized to those providers and programs that maximize the use of evidence-based and research-based practices((, as those terms are defined in section 603 of this act,)) unless otherwise designated by the legislature.

Sec. 2004. RCW 43.20A.890 and 2010 c 171 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A program for (a) the prevention and treatment of problem and pathological gambling; and (b) the training of professionals in the identification and treatment of problem and pathological gambling is established within the ((department of social and health services)) authority, to be administered by a qualified person who has training and experience in problem gambling or the organization and administration of treatment services for persons suffering from problem gambling. The department of health may license or certify and the authority may contract with treatment facilities for any services provided under the program. The ((department)) authority shall track program participation and client outcomes.

(2) To receive treatment under subsection (1) of this section, a person must:

(a) Need treatment for problem or pathological gambling, or because of the problem or pathological gambling of a family member, but be unable to afford treatment; and

(b) Be targeted by the ((department of social and health services)) authority as being most amenable to treatment.

(3) Treatment under this section is available only to the extent of the funds appropriated or otherwise made available to the ((department of social and health services)) authority for this purpose. The ((department)) authority may solicit and accept for use any gift of money or property made by will or otherwise, and any grant of money, services, or property from the federal government, any tribal government, the state, or any political subdivision thereof or any private source, and do all things necessary to cooperate with the federal government or any of its agencies or any tribal government in making an application for any grant.

(4) ((The department may adopt rules establishing standards for the review and certification of treatment facilities under this program.

(5))) The ((department of social and health services)) authority shall establish an advisory committee to assist it in designing, managing, and evaluating the effectiveness of the program established in this section. The advisory committee shall give due consideration in the design and management of the program that persons who hold licenses or contracts issued by the gambling commission, horse racing commission, and lottery commission are not excluded from, or discouraged from, applying to participate in the program. The committee shall include, at a minimum, persons knowledgeable in the field of problem and pathological gambling and persons representing tribal gambling, privately owned nontribal gambling, and the state lottery.

(((6))) (5) For purposes of this section, "pathological gambling" is a mental disorder characterized by loss of control over gambling, progression in preoccupation with gambling and in obtaining money to gamble, and continuation of gambling despite adverse consequences. "Problem gambling" is an earlier stage of pathological gambling which compromises, disrupts, or damages family or personal relationships or vocational pursuits.

Sec. 2005. RCW 43.20A.892 and 2005 c 369 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The problem gambling account is created in the state treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of the program established under RCW 43.20A.890 (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 2006. RCW 43.20A.893 and 2014 c 225 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receipt of guidance for the creation of common regional service areas from the adult behavioral health system task force established in section 1, chapter 338, Laws of 2013, the ((department and the health care)) authority shall ((jointly)) establish regional service areas as provided in this section.

(2) Counties, through the Washington state association of counties, must be given the opportunity to propose the composition of regional service areas. Each service area must:

(a) Include a sufficient number of medicaid lives to support full financial risk managed care contracting for services included in contracts with the department or the ((health care)) authority;

(b) Include full counties that are contiguous with one another; and

(c) Reflect natural medical and behavioral health service referral patterns and shared clinical, health care service, behavioral health service, and behavioral health crisis response resources.

(3) The Washington state association of counties must submit their recommendations to the department, the ((health care)) authority, and the task force described in section 1, chapter 225, Laws of 2014 on or before August 1, 2014.

Sec. 2007. RCW 43.20A.894 and 2014 c 225 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any agreement or contract by the ((department or the health care)) authority to provide behavioral health services as defined under RCW 71.24.025 to persons eligible for benefits under medicaid, Title XIX of the social security act, and to persons not eligible for medicaid must include the following:

(a) Contractual provisions consistent with the intent expressed in RCW 71.24.015, 71.36.005, ((70.96A.010,)) and 70.96A.011;

(b) Standards regarding the quality of services to be provided, including increased use of evidence-based, research-based, and promising practices, as defined in RCW 71.24.025;

(c) Accountability for the client outcomes established in RCW 43.20A.895, 70.320.020, and 71.36.025 and performance measures linked to those outcomes;

(d) Standards requiring behavioral health organizations to maintain a network of appropriate providers that is supported by written agreements sufficient to provide adequate access to all services covered under the contract with the ((department or the health care)) authority and to protect essential existing behavioral health system infrastructure and capacity, including a continuum of chemical dependency services;

(e) Provisions to require that medically necessary chemical dependency and mental health treatment services be available to clients;

(f) Standards requiring the use of behavioral health service provider reimbursement methods that incentivize improved performance with respect to the client outcomes established in RCW 43.20A.895 and 71.36.025, integration of behavioral health and primary care services at the clinical level, and improved care coordination for individuals with complex care needs;

(g) Standards related to the financial integrity of the responding organization. The ((department)) authority shall adopt rules establishing the solvency requirements and other financial integrity standards for behavioral health organizations. This subsection does not limit the authority of the ((department)) authority to take action under a contract upon finding that a behavioral health organization's financial status jeopardizes the organization's ability to meet its contractual obligations;

(h) Mechanisms for monitoring performance under the contract and remedies for failure to substantially comply with the requirements of the contract including, but not limited to, financial deductions, termination of the contract, receivership, reprocurement of the contract, and injunctive remedies;

(i) Provisions to maintain the decision-making independence of designated mental health professionals or designated chemical dependency specialists; and

(j) Provisions stating that public funds appropriated by the legislature may not be used to promote or deter, encourage, or discourage employees from exercising their rights under Title 29, chapter 7, subchapter II, United States Code or chapter 41.56 RCW.

(2) The following factors must be given significant weight in any purchasing process:

(a) Demonstrated commitment and experience in serving low-income populations;

(b) Demonstrated commitment and experience serving persons who have mental illness, chemical dependency, or co-occurring disorders;

(c) Demonstrated commitment to and experience with partnerships with county and municipal criminal justice systems, housing services, and other critical support services necessary to achieve the outcomes established in RCW 43.20A.895, 70.320.020, and 71.36.025;

(d) Recognition that meeting enrollees' physical and behavioral health care needs is a shared responsibility of contracted behavioral health organizations, managed health care systems, service providers, the state, and communities;

(e) Consideration of past and current performance and participation in other state or federal behavioral health programs as a contractor; and

(f) The ability to meet requirements established by the ((department)) authority.

(3) For purposes of purchasing behavioral health services and medical care services for persons eligible for benefits under medicaid, Title XIX of the social security act and for persons not eligible for medicaid, the ((department and the health care)) authority must use ((common)) regional service areas. The regional service areas must be established by the ((department and the health care)) authority as provided in RCW 43.20A.893 (as recodified by this act).

(4) Consideration must be given to using multiple-biennia contracting periods.

(5) Each behavioral health organization operating pursuant to a contract issued under this section shall enroll clients within its regional service area who meet the ((department's)) authority's eligibility criteria for mental health and chemical dependency services.

Sec. 2008. RCW 43.20A.896 and 2014 c 225 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((secretary)) director shall require that behavioral health organizations offer contracts to managed health care systems under chapter 74.09 RCW or primary care practice settings to promote access to the services of chemical dependency professionals under chapter 18.205 RCW and mental health professionals, as defined by the department of health in rule, for the purposes of integrating such services into primary care settings for individuals with behavioral health and medical comorbidities.

Sec. 2009. RCW 43.20A.897 and 2014 c 225 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By November 30, 2013, the department and the ((health care)) authority must report to the governor and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, a plan that establishes a tribal-centric behavioral health system incorporating both mental health and chemical dependency services. The plan must assure that child, adult, and older adult American Indians and Alaskan Natives eligible for medicaid have increased access to culturally appropriate mental health and chemical dependency services. The plan must:

(a) Include implementation dates, major milestones, and fiscal estimates as needed;

(b) Emphasize the use of culturally appropriate evidence-based and promising practices;

(c) Address equitable access to crisis services, outpatient care, voluntary and involuntary hospitalization, and behavioral health care coordination;

(d) Identify statutory changes necessary to implement the tribal-centric behavioral health system; and

(e) Be developed with the department's Indian policy advisory committee and the American Indian health commission, in consultation with Washington's federally recognized tribes.

(2) The ((department)) authority shall enter into agreements with the tribes and urban Indian health programs and modify behavioral health organization contracts as necessary to develop a tribal-centric behavioral health system that better serves the needs of the tribes.

Sec. 2010. RCW 74.04.015 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 62 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary of social and health services shall be the responsible state officer for the administration and disbursement of all funds, goods, commodities, and services, which may be received by the state in connection with programs of public assistance or services related directly or indirectly to assistance programs, and all other matters included in the federal social security act as amended, or any other federal act or as the same may be amended except as otherwise provided by law.

(2) The director shall be the responsible state officer for the administration and disbursement of funds that the state receives in connection with the medical services programs established under chapter 74.09 RCW, including the state children's health insurance program, Titles XIX and XXI of the social security act of 1935, as amended, and programs established under chapter 71.05, 71.24, and 71.34 RCW that are under the director's authority.

(3) The department and the authority, as appropriate, shall make such reports and render such accounting as may be required by federal law.

PART 3

Sec. 3001. RCW 71.05.020 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 14 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;

(2) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(3) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical antipsychotic medications;

(4) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW;

(5) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a patient;

(6) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority;

(7) "Chemical dependency" means:

(a) Alcoholism;

(b) Drug addiction; or

(c) Dependence on alcohol and one or more psychoactive chemicals, as the context requires;

(((7))) (8) "Chemical dependency professional" means a person certified as a chemical dependency professional by the department ((of health)) under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(((8))) (9) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;

(((9))) (10) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;

(((10))) (11) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department ((of health and certified by the department of social and health services)) under RCW 71.24.035, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization;

(((11))) (12) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment;

(((12))) (13) "Department" means the department of ((social and)) health ((services));

(((13))) (14) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health professional appointed by the behavioral health organization to perform the duties specified in this chapter;

(((14))) (15) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter;

(((15))) (16) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of social and health services;

(((16))) (17) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW 71A.10.020(5);

(((17))) (18) "Director" means the director of the authority;

(19) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order;

(((18))) (20) "Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(((19))) (21) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a mental disorder, and which is licensed or certified as such by the department. The ((department)) authority may certify single beds as temporary evaluation and treatment beds under RCW 71.05.745. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department of social and health services or any federal agency will not require certification. No correctional institution or facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter;

(((20))) (22) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a result of a mental disorder, or as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;

(((21))) (23) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged criminal conduct;

(((22))) (24) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, a long-term alcoholism or drug treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;

(((23))) (25) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;

(((24))) (26) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:

(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;

(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;

(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;

(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;

(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and

(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences;

(((25))) (27) "Information related to mental health services" means all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services by a mental health service provider. This may include documents of legal proceedings under this chapter or chapter 71.34 or 10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information;

(((26))) (28) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals;

(((27))) (29) "In need of assisted outpatient mental health treatment" means that a person, as a result of a mental disorder: (a) Has been committed by a court to detention for involuntary mental health treatment at least twice during the preceding thirty-six months, or, if the person is currently committed for involuntary mental health treatment, the person has been committed to detention for involuntary mental health treatment at least once during the thirty-six months preceding the date of initial detention of the current commitment cycle; (b) is unlikely to voluntarily participate in outpatient treatment without an order for less restrictive alternative treatment, in view of the person's treatment history or current behavior; (c) is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision; (d) is likely to benefit from less restrictive alternative treatment; and (e) requires less restrictive alternative treatment to prevent a relapse, decompensation, or deterioration that is likely to result in the person presenting a likelihood of serious harm or the person becoming gravely disabled within a reasonably short period of time. For purposes of (a) of this subsection, time spent in a mental health facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction is excluded from the thirty-six month calculation;

(((28))) (30) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(((29))) (31) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public mental health and substance use disorder service providers under RCW 71.05.130;

(((30))) (32) "Less restrictive alternative treatment" means a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.05.585;

(((31))) (33) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington;

(((32))) (34) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or

(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts;

(((33))) (35) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder;

(((34))) (36) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive or volitional functions;

(((35))) (37) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(((36))) (38) "Mental health service provider" means a public or private agency that provides mental health services to persons with mental disorders or substance use disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from public sources. This includes, but is not limited to, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in this section, community mental health service delivery systems or behavioral health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025, facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW, approved substance use disorder treatment programs as defined in this section, secure detoxification facilities as defined in this section, and correctional facilities operated by state and local governments;

(((37))) (39) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment;

(((38))) (40) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.57A or 18.71A RCW;

(((39))) (41) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders;

(((40))) (42) "Professional person" means a mental health professional, chemical dependency professional, or designated crisis responder and shall also mean a physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(((41))) (43) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a person who is licensed as an advanced registered nurse practitioner pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;

(((42))) (44) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology;

(((43))) (45) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;

(((44))) (46) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, secure detoxification facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders, if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments;

(((45) "Registration records" include all the records of the department, behavioral health organizations, treatment facilities, and other persons providing services to the department, county departments, or facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness or substance use disorders;

(46))) (47) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter;

(((47))) (48) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW;

(((48))) (49) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of ((social and)) health ((services)), or his or her designee;

(((49))) (50) "Secure detoxification facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency that:

(a) Provides for intoxicated persons:

(i) Evaluation and assessment, provided by certified chemical dependency professionals;

(ii) Acute or subacute detoxification services; and

(iii) Discharge assistance provided by certified chemical dependency professionals, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Includes security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Is licensed or certified as such by the department of health;

(((50))) (51) "Serious violent offense" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9.94A.030;

(((51))) (52) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010;

(((52))) (53) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances;

(((53))) (54) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties;

(((54))) (55) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department of social and health services, ((by)) the department, the authority, behavioral health organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;

(((55))) (56) "Triage facility" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department ((of health and certified by the department of social and health services)) under RCW 71.24.035, which is designed as a facility to assess and stabilize an individual or determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual, and must meet department ((of health)) residential treatment facility standards. A triage facility may be structured as a voluntary or involuntary placement facility;

(((56))) (57) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to property.

Sec. 3002. RCW 71.05.026 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except for monetary damage claims which have been reduced to final judgment by a superior court, this section applies to all claims against the state, state agencies, state officials, or state employees that exist on or arise after March 29, 2006.

(2) Except as expressly provided in contracts entered into between the ((department)) authority and the behavioral health organizations after March 29, 2006, the entities identified in subsection (3) of this section shall have no claim for declaratory relief, injunctive relief, judicial review under chapter 34.05 RCW, or civil liability against the state or state agencies for actions or inactions performed pursuant to the administration of this chapter with regard to the following: (a) The allocation or payment of federal or state funds; (b) the use or allocation of state hospital beds; or (c) financial responsibility for the provision of inpatient mental health care or inpatient substance use disorder treatment.

(3) This section applies to counties, behavioral health organizations, and entities which contract to provide behavioral health organization services and their subcontractors, agents, or employees.

Sec. 3003. RCW 71.05.027 and 2014 c 225 s 82 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Not later than January 1, 2007, all persons providing treatment under this chapter shall also implement the integrated comprehensive screening and assessment process for chemical dependency and mental disorders adopted pursuant to RCW ((70.96C.010)) 71.24.630 and shall document the numbers of clients with co-occurring mental and substance abuse disorders based on a quadrant system of low and high needs.

(2) Treatment providers and behavioral health organizations who fail to implement the integrated comprehensive screening and assessment process for chemical dependency and mental disorders by July 1, 2007, shall be subject to contractual penalties established under RCW ((70.96C.010)) 71.24.630.

Sec. 3004. RCW 71.05.040 and 2004 c 166 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Persons ((who are developmentally disabled)) with developmental disabilities, impaired by ((chronic alcoholism or drug abuse)) substance use disorder, or suffering from dementia shall not be detained for evaluation and treatment or judicially committed solely by reason of that condition unless such condition causes a person to be gravely disabled or as a result of a mental disorder such condition exists that constitutes a likelihood of serious harm((: Provided)). However, ((That)) persons ((who are developmentally disabled)) with developmental disabilities, impaired by ((chronic alcoholism or drug abuse)) substance use disorder, or suffering from dementia and who otherwise meet the criteria for detention or judicial commitment are not ineligible for detention or commitment based on this condition alone.

Sec. 3005. RCW 71.05.100 and 1997 c 112 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the responsibility provided for by RCW 43.20B.330, any person, or his or her estate, or his or her spouse, or the parents of a minor person who is involuntarily detained pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of treatment and evaluation outside of a facility maintained and operated by the department of social and health services shall be responsible for the cost of such care and treatment. In the event that an individual is unable to pay for such treatment or in the event payment would result in a substantial hardship upon the individual or his or her family, then the county of residence of such person shall be responsible for such costs. If it is not possible to determine the county of residence of the person, the cost shall be borne by the county where the person was originally detained. The department of social and health services, or the authority, as appropriate, shall, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, adopt standards as to (1) inability to pay in whole or in part, (2) a definition of substantial hardship, and (3) appropriate payment schedules. ((Such standards shall be applicable to all county mental health administrative boards.)) Financial responsibility with respect to ((department)) services and facilities of the department of social and health services shall continue to be as provided in RCW 43.20B.320 through 43.20B.360 and 43.20B.370.

Sec. 3006. RCW 71.05.203 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 14 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((department)) authority and each behavioral health organization or agency employing designated crisis responders shall publish information in an easily accessible format describing the process for an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator to petition for court review of a detention decision under RCW 71.05.201.

(2) A designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency that receives a request for investigation for possible detention under this chapter must inquire whether the request comes from an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator who would be eligible to petition under RCW 71.05.201. If the designated crisis responder decides not to detain the person for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or forty-eight hours have elapsed since the request for investigation was received and the designated crisis responder has not taken action to have the person detained, the designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency must inform the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator who made the request for investigation about the process to petition for court review under RCW 71.05.201 and, to the extent feasible, provide the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator with written or electronic information about the petition process. If provision of written or electronic information is not feasible, the designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency must refer the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator to a web site where published information on the petition process may be accessed. The designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency must document the manner and date on which the information required under this subsection was provided to the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator.

(3) A designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency must, upon request, disclose the date of a designated crisis responder investigation under this chapter to an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator of a person to assist in the preparation of a petition under RCW 71.05.201.

Sec. 3007. RCW 71.05.214 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 227 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) authority shall develop statewide protocols to be utilized by professional persons and designated crisis responders in administration of this chapter and chapter 10.77 RCW. The protocols shall be updated at least every three years. The protocols shall provide uniform development and application of criteria in evaluation and commitment recommendations, of persons who have, or are alleged to have, mental disorders or substance use disorders and are subject to this chapter.

The initial protocols shall be developed not later than September 1, 1999. The ((department)) authority shall develop and update the protocols in consultation with representatives of designated crisis responders, the department of social and health services, local government, law enforcement, county and city prosecutors, public defenders, and groups concerned with mental illness and substance use disorders. The protocols shall be submitted to the governor and legislature upon adoption by the ((department)) authority.

Sec. 3008. RCW 71.05.215 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 228 and 2016 c 155 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A person found to be gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm as a result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder has a right to refuse antipsychotic medication unless it is determined that the failure to medicate may result in a likelihood of serious harm or substantial deterioration or substantially prolong the length of involuntary commitment and there is no less intrusive course of treatment than medication in the best interest of that person.

(2) The ((department)) authority shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this chapter. These rules shall include:

(a) An attempt to obtain the informed consent of the person prior to administration of antipsychotic medication.

(b) For short-term treatment up to thirty days, the right to refuse antipsychotic medications unless there is an additional concurring medical opinion approving medication by a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician or physician assistant in consultation with a mental health professional with prescriptive authority.

(c) For continued treatment beyond thirty days through the hearing on any petition filed under RCW 71.05.217, the right to periodic review of the decision to medicate by the medical director or designee.

(d) Administration of antipsychotic medication in an emergency and review of this decision within twenty-four hours. An emergency exists if the person presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, and medically acceptable alternatives to administration of antipsychotic medications are not available or are unlikely to be successful; and in the opinion of the physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, the person's condition constitutes an emergency requiring the treatment be instituted prior to obtaining a second medical opinion.

(e) Documentation in the medical record of the attempt by the physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner to obtain informed consent and the reasons why antipsychotic medication is being administered over the person's objection or lack of consent.

Sec. 3009. RCW 71.05.240 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 232 and 2016 c 45 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) If a petition is filed for fourteen day involuntary treatment or ninety days of less restrictive alternative treatment, the court shall hold a probable cause hearing within seventy-two hours of the initial detention or involuntary outpatient evaluation of such person as determined in RCW 71.05.180. If requested by the person or his or her attorney, the hearing may be postponed for a period not to exceed forty-eight hours. The hearing may also be continued subject to the conditions set forth in RCW 71.05.210 or subject to the petitioner's showing of good cause for a period not to exceed twenty-four hours.

(2) If the petition is for mental health treatment, the court at the time of the probable cause hearing and before an order of commitment is entered shall inform the person both orally and in writing that the failure to make a good faith effort to seek voluntary treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.230 will result in the loss of his or her firearm rights if the person is subsequently detained for involuntary treatment under this section.

(3)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, at the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that such person, as the result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled, and, after considering less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and treatment, finds that no such alternatives are in the best interests of such person or others, the court shall order that such person be detained for involuntary treatment not to exceed fourteen days in a facility licensed or certified to provide treatment by the department.

(b) Commitment for up to fourteen days based on a substance use disorder must be to either a secure detoxification facility or an approved substance use disorder treatment program. A court may only enter a commitment order based on a substance use disorder if there is an available secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program with adequate space for the person.

(c) At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that such person, as the result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled, but that treatment in a less restrictive setting than detention is in the best interest of such person or others, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment for not to exceed ninety days.

(d) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that such person, as the result of a mental disorder, is in need of assisted outpatient mental health treatment, and that the person does not present a likelihood of serious harm or grave disability, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment not to exceed ninety days, and may not order inpatient treatment.

(e) An order for less restrictive alternative treatment must name the mental health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the services planned by the mental health service provider.

(4) The court shall specifically state to such person and give such person notice in writing that if involuntary treatment beyond the fourteen day period or beyond the ninety days of less restrictive treatment is to be sought, such person will have the right to a full hearing or jury trial as required by RCW 71.05.310. If the commitment is for mental health treatment, the court shall also state to the person and provide written notice that the person is barred from the possession of firearms and that the prohibition remains in effect until a court restores his or her right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.047.

Sec. 3010. RCW 71.05.240 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 233 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a petition is filed for fourteen day involuntary treatment or ninety days of less restrictive alternative treatment, the court shall hold a probable cause hearing within seventy-two hours of the initial detention or involuntary outpatient evaluation of such person as determined in RCW 71.05.180. If requested by the person or his or her attorney, the hearing may be postponed for a period not to exceed forty-eight hours. The hearing may also be continued subject to the conditions set forth in RCW 71.05.210 or subject to the petitioner's showing of good cause for a period not to exceed twenty-four hours.

(2) If the petition is for mental health treatment, the court at the time of the probable cause hearing and before an order of commitment is entered shall inform the person both orally and in writing that the failure to make a good faith effort to seek voluntary treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.230 will result in the loss of his or her firearm rights if the person is subsequently detained for involuntary treatment under this section.

(3)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, at the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that such person, as the result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled, and, after considering less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and treatment, finds that no such alternatives are in the best interests of such person or others, the court shall order that such person be detained for involuntary treatment not to exceed fourteen days in a facility licensed or certified to provide treatment by the department.

(b) Commitment for up to fourteen days based on a substance use disorder must be to either a secure detoxification facility or an approved substance use disorder treatment program.

(c) At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that such person, as the result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled, but that treatment in a less restrictive setting than detention is in the best interest of such person or others, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment for not to exceed ninety days.

(d) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that such person, as the result of a mental disorder, is in need of assisted outpatient mental health treatment, and that the person does not present a likelihood of serious harm or grave disability, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment not to exceed ninety days, and may not order inpatient treatment.

(e) An order for less restrictive alternative treatment must name the mental health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the services planned by the mental health service provider.

(4) The court shall specifically state to such person and give such person notice in writing that if involuntary treatment beyond the fourteen day period or beyond the ninety days of less restrictive treatment is to be sought, such person will have the right to a full hearing or jury trial as required by RCW 71.05.310. If the commitment is for mental health treatment, the court shall also state to the person and provide written notice that the person is barred from the possession of firearms and that the prohibition remains in effect until a court restores his or her right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.047.

Sec. 3011. RCW 71.05.285 and 2001 c 12 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In determining whether an inpatient or less restrictive alternative commitment under the process provided in RCW 71.05.280 and 71.05.320(((2))) (4) is appropriate, great weight shall be given to evidence of a prior history or pattern of decompensation and discontinuation of treatment resulting in: (1) Repeated hospitalizations; or (2) repeated peace officer interventions resulting in juvenile offenses, criminal charges, diversion programs, or jail admissions. Such evidence may be used to provide a factual basis for concluding that the individual would not receive, if released, such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.

Sec. 3012. RCW 71.05.320 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 237 and 2016 c 45 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, if the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280 have been proven and that the best interests of the person or others will not be served by a less restrictive treatment which is an alternative to detention, the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the department of social and health services or to a facility certified for ninety day treatment by the department for a further period of intensive treatment not to exceed ninety days from the date of judgment.

(b) If the order for inpatient treatment is based on a substance use disorder, treatment must take place at an approved substance use disorder treatment program. The court may only enter an order for commitment based on a substance use disorder if there is an available approved substance use disorder treatment program with adequate space for the person.

(c) If the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis of commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to but not exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment ((in)) to the custody of the department of social and health services or to a facility certified for one hundred eighty day treatment by the department.

(2) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280 have been proven, but finds that treatment less restrictive than detention will be in the best interest of the person or others, then the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the department of social and health services or to a facility certified for ninety day treatment by the department or to a less restrictive alternative for a further period of less restrictive treatment not to exceed ninety days from the date of judgment. If the order for less restrictive treatment is based on a substance use disorder, treatment must be provided by an approved substance use disorder treatment program. If the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis of commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to but not exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment. If the court or jury finds that the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(5) have been proven, and provide the only basis for commitment, the court must enter an order for less restrictive alternative treatment for up to ninety days from the date of judgment and may not order inpatient treatment.

(3) An order for less restrictive alternative treatment entered under subsection (2) of this section must name the mental health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the services planned by the mental health service provider.

(4) The person shall be released from involuntary treatment at the expiration of the period of commitment imposed under subsection (1) or (2) of this section unless the superintendent or professional person in charge of the facility in which he or she is confined, or in the event of a less restrictive alternative, the designated crisis responder, files a new petition for involuntary treatment on the grounds that the committed person:

(a) During the current period of court ordered treatment: (i) Has threatened, attempted, or inflicted physical harm upon the person of another, or substantial damage upon the property of another, and (ii) as a result of a mental disorder, substance use disorder, or developmental disability presents a likelihood of serious harm; or

(b) Was taken into custody as a result of conduct in which he or she attempted or inflicted serious physical harm upon the person of another, and continues to present, as a result of mental disorder, substance use disorder, or developmental disability a likelihood of serious harm; or

(c)(i) Is in custody pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) and as a result of mental disorder or developmental disability continues to present a substantial likelihood of repeating acts similar to the charged criminal behavior, when considering the person's life history, progress in treatment, and the public safety.

(ii) In cases under this subsection where the court has made an affirmative special finding under RCW 71.05.280(3)(b), the commitment shall continue for up to an additional one hundred eighty day period whenever the petition presents prima facie evidence that the person continues to suffer from a mental disorder or developmental disability that results in a substantial likelihood of committing acts similar to the charged criminal behavior, unless the person presents proof through an admissible expert opinion that the person's condition has so changed such that the mental disorder or developmental disability no longer presents a substantial likelihood of the person committing acts similar to the charged criminal behavior. The initial or additional commitment period may include transfer to a specialized program of intensive support and treatment, which may be initiated prior to or after discharge from the state hospital; or

(d) Continues to be gravely disabled; or

(e) Is in need of assisted outpatient mental health treatment.

If the conduct required to be proven in (b) and (c) of this subsection was found by a judge or jury in a prior trial under this chapter, it shall not be necessary to prove such conduct again.

If less restrictive alternative treatment is sought, the petition shall set forth any recommendations for less restrictive alternative treatment services.

(5) A new petition for involuntary treatment filed under subsection (4) of this section shall be filed and heard in the superior court of the county of the facility which is filing the new petition for involuntary treatment unless good cause is shown for a change of venue. The cost of the proceedings shall be borne by the state.

(6)(a) The hearing shall be held as provided in RCW 71.05.310, and if the court or jury finds that the grounds for additional confinement as set forth in this section are present, subject to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court may order the committed person returned for an additional period of treatment not to exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section. If the court's order is based solely on the grounds identified in subsection (4)(e) of this section, the court may enter an order for less restrictive alternative treatment not to exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment, and may not enter an order for inpatient treatment. An order for less restrictive alternative treatment must name the mental health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the services planned by the mental health service provider.

(b) At the end of the one hundred eighty day period of commitment, or one-year period of commitment if subsection (7) of this section applies, the committed person shall be released unless a petition for an additional one hundred eighty day period of continued treatment is filed and heard in the same manner as provided in this section. Successive one hundred eighty day commitments are permissible on the same grounds and pursuant to the same procedures as the original one hundred eighty day commitment.

(7) An order for less restrictive treatment entered under subsection (6) of this section may be for up to one year when the person's previous commitment term was for intensive inpatient treatment in a state hospital.

(8) No person committed as provided in this section may be detained unless a valid order of commitment is in effect. No order of commitment can exceed one hundred eighty days in length except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

Sec. 3013. RCW 71.05.320 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 238 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280 have been proven and that the best interests of the person or others will not be served by a less restrictive treatment which is an alternative to detention, the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the department of social and health services or to a facility certified for ninety day treatment by the department for a further period of intensive treatment not to exceed ninety days from the date of judgment.

If the order for inpatient treatment is based on a substance use disorder, treatment must take place at an approved substance use disorder treatment program. If the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis of commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to but not exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment ((in)) to the custody of the department of social and health services or to a facility certified for one hundred eighty day treatment by the department.

(2) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280 have been proven, but finds that treatment less restrictive than detention will be in the best interest of the person or others, then the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the department of social and health services or to a facility certified for ninety day treatment by the department or to a less restrictive alternative for a further period of less restrictive treatment not to exceed ninety days from the date of judgment. If the order for less restrictive treatment is based on a substance use disorder, treatment must be provided by an approved substance use disorder treatment program. If the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis of commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to but not exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment. If the court or jury finds that the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(5) have been proven, and provide the only basis for commitment, the court must enter an order for less restrictive alternative treatment for up to ninety days from the date of judgment and may not order inpatient treatment.

(3) An order for less restrictive alternative treatment entered under subsection (2) of this section must name the mental health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the services planned by the mental health service provider.

(4) The person shall be released from involuntary treatment at the expiration of the period of commitment imposed under subsection (1) or (2) of this section unless the superintendent or professional person in charge of the facility in which he or she is confined, or in the event of a less restrictive alternative, the designated crisis responder, files a new petition for involuntary treatment on the grounds that the committed person:

(a) During the current period of court ordered treatment: (i) Has threatened, attempted, or inflicted physical harm upon the person of another, or substantial damage upon the property of another, and (ii) as a result of a mental disorder, substance use disorder, or developmental disability presents a likelihood of serious harm; or

(b) Was taken into custody as a result of conduct in which he or she attempted or inflicted serious physical harm upon the person of another, and continues to present, as a result of mental disorder, substance use disorder, or developmental disability a likelihood of serious harm; or

(c)(i) Is in custody pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) and as a result of mental disorder or developmental disability continues to present a substantial likelihood of repeating acts similar to the charged criminal behavior, when considering the person's life history, progress in treatment, and the public safety.

(ii) In cases under this subsection where the court has made an affirmative special finding under RCW 71.05.280(3)(b), the commitment shall continue for up to an additional one hundred eighty day period whenever the petition presents prima facie evidence that the person continues to suffer from a mental disorder or developmental disability that results in a substantial likelihood of committing acts similar to the charged criminal behavior, unless the person presents proof through an admissible expert opinion that the person's condition has so changed such that the mental disorder or developmental disability no longer presents a substantial likelihood of the person committing acts similar to the charged criminal behavior. The initial or additional commitment period may include transfer to a specialized program of intensive support and treatment, which may be initiated prior to or after discharge from the state hospital; or

(d) Continues to be gravely disabled; or

(e) Is in need of assisted outpatient mental health treatment.

If the conduct required to be proven in (b) and (c) of this subsection was found by a judge or jury in a prior trial under this chapter, it shall not be necessary to prove such conduct again.

If less restrictive alternative treatment is sought, the petition shall set forth any recommendations for less restrictive alternative treatment services.

(5) A new petition for involuntary treatment filed under subsection (4) of this section shall be filed and heard in the superior court of the county of the facility which is filing the new petition for involuntary treatment unless good cause is shown for a change of venue. The cost of the proceedings shall be borne by the state.

(6)(a) The hearing shall be held as provided in RCW 71.05.310, and if the court or jury finds that the grounds for additional confinement as set forth in this section are present, the court may order the committed person returned for an additional period of treatment not to exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section. If the court's order is based solely on the grounds identified in subsection (4)(e) of this section, the court may enter an order for less restrictive alternative treatment not to exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment, and may not enter an order for inpatient treatment. An order for less restrictive alternative treatment must name the mental health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the services planned by the mental health service provider.

(b) At the end of the one hundred eighty day period of commitment, or one-year period of commitment if subsection (7) of this section applies, the committed person shall be released unless a petition for an additional one hundred eighty day period of continued treatment is filed and heard in the same manner as provided in this section. Successive one hundred eighty day commitments are permissible on the same grounds and pursuant to the same procedures as the original one hundred eighty day commitment.

(7) An order for less restrictive treatment entered under subsection (6) of this section may be for up to one year when the person's previous commitment term was for intensive inpatient treatment in a state hospital.

(8) No person committed as provided in this section may be detained unless a valid order of commitment is in effect. No order of commitment can exceed one hundred eighty days in length except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

Sec. 3014. RCW 71.05.325 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 239 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before a person committed under grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) is released because a new petition for involuntary treatment has not been filed under RCW 71.05.320(((3))) (4), the superintendent, professional person, or designated crisis responder responsible for the decision whether to file a new petition shall in writing notify the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the criminal charges against the committed person were dismissed, of the decision not to file a new petition for involuntary treatment. Notice shall be provided at least forty-five days before the period of commitment expires.

(2)(a) Before a person committed under grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) is permitted temporarily to leave a treatment facility pursuant to RCW 71.05.270 for any period of time without constant accompaniment by facility staff, the superintendent, professional person in charge of a treatment facility, or his or her professional designee shall in writing notify the prosecuting attorney of any county of the person's destination and the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the criminal charges against the committed person were dismissed. The notice shall be provided at least forty-five days before the anticipated leave and shall describe the conditions under which the leave is to occur.

(b) The provisions of RCW 71.05.330(2) apply to proposed leaves, and either or both prosecuting attorneys receiving notice under this subsection may petition the court under RCW 71.05.330(2).

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize detention of a person unless a valid order of commitment is in effect.

(4) The existence of the notice requirements in this section will not require any extension of the leave date in the event the leave plan changes after notification.

(5) The notice requirements contained in this section shall not apply to emergency medical transfers.

(6) The notice provisions of this section are in addition to those provided in RCW 71.05.425.

Sec. 3015. RCW 71.05.330 and 1998 c 297 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the superintendent or professional person in charge of the hospital or facility in which the person is being involuntarily treated from releasing him or her prior to the expiration of the commitment period when, in the opinion of the superintendent or professional person in charge, the person being involuntarily treated no longer presents a likelihood of serious harm.

Whenever the superintendent or professional person in charge of a hospital or facility providing involuntary treatment pursuant to this chapter releases a person prior to the expiration of the period of commitment, the superintendent or professional person in charge shall in writing notify the court which committed the person for treatment.

(2) Before a person committed under grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(((2))) (4)(c) is released under this section, the superintendent or professional person in charge shall in writing notify the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the criminal charges against the committed person were dismissed, of the release date. Notice shall be provided at least thirty days before the release date. Within twenty days after receiving notice, the prosecuting attorney may petition the court in the county in which the person is being involuntarily treated for a hearing to determine whether the person is to be released. The prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the petition to the superintendent or professional person in charge of the hospital or facility providing involuntary treatment, the attorney, if any, and the guardian or conservator of the committed person. The court shall conduct a hearing on the petition within ten days of filing the petition. The committed person shall have the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as for an involuntary treatment proceeding, except as set forth in this subsection and except that there shall be no right to jury trial. The issue to be determined at the hearing is whether or not the person may be released without substantial danger to other persons, or substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security. If the court disapproves of the release, it may do so only on the basis of substantial evidence. Pursuant to the determination of the court upon the hearing, the committed person shall be released or shall be returned for involuntary treatment subject to release at the end of the period for which he or she was committed, or otherwise in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 3016. RCW 71.05.335 and 1986 c 67 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

In any proceeding under this chapter to modify a commitment order of a person committed to inpatient treatment under grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(((2))) (4)(c) in which the requested relief includes treatment less restrictive than detention, the prosecuting attorney shall be entitled to intervene. The party initiating the motion to modify the commitment order shall serve the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the criminal charges against the committed person were dismissed with written notice and copies of the initiating papers.

Sec. 3017. RCW 71.05.340 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 240 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) When, in the opinion of the superintendent or the professional person in charge of the hospital or facility providing involuntary treatment, the committed person can be appropriately served by outpatient treatment prior to or at the expiration of the period of commitment, then such outpatient care may be required as a term of conditional release for a period which, when added to the inpatient treatment period, shall not exceed the period of commitment. If the facility or agency designated to provide outpatient treatment is other than the facility providing involuntary treatment, the outpatient facility so designated must agree in writing to assume such responsibility. A copy of the terms of conditional release shall be given to the patient, the designated crisis responder in the county in which the patient is to receive outpatient treatment, and to the court of original commitment.

(b) Before a person committed under grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(4)(c) is conditionally released under (a) of this subsection, the superintendent or professional person in charge of the hospital or facility providing involuntary treatment shall in writing notify the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the criminal charges against the committed person were dismissed, of the decision to conditionally release the person. Notice and a copy of the terms of conditional release shall be provided at least thirty days before the person is released from inpatient care. Within twenty days after receiving notice, the prosecuting attorney may petition the court in the county that issued the commitment order to hold a hearing to determine whether the person may be conditionally released and the terms of the conditional release. The prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the petition to the superintendent or professional person in charge of the hospital or facility providing involuntary treatment, the attorney, if any, and guardian or conservator of the committed person, and the court of original commitment. If the county in which the committed person is to receive outpatient treatment is the same county in which the criminal charges against the committed person were dismissed, then the court shall, upon the motion of the prosecuting attorney, transfer the proceeding to the court in that county. The court shall conduct a hearing on the petition within ten days of the filing of the petition. The committed person shall have the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as for an involuntary treatment proceeding, except as set forth in this subsection and except that there shall be no right to jury trial. The issue to be determined at the hearing is whether or not the person may be conditionally released without substantial danger to other persons, or substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security. If the court disapproves of the conditional release, it may do so only on the basis of substantial evidence. Pursuant to the determination of the court upon the hearing, the conditional release of the person shall be approved by the court on the same or modified conditions or the person shall be returned for involuntary treatment on an inpatient basis subject to release at the end of the period for which he or she was committed, or otherwise in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(2) The facility or agency designated to provide outpatient care or the secretary of the department of social and health services may modify the conditions for continued release when such modification is in the best interest of the person. Notification of such changes shall be sent to all persons receiving a copy of the original conditions. Enforcement or revocation proceedings related to a conditional release order may occur as provided under RCW 71.05.590.

Sec. 3018. RCW 71.05.350 and 1997 c 112 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

No indigent patient shall be conditionally released or discharged from involuntary treatment without suitable clothing, and the superintendent of a state hospital shall furnish the same, together with such sum of money as he or she deems necessary for the immediate welfare of the patient. Such sum of money shall be the same as the amount required by RCW 72.02.100 to be provided to persons in need being released from correctional institutions. As funds are available, the secretary of the department of social and health services may provide payment to indigent persons conditionally released pursuant to this chapter consistent with the optional provisions of RCW 72.02.100 and 72.02.110, and may adopt rules and regulations to do so.

Sec. 3019. RCW 71.05.425 and 2013 c 289 s 6 and 2013 c 200 s 30 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the earliest possible date, and in no event later than thirty days before conditional release, final release, authorized leave under RCW 71.05.325(2), or transfer to a facility other than a state mental hospital, the superintendent shall send written notice of conditional release, release, authorized leave, or transfer of a person committed under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(((3))) (4)(c) following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony harassment offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4) to the following:

(i) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the person will reside;

(ii) The sheriff of the county in which the person will reside; and

(iii) The prosecuting attorney of the county in which the criminal charges against the committed person were dismissed.

(b) The same notice as required by (a) of this subsection shall be sent to the following, if such notice has been requested in writing about a specific person committed under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(((3))) (4)(c) following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony harassment offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4):

(i) The victim of the sex, violent, or felony harassment offense that was dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4) preceding commitment under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(((3))) (4)(c) or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide;

(ii) Any witnesses who testified against the person in any court proceedings;

(iii) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney. Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are confidential and shall not be available to the person committed under this chapter; and

(iv) The chief of police of the city, if any, and the sheriff of the county, if any, which had jurisdiction of the person on the date of the applicable offense.

(c) The thirty-day notice requirements contained in this subsection shall not apply to emergency medical transfers.

(d) The existence of the notice requirements in this subsection will not require any extension of the release date in the event the release plan changes after notification.

(2) If a person committed under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(((3))) (4)(c) following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony harassment offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4) escapes, the superintendent shall immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the county in which the person escaped and in which the person resided immediately before the person's arrest and the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the criminal charges against the committed person were dismissed. If previously requested, the superintendent shall also notify the witnesses and the victim of the sex, violent, or felony harassment offense that was dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4) preceding commitment under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(((3))) (4) or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide. In addition, the secretary shall also notify appropriate parties pursuant to RCW 70.02.230(2)(n). If the person is recaptured, the superintendent shall send notice to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as possible but in no event later than two working days after the department of social and health services learns of such recapture.

(3) If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be sent to the parent or legal guardian of the child.

(4) The superintendent shall send the notices required by this chapter to the last address provided to the department of social and health services by the requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department of social and health services with a current address.

(5) For purposes of this section the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) "Violent offense" means a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) "Sex offense" means a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030;

(c) "Next of kin" means a person's spouse, state registered domestic partner, parents, siblings, and children;

(d) "Felony harassment offense" means a crime of harassment as defined in RCW 9A.46.060 that is a felony.

Sec. 3020. RCW 71.05.435 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 246 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a person who is the subject of an involuntary commitment order under this chapter is discharged from an evaluation and treatment facility, state hospital, secure detoxification facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program providing involuntary treatment services, the entity discharging the person shall provide notice of the person's discharge to the designated crisis responder office responsible for the initial commitment and the designated crisis responder office that serves the county in which the person is expected to reside. The entity discharging the person must also provide these offices with a copy of any less restrictive order or conditional release order entered in conjunction with the discharge of the person, unless the entity discharging the person has entered into a memorandum of understanding obligating another entity to provide these documents.

(2) The notice and documents referred to in subsection (1) of this section shall be provided as soon as possible and no later than one business day following the discharge of the person. Notice is not required under this section if the discharge is for the purpose of transferring the person for continued detention and treatment under this chapter at another treatment facility.

(3) The ((department)) authority shall maintain and make available an updated list of contact information for designated crisis responder offices around the state.

Sec. 3021. RCW 71.05.445 and 2014 c 225 s 86 and 2014 c 220 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) When a mental health service provider conducts its initial assessment for a person receiving court-ordered treatment, the service provider shall inquire and shall be told by the offender whether he or she is subject to supervision by the department of corrections.

(b) When a person receiving court-ordered treatment or treatment ordered by the department of corrections discloses to his or her mental health service provider that he or she is subject to supervision by the department of corrections, the mental health service provider shall notify the department of corrections that he or she is treating the offender and shall notify the offender that his or her community corrections officer will be notified of the treatment, provided that if the offender has received relief from disclosure pursuant to RCW 9.94A.562((, 70.96A.155,)) or 71.05.132 and the offender has provided the mental health service provider with a copy of the order granting relief from disclosure pursuant to RCW 9.94A.562((, 70.96A.155,)) or 71.05.132, the mental health service provider is not required to notify the department of corrections that the mental health service provider is treating the offender. The notification may be written or oral and shall not require the consent of the offender. If an oral notification is made, it must be confirmed by a written notification. For purposes of this section, a written notification includes notification by email or facsimile, so long as the notifying mental health service provider is clearly identified.

(2) The information to be released to the department of corrections shall include all relevant records and reports, as defined by rule, necessary for the department of corrections to carry out its duties.

(3) The ((department)) authority and the department of corrections, in consultation with behavioral health organizations, mental health service providers as defined in RCW 71.05.020, mental health consumers, and advocates for persons with mental illness, shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section related to the type and scope of information to be released. These rules shall:

(a) Enhance and facilitate the ability of the department of corrections to carry out its responsibility of planning and ensuring community protection with respect to persons subject to sentencing under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW, including accessing and releasing or disclosing information of persons who received mental health services as a minor; and

(b) Establish requirements for the notification of persons under the supervision of the department of corrections regarding the provisions of this section.

(4) The information received by the department of corrections under this section shall remain confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure outlined in this chapter (( 71.05 RCW)), except as provided in RCW 72.09.585.

(5) No mental health service provider or individual employed by a mental health service provider shall be held responsible for information released to or used by the department of corrections under the provisions of this section or rules adopted under this section.

(6) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the release of information and records related to mental health services for any patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug dependency, the release of the information may be restricted as necessary to comply with federal law and regulations.

(7) This section does not modify the terms and conditions of disclosure of information related to sexually transmitted diseases under chapter 70.24 RCW.

(8) The ((department)) authority shall, subject to available resources, electronically, or by the most cost-effective means available, provide the department of corrections with the names, last dates of services, and addresses of specific behavioral health organizations and mental health service providers that delivered mental health services to a person subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW pursuant to an agreement between the authority and the department((s)) of corrections.

Sec. 3022. RCW 71.05.510 and 1974 ex.s. c 145 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

Any individual who knowingly, ((wilfully)) willfully or through gross negligence violates the provisions of this chapter by detaining a person for more than the allowable number of days shall be liable to the person detained in civil damages. It shall not be a prerequisite to an action under this section that the plaintiff shall have suffered or be threatened with special, as contrasted with general damages.

Sec. 3023. RCW 71.05.520 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 142 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department of social and health services)) authority as the state's behavioral health authority, the department of social and health services in its operation of the state hospitals, and the department of health in exercising its function of licensing and certification of behavioral health providers and facilities shall have the responsibility to determine whether all rights of individuals recognized and guaranteed by the provisions of this chapter and the Constitutions of the state of Washington and the United States are in fact protected and effectively secured. To this end, ((the department)) each agency shall assign appropriate staff who shall from time to time as may be necessary have authority to examine records, inspect facilities, attend proceedings, and do whatever is necessary to monitor, evaluate, and assure adherence to such rights. Such persons shall also recommend such additional safeguards or procedures as may be appropriate to secure individual rights set forth in this chapter and as guaranteed by the state and federal Constitutions.

Sec. 3024. RCW 71.05.525 and 1997 c 112 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

When, in the judgment of the department of social and health services, the welfare of any person committed to or confined in any state juvenile correctional institution or facility necessitates that such a person be transferred or moved for observation, diagnosis or treatment to any state institution or facility for the care of ((mentally ill)) juveniles with mental illness the secretary of the department of social and health services, or his or her designee, is authorized to order and effect such move or transfer: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the secretary of the department of social and health services shall adopt and implement procedures to assure that persons so transferred shall, while detained or confined in such institution or facility for the care of ((mentally ill)) juveniles with mental illness, be provided with substantially similar opportunities for parole or early release evaluation and determination as persons detained or confined in state juvenile correctional institutions or facilities: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the secretary of the department of social and health services shall notify the original committing court of such transfer.

Sec. 3025. RCW 71.05.560 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 248 are each amended to read as follows:

The department, the department of social and health services, and the authority shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to effectuate the intent and purposes of this chapter, which shall include but not be limited to evaluation of the quality of the program and facilities operating pursuant to this chapter, evaluation of the effectiveness and cost effectiveness of such programs and facilities, and procedures and standards for licensing or certification and other action relevant to evaluation and treatment facilities, secure detoxification facilities, and approved substance use disorder treatment programs.

Sec. 3026. RCW 71.05.590 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 14 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Either an agency or facility designated to monitor or provide services under a less restrictive alternative order or conditional release order, or a designated crisis responder, may take action to enforce, modify, or revoke a less restrictive alternative or conditional release order. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder must determine that:

(a) The person is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of the court order;

(b) Substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred;

(c) There is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further evaluation, intervention, or treatment; or

(d) The person poses a likelihood of serious harm.

(2) Actions taken under this section must include a flexible range of responses of varying levels of intensity appropriate to the circumstances and consistent with the interests of the individual and the public in personal autonomy, safety, recovery, and compliance. Available actions may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(a) To counsel or advise the person as to their rights and responsibilities under the court order, and to offer appropriate incentives to motivate compliance;

(b) To increase the intensity of outpatient services provided to the person by increasing the frequency of contacts with the provider, referring the person for an assessment for assertive community services, or by other means;

(c) To request a court hearing for review and modification of the court order. The request must be made to the court with jurisdiction over the order and specify the circumstances that give rise to the request and what modification is being sought. The county prosecutor shall assist the agency or facility in requesting this hearing and issuing an appropriate summons to the person. This subsection does not limit the inherent authority of a treatment provider to alter conditions of treatment for clinical reasons, and is intended to be used only when court intervention is necessary or advisable to secure the person's compliance and prevent decompensation or deterioration;

(d) To cause the person to be transported by a peace officer, designated crisis responder, or other means to the agency or facility monitoring or providing services under the court order, or to a triage facility, crisis stabilization unit, emergency department, or to an evaluation and treatment facility if the person is committed for mental health treatment, or to a secure detoxification facility with available space or an approved substance use disorder treatment program with available space if the person is committed for substance use disorder treatment. The person may be detained at the facility for up to twelve hours for the purpose of an evaluation to determine whether modification, revocation, or commitment proceedings are necessary and appropriate to stabilize the person and prevent decompensation, deterioration, or physical harm. Temporary detention for evaluation under this subsection is intended to occur only following a pattern of noncompliance or the failure of reasonable attempts at outreach and engagement, and may occur only when in the clinical judgment of a designated crisis responder or the professional person in charge of an agency or facility designated to monitor less restrictive alternative services temporary detention is appropriate. This subsection does not limit the ability or obligation to pursue revocation procedures under subsection (4) of this section in appropriate circumstances; and

(e) To initiate revocation procedures under subsection (4) of this section.

(3) The facility or agency designated to provide outpatient treatment shall notify the secretary of the department of social and health services or designated crisis responder when a person fails to adhere to terms and conditions of court ordered treatment or experiences substantial deterioration in his or her condition and, as a result, presents an increased likelihood of serious harm.

(4)(a) A designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may upon their own motion or notification by the facility or agency designated to provide outpatient care order a person subject to a court order under this chapter to be apprehended and taken into custody and temporary detention in an evaluation and treatment facility in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment if the person is committed for mental health treatment, or, if the person is committed for substance use disorder treatment, in a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if either is available in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment and has adequate space. Proceedings under this subsection (4) may be initiated without ordering the apprehension and detention of the person.

(b) A person detained under this subsection (4) must be held until such time, not exceeding five days, as a hearing can be scheduled to determine whether or not the person should be returned to the hospital or facility from which he or she had been released. If the person is not detained, the hearing must be scheduled within five days of service on the person. The designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may modify or rescind the order at any time prior to commencement of the court hearing.

(c) The designated crisis responder or secretary of the department of social and health services shall file a revocation petition and order of apprehension and detention with the court of the county where the person is currently located or being detained. The designated crisis responder shall serve the person and their attorney, guardian, and conservator, if any. The person has the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as in any involuntary treatment proceeding, except as specifically set forth in this section. There is no right to jury trial. The venue for proceedings is the county where the petition is filed. Notice of the filing must be provided to the court that originally ordered commitment, if different from the court where the petition for revocation is filed, within two judicial days of the person's detention.

(d) The issues for the court to determine are whether: (i) The person adhered to the terms and conditions of the court order; (ii) substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred; (iii) there is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further inpatient treatment; or (iv) there is a likelihood of serious harm; and, if any of the above conditions apply, whether the court should reinstate or modify the person's less restrictive alternative or conditional release order or order the person's detention for inpatient treatment. The person may waive the court hearing and allow the court to enter a stipulated order upon the agreement of all parties. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment, the treatment period may be for no longer than the period authorized in the original court order. A court may not issue an order to detain a person for inpatient treatment in a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program under this subsection unless there is a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program available and with adequate space for the person.

(e) Revocation proceedings under this subsection (4) are not allowable if the current commitment is solely based on the person being in need of assisted outpatient mental health treatment. In order to obtain a court order for detention for inpatient treatment under this circumstance, a petition must be filed under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153.

(5) In determining whether or not to take action under this section the designated crisis responder, agency, or facility must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.212 and the court must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.245 as they apply to the question of whether to enforce, modify, or revoke a court order for involuntary treatment.

Sec. 3027. RCW 71.05.590 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 14 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Either an agency or facility designated to monitor or provide services under a less restrictive alternative order or conditional release order, or a designated crisis responder, may take action to enforce, modify, or revoke a less restrictive alternative or conditional release order. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder must determine that:

(a) The person is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of the court order;

(b) Substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred;

(c) There is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further evaluation, intervention, or treatment; or

(d) The person poses a likelihood of serious harm.

(2) Actions taken under this section must include a flexible range of responses of varying levels of intensity appropriate to the circumstances and consistent with the interests of the individual and the public in personal autonomy, safety, recovery, and compliance. Available actions may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(a) To counsel or advise the person as to their rights and responsibilities under the court order, and to offer appropriate incentives to motivate compliance;

(b) To increase the intensity of outpatient services provided to the person by increasing the frequency of contacts with the provider, referring the person for an assessment for assertive community services, or by other means;

(c) To request a court hearing for review and modification of the court order. The request must be made to the court with jurisdiction over the order and specify the circumstances that give rise to the request and what modification is being sought. The county prosecutor shall assist the agency or facility in requesting this hearing and issuing an appropriate summons to the person. This subsection does not limit the inherent authority of a treatment provider to alter conditions of treatment for clinical reasons, and is intended to be used only when court intervention is necessary or advisable to secure the person's compliance and prevent decompensation or deterioration;

(d) To cause the person to be transported by a peace officer, designated crisis responder, or other means to the agency or facility monitoring or providing services under the court order, or to a triage facility, crisis stabilization unit, emergency department, or to an evaluation and treatment facility if the person is committed for mental health treatment, or to a secure detoxification facility or an approved substance use disorder treatment program if the person is committed for substance use disorder treatment. The person may be detained at the facility for up to twelve hours for the purpose of an evaluation to determine whether modification, revocation, or commitment proceedings are necessary and appropriate to stabilize the person and prevent decompensation, deterioration, or physical harm. Temporary detention for evaluation under this subsection is intended to occur only following a pattern of noncompliance or the failure of reasonable attempts at outreach and engagement, and may occur only when in the clinical judgment of a designated crisis responder or the professional person in charge of an agency or facility designated to monitor less restrictive alternative services temporary detention is appropriate. This subsection does not limit the ability or obligation to pursue revocation procedures under subsection (4) of this section in appropriate circumstances; and

(e) To initiate revocation procedures under subsection (4) of this section.

(3) The facility or agency designated to provide outpatient treatment shall notify the secretary of the department of social and health services or designated crisis responder when a person fails to adhere to terms and conditions of court ordered treatment or experiences substantial deterioration in his or her condition and, as a result, presents an increased likelihood of serious harm.

(4)(a) A designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may upon their own motion or notification by the facility or agency designated to provide outpatient care order a person subject to a court order under this chapter to be apprehended and taken into custody and temporary detention in an evaluation and treatment facility in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment if the person is committed for mental health treatment, or, if the person is committed for substance use disorder treatment, in a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if either is available in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment. Proceedings under this subsection (4) may be initiated without ordering the apprehension and detention of the person.

(b) A person detained under this subsection (4) must be held until such time, not exceeding five days, as a hearing can be scheduled to determine whether or not the person should be returned to the hospital or facility from which he or she had been released. If the person is not detained, the hearing must be scheduled within five days of service on the person. The designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may modify or rescind the order at any time prior to commencement of the court hearing.

(c) The designated crisis responder or secretary of the department of social and health services shall file a revocation petition and order of apprehension and detention with the court of the county where the person is currently located or being detained. The designated crisis responder shall serve the person and their attorney, guardian, and conservator, if any. The person has the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as in any involuntary treatment proceeding, except as specifically set forth in this section. There is no right to jury trial. The venue for proceedings is the county where the petition is filed. Notice of the filing must be provided to the court that originally ordered commitment, if different from the court where the petition for revocation is filed, within two judicial days of the person's detention.

(d) The issues for the court to determine are whether: (i) The person adhered to the terms and conditions of the court order; (ii) substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred; (iii) there is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further inpatient treatment; or (iv) there is a likelihood of serious harm; and, if any of the above conditions apply, whether the court should reinstate or modify the person's less restrictive alternative or conditional release order or order the person's detention for inpatient treatment. The person may waive the court hearing and allow the court to enter a stipulated order upon the agreement of all parties. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment, the treatment period may be for no longer than the period authorized in the original court order.

(e) Revocation proceedings under this subsection (4) are not allowable if the current commitment is solely based on the person being in need of assisted outpatient mental health treatment. In order to obtain a court order for detention for inpatient treatment under this circumstance, a petition must be filed under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153.

(5) In determining whether or not to take action under this section the designated crisis responder, agency, or facility must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.212 and the court must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.245 as they apply to the question of whether to enforce, modify, or revoke a court order for involuntary treatment.

Sec. 3028. RCW 71.05.620 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 249 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The files and records of court proceedings under this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW shall be closed but shall be accessible to:

(a) The department;

(b) The department of social and health services;

(c) The authority;

(d) The state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010;

(((c))) (e) Any person who is the subject of a petition;

(((d))) (f) The attorney or guardian of the person;

(((e))) (g) Resource management services for that person; and

(((f))) (h) Service providers authorized to receive such information by resource management services.

(2) The ((department)) authority shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 3029. RCW 71.05.720 and 2007 c 360 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Annually, all community mental health employees who work directly with clients shall be provided with training on safety and violence prevention topics described in RCW 49.19.030. The curriculum for the training shall be developed collaboratively among the ((department of social and health services)) authority, the department, contracted mental health providers, and employee organizations that represent community mental health workers.

Sec. 3030. RCW 71.05.732 and 2011 c 343 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct an independent assessment of the direct costs of providing judicial services under this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW as defined in RCW 71.05.730. The assessment shall include a review and analysis of the reasons for differences in costs among counties. The assessment shall be conducted for any county in which more than twenty civil commitment cases were conducted during the year prior to the study. The assessment must be completed by June 1, 2012.

(2) The administrative office of the courts, the authority, and the department of social and health services shall provide the joint legislative audit and review committee with assistance and data required to complete the assessment.

(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall present recommendations as to methods for updating the costs identified in the assessment to reflect changes over time.

Sec. 3031. RCW 71.05.740 and 2014 c 225 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

((By August 1, 2013,)) All behavioral health organizations in the state of Washington must forward historical mental health involuntary commitment information retained by the organization including identifying information and dates of commitment to the ((department)) authority. As soon as feasible, the behavioral health organizations must arrange to report new commitment data to the ((department)) authority within twenty-four hours. Commitment information under this section does not need to be resent if it is already in the possession of the ((department)) authority. Behavioral health organizations and the ((department)) authority shall be immune from liability related to the sharing of commitment information under this section.

Sec. 3032. RCW 71.05.745 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 252 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((department)) authority may use a single bed certification process as outlined in rule to provide additional treatment capacity for a person suffering from a mental disorder for whom an evaluation and treatment bed is not available. The facility that is the proposed site of the single bed certification must be a facility that is willing and able to provide the person with timely and appropriate treatment either directly or by arrangement with other public or private agencies.

(2) A single bed certification must be specific to the patient receiving treatment.

(3) A designated crisis responder who submits an application for a single bed certification for treatment at a facility that is willing and able to provide timely and appropriate mental health treatment in good faith belief that the single bed certification is appropriate may presume that the single bed certification will be approved for the purpose of completing the detention process and responding to other emergency calls.

(4) The ((department)) authority may adopt rules implementing this section and continue to enforce rules it has already adopted except where inconsistent with this section.

Sec. 3033. RCW 71.05.750 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 253 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A designated crisis responder shall make a report to the ((department)) authority when he or she determines a person meets detention criteria under RCW 71.05.150, 71.05.153, 71.34.700, or 71.34.710 and there are not any beds available at an evaluation and treatment facility, the person has not been provisionally accepted for admission by a facility, and the person cannot be served on a single bed certification or less restrictive alternative. Starting at the time when the designated crisis responder determines a person meets detention criteria and the investigation has been completed, the designated crisis responder has twenty-four hours to submit a completed report to the ((department)) authority.

(2) The report required under subsection (1) of this section must contain at a minimum:

(a) The date and time that the investigation was completed;

(b) The identity of the responsible behavioral health organization;

(c) The county in which the person met detention criteria;

(d) A list of facilities which refused to admit the person; and

(e) Identifying information for the person, including age or date of birth.

(3) The ((department)) authority shall develop a standardized reporting form or modify the current form used for single bed certifications for the report required under subsection (2) of this section and may require additional reporting elements as it determines are necessary or supportive. The ((department)) authority shall also determine the method for the transmission of the completed report from the designated crisis responder to the ((department)) authority.

(4) The ((department)) authority shall create quarterly reports displayed on its web site that summarize the information reported under subsection (2) of this section. At a minimum, the reports must display data by county and by month. The reports must also include the number of single bed certifications granted by category. The categories must include all of the reasons that the ((department)) authority recognizes for issuing a single bed certification, as identified in rule.

(5) The reports provided according to this section may not display "protected health information" as that term is used in the federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996, nor information contained in "mental health treatment records" as that term is used in chapter 70.02 RCW or elsewhere in state law, and must otherwise be compliant with state and federal privacy laws.

(6) For purposes of this section, the term "single bed certification" means a situation in which an adult on a seventy-two hour detention, fourteen-day commitment, ninety-day commitment, or one hundred eighty-day commitment is detained to a facility that is:

(a) Not licensed or certified as an inpatient evaluation and treatment facility; or

(b) A licensed or certified inpatient evaluation and treatment facility that is already at capacity.

Sec. 3034. RCW 71.05.755 and 2015 c 269 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((department)) authority shall promptly share reports it receives under RCW 71.05.750 with the responsible regional support network or behavioral health organization. The regional support network or behavioral health organization receiving this notification must attempt to engage the person in appropriate services for which the person is eligible and report back within seven days to the ((department)) authority.

(2) The ((department)) authority shall track and analyze reports submitted under RCW 71.05.750. The ((department)) authority must initiate corrective action when appropriate to ensure that each regional support network or behavioral health organization has implemented an adequate plan to provide evaluation and treatment services. Corrective actions may include remedies under RCW 71.24.330 and 43.20A.894 (as recodified by this act), including requiring expenditure of reserve funds. An adequate plan may include development of less restrictive alternatives to involuntary commitment such as crisis triage, crisis diversion, voluntary treatment, or prevention programs reasonably calculated to reduce demand for evaluation and treatment under this chapter.

Sec. 3035. RCW 71.05.760 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 14 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) By April 1, 2018, the ((department)) authority, by rule, must combine the functions of a designated mental health professional and designated chemical dependency specialist by establishing a designated crisis responder who is authorized to conduct investigations, detain persons up to seventy-two hours to the proper facility, and carry out the other functions identified in this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW. The behavioral health organizations shall provide training to the designated crisis responders as required by the ((department)) authority.

(b)(i) To qualify as a designated crisis responder, a person must have received chemical dependency training as determined by the department and be a:

(A) Psychiatrist, psychologist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker;

(B) Person who is licensed by the department as a mental health counselor or mental health counselor associate, or marriage and family therapist or marriage and family therapist associate;

(C) Person with a master's degree or further advanced degree in counseling or one of the social sciences from an accredited college or university and who have, in addition, at least two years of experience in direct treatment of persons with mental illness or emotional disturbance, such experience gained under the direction of a mental health professional;

(((C))) (D) Person who meets the waiver criteria of RCW 71.24.260, which waiver was granted before 1986;

(((D))) (E) Person who had an approved waiver to perform the duties of a mental health professional that was requested by the regional support network and granted by the department of social and health services before July 1, 2001; or

(((E))) (F) Person who has been granted an exception of the minimum requirements of a mental health professional by the department consistent with rules adopted by the secretary.

(ii) Training must include chemical dependency training specific to the duties of a designated crisis responder, including diagnosis of substance abuse and dependence and assessment of risk associated with substance use.

(c) The ((department)) authority must develop a transition process for any person who has been designated as a designated mental health professional or a designated chemical dependency specialist before April 1, 2018, to be converted to a designated crisis responder. The behavioral health organizations shall provide training, as required by the ((department)) authority, to persons converting to designated crisis responders, which must include both mental health and chemical dependency training applicable to the designated crisis responder role.

(2)(a) The ((department)) authority must ensure that at least one sixteen-bed secure detoxification facility is operational by April 1, 2018, and that at least two sixteen-bed secure detoxification facilities are operational by April 1, 2019.

(b) If, at any time during the implementation of secure detoxification facility capacity, federal funding becomes unavailable for federal match for services provided in secure detoxification facilities, then the ((department)) authority must cease any expansion of secure detoxification facilities until further direction is provided by the legislature.

Sec. 3036. RCW 71.05.801 and 2009 c 323 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

When appropriate and subject to available funds, the treatment and training of a person with a developmental disability who is committed to the custody of the department of social and health services or to a facility licensed or certified for ninety day treatment by the department for a further period of intensive treatment under RCW 71.05.320 must be provided in a program specifically reserved for the treatment and training of persons with developmental disabilities. A person so committed shall receive habilitation services pursuant to an individualized service plan specifically developed to treat the behavior which was the subject of the criminal proceedings. The treatment program shall be administered by developmental disabilities professionals and others trained specifically in the needs of persons with developmental disabilities. The department of social and health services may limit admissions to this specialized program in order to ensure that expenditures for services do not exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and allocated by the department of social and health services for such services. The department of social and health services may establish admission priorities in the event that the number of eligible persons exceeds the limits set by the department of social and health services.

Sec. 3037. RCW 71.05.940 and 1999 c 13 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of chapter 420, Laws of 1989 shall apply equally to persons in the custody of the department of social and health services on May 13, 1989, who were found by a court to be not guilty by reason of insanity or incompetent to stand trial, or who have been found to have committed acts constituting a felony pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) and present a substantial likelihood of repeating similar acts, and the secretary of the department of social and health services shall cause such persons to be evaluated to ascertain if such persons ((are developmentally disabled)) have a developmental disability for placement in a program specifically reserved for the treatment and training of persons with developmental disabilities.

PART 4

Sec. 4001. RCW 71.24.015 and 2014 c 225 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the legislature to establish a community mental health program which shall help people experiencing mental illness to retain a respected and productive position in the community. This will be accomplished through programs that focus on resilience and recovery, and practices that are evidence-based, research-based, consensus-based, or, where these do not exist, promising or emerging best practices, which provide for:

(1) Access to mental health services for adults with mental illness and children with mental illness or emotional disturbances who meet access to care standards which services recognize the special needs of underserved populations, including minorities, children, ((the elderly [older adults])) older adults, individuals with disabilities, and low-income persons. Access to mental health services shall not be limited by a person's history of confinement in a state, federal, or local correctional facility. It is also the purpose of this chapter to promote the early identification of children with mental illness and to ensure that they receive the mental health care and treatment which is appropriate to their developmental level. This care should improve home, school, and community functioning, maintain children in a safe and nurturing home environment, and should enable treatment decisions to be made in response to clinical needs in accordance with sound professional judgment while also recognizing parents' rights to participate in treatment decisions for their children;

(2) The involvement of persons with mental illness, their family members, and advocates in designing and implementing mental health services that reduce unnecessary hospitalization and incarceration and promote the recovery and employment of persons with mental illness. To improve the quality of services available and promote the rehabilitation, recovery, and reintegration of persons with mental illness, consumer and advocate participation in mental health services is an integral part of the community mental health system and shall be supported;

(3) Accountability of efficient and effective services through state-of-the-art outcome and performance measures and statewide standards for monitoring client and system outcomes, performance, and reporting of client and system outcome information. These processes shall be designed so as to maximize the use of available resources for direct care of people with a mental illness and to assure uniform data collection across the state;

(4) Minimum service delivery standards;

(5) Priorities for the use of available resources for the care of individuals with mental illness consistent with the priorities defined in the statute;

(6) Coordination of services within the department of social and health services, including those divisions within the department of social and health services that provide services to children, between the authority, department of social and health services, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and among state mental hospitals, county authorities, behavioral health organizations, community mental health services, and other support services, which shall to the maximum extent feasible also include the families of individuals with mental illness, and other service providers; and

(7) Coordination of services aimed at reducing duplication in service delivery and promoting complementary services among all entities that provide mental health services to adults and children.

It is the policy of the state to encourage the provision of a full range of treatment and rehabilitation services in the state for mental disorders including services operated by consumers and advocates. The legislature intends to encourage the development of regional mental health services with adequate local flexibility to assure eligible people in need of care access to the least-restrictive treatment alternative appropriate to their needs, and the availability of treatment components to assure continuity of care. To this end, counties must enter into joint operating agreements with other counties to form regional systems of care that are consistent with the regional service areas established under RCW 43.20A.893 (as recodified by this act). Regional systems of care, whether operated by a county, group of counties, or another entity shall integrate planning, administration, and service delivery duties under chapter((s)) 71.05 ((and 71.24)) RCW and this chapter to consolidate administration, reduce administrative layering, and reduce administrative costs. The legislature hereby finds and declares that sound fiscal management requires vigilance to ensure that funds appropriated by the legislature for the provision of needed community mental health programs and services are ultimately expended solely for the purpose for which they were appropriated, and not for any other purpose.

It is further the intent of the legislature to integrate the provision of services to provide continuity of care through all phases of treatment. To this end, the legislature intends to promote active engagement with persons with mental illness and collaboration between families and service providers.

Sec. 4002. RCW 71.24.025 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 502 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Acutely mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a short-term severe crisis episode of:

(a) A mental disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020;

(b) Being gravely disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, a gravely disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020; or

(c) Presenting a likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.

(2) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(3) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department ((of social and health services)) as meeting standards adopted under this chapter.

(4) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(5) "Available resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose of providing community mental health programs, federal funds, except those provided according to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and state funds appropriated under this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW by the legislature during any biennium for the purpose of providing residential services, resource management services, community support services, and other mental health services. This does not include funds appropriated for the purpose of operating and administering the state psychiatric hospitals.

(((5))) (6) "Behavioral health organization" means any county authority or group of county authorities or other entity recognized by the ((secretary)) director in contract in a defined region.

(((6))) (7) "Behavioral health program" means all expenditures, services, activities, or programs, including reasonable administration and overhead, designed and conducted to prevent or treat chemical dependency and mental illness.

(((7))) (8) "Behavioral health services" means mental health services as described in this chapter and chapter 71.36 RCW and substance use disorder treatment services as described in this chapter.

(((8))) (9) "Child" means a person under the age of eighteen years.

(((9))) (10) "Chronically mentally ill adult" or "adult who is chronically mentally ill" means an adult who has a mental disorder and meets at least one of the following criteria:

(a) Has undergone two or more episodes of hospital care for a mental disorder within the preceding two years; or

(b) Has experienced a continuous psychiatric hospitalization or residential treatment exceeding six months' duration within the preceding year; or

(c) Has been unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity by reason of any mental disorder which has lasted for a continuous period of not less than twelve months. "Substantial gainful activity" shall be defined by the ((department)) authority by rule consistent with Public Law 92-603, as amended.

(((10))) (11) "Clubhouse" means a community-based program that provides rehabilitation services and is licensed or certified by the department ((of social and health services)).

(((11))) (12) "Community mental health service delivery system" means public, private, or tribal agencies that provide services specifically to persons with mental disorders as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and receive funding from public sources.

(((12))) (13) "Community support services" means services authorized, planned, and coordinated through resource management services including, at a minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis intervention available twenty-four hours, seven days a week, prescreening determinations for persons who are mentally ill being considered for placement in nursing homes as required by federal law, screening for patients being considered for admission to residential services, diagnosis and treatment for children who are acutely mentally ill or severely emotionally disturbed discovered under screening through the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program, investigation, legal, and other nonresidential services under chapter 71.05 RCW, case management services, psychiatric treatment including medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy, assuring transfer of relevant patient information between service providers, recovery services, and other services determined by behavioral health organizations.

(((13))) (14) "Consensus-based" means a program or practice that has general support among treatment providers and experts, based on experience or professional literature, and may have anecdotal or case study support, or that is agreed but not possible to perform studies with random assignment and controlled groups.

(((14))) (15) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners, county council, or county executive having authority to establish a community mental health program, or two or more of the county authorities specified in this subsection which have entered into an agreement to provide a community mental health program.

(((15))) (16) "Department" means the department of ((social and)) health ((services)).

(((16))) (17) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health professional designated by the county or other authority authorized in rule to perform the duties specified in this chapter.

(((17))) (18) "Director" means the director of the authority.

(19) "Drug addiction" means a disease characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(((18))) (20) "Early adopter" means a regional service area for which all of the county authorities have requested that the ((department and the health care)) authority ((jointly)) purchase medical and behavioral health services through a managed care health system as defined under RCW 71.24.380(6).

(((19))) (21) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice" means a program or practice that, based on statistical analyses or a well established theory of change, shows potential for meeting the evidence-based or research-based criteria, which may include the use of a program that is evidence-based for outcomes other than those listed in subsection (((20))) (22) of this section.

(((20))) (22) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has been tested in heterogeneous or intended populations with multiple randomized, or statistically controlled evaluations, or both; or one large multiple site randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review demonstrates sustained improvements in at least one outcome. "Evidence-based" also means a program or practice that can be implemented with a set of procedures to allow successful replication in Washington and, when possible, is determined to be cost-beneficial.

(((21))) (23) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.

(((22))) (24) "Licensed or certified service provider" means an entity licensed or certified according to this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW or an entity deemed to meet state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a current agreement with the department, or tribal attestation that meets state minimum standards, or persons licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.57A, 18.71, 18.71A, 18.83, or 18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered nurses and advanced registered nurse practitioners.

(((23))) (25) "Long-term inpatient care" means inpatient services for persons committed for, or voluntarily receiving intensive treatment for, periods of ninety days or greater under chapter 71.05 RCW. "Long-term inpatient care" as used in this chapter does not include: (a) Services for individuals committed under chapter 71.05 RCW who are receiving services pursuant to a conditional release or a court-ordered less restrictive alternative to detention; or (b) services for individuals voluntarily receiving less restrictive alternative treatment on the grounds of the state hospital.

(((24))) (26) "Mental health services" means all services provided by behavioral health organizations and other services provided by the state for persons who are mentally ill.

(((25))) (27) Mental health "treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department of social and health services or the authority, by behavioral health organizations and their staffs, ((and)) or by treatment facilities. "Treatment records" do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department of social and health services, behavioral health organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.

(((26))) (28) "Mentally ill persons," "persons who are mentally ill," and "the mentally ill" mean persons and conditions defined in subsections (1), (((9), (34), and (35))) (10), (36), and (37) of this section.

(((27))) (29) "Recovery" means the process in which people are able to live, work, learn, and participate fully in their communities.

(((28))) (30) "Registration records" include all the records of the department of social and health services, the authority, behavioral health organizations, treatment facilities, and other persons providing services ((to)) for the department of social and health services, the authority, county departments, or facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness.

(((29))) (31) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has been tested with a single randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, demonstrating sustained desirable outcomes; or where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review supports sustained outcomes as described in subsection (((20))) (22) of this section but does not meet the full criteria for evidence-based.

(((30))) (32) "Residential services" means a complete range of residences and supports authorized by resource management services and which may involve a facility, a distinct part thereof, or services which support community living, for persons who are acutely mentally ill, adults who are chronically mentally ill, children who are severely emotionally disturbed, or adults who are seriously disturbed and determined by the behavioral health organization to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. The services shall include at least evaluation and treatment services as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW, acute crisis respite care, long-term adaptive and rehabilitative care, and supervised and supported living services, and shall also include any residential services developed to service persons who are mentally ill in nursing homes, residential treatment facilities, assisted living facilities, and adult family homes, and may include outpatient services provided as an element in a package of services in a supported housing model. Residential services for children in out-of-home placements related to their mental disorder shall not include the costs of food and shelter, except for children's long-term residential facilities existing prior to January 1, 1991.

(((31))) (33) "Resilience" means the personal and community qualities that enable individuals to rebound from adversity, trauma, tragedy, threats, or other stresses, and to live productive lives.

(((32))) (34) "Resource management services" mean the planning, coordination, and authorization of residential services and community support services administered pursuant to an individual service plan for: (a) Adults and children who are acutely mentally ill; (b) adults who are chronically mentally ill; (c) children who are severely emotionally disturbed; or (d) adults who are seriously disturbed and determined solely by a behavioral health organization to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. Such planning, coordination, and authorization shall include mental health screening for children eligible under the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program. Resource management services include seven day a week, twenty-four hour a day availability of information regarding enrollment of adults and children who are mentally ill in services and their individual service plan to designated crisis responders, evaluation and treatment facilities, and others as determined by the behavioral health organization.

(((33))) (35) "Secretary" means the secretary of ((social and health services)) the department of health.

(((34))) (36) "Seriously disturbed person" means a person who:

(a) Is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself or others, or to the property of others, as a result of a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW;

(b) Has been on conditional release status, or under a less restrictive alternative order, at some time during the preceding two years from an evaluation and treatment facility or a state mental health hospital;

(c) Has a mental disorder which causes major impairment in several areas of daily living;

(d) Exhibits suicidal preoccupation or attempts; or

(e) Is a child diagnosed by a mental health professional, as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as experiencing a mental disorder which is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or with peers or is clearly interfering with the child's personality development and learning.

(((35))) (37) "Severely emotionally disturbed child" or "child who is severely emotionally disturbed" means a child who has been determined by the behavioral health organization to be experiencing a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, including those mental disorders that result in a behavioral or conduct disorder, that is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or with peers and who meets at least one of the following criteria:

(a) Has undergone inpatient treatment or placement outside of the home related to a mental disorder within the last two years;

(b) Has undergone involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW within the last two years;

(c) Is currently served by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice, child-protection/welfare, special education, or developmental disabilities;

(d) Is at risk of escalating maladjustment due to:

(i) Chronic family dysfunction involving a caretaker who is mentally ill or inadequate;

(ii) Changes in custodial adult;

(iii) Going to, residing in, or returning from any placement outside of the home, for example, psychiatric hospital, short-term inpatient, residential treatment, group or foster home, or a correctional facility;

(iv) Subject to repeated physical abuse or neglect;

(v) Drug or alcohol abuse; or

(vi) Homelessness.

(((36))) (38) "State minimum standards" means minimum requirements established by rules adopted ((by the secretary)) and necessary to implement this chapter ((for)) by:

(a) The authority for:

(i) Delivery of mental health and substance use disorder services; and (((b) licensed service providers for the provision of mental health services; (c) residential services; and (d)))

(ii) Community support services and resource management services;

(b) The department of health for:

(i) Licensed or certified service providers for the provision of mental health and substance use disorder services; and

(ii) Residential services.

(((37))) (39) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.

(((38))) (40) "Tribal authority," for the purposes of this section and RCW 71.24.300 only, means: The federally recognized Indian tribes and the major Indian organizations recognized by the ((secretary)) director insofar as these organizations do not have a financial relationship with any behavioral health organization that would present a conflict of interest.

Sec. 4003. RCW 71.24.030 and 2005 c 503 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((secretary)) director is authorized to make grants and/or purchase services from counties, combinations of counties, or other entities, to establish and operate community mental health programs.

Sec. 4004. RCW 71.24.035 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((department)) authority is designated as the state behavioral health authority which includes recognition as the single state authority for substance use disorders and state mental health authority.

(2) The ((secretary)) director shall provide for public, client, tribal, and licensed or certified service provider participation in developing the state behavioral health program, developing contracts with behavioral health organizations, and any waiver request to the federal government under medicaid.

(3) The ((secretary)) director shall provide for participation in developing the state behavioral health program for children and other underserved populations, by including representatives on any committee established to provide oversight to the state behavioral health program.

(4) The ((secretary)) director shall be designated as the behavioral health organization if the behavioral health organization fails to meet state minimum standards or refuses to exercise responsibilities under its contract or RCW 71.24.045, until such time as a new behavioral health organization is designated.

(5) The ((secretary)) director shall:

(a) Develop a biennial state behavioral health program that incorporates regional biennial needs assessments and regional mental health service plans and state services for adults and children with mental disorders or substance use disorders or both;

(b) Assure that any behavioral health organization or county community behavioral health program provides medically necessary services to medicaid recipients consistent with the state's medicaid state plan or federal waiver authorities, and nonmedicaid services consistent with priorities established by the ((department)) authority;

(c) Develop and adopt rules establishing state minimum standards for the delivery of behavioral health services pursuant to RCW 71.24.037 including, but not limited to:

(i) Licensed or certified service providers. These rules shall permit a county-operated behavioral health program to be licensed as a service provider subject to compliance with applicable statutes and rules. ((The secretary shall provide for deeming of compliance with state minimum standards for those entities accredited by recognized behavioral health accrediting bodies recognized and having a current agreement with the department;))

(ii) Inpatient services, an adequate network of evaluation and treatment services and facilities under chapter 71.05 RCW to ensure access to treatment, resource management services, and community support services;

(d) Assure that the special needs of persons who are minorities, elderly, disabled, children, low-income, and parents who are respondents in dependency cases are met within the priorities established in this section;

(e) Establish a standard contract or contracts, consistent with state minimum standards which shall be used in contracting with behavioral health organizations. The standard contract shall include a maximum fund balance, which shall be consistent with that required by federal regulations or waiver stipulations;

(f) Make contracts necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers, including managed care contracts for behavioral health services, contracts entered into under RCW 74.09.522, and contracts with public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals to pay them for behavioral health services;

(g) Establish, to the extent possible, a standardized auditing procedure which is designed to assure compliance with contractual agreements authorized by this chapter and minimizes paperwork requirements of behavioral health organizations and licensed or certified service providers. The audit procedure shall focus on the outcomes of service as provided in RCW 43.20A.895, 70.320.020, and 71.36.025;

(h) Develop and maintain an information system to be used by the state and behavioral health organizations that includes a tracking method which allows the ((department)) authority and behavioral health organizations to identify behavioral health clients' participation in any behavioral health service or public program on an immediate basis. The information system shall not include individual patient's case history files. Confidentiality of client information and records shall be maintained as provided in this chapter and chapter 70.02 RCW;

(i) ((License service providers who meet state minimum standards;

(j))) Periodically monitor the compliance of behavioral health organizations and their network of licensed or certified service providers for compliance with the contract between the ((department)) authority, the behavioral health organization, and federal and state rules at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner;

(((k) Fix fees to be paid by evaluation and treatment centers to the secretary for the required inspections;

(l))) (j) Monitor and audit behavioral health organizations ((and licensed service providers)) as needed to assure compliance with contractual agreements authorized by this chapter;

(((m))) (k) Adopt such rules as are necessary to implement the ((department's)) authority's responsibilities under this chapter;

(((n) License or certify crisis stabilization units that meet state minimum standards;

(o) License or certify clubhouses that meet state minimum standards;

(p) License or certify triage facilities that meet state minimum standards;)) and

(((q))) (l) Administer or supervise the administration of the provisions relating to persons with substance use disorders and intoxicated persons of any state plan submitted for federal funding pursuant to federal health, welfare, or treatment legislation.

(6) The ((secretary)) director shall use available resources only for behavioral health organizations, except:

(a) To the extent authorized, and in accordance with any priorities or conditions specified, in the biennial appropriations act; or

(b) To incentivize improved performance with respect to the client outcomes established in RCW 43.20A.895, 70.320.020, and 71.36.025, integration of behavioral health and medical services at the clinical level, and improved care coordination for individuals with complex care needs.

(7) Each behavioral health organization and licensed or certified service provider shall file with the secretary of the department of health or the director, on request, such data, statistics, schedules, and information as the secretary of the department of health or the director reasonably requires. A behavioral health organization or licensed or certified service provider which, without good cause, fails to furnish any data, statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent reports thereof, may be subject to the behavioral health organization contractual remedies in RCW 43.20A.894 (as recodified by this act) or may have its service provider certification or license revoked or suspended.

(8) ((The secretary may suspend, revoke, limit, or restrict a certification or license, or refuse to grant a certification or license for failure to conform to: (a) The law; (b) applicable rules and regulations; (c) applicable standards; or (d) state minimum standards.

(9))) The superior court may restrain any behavioral health organization or service provider from operating without a contract, certification, or a license or any other violation of this section. The court may also review, pursuant to procedures contained in chapter 34.05 RCW, any denial, suspension, limitation, restriction, or revocation of certification or license, and grant other relief required to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(((10))) (9) Upon petition by the secretary of the department of health or the director, and after hearing held upon reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a warrant to an officer or employee of the secretary of the department of health or the director authorizing him or her to enter at reasonable times, and examine the records, books, and accounts of any behavioral health organization or service provider refusing to consent to inspection or examination by the authority.

(((11))) (10) Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the secretary of the department of health or the director may file an action for an injunction or other process against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent the establishment, conduct, or operation of a behavioral health organization or service provider without a contract, certification, or a license under this chapter.

(((12))) (11) The ((department)) authority shall distribute appropriated state and federal funds in accordance with any priorities, terms, or conditions specified in the appropriations act.

(((13))) (12) The ((secretary)) director shall assume all duties assigned to the nonparticipating behavioral health organizations under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW and this chapter. Such responsibilities shall include those which would have been assigned to the nonparticipating counties in regions where there are not participating behavioral health organizations.

The behavioral health organizations, or the ((secretary's)) director's assumption of all responsibilities under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW and this chapter, shall be included in all state and federal plans affecting the state behavioral health program including at least those required by this chapter, the medicaid program, and P.L. 99-660. Nothing in these plans shall be inconsistent with the intent and requirements of this chapter.

(((14))) (13) The ((secretary)) director shall:

(a) Disburse funds for the behavioral health organizations within sixty days of approval of the biennial contract. The ((department)) authority must either approve or reject the biennial contract within sixty days of receipt.

(b) Enter into biennial contracts with behavioral health organizations. The contracts shall be consistent with available resources. No contract shall be approved that does not include progress toward meeting the goals of this chapter by taking responsibility for: (i) Short-term commitments; (ii) residential care; and (iii) emergency response systems.

(c) Notify behavioral health organizations of their allocation of available resources at least sixty days prior to the start of a new biennial contract period.

(d) Deny all or part of the funding allocations to behavioral health organizations based solely upon formal findings of noncompliance with the terms of the behavioral health organization's contract with the ((department)) authority. Behavioral health organizations disputing the decision of the ((secretary)) director to withhold funding allocations are limited to the remedies provided in the ((department's)) authority's contracts with the behavioral health organizations.

(((15))) (14) The ((department)) authority, in cooperation with the state congressional delegation, shall actively seek waivers of federal requirements and such modifications of federal regulations as are necessary to allow federal medicaid reimbursement for services provided by freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW or certified under chapter 71.05 RCW. The ((department)) authority shall periodically report its efforts to the appropriate committees of the senate and the house of representatives.

(((16))) (15) The ((department)) authority may:

(a) Plan, establish, and maintain substance use disorder prevention and substance use disorder treatment programs as necessary or desirable;

(b) Coordinate its activities and cooperate with behavioral programs in this and other states, and make contracts and other joint or cooperative arrangements with state, local, or private agencies in this and other states for behavioral health services and for the common advancement of substance use disorder programs;

(c) Solicit and accept for use any gift of money or property made by will or otherwise, and any grant of money, services, or property from the federal government, the state, or any political subdivision thereof or any private source, and do all things necessary to cooperate with the federal government or any of its agencies in making an application for any grant;

(d) Keep records and engage in research and the gathering of relevant statistics; and

(e) Acquire, hold, or dispose of real property or any interest therein, and construct, lease, or otherwise provide substance use disorder treatment programs.

Sec. 4005. RCW 71.24.037 and 2017 c 330 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall by rule establish state minimum standards for licensed or certified behavioral health service providers and services, whether those service providers and services are licensed or certified to provide solely mental health services, substance use disorder treatment services, or services to persons with co-occurring disorders.

(2) Minimum standards for licensed or certified behavioral health service providers shall, at a minimum, establish: Qualifications for staff providing services directly to persons with mental disorders, substance use disorders, or both, the intended result of each service, and the rights and responsibilities of persons receiving behavioral health services pursuant to this chapter. The secretary shall provide for deeming of licensed or certified behavioral health service providers as meeting state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a current agreement with the department.

(3) Minimum standards for community support services and resource management services shall include at least qualifications for resource management services, client tracking systems, and the transfer of patient information between behavioral health service providers.

(4) The department may suspend, revoke, limit, restrict, or modify an approval, or refuse to grant approval, for failure to meet the provisions of this chapter, or the standards adopted under this chapter. RCW ((43.20A.205)) 43.70.115 governs notice of a license or certification denial, revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding.

(5) No licensed or certified behavioral health service provider may advertise or represent itself as a licensed or certified behavioral health service provider if approval has not been granted, has been denied, suspended, revoked, or canceled.

(6) Licensure or certification as a behavioral health service provider is effective for one calendar year from the date of issuance of the license or certification. The license or certification must specify the types of services provided by the behavioral health service provider that meet the standards adopted under this chapter. Renewal of a license or certification must be made in accordance with this section for initial approval and in accordance with the standards set forth in rules adopted by the secretary.

(7) Licensure or certification as a licensed or certified behavioral health service provider must specify the types of services provided that meet the standards adopted under this chapter. Renewal of a license or certification must be made in accordance with this section for initial approval and in accordance with the standards set forth in rules adopted by the secretary.

(8) Licensed or certified behavioral health service providers may not provide types of services for which the licensed or certified behavioral health service provider has not been certified. Licensed or certified behavioral health service providers may provide services for which approval has been sought and is pending, if approval for the services has not been previously revoked or denied.

(9) The department periodically shall inspect licensed or certified behavioral health service providers at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner.

(10) Upon petition of the department and after a hearing held upon reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a warrant to an officer or employee of the department authorizing him or her to enter and inspect at reasonable times, and examine the books and accounts of, any licensed or certified behavioral health service provider refusing to consent to inspection or examination by the department or which the department has reasonable cause to believe is operating in violation of this chapter.

(11) The department shall maintain and periodically publish a current list of licensed or certified behavioral health service providers.

(12) Each licensed or certified behavioral health service provider shall file with the department or the authority upon request, data, statistics, schedules, and information the department or the authority reasonably requires. A licensed or certified behavioral health service provider that without good cause fails to furnish any data, statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent returns thereof, may have its license or certification revoked or suspended.

(13) The ((department)) authority shall use the data provided in subsection (12) of this section to evaluate each program that admits children to inpatient substance use disorder treatment upon application of their parents. The evaluation must be done at least once every twelve months. In addition, the ((department)) authority shall randomly select and review the information on individual children who are admitted on application of the child's parent for the purpose of determining whether the child was appropriately placed into substance use disorder treatment based on an objective evaluation of the child's condition and the outcome of the child's treatment.

(14) Any settlement agreement entered into between the department and licensed or certified behavioral health service providers to resolve administrative complaints, license or certification violations, license or certification suspensions, or license or certification revocations may not reduce the number of violations reported by the department unless the department concludes, based on evidence gathered by inspectors, that the licensed or certified behavioral health service provider did not commit one or more of the violations.

(15) In cases in which a behavioral health service provider that is in violation of licensing or certification standards attempts to transfer or sell the behavioral health service provider to a family member, the transfer or sale may only be made for the purpose of remedying license or certification violations and achieving full compliance with the terms of the license or certification. Transfers or sales to family members are prohibited in cases in which the purpose of the transfer or sale is to avoid liability or reset the number of license or certification violations found before the transfer or sale. If the department finds that the owner intends to transfer or sell, or has completed the transfer or sale of, ownership of the behavioral health service provider to a family member solely for the purpose of resetting the number of violations found before the transfer or sale, the department may not renew the behavioral health service provider's license or certification or issue a new license or certification to the behavioral health service provider.

Sec. 4006. RCW 71.24.045 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 421 are each amended to read as follows:

The behavioral health organization shall:

(1) Contract as needed with licensed or certified service providers. The behavioral health organization may, in the absence of a licensed or certified service provider entity, become a licensed or certified service provider entity pursuant to minimum standards required for licensing or certification by the department for the purpose of providing services not available from licensed or certified service providers;

(2) Operate as a licensed or certified service provider if it deems that doing so is more efficient and cost effective than contracting for services. When doing so, the behavioral health organization shall comply with rules ((promulgated)) adopted by the ((secretary)) director that shall provide measurements to determine when a behavioral health organization provided service is more efficient and cost effective;

(3) Monitor and perform biennial fiscal audits of licensed or certified service providers who have contracted with the behavioral health organization to provide services required by this chapter. The monitoring and audits shall be performed by means of a formal process which insures that the licensed or certified service providers and professionals designated in this subsection meet the terms of their contracts;

(4) Establish reasonable limitations on administrative costs for agencies that contract with the behavioral health organization;

(5) Assure that the special needs of minorities, older adults, individuals with disabilities, children, and low-income persons are met within the priorities established in this chapter;

(6) Maintain patient tracking information in a central location as required for resource management services and the ((department's)) authority's information system;

(7) Collaborate to ensure that policies do not result in an adverse shift of persons with mental illness into state and local correctional facilities;

(8) Work with the ((department)) authority to expedite the enrollment or reenrollment of eligible persons leaving state or local correctional facilities and institutions for mental diseases;

(9) Work closely with the designated crisis responder to maximize appropriate placement of persons into community services; and

(10) Coordinate services for individuals who have received services through the community mental health system and who become patients at a state psychiatric hospital to ensure they are transitioned into the community in accordance with mutually agreed upon discharge plans and upon determination by the medical director of the state psychiatric hospital that they no longer need intensive inpatient care.

Sec. 4007. RCW 71.24.061 and 2014 c 225 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((department)) authority shall provide flexibility in provider contracting to behavioral health organizations for children's mental health services. ((Beginning with 2007-2009 biennium contracts,)) Behavioral health organization contracts shall authorize behavioral health organizations to allow and encourage licensed or certified community mental health centers to subcontract with individual licensed mental health professionals when necessary to meet the need for an adequate, culturally competent, and qualified children's mental health provider network.

(2) To the extent that funds are specifically appropriated for this purpose or that nonstate funds are available, a children's mental health evidence-based practice institute shall be established at the University of Washington division of public behavioral health and justice policy. The institute shall closely collaborate with entities currently engaged in evaluating and promoting the use of evidence-based, research-based, promising, or consensus-based practices in children's mental health treatment, including but not limited to the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences, children's hospital and regional medical center, the University of Washington school of nursing, the University of Washington school of social work, and the Washington state institute for public policy. To ensure that funds appropriated are used to the greatest extent possible for their intended purpose, the University of Washington's indirect costs of administration shall not exceed ten percent of appropriated funding. The institute shall:

(a) Improve the implementation of evidence-based and research-based practices by providing sustained and effective training and consultation to licensed children's mental health providers and child-serving agencies who are implementing evidence-based or researched-based practices for treatment of children's emotional or behavioral disorders, or who are interested in adapting these practices to better serve ethnically or culturally diverse children. Efforts under this subsection should include a focus on appropriate oversight of implementation of evidence-based practices to ensure fidelity to these practices and thereby achieve positive outcomes;

(b) Continue the successful implementation of the "partnerships for success" model by consulting with communities so they may select, implement, and continually evaluate the success of evidence-based practices that are relevant to the needs of children, youth, and families in their community;

(c) Partner with youth, family members, family advocacy, and culturally competent provider organizations to develop a series of information sessions, literature, and online resources for families to become informed and engaged in evidence-based and research-based practices;

(d) Participate in the identification of outcome-based performance measures under RCW 71.36.025(2) and partner in a statewide effort to implement statewide outcomes monitoring and quality improvement processes; and

(e) Serve as a statewide resource to the ((department)) authority and other entities on child and adolescent evidence-based, research-based, promising, or consensus-based practices for children's mental health treatment, maintaining a working knowledge through ongoing review of academic and professional literature, and knowledge of other evidence-based practice implementation efforts in Washington and other states.

(3) To the extent that funds are specifically appropriated for this purpose, the ((department)) authority in collaboration with the evidence-based practice institute shall implement a pilot program to support primary care providers in the assessment and provision of appropriate diagnosis and treatment of children with mental and behavioral health disorders and track outcomes of this program. The program shall be designed to promote more accurate diagnoses and treatment through timely case consultation between primary care providers and child psychiatric specialists, and focused educational learning collaboratives with primary care providers.

Sec. 4008. RCW 71.24.100 and 2014 c 225 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

A county authority or a group of county authorities may enter into a joint operating agreement to respond to a request for a detailed plan and contract with the state to operate a behavioral health organization whose boundaries are consistent with the regional service areas established under RCW 43.20A.893 (as recodified by this act). Any agreement between two or more county authorities shall provide:

(1) That each county shall bear a share of the cost of mental health services; and

(2) That the treasurer of one participating county shall be the custodian of funds made available for the purposes of such mental health services, and that the treasurer may make payments from such funds upon audit by the appropriate auditing officer of the county for which he or she is treasurer.

Sec. 4009. RCW 71.24.155 and 2014 c 225 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

Grants shall be made by the ((department)) authority to behavioral health organizations for community mental health programs totaling not less than ninety-five percent of available resources. The ((department)) authority may use up to forty percent of the remaining five percent to provide community demonstration projects, including early intervention or primary prevention programs for children, and the remainder shall be for emergency needs and technical assistance under this chapter.

Sec. 4010. RCW 71.24.160 and 2014 c 225 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

The behavioral health organizations shall make satisfactory showing to the ((secretary)) director that state funds shall in no case be used to replace local funds from any source being used to finance mental health services prior to January 1, 1990. Maintenance of effort funds devoted to judicial services related to involuntary commitment reimbursed under RCW 71.05.730 must be expended for other purposes that further treatment for mental health and chemical dependency disorders.

Sec. 4011. RCW 71.24.215 and 1982 c 204 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Clients receiving mental health services funded by available resources shall be charged a fee under sliding-scale fee schedules, based on ability to pay, approved by the ((department)) authority or the department of social and health services, as appropriate. Fees shall not exceed the actual cost of care.

Sec. 4012. RCW 71.24.220 and 1999 c 10 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((secretary)) director may withhold state grants in whole or in part for any community mental health program in the event of a failure to comply with this chapter or the related rules adopted by the ((department)) authority.

Sec. 4013. RCW 71.24.240 and 2014 c 225 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to establish eligibility for funding under this chapter, any behavioral health organization seeking to obtain federal funds for the support of any aspect of a community mental health program as defined in this chapter shall submit program plans to the ((secretary)) director for prior review and approval before such plans are submitted to any federal agency.

Sec. 4014. RCW 71.24.300 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 522 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon the request of a tribal authority or authorities within a behavioral health organization the joint operating agreement or the county authority shall allow for the inclusion of the tribal authority to be represented as a party to the behavioral health organization.

(2) The roles and responsibilities of the county and tribal authorities shall be determined by the terms of that agreement including a determination of membership on the governing board and advisory committees, the number of tribal representatives to be party to the agreement, and the provisions of law and shall assure the provision of culturally competent services to the tribes served.

(3) The state behavioral health authority may not determine the roles and responsibilities of county authorities as to each other under behavioral health organizations by rule, except to assure that all duties required of behavioral health organizations are assigned and that counties and the behavioral health organization do not duplicate functions and that a single authority has final responsibility for all available resources and performance under the behavioral health organization's contract with the ((secretary)) director.

(4) If a behavioral health organization is a private entity, the ((department)) authority shall allow for the inclusion of the tribal authority to be represented as a party to the behavioral health organization.

(5) The roles and responsibilities of the private entity and the tribal authorities shall be determined by the ((department)) authority, through negotiation with the tribal authority.

(6) Behavioral health organizations shall submit an overall six-year operating and capital plan, timeline, and budget and submit progress reports and an updated two-year plan biennially thereafter, to assume within available resources all of the following duties:

(a) Administer and provide for the availability of all resource management services, residential services, and community support services.

(b) Administer and provide for the availability of an adequate network of evaluation and treatment services to ensure access to treatment, all investigation, transportation, court-related, and other services provided by the state or counties pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW.

(c) Provide within the boundaries of each behavioral health organization evaluation and treatment services for at least ninety percent of persons detained or committed for periods up to seventeen days according to chapter 71.05 RCW. Behavioral health organizations may contract to purchase evaluation and treatment services from other organizations if they are unable to provide for appropriate resources within their boundaries. Insofar as the original intent of serving persons in the community is maintained, the ((secretary)) director is authorized to approve exceptions on a case-by-case basis to the requirement to provide evaluation and treatment services within the boundaries of each behavioral health organization. Such exceptions are limited to:

(i) Contracts with neighboring or contiguous regions; or

(ii) Individuals detained or committed for periods up to seventeen days at the state hospitals at the discretion of the ((secretary)) director.

(d) Administer and provide for the availability of all other mental health services, which shall include patient counseling, day treatment, consultation, education services, employment services as described in RCW 71.24.035, and mental health services to children.

(e) Establish standards and procedures for reviewing individual service plans and determining when that person may be discharged from resource management services.

(7) A behavioral health organization may request that any state-owned land, building, facility, or other capital asset which was ever purchased, deeded, given, or placed in trust for the care of the persons with mental illness and which is within the boundaries of a behavioral health organization be made available to support the operations of the behavioral health organization. State agencies managing such capital assets shall give first priority to requests for their use pursuant to this chapter.

(8) Each behavioral health organization shall appoint a behavioral health advisory board which shall review and provide comments on plans and policies developed under this chapter, provide local oversight regarding the activities of the behavioral health organization, and work with the behavioral health organization to resolve significant concerns regarding service delivery and outcomes. The ((department)) authority shall establish statewide procedures for the operation of regional advisory committees including mechanisms for advisory board feedback to the ((department)) authority regarding behavioral health organization performance. The composition of the board shall be broadly representative of the demographic character of the region and shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of consumers of substance use disorder and mental health services and their families, law enforcement, and, where the county is not the behavioral health organization, county elected officials. Composition and length of terms of board members may differ between behavioral health organizations but shall be included in each behavioral health organization's contract and approved by the ((secretary)) director.

(9) Behavioral health organizations shall assume all duties specified in their plans and joint operating agreements through biennial contractual agreements with the ((secretary)) director.

(10) Behavioral health organizations may receive technical assistance from the housing trust fund and may identify and submit projects for housing and housing support services to the housing trust fund established under chapter 43.185 RCW. Projects identified or submitted under this subsection must be fully integrated with the behavioral health organization six-year operating and capital plan, timeline, and budget required by subsection (6) of this section.

Sec. 4015. RCW 71.24.310 and 2017 c 222 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that administration of chapter 71.05 RCW and this chapter can be most efficiently and effectively implemented as part of the behavioral health organization defined in RCW 71.24.025. For this reason, the legislature intends that the ((department)) authority and the behavioral health organizations shall work together to implement chapter 71.05 RCW as follows:

(1) ((By June 1, 2006,)) Behavioral health organizations shall recommend to the ((department)) authority the number of state hospital beds that should be allocated for use by each behavioral health organization. The statewide total allocation shall not exceed the number of state hospital beds offering long-term inpatient care, as defined in this chapter, for which funding is provided in the biennial appropriations act.

(2) If there is consensus among the behavioral health organizations regarding the number of state hospital beds that should be allocated for use by each behavioral health organization, the ((department)) authority shall contract with each behavioral health organization accordingly.

(3) If there is not consensus among the behavioral health organizations regarding the number of beds that should be allocated for use by each behavioral health organization, the ((department)) authority shall establish by emergency rule the number of state hospital beds that are available for use by each behavioral health organization. ((The emergency rule shall be effective September 1, 2006.)) The primary factor used in the allocation shall be the estimated number of adults with acute and chronic mental illness in each behavioral health organization area, based upon population-adjusted incidence and utilization.

(4) The allocation formula shall be updated at least every three years to reflect demographic changes, and new evidence regarding the incidence of acute and chronic mental illness and the need for long-term inpatient care. In the updates, the statewide total allocation shall include (a) all state hospital beds offering long-term inpatient care for which funding is provided in the biennial appropriations act; plus (b) the estimated equivalent number of beds or comparable diversion services contracted in accordance with subsection (5) of this section.

(5) The ((department)) authority is encouraged to enter performance-based contracts with behavioral health organizations to provide some or all of the behavioral health organization's allocated long-term inpatient treatment capacity in the community, rather than in the state hospital. The performance contracts shall specify the number of patient days of care available for use by the behavioral health organization in the state hospital.

(6) If a behavioral health organization uses more state hospital patient days of care than it has been allocated under subsection (3) or (4) of this section, or than it has contracted to use under subsection (5) of this section, whichever is less, it shall reimburse the ((department)) authority for that care. Reimbursements must be calculated using quarterly average census data to determine an average number of days used in excess of the bed allocation for the quarter. The reimbursement rate per day shall be the hospital's total annual budget for long-term inpatient care, divided by the total patient days of care assumed in development of that budget.

(7) One-half of any reimbursements received pursuant to subsection (6) of this section shall be used to support the cost of operating the state hospital ((and, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, implementing new services that will enable a behavioral health organization to reduce its utilization of the state hospital)). The ((department)) authority shall distribute the remaining half of such reimbursements among behavioral health organizations that have used less than their allocated or contracted patient days of care at that hospital, proportional to the number of patient days of care not used.

Sec. 4016. RCW 71.24.320 and 2014 c 225 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an existing behavioral health organization chooses not to respond to a request for a detailed plan, or is unable to substantially meet the requirements of a request for a detailed plan, or notifies the ((department of social and health services)) authority it will no longer serve as a behavioral health organization, the ((department)) authority shall utilize a procurement process in which other entities recognized by the ((secretary)) director may bid to serve as the behavioral health organization.

(a) The request for proposal shall include a scoring factor for proposals that include additional financial resources beyond that provided by state appropriation or allocation.

(b) The ((department)) authority shall provide detailed briefings to all bidders in accordance with ((department)) authority and state procurement policies.

(c) The request for proposal shall also include a scoring factor for proposals submitted by nonprofit entities that include a component to maximize the utilization of state provided resources and the leverage of other funds for the support of mental health services to persons with mental illness.

(2) A behavioral health organization that voluntarily terminates, refuses to renew, or refuses to sign a mandatory amendment to its contract to act as a behavioral health organization is prohibited from responding to a procurement under this section or serving as a behavioral health organization for five years from the date that the department of social and health services, or the authority, as applicable, signs a contract with the entity that will serve as the behavioral health organization.

Sec. 4017. RCW 71.24.330 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 422 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Contracts between a behavioral health organization and the ((department)) authority shall include mechanisms for monitoring performance under the contract and remedies for failure to substantially comply with the requirements of the contract including, but not limited to, financial penalties, termination of the contract, and reprocurement of the contract.

(b) The ((department)) authority shall incorporate the criteria to measure the performance of service coordination organizations into contracts with behavioral health organizations as provided in chapter 70.320 RCW.

(2) The behavioral health organization procurement processes shall encourage the preservation of infrastructure previously purchased by the community mental health service delivery system, the maintenance of linkages between other services and delivery systems, and maximization of the use of available funds for services versus profits. However, a behavioral health organization selected through the procurement process is not required to contract for services with any county-owned or operated facility. The behavioral health organization procurement process shall provide that public funds appropriated by the legislature shall not be used to promote or deter, encourage, or discourage employees from exercising their rights under Title 29, chapter 7, subchapter II, United States Code or chapter 41.56 RCW.

(3) In addition to the requirements of RCW 71.24.035, contracts shall:

(a) Define administrative costs and ensure that the behavioral health organization does not exceed an administrative cost of ten percent of available funds;

(b) Require effective collaboration with law enforcement, criminal justice agencies, and the chemical dependency treatment system;

(c) Require substantial implementation of ((department)) authority adopted integrated screening and assessment process and matrix of best practices;

(d) Maintain the decision-making independence of designated crisis responders;

(e) Except at the discretion of the secretary of the department of social and health services in consultation with the director or as specified in the biennial budget, require behavioral health organizations to pay the state for the costs associated with individuals who are being served on the grounds of the state hospitals and who are not receiving long-term inpatient care as defined in RCW 71.24.025;

(f) Include a negotiated alternative dispute resolution clause;

(g) Include a provision requiring either party to provide one hundred eighty days' notice of any issue that may cause either party to voluntarily terminate, refuse to renew, or refuse to sign a mandatory amendment to the contract to act as a behavioral health organization. If either party decides to voluntarily terminate, refuse to renew, or refuse to sign a mandatory amendment to the contract to serve as a behavioral health organization they shall provide ninety days' advance notice in writing to the other party;

(h) Require behavioral health organizations to provide services as identified in RCW 71.05.585 to individuals committed for involuntary commitment under less restrictive alternative court orders when:

(i) The individual is enrolled in the medicaid program and meets behavioral health organization access to care standards; or

(ii) The individual is not enrolled in medicaid, does not have other insurance which can pay for the services, and the behavioral health organization has adequate available resources to provide the services; and

(i) Establish caseload guidelines for care coordinators who supervise less restrictive alternative orders and guidelines for response times during and immediately following periods of hospitalization or incarceration.

Sec. 4018. RCW 71.24.340 and 2014 c 225 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((secretary)) director shall require the behavioral health organizations to develop agreements with city and county jails to accept referrals for enrollment on behalf of a confined person, prior to the person's release.

Sec. 4019. RCW 71.24.350 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 523 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) authority shall require each behavioral health organization to provide for a separately funded behavioral health ombuds office in each behavioral health organization that is independent of the behavioral health organization. The ombuds office shall maximize the use of consumer advocates.

Sec. 4020. RCW 71.24.360 and 2014 c 225 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((department)) authority may establish new behavioral health organization boundaries in any part of the state:

(a) Where more than one organization chooses not to respond to, or is unable to substantially meet the requirements of, the request for a detailed plan under RCW 71.24.320;

(b) Where a behavioral health organization is subject to reprocurement under RCW 71.24.330; or

(c) Where two or more behavioral health organizations propose to reconfigure themselves to achieve consolidation, in which case the procurement process described in RCW 71.24.320 and 71.24.330(2) does not apply.

(2) The ((department)) authority may establish no fewer than six and no more than fourteen behavioral health organizations under this chapter. No entity shall be responsible for more than three behavioral health organizations.

Sec. 4021. RCW 71.24.370 and 2014 c 225 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except for monetary damage claims which have been reduced to final judgment by a superior court, this section applies to all claims against the state, state agencies, state officials, or state employees that exist on or arise after March 29, 2006.

(2) Except as expressly provided in contracts entered into between the ((department)) authority and the behavioral health organizations after March 29, 2006, the entities identified in subsection (3) of this section shall have no claim for declaratory relief, injunctive relief, judicial review under chapter 34.05 RCW, or civil liability against the state or state agencies for actions or inactions performed pursuant to the administration of this chapter with regard to the following: (a) The allocation or payment of federal or state funds; (b) the use or allocation of state hospital beds; or (c) financial responsibility for the provision of inpatient mental health care.

(3) This section applies to counties, behavioral health organizations, and entities which contract to provide behavioral health organization services and their subcontractors, agents, or employees.

Sec. 4022. RCW 71.24.380 and 2014 c 225 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((secretary)) director shall purchase mental health and chemical dependency treatment services primarily through managed care contracting, but may continue to purchase behavioral health services directly from tribal clinics and other tribal providers.

(2)(a) The ((secretary)) director shall request a detailed plan from the entities identified in (b) of this subsection that demonstrates compliance with the contractual elements of RCW 43.20A.894 (as recodified by this act) and federal regulations related to medicaid managed care contracting((,)) including, but not limited to: Having a sufficient network of providers to provide adequate access to mental health and chemical dependency services for residents of the regional service area that meet eligibility criteria for services, ability to maintain and manage adequate reserves, and maintenance of quality assurance processes. Any responding entity that submits a detailed plan that demonstrates that it can meet the requirements of this section must be awarded the contract to serve as the behavioral health organization.

(b)(i) For purposes of responding to the request for a detailed plan under (a) of this subsection, the entities from which a plan will be requested are:

(A) A county in a single county regional service area that currently serves as the regional support network for that area;

(B) In the event that a county has made a decision prior to January 1, 2014, not to contract as a regional support network, any private entity that serves as the regional support network for that area;

(C) All counties within a regional service area that includes more than one county, which shall form a responding entity through the adoption of an interlocal agreement. The interlocal agreement must specify the terms by which the responding entity shall serve as the behavioral health organization within the regional service area.

(ii) In the event that a regional service area is comprised of multiple counties including one that has made a decision prior to January 1, 2014, not to contract as a regional support network the counties shall adopt an interlocal agreement and may respond to the request for a detailed plan under (a) of this subsection and the private entity may also respond to the request for a detailed plan. If both responding entities meet the requirements of this section, the responding entities shall follow the ((department's)) authority's procurement process established in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) If an entity that has received a request under this section to submit a detailed plan does not respond to the request, a responding entity under subsection (1) of this section is unable to substantially meet the requirements of the request for a detailed plan, or more than one responding entity substantially meets the requirements for the request for a detailed plan, the ((department)) authority shall use a procurement process in which other entities recognized by the ((secretary)) director may bid to serve as the behavioral health organization in that regional service area.

(4) Contracts for behavioral health organizations must begin on April 1, 2016.

(5) Upon request of all of the county authorities in a regional service area, the ((department and the health care)) authority may ((jointly)) purchase behavioral health services through an integrated medical and behavioral health services contract with a behavioral health organization or a managed health care system as defined in RCW 74.09.522, pursuant to standards to be developed ((jointly)) by the ((secretary and the health care)) authority. Any contract for such a purchase must comply with all federal medicaid and state law requirements related to managed health care contracting.

(6) As an incentive to county authorities to become early adopters of fully integrated purchasing of medical and behavioral health services, the standards adopted by the ((secretary and the health care)) authority under subsection (5) of this section shall provide for an incentive payment to counties which elect to move to full integration by January 1, 2016. Subject to federal approval, the incentive payment shall be targeted at ten percent of savings realized by the state within the regional service area in which the fully integrated purchasing takes place. Savings shall be calculated in alignment with the outcome and performance measures established in RCW 43.20A.895, 70.320.020, and 71.36.025, and incentive payments for early adopter counties shall be made available for up to a six-year period, or until full integration of medical and behavioral health services is accomplished statewide, whichever comes sooner, according to rules to be developed by the ((secretary and health care)) authority.

Sec. 4023. RCW 71.24.385 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 510 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, behavioral health organizations shall develop the means to serve the needs of people:

(a) With mental disorders residing within the boundaries of their regional service area. Elements of the program may include:

(i) Crisis diversion services;

(ii) Evaluation and treatment and community hospital beds;

(iii) Residential treatment;

(iv) Programs for intensive community treatment;

(v) Outpatient services;

(vi) Peer support services;

(vii) Community support services;

(viii) Resource management services; and

(ix) Supported housing and supported employment services.

(b) With substance use disorders and their families, people incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated people.

(i) Elements of the program shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, a continuum of substance use disorder treatment services that includes:

(A) Withdrawal management;

(B) Residential treatment; and

(C) Outpatient treatment.

(ii) The program may include peer support, supported housing, supported employment, crisis diversion, or recovery support services.

(iii) The ((department)) authority may contract for the use of an approved substance use disorder treatment program or other individual or organization if the ((secretary)) director considers this to be an effective and economical course to follow.

(2) The behavioral health organization shall have the flexibility, within the funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose and the terms of their contract, to design the mix of services that will be most effective within their service area of meeting the needs of people with behavioral health disorders and avoiding placement of such individuals at the state mental hospital. Behavioral health organizations are encouraged to maximize the use of evidence-based practices and alternative resources with the goal of substantially reducing and potentially eliminating the use of institutions for mental diseases.

(3)(a) Treatment provided under this chapter must be purchased primarily through managed care contracts.

(b) Consistent with RCW 71.24.580, services and funding provided through the criminal justice treatment account are intended to be exempted from managed care contracting.

Sec. 4024. RCW 71.24.400 and 2001 c 323 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that the current complex set of federal, state, and local rules and regulations, audited and administered at multiple levels, which affect the community mental health service delivery system, focus primarily on the process of providing mental health services and do not sufficiently address consumer and system outcomes. The legislature finds that the ((department)) authority and the community mental health service delivery system must make ongoing efforts to achieve the purposes set forth in RCW 71.24.015 related to reduced administrative layering, duplication, elimination of process measures not specifically required by the federal government for the receipt of federal funds, and reduced administrative costs.

Sec. 4025. RCW 71.24.405 and 2014 c 225 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) authority shall establish a comprehensive and collaborative effort within behavioral health organizations and with local mental health service providers aimed at creating innovative and streamlined community mental health service delivery systems, in order to carry out the purposes set forth in RCW 71.24.400 and to capture the diversity of the community mental health service delivery system.

The ((department)) authority must accomplish the following:

(1) Identification, review, and cataloging of all rules, regulations, duplicative administrative and monitoring functions, and other requirements that currently lead to inefficiencies in the community mental health service delivery system and, if possible, eliminate the requirements;

(2) The systematic and incremental development of a single system of accountability for all federal, state, and local funds provided to the community mental health service delivery system. Systematic efforts should be made to include federal and local funds into the single system of accountability;

(3) The elimination of process regulations and related contract and reporting requirements. In place of the regulations and requirements, a set of outcomes for mental health adult and children clients according to this chapter (( 71.24 RCW)) must be used to measure the performance of mental health service providers and behavioral health organizations. Such outcomes shall focus on stabilizing out-of-home and hospital care, increasing stable community living, increasing age-appropriate activities, achieving family and consumer satisfaction with services, and system efficiencies;

(4) Evaluation of the feasibility of contractual agreements between the ((department of social and health services)) authority and behavioral health organizations and mental health service providers that link financial incentives to the success or failure of mental health service providers and behavioral health organizations to meet outcomes established for mental health service clients;

(5) The involvement of mental health consumers and their representatives. Mental health consumers and their representatives will be involved in the development of outcome standards for mental health clients under section 5 of this act; and

(6) An independent evaluation component to measure the success of the ((department)) authority in fully implementing the provisions of RCW 71.24.400 and this section.

Sec. 4026. RCW 71.24.415 and 1999 c 10 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

To carry out the purposes specified in RCW 71.24.400, the ((department)) authority is encouraged to utilize its authority to eliminate any unnecessary rules, regulations, standards, or contracts, to immediately eliminate duplication of audits or any other unnecessarily duplicated functions, and to seek any waivers of federal or state rules or regulations necessary to achieve the purpose of streamlining the community mental health service delivery system and infusing it with incentives that reward efficiency, positive outcomes for clients, and quality services.

Sec. 4027. RCW 71.24.420 and 2014 c 225 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) authority shall operate the community mental health service delivery system authorized under this chapter within the following constraints:

(1) The full amount of federal funds for mental health services, plus qualifying state expenditures as appropriated in the biennial operating budget, shall be appropriated to the ((department)) authority each year in the biennial appropriations act to carry out the provisions of the community mental health service delivery system authorized in this chapter.

(2) The ((department)) authority may expend funds defined in subsection (1) of this section in any manner that will effectively accomplish the outcome measures established in RCW 43.20A.895 and 71.36.025 and performance measures linked to those outcomes.

(3) The ((department)) authority shall implement strategies that accomplish the outcome measures established in RCW 43.20A.895, 70.320.020, and 71.36.025 and performance measures linked to those outcomes.

(4) The ((department)) authority shall monitor expenditures against the appropriation levels provided for in subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 4028. RCW 71.24.430 and 2014 c 225 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((department)) authority shall ensure the coordination of allied services for mental health clients. The ((department)) authority shall implement strategies for resolving organizational, regulatory, and funding issues at all levels of the system, including the state, the behavioral health organizations, and local service providers.

(2) The ((department)) authority shall propose, in operating budget requests, transfers of funding among programs to support collaborative service delivery to persons who require services from multiple department of social and health services and authority programs. The ((department)) authority shall report annually to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives on actions and projects it has taken to promote collaborative service delivery.

Sec. 4029. RCW 71.24.455 and 2014 c 225 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((secretary)) director shall select and contract with a behavioral health organization or private provider to provide specialized access and services to offenders with mental illness upon release from total confinement within the department of corrections who have been identified by the department of corrections and selected by the behavioral health organization or private provider as high-priority clients for services and who meet service program entrance criteria. The program shall enroll no more than twenty-five offenders at any one time, or a number of offenders that can be accommodated within the appropriated funding level, and shall seek to fill any vacancies that occur.

(2) Criteria shall include a determination by department of corrections staff that:

(a) The offender suffers from a major mental illness and needs continued mental health treatment;

(b) The offender's previous crime or crimes have been determined by either the court or department of corrections staff to have been substantially influenced by the offender's mental illness;

(c) It is believed the offender will be less likely to commit further criminal acts if provided ongoing mental health care;

(d) The offender is unable or unlikely to obtain housing and/or treatment from other sources for any reason; and

(e) The offender has at least one year remaining before his or her sentence expires but is within six months of release to community housing and is currently housed within a work release facility or any department of corrections' division of prisons facility.

(3) The behavioral health organization or private provider shall provide specialized access and services to the selected offenders. The services shall be aimed at lowering the risk of recidivism. An oversight committee composed of a representative of the ((department)) authority, a representative of the selected behavioral health organization or private provider, and a representative of the department of corrections shall develop policies to guide the pilot program, provide dispute resolution including making determinations as to when entrance criteria or required services may be waived in individual cases, advise the department of corrections and the behavioral health organization or private provider on the selection of eligible offenders, and set minimum requirements for service contracts. The selected behavioral health organization or private provider shall implement the policies and service contracts. The following services shall be provided:

(a) Intensive case management to include a full range of intensive community support and treatment in client-to-staff ratios of not more than ten offenders per case manager including: (i) A minimum of weekly group and weekly individual counseling; (ii) home visits by the program manager at least two times per month; and (iii) counseling focusing on relapse prevention and past, current, or future behavior of the offender.

(b) The case manager shall attempt to locate and procure housing appropriate to the living and clinical needs of the offender and as needed to maintain the psychiatric stability of the offender. The entire range of emergency, transitional, and permanent housing and involuntary hospitalization must be considered as available housing options. A housing subsidy may be provided to offenders to defray housing costs up to a maximum of six thousand six hundred dollars per offender per year and be administered by the case manager. Additional funding sources may be used to offset these costs when available.

(c) The case manager shall collaborate with the assigned prison, work release, or community corrections staff during release planning, prior to discharge, and in ongoing supervision of the offender while under the authority of the department of corrections.

(d) Medications including the full range of psychotropic medications including atypical antipsychotic medications may be required as a condition of the program. Medication prescription, medication monitoring, and counseling to support offender understanding, acceptance, and compliance with prescribed medication regimens must be included.

(e) A systematic effort to engage offenders to continuously involve themselves in current and long-term treatment and appropriate habilitative activities shall be made.

(f) Classes appropriate to the clinical and living needs of the offender and appropriate to his or her level of understanding.

(g) The case manager shall assist the offender in the application and qualification for entitlement funding, including medicaid, state assistance, and other available government and private assistance at any point that the offender is qualified and resources are available.

(h) The offender shall be provided access to daily activities such as drop-in centers, prevocational and vocational training and jobs, and volunteer activities.

(4) Once an offender has been selected into the pilot program, the offender shall remain in the program until the end of his or her sentence or unless the offender is released from the pilot program earlier by the department of corrections.

(5) Specialized training in the management and supervision of high-crime risk offenders with mental illness shall be provided to all participating mental health providers by the ((department)) authority and the department of corrections prior to their participation in the program and as requested thereafter.

(6) The pilot program provided for in this section must be providing services by July 1, 1998.

Sec. 4030. RCW 71.24.460 and 1999 c 10 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) authority, in collaboration with the department of corrections and the oversight committee created in RCW 71.24.455, shall track outcomes and submit to the legislature annual reports regarding services and outcomes. The reports shall include the following: (1) A statistical analysis regarding the reoffense and reinstitutionalization rate by the enrollees in the program set forth in RCW 71.24.455; (2) a quantitative description of the services provided in the program set forth in RCW 71.24.455; and (3) recommendations for any needed modifications in the services and funding levels to increase the effectiveness of the program set forth in RCW 71.24.455. By December 1, 2003, the department shall certify the reoffense rate for enrollees in the program authorized by RCW 71.24.455 to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative committees. If the reoffense rate exceeds fifteen percent, the authorization for the department to conduct the program under RCW 71.24.455 is terminated on January 1, 2004.

Sec. 4031. RCW 71.24.470 and 2014 c 225 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((secretary)) director shall contract, to the extent that funds are appropriated for this purpose, for case management services and such other services as the ((secretary)) director deems necessary to assist offenders identified under RCW 72.09.370 for participation in the offender reentry community safety program. The contracts may be with behavioral health organizations or any other qualified and appropriate entities.

(2) The case manager has the authority to assist these offenders in obtaining the services, as set forth in the plan created under RCW 72.09.370(2), for up to five years. The services may include coordination of mental health services, assistance with unfunded medical expenses, obtaining chemical dependency treatment, housing, employment services, educational or vocational training, independent living skills, parenting education, anger management services, and such other services as the case manager deems necessary.

(3) The legislature intends that funds appropriated for the purposes of RCW 72.09.370, 71.05.145, and 71.05.212, and this section and distributed to the behavioral health organizations are to supplement and not to supplant general funding. Funds appropriated to implement RCW 72.09.370, 71.05.145, and 71.05.212, and this section are not to be considered available resources as defined in RCW 71.24.025 and are not subject to the priorities, terms, or conditions in the appropriations act established pursuant to RCW 71.24.035.

(4) The offender reentry community safety program was formerly known as the community integration assistance program.

Sec. 4032. RCW 71.24.480 and 2014 c 225 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A licensed or certified service provider or behavioral health organization, acting in the course of the provider's or organization's duties under this chapter, is not liable for civil damages resulting from the injury or death of another caused by a participant in the offender reentry community safety program who is a client of the provider or organization, unless the act or omission of the provider or organization constitutes:

(a) Gross negligence;

(b) Willful or wanton misconduct; or

(c) A breach of the duty to warn of and protect from a client's threatened violent behavior if the client has communicated a serious threat of physical violence against a reasonably ascertainable victim or victims.

(2) In addition to any other requirements to report violations, the licensed or certified service provider and behavioral health organization shall report an offender's expressions of intent to harm or other predatory behavior, regardless of whether there is an ascertainable victim, in progress reports and other established processes that enable courts and supervising entities to assess and address the progress and appropriateness of treatment.

(3) A licensed or certified service provider's or behavioral health organization's mere act of treating a participant in the offender reentry community safety program is not negligence. Nothing in this subsection alters the licensed or certified service provider's or behavioral health organization's normal duty of care with regard to the client.

(4) The limited liability provided by this section applies only to the conduct of licensed or certified service providers and behavioral health organizations and does not apply to conduct of the state.

(5) For purposes of this section, "participant in the offender reentry community safety program" means a person who has been identified under RCW 72.09.370 as an offender who: (a) Is reasonably believed to be dangerous to himself or herself or others; and (b) has a mental disorder.

Sec. 4033. RCW 71.24.490 and 2015 c 269 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) authority must collaborate with regional support networks or behavioral health organizations and the Washington state institute for public policy to estimate the capacity needs for evaluation and treatment services within each regional service area. Estimated capacity needs shall include consideration of the average occupancy rates needed to provide an adequate network of evaluation and treatment services to ensure access to treatment. A regional service network or behavioral health organization must develop and maintain an adequate plan to provide for evaluation and treatment needs.

Sec. 4034. RCW 71.24.500 and 2016 c 154 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of social and health services and the ((Washington state health care)) authority shall publish written guidance and provide trainings to behavioral health organizations, managed care organizations, and behavioral health providers related to how these organizations may provide outreach, assistance, transition planning, and rehabilitation case management reimbursable under federal law to persons who are incarcerated, involuntarily hospitalized, or in the process of transitioning out of one of these services. The guidance and trainings may also highlight preventive activities not reimbursable under federal law which may be cost-effective in a managed care environment. The purpose of this written guidance and trainings is to champion best clinical practices including, where appropriate, use of care coordination and long-acting injectable psychotropic medication, and to assist the health community to leverage federal funds and standardize payment and reporting procedures. The authority and the department of social and health services shall construe governing laws liberally to effectuate the broad remedial purposes of chapter 154, Laws of 2016, and provide a status update to the legislature by December 31, 2016.

Sec. 4035. RCW 71.24.515 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 514 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of social and health services shall contract for chemical dependency specialist services at division of children and family services offices to enhance the timeliness and quality of child protective services assessments and to better connect families to needed treatment services.

(2) The chemical dependency specialist's duties may include, but are not limited to: Conducting on-site substance use disorder screening and assessment, facilitating progress reports to department of social and health services employees, in-service training of department of social and health services employees and staff on substance use disorder issues, referring clients from the department of social and health services to treatment providers, and providing consultation on cases to department of social and health services employees.

(3) The department of social and health services shall provide training in and ensure that each case-carrying employee is trained in uniform screening for mental health and substance use disorder.

Sec. 4036. RCW 71.24.520 and 2014 c 225 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) authority, in the operation of the chemical dependency program may:

(1) Plan, establish, and maintain prevention and treatment programs as necessary or desirable;

(2) Make contracts necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers, including managed care contracts for behavioral health services, contracts entered into under RCW 74.09.522, and contracts with public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals to pay them for services rendered or furnished to persons with substance use disorders, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, or intoxicated persons;

(3) Enter into agreements for monitoring of verification of qualifications of counselors employed by approved treatment programs;

(4) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to carry out the provisions and purposes of this chapter and contract, cooperate, and coordinate with other public or private agencies or individuals for those purposes;

(5) Solicit and accept for use any gift of money or property made by will or otherwise, and any grant of money, services, or property from the federal government, the state, or any political subdivision thereof or any private source, and do all things necessary to cooperate with the federal government or any of its agencies in making an application for any grant;

(6) Administer or supervise the administration of the provisions relating to persons with substance use disorders and intoxicated persons of any state plan submitted for federal funding pursuant to federal health, welfare, or treatment legislation;

(7) Coordinate its activities and cooperate with chemical dependency programs in this and other states, and make contracts and other joint or cooperative arrangements with state, local, or private agencies in this and other states for the treatment of persons with substance use disorders and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons and for the common advancement of chemical dependency programs;

(8) Keep records and engage in research and the gathering of relevant statistics;

(9) Do other acts and things necessary or convenient to execute the authority expressly granted to it;

(10) Acquire, hold, or dispose of real property or any interest therein, and construct, lease, or otherwise provide treatment programs.

Sec. 4037. RCW 71.24.525 and 1989 c 270 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act, chapter 39.34 RCW, the ((department)) authority may enter into agreements to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 4038. RCW 71.24.530 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 515 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in this chapter, the ((secretary)) director shall not approve any substance use disorder facility, plan, or program for financial assistance under RCW 71.24.520 unless at least ten percent of the amount spent for the facility, plan, or program is provided from local public or private sources. When deemed necessary to maintain public standards of care in the substance use disorder facility, plan, or program, the ((secretary)) director may require the substance use disorder facility, plan, or program to provide up to fifty percent of the total spent for the program through fees, gifts, contributions, or volunteer services. The ((secretary)) director shall determine the value of the gifts, contributions, and volunteer services.

Sec. 4039. RCW 71.24.535 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) authority shall:

(1) Develop, encourage, and foster statewide, regional, and local plans and programs for the prevention of alcoholism and other drug addiction, treatment of persons with substance use disorders and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons in cooperation with public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals and provide technical assistance and consultation services for these purposes;

(2) Assure that any behavioral health organization managed care contract, or managed care contract under RCW 74.09.522 for behavioral health services or programs for the treatment of persons with substance use disorders and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons provides medically necessary services to medicaid recipients. This must include a continuum of mental health and substance use disorder services consistent with the state's medicaid plan or federal waiver authorities, and nonmedicaid services consistent with priorities established by the ((department)) authority;

(3) Coordinate the efforts and enlist the assistance of all public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals interested in prevention of alcoholism and drug addiction, and treatment of persons with substance use disorders and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons;

(4) Cooperate with public and private agencies in establishing and conducting programs to provide treatment for persons with substance use disorders and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons who are clients of the correctional system;

(5) Cooperate with the superintendent of public instruction, state board of education, schools, police departments, courts, and other public and private agencies, organizations and individuals in establishing programs for the prevention of substance use disorders, treatment of persons with substance use disorders and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons, and preparing curriculum materials thereon for use at all levels of school education;

(6) Prepare, publish, evaluate, and disseminate educational material dealing with the nature and effects of alcohol and other psychoactive chemicals and the consequences of their use;

(7) Develop and implement, as an integral part of substance use disorder treatment programs, an educational program for use in the treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons, which program shall include the dissemination of information concerning the nature and effects of alcohol and other psychoactive chemicals, the consequences of their use, the principles of recovery, and HIV and AIDS;

(8) Organize and foster training programs for persons engaged in treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons;

(9) Sponsor and encourage research into the causes and nature of substance use disorders, treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons, and serve as a clearinghouse for information relating to substance use disorders;

(10) Specify uniform methods for keeping statistical information by public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals, and collect and make available relevant statistical information, including number of persons treated, frequency of admission and readmission, and frequency and duration of treatment;

(11) Advise the governor in the preparation of a comprehensive plan for treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons for inclusion in the state's comprehensive health plan;

(12) Review all state health, welfare, and treatment plans to be submitted for federal funding under federal legislation, and advise the governor on provisions to be included relating to substance use disorders;

(13) Assist in the development of, and cooperate with, programs for alcohol and other psychoactive chemical education and treatment for employees of state and local governments and businesses and industries in the state;

(14) Use the support and assistance of interested persons in the community to encourage persons with substance use disorders voluntarily to undergo treatment;

(15) Cooperate with public and private agencies in establishing and conducting programs designed to deal with the problem of persons operating motor vehicles while intoxicated;

(16) Encourage general hospitals and other appropriate health facilities to admit without discrimination persons with substance use disorders, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons and to provide them with adequate and appropriate treatment;

(17) Encourage all health and disability insurance programs to include substance use disorders as a covered illness; and

(18) Organize and sponsor a statewide program to help court personnel, including judges, better understand substance use disorders and the uses of substance use disorder treatment programs.

Sec. 4040. RCW 71.24.540 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 516 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) authority shall contract with counties operating drug courts and counties in the process of implementing new drug courts for the provision of substance use disorder treatment services.

Sec. 4041. RCW 71.24.545 and 2014 c 225 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((In coordination with the health care)) The authority((, the department)) shall establish by appropriate means((,)) a comprehensive and coordinated program for the treatment of persons with substance use disorders and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons.

(2)(a) The program shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, a continuum of chemical dependency treatment services that includes:

(i) Withdrawal management;

(ii) Residential treatment; and

(iii) Outpatient treatment.

(b) The program may include peer support, supported housing, supported employment, crisis diversion, or recovery support services.

(3) All appropriate public and private resources shall be coordinated with and used in the program when possible.

(4) The ((department)) authority may contract for the use of an approved treatment program or other individual or organization if the ((secretary)) director considers this to be an effective and economical course to follow.

(5) By April 1, 2016, treatment provided under this chapter must be purchased primarily through managed care contracts. Consistent with RCW ((70.96A.350)) 71.24.580, services and funding provided through the criminal justice treatment account are intended to be exempted from managed care contracting.

Sec. 4042. RCW 71.24.555 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 517 are each amended to read as follows:

To be eligible to receive its share of liquor taxes and profits, each city and county shall devote no less than two percent of its share of liquor taxes and profits to the support of a substance use disorder program approved by the behavioral health organization and the ((secretary)) director, and licensed or certified by the department of health.

Sec. 4043. RCW 71.24.565 and 2014 c 225 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((secretary)) director shall adopt and may amend and repeal rules for acceptance of persons into the approved treatment program, considering available treatment resources and facilities, for the purpose of early and effective treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons. In establishing the rules, the secretary shall be guided by the following standards:

(1) If possible a patient shall be treated on a voluntary rather than an involuntary basis.

(2) A patient shall be initially assigned or transferred to outpatient treatment, unless he or she is found to require residential treatment.

(3) A person shall not be denied treatment solely because he or she has withdrawn from treatment against medical advice on a prior occasion or because he or she has relapsed after earlier treatment.

(4) An individualized treatment plan shall be prepared and maintained on a current basis for each patient.

(5) Provision shall be made for a continuum of coordinated treatment services, so that a person who leaves a facility or a form of treatment will have available and use other appropriate treatment.

Sec. 4044. RCW 71.24.580 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 981 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a) Substance use disorder treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder that, if not treated, would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of substance use disorder treatment services and treatment support services for nonviolent offenders within a drug court program; and (c) the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court. ((During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the criminal justice treatment account to the state general fund amounts as reflect the state savings associated with the implementation of the medicaid expansion of the federal affordable care act and the excess fund balance of the account.)) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account to the state general fund. It is the intent of the legislature to continue, in future biennia, the policy of transferring to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's successful completion of his or her substance use disorder treatment program, but does not include the following services: Housing other than that provided as part of an inpatient substance use disorder treatment program, vocational training, and mental health counseling; and

(b) "Treatment support" means transportation to or from inpatient or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.

(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of: (a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b) any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.

(4)(a) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics.

(b) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a) of this subsection to the department for the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.

(5) Moneys appropriated to the ((department)) authority from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed as specified in this subsection. The ((department)) authority may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section for its administrative costs.

(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the ((department)) authority from the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the distribution formula adopted under this section. The ((division of alcohol and substance abuse)) authority, in consultation with the department of corrections, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, the superior court judges' association, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the criminal defense bar, representatives of substance use disorder treatment providers, and any other person deemed by the ((department)) authority to be necessary, shall establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must be approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.

(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the ((department)) authority from the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting attorney. The ((department)) authority shall appoint a panel of representatives from the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges' association, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington defender's association or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, and substance use disorder treatment providers((, and the division)). The panel shall review county or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.

(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor, county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority, and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b) of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the criminal justice treatment account within that county. The funds shall be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance abuse treatment pursuant to RCW 71.24.560, treatment support services, and for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court.

(a) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent on the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court.

(b) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for treatment support services.

(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under this section.

(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used for substance abuse treatment.

(9) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW 2.30.030(3).

(10) The authority under this section to use funds from the criminal justice treatment account for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court expires June 30, 2015.

Sec. 4045. RCW 71.24.590 and 2017 c 297 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When making a decision on an application for licensing or certification of a program, the department shall:

(a) Consult with the county legislative authorities in the area in which an applicant proposes to locate a program and the city legislative authority in any city in which an applicant proposes to locate a program;

(b) License or certify only programs that will be sited in accordance with the appropriate county or city land use ordinances. Counties and cities may require conditional use permits with reasonable conditions for the siting of programs. Pursuant to RCW 36.70A.200, no local comprehensive plan or development regulation may preclude the siting of essential public facilities;

(c) Not discriminate in its licensing or certification decision on the basis of the corporate structure of the applicant;

(d) Consider the size of the population in need of treatment in the area in which the program would be located and license or certify only applicants whose programs meet the necessary treatment needs of that population;

(e) Consider the availability of other certified opioid treatment programs near the area in which the applicant proposes to locate the program;

(f) Consider the transportation systems that would provide service to the program and whether the systems will provide reasonable opportunities to access the program for persons in need of treatment;

(g) Consider whether the applicant has, or has demonstrated in the past, the capability to provide the appropriate services to assist the persons who utilize the program in meeting goals established by the legislature in RCW 71.24.585. The department shall prioritize licensing or certification to applicants who have demonstrated such capability and are able to measure their success in meeting such outcomes;

(h) Hold one public hearing in the community in which the facility is proposed to be located. The hearing shall be held at a time and location that are most likely to permit the largest number of interested persons to attend and present testimony. The department shall notify all appropriate media outlets of the time, date, and location of the hearing at least three weeks in advance of the hearing.

(2) A county may impose a maximum capacity for a program of not
less than three hundred fifty participants if necessary to address
specific local conditions cited by the county.

(3) A program applying for licensing or certification from the department and a program applying for a contract from a state agency that has been denied the licensing or certification or contract shall be provided with a written notice specifying the rationale and reasons for the denial.

(4) For the purpose of this chapter, opioid treatment program means:

(a) Dispensing a medication approved by the federal drug administration for the treatment of opioid use disorder and dispensing medication for the reversal of opioid overdose; and

(b) Providing a comprehensive range of medical and rehabilitative services.

Sec. 4046. RCW 71.24.595 and 2017 c 297 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, in consultation with opioid treatment program service providers and counties and cities, shall establish statewide treatment standards for licensed or certified opioid treatment programs. The department shall enforce these treatment standards. The treatment standards shall include, but not be limited to, reasonable provisions for all appropriate and necessary medical procedures, counseling requirements, urinalysis, and other suitable tests as needed to ensure compliance with this chapter.

(2) The department, in consultation with opioid treatment programs and counties, shall establish statewide operating standards for certified opioid treatment programs. The department shall enforce these operating standards. The operating standards shall include, but not be limited to, reasonable provisions necessary to enable the department and counties to monitor certified ((and)) or licensed opioid treatment programs for compliance with this chapter and the treatment standards authorized by this chapter and to minimize the impact of the opioid treatment programs upon the business and residential neighborhoods in which the program is located.

(3) The department shall analyze and evaluate the data submitted by each treatment program and take corrective action where necessary to ensure compliance with the goals and standards enumerated under this chapter. Opioid treatment programs are subject to the oversight required for other substance use disorder treatment programs, as described in this chapter.

Sec. 4047. RCW 71.24.600 and 1989 c 271 s 308 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) authority shall not refuse admission for diagnosis, evaluation, guidance or treatment to any applicant because it is determined that the applicant is financially unable to contribute fully or in part to the cost of any services or facilities available under the program on alcoholism.

The ((department)) authority may limit admissions of such applicants or modify its programs in order to ensure that expenditures for services or programs do not exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and are allocated by the ((department)) authority for such services or programs. The ((department)) authority may establish admission priorities in the event that the number of eligible applicants exceeds the limits set by the ((department)) authority.

Sec. 4048. RCW 71.24.605 and 1998 c 245 s 136 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) authority shall contract with the University of Washington fetal alcohol syndrome clinic to provide fetal alcohol exposure screening and assessment services. The University indirect charges shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount. The contract shall require the University of Washington fetal alcohol syndrome clinic to provide the following services:

(1) Training for health care staff in community-based fetal alcohol exposure clinics to ensure the accurate diagnosis of individuals with fetal alcohol exposure and the development and implementation of appropriate service referral plans;

(2) Development of written or visual educational materials for the individuals diagnosed with fetal alcohol exposure and their families or caregivers;

(3) Systematic information retrieval from each community clinic to (a) maintain diagnostic accuracy and reliability across all community clinics, (b) facilitate the development of effective and efficient screening tools for population-based identification of individuals with fetal alcohol exposure, (c) facilitate identification of the most clinically efficacious and cost-effective educational, social, vocational, and health service interventions for individuals with fetal alcohol exposure;

(4) Based on available funds, establishment of a network of community-based fetal alcohol exposure clinics across the state to meet the demand for fetal alcohol exposure diagnostic and referral services; and

(5) Preparation of an annual report for submission to the authority, the department of health, the department of social and health services, the department of corrections, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction which includes the information retrieved under subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 4049. RCW 71.24.610 and 1995 c 54 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall execute an interagency agreement to ensure the coordination of identification, prevention, and intervention programs for children who have fetal alcohol exposure, and for women who are at high risk of having children with fetal alcohol exposure.

The interagency agreement shall provide a process for community advocacy groups to participate in the review and development of identification, prevention, and intervention programs administered or contracted for by the agencies executing this agreement.

Sec. 4050. RCW 71.24.615 and 2003 c 207 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) authority shall prioritize expenditures for treatment provided under RCW 13.40.165. The ((department)) authority shall provide funds for inpatient and outpatient treatment providers that are the most successful, using the standards developed by the University of Washington under section 27, chapter 338, Laws of 1997. The ((department)) authority may consider variations between the nature of the programs provided and clients served but must provide funds first for those programs that demonstrate the greatest success in treatment within categories of treatment and the nature of the persons receiving treatment.

Sec. 4051. RCW 71.24.620 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 520 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the ((secretary)) director shall select and contract with behavioral health organizations to provide intensive case management for persons with substance use disorders and histories of high utilization of crisis services at two sites. In selecting the two sites, the ((secretary)) director shall endeavor to site one in an urban county, and one in a rural county; and to site them in counties other than those selected pursuant to RCW 70.96B.020, to the extent necessary to facilitate evaluation of pilot project results. Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the secretary may contract with additional counties to provide intensive case management.

(2) The contracted sites shall implement the pilot programs by providing intensive case management to persons with a primary substance use disorder diagnosis or dual primary substance use disorder and mental health diagnoses, through the employment of substance use disorder case managers. The substance use disorder case managers shall:

(a) Be trained in and use the integrated, comprehensive screening and assessment process adopted under RCW 71.24.630;

(b) Reduce the use of crisis medical, substance use disorder treatment and mental health services, including but not limited to((,)) emergency room admissions, hospitalizations, withdrawal management programs, inpatient psychiatric admissions, involuntary treatment petitions, emergency medical services, and ambulance services;

(c) Reduce the use of emergency first responder services including police, fire, emergency medical, and ambulance services;

(d) Reduce the number of criminal justice interventions including arrests, violations of conditions of supervision, bookings, jail days, prison sanction day for violations, court appearances, and prosecutor and defense costs;

(e) Where appropriate and available, work with therapeutic courts including drug courts and mental health courts to maximize the outcomes for the individual and reduce the likelihood of reoffense;

(f) Coordinate with local offices of the economic services administration to assist the person in accessing and remaining enrolled in those programs to which the person may be entitled;

(g) Where appropriate and available, coordinate with primary care and other programs operated through the federal government including federally qualified health centers, Indian health programs, and veterans' health programs for which the person is eligible to reduce duplication of services and conflicts in case approach;

(h) Where appropriate, advocate for the client's needs to assist the person in achieving and maintaining stability and progress toward recovery;

(i) Document the numbers of persons with co-occurring mental and substance use disorders and the point of determination of the co-occurring disorder by quadrant of intensity of need; and

(j) Where a program participant is under supervision by the department of corrections, collaborate with the department of corrections to maximize treatment outcomes and reduce the likelihood of reoffense.

(3) The pilot programs established by this section shall begin providing services by March 1, 2006.

Sec. 4052. RCW 71.24.625 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 521 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) authority shall ensure that the provisions of this chapter are applied by the behavioral health organizations in a consistent and uniform manner. The ((department)) authority shall also ensure that, to the extent possible within available funds, the behavioral health organization-designated chemical dependency specialists are specifically trained in adolescent chemical dependency issues, the chemical dependency commitment laws, and the criteria for commitment, as specified in this chapter and chapter 70.96A RCW.

Sec. 4053. RCW 71.24.630 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 513 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((department of social and health services)) authority shall maintain an integrated and comprehensive screening and assessment process for substance use and mental disorders and co-occurring substance use and mental disorders.

(a) The process adopted shall include, at a minimum:

(i) An initial screening tool that can be used by intake personnel system-wide and which will identify the most common types of co-occurring disorders;

(ii) An assessment process for those cases in which assessment is indicated that provides an appropriate degree of assessment for most situations, which can be expanded for complex situations;

(iii) Identification of triggers in the screening that indicate the need to begin an assessment;

(iv) Identification of triggers after or outside the screening that indicate a need to begin or resume an assessment;

(v) The components of an assessment process and a protocol for determining whether part or all of the assessment is necessary, and at what point; and

(vi) Emphasis that the process adopted under this section is to replace and not to duplicate existing intake, screening, and assessment tools and processes.

(b) The ((department)) authority shall consider existing models, including those already adopted by other states, and to the extent possible, adopt an established, proven model.

(c) The integrated, comprehensive screening and assessment process shall be implemented statewide by all substance use disorder and mental health treatment providers as well as all designated mental health professionals, designated chemical dependency specialists, and designated crisis responders.

(2) The ((department)) authority shall provide adequate training to effect statewide implementation by the dates designated in this section and shall report the rates of co-occurring disorders and the stage of screening or assessment at which the co-occurring disorder was identified to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(3) The ((department)) authority shall establish contractual penalties to contracted treatment providers, the behavioral health organizations, and their contracted providers for failure to implement the integrated screening and assessment process.

Sec. 4054. RCW 71.24.640 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 507 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall license or certify evaluation and treatment facilities that meet state minimum standards. The standards for certification or licensure of evaluation and treatment facilities by the department must include standards relating to maintenance of good physical and mental health and other services to be afforded persons pursuant to this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW, and must otherwise assure the effectuation of the purposes of these chapters.

Sec. 4055. RCW 71.24.645 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 508 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall license or certify crisis stabilization units that meet state minimum standards. The standards for certification or licensure of crisis stabilization units by the department must include standards that:

(1) Permit location of the units at a jail facility if the unit is physically separate from the general population of the jail;

(2) Require administration of the unit by mental health professionals who direct the stabilization and rehabilitation efforts; and

(3) Provide an environment affording security appropriate with the alleged criminal behavior and necessary to protect the public safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4056. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary shall license or certify triage facilities that meet state minimum standards. The standards for certification or licensure of triage facilities by the department must include standards related to the ability to assess and stabilize an individual or determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual.

Sec. 4057. RCW 71.24.650 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 509 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall license or certify clubhouses that meet state minimum standards. The standards for certification or licensure of a clubhouse by the department must at a minimum include:

(1) The facilities may be peer-operated and must be recovery-focused;

(2) Members and employees must work together;

(3) Members must have the opportunity to participate in all the work of the clubhouse, including administration, research, intake and orientation, outreach, hiring, training and evaluation of staff, public relations, advocacy, and evaluation of clubhouse effectiveness;

(4) Members and staff and ultimately the clubhouse director must be responsible for the operation of the clubhouse, central to this responsibility is the engagement of members and staff in all aspects of clubhouse operations;

(5) Clubhouse programs must be comprised of structured activities including but not limited to social skills training, vocational rehabilitation, employment training and job placement, and community resource development;

(6) Clubhouse programs must provide in-house educational programs that significantly utilize the teaching and tutoring skills of members and assist members by helping them to take advantage of adult education opportunities in the community;

(7) Clubhouse programs must focus on strengths, talents, and abilities of its members;

(8) The work-ordered day may not include medication clinics, day treatment, or other therapy programs within the clubhouse.

Sec. 4058. RCW 71.24.805 and 2001 c 334 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature affirms its support for those recommendations of the performance audit of the public mental health system conducted by the joint legislative audit and review committee relating to: Improving the coordination of services for clients with multiple needs; improving the consistency of client, service, and fiscal data collected by the ((mental health division)) authority; replacing process-oriented accountability activities with a uniform statewide outcome measurement system; and using outcome information to identify and provide incentives for best practices in the provision of public mental health services.

Sec. 4059. RCW 71.24.810 and 2001 c 334 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature supports recommendations 1 through 10 and 12 through 14 of the mental health system performance audit conducted by the joint legislative audit and review committee. The legislature expects the ((department of social and health services)) authority to work diligently within available funds to implement these recommendations.

Sec. 4060. RCW 71.24.850 and 2014 c 225 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By December 1, 2018, the department of social and health services and the ((health care)) authority shall report to the governor and the legislature regarding the preparedness of each regional service area to provide mental health services, chemical dependency services, and medical care services to medicaid clients under a fully integrated managed care health system.

(2) By January 1, 2020, the community behavioral health program must be fully integrated in a managed care health system that provides mental health services, chemical dependency services, and medical care services to medicaid clients.

Sec. 4061. RCW 71.24.860 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 533 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of social and health services and the ((Washington state health care)) authority shall convene a task force including participation by a representative cross-section of behavioral health organizations and behavioral health providers to align regulations between behavioral health and primary health care settings and simplify regulations for behavioral health providers. The alignment must support clinical integration from the standpoint of standardizing practices and culture in a manner that to the extent practicable reduces barriers to access, including reducing the paperwork burden for patients and providers. Brief integrated behavioral health services must not, in general, take longer to document than to provide. Regulations should emphasize the desired outcome rather than how they should be achieved. The task force may also make recommendations to the department of social and health services concerning subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(2) The department of social and health services shall collaborate with the department of health, the Washington state health care authority, and other appropriate government partners to reduce unneeded costs and burdens to health plans and providers associated with excessive audits, the licensing process, and contracting. In pursuit of this goal, the department of social and health services shall consider steps such as cooperating across divisions and agencies to combine audit functions when multiple audits of an agency or site are scheduled, sharing audit information across divisions and agencies to reduce redundancy of audits, and treating organizations with multiple sites and programs as single entities instead of as multiple agencies.

(3) The department of social and health services shall review its practices under RCW 71.24.035(5)(c)(i) to determine whether its practices comply with the statutory mandate to deem accreditation by recognized behavioral health accrediting bodies as equivalent to meeting licensure requirements, comport with standard practices used by other state divisions or agencies, and properly incentivize voluntary accreditation to the highest industry standards.

(4) The task force described in subsection (1) of this section must consider means to provide notice to parents when a minor requests chemical dependency treatment, which are consistent with federal privacy laws and consistent with the best interests of the minor and the minor's family. The department of social and health services must provide a report to the relevant committees of the legislature by December 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4062. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall, upon the request of a county authority or authorities within a regional service area, collaborate with counties to create an interlocal leadership structure that includes participation from counties and the managed health care systems serving that regional service area. The interlocal leadership structure must include representation from physical and behavioral health care providers, tribes, and other entities serving the regional service area as necessary.

(2) The interlocal leadership structure regional organization must be chaired by the counties and jointly administered by the authority, managed health care systems, and counties. It must design and implement the fully integrated managed care model for that regional service area to assure clients are at the center of care delivery and support integrated delivery of physical and behavioral health care at the provider level.

(3) The interlocal leadership structure may address, but is not limited to addressing, the following topics:

(a) Alignment of contracting, administrative functions, and other processes to minimize administrative burden at the provider level to achieve outcomes;

(b) Monitoring implementation of fully integrated managed care in the regional service area, including design of an early warning system to monitor ongoing success to achieve better outcomes and to make adjustments to the system as necessary;

(c) Developing regional coordination processes for capital infrastructure requests, local capacity building, and other community investments;

(d) Identifying, using, and building on measures and data consistent with, but not limited to, RCW 70.320.030 and 41.05.690, for tracking and maintaining regional accountability for delivery system performance; and

(e) Discussing whether the managed health care systems awarded the contract by the authority for a regional service area should subcontract with a county-based administrative service organization or other local organization, which may include and determine, in partnership with that organization, which value-add services will best support a bidirectional system of care.

(4) To ensure an optimal transition, regional service areas that enter as mid-adopters must be allowed a transition period of up to one year during which the interlocal leadership structure develops and implements a local plan, including measurable milestones, to transition to fully integrated managed care. The transition plan may include provisions for the counties' organization to maintain existing contracts during some or all of the transition period if the managed care design begins during 2017 to 2018, with the mid-adopter transition year occurring in 2019.

(5) Nothing in this section may be used to compel contracts between a provider, integrated managed health care system, or administrative service organization.

(6) The interlocal leadership group expires December 1, 2021, unless the interlocal leadership group decides locally to extend it.

Sec. 4063. RCW 71.24.902 and 1986 c 274 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting the secretary of the department of social and health services from consolidating ((within the department)) children's mental health services with other ((departmental)) services related to children.

PART 5

Sec. 5001. RCW 71.34.010 and 1998 c 296 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the purpose of this chapter to assure that minors in need of mental health care and treatment receive an appropriate continuum of culturally relevant care and treatment, including prevention and early intervention, self-directed care, parent-directed care, and involuntary treatment. To facilitate the continuum of care and treatment to minors in out-of-home placements, all divisions of the authority and the department that provide mental health services to minors shall jointly plan and deliver those services.

It is also the purpose of this chapter to protect the rights of minors against needless hospitalization and deprivations of liberty and to enable treatment decisions to be made in response to clinical needs in accordance with sound professional judgment. The mental health care and treatment providers shall encourage the use of voluntary services and, whenever clinically appropriate, the providers shall offer less restrictive alternatives to inpatient treatment. Additionally, all mental health care and treatment providers shall assure that minors' parents are given an opportunity to participate in the treatment decisions for their minor children. The mental health care and treatment providers shall, to the extent possible, offer services that involve minors' parents or family.

It is also the purpose of this chapter to assure the ability of parents to exercise reasonable, compassionate care and control of their minor children when there is a medical necessity for treatment and without the requirement of filing a petition under this chapter.

Sec. 5002. RCW 71.34.020 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 254 and 2016 c 155 s 17 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(2) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for minors with substance use disorders provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department of health as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4) "Chemical dependency" means:

(a) Alcoholism;

(b) Drug addiction; or

(c) Dependence on alcohol and one or more other psychoactive chemicals, as the context requires.

(((4))) (5) "Chemical dependency professional" means a person certified as a chemical dependency professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW.

(((5))) (6) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.

(((6))) (7) "Children's mental health specialist" means:

(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of children; and

(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the supervision of a children's mental health specialist.

(((7))) (8) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.

(((8))) (9) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(((9))) (10) "Designated crisis responder" means a person designated by a behavioral health organization to perform the duties specified in this chapter.

(((10))) (11) "Director" means the director of the authority.

(12) "Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(((11))) (13) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private facility or unit that is licensed or certified by the department of health to provide emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate and separately-operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which is part of or operated by the ((department)) state or federal agency does not require licensure or certification. No correctional institution or facility, juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.

(((12))) (14) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors under this chapter.

(((13))) (15) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a mental disorder, or as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety, or manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.

(((14))) (16) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental health care provided within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital, residential treatment facility licensed or certified by the department of health as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors, secure detoxification facility for minors, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for minors.

(((15))) (17) "Intoxicated minor" means a minor whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals.

(((16))) (18) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting" means outpatient treatment provided to a minor who is not residing in a facility providing inpatient treatment as defined in this chapter.

(((17))) (19) "Likelihood of serious harm" means either: (a) A substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (b) a substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (c) a substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others.

(((18))) (20) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct, cure, or alleviate a mental disorder or substance use disorder; or (b) prevent the progression of a substance use disorder that endangers life or causes suffering and pain, or results in illness or infirmity or threatens to cause or aggravate a handicap, or causes physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative available.

(((19))) (21) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or intellectual disabilities alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental disorder" within the meaning of this section.

(((20))) (22) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of health under this chapter.

(((21))) (23) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.

(((22))) (24) "Outpatient treatment" means any of the nonresidential services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed or certified service providers as identified by RCW 71.24.025.

(((23))) (25) "Parent" means:

(a) A biological or adoptive parent who has legal custody of the child, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint custody agreement; or

(b) A person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or custodian of the child.

(((24))) (26) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a ((department)) distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders.

(((25))) (27) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.57A or 18.71A RCW.

(((26))) (28) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician, other mental health professional, or other person empowered by an evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program with authority to make admission and discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.

(((27))) (29) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has ((a bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university, and who has had, in addition, at least two years')) experience in the direct treatment of persons who have a mental illness or who are emotionally disturbed, such experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional. (("Psychiatric nurse" shall also mean any other registered nurse who has three years of such experience.))

(((28))) (30) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in psychiatry.

(((29))) (31) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.

(((30))) (32) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program that is conducted for, or includes a ((department)) distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments.

(((31))) (33) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the minor.

(((32))) (34) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or secretary's designee.

(((33))) (35) "Secure detoxification facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency that:

(a) Provides for intoxicated minors:

(i) Evaluation and assessment, provided by certified chemical dependency professionals;

(ii) Acute or subacute detoxification services; and

(iii) Discharge assistance provided by certified chemical dependency professionals, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the minor;

(b) Includes security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Is licensed or certified as such by the department of health.

(((34))) (36) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.

(((35))) (37) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program offering inpatient treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time. With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the provisions of this chapter.

(((36))) (38) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.

Sec. 5003. RCW 71.34.300 and 2011 c 343 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county or combination of counties is responsible for development and coordination of the evaluation and treatment program for minors, for incorporating the program into the ((county)) mental health plan, and for coordination of evaluation and treatment services and resources with the community mental health program required under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(2) The county shall be responsible for maintaining its support of involuntary treatment services for minors at its 1984 level, adjusted for inflation, with the ((department)) authority responsible for additional costs to the county resulting from this chapter. Maintenance of effort funds devoted to judicial services related to involuntary commitment reimbursed under RCW 71.05.730 must be expended for other purposes that further treatment for mental health and chemical dependency disorders.

Sec. 5004. RCW 71.34.365 and 1985 c 354 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a minor is not accepted for admission or is released by an inpatient evaluation and treatment facility, the facility shall release the minor to the custody of the minor's parent or other responsible person. If not otherwise available, the facility shall furnish transportation for the minor to the minor's residence or other appropriate place.

(2) If the minor is released to someone other than the minor's parent, the facility shall make every effort to notify the minor's parent of the release as soon as possible.

(3) No indigent minor may be released to less restrictive alternative treatment or setting or discharged from inpatient treatment without suitable clothing, and the ((department)) authority shall furnish this clothing. As funds are available, the ((secretary)) director may provide necessary funds for the immediate welfare of indigent minors upon discharge or release to less restrictive alternative treatment.

Sec. 5005. RCW 71.34.375 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 256 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a parent or guardian, for the purpose of mental health treatment, substance use disorder treatment, or evaluation, brings his or her minor child to an evaluation and treatment facility, a hospital emergency room, an inpatient facility licensed under chapter 72.23 RCW, an inpatient facility licensed under chapter 70.41 or 71.12 RCW operating inpatient psychiatric beds for minors, a secure detoxification facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program, the facility is required to promptly provide written and verbal notice of all statutorily available treatment options contained in this chapter. The notice need not be given more than once if written and verbal notice has already been provided and documented by the facility.

(2) The provision of notice must be documented by the facilities required to give notice under subsection (1) of this section and must be accompanied by a signed acknowledgment of receipt by the parent or guardian. The notice must contain the following information:

(a) All current statutorily available treatment options including but not limited to those provided in this chapter; and

(b) The procedures to be followed to utilize the treatment options described in this chapter.

(3) The department of health shall produce, and make available, the written notification that must include, at a minimum, the information contained in subsection (2) of this section. The department of health must revise the written notification as necessary to reflect changes in the law.

Sec. 5006. RCW 71.34.380 and 1985 c 354 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, department of health, and the authority shall adopt such rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW as may be necessary to effectuate the intent and purposes of this chapter((, which shall include but not be limited to evaluation of)).

(2) The authority shall evaluate the quality, effectiveness, efficiency, and use of services ((and facilities operating under this chapter)), procedures and standards for commitment, and ((other action relevant to)) establish criteria and procedures for placement and transfer of committed minors.

(3) The department of health shall regulate the evaluation and treatment facilities((, and establishment of criteria and procedures for placement and transfer of committed minors)) and programs.

(4) The department shall operate and maintain the child study and treatment center.

Sec. 5007. RCW 71.34.385 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 257 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) authority shall ensure that the provisions of this chapter are applied by the counties in a consistent and uniform manner. The ((department)) authority shall also ensure that, to the extent possible within available funds, the designated crisis responders are specifically trained in adolescent mental health issues, the mental health and substance use disorder civil commitment laws, and the criteria for civil commitment.

Sec. 5008. RCW 71.34.390 and 1992 c 205 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of encouraging the expansion of existing evaluation and treatment facilities and the creation of new facilities, the ((department)) authority shall endeavor to redirect federal Title XIX funds which are expended on out-of-state placements to fund placements within the state.

Sec. 5009. RCW 71.34.395 and 1998 c 296 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

The ability of a parent to bring his or her minor child to a licensed or certified evaluation and treatment program for evaluation and treatment does not create a right to obtain or benefit from any funds or resources of the state. The state may provide services for indigent minors to the extent that funds are available.

Sec. 5010. RCW 71.34.400 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 258 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of eligibility for medical assistance under chapter 74.09 RCW, minors in inpatient mental health or inpatient substance use disorder treatment shall be considered to be part of their parent's or legal guardian's household, unless the minor has been assessed by the ((department)) authority or its designee as likely to require such treatment for at least ninety consecutive days, or is in out-of-home care in accordance with chapter 13.34 RCW, or the parents are found to not be exercising responsibility for care and control of the minor. Payment for such care by the ((department)) authority shall be made only in accordance with rules, guidelines, and clinical criteria applicable to inpatient treatment of minors established by the ((department)) authority.

Sec. 5011. RCW 71.34.405 and 1985 c 354 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A minor receiving treatment under the provisions of this chapter and responsible others shall be liable for the costs of treatment, care, and transportation to the extent of available resources and ability to pay.

(2) The secretary or director, as appropriate, shall establish rules to implement this section and to define income, resources, and exemptions to determine the responsible person's or persons' ability to pay.

Sec. 5012. RCW 71.34.420 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 260 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((department)) authority may use a single bed certification process as outlined in rule to provide additional treatment capacity for a minor suffering from a mental disorder for whom an evaluation and treatment bed is not available. The facility that is the proposed site of the single bed certification must be a facility that is willing and able to provide the person with timely and appropriate treatment either directly or by arrangement with other public or private agencies.

(2) A single bed certification must be specific to the minor receiving treatment.

(3) A designated crisis responder who submits an application for a single bed certification for treatment at a facility that is willing and able to provide timely and appropriate mental health treatment in good faith belief that the single bed certification is appropriate may presume that the single bed certification will be approved for the purpose of completing the detention process and responding to other emergency calls.

(4) The ((department)) authority may adopt rules implementing this section and continue to enforce rules it has already adopted except where inconsistent with this section.

Sec. 5013. RCW 71.34.600 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 263 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A parent may bring, or authorize the bringing of, his or her minor child to:

(a) An evaluation and treatment facility or an inpatient facility licensed under chapter 70.41, 71.12, or 72.23 RCW and request that the professional person examine the minor to determine whether the minor has a mental disorder and is in need of inpatient treatment; or

(b) A secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program and request that a substance use disorder assessment be conducted by a professional person to determine whether the minor has a substance use disorder and is in need of inpatient treatment.

(2) The consent of the minor is not required for admission, evaluation, and treatment if the parent brings the minor to the facility.

(3) An appropriately trained professional person may evaluate whether the minor has a mental disorder or has a substance use disorder. The evaluation shall be completed within twenty-four hours of the time the minor was brought to the facility, unless the professional person determines that the condition of the minor necessitates additional time for evaluation. In no event shall a minor be held longer than seventy-two hours for evaluation. If, in the judgment of the professional person, it is determined it is a medical necessity for the minor to receive inpatient treatment, the minor may be held for treatment. The facility shall limit treatment to that which the professional person determines is medically necessary to stabilize the minor's condition until the evaluation has been completed. Within twenty-four hours of completion of the evaluation, the professional person shall notify the ((department)) authority if the child is held for treatment and of the date of admission.

(4) No provider is obligated to provide treatment to a minor under the provisions of this section except that no provider may refuse to treat a minor under the provisions of this section solely on the basis that the minor has not consented to the treatment. No provider may admit a minor to treatment under this section unless it is medically necessary.

(5) No minor receiving inpatient treatment under this section may be discharged from the facility based solely on his or her request.

(6) Prior to the review conducted under RCW 71.34.610, the professional person shall notify the minor of his or her right to petition superior court for release from the facility.

(7) For the purposes of this section "professional person" means "professional person" as defined in RCW 71.05.020.

Sec. 5014. RCW 71.34.610 and 1998 c 296 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((department)) authority shall assure that, for any minor admitted to inpatient treatment under RCW 71.34.600, a review is conducted by a physician or other mental health professional who is employed by the ((department)) authority, or an agency under contract with the ((department)) authority, and who neither has a financial interest in continued inpatient treatment of the minor nor is affiliated with the facility providing the treatment. The physician or other mental health professional shall conduct the review not less than seven nor more than fourteen days following the date the minor was brought to the facility under RCW 71.34.600 to determine whether it is a medical necessity to continue the minor's treatment on an inpatient basis.

(2) In making a determination under subsection (1) of this section, the ((department)) authority shall consider the opinion of the treatment provider, the safety of the minor, and the likelihood the minor's mental health will deteriorate if released from inpatient treatment. The ((department)) authority shall consult with the parent in advance of making its determination.

(3) If, after any review conducted by the ((department)) authority under this section, the ((department)) authority determines it is no longer a medical necessity for a minor to receive inpatient treatment, the ((department)) authority shall immediately notify the parents and the facility. The facility shall release the minor to the parents within twenty-four hours of receiving notice. If the professional person in charge and the parent believe that it is a medical necessity for the minor to remain in inpatient treatment, the minor shall be released to the parent on the second judicial day following the ((department's)) authority's determination in order to allow the parent time to file an at-risk youth petition under chapter 13.32A RCW. If the ((department)) authority determines it is a medical necessity for the minor to receive outpatient treatment and the minor declines to obtain such treatment, such refusal shall be grounds for the parent to file an at-risk youth petition.

(4) If the evaluation conducted under RCW 71.34.600 is done by the ((department)) authority, the reviews required by subsection (1) of this section shall be done by contract with an independent agency.

(5) The ((department)) authority may, subject to available funds, contract with other governmental agencies to conduct the reviews under this section. The ((department)) authority may seek reimbursement from the parents, their insurance, or medicaid for the expense of any review conducted by an agency under contract.

(6) In addition to the review required under this section, the ((department)) authority may periodically determine and redetermine the medical necessity of treatment for purposes of payment with public funds.

Sec. 5015. RCW 71.34.630 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 264 are each amended to read as follows:

If the minor is not released as a result of the petition filed under RCW 71.34.620, he or she shall be released not later than thirty days following the later of: (1) The date of the ((department's)) authority's determination under RCW 71.34.610(2); or (2) the filing of a petition for judicial review under RCW 71.34.620, unless a professional person or the designated crisis responder initiates proceedings under this chapter.

Sec. 5016. RCW 71.34.640 and 1996 c 133 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) authority shall randomly select and review the information on children who are admitted to inpatient treatment on application of the child's parent regardless of the source of payment, if any. The review shall determine whether the children reviewed were appropriately admitted into treatment based on an objective evaluation of the child's condition and the outcome of the child's treatment.

Sec. 5017. RCW 71.34.720 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 271 and 2016 c 155 s 19 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Each minor approved by the facility for inpatient admission shall be examined and evaluated by a children's mental health specialist, for minors admitted as a result of a mental disorder, or by a chemical dependency professional, for minors admitted as a result of a substance use disorder, as to the child's mental condition and by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner as to the child's physical condition within twenty-four hours of admission. Reasonable measures shall be taken to ensure medical treatment is provided for any condition requiring immediate medical attention.

(2) If, after examination and evaluation, the children's mental health specialist or substance use disorder specialist and the physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner determine that the initial needs of the minor, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a substance use disorder treatment ((facility)) program or, if detained to a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility, then the minor shall be referred to the more appropriate placement; however a minor may only be referred to a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if there is a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program available and that has adequate space for the minor.

(3) The admitting facility shall take reasonable steps to notify immediately the minor's parent of the admission.

(4) During the initial seventy-two hour treatment period, the minor has a right to associate or receive communications from parents or others unless the professional person in charge determines that such communication would be seriously detrimental to the minor's condition or treatment and so indicates in the minor's clinical record, and notifies the minor's parents of this determination. In no event may the minor be denied the opportunity to consult an attorney.

(5) If the evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admits the minor, it may detain the minor for evaluation and treatment for a period not to exceed seventy-two hours from the time of provisional acceptance. The computation of such seventy-two hour period shall exclude Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. This initial treatment period shall not exceed seventy-two hours except when an application for voluntary inpatient treatment is received or a petition for fourteen-day commitment is filed.

(6) Within twelve hours of the admission, the facility shall advise the minor of his or her rights as set forth in this chapter.

Sec. 5018. RCW 71.34.720 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 272 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each minor approved by the facility for inpatient admission shall be examined and evaluated by a children's mental health specialist, for minors admitted as a result of a mental disorder, or by a chemical dependency professional, for minors admitted as a result of a substance use disorder, as to the child's mental condition and by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner as to the child's physical condition within twenty-four hours of admission. Reasonable measures shall be taken to ensure medical treatment is provided for any condition requiring immediate medical attention.

(2) If, after examination and evaluation, the children's mental health specialist or substance use disorder specialist and the physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner determine that the initial needs of the minor, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a substance use disorder treatment ((facility)) program or, if detained to a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility, then the minor shall be referred to the more appropriate placement.

(3) The admitting facility shall take reasonable steps to notify immediately the minor's parent of the admission.

(4) During the initial seventy-two hour treatment period, the minor has a right to associate or receive communications from parents or others unless the professional person in charge determines that such communication would be seriously detrimental to the minor's condition or treatment and so indicates in the minor's clinical record, and notifies the minor's parents of this determination. In no event may the minor be denied the opportunity to consult an attorney.

(5) If the evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admits the minor, it may detain the minor for evaluation and treatment for a period not to exceed seventy-two hours from the time of provisional acceptance. The computation of such seventy-two hour period shall exclude Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. This initial treatment period shall not exceed seventy-two hours except when an application for voluntary inpatient treatment is received or a petition for fourteen-day commitment is filed.

(6) Within twelve hours of the admission, the facility shall advise the minor of his or her rights as set forth in this chapter.

Sec. 5019. RCW 71.34.760 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 278 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a minor is committed for one hundred eighty-day inpatient treatment and is to be placed in a state-supported program, the ((secretary)) director shall accept immediately and place the minor in a state-funded long-term evaluation and treatment facility or state-funded approved substance use disorder treatment program.

(2) The ((secretary's)) director's placement authority shall be exercised through a designated placement committee appointed by the ((secretary)) director and composed of children's mental health specialists and chemical dependency professionals, including at least one child psychiatrist who represents the state-funded, long-term, evaluation and treatment facility for minors and one chemical dependency professional who represents the state-funded approved substance use disorder treatment program. The responsibility of the placement committee will be to:

(a) Make the long-term placement of the minor in the most appropriate, available state-funded evaluation and treatment facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, having carefully considered factors including the treatment needs of the minor, the most appropriate facility able to respond to the minor's identified treatment needs, the geographic proximity of the facility to the minor's family, the immediate availability of bed space, and the probable impact of the placement on other residents of the facility;

(b) Approve or deny requests from treatment facilities for transfer of a minor to another facility;

(c) Receive and monitor reports required under this section;

(d) Receive and monitor reports of all discharges.

(3) The ((secretary)) director may authorize transfer of minors among treatment facilities if the transfer is in the best interests of the minor or due to treatment priorities.

(4) The responsible state-funded evaluation and treatment facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program shall submit a report to the ((department's)) authority's designated placement committee within ninety days of admission and no less than every one hundred eighty days thereafter, setting forth such facts as the ((department)) authority requires, including the minor's individual treatment plan and progress, recommendations for future treatment, and possible less restrictive treatment.

Sec. 5020. RCW 71.34.780 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 279 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the professional person in charge of an outpatient treatment program, a designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, determines that a minor is failing to adhere to the conditions of the court order for less restrictive alternative treatment or the conditions for the conditional release, or that substantial deterioration in the minor's functioning has occurred, the designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may order that the minor, if committed for mental health treatment, be taken into custody and transported to an inpatient evaluation and treatment facility or, if committed for substance use disorder treatment, be taken into custody and transported to a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if there is an available secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program that has adequate space for the minor.

(2) The designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, shall file the order of apprehension and detention and serve it upon the minor and notify the minor's parent and the minor's attorney, if any, of the detention within two days of return. At the time of service the minor shall be informed of the right to a hearing and to representation by an attorney. The designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may modify or rescind the order of apprehension and detention at any time prior to the hearing.

(3) A petition for revocation of less restrictive alternative treatment shall be filed by the designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, with the court in the county ordering the less restrictive alternative treatment. The court shall conduct the hearing in that county. A petition for revocation of conditional release may be filed with the court in the county ordering inpatient treatment or the county where the minor on conditional release is residing. A petition shall describe the behavior of the minor indicating violation of the conditions or deterioration of routine functioning and a dispositional recommendation. Upon motion for good cause, the hearing may be transferred to the county of the minor's residence or to the county in which the alleged violations occurred. The hearing shall be held within seven days of the minor's return. The issues to be determined are whether the minor did or did not adhere to the conditions of the less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release, or whether the minor's routine functioning has substantially deteriorated, and, if so, whether the conditions of less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release should be modified or, subject to subsection (4) of this section, whether the minor should be returned to inpatient treatment. Pursuant to the determination of the court, the minor shall be returned to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions or shall be returned to inpatient treatment. If the minor is returned to inpatient treatment, RCW 71.34.760 regarding the ((secretary's)) director's placement responsibility shall apply. The hearing may be waived by the minor and the minor returned to inpatient treatment or to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions.

(4) A court may not order the return of a minor to inpatient treatment in a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program unless there is a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program available with adequate space for the minor.

Sec. 5021. RCW 71.34.780 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 280 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the professional person in charge of an outpatient treatment program, a designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, determines that a minor is failing to adhere to the conditions of the court order for less restrictive alternative treatment or the conditions for the conditional release, or that substantial deterioration in the minor's functioning has occurred, the designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may order that the minor, if committed for mental health treatment, be taken into custody and transported to an inpatient evaluation and treatment facility or, if committed for substance use disorder treatment, be taken into custody and transported to a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program.

(2) The designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, shall file the order of apprehension and detention and serve it upon the minor and notify the minor's parent and the minor's attorney, if any, of the detention within two days of return. At the time of service the minor shall be informed of the right to a hearing and to representation by an attorney. The designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may modify or rescind the order of apprehension and detention at any time prior to the hearing.

(3) A petition for revocation of less restrictive alternative treatment shall be filed by the designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, with the court in the county ordering the less restrictive alternative treatment. The court shall conduct the hearing in that county. A petition for revocation of conditional release may be filed with the court in the county ordering inpatient treatment or the county where the minor on conditional release is residing. A petition shall describe the behavior of the minor indicating violation of the conditions or deterioration of routine functioning and a dispositional recommendation. Upon motion for good cause, the hearing may be transferred to the county of the minor's residence or to the county in which the alleged violations occurred. The hearing shall be held within seven days of the minor's return. The issues to be determined are whether the minor did or did not adhere to the conditions of the less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release, or whether the minor's routine functioning has substantially deteriorated, and, if so, whether the conditions of less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release should be modified or whether the minor should be returned to inpatient treatment. Pursuant to the determination of the court, the minor shall be returned to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions or shall be returned to inpatient treatment. If the minor is returned to inpatient treatment, RCW 71.34.760 regarding the ((secretary's)) director's placement responsibility shall apply. The hearing may be waived by the minor and the minor returned to inpatient treatment or to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions.

Sec. 5022. RCW 71.34.790 and 1985 c 354 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Necessary transportation for minors committed to the ((secretary)) director under this chapter for one hundred eighty-day treatment shall be provided by the ((department)) authority in the most appropriate and cost-effective means.

Sec. 5023. RCW 71.36.010 and 2014 c 225 s 91 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Agency" means a state, tribal, or local governmental entity or a private not-for-profit organization.

(2) "Behavioral health organization" means a county authority or group of county authorities or other nonprofit entity that has entered into contracts with the ((secretary)) health care authority pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW.

(3) "Child" means a person under eighteen years of age, except as expressly provided otherwise in state or federal law.

(4) "Consensus-based" means a program or practice that has general support among treatment providers and experts, based on experience or professional literature, and may have anecdotal or case study support, or that is agreed but not possible to perform studies with random assignment and controlled groups.

(5) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners or county executive.

(6) (("Department" means the department of social and health services.

(7))) "Early periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment" means the component of the federal medicaid program established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(r), as amended.

(((8))) (7) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the population.

(((9))) (8) "Family" means a child's biological parents, adoptive parents, foster parents, guardian, legal custodian authorized pursuant to Title 26 RCW, a relative with whom a child has been placed by the department of social and health services, or a tribe.

(((10))) (9) "Promising practice" or "emerging best practice" means a practice that presents, based upon preliminary information, potential for becoming a research-based or consensus-based practice.

(((11))) (10) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the standard of evidence-based practices.

(((12) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

(13))) (11) "Wraparound process" means a family driven planning process designed to address the needs of children and youth by the formation of a team that empowers families to make key decisions regarding the care of the child or youth in partnership with professionals and the family's natural community supports. The team produces a community-based and culturally competent intervention plan which identifies the strengths and needs of the child or youth and family and defines goals that the team collaborates on achieving with respect for the unique cultural values of the family. The "wraparound process" shall emphasize principles of persistence and outcome-based measurements of success.

Sec. 5024. RCW 71.36.025 and 2014 c 225 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the goal of the legislature that, by 2012, the children's mental health system in Washington state include the following elements:

(a) A continuum of services from early identification, intervention, and prevention through crisis intervention and inpatient treatment, including peer support and parent mentoring services;

(b) Equity in access to services for similarly situated children, including children with co-occurring disorders;

(c) Developmentally appropriate, high quality, and culturally competent services available statewide;

(d) Treatment of each child in the context of his or her family and other persons that are a source of support and stability in his or her life;

(e) A sufficient supply of qualified and culturally competent children's mental health providers;

(f) Use of developmentally appropriate evidence-based and research-based practices;

(g) Integrated and flexible services to meet the needs of children who, due to mental illness or emotional or behavioral disturbance, are at risk of out-of-home placement or involved with multiple child-serving systems.

(2) The effectiveness of the children's mental health system shall be determined through the use of outcome-based performance measures. The ((department)) health care authority and the evidence-based practice institute established in RCW 71.24.061, in consultation with parents, caregivers, youth, behavioral health organizations, mental health services providers, health plans, primary care providers, tribes, and others, shall develop outcome-based performance measures such as:

(a) Decreased emergency room utilization;

(b) Decreased psychiatric hospitalization;

(c) Lessening of symptoms, as measured by commonly used assessment tools;

(d) Decreased out-of-home placement, including residential, group, and foster care, and increased stability of such placements, when necessary;

(e) Decreased runaways from home or residential placements;

(f) Decreased rates of chemical dependency;

(g) Decreased involvement with the juvenile justice system;

(h) Improved school attendance and performance;

(i) Reductions in school or child care suspensions or expulsions;

(j) Reductions in use of prescribed medication where cognitive behavioral therapies are indicated;

(k) Improved rates of high school graduation and employment; and

(l) Decreased use of mental health services upon reaching adulthood for mental disorders other than those that require ongoing treatment to maintain stability.

Performance measure reporting for children's mental health services should be integrated into existing performance measurement and reporting systems developed and implemented under chapter 71.24 RCW.

Sec. 5025. RCW 71.36.040 and 2014 c 225 s 93 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature supports recommendations made in the August 2002 study of the public mental health system for children conducted by the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(2) The ((department)) health care authority shall, within available funds:

(a) Identify internal business operation issues that limit the agency's ability to meet legislative intent to coordinate existing categorical children's mental health programs and funding;

(b) Collect reliable mental health cost, service, and outcome data specific to children. This information must be used to identify best practices and methods of improving fiscal management;

(c) Revise the early periodic screening diagnosis and treatment plan to reflect the mental health system structure in place on July 27, 2003, and thereafter revise the plan as necessary to conform to subsequent changes in the structure.

(3) The ((department)) health care authority and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall jointly identify school districts where mental health and education systems coordinate services and resources to provide public mental health care for children. The ((department)) health care authority and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall work together to share information about these approaches with other school districts, behavioral health organizations, and state agencies.

Sec. 5026. RCW 71.36.060 and 2007 c 359 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) health care authority shall explore the feasibility of obtaining a medicaid state plan amendment to allow the state to receive medicaid matching funds for health services provided to medicaid enrolled youth who are temporarily placed in a juvenile detention facility. Temporary placement shall be defined as until adjudication or up to sixty continuous days, whichever occurs first.

PART 6

Sec. 6001. RCW 9.41.047 and 2016 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) At the time a person is convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of an offense making the person ineligible to possess a firearm, or at the time a person is committed by court order under RCW 71.05.240, 71.05.320, 71.34.740, 71.34.750, or chapter 10.77 RCW for mental health treatment, the convicting or committing court shall notify the person, orally and in writing, that the person must immediately surrender any concealed pistol license and that the person may not possess a firearm unless his or her right to do so is restored by a court of record. For purposes of this section a convicting court includes a court in which a person has been found not guilty by reason of insanity.

(b) The convicting or committing court shall forward within three judicial days after conviction or entry of the commitment order a copy of the person's driver's license or identicard, or comparable information, along with the date of conviction or commitment, to the department of licensing. When a person is committed by court order under RCW 71.05.240, 71.05.320, 71.34.740, 71.34.750, or chapter 10.77 RCW, for mental health treatment, the committing court also shall forward, within three judicial days after entry of the commitment order, a copy of the person's driver's license, or comparable information, along with the date of commitment, to the national instant criminal background check system index, denied persons file, created by the federal Brady handgun violence prevention act (P.L. 103-159). The petitioning party shall provide the court with the information required. If more than one commitment order is entered under one cause number, only one notification to the department of licensing and the national instant criminal background check system is required.

(2) Upon receipt of the information provided for by subsection (1) of this section, the department of licensing shall determine if the convicted or committed person has a concealed pistol license. If the person does have a concealed pistol license, the department of licensing shall immediately notify the license-issuing authority which, upon receipt of such notification, shall immediately revoke the license.

(3)(a) A person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm, by reason of having been involuntarily committed for mental health treatment under RCW 71.05.240, 71.05.320, 71.34.740, 71.34.750, chapter 10.77 RCW, or equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction may, upon discharge, petition the superior court to have his or her right to possess a firearm restored.

(b) The petition must be brought in the superior court that ordered the involuntary commitment or the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides.

(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, the court shall restore the petitioner's right to possess a firearm if the petitioner proves by a preponderance of the evidence that:

(i) The petitioner is no longer required to participate in court-ordered inpatient or outpatient treatment;

(ii) The petitioner has successfully managed the condition related to the commitment;

(iii) The petitioner no longer presents a substantial danger to himself or herself, or the public; and

(iv) The symptoms related to the commitment are not reasonably likely to recur.

(d) If a preponderance of the evidence in the record supports a finding that the person petitioning the court has engaged in violence and that it is more likely than not that the person will engage in violence after his or her right to possess a firearm is restored, the person shall bear the burden of proving by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that he or she does not present a substantial danger to the safety of others.

(e) When a person's right to possess a firearm has been restored under this subsection, the court shall forward, within three judicial days after entry of the restoration order, notification that the person's right to possess a firearm has been restored to the department of licensing, the ((department of social and health services)) health care authority, and the national instant criminal background check system index, denied persons file.

(4) No person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity may petition a court for restoration of the right to possess a firearm unless the person meets the requirements for the restoration of the right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.040(4).

Sec. 6002. RCW 9.41.070 and 2017 c 282 s 1 and 2017 c 174 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a county shall within thirty days after the filing of an application of any person, issue a license to such person to carry a pistol concealed on his or her person within this state for five years from date of issue, for the purposes of protection or while engaged in business, sport, or while traveling. However, if the applicant does not have a valid permanent Washington driver's license or Washington state identification card or has not been a resident of the state for the previous consecutive ninety days, the issuing authority shall have up to sixty days after the filing of the application to issue a license. The issuing authority shall not refuse to accept completed applications for concealed pistol licenses during regular business hours.

The applicant's constitutional right to bear arms shall not be denied, unless:

(a) He or she is ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions of RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045, or is prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal law;

(b) The applicant's concealed pistol license is in a revoked status;

(c) He or she is under twenty-one years of age;

(d) He or she is subject to a court order or injunction regarding firearms pursuant to RCW 9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.50.060, 26.50.070, or 26.26.590;

(e) He or she is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing for a felony offense;

(f) He or she has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor; or

(g) He or she has been ordered to forfeit a firearm under RCW 9.41.098(1)(e) within one year before filing an application to carry a pistol concealed on his or her person.

No person convicted of a felony may have his or her right to possess firearms restored or his or her privilege to carry a concealed pistol restored, unless the person has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c), or RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.

(2)(a) The issuing authority shall conduct a check through the national instant criminal background check system, the Washington state patrol electronic database, the ((department of social and health services)) health care authority electronic database, and with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess a firearm, or is prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal law, and therefore ineligible for a concealed pistol license.

(b) The issuing authority shall deny a permit to anyone who is found to be prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal or state law.

(c) This subsection applies whether the applicant is applying for a new concealed pistol license or to renew a concealed pistol license.

(3) Any person whose firearms rights have been restricted and who has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c) or who is exempt under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(20)(A) shall have his or her right to acquire, receive, transfer, ship, transport, carry, and possess firearms in accordance with Washington state law restored except as otherwise prohibited by this chapter.

(4) The license application shall bear the full name, residential address, telephone number at the option of the applicant, email address at the option of the applicant, date and place of birth, race, gender, description, a complete set of fingerprints, and signature of the licensee, and the licensee's driver's license number or state identification card number if used for identification in applying for the license. A signed application for a concealed pistol license shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the ((department of social and health services)) health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release information relevant to the applicant's eligibility for a concealed pistol license to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.

The application for an original license shall include a complete set of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol.

The license and application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a defense to a federal prosecution.

The license shall contain a description of the major differences between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be consistent with state law.

The application shall contain questions about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 and federal law to possess a pistol, the applicant's place of birth, and whether the applicant is a United States citizen. If the applicant is not a United States citizen, the applicant must provide the applicant's country of citizenship, United States issued alien number or admission number, and the basis on which the applicant claims to be exempt from federal prohibitions on firearm possession by aliens. The applicant shall not be required to produce a birth certificate or other evidence of citizenship. A person who is not a citizen of the United States shall, if applicable, meet the additional requirements of RCW 9.41.173 and produce proof of compliance with RCW 9.41.173 upon application. The license may be in triplicate or in a form to be prescribed by the department of licensing.

The original thereof shall be delivered to the licensee, the duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the director of licensing and the triplicate shall be preserved for six years, by the authority issuing the license.

The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement and corrections agencies, in an on-line format, all information received under this subsection.

(5) The nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the original five-year license shall be thirty-six dollars plus additional charges imposed by the federal bureau of investigation that are passed on to the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the issuance of the license.

The fee shall be distributed as follows:

(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;

(b) Four dollars shall be paid to the agency taking the fingerprints of the person licensed;

(c) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter;

(d) Two dollars and sixteen cents to the firearms range account in the general fund; and

(e) Eighty-four cents to the concealed pistol license renewal notification account created in RCW 43.79.540.

(6) The nonrefundable fee for the renewal of such license shall be thirty-two dollars. No other branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the renewal of the license.

The renewal fee shall be distributed as follows:

(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;

(b) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter;

(c) Two dollars and sixteen cents to the firearms range account in the general fund; and

(d) Eighty-four cents to the concealed pistol license renewal notification account created in RCW 43.79.540.

(7) The nonrefundable fee for replacement of lost or damaged licenses is ten dollars to be paid to the issuing authority.

(8) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the option of the issuing authority.

(9)(a) A licensee may renew a license if the licensee applies for renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the license. A license so renewed shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of the license must pay a late renewal penalty of ten dollars in addition to the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section. The fee shall be distributed as follows:

(i) Three dollars shall be deposited in the state wildlife account and used exclusively first for the printing and distribution of a pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms safety, and the preemptive nature of state law, and subsequently the support of volunteer instructors in the basic firearms safety training program conducted by the department of fish and wildlife. The pamphlet shall be given to each applicant for a license; and

(ii) Seven dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter.

(b) Beginning with concealed pistol licenses that expire on or after August 1, 2018, the department of licensing shall mail a renewal notice approximately ninety days before the license expiration date to the licensee at the address listed on the concealed pistol license application, or to the licensee's new address if the licensee has notified the department of licensing of a change of address. Alternatively, if the licensee provides an email address at the time of license application, the department of licensing may send the renewal notice to the licensee's email address. The notice must contain the date the concealed pistol license will expire, the amount of renewal fee, the penalty for late renewal, and instructions on how to renew the license.

(10) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (1) through (9) of this section, the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county of the applicant's residence may issue a temporary emergency license for good cause pending review under subsection (1) of this section. However, a temporary emergency license issued under this subsection shall not exempt the holder of the license from any records check requirement. Temporary emergency licenses shall be easily distinguishable from regular licenses.

(11) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the requirements of this section or chapter, nor may a political subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any information not required by this section.

(12) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding citizenship or identity on an application for a concealed pistol license is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, the concealed pistol license of a person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be revoked, and the person shall be permanently ineligible for a concealed pistol license.

(13) A person may apply for a concealed pistol license:

(a) To the municipality or to the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant resides in a municipality;

(b) To the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant resides in an unincorporated area; or

(c) Anywhere in the state if the applicant is a nonresident.

(14) Any person who, as a member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, is unable to renew his or her license under subsections (6) and (9) of this section because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service may renew his or her license within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service, if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if appropriate, a copy of the person's discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this subsection (14) shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of the license under this subsection (14) shall pay only the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section and shall not be required to pay a late renewal penalty in addition to the renewal fee.

Sec. 6003. RCW 9.41.090 and 2015 c 1 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the other requirements of this chapter, no dealer may deliver a pistol to the purchaser thereof until:

(a) The purchaser produces a valid concealed pistol license and the dealer has recorded the purchaser's name, license number, and issuing agency, such record to be made in triplicate and processed as provided in subsection (5) of this section. For purposes of this subsection (1)(a), a "valid concealed pistol license" does not include a temporary emergency license, and does not include any license issued before July 1, 1996, unless the issuing agency conducted a records search for disqualifying crimes under RCW 9.41.070 at the time of issuance;

(b) The dealer is notified in writing by the chief of police or the sheriff of the jurisdiction in which the purchaser resides that the purchaser is eligible to possess a pistol under RCW 9.41.040 and that the application to purchase is approved by the chief of police or sheriff; or

(c) The requirements or time periods in RCW 9.41.092 have been satisfied.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, in determining whether the purchaser meets the requirements of RCW 9.41.040, the chief of police or sheriff, or the designee of either, shall check with the national crime information center, the Washington state patrol electronic database, the ((department of social and health services)) health care authority electronic database, and with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm.

(b) Once the system is established, a dealer shall use the state system and national instant criminal background check system, provided for by the Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act (18 U.S.C. Sec. 921 et seq.), to make criminal background checks of applicants to purchase firearms. However, a chief of police or sheriff, or a designee of either, shall continue to check the ((department of social and health services')) health care authority's electronic database and with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether applicants are ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm.

(3) In any case under this section where the applicant has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor, the dealer shall hold the delivery of the pistol until the warrant for arrest is served and satisfied by appropriate court appearance. The local jurisdiction for purposes of the sale shall confirm the existence of outstanding warrants within seventy-two hours after notification of the application to purchase a pistol is received. The local jurisdiction shall also immediately confirm the satisfaction of the warrant on request of the dealer so that the hold may be released if the warrant was for an offense other than an offense making a person ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a pistol.

(4) In any case where the chief or sheriff of the local jurisdiction has reasonable grounds based on the following circumstances: (a) Open criminal charges, (b) pending criminal proceedings, (c) pending commitment proceedings, (d) an outstanding warrant for an offense making a person ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a pistol, or (e) an arrest for an offense making a person ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a pistol, if the records of disposition have not yet been reported or entered sufficiently to determine eligibility to purchase a pistol, the local jurisdiction may hold the sale and delivery of the pistol up to thirty days in order to confirm existing records in this state or elsewhere. After thirty days, the hold will be lifted unless an extension of the thirty days is approved by a local district court or municipal court for good cause shown. A dealer shall be notified of each hold placed on the sale by local law enforcement and of any application to the court for additional hold period to confirm records or confirm the identity of the applicant.

(5) At the time of applying for the purchase of a pistol, the purchaser shall sign in triplicate and deliver to the dealer an application containing his or her full name, residential address, date and place of birth, race, and gender; the date and hour of the application; the applicant's driver's license number or state identification card number; a description of the pistol including the make, model, caliber and manufacturer's number if available at the time of applying for the purchase of a pistol. If the manufacturer's number is not available, the application may be processed, but delivery of the pistol to the purchaser may not occur unless the manufacturer's number is recorded on the application by the dealer and transmitted to the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county in which the purchaser resides; and a statement that the purchaser is eligible to possess a pistol under RCW 9.41.040.

The application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in federal court. State permission to purchase a firearm is not a defense to a federal prosecution.

The purchaser shall be given a copy of the department of fish and wildlife pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms safety, and the fact that local laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be consistent with state law.

The dealer shall, by the end of the business day, sign and attach his or her address and deliver a copy of the application and such other documentation as required under subsection (1) of this section to the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county of which the purchaser is a resident. The triplicate shall be retained by the dealer for six years. The dealer shall deliver the pistol to the purchaser following the period of time specified in this chapter unless the dealer is notified of an investigative hold under subsection (4) of this section in writing by the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county, whichever is applicable, denying the purchaser's application to purchase and the grounds thereof. The application shall not be denied unless the purchaser is not eligible to possess a pistol under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045, or federal law.

The chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county shall retain or destroy applications to purchase a pistol in accordance with the requirements of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 922.

(6) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding identity or eligibility requirements on the application to purchase a pistol is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040.

(7) This section does not apply to sales to licensed dealers for resale or to the sale of antique firearms.

Sec. 6004. RCW 9.41.094 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 411 are each amended to read as follows:

A signed application to purchase a pistol shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the ((department of social and health services)) health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release, to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency, information relevant to the applicant's eligibility to purchase a pistol to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.

Sec. 6005. RCW 9.41.097 and 2009 c 216 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((department of social and health services)) health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities shall, upon request of a court or law enforcement agency, supply such relevant information as is necessary to determine the eligibility of a person to possess a pistol or to be issued a concealed pistol license under RCW 9.41.070 or to purchase a pistol under RCW 9.41.090.

(2) Mental health information received by: (a) The department of licensing pursuant to RCW 9.41.047 or 9.41.173; (b) an issuing authority pursuant to RCW 9.41.047 or 9.41.070; (c) a chief of police or sheriff pursuant to RCW 9.41.090 or 9.41.173; (d) a court or law enforcement agency pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, shall not be disclosed except as provided in RCW 42.56.240(4).

Sec. 6006. RCW 9.41.173 and 2017 c 174 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to obtain an alien firearm license, a nonimmigrant alien residing in Washington must apply to the sheriff of the county in which he or she resides.

(2) The sheriff of the county shall within sixty days after the filing of an application of a nonimmigrant alien residing in the state of Washington, issue an alien firearm license to such person to carry or possess a firearm for the purposes of hunting and sport shooting. The license shall be good for two years. The issuing authority shall not refuse to accept completed applications for alien firearm licenses during regular business hours. An application for a license may not be denied, unless the applicant's alien firearm license is in a revoked status, or the applicant:

(a) Is ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions of RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045;

(b) Is subject to a court order or injunction regarding firearms pursuant to RCW 9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.50.060, 26.50.070, or 26.26.590;

(c) Is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing for a felony offense; or

(d) Has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor.

No license application shall be granted to a nonimmigrant alien convicted of a felony unless the person has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c), or unless RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.

(3) The sheriff shall check with the national crime information center, the Washington state patrol electronic database, the ((department of social and health services)) health care authority electronic database, and with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess a firearm.

(4) The license application shall bear the full name, residential address, telephone number at the option of the applicant, date and place of birth, race, gender, description, a complete set of fingerprints, and signature of the applicant, a copy of the applicant's passport and visa showing the applicant is in the country legally, and a valid Washington hunting license or documentation that the applicant is a member of a sport shooting club.

A signed application for an alien firearm license shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the ((department of social and health services)) health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release information relevant to the applicant's eligibility for an alien firearm license to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.

The application for an original license shall include a complete set of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol.

The license and application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a defense to a federal prosecution.

The license shall contain a description of the major differences between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be consistent with state law. The application shall contain questions about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm. The nonimmigrant alien applicant shall be required to produce a passport and visa as evidence of being in the country legally.

The license may be in triplicate or in a form to be prescribed by the department of licensing. The original thereof shall be delivered to the licensee, the duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the director of licensing and the triplicate shall be preserved for six years, by the authority issuing the license.

The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement and corrections agencies, in an online format, all information received under this section.

(5) The sheriff has the authority to collect a nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the two-year license. The fee shall be fifty dollars plus additional charges imposed by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation that are passed on to the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the issuance of the license. The fee shall be retained by the sheriff.

(6) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the option of the sheriff.

(7) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the requirements of this section, nor may a political subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any information not required by this section.

(8) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding citizenship or identity on an application for an alien firearm license is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, the alien firearm license of a person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be revoked, and the person shall be permanently ineligible for an alien firearm license.

Sec. 6007. RCW 9.41.300 and 2011 c 221 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to enter the following places when he or she knowingly possesses or knowingly has under his or her control a weapon:

(a) The restricted access areas of a jail, or of a law enforcement facility, or any place used for the confinement of a person (i) arrested for, charged with, or convicted of an offense, (ii) held for extradition or as a material witness, or (iii) otherwise confined pursuant to an order of a court, except an order under chapter 13.32A or 13.34 RCW. Restricted access areas do not include common areas of egress or ingress open to the general public;

(b) Those areas in any building which are used in connection with court proceedings, including courtrooms, jury rooms, judge's chambers, offices and areas used to conduct court business, waiting areas, and corridors adjacent to areas used in connection with court proceedings. The restricted areas do not include common areas of ingress and egress to the building that is used in connection with court proceedings, when it is possible to protect court areas without restricting ingress and egress to the building. The restricted areas shall be the minimum necessary to fulfill the objective of this subsection (1)(b).

For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), "weapon" means any firearm, explosive as defined in RCW 70.74.010, or any weapon of the kind usually known as slung shot, sand club, or metal knuckles, or any knife, dagger, dirk, or other similar weapon that is capable of causing death or bodily injury and is commonly used with the intent to cause death or bodily injury.

In addition, the local legislative authority shall provide either a stationary locked box sufficient in size for pistols and key to a weapon owner for weapon storage, or shall designate an official to receive weapons for safekeeping, during the owner's visit to restricted areas of the building. The locked box or designated official shall be located within the same building used in connection with court proceedings. The local legislative authority shall be liable for any negligence causing damage to or loss of a weapon either placed in a locked box or left with an official during the owner's visit to restricted areas of the building.

The local judicial authority shall designate and clearly mark those areas where weapons are prohibited, and shall post notices at each entrance to the building of the prohibition against weapons in the restricted areas;

(c) The restricted access areas of a public mental health facility certified by the department of ((social and)) health ((services)) for inpatient hospital care and state institutions for the care of the mentally ill, excluding those facilities solely for evaluation and treatment. Restricted access areas do not include common areas of egress and ingress open to the general public;

(d) That portion of an establishment classified by the state liquor ((control)) and cannabis board as off-limits to persons under twenty-one years of age; or

(e) The restricted access areas of a commercial service airport designated in the airport security plan approved by the federal transportation security administration, including passenger screening checkpoints at or beyond the point at which a passenger initiates the screening process. These areas do not include airport drives, general parking areas and walkways, and shops and areas of the terminal that are outside the screening checkpoints and that are normally open to unscreened passengers or visitors to the airport. Any restricted access area shall be clearly indicated by prominent signs indicating that firearms and other weapons are prohibited in the area.

(2) Cities, towns, counties, and other municipalities may enact laws and ordinances:

(a) Restricting the discharge of firearms in any portion of their respective jurisdictions where there is a reasonable likelihood that humans, domestic animals, or property will be jeopardized. Such laws and ordinances shall not abridge the right of the individual guaranteed by Article I, section 24 of the state Constitution to bear arms in defense of self or others; and

(b) Restricting the possession of firearms in any stadium or convention center, operated by a city, town, county, or other municipality, except that such restrictions shall not apply to:

(i) Any pistol in the possession of a person licensed under RCW 9.41.070 or exempt from the licensing requirement by RCW 9.41.060; or

(ii) Any showing, demonstration, or lecture involving the exhibition of firearms.

(3)(a) Cities, towns, and counties may enact ordinances restricting the areas in their respective jurisdictions in which firearms may be sold, but, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a business selling firearms may not be treated more restrictively than other businesses located within the same zone. An ordinance requiring the cessation of business within a zone shall not have a shorter grandfather period for businesses selling firearms than for any other businesses within the zone.

(b) Cities, towns, and counties may restrict the location of a business selling firearms to not less than five hundred feet from primary or secondary school grounds, if the business has a storefront, has hours during which it is open for business, and posts advertisements or signs observable to passersby that firearms are available for sale. A business selling firearms that exists as of the date a restriction is enacted under this subsection (3)(b) shall be grandfathered according to existing law.

(4) Violations of local ordinances adopted under subsection (2) of this section must have the same penalty as provided for by state law.

(5) The perimeter of the premises of any specific location covered by subsection (1) of this section shall be posted at reasonable intervals to alert the public as to the existence of any law restricting the possession of firearms on the premises.

(6) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:

(a) A person engaged in military activities sponsored by the federal or state governments, while engaged in official duties;

(b) Law enforcement personnel, except that subsection (1)(b) of this section does apply to a law enforcement officer who is present at a courthouse building as a party to an action under chapter 10.14, 10.99, or 26.50 RCW, or an action under Title 26 RCW where any party has alleged the existence of domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010; or

(c) Security personnel while engaged in official duties.

(7) Subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), and (e) of this section does not apply to correctional personnel or community corrections officers, as long as they are employed as such, who have completed government-sponsored law enforcement firearms training, except that subsection (1)(b) of this section does apply to a correctional employee or community corrections officer who is present at a courthouse building as a party to an action under chapter 10.14, 10.99, or 26.50 RCW, or an action under Title 26 RCW where any party has alleged the existence of domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010.

(8) Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to a person licensed pursuant to RCW 9.41.070 who, upon entering the place or facility, directly and promptly proceeds to the administrator of the facility or the administrator's designee and obtains written permission to possess the firearm while on the premises or checks his or her firearm. The person may reclaim the firearms upon leaving but must immediately and directly depart from the place or facility.

(9) Subsection (1)(c) of this section does not apply to any administrator or employee of the facility or to any person who, upon entering the place or facility, directly and promptly proceeds to the administrator of the facility or the administrator's designee and obtains written permission to possess the firearm while on the premises.

(10) Subsection (1)(d) of this section does not apply to the proprietor of the premises or his or her employees while engaged in their employment.

(11) Government-sponsored law enforcement firearms training must be training that correctional personnel and community corrections officers receive as part of their job requirement and reference to such training does not constitute a mandate that it be provided by the correctional facility.

(12) Any person violating subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(13) "Weapon" as used in this section means any firearm, explosive as defined in RCW 70.74.010, or instrument or weapon listed in RCW 9.41.250.

PART 7

Sec. 7001. RCW 41.05.015 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall designate a medical director who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW. The director shall also appoint such professional personnel and other assistants and employees, including professional medical screeners, as may be reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and chapter 74.09 RCW and other applicable law. The medical screeners must be supervised by one or more physicians whom the director or the director's designee shall appoint.

Sec. 7002. RCW 41.05.021 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 803 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state health care authority is created within the executive branch. The authority shall have a director appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director may employ a deputy director, and such assistant directors and special assistants as may be needed to administer the authority, who shall be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are necessary to administer this chapter. The director may delegate any power or duty vested in him or her by law, including authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The primary duties of the authority shall be to: Administer insurance benefits for state employees, retired or disabled state and school employees, and subject to school employees' benefits board direction, school employees; administer the basic health plan pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; administer the children's health program pursuant to chapter 74.09 RCW; study state purchased health care programs in order to maximize cost containment in these programs while ensuring access to quality health care; implement state initiatives, joint purchasing strategies, and techniques for efficient administration that have potential application to all state-purchased health services; and administer grants that further the mission and goals of the authority. The authority's duties include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) To administer health care benefit programs for state employees, retired or disabled state and school employees, and subject to school employees' benefits board direction, school employees as specifically authorized in RCW 41.05.065 and 41.05.740 and in accordance with the methods described in RCW 41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this chapter;

(b) To analyze state purchased health care programs and to explore options for cost containment and delivery alternatives for those programs that are consistent with the purposes of those programs, including, but not limited to:

(i) Creation of economic incentives for the persons for whom the state purchases health care to appropriately utilize and purchase health care services, including the development of flexible benefit plans to offset increases in individual financial responsibility;

(ii) Utilization of provider arrangements that encourage cost containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems, utilization review, and prospective payment methods, and that ensure access to quality care, including assuring reasonable access to local providers, especially for employees residing in rural areas;

(iii) Coordination of state agency efforts to purchase drugs effectively as provided in RCW 70.14.050;

(iv) Development of recommendations and methods for purchasing medical equipment and supporting services on a volume discount basis;

(v) Development of data systems to obtain utilization data from state purchased health care programs in order to identify cost centers, utilization patterns, provider and hospital practice patterns, and procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained pursuant to RCW 41.05.031; and

(vi) In collaboration with other state agencies that administer state purchased health care programs, private health care purchasers, health care facilities, providers, and carriers:

(A) Use evidence-based medicine principles to develop common performance measures and implement financial incentives in contracts with insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers that:

(I) Reward improvements in health outcomes for individuals with chronic diseases, increased utilization of appropriate preventive health services, and reductions in medical errors; and

(II) Increase, through appropriate incentives to insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers, the adoption and use of information technology that contributes to improved health outcomes, better coordination of care, and decreased medical errors;

(B) Through state health purchasing, reimbursement, or pilot strategies, promote and increase the adoption of health information technology systems, including electronic medical records, by hospitals as defined in RCW 70.41.020, integrated delivery systems, and providers that:

(I) Facilitate diagnosis or treatment;

(II) Reduce unnecessary duplication of medical tests;

(III) Promote efficient electronic physician order entry;

(IV) Increase access to health information for consumers and their providers; and

(V) Improve health outcomes;

(C) Coordinate a strategy for the adoption of health information technology systems using the final health information technology report and recommendations developed under chapter 261, Laws of 2005;

(c) To analyze areas of public and private health care interaction;

(d) To provide information and technical and administrative assistance to the board and the school employees' benefits board;

(e) To review and approve or deny applications from counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state to provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to their employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW 41.04.205 and (g) of this subsection, setting the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined in RCW 41.05.050;

(f) To review and approve or deny the application when the governing body of a tribal government applies to transfer their employees to an insurance or self-insurance program administered under this chapter. In the event of an employee transfer pursuant to this subsection (1)(f), members of the governing body are eligible to be included in such a transfer if the members are authorized by the tribal government to participate in the insurance program being transferred from and subject to payment by the members of all costs of insurance for the members. The authority shall: (i) Establish the conditions for participation; (ii) have the sole right to reject the application; and (iii) set the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined in RCW 41.05.050. Approval of the application by the authority transfers the employees and dependents involved to the insurance, self-insurance, or health care program approved by the authority;

(g) To ensure the continued status of the employee insurance or self-insurance programs administered under this chapter as a governmental plan under section 3(32) of the employee retirement income security act of 1974, as amended, the authority shall limit the participation of employees of a county, municipal, school district, educational service district, or other political subdivision, the Washington health benefit exchange, or a tribal government, including providing for the participation of those employees whose services are substantially all in the performance of essential governmental functions, but not in the performance of commercial activities;

(h) To establish billing procedures and collect funds from school districts in a way that minimizes the administrative burden on districts;

(i) Through December 31, 2019, to publish and distribute to nonparticipating school districts and educational service districts by October 1st of each year a description of health care benefit plans available through the authority and the estimated cost if school districts and educational service district employees were enrolled;

(j) To apply for, receive, and accept grants, gifts, and other payments, including property and service, from any governmental or other public or private entity or person, and make arrangements as to the use of these receipts to implement initiatives and strategies developed under this section;

(k) To issue, distribute, and administer grants that further the mission and goals of the authority;

(l) To adopt rules consistent with this chapter as described in RCW 41.05.160 including, but not limited to:

(i) Setting forth the criteria established by the board under RCW 41.05.065, and by the school employees' benefits board under RCW 41.05.740, for determining whether an employee is eligible for benefits;

(ii) Establishing an appeal process in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW by which an employee may appeal an eligibility determination;

(iii) Establishing a process to assure that the eligibility determinations of an employing agency comply with the criteria under this chapter, including the imposition of penalties as may be authorized by the board or the school employees' benefits board;

(m)(i) To administer the medical services programs established under chapter 74.09 RCW as the designated single state agency for purposes of Title XIX of the federal social security act;

(ii) To administer the state children's health insurance program under chapter 74.09 RCW for purposes of Title XXI of the federal social security act;

(iii) To enter into agreements with the department of social and health services for administration of medical care services programs under Titles XIX and XXI of the social security act and programs under chapters 71.05, 71.24, and 71.34 RCW. The agreements shall establish the division of responsibilities between the authority and the department with respect to mental health, chemical dependency, and long-term care services, including services for persons with developmental disabilities. The agreements shall be revised as necessary, to comply with the final implementation plan adopted under section 116, chapter 15, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.;

(iv) To adopt rules to carry out the purposes of chapter 74.09 RCW;

(v) To appoint such advisory committees or councils as may be required by any federal statute or regulation as a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the authority. The director may appoint statewide committees or councils in the following subject areas: (A) Health facilities; (B) children and youth services; (C) blind services; (D) medical and health care; (E) drug abuse and alcoholism; (F) rehabilitative services; and (G) such other subject matters as are or come within the authority's responsibilities. The statewide councils shall have representation from both major political parties and shall have substantial consumer representation. Such committees or councils shall be constituted as required by federal law or as the director in his or her discretion may determine. The members of the committees or councils shall hold office for three years except in the case of a vacancy, in which event appointment shall be only for the remainder of the unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs. No member shall serve more than two consecutive terms. Members of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended;

(n) To review and approve or deny the application from the governing board of the Washington health benefit exchange to provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to employees of the exchange. The authority shall (i) establish the conditions for participation; (ii) have the sole right to reject an application; and (iii) set the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined in RCW 41.05.050.

(2) ((On and after January 1, 1996,)) The public employees' benefits board and the school employees' benefits board ((beginning October 1, 2017,)) may implement strategies to promote managed competition among employee health benefit plans. Strategies may include but are not limited to:

(a) Standardizing the benefit package;

(b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit package;

(c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent of the lowest priced qualified plan within a geographical area;

(d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this subsection with regards to: Efficiencies in health service delivery, cost shifts to subscribers, access to and choice of managed care plans statewide, and quality of health services. The health care authority shall also advise on the value of administering a benchmark employer-managed plan to promote competition among managed care plans.

Sec. 7003. RCW 41.05A.005 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

The purpose of this chapter is to provide the health care authority with the powers, duties, and authority with respect to the collection of overpayments and the coordination of benefits that are currently provided to the department of social and health services in chapter 43.20B RCW. Providing the health care authority with these powers is necessary for the authority to administer medical services programs established under chapter 74.09 RCW currently administered by the department of social and health services programs but transferred to the authority under chapter 15, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess., and programs transferred to the authority under chapter . . ., Laws of 2018 (this act). The authority is authorized to collaborate with other state agencies in carrying out its duties under this chapter and, to the extent appropriate, may enter into agreements with such other agencies. Nothing in this chapter may be construed as diminishing the powers, duties, and authority granted to the department of social and health services in chapter 43.20B RCW with respect to the programs that will remain under its jurisdiction following enactment of chapter 15, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. and chapter . . ., Laws of 2018 (this act).

Sec. 7004. RCW 74.09.050 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall appoint such professional personnel and other assistants and employees, including professional medical screeners, as may be reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter or other applicable law. The medical screeners shall be supervised by one or more physicians who shall be appointed by the director or his or her designee. The director shall appoint a medical director who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

(2) Whenever the director's authority is not specifically limited by law, he or she has complete charge and supervisory powers over the authority. The director is authorized to create such administrative structures as deemed appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The director has the power to employ such assistants and personnel as may be necessary for the general administration of the authority. Except as elsewhere specified, such employment must be in accordance with the rules of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW.

Sec. 7005. RCW 74.09.055 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority is authorized to establish copayment, deductible, or coinsurance, or other cost-sharing requirements for recipients of any medical programs defined in RCW 74.09.010 or other applicable law, except that premiums shall not be imposed on children in households at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level.

Sec. 7006. RCW 74.09.080 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

In carrying out the administrative responsibility of this chapter or other applicable law, the department or authority, as appropriate:

(1) May contract with an individual or a group, may utilize existing local state public assistance offices, or establish separate welfare medical care offices on a county or multicounty unit basis as found necessary; and

(2) Shall determine both financial and functional eligibility for persons applying for long-term care services under chapter 74.39 or 74.39A RCW as a unified process in a single long-term care organizational unit.

Sec. 7007. RCW 74.09.120 and 2012 c 10 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall purchase nursing home care by contract and payment for the care shall be in accordance with the provisions of chapter 74.46 RCW and rules adopted by the department. No payment shall be made to a nursing home which does not permit inspection by the authority and the department of every part of its premises and an examination of all records, including financial records, methods of administration, general and special dietary programs, the disbursement of drugs and methods of supply, and any other records the authority or the department deems relevant to the regulation of nursing home operations, enforcement of standards for resident care, and payment for nursing home services.

(2) The department may purchase nursing home care by contract in veterans' homes operated by the state department of veterans affairs and payment for the care shall be in accordance with the provisions of chapter 74.46 RCW and rules adopted by the department under the authority of RCW 74.46.800.

(3) The department may purchase care in institutions for persons with intellectual disabilities, also known as intermediate care facilities for persons with intellectual disabilities. The department shall establish rules for reasonable accounting and reimbursement systems for such care. Institutions for persons with intellectual disabilities include licensed nursing homes, public institutions, licensed assisted living facilities with fifteen beds or less, and hospital facilities certified as intermediate care facilities for persons with intellectual disabilities under the federal medicaid program to provide health, habilitative, or rehabilitative services and twenty-four hour supervision for persons with intellectual disabilities or related conditions and includes in the program "active treatment" as federally defined.

(4) The department may purchase care in institutions for mental diseases by contract. The department shall establish rules for reasonable accounting and reimbursement systems for such care. Institutions for mental diseases are certified under the federal medicaid program and primarily engaged in providing diagnosis, treatment, or care to persons with mental diseases, including medical attention, nursing care, and related services.

(5) Both the department and the authority may each purchase all other services provided under this chapter or other applicable law by contract or at rates established by the department or the authority respectively.

Sec. 7008. RCW 74.09.160 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Each vendor or group who has a contract and is rendering service to eligible persons as defined in this chapter or other applicable law shall submit such charges as agreed upon between the department or authority, as appropriate, and the individual or group no later than twelve months from the date of service. If the final charges are not presented within the twelve-month period, they shall not be a charge against the state. Said twelve-month period may also be extended by regulation, but only if required by applicable federal law or regulation, and to no more than the extension of time so required.

Sec. 7009. RCW 74.09.210 and 2013 c 23 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, agency, institution, or other legal entity, but not including an individual public assistance recipient of health care, shall, on behalf of himself or herself or others, obtain or attempt to obtain benefits or payments under this chapter or other applicable law in a greater amount than that to which entitled by means of:

(a) A willful false statement;

(b) By willful misrepresentation, or by concealment of any material facts; or

(c) By other fraudulent scheme or device, including, but not limited to:

(i) Billing for services, drugs, supplies, or equipment that were unfurnished, of lower quality, or a substitution or misrepresentation of items billed; or

(ii) Repeated billing for purportedly covered items, which were not in fact so covered.

(2) Any person or entity knowingly violating any of the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be liable for repayment of any excess benefits or payments received, plus interest at the rate and in the manner provided in RCW 43.20B.695. Such person or other entity shall further, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, be subject to civil penalties. The director or the attorney general may assess civil penalties in an amount not to exceed three times the amount of such excess benefits or payments: PROVIDED, That these civil penalties shall not apply to any acts or omissions occurring prior to September 1, 1979. RCW 43.20A.215 governs notice of a civil fine assessed by the director and provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding.

(3) A criminal action need not be brought against a person for that person to be civilly liable under this section.

(4) In all administrative proceedings under this section, service, adjudicative proceedings, and judicial review of such determinations shall be in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

(5) Civil penalties shall be deposited upon their receipt into the medicaid fraud penalty account established in RCW 74.09.215.

(6) The attorney general may contract with private attorneys and local governments in bringing actions under this section as necessary.

Sec. 7010. RCW 74.09.220 and 1987 c 283 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, agency, institution or other legal entity, but not including an individual public assistance recipient of health care, that, without intent to violate this chapter or other applicable law, obtains benefits or payments under this code to which such person or entity is not entitled, or in a greater amount than that to which entitled, shall be liable for (1) any excess benefits or payments received, and (2) interest calculated at the rate and in the manner provided in RCW 43.20B.695. Whenever a penalty is due under RCW 74.09.210 or interest is due under RCW 43.20B.695, such penalty or interest shall not be reimbursable by the state as an allowable cost under any of the provisions of this chapter or other applicable law.

Sec. 7011. RCW 74.09.230 and 2013 c 23 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person, including any corporation, that

(1) knowingly makes or causes to be made any false statement or representation of a material fact in any application for any payment under any medical care program authorized under this chapter or other applicable law, or

(2) at any time knowingly makes or causes to be made any false statement or representation of a material fact for use in determining rights to such payment, or knowingly falsifies, conceals, or covers up by any trick, scheme, or device a material fact in connection with such application or payment, or

(3) having knowledge of the occurrence of any event affecting (a) the initial or continued right to any payment, or (b) the initial or continued right to any such payment of any other individual in whose behalf he or she has applied for or is receiving such payment, conceals or fails to disclose such event with an intent fraudulently to secure such payment either in a greater amount or quantity than is due or when no such payment is authorized,

shall be guilty of a class C felony: PROVIDED, That the fine, if imposed, shall not be in an amount more than twenty-five thousand dollars, except as authorized by RCW 9A.20.030.

Sec. 7012. RCW 74.09.240 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person, including any corporation, that solicits or receives any remuneration (including any kickback, bribe, or rebate) directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind

(a) in return for referring an individual to a person for the furnishing or arranging for the furnishing of any item or service for which payment may be made in whole or in part under this chapter or other applicable law, or

(b) in return for purchasing, leasing, ordering, or arranging for or recommending purchasing, leasing, or ordering any goods, facility, service, or item for which payment may be made in whole or in part under this chapter or other applicable law,

shall be guilty of a class C felony; however, the fine, if imposed, shall not be in an amount more than twenty-five thousand dollars, except as authorized by RCW 9A.20.030.

(2) Any person, including any corporation, that offers or pays any remuneration (including any kickback, bribe, or rebate) directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind to any person to induce such person

(a) to refer an individual to a person for the furnishing or arranging for the furnishing of any item or service for which payment may be made, in whole or in part, under this chapter or other applicable law, or

(b) to purchase, lease, order, or arrange for or recommend purchasing, leasing, or ordering any goods, facility, service, or item for which payment may be made in whole or in part under this chapter or other applicable law,

shall be guilty of a class C felony; however, the fine, if imposed, shall not be in an amount more than twenty-five thousand dollars, except as authorized by RCW 9A.20.030.

(3)(a) Except as provided in 42 U.S.C. 1395 nn, physicians are prohibited from self-referring any client eligible under this chapter for the following designated health services to a facility in which the physician or an immediate family member has a financial relationship:

(i) Clinical laboratory services;

(ii) Physical therapy services;

(iii) Occupational therapy services;

(iv) Radiology including magnetic resonance imaging, computerized axial tomography, and ultrasound services;

(v) Durable medical equipment and supplies;

(vi) Parenteral and enteral nutrients equipment and supplies;

(vii) Prosthetics, orthotics, and prosthetic devices;

(viii) Home health services;

(ix) Outpatient prescription drugs;

(x) Inpatient and outpatient hospital services;

(xi) Radiation therapy services and supplies.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, "financial relationship" means the relationship between a physician and an entity that includes either:

(i) An ownership or investment interest; or

(ii) A compensation arrangement.

For purposes of this subsection, "compensation arrangement" means an arrangement involving remuneration between a physician, or an immediate family member of a physician, and an entity.

(c) The department or authority, as appropriate, is authorized to adopt by rule amendments to 42 U.S.C. 1395 nn enacted after July 23, 1995.

(d) This section shall not apply in any case covered by a general exception specified in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 nn.

(4) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not apply to:

(a) A discount or other reduction in price obtained by a provider of services or other entity under this chapter or other applicable law if the reduction in price is properly disclosed and appropriately reflected in the costs claimed or charges made by the provider or entity under this chapter or other applicable law; and

(b) Any amount paid by an employer to an employee (who has a bona fide employment relationship with such employer) for employment in the provision of covered items or services.

(5) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section, if applicable to the conduct involved, shall supersede the criminal provisions of chapter 19.68 RCW, but shall not preclude administrative proceedings authorized by chapter 19.68 RCW.

Sec. 7013. RCW 74.09.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person, including any corporation, that knowingly:

(1) Charges, for any service provided to a patient under any medical care plan authorized under this chapter or other applicable law, money or other consideration at a rate in excess of the rates established by the department or authority, as appropriate; or

(2) Charges, solicits, accepts, or receives, in addition to any amount otherwise required to be paid under such plan, any gift, money, donation, or other consideration (other than a charitable, religious, or philanthropic contribution from an organization or from a person unrelated to the patient):

(a) As a precondition of admitting a patient to a hospital or nursing facility; or

(b) As a requirement for the patient's continued stay in such facility,

when the cost of the services provided therein to the patient is paid for, in whole or in part, under such plan, shall be guilty of a class C felony: PROVIDED, That the fine, if imposed, shall not be in an amount more than twenty-five thousand dollars, except as authorized by RCW 9A.20.030.

Sec. 7014. RCW 74.09.280 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary or director may by rule require that any application, statement, or form filled out by suppliers of medical care under this chapter or other applicable law shall contain or be verified by a written statement that it is made under the penalties of perjury and such declaration shall be in lieu of any oath otherwise required, and each such paper shall in such event so state. The making or subscribing of any such papers or forms containing any false or misleading information may be prosecuted and punished under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

Sec. 7015. RCW 74.09.290 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary or director shall have the authority to:

(1) Conduct audits and investigations of providers of medical and other services furnished pursuant to this chapter or other applicable law, except that the Washington state medical quality assurance commission shall generally serve in an advisory capacity to the secretary or director in the conduct of audits or investigations of physicians. Any overpayment discovered as a result of an audit of a provider under this authority shall be offset by any underpayments discovered in that same audit sample. In order to determine the provider's actual, usual, customary, or prevailing charges, the secretary or director may examine such random representative records as necessary to show accounts billed and accounts received except that in the conduct of such examinations, patient names, other than public assistance applicants or recipients, shall not be noted, copied, or otherwise made available to the department or authority. In order to verify costs incurred by the department or authority for treatment of public assistance applicants or recipients, the secretary or director may examine patient records or portions thereof in connection with services to such applicants or recipients rendered by a health care provider, notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 5.60.060, 18.53.200, 18.83.110, or any other statute which may make or purport to make such records privileged or confidential: PROVIDED, That no original patient records shall be removed from the premises of the health care provider, and that the disclosure of any records or information by the department or the authority is prohibited and shall be punishable as a class C felony according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, unless such disclosure is directly connected to the official purpose for which the records or information were obtained: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the disclosure of patient information as required under this section shall not subject any physician or other health services provider to any liability for breach of any confidential relationship between the provider and the patient, but no evidence resulting from such disclosure may be used in any civil, administrative, or criminal proceeding against the patient unless a waiver of the applicable evidentiary privilege is obtained: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the secretary or director shall destroy all copies of patient medical records in their possession upon completion of the audit, investigation or proceedings;

(2) Approve or deny applications to participate as a provider of services furnished pursuant to this chapter or other applicable law;

(3) Terminate or suspend eligibility to participate as a provider of services furnished pursuant to this chapter or other applicable law; and

(4) Adopt, promulgate, amend, and repeal administrative rules, in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to carry out the policies and purposes of this section and RCW 74.09.200 through ((74.09.290)) 74.09.280.

Sec. 7016. RCW 74.09.315 and 2012 c 241 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Employer" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, agency, institution, or other legal entity.

(b) "Whistleblower" means an employee of an employer that obtains or attempts to obtain benefits or payments under this chapter or other applicable law in violation of RCW 74.09.210, who in good faith reports a violation of RCW 74.09.210 to the authority.

(c) "Workplace reprisal or retaliatory action" includes, but is not limited to: Denial of adequate staff to fulfill duties; frequent staff changes; frequent and undesirable office changes; refusal to assign meaningful work; unwarranted and unsubstantiated report of misconduct under Title 18 RCW; unwarranted and unsubstantiated letters of reprimand or unsatisfactory performance evaluations; demotion; reduction in pay; denial of promotion; suspension; dismissal; denial of employment; ((or)) a supervisor or superior behaving in or encouraging coworkers to behave in a hostile manner toward the whistleblower; or a change in the physical location of the employee's workplace or a change in the basic nature of the employee's job, if either are in opposition to the employee's expressed wish.

(2) A whistleblower who has been subjected to workplace reprisal or retaliatory action has the remedies provided under chapter 49.60 RCW. RCW 4.24.500 through 4.24.520, providing certain protection to persons who communicate to government agencies, apply to complaints made under this section. The identity of a whistleblower who complains, in good faith, to the authority about a suspected violation of RCW 74.09.210 may remain confidential if requested. The identity of the whistleblower must subsequently remain confidential unless the authority determines that the complaint was not made in good faith.

(3) This section does not prohibit an employer from exercising its authority to terminate, suspend, or discipline an employee who engages in workplace reprisal or retaliatory action against a whistleblower. The protections provided to whistleblowers under this chapter do not prevent an employer from: (a) Terminating, suspending, or disciplining a whistleblower for other lawful purposes; or (b) reducing the hours of employment or terminating employment as a result of the demonstrated inability to meet payroll requirements. The authority shall determine if the employer cannot meet payroll in cases where a whistleblower has been terminated or had hours of employment reduced due to the inability of a facility to meet payroll.

(4) The authority shall adopt rules to implement procedures for filing, investigation, and resolution of whistleblower complaints that are integrated with complaint procedures under this chapter. The authority shall adopt rules designed to discourage whistleblower complaints made in bad faith or for retaliatory purposes.

Sec. 7017. RCW 74.09.522 and 2015 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Managed health care system" means any health care organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care service contractors, health maintenance organizations, health insuring organizations, or any combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract health care services covered under this chapter or other applicable law and rendered by licensed providers, on a prepaid capitated basis and that meets the requirements of section 1903(m)(1)(A) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or federal demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;

(b) "Nonparticipating provider" means a person, health care provider, practitioner, facility, or entity, acting within their scope of practice, that does not have a written contract to participate in a managed health care system's provider network, but provides health care services to enrollees of programs authorized under this chapter or other applicable law whose health care services are provided by the managed health care system.

(2) The authority shall enter into agreements with managed health care systems to provide health care services to recipients of temporary assistance for needy families under the following conditions:

(a) Agreements shall be made for at least thirty thousand recipients statewide;

(b) Agreements in at least one county shall include enrollment of all recipients of temporary assistance for needy families;

(c) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section 1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or federal demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act, recipients shall have a choice of systems in which to enroll and shall have the right to terminate their enrollment in a system: PROVIDED, That the authority may limit recipient termination of enrollment without cause to the first month of a period of enrollment, which period shall not exceed twelve months: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the authority shall not restrict a recipient's right to terminate enrollment in a system for good cause as established by the authority by rule;

(d) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section 1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act, participating managed health care systems shall not enroll a disproportionate number of medical assistance recipients within the total numbers of persons served by the managed health care systems, except as authorized by the authority under federal demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;

(e)(i) In negotiating with managed health care systems the authority shall adopt a uniform procedure to enter into contractual arrangements, to be included in contracts issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2015, including:

(A) Standards regarding the quality of services to be provided;

(B) The financial integrity of the responding system;

(C) Provider reimbursement methods that incentivize chronic care management within health homes, including comprehensive medication management services for patients with multiple chronic conditions consistent with the findings and goals established in RCW 74.09.5223;

(D) Provider reimbursement methods that reward health homes that, by using chronic care management, reduce emergency department and inpatient use;

(E) Promoting provider participation in the program of training and technical assistance regarding care of people with chronic conditions described in RCW 43.70.533, including allocation of funds to support provider participation in the training, unless the managed care system is an integrated health delivery system that has programs in place for chronic care management;

(F) Provider reimbursement methods within the medical billing processes that incentivize pharmacists or other qualified providers licensed in Washington state to provide comprehensive medication management services consistent with the findings and goals established in RCW 74.09.5223;

(G) Evaluation and reporting on the impact of comprehensive medication management services on patient clinical outcomes and total health care costs, including reductions in emergency department utilization, hospitalization, and drug costs; and

(H) Established consistent processes to incentivize integration of behavioral health services in the primary care setting, promoting care that is integrated, collaborative, colocated, and preventive.

(ii)(A) Health home services contracted for under this subsection may be prioritized to enrollees with complex, high cost, or multiple chronic conditions.

(B) Contracts that include the items in (e)(i)(C) through (G) of this subsection must not exceed the rates that would be paid in the absence of these provisions;

(f) The authority shall seek waivers from federal requirements as necessary to implement this chapter;

(g) The authority shall, wherever possible, enter into prepaid capitation contracts that include inpatient care. However, if this is not possible or feasible, the authority may enter into prepaid capitation contracts that do not include inpatient care;

(h) The authority shall define those circumstances under which a managed health care system is responsible for out-of-plan services and assure that recipients shall not be charged for such services;

(i) Nothing in this section prevents the authority from entering into similar agreements for other groups of people eligible to receive services under this chapter; and

(j) The authority must consult with the federal center for medicare and medicaid innovation and seek funding opportunities to support health homes.

(3) The authority shall ensure that publicly supported community health centers and providers in rural areas, who show serious intent and apparent capability to participate as managed health care systems are seriously considered as contractors. The authority shall coordinate its managed care activities with activities under chapter 70.47 RCW.

(4) The authority shall work jointly with the state of Oregon and other states in this geographical region in order to develop recommendations to be presented to the appropriate federal agencies and the United States congress for improving health care of the poor, while controlling related costs.

(5) The legislature finds that competition in the managed health care marketplace is enhanced, in the long term, by the existence of a large number of managed health care system options for medicaid clients. In a managed care delivery system, whose goal is to focus on prevention, primary care, and improved enrollee health status, continuity in care relationships is of substantial importance, and disruption to clients and health care providers should be minimized. To help ensure these goals are met, the following principles shall guide the authority in its healthy options managed health care purchasing efforts:

(a) All managed health care systems should have an opportunity to contract with the authority to the extent that minimum contracting requirements defined by the authority are met, at payment rates that enable the authority to operate as far below appropriated spending levels as possible, consistent with the principles established in this section.

(b) Managed health care systems should compete for the award of contracts and assignment of medicaid beneficiaries who do not voluntarily select a contracting system, based upon:

(i) Demonstrated commitment to or experience in serving low-income populations;

(ii) Quality of services provided to enrollees;

(iii) Accessibility, including appropriate utilization, of services offered to enrollees;

(iv) Demonstrated capability to perform contracted services, including ability to supply an adequate provider network;

(v) Payment rates; and

(vi) The ability to meet other specifically defined contract requirements established by the authority, including consideration of past and current performance and participation in other state or federal health programs as a contractor.

(c) Consideration should be given to using multiple year contracting periods.

(d) Quality, accessibility, and demonstrated commitment to serving low-income populations shall be given significant weight in the contracting, evaluation, and assignment process.

(e) All contractors that are regulated health carriers must meet state minimum net worth requirements as defined in applicable state laws. The authority shall adopt rules establishing the minimum net worth requirements for contractors that are not regulated health carriers. This subsection does not limit the authority of the Washington state health care authority to take action under a contract upon finding that a contractor's financial status seriously jeopardizes the contractor's ability to meet its contract obligations.

(f) Procedures for resolution of disputes between the authority and contract bidders or the authority and contracting carriers related to the award of, or failure to award, a managed care contract must be clearly set out in the procurement document.

(6) The authority may apply the principles set forth in subsection (5) of this section to its managed health care purchasing efforts on behalf of clients receiving supplemental security income benefits to the extent appropriate.

(7) By April 1, 2016, any contract with a managed health care system to provide services to medical assistance enrollees shall require that managed health care systems offer contracts to behavioral health organizations, mental health providers, or chemical dependency treatment providers to provide access to primary care services integrated into behavioral health clinical settings, for individuals with behavioral health and medical comorbidities.

(8) Managed health care system contracts effective on or after April 1, 2016, shall serve geographic areas that correspond to the regional service areas established in RCW 43.20A.893 (as recodified by this act).

(9) A managed health care system shall pay a nonparticipating provider that provides a service covered under this chapter or other applicable law to the system's enrollee no more than the lowest amount paid for that service under the managed health care system's contracts with similar providers in the state if the managed health care system has made good faith efforts to contract with the nonparticipating provider.

(10) For services covered under this chapter or other applicable law to medical assistance or medical care services enrollees and provided on or after August 24, 2011, nonparticipating providers must accept as payment in full the amount paid by the managed health care system under subsection (9) of this section in addition to any deductible, coinsurance, or copayment that is due from the enrollee for the service provided. An enrollee is not liable to any nonparticipating provider for covered services, except for amounts due for any deductible, coinsurance, or copayment under the terms and conditions set forth in the managed health care system contract to provide services under this section.

(11) Pursuant to federal managed care access standards, 42 C.F.R. Sec. 438, managed health care systems must maintain a network of appropriate providers that is supported by written agreements sufficient to provide adequate access to all services covered under the contract with the authority, including hospital-based physician services. The authority will monitor and periodically report on the proportion of services provided by contracted providers and nonparticipating providers, by county, for each managed health care system to ensure that managed health care systems are meeting network adequacy requirements. No later than January 1st of each year, the authority will review and report its findings to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature for the preceding state fiscal year.

(12) Payments under RCW 74.60.130 are exempt from this section.

(13) Subsections (9) through (11) of this section expire July 1, 2021.

Sec. 7018. RCW 74.09.530 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The authority is designated as the single state agency for purposes of Title XIX of the federal social security act.

(b) The amount and nature of medical assistance and the determination of eligibility of recipients for medical assistance shall be the responsibility of the authority.

(c) The authority shall establish reasonable standards of assistance and resource and income exemptions which shall be consistent with the provisions of the social security act and federal regulations for determining eligibility of individuals for medical assistance and the extent of such assistance to the extent that funds are available from the state and federal government. The authority shall not consider resources in determining continuing eligibility for recipients eligible under section 1931 of the social security act.

(d) The authority is authorized to collaborate with other state or local agencies and nonprofit organizations in carrying out its duties under this chapter or other applicable law and, to the extent appropriate, may enter into agreements with such other entities.

(2) Individuals eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510(3) shall be transitioned into coverage under that subsection immediately upon their termination from coverage under RCW 74.09.510(2)(a). The authority shall use income eligibility standards and eligibility determinations applicable to children placed in foster care. The authority shall provide information regarding basic health plan enrollment and shall offer assistance with the application and enrollment process to individuals covered under RCW 74.09.510(3) who are approaching their twenty-first birthday.

Sec. 7019. RCW 74.09.540 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to remove barriers to employment for individuals with disabilities by providing medical assistance to working individuals with disabilities through a buy-in program in accordance with section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii) of the social security act and eligibility and cost-sharing requirements established by the authority.

(2) The authority shall establish income, resource, and cost-sharing requirements for the buy-in program in accordance with federal law and any conditions or limitations specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The authority shall establish and modify eligibility and cost-sharing requirements in order to administer the program within available funds. The authority shall make every effort to coordinate benefits with employer-sponsored coverage available to the working individuals with disabilities receiving benefits under this chapter or other applicable law.

Sec. 7020. RCW 74.09.730 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In establishing Title XIX payments for inpatient hospital services:

(((1))) (a) To the extent funds are appropriated specifically for this purpose, and subject to any conditions placed on appropriations made for this purpose, the authority shall provide a disproportionate share hospital adjustment considering the following components:

(((a))) (i) A low-income care component based on a hospital's medicaid utilization rate, its low-income utilization rate, its provision of obstetric services, and other factors authorized by federal law;

(((b))) (ii) A medical indigency care component based on a hospital's services to persons who are medically indigent; and

(((c))) (iii) A state-only component, to be paid from available state funds to hospitals that do not qualify for federal payments under (((b))) (a)(ii) of this subsection, based on a hospital's services to persons who are medically indigent;

(((2))) (b) The payment methodology for disproportionate share hospitals shall be specified by the authority in regulation.

(((3))) (2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as a right or an entitlement by any hospital to any payment from the authority.

Sec. 7021. RCW 74.09.780 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 10 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal all or any part of this ((chapter [subchapter])) subchapter at any time and there shall be no vested private right of any kind against such amendment or repeal. All rights, privileges, or immunities conferred by this ((chapter [subchapter])) subchapter or any acts done pursuant thereto shall exist subject to the power of the legislature to amend or repeal this ((chapter [subchapter])) subchapter at any time.

Sec. 7022. RCW 74.64.010 and 2012 c 234 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(2) "Enrollee" means an individual who receives benefits through a medical services program.

(3) "Medical services programs" means those medical programs established under chapter 74.09 RCW or other applicable law, including medical assistance, the limited casualty program, children's health program, medical care services, and state children's health insurance program.

Sec. 7023. RCW 74.66.010 and 2012 c 241 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter:

(1)(a) "Claim" means any request or demand made for a medicaid payment under chapter 74.09 RCW or other applicable law, whether under a contract or otherwise, for money or property and whether or not a government entity has title to the money or property, that:

(i) Is presented to an officer, employee, or agent of a government entity; or

(ii) Is made to a contractor, grantee, or other recipient, if the money or property is to be spent or used on the government entity's behalf or to advance a government entity program or interest, and the government entity:

(A) Provides or has provided any portion of the money or property requested or demanded; or

(B) Will reimburse such contractor, grantee, or other recipient for any portion of the money or property which is requested or demanded.

(b) A "claim" does not include requests or demands for money or property that the government entity has paid to an individual as compensation for employment or as an income subsidy with no restrictions on that individual's use of the money or property.

(2) "Custodian" means the custodian, or any deputy custodian, designated by the attorney general.

(3) "Documentary material" includes the original or any copy of any book, record, report, memorandum, paper, communication, tabulation, chart, or other document, or data compilations stored in or accessible through computer or other information retrieval systems, together with instructions and all other materials necessary to use or interpret the data compilations, and any product of discovery.

(4) "False claims act investigation" means any inquiry conducted by any false claims act investigator for the purpose of ascertaining whether any person is or has been engaged in any violation of this chapter.

(5) "False claims act investigator" means any attorney or investigator employed by the state attorney general who is charged with the duty of enforcing or carrying into effect any provision of this chapter, or any officer or employee of the state of Washington acting under the direction and supervision of the attorney or investigator in connection with an investigation pursuant to this chapter.

(6) "Government entity" means all Washington state agencies that administer medicaid-funded programs under this title.

(7)(a) "Knowing" and "knowingly" mean that a person, with respect to information:

(i) Has actual knowledge of the information;

(ii) Acts in deliberate ignorance of the truth or falsity of the information; or

(iii) Acts in reckless disregard of the truth or falsity of the information.

(b) "Knowing" and "knowingly" do not require proof of specific intent to defraud.

(8) "Material" means having a natural tendency to influence, or be capable of influencing, the payment or receipt of money or property.

(9) "Obligation" means an established duty, whether or not fixed, arising from an express or implied contractual, grantor-grantee, or licensor-licensee relationship, from a fee-based or similar relationship, from statute or rule, or from the retention of any overpayment.

(10) "Official use" means any use that is consistent with the law, and the rules and policies of the attorney general, including use in connection with: Internal attorney general memoranda and reports; communications between the attorney general and a federal, state, or local government agency, or a contractor of a federal, state, or local government agency, undertaken in furtherance of an investigation or prosecution of a case; interviews of any qui tam relator or other witness; oral examinations; depositions; preparation for and response to civil discovery requests; introduction into the record of a case or proceeding; applications, motions, memoranda, and briefs submitted to a court or other tribunal; and communications with attorney general investigators, auditors, consultants and experts, the counsel of other parties, and arbitrators or mediators, concerning an investigation, case, or proceeding.

(11) "Person" means any natural person, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity, including any local or political subdivision of a state.

(12) "Product of discovery" includes:

(a) The original or duplicate of any deposition, interrogatory, document, thing, result of the inspection of land or other property, examination, or admission, which is obtained by any method of discovery in any judicial or administrative proceeding of an adversarial nature;

(b) Any digest, analysis, selection, compilation, or derivation of any item listed in (a) of this subsection; and

(c) Any index or other manner of access to any item listed in (a) of this subsection.

(13) "Qui tam action" is an action brought by a person under RCW 74.66.050.

(14) "Qui tam relator" or "relator" is a person who brings an action under RCW 74.66.050.

PART 8

Sec. 8001. RCW 70.02.010 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 416 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Admission" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(2) "Audit" means an assessment, evaluation, determination, or investigation of a health care provider by a person not employed by or affiliated with the provider to determine compliance with:

(a) Statutory, regulatory, fiscal, medical, or scientific standards;

(b) A private or public program of payments to a health care provider; or

(c) Requirements for licensing, accreditation, or certification.

(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4) "Commitment" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(((4))) (5) "Custody" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(((5))) (6) "Deidentified" means health information that does not identify an individual and with respect to which there is no reasonable basis to believe that the information can be used to identify an individual.

(((6))) (7) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(((7))) (8) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020 or 71.34.020, as applicable.

(((8))) (9) "Detention" or "detain" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(((9))) (10) "Directory information" means information disclosing the presence, and for the purpose of identification, the name, location within a health care facility, and the general health condition of a particular patient who is a patient in a health care facility or who is currently receiving emergency health care in a health care facility.

(((10))) (11) "Discharge" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(((11))) (12) "Evaluation and treatment facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020 or 71.34.020, as applicable.

(((12))) (13) "Federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities" means an officer of any agency or authority in the United States, a state, a tribe, a territory, or a political subdivision of a state, a tribe, or a territory who is empowered by law to: (a) Investigate or conduct an official inquiry into a potential criminal violation of law; or (b) prosecute or otherwise conduct a criminal proceeding arising from an alleged violation of law.

(((13))) (14) "General health condition" means the patient's health status described in terms of "critical," "poor," "fair," "good," "excellent," or terms denoting similar conditions.

(((14))) (15) "Health care" means any care, service, or procedure provided by a health care provider:

(a) To diagnose, treat, or maintain a patient's physical or mental condition; or

(b) That affects the structure or any function of the human body.

(((15))) (16) "Health care facility" means a hospital, clinic, nursing home, laboratory, office, or similar place where a health care provider provides health care to patients.

(((16))) (17) "Health care information" means any information, whether oral or recorded in any form or medium, that identifies or can readily be associated with the identity of a patient and directly relates to the patient's health care, including a patient's deoxyribonucleic acid and identified sequence of chemical base pairs. The term includes any required accounting of disclosures of health care information.

(((17))) (18) "Health care operations" means any of the following activities of a health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor to the extent that the activities are related to functions that make an entity a health care provider, a health care facility, or a third-party payor:

(a) Conducting: Quality assessment and improvement activities, including outcomes evaluation and development of clinical guidelines, if the obtaining of generalizable knowledge is not the primary purpose of any studies resulting from such activities; population-based activities relating to improving health or reducing health care costs, protocol development, case management and care coordination, contacting of health care providers and patients with information about treatment alternatives; and related functions that do not include treatment;

(b) Reviewing the competence or qualifications of health care professionals, evaluating practitioner and provider performance and third-party payor performance, conducting training programs in which students, trainees, or practitioners in areas of health care learn under supervision to practice or improve their skills as health care providers, training of nonhealth care professionals, accreditation, certification, licensing, or credentialing activities;

(c) Underwriting, premium rating, and other activities relating to the creation, renewal, or replacement of a contract of health insurance or health benefits, and ceding, securing, or placing a contract for reinsurance of risk relating to claims for health care, including stop-loss insurance and excess of loss insurance, if any applicable legal requirements are met;

(d) Conducting or arranging for medical review, legal services, and auditing functions, including fraud and abuse detection and compliance programs;

(e) Business planning and development, such as conducting cost-management and planning-related analyses related to managing and operating the health care facility or third-party payor, including formulary development and administration, development, or improvement of methods of payment or coverage policies; and

(f) Business management and general administrative activities of the health care facility, health care provider, or third-party payor including, but not limited to:

(i) Management activities relating to implementation of and compliance with the requirements of this chapter;

(ii) Customer service, including the provision of data analyses for policy holders, plan sponsors, or other customers, provided that health care information is not disclosed to such policy holder, plan sponsor, or customer;

(iii) Resolution of internal grievances;

(iv) The sale, transfer, merger, or consolidation of all or part of a health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor with another health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor or an entity that following such activity will become a health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor, and due diligence related to such activity; and

(v) Consistent with applicable legal requirements, creating deidentified health care information or a limited dataset for the benefit of the health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor.

(((18))) (19) "Health care provider" means a person who is licensed, certified, registered, or otherwise authorized by the law of this state to provide health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession.

(((19))) (20) "Human immunodeficiency virus" or "HIV" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.24.017.

(((20))) (21) "Imminent" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(((21))) (22) "Information and records related to mental health services" means a type of health care information that relates to all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services by a mental health service agency or mental health professional to persons who are receiving or have received services for mental illness. The term includes mental health information contained in a medical bill, registration records, as defined in RCW 71.05.020, and all other records regarding the person maintained by the department, by the authority, by ((regional support networks)) behavioral health organizations and their staff, and by treatment facilities. The term further includes documents of legal proceedings under chapter 71.05, 71.34, or 10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information. For health care information maintained by a hospital as defined in RCW 70.41.020 or a health care facility or health care provider that participates with a hospital in an organized health care arrangement defined under federal law, "information and records related to mental health services" is limited to information and records of services provided by a mental health professional or information and records of services created by a hospital-operated behavioral health program as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The term does not include psychotherapy notes.

(((22))) (23) "Information and records related to sexually transmitted diseases" means a type of health care information that relates to the identity of any person upon whom an HIV antibody test or other sexually transmitted infection test is performed, the results of such tests, and any information relating to diagnosis of or treatment for any confirmed sexually transmitted infections.

(((23))) (24) "Institutional review board" means any board, committee, or other group formally designated by an institution, or authorized under federal or state law, to review, approve the initiation of, or conduct periodic review of research programs to assure the protection of the rights and welfare of human research subjects.

(((24))) (25) "Legal counsel" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(((25))) (26) "Local public health officer" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.24.017.

(((26))) (27) "Maintain," as related to health care information, means to hold, possess, preserve, retain, store, or control that information.

(((27))) (28) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of ((social and health services)) health under chapter 71.05 RCW, whether that person works in a private or public setting.

(((28))) (29) "Mental health service agency" means a public or private agency that provides services to persons with mental disorders as defined under RCW 71.05.020 or 71.34.020 and receives funding from public sources. This includes evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in RCW 71.34.020, community mental health service delivery systems, or behavioral health programs, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW.

(((29))) (30) "Minor" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.34.020.

(((30))) (31) "Parent" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.34.020.

(((31))) (32) "Patient" means an individual who receives or has received health care. The term includes a deceased individual who has received health care.

(((32))) (33) "Payment" means:

(a) The activities undertaken by:

(i) A third-party payor to obtain premiums or to determine or fulfill its responsibility for coverage and provision of benefits by the third-party payor; or

(ii) A health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor, to obtain or provide reimbursement for the provision of health care; and

(b) The activities in (a) of this subsection that relate to the patient to whom health care is provided and that include, but are not limited to:

(i) Determinations of eligibility or coverage, including coordination of benefits or the determination of cost-sharing amounts, and adjudication or subrogation of health benefit claims;

(ii) Risk adjusting amounts due based on enrollee health status and demographic characteristics;

(iii) Billing, claims management, collection activities, obtaining payment under a contract for reinsurance, including stop-loss insurance and excess of loss insurance, and related health care data processing;

(iv) Review of health care services with respect to medical necessity, coverage under a health plan, appropriateness of care, or justification of charges;

(v) Utilization review activities, including precertification and preauthorization of services, and concurrent and retrospective review of services; and

(vi) Disclosure to consumer reporting agencies of any of the following health care information relating to collection of premiums or reimbursement:

(A) Name and address;

(B) Date of birth;

(C) Social security number;

(D) Payment history;

(E) Account number; and

(F) Name and address of the health care provider, health care facility, and/or third-party payor.

(((33))) (34) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(((34))) (35) "Professional person" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(((35))) (36) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(((36))) (37) "Psychotherapy notes" means notes recorded, in any medium, by a mental health professional documenting or analyzing the contents of conversations during a private counseling session or group, joint, or family counseling session, and that are separated from the rest of the individual's medical record. The term excludes mediation prescription and monitoring, counseling session start and stop times, the modalities and frequencies of treatment furnished, results of clinical tests, and any summary of the following items: Diagnosis, functional status, the treatment plan, symptoms, prognosis, and progress to date.

(((37))) (38) "Reasonable fee" means the charges for duplicating or searching the record, but shall not exceed sixty-five cents per page for the first thirty pages and fifty cents per page for all other pages. In addition, a clerical fee for searching and handling may be charged not to exceed fifteen dollars. These amounts shall be adjusted biennially in accordance with changes in the consumer price index, all consumers, for Seattle-Tacoma metropolitan statistical area as determined by the secretary of health. However, where editing of records by a health care provider is required by statute and is done by the provider personally, the fee may be the usual and customary charge for a basic office visit.

(((38))) (39) "Release" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(((39))) (40) "Resource management services" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(((40))) (41) "Serious violent offense" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(((41))) (42) "Sexually transmitted infection" or "sexually transmitted disease" has the same meaning as "sexually transmitted disease" in RCW 70.24.017.

(((42))) (43) "Test for a sexually transmitted disease" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.24.017.

(((43))) (44) "Third-party payor" means an insurer regulated under Title 48 RCW authorized to transact business in this state or other jurisdiction, including a health care service contractor, and health maintenance organization; or an employee welfare benefit plan, excluding fitness or wellness plans; or a state or federal health benefit program.

(((44))) (45) "Treatment" means the provision, coordination, or management of health care and related services by one or more health care providers or health care facilities, including the coordination or management of health care by a health care provider or health care facility with a third party; consultation between health care providers or health care facilities relating to a patient; or the referral of a patient for health care from one health care provider or health care facility to another.

Sec. 8002. RCW 70.02.230 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 816 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in this section, RCW 70.02.050, 71.05.445, 74.09.295, 70.02.210, 70.02.240, 70.02.250, and 70.02.260, or pursuant to a valid authorization under RCW 70.02.030, the fact of admission to a provider for mental health services and all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing mental health services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services at public or private agencies must be confidential.

(2) Information and records related to mental health services, other than those obtained through treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW, may be disclosed only:

(a) In communications between qualified professional persons to meet the requirements of chapter 71.05 RCW, in the provision of services or appropriate referrals, or in the course of guardianship proceedings if provided to a professional person:

(i) Employed by the facility;

(ii) Who has medical responsibility for the patient's care;

(iii) Who is a designated crisis responder;

(iv) Who is providing services under chapter 71.24 RCW;

(v) Who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where the person is confined or supervised; or

(vi) Who is providing evaluation, treatment, or follow-up services under chapter 10.77 RCW;

(b) When the communications regard the special needs of a patient and the necessary circumstances giving rise to such needs and the disclosure is made by a facility providing services to the operator of a facility in which the patient resides or will reside;

(c)(i) When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian, designates persons to whom information or records may be released, or if the person is a minor, when his or her parents make such a designation;

(ii) A public or private agency shall release to a person's next of kin, attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if any:

(A) The information that the person is presently a patient in the facility or that the person is seriously physically ill;

(B) A statement evaluating the mental and physical condition of the patient, and a statement of the probable duration of the patient's confinement, if such information is requested by the next of kin, attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator; and

(iii) Other information requested by the next of kin or attorney as may be necessary to decide whether or not proceedings should be instituted to appoint a guardian or conservator;

(d)(i) To the courts as necessary to the administration of chapter 71.05 RCW or to a court ordering an evaluation or treatment under chapter 10.77 RCW solely for the purpose of preventing the entry of any evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order entered under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(ii) To a court or its designee in which a motion under chapter 10.77 RCW has been made for involuntary medication of a defendant for the purpose of competency restoration.

(iii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purpose of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(e)(i) When a mental health professional or designated crisis responder is requested by a representative of a law enforcement or corrections agency, including a police officer, sheriff, community corrections officer, a municipal attorney, or prosecuting attorney to undertake an investigation or provide treatment under RCW 71.05.150, 10.31.110, or 71.05.153, the mental health professional or designated crisis responder shall, if requested to do so, advise the representative in writing of the results of the investigation including a statement of reasons for the decision to detain or release the person investigated. The written report must be submitted within seventy-two hours of the completion of the investigation or the request from the law enforcement or corrections representative, whichever occurs later.

(ii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(f) To the attorney of the detained person;

(g) To the prosecuting attorney as necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the office under RCW 71.05.330(2), 71.05.340(1)(b), and 71.05.335. The prosecutor must be provided access to records regarding the committed person's treatment and prognosis, medication, behavior problems, and other records relevant to the issue of whether treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment is in the best interest of the committed person or others. Information must be disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person and the person's counsel;

(h)(i) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when the identity of the person is known to the public or private agency, whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to have been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may designate a representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure must be made by the professional person in charge of the public or private agency or his or her designee and must include the dates of commitment, admission, discharge, or release, authorized or unauthorized absence from the agency's facility, and only any other information that is pertinent to the threat or harassment. The agency or its employees are not civilly liable for the decision to disclose or not, so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.

(ii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(i)(i) To appropriate corrections and law enforcement agencies all necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public. The mental health service agency or its employees are not civilly liable for the decision to disclose or not so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.

(ii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the health insurance portability and accountability act;

(j) To the persons designated in RCW 71.05.425 for the purposes described in those sections;

(k) Upon the death of a person. The person's next of kin, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, must be notified. Next of kin who are of legal age and competent must be notified under this section in the following order: Spouse, parents, children, brothers and sisters, and other relatives according to the degree of relation. Access to all records and information compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services to a deceased patient are governed by RCW 70.02.140;

(l) To mark headstones or otherwise memorialize patients interred at state hospital cemeteries. The department of social and health services shall make available the name, date of birth, and date of death of patients buried in state hospital cemeteries fifty years after the death of a patient;

(m) To law enforcement officers and to prosecuting attorneys as are necessary to enforce RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii). The extent of information that may be released is limited as follows:

(i) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, an official copy of any order or orders of commitment, and an official copy of any written or oral notice of ineligibility to possess a firearm that was provided to the person pursuant to RCW 9.41.047(1), must be disclosed upon request;

(ii) The law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may only release the information obtained to the person's attorney as required by court rule and to a jury or judge, if a jury is waived, that presides over any trial at which the person is charged with violating RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii);

(iii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(n) When a patient would otherwise be subject to the provisions of this section and disclosure is necessary for the protection of the patient or others due to his or her unauthorized disappearance from the facility, and his or her whereabouts is unknown, notice of the disappearance, along with relevant information, may be made to relatives, the department of corrections when the person is under the supervision of the department, and governmental law enforcement agencies designated by the physician or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner in charge of the patient or the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee;

(o) Pursuant to lawful order of a court;

(p) To qualified staff members of the department, to the authority, to the director of behavioral health organizations, to resource management services responsible for serving a patient, or to service providers designated by resource management services as necessary to determine the progress and adequacy of treatment and to determine whether the person should be transferred to a less restrictive or more appropriate treatment modality or facility;

(q) Within the mental health service agency where the patient is receiving treatment, confidential information may be disclosed to persons employed, serving in bona fide training programs, or participating in supervised volunteer programs, at the facility when it is necessary to perform their duties;

(r) Within the department and the authority as necessary to coordinate treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, alcoholism, or ((drug abuse)) substance use disorder of persons who are under the supervision of the department;

(s) Between the department of social and health services, the department of children, youth, and families, and the health care authority as necessary to coordinate treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, alcoholism, or drug abuse of persons who are under the supervision of the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families;

(t) To a licensed physician or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner who has determined that the life or health of the person is in danger and that treatment without the information and records related to mental health services could be injurious to the patient's health. Disclosure must be limited to the portions of the records necessary to meet the medical emergency;

(u)(i) Consistent with the requirements of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act, to:

(A) A health care provider who is providing care to a patient, or to whom a patient has been referred for evaluation or treatment; or

(B) Any other person who is working in a care coordinator role for a health care facility or health care provider or is under an agreement pursuant to the federal health insurance portability and accountability act with a health care facility or a health care provider and requires the information and records to assure coordinated care and treatment of that patient.

(ii) A person authorized to use or disclose information and records related to mental health services under this subsection (2)(u) must take appropriate steps to protect the information and records relating to mental health services.

(iii) Psychotherapy notes may not be released without authorization of the patient who is the subject of the request for release of information;

(v) To administrative and office support staff designated to obtain medical records for those licensed professionals listed in (u) of this subsection;

(w) To a facility that is to receive a person who is involuntarily committed under chapter 71.05 RCW, or upon transfer of the person from one evaluation and treatment facility to another. The release of records under this subsection is limited to the information and records related to mental health services required by law, a record or summary of all somatic treatments, and a discharge summary. The discharge summary may include a statement of the patient's problem, the treatment goals, the type of treatment which has been provided, and recommendation for future treatment, but may not include the patient's complete treatment record;

(x) To the person's counsel or guardian ad litem, without modification, at any time in order to prepare for involuntary commitment or recommitment proceedings, reexaminations, appeals, or other actions relating to detention, admission, commitment, or patient's rights under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(y) To staff members of the protection and advocacy agency or to staff members of a private, nonprofit corporation for the purpose of protecting and advocating the rights of persons with mental disorders or developmental disabilities. Resource management services may limit the release of information to the name, birthdate, and county of residence of the patient, information regarding whether the patient was voluntarily admitted, or involuntarily committed, the date and place of admission, placement, or commitment, the name and address of a guardian of the patient, and the date and place of the guardian's appointment. Any staff member who wishes to obtain additional information must notify the patient's resource management services in writing of the request and of the resource management services' right to object. The staff member shall send the notice by mail to the guardian's address. If the guardian does not object in writing within fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may obtain the additional information. If the guardian objects in writing within fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may not obtain the additional information;

(z) To all current treating providers of the patient with prescriptive authority who have written a prescription for the patient within the last twelve months. For purposes of coordinating health care, the department or the authority may release without written authorization of the patient, information acquired for billing and collection purposes as described in RCW 70.02.050(1)(d). The department, or the authority, if applicable, shall notify the patient that billing and collection information has been released to named providers, and provide the substance of the information released and the dates of such release. Neither the department nor the authority may ((not)) release counseling, inpatient psychiatric hospitalization, or drug and alcohol treatment information without a signed written release from the client;

(aa)(i) To the secretary of social and health services and the director of the health care authority for either program evaluation or research, or both so long as the secretary or director, where applicable, adopts rules for the conduct of the evaluation or research, or both. Such rules must include, but need not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers sign an oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency, or person) I, . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research regarding persons who have received services such that the person who received such services is identifiable.

I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information may subject me to civil liability under the provisions of state law.

/s/ . . . . . ."

(ii) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit the compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government or researchers under standards, including standards to assure maintenance of confidentiality, set forth by the secretary, or director, where applicable;

(bb) To any person if the conditions in RCW 70.02.205 are met.

(3) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the release of information contained in the information and records related to mental health services of any patient who receives treatment for chemical dependency, the department or the authority may restrict the release of the information as necessary to comply with federal law and regulations.

(4) Civil liability and immunity for the release of information about a particular person who is committed to the department of social and health services or the authority under RCW 71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(4)(c) after dismissal of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, is governed by RCW 4.24.550.

(5) The fact of admission to a provider of mental health services, as well as all records, files, evidence, findings, or orders made, prepared, collected, or maintained pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW are not admissible as evidence in any legal proceeding outside that chapter without the written authorization of the person who was the subject of the proceeding except as provided in RCW 70.02.260, in a subsequent criminal prosecution of a person committed pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(4)(c) on charges that were dismissed pursuant to chapter 10.77 RCW due to incompetency to stand trial, in a civil commitment proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW, or, in the case of a minor, a guardianship or dependency proceeding. The records and files maintained in any court proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW must be confidential and available subsequent to such proceedings only to the person who was the subject of the proceeding or his or her attorney. In addition, the court may order the subsequent release or use of such records or files only upon good cause shown if the court finds that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality are and will be maintained.

(6)(a) Except as provided in RCW 4.24.550, any person may bring an action against an individual who has willfully released confidential information or records concerning him or her in violation of the provisions of this section, for the greater of the following amounts:

(i) One thousand dollars; or

(ii) Three times the amount of actual damages sustained, if any.

(b) It is not a prerequisite to recovery under this subsection that the plaintiff suffered or was threatened with special, as contrasted with general, damages.

(c) Any person may bring an action to enjoin the release of confidential information or records concerning him or her or his or her ward, in violation of the provisions of this section, and may in the same action seek damages as provided in this subsection.

(d) The court may award to the plaintiff, should he or she prevail in any action authorized by this subsection, reasonable attorney fees in addition to those otherwise provided by law.

(e) If an action is brought under this subsection, no action may be brought under RCW 70.02.170.

Sec. 8003. RCW 70.02.240 and 2013 c 200 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The fact of admission and all information and records related to mental health services obtained through treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW is confidential, except as authorized in RCW 70.02.050, 70.02.210, 70.02.230, 70.02.250, and 70.02.260. Such confidential information may be disclosed only:

(1) In communications between mental health professionals to meet the requirements of chapter 71.34 RCW, in the provision of services to the minor, or in making appropriate referrals;

(2) In the course of guardianship or dependency proceedings;

(3) To the minor, the minor's parent, and the minor's attorney, subject to RCW 13.50.100;

(4) To the courts as necessary to administer chapter 71.34 RCW;

(5) To law enforcement officers or public health officers as necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their office. However, only the fact and date of admission, and the date of discharge, the name and address of the treatment provider, if any, and the last known address must be disclosed upon request;

(6) To law enforcement officers, public health officers, relatives, and other governmental law enforcement agencies, if a minor has escaped from custody, disappeared from an evaluation and treatment facility, violated conditions of a less restrictive treatment order, or failed to return from an authorized leave, and then only such information as may be necessary to provide for public safety or to assist in the apprehension of the minor. The officers are obligated to keep the information confidential in accordance with this chapter;

(7) To the secretary of social and health services and the director of the health care authority for assistance in data collection and program evaluation or research so long as the secretary or director, where applicable, adopts rules for the conduct of such evaluation and research. The rules must include, but need not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers sign an oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency, or person) I, . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research regarding minors who have received services in a manner such that the minor is identifiable.

I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information may subject me to civil liability under state law.

/s/ . . . . . . ";

(8) To appropriate law enforcement agencies, upon request, all necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public. The mental health service agency or its employees are not civilly liable for the decision to disclose or not, so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence;

(9) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when the identity of the person is known to the public or private agency, whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to have been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may designate a representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure must be made by the professional person in charge of the public or private agency or his or her designee and must include the dates of admission, discharge, authorized or unauthorized absence from the agency's facility, and only any other information that is pertinent to the threat or harassment. The agency or its employees are not civilly liable for the decision to disclose or not, so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence;

(10) To a minor's next of kin, attorney, guardian, or conservator, if any, the information that the minor is presently in the facility or that the minor is seriously physically ill and a statement evaluating the mental and physical condition of the minor as well as a statement of the probable duration of the minor's confinement;

(11) Upon the death of a minor, to the minor's next of kin;

(12) To a facility in which the minor resides or will reside;

(13) To law enforcement officers and to prosecuting attorneys as are necessary to enforce RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(((ii))) (iii). The extent of information that may be released is limited as follows:

(a) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, an official copy of any order or orders of commitment, and an official copy of any written or oral notice of ineligibility to possess a firearm that was provided to the person pursuant to RCW 9.41.047(1), must be disclosed upon request;

(b) The law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may only release the information obtained to the person's attorney as required by court rule and to a jury or judge, if a jury is waived, that presides over any trial at which the person is charged with violating RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(((ii))) (iii);

(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(14) This section may not be construed to prohibit the compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government or researchers under standards, including standards to assure maintenance of confidentiality, set forth by the director of the health care authority or the secretary of the department of social and health services, where applicable. The fact of admission and all information obtained pursuant to chapter 71.34 RCW are not admissible as evidence in any legal proceeding outside chapter 71.34 RCW, except guardianship or dependency, without the written consent of the minor or the minor's parent;

(15) For the purpose of a correctional facility participating in the postinstitutional medical assistance system supporting the expedited medical determinations and medical suspensions as provided in RCW 74.09.555 and 74.09.295;

(16) Pursuant to a lawful order of a court.

Sec. 8004. RCW 70.02.250 and 2014 c 225 s 72 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Information and records related to mental health services delivered to a person subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW must be released, upon request, by a mental health service agency to department of corrections personnel for whom the information is necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their office. The information must be provided only for the purpose of completing presentence investigations, supervision of an incarcerated person, planning for and provision of supervision of a person, or assessment of a person's risk to the community. The request must be in writing and may not require the consent of the subject of the records.

(2) The information to be released to the department of corrections must include all relevant records and reports, as defined by rule, necessary for the department of corrections to carry out its duties, including those records and reports identified in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The ((department)) authority shall, subject to available resources, electronically, or by the most cost-effective means available, provide the department of corrections with the names, last dates of services, and addresses of specific behavioral health organizations and mental health service agencies that delivered mental health services to a person subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW pursuant to an agreement between the authority and the department((s)) of corrections.

(4) The ((department and the department of corrections)) authority, in consultation with the department, the department of corrections, behavioral health organizations, mental health service agencies as defined in RCW 70.02.010, mental health consumers, and advocates for persons with mental illness, shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section related to the type and scope of information to be released. These rules must:

(a) Enhance and facilitate the ability of the department of corrections to carry out its responsibility of planning and ensuring community protection with respect to persons subject to sentencing under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW, including accessing and releasing or disclosing information of persons who received mental health services as a minor; and

(b) Establish requirements for the notification of persons under the supervision of the department of corrections regarding the provisions of this section.

(5) The information received by the department of corrections under this section must remain confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure outlined in chapter 71.34 RCW, except as provided in RCW 72.09.585.

(6) No mental health service agency or individual employed by a mental health service agency may be held responsible for information released to or used by the department of corrections under the provisions of this section or rules adopted under this section.

(7) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the release of information contained in the treatment records of any patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug dependency, the release of the information may be restricted as necessary to comply with federal law and regulations.

(8) This section does not modify the terms and conditions of disclosure of information related to sexually transmitted diseases under this chapter.

Sec. 8005. RCW 70.02.260 and 2013 c 200 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A mental health service agency shall release to the persons authorized under subsection (2) of this section, upon request:

(i) The fact, place, and date of an involuntary commitment, the fact and date of discharge or release, and the last known address of a person who has been committed under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(ii) Information and records related to mental health services, in the format determined under subsection (9) of this section, concerning a person who:

(A) Is currently committed to the custody or supervision of the department of corrections or the indeterminate sentence review board under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW;

(B) Has been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of a serious violent offense; or

(C) Was charged with a serious violent offense and the charges were dismissed under RCW 10.77.086.

(b) Legal counsel may release such information to the persons authorized under subsection (2) of this section on behalf of the mental health service agency, so long as nothing in this subsection requires the disclosure of attorney work product or attorney-client privileged information.

(2) The information subject to release under subsection (1) of this section must be released to law enforcement officers, personnel of a county or city jail, designated mental health professionals or designated crisis responders, as appropriate, public health officers, therapeutic court personnel as defined in RCW 71.05.020, or personnel of the department of corrections, including the indeterminate sentence review board and personnel assigned to perform board-related duties, when such information is requested during the course of business and for the purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of the requesting person's office. No mental health service agency or person employed by a mental health service agency, or its legal counsel, may be liable for information released to or used under the provisions of this section or rules adopted under this section except under RCW 71.05.680.

(3) A person who requests information under subsection (1)(a)(ii) of this section must comply with the following restrictions:

(a) Information must be requested only for the purposes permitted by this subsection and for the purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of the requesting person's office. Appropriate purposes for requesting information under this section include:

(i) Completing presentence investigations or risk assessment reports;

(ii) Assessing a person's risk to the community;

(iii) Assessing a person's risk of harm to self or others when confined in a city or county jail;

(iv) Planning for and provision of supervision of an offender, including decisions related to sanctions for violations of conditions of community supervision; and

(v) Responding to an offender's failure to report for department of corrections supervision;

(b) Information may not be requested under this section unless the requesting person has reasonable suspicion that the individual who is the subject of the information:

(i) Has engaged in activity indicating that a crime or a violation of community custody or parole has been committed or, based upon his or her current or recent past behavior, is likely to be committed in the near future; or

(ii) Is exhibiting signs of a deterioration in mental functioning which may make the individual appropriate for civil commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW; and

(c) Any information received under this section must be held confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure outlined in this chapter, except:

(i) The information may be shared with other persons who have the right to request similar information under subsection (2) of this section, solely for the purpose of coordinating activities related to the individual who is the subject of the information in a manner consistent with the official responsibilities of the persons involved;

(ii) The information may be shared with a prosecuting attorney acting in an advisory capacity for a person who receives information under this section. A prosecuting attorney under this subsection is subject to the same restrictions and confidentiality limitations as the person who requested the information; and

(iii) As provided in RCW 72.09.585.

(4) A request for information and records related to mental health services under this section does not require the consent of the subject of the records. The request must be provided in writing, except to the extent authorized in subsection (5) of this section. A written request may include requests made by email or facsimile so long as the requesting person is clearly identified. The request must specify the information being requested.

(5) In the event of an emergency situation that poses a significant risk to the public or the offender, a mental health service agency, or its legal counsel, shall release information related to mental health services delivered to the offender and, if known, information regarding where the offender is likely to be found to the department of corrections or law enforcement upon request. The initial request may be written or oral. All oral requests must be subsequently confirmed in writing. Information released in response to an oral request is limited to a statement as to whether the offender is or is not being treated by the mental health service agency and the address or information about the location or whereabouts of the offender.

(6) Disclosure under this section to state or local law enforcement authorities is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act.

(7) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the release of information contained in the treatment records of any patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug dependency, the release of the information may be restricted as necessary to comply with federal law and regulations.

(8) This section does not modify the terms and conditions of disclosure of information related to sexually transmitted diseases under this chapter.

(9) In collaboration with interested organizations, the ((department)) authority shall develop a standard form for requests for information related to mental health services made under this section and a standard format for information provided in response to the requests. Consistent with the goals of the health information privacy provisions of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act, in developing the standard form for responsive information, the ((department)) authority shall design the form in such a way that the information disclosed is limited to the minimum necessary to serve the purpose for which the information is requested.

Sec. 8006. RCW 70.02.340 and 2014 c 220 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department of social and health services)) authority shall adopt rules related to the disclosure of information and records related to mental health services ((in this chapter)).

Sec. 8007. RCW 70.02.350 and 2013 c 200 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any other information required to be released under this chapter, the department of social and health services ((is)) and the authority are authorized, pursuant to RCW 4.24.550, to release relevant information that is necessary to protect the public, concerning a specific person committed under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c) following dismissal of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

Sec. 8008. RCW 42.56.270 and 2017 c 317 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:

(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private gain and public loss;

(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;

(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters 43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects under RCW 43.23.035;

(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by businesses or individuals during application for loans or program services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and 43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or program services provided by any local agency;

(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;

(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state investment board by any person when the information relates to the investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers of this information;

(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;

(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under chapter 70.95H RCW;

(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;

(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), marijuana producer, processor, or retailer license, liquor license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;

(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;

(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b) data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c) determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by any vendor to the department of social and health services or the health care authority for purposes of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;

(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of commerce:

(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person and provided to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW 43.330.050(8); and

(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person and provided to the department of commerce or the office of the governor in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's business and until a siting decision is made, identifying information of any person supplying information under this subsection and the locations being considered for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business;

(b) When developed by the department of commerce based on information as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, any work product is not exempt from disclosure;

(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;

(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to the department of commerce from a person connected with siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's business, information described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be available to the public under this chapter;

(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter 70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;

(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this information;

(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or 19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel licensees;

(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;

(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the application or issuance of a permit;

(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;

(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to providers of this information;

(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328 that can be identified to a particular business;

(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained by the University of Washington, other than information the university is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to result in private loss to the providers of this information;

(21) Market share data submitted by a manufacturer under RCW 70.95N.190(4);

(22) Financial information supplied to the department of financial institutions or to a portal under RCW 21.20.883, when filed by or on behalf of an issuer of securities for the purpose of obtaining the exemption from state securities registration for small securities offerings provided under RCW 21.20.880 or when filed by or on behalf of an investor for the purpose of purchasing such securities;

(23) Unaggregated or individual notices of a transfer of crude oil that is financial, proprietary, or commercial information, submitted to the department of ecology pursuant to RCW 90.56.565(1)(a), and that is in the possession of the department of ecology or any entity with which the department of ecology has shared the notice pursuant to RCW 90.56.565;

(24) Financial institution and retirement account information, and building security plan information, supplied to the liquor and cannabis board pursuant to RCW 69.50.325, 69.50.331, 69.50.342, and 69.50.345, when filed by or on behalf of a licensee or prospective licensee for the purpose of obtaining, maintaining, or renewing a license to produce, process, transport, or sell marijuana as allowed under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(25) Marijuana transport information, vehicle and driver identification data, and account numbers or unique access identifiers issued to private entities for traceability system access, submitted by an individual or business to the liquor and cannabis board under the requirements of RCW 69.50.325, 69.50.331, 69.50.342, and 69.50.345 for the purpose of marijuana product traceability. Disclosure to local, state, and federal officials is not considered public disclosure for purposes of this section;

(26) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained by the retirement board of any city that is responsible for the management of an employees' retirement system pursuant to the authority of chapter 35.39 RCW, when the information relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in loss to the retirement fund or to result in private loss to the providers of this information except that (a) the names and commitment amounts of the private funds in which retirement funds are invested and (b) the aggregate quarterly performance results for a retirement fund's portfolio of investments in such funds are subject to disclosure;

(27) Proprietary financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research information and data submitted to or obtained by the liquor and cannabis board in applications for marijuana research licenses under RCW 69.50.372, or in reports submitted by marijuana research licensees in accordance with rules adopted by the liquor and cannabis board under RCW 69.50.372; and

(28) Trade secrets, technology, proprietary information, and financial considerations contained in any agreements or contracts, entered into by a licensed marijuana business under RCW 69.50.395, which may be submitted to or obtained by the state liquor and cannabis board.

Sec. 8009. RCW 43.70.080 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

The powers and duties of the department of social and health services and the secretary of social and health services under the following statutes are hereby transferred to the department of health and the secretary of health: Chapters 16.70, ((18.20,)) 18.46, 18.71, 18.73, 18.76, 69.30, 70.28, 70.30, ((70.32, 70.33,)) 70.50, 70.58, 70.62, 70.83, ((70.83B,)) 70.90, 70.98, 70.104, 70.116, 70.118, 70.119, 70.119A, 70.121, 70.127, 70.142, and 80.50 RCW. More specifically, the following programs and services presently administered by the department of social and health services are hereby transferred to the department of health:

(1) Personal health and protection programs and related management and support services, including, but not limited to: Immunizations; tuberculosis; sexually transmitted diseases; AIDS; diabetes control; primary health care; cardiovascular risk reduction; kidney disease; regional genetic services; newborn metabolic screening; sentinel birth defects; cytogenetics; communicable disease epidemiology; and chronic disease epidemiology;

(2) Environmental health protection services and related management and support services, including, but not limited to: Radiation, including X-ray control, radioactive materials, uranium mills, low-level waste, emergency response and reactor safety, and environmental radiation protection; drinking water; toxic substances; on-site sewage; recreational water contact facilities; food services sanitation; shellfish; and general environmental health services, including schools, vectors, parks, and camps;

(3) Public health laboratory;

(4) Public health support services, including, but not limited to: Vital records; health data; local public health services support; and health education and information;

(5) Licensing and certification services including, but not limited to: Behavioral health agencies, agencies providing problem and pathological gambling treatment, health and personal care facility survey, construction review, emergency medical services, laboratory quality assurance, and accommodations surveys; and

(6) Effective January 1, 1991, parent and child health services and related management support services, including, but not limited to: Maternal and infant health; child health; parental health; nutrition; ((handicapped children's)) services for children with disabilities; family planning; adolescent pregnancy services; high priority infant tracking; early intervention; parenting education; prenatal regionalization; and power and duties under RCW 43.20A.635. The director of the office of financial management may recommend to the legislature a delay in this transfer, if it is determined that this time frame is not adequate.

Sec. 8010. RCW 43.59.030 and 2016 c 206 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The governor shall be assisted in his or her duties and responsibilities by the Washington state traffic safety commission. The Washington traffic safety commission shall be composed of the governor as chair, the superintendent of public instruction, the director of licensing, the secretary of transportation, the chief of the state patrol, the secretary of health, the ((secretary of social and health services)) director of the health care authority, a representative of the association of Washington cities to be appointed by the governor, a member of the association of counties to be appointed by the governor, and a representative of the judiciary to be appointed by the governor. Appointments to any vacancies among appointee members shall be as in the case of original appointment.

The governor may designate an employee of the governor's office familiar with the traffic safety commission to act on behalf of the governor during the absence of the governor at one or more of the meetings of the commission. The vote of the designee shall have the same effect as if cast by the governor if the designation is in writing and is presented to the person presiding at the meetings included within the designation.

The governor may designate a member, other than the governor's designee, to preside during the governor's absence.

Sec. 8011. RCW 48.21.180 and 2003 c 248 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Each group disability insurance contract which is delivered or issued for delivery or renewed, on or after January 1, 1988, and which insures for hospital or medical care must contain provisions providing benefits for the treatment of chemical dependency rendered to the insured by a provider which is an "approved substance use disorder treatment program" under RCW 70.96A.020(((3))) (2).

Sec. 8012. RCW 48.44.240 and 2005 c 223 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

Each group contract for health care services that is delivered or issued for delivery or renewed, on or after January 1, 1988, must contain provisions providing benefits for the treatment of chemical dependency rendered to covered persons by a provider that is an "approved substance use disorder treatment program" under RCW 70.96A.020(((3))) (2).

Sec. 8013. RCW 48.46.350 and 2003 c 248 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

Each group agreement for health care services that is delivered or issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1, 1988, must contain provisions providing benefits for the treatment of chemical dependency rendered to covered persons by a provider which is an "approved substance use disorder treatment program" under RCW 70.96A.020(((3))) (2). However, this section does not apply to any agreement written as supplemental coverage to any federal or state programs of health care including, but not limited to, Title XVIII health insurance for the aged, which is commonly referred to as Medicare, Parts A&B, and amendments thereto. Treatment must be covered under the chemical dependency coverage if treatment is rendered by the health maintenance organization or if the health maintenance organization refers the enrolled participant or the enrolled participant's dependents to a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW, or to a qualified counselor employed by an approved substance use disorder treatment program described in RCW 70.96A.020(((3))) (2). In all cases, a health maintenance organization retains the right to diagnose the presence of chemical dependency and select the modality of treatment that best serves the interest of the health maintenance organization's enrolled participant, or the enrolled participant's covered dependent.

Sec. 8014. RCW 69.50.540 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 979 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature must annually appropriate moneys in the dedicated marijuana account created in RCW 69.50.530 as follows:

(1) For the purposes listed in this subsection (1), the legislature must appropriate to the respective agencies amounts sufficient to make the following expenditures on a quarterly basis:

(a) Beginning July 1, ((2015)) 2017, one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars to the ((department of social and health services)) health care authority to design and administer the Washington state healthy youth survey, analyze the collected data, and produce reports, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, department of health, department of commerce, family policy council, and state liquor and cannabis board. The survey must be conducted at least every two years and include questions regarding, but not necessarily limited to, academic achievement, age at time of substance use initiation, antisocial behavior of friends, attitudes toward antisocial behavior, attitudes toward substance use, laws and community norms regarding antisocial behavior, family conflict, family management, parental attitudes toward substance use, peer rewarding of antisocial behavior, perceived risk of substance use, and rebelliousness. Funds disbursed under this subsection may be used to expand administration of the healthy youth survey to student populations attending institutions of higher education in Washington;

(b) Beginning July 1, ((2015)) 2017, fifty thousand dollars to the ((department of social and health services)) health care authority for the purpose of contracting with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct the cost-benefit evaluation and produce the reports described in RCW 69.50.550. This appropriation ends after production of the final report required by RCW 69.50.550;

(c) Beginning July 1, ((2015)) 2017, five thousand dollars to the University of Washington alcohol and drug abuse institute for the creation, maintenance, and timely updating of web-based public education materials providing medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use;

(d)(i) An amount not less than one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the state liquor and cannabis board for administration of this chapter as appropriated in the omnibus appropriations act; and

(ii) Three hundred fifty-one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars for fiscal year 2018 and three hundred fifty-one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars for fiscal year 2019 to the health professions account established under RCW 43.70.320 for the development and administration of the marijuana authorization database by the department of health. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium;

(e) Twenty-three thousand seven hundred fifty dollars to the department of enterprise services provided solely for the state building code council established under RCW 19.27.070, to develop and adopt fire and building code provisions related to marijuana processing and extraction facilities. The distribution under this subsection (1)(e) is for fiscal year 2016 only;

(2) From the amounts in the dedicated marijuana account after appropriation of the amounts identified in subsection (1) of this section, the legislature must appropriate for the purposes listed in this subsection (2) as follows:

(a)(i) Up to fifteen percent to the ((department of social and health services division of behavioral health and recovery)) health care authority for the development, implementation, maintenance, and evaluation of programs and practices aimed at the prevention or reduction of maladaptive substance use, substance use disorder, substance abuse or substance dependence, as these terms are defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, among middle school and high school-age students, whether as an explicit goal of a given program or practice or as a consistently corresponding effect of its implementation, mental health services for children and youth, and services for pregnant and parenting women; PROVIDED, That:

(A) Of the funds appropriated under (a)(i) of this subsection for new programs and new services, at least eighty-five percent must be directed to evidence-based or research-based programs and practices that produce objectively measurable results and, by September 1, 2020, are cost-beneficial; and

(B) Up to fifteen percent of the funds appropriated under (a)(i) of this subsection for new programs and new services may be directed to proven and tested practices, emerging best practices, or promising practices.

(ii) In deciding which programs and practices to fund, the ((secretary of the department of social and health services)) director of the health care authority must consult, at least annually, with the University of Washington's social development research group and the University of Washington's alcohol and drug abuse institute.

(iii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of twenty-seven million seven hundred eighty-six thousand dollars, and for each subsequent fiscal year thereafter, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of twenty-five million five hundred thirty-six thousand dollars under this subsection (2)(a);

(b)(i) Up to ten percent to the department of health for the following, subject to (b)(ii) of this subsection (2):

(A) Creation, implementation, operation, and management of a marijuana education and public health program that contains the following:

(I) A marijuana use public health hotline that provides referrals to substance abuse treatment providers, utilizes evidence-based or research-based public health approaches to minimizing the harms associated with marijuana use, and does not solely advocate an abstinence-only approach;

(II) A grants program for local health departments or other local community agencies that supports development and implementation of coordinated intervention strategies for the prevention and reduction of marijuana use by youth; and

(III) Media-based education campaigns across television, internet, radio, print, and out-of-home advertising, separately targeting youth and adults, that provide medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use;

(B) The Washington poison control center; and

(C) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the funds appropriated under this subsection (2)(b) may be used for prevention activities that target youth and populations with a high incidence of tobacco use.

(ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of seven million five hundred thousand dollars and for each subsequent fiscal year thereafter, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of nine million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars under this subsection (2)(b);

(c)(i) Up to six-tenths of one percent to the University of Washington and four-tenths of one percent to Washington State University for research on the short and long-term effects of marijuana use, to include but not be limited to formal and informal methods for estimating and measuring intoxication and impairment, and for the dissemination of such research.

(ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of two hundred seven thousand dollars and for each subsequent fiscal year, except for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of one million twenty-one thousand dollars to the University of Washington. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of one hundred thirty-eight thousand dollars and for each subsequent fiscal year thereafter, except for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, a minimum of six hundred eighty-one thousand dollars to Washington State University under this subsection (2)(c). It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium;

(d) Fifty percent to the state basic health plan trust account to be administered by the Washington basic health plan administrator and used as provided under chapter 70.47 RCW;

(e) Five percent to the Washington state health care authority to be expended exclusively through contracts with community health centers to provide primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity health care services as provided under RCW 41.05.220;

(f)(i) Up to three-tenths of one percent to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to fund grants to building bridges programs under chapter 28A.175 RCW.

(ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, and each subsequent fiscal year, the legislature must appropriate a minimum of five hundred eleven thousand dollars to the office of the superintendent of public instruction under this subsection (2)(f); and

(g) At the end of each fiscal year, the treasurer must transfer any amounts in the dedicated marijuana account that are not appropriated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and this subsection (2) into the general fund, except as provided in (g)(i) of this subsection (2).

(i) Beginning in fiscal year 2018, if marijuana excise tax collections deposited into the general fund in the prior fiscal year exceed twenty-five million dollars, then each fiscal year the legislature must appropriate an amount equal to thirty percent of all marijuana excise taxes deposited into the general fund the prior fiscal year to the treasurer for distribution to counties, cities, and towns as follows:

(A) Thirty percent must be distributed to counties, cities, and towns where licensed marijuana retailers are physically located. Each jurisdiction must receive a share of the revenue distribution under this subsection (2)(g)(i)(A) based on the proportional share of the total revenues generated in the individual jurisdiction from the taxes collected under RCW 69.50.535, from licensed marijuana retailers physically located in each jurisdiction. For purposes of this subsection (2)(g)(i)(A), one hundred percent of the proportional amount attributed to a retailer physically located in a city or town must be distributed to the city or town.

(B) Seventy percent must be distributed to counties, cities, and towns ratably on a per capita basis. Counties must receive sixty percent of the distribution, which must be disbursed based on each county's total proportional population. Funds may only be distributed to jurisdictions that do not prohibit the siting of any state licensed marijuana producer, processor, or retailer.

(ii) Distribution amounts allocated to each county, city, and town must be distributed in four installments by the last day of each fiscal quarter.

(iii) By September 15th of each year, the state liquor and cannabis board must provide the state treasurer the annual distribution amount, if any, for each county and city as determined in (g)(i) of this subsection (2).

(iv) The total share of marijuana excise tax revenues distributed to counties and cities in (g)(i) of this subsection (2) may not exceed six million dollars in fiscal years 2018 and 2019 and twenty million dollars per fiscal year thereafter. However, if the February 2018 forecast of state revenues for the general fund in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium exceeds the amount estimated in the June 2017 revenue forecast by over eighteen million dollars after adjusting for changes directly related to legislation adopted in the 2017 legislative session, the total share of marijuana excise tax revenue distributed to counties and cities in (g)(i) of this subsection (2) may not exceed fifteen million dollars in fiscal years 2018 and 2019. It is the intent of the legislature that the policy for the maximum distributions in the subsequent fiscal biennia will be no more than (($6)) six million dollars per fiscal year.

For the purposes of this section, "marijuana products" means "useable marijuana," "marijuana concentrates," and "marijuana-infused products" as those terms are defined in RCW 69.50.101.

PART 9

Sec. 9001. RCW 2.30.020 and 2015 c 291 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice" means a program or practice that, based on statistical analyses or a well- established theory of change, shows potential for meeting the evidence-based or research-based criteria, which may include the use of a program that is evidence-based for outcomes other than those listed in this section.

(2) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that: (a) Has been tested in heterogeneous or intended populations with multiple randomized, or statistically controlled evaluations, or both; or one large multiple site randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review demonstrates sustained improvements in at least one outcome; or (b) may be implemented with a set of procedures to allow successful replication in Washington and, when possible, is determined to be cost-beneficial.

(3) "Government authority" means prosecutor or other representative initiating action leading to a proceeding in therapeutic court.

(4) "Participant" means an accused person, offender, or respondent in the judicial proceeding.

(5) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has been tested with a single randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, demonstrating sustained desirable outcomes; or where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review supports sustained outcomes as described in this subsection but does not meet the full criteria for evidence-based.

(6) "Specialty court" and "therapeutic court" both mean a court utilizing a program or programs structured to achieve both a reduction in recidivism and an increase in the likelihood of rehabilitation, or to reduce child abuse and neglect, out-of-home placements of children, termination of parental rights, and substance abuse and mental health symptoms among parents or guardians and their children through continuous and intense judicially supervised treatment and the appropriate use of services, sanctions, and incentives.

(7) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a therapeutic court including, but not limited to: Court and clerk personnel with therapeutic court duties, prosecuting attorneys, the attorney general or his or her representatives, defense counsel, monitoring personnel, and others acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties.

(8) "Trial court" means a superior court authorized under this title ((2 RCW)) or a district or municipal court authorized under Title 3 or 35 RCW.

Sec. 9002. RCW 2.30.030 and 2015 c 291 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every trial and juvenile court in the state of Washington is authorized and encouraged to establish and operate therapeutic courts. Therapeutic courts, in conjunction with the government authority and subject matter experts specific to the focus of the therapeutic court, develop and process cases in ways that depart from traditional judicial processes to allow defendants or respondents the opportunity to obtain treatment services to address particular issues that may have contributed to the conduct that led to their arrest or involvement in the child welfare system in exchange for resolution of the case or charges. In criminal cases, the consent of the prosecutor is required.

(2) While a therapeutic court judge retains the discretion to decline to accept a case into the therapeutic court, and while a therapeutic court retains discretion to establish processes and determine eligibility for admission to the therapeutic court process unique to their community and jurisdiction, the effectiveness and credibility of any therapeutic court will be enhanced when the court implements evidence-based practices, research-based practices, emerging best practices, or promising practices that have been identified and accepted at the state and national levels. Promising practices, emerging best practices, and/or research-based programs are authorized where determined by the court to be appropriate. As practices evolve, the trial court shall regularly assess the effectiveness of its program and the methods by which it implements and adopts new best practices.

(3) Except under special findings by the court, the following individuals are not eligible for participation in therapeutic courts:

(a) Individuals who are currently charged or who have been previously convicted of a serious violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) Individuals who are currently charged with an offense alleging intentional discharge, threat to discharge, or attempt to discharge a firearm in furtherance of the offense;

(c) Individuals who are currently charged with or who have been previously convicted of vehicular homicide or an equivalent out-of- state offense; or

(d) Individuals who are currently charged with or who have been previously convicted of: An offense alleging substantial bodily harm or great bodily harm as defined in RCW 9A.04.110, or death of another person.

(4) Any jurisdiction establishing a therapeutic court shall endeavor to incorporate the therapeutic court principles of best practices as recognized by state and national therapeutic court organizations in structuring a particular program, which may include:

(a) Determining the population;

(b) Performing a clinical assessment;

(c) Developing the treatment plan;

(d) Monitoring the participant, including any appropriate testing;

(e) Forging agency, organization, and community partnerships;

(f) Taking a judicial leadership role;

(g) Developing case management strategies;

(h) Addressing transportation, housing, and subsistence issues;

(i) Evaluating the program;

(j) Ensuring a sustainable program.

(5) Upon a showing of indigence under RCW 10.101.010, fees may be reduced or waived.

(6) The ((department of social and health services)) health care authority shall furnish services to therapeutic courts addressing dependency matters where substance abuse or mental health are an issue unless the court contracts with providers outside of the ((department)) health care authority.

(7) Any jurisdiction that has established more than one therapeutic court under this chapter may combine the functions of these courts into a single therapeutic court.

(8) Nothing in this section prohibits a district or municipal court from ordering treatment or other conditions of sentence or probation following a conviction, without the consent of either the prosecutor or defendant.

(9) No therapeutic or specialty court may be established specifically for the purpose of applying foreign law, including foreign criminal, civil, or religious law, that is otherwise not required by treaty.

(10) No therapeutic or specialty court established by court rule shall enforce a foreign law, if doing so would violate a right guaranteed by the Constitution of this state or of the United States.

Sec. 9003. RCW 9.41.300 and 2011 c 221 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to enter the following places when he or she knowingly possesses or knowingly has under his or her control a weapon:

(a) The restricted access areas of a jail, or of a law enforcement facility, or any place used for the confinement of a person (i) arrested for, charged with, or convicted of an offense, (ii) held for extradition or as a material witness, or (iii) otherwise confined pursuant to an order of a court, except an order under chapter 13.32A or 13.34 RCW. Restricted access areas do not include common areas of egress or ingress open to the general public;

(b) Those areas in any building which are used in connection with court proceedings, including courtrooms, jury rooms, judge's chambers, offices and areas used to conduct court business, waiting areas, and corridors adjacent to areas used in connection with court proceedings. The restricted areas do not include common areas of ingress and egress to the building that is used in connection with court proceedings, when it is possible to protect court areas without restricting ingress and egress to the building. The restricted areas shall be the minimum necessary to fulfill the objective of this subsection (1)(b).

For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), "weapon" means any firearm, explosive as defined in RCW 70.74.010, or any weapon of the kind usually known as slung shot, sand club, or metal knuckles, or any knife, dagger, dirk, or other similar weapon that is capable of causing death or bodily injury and is commonly used with the intent to cause death or bodily injury.

In addition, the local legislative authority shall provide either a stationary locked box sufficient in size for pistols and key to a weapon owner for weapon storage, or shall designate an official to receive weapons for safekeeping, during the owner's visit to restricted areas of the building. The locked box or designated official shall be located within the same building used in connection with court proceedings. The local legislative authority shall be liable for any negligence causing damage to or loss of a weapon either placed in a locked box or left with an official during the owner's visit to restricted areas of the building.

The local judicial authority shall designate and clearly mark those areas where weapons are prohibited, and shall post notices at each entrance to the building of the prohibition against weapons in the restricted areas;

(c) The restricted access areas of a public mental health facility licensed or certified by the department of ((social and health services)) health for inpatient hospital care and state institutions for the care of the mentally ill, excluding those facilities solely for evaluation and treatment. Restricted access areas do not include common areas of egress and ingress open to the general public;

(d) That portion of an establishment classified by the state liquor ((control)) and cannabis board as off-limits to persons under twenty-one years of age; or

(e) The restricted access areas of a commercial service airport designated in the airport security plan approved by the federal transportation security administration, including passenger screening checkpoints at or beyond the point at which a passenger initiates the screening process. These areas do not include airport drives, general parking areas and walkways, and shops and areas of the terminal that are outside the screening checkpoints and that are normally open to unscreened passengers or visitors to the airport. Any restricted access area shall be clearly indicated by prominent signs indicating that firearms and other weapons are prohibited in the area.

(2) Cities, towns, counties, and other municipalities may enact laws and ordinances:

(a) Restricting the discharge of firearms in any portion of their respective jurisdictions where there is a reasonable likelihood that humans, domestic animals, or property will be jeopardized. Such laws and ordinances shall not abridge the right of the individual guaranteed by Article I, section 24 of the state Constitution to bear arms in defense of self or others; and

(b) Restricting the possession of firearms in any stadium or convention center, operated by a city, town, county, or other municipality, except that such restrictions shall not apply to:

(i) Any pistol in the possession of a person licensed under RCW 9.41.070 or exempt from the licensing requirement by RCW 9.41.060; or

(ii) Any showing, demonstration, or lecture involving the exhibition of firearms.

(3)(a) Cities, towns, and counties may enact ordinances restricting the areas in their respective jurisdictions in which firearms may be sold, but, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a business selling firearms may not be treated more restrictively than other businesses located within the same zone. An ordinance requiring the cessation of business within a zone shall not have a shorter grandfather period for businesses selling firearms than for any other businesses within the zone.

(b) Cities, towns, and counties may restrict the location of a business selling firearms to not less than five hundred feet from primary or secondary school grounds, if the business has a storefront, has hours during which it is open for business, and posts advertisements or signs observable to passersby that firearms are available for sale. A business selling firearms that exists as of the date a restriction is enacted under this subsection (3)(b) shall be grandfathered according to existing law.

(4) Violations of local ordinances adopted under subsection (2) of this section must have the same penalty as provided for by state law.

(5) The perimeter of the premises of any specific location covered by subsection (1) of this section shall be posted at reasonable intervals to alert the public as to the existence of any law restricting the possession of firearms on the premises.

(6) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:

(a) A person engaged in military activities sponsored by the federal or state governments, while engaged in official duties;

(b) Law enforcement personnel, except that subsection (1)(b) of this section does apply to a law enforcement officer who is present at a courthouse building as a party to an action under chapter 10.14, 10.99, or 26.50 RCW, or an action under Title 26 RCW where any party has alleged the existence of domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010; or

(c) Security personnel while engaged in official duties.

(7) Subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), and (e) of this section does not apply to correctional personnel or community corrections officers, as long as they are employed as such, who have completed government-sponsored law enforcement firearms training, except that subsection (1)(b) of this section does apply to a correctional employee or community corrections officer who is present at a courthouse building as a party to an action under chapter 10.14, 10.99, or 26.50 RCW, or an action under Title 26 RCW where any party has alleged the existence of domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010.

(8) Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to a person licensed pursuant to RCW 9.41.070 who, upon entering the place or facility, directly and promptly proceeds to the administrator of the facility or the administrator's designee and obtains written permission to possess the firearm while on the premises or checks his or her firearm. The person may reclaim the firearms upon leaving but must immediately and directly depart from the place or facility.

(9) Subsection (1)(c) of this section does not apply to any administrator or employee of the facility or to any person who, upon entering the place or facility, directly and promptly proceeds to the administrator of the facility or the administrator's designee and obtains written permission to possess the firearm while on the premises.

(10) Subsection (1)(d) of this section does not apply to the proprietor of the premises or his or her employees while engaged in their employment.

(11) Government-sponsored law enforcement firearms training must be training that correctional personnel and community corrections officers receive as part of their job requirement and reference to such training does not constitute a mandate that it be provided by the correctional facility.

(12) Any person violating subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(13) "Weapon" as used in this section means any firearm, explosive as defined in RCW 70.74.010, or instrument or weapon listed in RCW 9.41.250.

Sec. 9004. RCW 9.94A.703 and 2015 c 81 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

When a court sentences a person to a term of community custody, the court shall impose conditions of community custody as provided in this section.

(1) Mandatory conditions. As part of any term of community custody, the court shall:

(a) Require the offender to inform the department of court-ordered treatment upon request by the department;

(b) Require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department under RCW 9.94A.704;

(c) If the offender was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 for an offense listed in RCW 9.94A.507(1)(a), and the victim of the offense was under eighteen years of age at the time of the offense, prohibit the offender from residing in a community protection zone;

(d) If the offender was sentenced under RCW 9A.36.120, prohibit the offender from serving in any paid or volunteer capacity where he or she has control or supervision of minors under the age of thirteen.

(2) Waivable conditions. Unless waived by the court, as part of any term of community custody, the court shall order an offender to:

(a) Report to and be available for contact with the assigned community corrections officer as directed;

(b) Work at department-approved education, employment, or community restitution, or any combination thereof;

(c) Refrain from possessing or consuming controlled substances except pursuant to lawfully issued prescriptions;

(d) Pay supervision fees as determined by the department; and

(e) Obtain prior approval of the department for the offender's residence location and living arrangements.

(3) Discretionary conditions. As part of any term of community custody, the court may order an offender to:

(a) Remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical boundary;

(b) Refrain from direct or indirect contact with the victim of the crime or a specified class of individuals;

(c) Participate in crime-related treatment or counseling services;

(d) Participate in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct reasonably related to the circumstances of the offense, the offender's risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community;

(e) Refrain from possessing or consuming alcohol; or

(f) Comply with any crime-related prohibitions.

(4) Special conditions.

(a) In sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor child, or if the victim of the offense for which the offender was convicted has a minor child, the court may order the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator program approved under RCW 26.50.150.

(b)(i) In sentencing an offender convicted of an alcohol or drug-related traffic offense, the court shall require the offender to complete a diagnostic evaluation by ((an alcohol or drug dependency agency)) a substance use disorder treatment program approved by the department of social and health services or a qualified probation department, defined under RCW 46.61.516, that has been approved by the department of social and health services. If the offense was pursuant to chapter 46.61 RCW, the report shall be forwarded to the department of licensing. If the offender is found to have an alcohol or drug problem that requires treatment, the offender shall complete treatment in ((a program approved by the department of social and health services under chapter 70.96A RCW)) an approved substance use disorder treatment program as defined in chapter 71.24 RCW. If the offender is found not to have an alcohol or drug problem that requires treatment, the offender shall complete a course in an alcohol and drug information school ((approved)) licensed or certified by the department of ((social and health services)) health under chapter 70.96A RCW. The offender shall pay all costs for any evaluation, education, or treatment required by this section, unless the offender is eligible for an existing program offered or approved by the department of social and health services.

(ii) For purposes of this section, "alcohol or drug-related traffic offense" means the following: Driving while under the influence as defined by RCW 46.61.502, actual physical control while under the influence as defined by RCW 46.61.504, vehicular homicide as defined by RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), vehicular assault as defined by RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), homicide by watercraft as defined by RCW 79A.60.050, or assault by watercraft as defined by RCW 79A.60.060.

(iii) This subsection (4)(b) does not require the department of social and health services to add new treatment or assessment facilities nor affect its use of existing programs and facilities authorized by law.

Sec. 9005. RCW 10.05.040 and 2002 c 219 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((facility)) program to which such person is referred, or the department of social and health services if the petition is brought under RCW 10.05.020(2), shall conduct an investigation and examination to determine:

(1) Whether the person suffers from the problem described;

(2) Whether the problem is such that if not treated, or if no child welfare services are provided, there is a probability that similar misconduct will occur in the future;

(3) Whether extensive and long term treatment is required;

(4) Whether effective treatment or child welfare services for the person's problem are available; and

(5) Whether the person is amenable to treatment or willing to cooperate with child welfare services.

Sec. 9006. RCW 10.05.050 and 2002 c 219 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((facility)) program, or the department of social and health services if the petition is brought under RCW 10.05.020(2), shall make a written report to the court stating its findings and recommendations after the examination required by RCW 10.05.040. If its findings and recommendations support treatment or the implementation of a child welfare service plan, it shall also recommend a treatment or service plan setting out:

(a) The type;

(b) Nature;

(c) Length;

(d) A treatment or service time schedule; and

(e) Approximate cost of the treatment or child welfare services.

(2) In the case of a child welfare service plan, the plan shall be designed in a manner so that a parent who successfully completes the plan will not be likely to withhold the basic necessities of life from his or her child.

(3) The report with the treatment or service plan shall be filed with the court and a copy given to the petitioner and petitioner's counsel. A copy of the treatment or service plan shall be given to the prosecutor by petitioner's counsel at the request of the prosecutor. The evaluation facility, or the department of social and health services if the petition is brought under RCW 10.05.020(2), making the written report shall append to the report a commitment by the treatment ((facility)) program or the department of social and health services that it will provide the treatment or child welfare services in accordance with this chapter. The facility or the service provider shall agree to provide the court with a statement every three months for the first year and every six months for the second year regarding (a) the petitioner's cooperation with the treatment or child welfare service plan proposed and (b) the petitioner's progress or failure in treatment or child welfare services. These statements shall be made as a declaration by the person who is personally responsible for providing the treatment or services.

Sec. 9007. RCW 18.205.080 and 1998 c 243 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall appoint a chemical dependency certification advisory committee to further the purposes of this chapter. The committee shall be composed of seven members, one member initially appointed for a term of one year, three for a term of two years, and three for a term of three years. Subsequent appointments shall be for terms of three years. No person may serve as a member of the committee for more than two consecutive terms. Members of the committee shall be residents of this state. The committee shall be composed of four certified chemical dependency professionals; one chemical dependency treatment program director; one physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW who is certified in addiction medicine or a licensed or certified mental health practitioner; and one member of the public who has received chemical dependency counseling.

(2) The secretary may remove any member of the committee for cause as specified by rule. In the case of a vacancy, the secretary shall appoint a person to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(3) The committee shall meet at the times and places designated by the secretary and shall hold meetings during the year as necessary to provide advice to the director. The committee may elect a chair and a vice chair. A majority of the members currently serving shall constitute a quorum.

(4) Each member of the committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. In addition, members of the committee shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 when engaged in the authorized business of the committee.

(5) The director of the ((department of social and health services division of alcohol and substance abuse or the director's)) health care authority, or his or her designee, shall serve as an ex officio member of the committee.

(6) The secretary, members of the committee, or individuals acting on their behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on any certification or disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their duties.

Sec. 9008. RCW 18.88A.020 and 2015 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Alternative training" means a nursing assistant-certified program meeting criteria adopted by the commission under RCW 18.88A.087 to meet the requirements of a state-approved nurse aide competency evaluation program consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395i-3(e) and (f) of the federal social security act.

(2) "Approved training program" means a nursing assistant-certified training program approved by the commission to meet the requirements of a state-approved nurse aide training and competency evaluation program consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395i-3(e) and (f) of the federal social security act. For community college, vocational-technical institutes, skill centers, and secondary school as defined in chapter 28B.50 RCW, nursing assistant-certified training programs shall be approved by the commission in cooperation with the board for community and technical colleges or the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) "Commission" means the Washington nursing care quality assurance commission.

(4) "Competency evaluation" means the measurement of an individual's knowledge and skills as related to safe, competent performance as a nursing assistant.

(5) "Department" means the department of health.

(6) "Health care facility" means a nursing home, hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 or 71.12 RCW, hospice care facility, home health care agency, hospice agency, licensed or certified service provider under chapter 71.24 RCW other than an individual health care provider, or other entity for delivery of health care services as defined by the commission.

(7) "Medication assistant" means a nursing assistant-certified with a medication assistant endorsement issued under RCW 18.88A.082 who is authorized, in addition to his or her duties as a nursing assistant-certified, to administer certain medications and perform certain treatments in a nursing home under the supervision of a registered nurse under RCW 18.88A.082.

(8) "Nursing assistant" means an individual, regardless of title, who, under the direction and supervision of a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse, assists in the delivery of nursing and nursing-related activities to patients in a health care facility. The two levels of nursing assistants are:

(a) "Nursing assistant-certified," an individual certified under this chapter; and

(b) "Nursing assistant-registered," an individual registered under this chapter.

(9) "Nursing home" means a nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW.

(10) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

Sec. 9009. RCW 46.61.5055 and 2017 c 336 s 6 and 2017 c 335 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) No prior offenses in seven years. Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than three hundred sixty-four days. Twenty-four consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be suspended unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension and the facts upon which the suspension is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(a)(i), the court may order not less than fifteen days of electronic home monitoring or a ninety-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program monitoring as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device or other separate alcohol monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than three hundred sixty-four days. Forty-eight consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be suspended unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension and the facts upon which the suspension is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court may order not less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring or a one hundred twenty day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program testing as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(2) One prior offense in seven years. Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than three hundred sixty-four days and sixty days of electronic home monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory term of imprisonment and electronic home monitoring under this subsection (2)(a)(i), the court may order a minimum of four days in jail and either one hundred eighty days of electronic home monitoring or a one hundred twenty-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program monitoring as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The court shall order an expanded alcohol assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension and the facts upon which the suspension is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than three hundred sixty-four days and ninety days of electronic home monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment and electronic home monitoring under this subsection (2)(b)(i), the court may order a minimum of six days in jail and either six months of electronic home monitoring or a one hundred twenty-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program monitoring as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The court shall order an expanded alcohol assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of imprisonment and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension and the facts upon which the suspension is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(3) Two prior offenses in seven years. Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has two prior offenses within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than three hundred sixty-four days, if available in that county or city, a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390, and one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring, the court may order at least an additional eight days in jail. The court shall order an expanded alcohol assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Ninety days of imprisonment and one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension and the facts upon which the suspension is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor more than three hundred sixty-four days, if available in that county or city, a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390, and one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring, the court may order at least an additional ten days in jail. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The court shall order an expanded alcohol assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension and the facts upon which the suspension is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(4) Three or more prior offenses in ten years. A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 shall be punished under chapter 9.94A RCW if:

(a) The person has three or more prior offenses within ten years; or

(b) The person has ever previously been convicted of:

(i) A violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(ii) A violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(iii) An out-of-state offense comparable to the offense specified in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection; or

(iv) A violation of RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6).

(5) Monitoring. (a) Ignition interlock device. The court shall require any person convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance to comply with the rules and requirements of the department regarding the installation and use of a functioning ignition interlock device installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person.

(b) Monitoring devices. If the court orders that a person refrain from consuming any alcohol, the court may order the person to submit to alcohol monitoring through an alcohol detection breathalyzer device, transdermal sensor device, or other technology designed to detect alcohol in a person's system. The person shall pay for the cost of the monitoring, unless the court specifies that the cost of monitoring will be paid with funds that are available from an alternative source identified by the court. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost.

(c) 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In any county or city where a 24/7 sobriety program is available and verified by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the court shall:

(i) Order the person to install and use a functioning ignition interlock or other device in lieu of such period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring;

(ii) Order the person to a period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this section; or

(iii) Order the person to install and use a functioning ignition interlock or other device in addition to a period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this section.

(6) Penalty for having a minor passenger in vehicle. If a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 committed the offense while a passenger under the age of sixteen was in the vehicle, the court shall:

(a) Order the use of an ignition interlock or other device for an additional six months;

(b) In any case in which the person has no prior offenses within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), order an additional twenty-four hours of imprisonment and a fine of not less than one thousand dollars and not more than five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent;

(c) In any case in which the person has one prior offense within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), order an additional five days of imprisonment and a fine of not less than two thousand dollars and not more than five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent;

(d) In any case in which the person has two prior offenses within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), order an additional ten days of imprisonment and a fine of not less than three thousand dollars and not more than ten thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(7) Other items courts must consider while setting penalties. In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly consider the following:

(a) Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was responsible for injury or damage to another or another's property;

(b) Whether at the time of the offense the person was driving or in physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers;

(c) Whether the driver was driving in the opposite direction of the normal flow of traffic on a multiple lane highway, as defined by RCW 46.04.350, with a posted speed limit of forty-five miles per hour or greater; and

(d) Whether a child passenger under the age of sixteen was an occupant in the driver's vehicle.

(8) Treatment and information school. An offender punishable under this section is subject to the alcohol assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.

(9) Driver's license privileges of the defendant. The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person convicted of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:

(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be suspended or denied by the department for ninety days or until the person is evaluated by an alcoholism agency or probation department pursuant to RCW 46.20.311 and the person completes or is enrolled in a ninety-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In no circumstances shall the license suspension be for fewer than two days;

(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for two years or until the person is evaluated by an alcoholism agency or probation department pursuant to RCW 46.20.311 and the person completes or is enrolled in a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In no circumstances shall the license suspension be for less than one year; or

(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years;

(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15:

(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for one year or until the person is evaluated by an alcoholism agency or probation department pursuant to RCW 46.20.311 and the person completes or is enrolled in a one hundred twenty day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In no circumstances shall the license revocation be for fewer than four days;

(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for nine hundred days; or

(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years; or

(c) Penalty for refusing to take test. If by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308, there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) Where there have been no prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for two years;

(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years; or

(iii) Where there have been two or more previous offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years.

The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under this subsection for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under RCW 46.20.3101 arising out of the same incident.

Upon receipt of a notice from the court under RCW 36.28A.390 that a participant has been removed from a 24/7 sobriety program, the department must resume any suspension, revocation, or denial that had been terminated early under this subsection due to participation in the program, granting credit on a day-for-day basis for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under RCW 46.20.3101 or this section arising out of the same incident.

Upon its own motion or upon motion by a person, a court may find, on the record, that notice to the department under RCW 46.20.270 has been delayed for three years or more as a result of a clerical or court error. If so, the court may order that the person's license, permit, or nonresident privilege shall not be revoked, suspended, or denied for that offense. The court shall send notice of the finding and order to the department and to the person. Upon receipt of the notice from the court, the department shall not revoke, suspend, or deny the license, permit, or nonresident privilege of the person for that offense.

For purposes of this subsection (9), the department shall refer to the driver's record maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the existence of prior offenses.

(10) Probation of driving privilege. After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive required by this section, the department shall place the offender's driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.

(11) Conditions of probation. (a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence required by this section, whenever the court imposes up to three hundred sixty-four days in jail, the court shall also suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not exceeding five years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that include: (i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this state without a valid license to drive; (ii) not driving a motor vehicle within this state without proof of liability insurance or other financial responsibility for the future pursuant to RCW 46.30.020; (iii) not driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more or a THC concentration of 5.00 nanograms per milliliter of whole blood or higher, within two hours after driving; (iv) not refusing to submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol or drug concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to believe the person was driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drug; and (v) not driving a motor vehicle in this state without a functioning ignition interlock device as required by the department under RCW 46.20.720. The court may impose conditions of probation that include nonrepetition, installation of an ignition interlock device on the probationer's motor vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment, supervised probation, or other conditions that may be appropriate. The sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of probation during the suspension period.

(b) For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this subsection, the court shall order the convicted person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be suspended or deferred.

(c) For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory condition of probation imposed under this subsection, the license, permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be suspended by the court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or privilege to drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the finding of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall notify the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any extension of a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection.

(12) Waiver of electronic home monitoring. A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements of this chapter when:

(a) The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or any other necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system. However, if a court determines that an alcohol monitoring device utilizing wireless reporting technology is reasonably available, the court may require the person to obtain such a device during the period of required electronic home monitoring;

(b) The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or

(c) The court determines that there is reason to believe that the offender would violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring penalty.

Whenever the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring is waived, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the waiver and the facts upon which the waiver is based, and shall impose an alternative sentence with similar punitive consequences. The alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to, use of an ignition interlock device, the 24/7 sobriety program monitoring, additional jail time, work crew, or work camp.

Whenever the combination of jail time and electronic home monitoring or alternative sentence would exceed three hundred sixty-four days, the offender shall serve the jail portion of the sentence first, and the electronic home monitoring or alternative portion of the sentence shall be reduced so that the combination does not exceed three hundred sixty-four days.

(13) Extraordinary medical placement. An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an extraordinary medical placement by the jail administrator subject to the standards and limitations set forth in RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c).

(14) Definitions. For purposes of this section and RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504:

(a) A "prior offense" means any of the following:

(i) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(iii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.25.110 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(iv) A conviction for a violation of RCW 79A.60.040(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;

(v) A conviction for a violation of RCW 79A.60.040(1) or an equivalent local ordinance committed in a reckless manner if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 79A.60.040(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;

(vi) A conviction for a violation of RCW 47.68.220 or an equivalent local ordinance committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(vii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 47.68.220 or an equivalent local ordinance committed in a careless or reckless manner if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 47.68.220 or an equivalent local ordinance while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(viii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.09.470(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ix) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.10.490(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;

(x) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed in a reckless manner or with the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(xi) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed in a reckless manner or with the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(xii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050 or an equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

(xiii) An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of (a)(i), (ii), (x), (xi), or (xii) of this subsection if committed in this state;

(xiv) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance;

(xv) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred prosecution was granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

(xvi) A deferred prosecution granted in another state for a violation of driving or having physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the out-of-state deferred prosecution is equivalent to the deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW, including a requirement that the defendant participate in a chemical dependency treatment program; or

(xvii) A deferred sentence imposed in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred sentence was imposed was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or a violation of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

If a deferred prosecution is revoked based on a subsequent conviction for an offense listed in this subsection (14)(a), the subsequent conviction shall not be treated as a prior offense of the revoked deferred prosecution for the purposes of sentencing;

(b) "Treatment" means substance use disorder treatment ((approved)) licensed or certified by the department of ((social and health services)) health;

(c) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense occurred within seven years before or after the arrest for the current offense; and

(d) "Within ten years" means that the arrest for a prior offense occurred within ten years before or after the arrest for the current offense.

(15) All fines imposed by this section apply to adult offenders only.

Sec. 9010. RCW 46.61.5056 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 531 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person subject to alcohol assessment and treatment under RCW 46.61.5055 shall be required by the court to complete a course in an alcohol and drug information school ((approved)) licensed or certified by the department of ((social and)) health ((services)) or to complete more intensive treatment in a substance use disorder treatment program ((approved)) licensed or certified by the department of ((social and)) health ((services)), as determined by the court. The court shall notify the department of licensing whenever it orders a person to complete a course or treatment program under this section.

(2) A diagnostic evaluation and treatment recommendation shall be prepared under the direction of the court by ((an alcoholism agency approved)) a substance use disorder treatment program licensed or certified by the department of ((social and)) health ((services)) or a qualified probation department approved by the department of social and health services. A copy of the report shall be forwarded to the court and the department of licensing. Based on the diagnostic evaluation, the court shall determine whether the person shall be required to complete a course in an alcohol and drug information school ((approved)) licensed or certified by the department of ((social and)) health ((services)) or more intensive treatment in ((a)) an approved substance use disorder treatment program ((approved)) licensed or certified by the department of ((social and)) health ((services)).

(3) Standards for approval for alcohol treatment programs shall be prescribed by the department of ((social and)) health ((services)). The department of ((social and)) health ((services)) shall periodically review the costs of alcohol and drug information schools and treatment programs.

(4) Any agency that provides treatment ordered under RCW 46.61.5055, shall immediately report to the appropriate probation department where applicable, otherwise to the court, and to the department of licensing any noncompliance by a person with the conditions of his or her ordered treatment. The court shall notify the department of licensing and the department of ((social and)) health ((services)) of any failure by an agency to so report noncompliance. Any agency with knowledge of noncompliance that fails to so report shall be fined two hundred fifty dollars by the department of ((social and)) health ((services)). Upon three such failures by an agency within one year, the department of ((social and)) health ((services)) shall revoke the agency's ((approval)) license or certification under this section.

(5) The department of licensing and the department of ((social and)) health ((services)) may adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out this section.

Sec. 9011. RCW 72.09.350 and 2014 c 225 s 94 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of corrections and the University of Washington may enter into a collaborative arrangement to provide improved services for offenders with mental illness with a focus on prevention, treatment, and reintegration into society. The participants in the collaborative arrangement may develop a strategic plan within sixty days after May 17, 1993, to address the management of offenders with mental illness within the correctional system, facilitating their reentry into the community and the mental health system, and preventing the inappropriate incarceration of individuals with mental illness. The collaborative arrangement may also specify the establishment and maintenance of a corrections mental health center located at McNeil Island corrections center. The collaborative arrangement shall require that an advisory panel of key stakeholders be established and consulted throughout the development and implementation of the center. The stakeholders advisory panel shall include a broad array of interest groups drawn from representatives of mental health, criminal justice, and correctional systems. The stakeholders advisory panel shall include, but is not limited to, membership from: The department of corrections, the department of social and health services mental health division and division of juvenile rehabilitation, the health care authority, behavioral health organizations, local and regional law enforcement agencies, the sentencing guidelines commission, county and city jails, mental health advocacy groups for individuals with mental illness or developmental disabilities, ((and)) the traumatically brain-injured, and the general public. The center established by the department of corrections and University of Washington, in consultation with the stakeholder advisory groups, shall have the authority to:

(a) Develop new and innovative treatment approaches for corrections mental health clients;

(b) Improve the quality of mental health services within the department and throughout the corrections system;

(c) Facilitate mental health staff recruitment and training to meet departmental, county, and municipal needs;

(d) Expand research activities within the department in the area of treatment services, the design of delivery systems, the development of organizational models, and training for corrections mental health care professionals;

(e) Improve the work environment for correctional employees by developing the skills, knowledge, and understanding of how to work with offenders with special chronic mental health challenges;

(f) Establish a more positive rehabilitative environment for offenders;

(g) Strengthen multidisciplinary mental health collaboration between the University of Washington, other groups committed to the intent of this section, and the department of corrections;

(h) Strengthen department linkages between institutions of higher education, public sector mental health systems, and county and municipal corrections;

(i) Assist in the continued formulation of corrections mental health policies;

(j) Develop innovative and effective recruitment and training programs for correctional personnel working with offenders with mental illness;

(k) Assist in the development of a coordinated continuum of mental health care capable of providing services from corrections entry to community return; and

(l) Evaluate all current and innovative approaches developed within this center in terms of their effective and efficient achievement of improved mental health of inmates, development and utilization of personnel, the impact of these approaches on the functioning of correctional institutions, and the relationship of the corrections system to mental health and criminal justice systems. Specific attention should be paid to evaluating the effects of programs on the reintegration of offenders with mental illness into the community and the prevention of inappropriate incarceration of persons with mental illness.

(2) The corrections mental health center may conduct research, training, and treatment activities for the offender with mental illness within selected sites operated by the department. The department shall provide support services for the center such as food services, maintenance, perimeter security, classification, offender supervision, and living unit functions. The University of Washington may develop, implement, and evaluate the clinical, treatment, research, and evaluation components of the mentally ill offender center. The institute of for public policy and management may be consulted regarding the development of the center and in the recommendations regarding public policy. As resources permit, training within the center shall be available to state, county, and municipal agencies requiring the services. Other state colleges, state universities, and mental health providers may be involved in activities as required on a subcontract basis. Community mental health organizations, research groups, and community advocacy groups may be critical components of the center's operations and involved as appropriate to annual objectives. Clients with mental illness may be drawn from throughout the department's population and transferred to the center as clinical need, available services, and department jurisdiction permits.

(3) The department shall prepare a report of the center's progress toward the attainment of stated goals and provide the report to the legislature annually.

Sec. 9012. RCW 72.09.370 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 427 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The offender reentry community safety program is established to provide intensive services to offenders identified under this subsection and to thereby promote public safety. The secretary shall identify offenders in confinement or partial confinement who: (a) Are reasonably believed to be dangerous to themselves or others; and (b) have a mental disorder. In determining an offender's dangerousness, the secretary shall consider behavior known to the department and factors, based on research, that are linked to an increased risk for dangerousness of offenders with mental illnesses and shall include consideration of an offender's chemical dependency or abuse.

(2) Prior to release of an offender identified under this section, a team consisting of representatives of the department of corrections, the ((division of mental health)) health care authority, and, as necessary, the indeterminate sentence review board, ((other)) divisions or administrations within the department of social and health services, specifically including ((the division of alcohol and substance abuse and)) the division of developmental disabilities, the appropriate behavioral health organization, and the providers, as appropriate, shall develop a plan, as determined necessary by the team, for delivery of treatment and support services to the offender upon release. In developing the plan, the offender shall be offered assistance in executing a mental health directive under chapter 71.32 RCW, after being fully informed of the benefits, scope, and purposes of such directive. The team may include a school district representative for offenders under the age of twenty-one. The team shall consult with the offender's counsel, if any, and, as appropriate, the offender's family and community. The team shall notify the crime victim/witness program, which shall provide notice to all people registered to receive notice under RCW 72.09.712 of the proposed release plan developed by the team. Victims, witnesses, and other interested people notified by the department may provide information and comments to the department on potential safety risk to specific individuals or classes of individuals posed by the specific offender. The team may recommend: (a) That the offender be evaluated by the designated crisis responder, as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW; (b) department-supervised community treatment; or (c) voluntary community mental health or chemical dependency or abuse treatment.

(3) Prior to release of an offender identified under this section, the team shall determine whether or not an evaluation by a designated crisis responder is needed. If an evaluation is recommended, the supporting documentation shall be immediately forwarded to the appropriate designated crisis responder. The supporting documentation shall include the offender's criminal history, history of judicially required or administratively ordered involuntary antipsychotic medication while in confinement, and any known history of involuntary civil commitment.

(4) If an evaluation by a designated crisis responder is recommended by the team, such evaluation shall occur not more than ten days, nor less than five days, prior to release.

(5) A second evaluation by a designated crisis responder shall occur on the day of release if requested by the team, based upon new information or a change in the offender's mental condition, and the initial evaluation did not result in an emergency detention or a summons under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(6) If the designated crisis responder determines an emergency detention under chapter 71.05 RCW is necessary, the department shall release the offender only to a state hospital or to a consenting evaluation and treatment facility. The department shall arrange transportation of the offender to the hospital or facility.

(7) If the designated crisis responder believes that a less restrictive alternative treatment is appropriate, he or she shall seek a summons, pursuant to the provisions of chapter 71.05 RCW, to require the offender to appear at an evaluation and treatment facility. If a summons is issued, the offender shall remain within the corrections facility until completion of his or her term of confinement and be transported, by corrections personnel on the day of completion, directly to the identified evaluation and treatment facility.

(8) The secretary shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 9013. RCW 72.09.380 and 1999 c 214 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((secretaries)) secretary of the department of corrections and the ((department of social and health services)) director of the health care authority shall adopt rules and develop working agreements which will ensure that offenders identified under RCW 72.09.370(1) will be assisted in making application for medicaid to facilitate a decision regarding their eligibility for such entitlements prior to the end of their term of confinement in a correctional facility.

Sec. 9014. RCW 72.09.381 and 2014 c 225 s 96 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of the department of corrections and the ((secretary of the department of social and health services)) director of the health care authority shall, in consultation with the behavioral health organizations and provider representatives, each adopt rules as necessary to implement chapter 214, Laws of 1999.

Sec. 9015. RCW 72.09.585 and 2013 c 200 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When the department is determining an offender's risk management level, the department shall inquire of the offender and shall be told whether the offender is subject to court-ordered treatment for mental health services or chemical dependency services. The department shall request and the offender shall provide an authorization to release information form that meets applicable state and federal requirements and shall provide the offender with written notice that the department will request the offender's mental health and substance ((abuse)) use disorder treatment information. An offender's failure to inform the department of court-ordered treatment is a violation of the conditions of supervision if the offender is in the community and an infraction if the offender is in confinement, and the violation or infraction is subject to sanctions.

(2) When an offender discloses that he or she is subject to court-ordered mental health services or chemical dependency treatment, the department shall provide the mental health services provider or chemical dependency treatment provider with a written request for information and any necessary authorization to release information forms. The written request shall comply with rules adopted by the ((department of social and health services)) health care authority or protocols developed jointly by the department and the ((department of social and health services)) health care authority. A single request shall be valid for the duration of the offender's supervision in the community. Disclosures of information related to mental health services made pursuant to a department request shall not require consent of the offender.

(3) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445 or 70.02.250 may be released to the indeterminate sentence review board as relevant to carry out its responsibility of planning and ensuring community protection with respect to persons under its jurisdiction. Further disclosure by the indeterminate sentence review board is subject to the limitations set forth in subsections (5) and (6) of this section and must be consistent with the written policy of the indeterminate sentence review board. The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for the indeterminate sentence review board or staff assigned to perform board-related duties provided that the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.

(4) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445 or 70.02.250 may be used to meet the statutory duties of the department to provide evidence or report to the court. Disclosure to the public of information provided to the court by the department related to mental health services shall be limited in accordance with RCW 9.94A.500 or this section.

(5) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445 or 70.02.250 may be disclosed by the department to other state and local agencies as relevant to plan for and provide offenders transition, treatment, and supervision services, or as relevant and necessary to protect the public and counteract the danger created by a particular offender, and in a manner consistent with the written policy established by the secretary. The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for the department or its employees so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence. The information received by a state or local agency from the department shall remain confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure set forth in chapters 70.02, 71.05, and 71.34 RCW and, subject to these limitations, may be released only as relevant and necessary to counteract the danger created by a particular offender.

(6) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445 or 70.02.250 may be disclosed by the department to individuals only with respect to offenders who have been determined by the department to have a high risk of reoffending by a risk assessment, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, only as relevant and necessary for those individuals to take reasonable steps for the purpose of self-protection, or as provided in RCW 72.09.370(2). The information may not be disclosed for the purpose of engaging the public in a system of supervision, monitoring, and reporting offender behavior to the department. The department must limit the disclosure of information related to mental health services to the public to descriptions of an offender's behavior, risk he or she may present to the community, and need for mental health treatment, including medications, and shall not disclose or release to the public copies of treatment documents or records, except as otherwise provided by law. All disclosure of information to the public must be done in a manner consistent with the written policy established by the secretary. The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for the department or its employees so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence. Nothing in this subsection prevents any person from reporting to law enforcement or the department behavior that he or she believes creates a public safety risk.

Sec. 9016. RCW 74.34.020 and 2017 c 268 s 2 and 2017 c 266 s 12 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Abandonment" means action or inaction by a person or entity with a duty of care for a vulnerable adult that leaves the vulnerable person without the means or ability to obtain necessary food, clothing, shelter, or health care.

(2) "Abuse" means the willful action or inaction that inflicts injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment on a vulnerable adult. In instances of abuse of a vulnerable adult who is unable to express or demonstrate physical harm, pain, or mental anguish, the abuse is presumed to cause physical harm, pain, or mental anguish. Abuse includes sexual abuse, mental abuse, physical abuse, and personal exploitation of a vulnerable adult, and improper use of restraint against a vulnerable adult which have the following meanings:

(a) "Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual conduct, including but not limited to unwanted or inappropriate touching, rape, sodomy, sexual coercion, sexually explicit photographing, and sexual harassment. Sexual abuse also includes any sexual conduct between a staff person, who is not also a resident or client, of a facility or a staff person of a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, and a vulnerable adult living in that facility or receiving service from a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, whether or not it is consensual.

(b) "Physical abuse" means the willful action of inflicting bodily injury or physical mistreatment. Physical abuse includes, but is not limited to, striking with or without an object, slapping, pinching, choking, kicking, shoving, or prodding.

(c) "Mental abuse" means a willful verbal or nonverbal action that threatens, humiliates, harasses, coerces, intimidates, isolates, unreasonably confines, or punishes a vulnerable adult. Mental abuse may include ridiculing, yelling, or swearing.

(d) "Personal exploitation" means an act of forcing, compelling, or exerting undue influence over a vulnerable adult causing the vulnerable adult to act in a way that is inconsistent with relevant past behavior, or causing the vulnerable adult to perform services for the benefit of another.

(e) "Improper use of restraint" means the inappropriate use of chemical, physical, or mechanical restraints for convenience or discipline or in a manner that: (i) Is inconsistent with federal or state licensing or certification requirements for facilities, hospitals, or programs authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW; (ii) is not medically authorized; or (iii) otherwise constitutes abuse under this section.

(3) "Chemical restraint" means the administration of any drug to manage a vulnerable adult's behavior in a way that reduces the safety risk to the vulnerable adult or others, has the temporary effect of restricting the vulnerable adult's freedom of movement, and is not standard treatment for the vulnerable adult's medical or psychiatric condition.

(4) "Consent" means express written consent granted after the vulnerable adult or his or her legal representative has been fully informed of the nature of the services to be offered and that the receipt of services is voluntary.

(5) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(6) "Facility" means a residence licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, assisted living facilities; chapter 18.51 RCW, nursing homes; chapter 70.128 RCW, adult family homes; chapter 72.36 RCW, soldiers' homes; or chapter 71A.20 RCW, residential habilitation centers; or any other facility licensed or certified by the department or the department of health.

(7) "Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use, control over, or withholding of the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult by any person or entity for any person's or entity's profit or advantage other than for the vulnerable adult's profit or advantage. "Financial exploitation" includes, but is not limited to:

(a) The use of deception, intimidation, or undue influence by a person or entity in a position of trust and confidence with a vulnerable adult to obtain or use the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or entity other than the vulnerable adult;

(b) The breach of a fiduciary duty, including, but not limited to, the misuse of a power of attorney, trust, or a guardianship appointment, that results in the unauthorized appropriation, sale, or transfer of the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or entity other than the vulnerable adult; or

(c) Obtaining or using a vulnerable adult's property, income, resources, or trust funds without lawful authority, by a person or entity who knows or clearly should know that the vulnerable adult lacks the capacity to consent to the release or use of his or her property, income, resources, or trust funds.

(8) "Financial institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 30A.22.040 and 30A.22.041. For purposes of this chapter only, "financial institution" also means a "broker-dealer" or "investment adviser" as defined in RCW 21.20.005.

(9) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41((,)) or 71.12((,)) RCW or a state hospital defined in chapter 72.23 RCW and any employee, agent, officer, director, or independent contractor thereof.

(10) "Incapacitated person" means a person who is at a significant risk of personal or financial harm under RCW 11.88.010(1) (a), (b), (c), or (d).

(11) "Individual provider" means a person under contract with the department to provide services in the home under chapter 74.09 or 74.39A RCW.

(12) "Interested person" means a person who demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the person is interested in the welfare of the vulnerable adult, that the person has a good faith belief that the court's intervention is necessary, and that the vulnerable adult is unable, due to incapacity, undue influence, or duress at the time the petition is filed, to protect his or her own interests.

(13)(a) "Isolate" or "isolation" means to restrict a vulnerable adult's ability to communicate, visit, interact, or otherwise associate with persons of his or her choosing. Isolation may be evidenced by acts including but not limited to:

(i) Acts that prevent a vulnerable adult from sending, making, or receiving his or her personal mail, electronic communications, or telephone calls; or

(ii) Acts that prevent or obstruct the vulnerable adult from meeting with others, such as telling a prospective visitor or caller that a vulnerable adult is not present, or does not wish contact, where the statement is contrary to the express wishes of the vulnerable adult.

(b) The term "isolate" or "isolation" may not be construed in a manner that prevents a guardian or limited guardian from performing his or her fiduciary obligations under chapter 11.92 RCW or prevents a hospital or facility from providing treatment consistent with the standard of care for delivery of health services.

(14) "Mandated reporter" is an employee of the department; law enforcement officer; social worker; professional school personnel; individual provider; an employee of a facility; an operator of a facility; an employee of a social service, welfare, mental health, adult day health, adult day care, home health, home care, or hospice agency; county coroner or medical examiner; Christian Science practitioner; or health care provider subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.

(15) "Mechanical restraint" means any device attached or adjacent to the vulnerable adult's body that he or she cannot easily remove that restricts freedom of movement or normal access to his or her body. "Mechanical restraint" does not include the use of devices, materials, or equipment that are (a) medically authorized, as required, and (b) used in a manner that is consistent with federal or state licensing or certification requirements for facilities, hospitals, or programs authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW.

(16) "Neglect" means (a) a pattern of conduct or inaction by a person or entity with a duty of care that fails to provide the goods and services that maintain physical or mental health of a vulnerable adult, or that fails to avoid or prevent physical or mental harm or pain to a vulnerable adult; or (b) an act or omission by a person or entity with a duty of care that demonstrates a serious disregard of consequences of such a magnitude as to constitute a clear and present danger to the vulnerable adult's health, welfare, or safety, including but not limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100.

(17) "Permissive reporter" means any person, including, but not limited to, an employee of a financial institution, attorney, or volunteer in a facility or program providing services for vulnerable adults.

(18) "Physical restraint" means the application of physical force without the use of any device, for the purpose of restraining the free movement of a vulnerable adult's body. "Physical restraint" does not include (a) briefly holding without undue force a vulnerable adult in order to calm or comfort him or her, or (b) holding a vulnerable adult's hand to safely escort him or her from one area to another.

(19) "Protective services" means any services provided by the department to a vulnerable adult with the consent of the vulnerable adult, or the legal representative of the vulnerable adult, who has been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, neglected, or in a state of self-neglect. These services may include, but are not limited to case management, social casework, home care, placement, arranging for medical evaluations, psychological evaluations, day care, or referral for legal assistance.

(20) "Self-neglect" means the failure of a vulnerable adult, not living in a facility, to provide for himself or herself the goods and services necessary for the vulnerable adult's physical or mental health, and the absence of which impairs or threatens the vulnerable adult's well-being. This definition may include a vulnerable adult who is receiving services through home health, hospice, or a home care agency, or an individual provider when the neglect is not a result of inaction by that agency or individual provider.

(21) "Social worker" means:

(a) A social worker as defined in RCW 18.320.010(2); or

(b) Anyone engaged in a professional capacity during the regular course of employment in encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support, or education of vulnerable adults, or providing social services to vulnerable adults, whether in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(22) "Vulnerable adult" includes a person:

(a) Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or physical inability to care for himself or herself; or

(b) Found incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW; or

(c) Who has a developmental disability as defined under RCW 71A.10.020; or

(d) Admitted to any facility; or

(e) Receiving services from home health, hospice, or home care agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW; or

(f) Receiving services from an individual provider; or

(g) Who self-directs his or her own care and receives services from a personal aide under chapter 74.39 RCW.

(23) "Vulnerable adult advocacy team" means a team of three or more persons who coordinate a multidisciplinary process, in compliance with chapter 266, Laws of 2017 and the protocol governed by RCW 74.34.320, for preventing, identifying, investigating, prosecuting, and providing services related to abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of vulnerable adults.

PART 10

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10001. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The powers, duties, and functions of the department of social and health services pertaining to the behavioral health system and purchasing function of the behavioral health administration, except for oversight and management of state-run mental health institutions and licensing and certification activities, are hereby transferred to the Washington state health care authority to the extent necessary to carry out the purposes of this act. All references to the secretary or the department of social and health services in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director of the health care authority or the health care authority when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of social and health services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the health care authority. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of social and health services in carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be made available to the health care authority. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the department of social and health services in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be assigned to the health care authority.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health services for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the health care authority.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all pending business before the department of social and health services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the health care authority. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the health care authority.

(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of social and health services shall not affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of this section.

(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(6) On July 1, 2018, all employees of the department of social and health services engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred to the health care authority are transferred to the health care authority. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the health care authority to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service law.

(7) Positions in any bargaining unit within the health care authority existing on the effective date of this section will not be removed from an existing bargaining unit as a result of this section unless and until the existing bargaining unit is modified by the public employment relations commission pursuant to Title 391 WAC. The portions of any bargaining units of employees at the department of social and health services existing on the effective date of this section that are transferred to the health care authority shall be considered separate appropriate units within the health care authority unless and until modified by the public employment relations commission pursuant to Title 391 WAC. The exclusive bargaining representatives recognized as representing the portions of the bargaining units of employees at the department of social and health services existing on the effective date of this section shall continue as the exclusive bargaining representatives of the transferred bargaining units without the necessity of an election.

(8) The public employment relations commission may review the appropriateness of the collective bargaining units that are a result of the transfer from the department of social and health services to the health care authority under this act. The employer or the exclusive bargaining representative may petition the public employment relations commission to review the bargaining units in accordance with this section.

(9) On July 1, 2018, the health care authority must enter into an agreement with the department of health to ensure coordination of preventative behavioral health services or other necessary agreements to carry out the intent of this act.

(10) The health care authority may enter into agreements as necessary with the department of social and health services to carry out the transfer of duties as set forth in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10002. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The powers, duties, and functions of the department of social and health services pertaining to licensing and certification of behavioral health provider agencies and facilities, except for state-run mental health institutions, are hereby transferred to the department of health to the extent necessary to carry out the purposes of this act. All references to the secretary or the department of social and health services in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary of the department of health or the department of health when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of social and health services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department of health. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of social and health services in carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be made available to the department of health. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the department of social and health services in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be assigned to the department of health.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health services for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the department of health.

(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all pending business before the department of social and health services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department of health. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of health.

(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of social and health services shall not affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of this section.

(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(6) On July 1, 2018, all employees of the department of social and health services engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred to the department of health are transferred to the department of health. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of health to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service law.

(7) Positions in any bargaining unit within the department of health existing on the effective date of this section will not be removed from an existing bargaining unit as a result of this section unless and until the existing bargaining unit is modified by the public employment relations commission pursuant to Title 391 WAC. Nonsupervisory civil service employees of the department of social and health services assigned to the department of health under this section whose positions are within the existing bargaining unit description at the department of health shall become a part of that unit under the provision of chapter 41.80 RCW. The existing bargaining representative of the existing bargaining unit at the department of health shall continue to be certified as the exclusive bargaining representative without the necessity of an election.

(8) The department of health may enter into agreements as necessary with the department of social and health services to carry out the transfer of duties as set forth in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10003. The code reviser shall note wherever the secretary or department of any agency or agency's duties transferred or consolidated under this act is used or referred to in statute that the name of the secretary or department has changed. The code reviser shall prepare legislation for the 2019 regular session that: (1) Changes all statutory references to the secretary or department of any agency transferred or consolidated under this act; and (2) changes statutory references to sections recodified by this act but not amended in this act.

PART 11

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11001. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11002. RCW 71.24.065 (Wraparound model of integrated children's mental health services delivery—Contracts—Evaluation—Report) is decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11003. (1) RCW 43.20A.025 is recodified as a section in chapter 71.34 RCW.

(2) RCW 43.20A.065 and 43.20A.433 are each recodified as sections in chapter 71.24 RCW.

(3) RCW 43.20A.890 and 43.20A.892 are each recodified as sections in chapter 41.05 RCW.

(4) RCW 43.20A.893, 43.20A.894, 43.20A.896, and 43.20A.897 are each recodified as sections in chapter 74.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11004. Sections 3009, 3012, 3026, 5017, and 5020 of this act expire July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11005. Sections 3010, 3013, 3027, 5018, and 5021 of this act take effect July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11006. Except as provided in section 11005 of this act, this act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---