BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the following project loans recommended by the public works board are to be made:

(1) Bremerton, City of - storm project - Ostrich Creek Culvert Improvements. . . .$4,699,688

(2) King County - storm project - Georgetown Wet Weather Treatment Station. . . .$3,508,750

(3) Aberdeen, City of - road project - 1st Avenue Landslide Repair. . . .$373,632

(4) Bremerton, City of – storm project - Pine Basin Watershed Storm Sewer Improvements. . . .$3,891,034

(5) Lexington Flood Control Zone District – storm project - South Fork McCorkle Creek Stormwater Detention Facility. . . .$4,711,750

(6) Kenmore, City of – storm project - 61st/190th Culvert Replacement & Embankment Repair. . . .$1,503,750

(7) Walla Walla, City of – road project - Isaacs Avenue Improvements - Phase 2. . . .$3,971,957

(8) Seattle, City of – bridge project - Fairview Ave N Bridge Replacement. . . .$10,025,000

(9) Walla Walla, City of – solid waste project - Sudbury Landfill Area 7 Cell 3 Construction. . . .$2,985,643

(10) Quincy, City of – sewer project - Wastewater Reuse

Project . . . .$10,025,000

(11) Whatcom County – storm project - Slater Road/Jordan Creek Fish Passage Project. . . .$5,012,500

(12) Wenatchee, City of – road project - Miller Street Re-Alignment and Storm Repair. . . .$4,838,155

(13) Clark County – road project - NE 10th Avenue (NE 149th to NE 164th St. . . .$10,025,000

(14) Lake Forest Park Water District – water project - McKinnon Creek Wellfield Critical Infrastructure Security

Improvements. . . .$200,500

(15) King County – solid waste project - Cedar Hills Regional Landfill Pump Station Repairs. . . .$3,007,500

(16) Snohomish County – road project - 35th Ave SE Phase II SR 524 to 180th St SE. . . .$3,007,500

(17) Snohomish County – road project - 180th St SE SR 527 Brook Blvd. . . .$3,007,500

(18) Vancouver, City of – road project - City Street Light Conversion to Light Emitting Diode (LED). . . .$4,827,539

(19) Lincoln County – solid waste project - Tipping Floor Restoration and Safety Upgrades. . . .$156,039

(20) Birch Bay Water and Sewer District – water project - Automated Meter Reading Systems. . . .$1,503,750

(21) King County – solid waste project - Cedar Hills Regional Landfill North Flare Station Repairs. . . .$1,587,008

(22) Thurston Co. PUD No. 1 - water project - Water System Safety and Energy Efficiency Improvements. . . .$1,030,299

(23) Kennewick, City of – road project - US 395/Ridgeline Interchange. . . .$6,015,000

(24) Kennewick, City of - water project - Kennewick Automated Meter Reading Project. . . .$6,015,000

(25) Spokane, City of – water project - Sunset Reservoir Restoration. . . .$1,415,530

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---