BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.57.003 and 1991 c 160 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created an agency of the state of Washington, consisting of ((seven)) eleven individuals appointed by the governor to be known as the Washington state board of osteopathic medicine and surgery.

On expiration of the term of any member, the governor shall appoint for a period of five years a qualified individual to take the place of such member. Each member shall hold office until the expiration of the term for which such member is appointed or until a successor shall have been appointed and shall have qualified. Initial appointments shall be made and vacancies in the membership of the board shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governor.

Each member of the board shall be a citizen of the United States and must be an actual resident of this state. ((One member shall be a consumer who has)) Two members must be consumers who have neither a financial nor a fiduciary relationship to a health care delivery system, one member must have been in active practice as a licensed osteopathic physician assistant in this state for at least five years immediately preceding appointment, and every other member must have been in active practice as a licensed osteopathic physician and surgeon in this state for at least five years immediately preceding appointment.

The board shall elect a chairperson, a secretary, and a vice chairperson from its members. Meetings of the board shall be held at least four times a year and at such place as the board shall determine and at such other times and places as the board deems necessary.

An affirmative vote of a simple majority of the members present at a meeting or hearing shall be required for the board to take any official action. The board may not take any action without a quorum of the board members present. A simple majority of the board members currently serving constitutes a quorum of the board.

Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW ((43.03.240)) 43.03.265 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

Any member of the board may be removed by the governor for neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance or misfeasance in office, or upon written request of two-thirds of the physicians licensed under this chapter and in active practice in this state.

--- END ---