BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall convert at least two of the toll booths used for the Tacoma Narrows bridge to unstaffed toll booths that exclusively accept credit cards for toll payment. The department shall expand the use of these unstaffed toll booths to more than two if an assessment of the rate and volume of credit card transactions processed in toll booths, along with other impacts of unstaffed toll booth usage, demonstrates that increased deployment of these unstaffed toll booths will result in additional operating cost savings without any adverse effect on the overall processing of vehicles through toll booths.

--- END ---