BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that many residents of Washington enjoy recreational opportunities for off-road vehicle and snowmobile use afforded by the natural beauty of the state and do so in compliance with vehicle titling and registration laws and other laws that govern off-road vehicle and snowmobile use. At the same time, the legislature recognizes that the current law and corresponding enforcement regime may not be robust enough to ensure full compliance with legal registration requirements and a level playing field for all users. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to modify the statutory framework governing penalties for off-road vehicle and snowmobile registration violations and to add requirements to the department of licensing in order to improve registration compliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.09 RCW under the subchapter heading "uses and violations" to read as follows:

(1) It is a gross misdemeanor, punishable as provided under chapter 9A.20 RCW, for a resident, as identified in RCW 46.16A.140, to knowingly fail to apply for a Washington state certificate of title for, or to knowingly fail to register, an off-road vehicle within fifteen days of receiving or refusing a notice issued by the department under section 4 of this act.

(2) Excise taxes owed and fines assessed must be deposited in the manner provided under RCW 46.16A.030(6).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 46.10 RCW under the subchapter heading "uses and violations" to read as follows:

(1) It is a gross misdemeanor, punishable as provided under chapter 9A.20 RCW, for a resident, as identified in RCW 46.16A.140, to knowingly fail to register a snowmobile within fifteen days of receiving or refusing a notice issued by the department under section 4 of this act.

(2) Excise taxes owed and fines assessed must be deposited in the manner provided under RCW 46.16A.030(6).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 46.93 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By the first business day in February of each year, beginning in 2018, motorsports vehicle manufacturers must report to the department of licensing a listing of all motorsports vehicle warranties for off-road vehicles under chapter 46.09 RCW and snowmobiles under chapter 46.10 RCW sold to Washington residents by out-of-state motorsports vehicle dealers in the previous calendar year. The report must be transmitted such that the department receives the listing no later than the first business day in February. Failure to report a complete listing as required under this subsection results in an administrative fine of one hundred dollars for each day after January that the department has not received the report.

(2) The department of licensing shall examine the listing reported in subsection (1) of this section to verify whether the vehicles are properly registered in the state. Beginning in 2018, and to the extent that it has received the listing required under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall notify by certified mail from the United States postal service, with return receipt requested, by the end of February of each year, the purchasers of the warranties of the off-road vehicles and snowmobiles that are not properly registered in the state of the owner's obligations under state law regarding vehicle titling, registration, and use tax payment, as well as of the penalties for failure to comply with the law.

(3) Fines received under this section must be paid into the state treasury and credited to the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account under RCW 46.09.510 and to the snowmobile account under RCW 46.68.350. The state treasurer must apportion the fines between the accounts according to the pro rata share of the number of off-road vehicle and snowmobile registrations in the previous calendar year. The department must provide the state treasurer with the information needed to determine the apportionment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Section 4 of this act applies to the sales of off-road vehicles and snowmobiles beginning in January 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect August 1, 2017.

--- END ---