BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.90.120 and 1987 c 222 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall adopt rules under the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, governing safety, sanitation, and water quality for water recreation facilities. The rules shall include but not be limited to requirements for design; operation; injury and illness reporting; biological and chemical contamination standards; water quality monitoring; inspection; permit application and issuance; and enforcement procedures. However, a water recreation facility intended for the exclusive use of residents of any apartment house complex or of a group of rental housing units of less than fifteen living units, or of a mobile home park, or of a condominium complex or any group or association of less than fifteen home owners shall not be subject to preconstruction design review, routine inspection, or permit or fee requirements; and water treatment of hydroelectric reservoirs or natural streams, creeks, lakes, or irrigation canals shall not be required.

(2) In adopting rules under subsection (1) of this section regarding the operation or design of a recreational water contact facility, the board shall review and consider ((any recommendations made by the recreational water contact facility advisory committee)) the most recent version of the United States centers for disease control and prevention's model aquatic health code.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.90.250 and 1987 c 222 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter applies to all water recreation facilities regardless of whether ownership is public or private and regardless of whether the intended use is commercial or private, except that this chapter shall not apply to:

(1) Any water recreation facility for the sole use of residents and invited guests at a single-family dwelling;

(2) Therapeutic water facilities operated exclusively for physical therapy; ((and))

(3) Steam baths and saunas; and

(4) Inflatable equipment operated at a temporary event, including inflatable water slides, that do not allow water to pool more than six inches and do not recirculate water.

--- END ---