BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the policy of automatic relinquishment of water rights upon periods of extended nonuse no longer strikes the proper balance of incentives towards the economically efficient use of water resources. The process of maintaining or compiling sufficiently detailed records of historic water use has proven too burdensome and unrealistic to expect of small farmers and other landowners whose understandable fear of losing their water due to relinquishment keeps them from pursuing alternative uses of their water that would require a historic use analysis. Instead, many senior water right holders are currently afraid to transfer their water rights or engage with banking programs for the trading of their water rights because the associated documentation requirements might result in the loss of the water that they currently use, in addition to the loss of the possible economic opportunity that would come from transferring or banking their water.

(2) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to substantially revise statutory processes of relinquishment and instead establish a presumption that water right holders have been putting water to beneficial use, in absence of evidence that water rights have been intentionally abandoned under common law doctrine that provides for the loss of water rights. In addition, under this new formulation of the relinquishment process, water that would previously have been deemed to be relinquished to the state for appropriation instead remains available in trust for economically beneficial uses, with a priority given to use by the original water right holder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 90.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This section applies to any person entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state under the following authorities:

(a) Through an appropriation authorized under RCW 90.03.330, 90.44.080, or 90.44.090;

(b) By virtue of ownership of land abutting a stream, lake, or watercourse; or

(c) Through any appropriation authorized by enactments of the legislature prior to enactment of chapter 117, Laws of 1917, or by custom, or by general adjudication.

(2) In the absence of information conclusively demonstrating that a person abandoned a right to divert or withdraw water, or voluntarily failed to beneficially use all or part of a right to divert or withdraw water, the department of ecology shall presume that the water has been applied to beneficial use in a manner sufficient to retain the entirety of the water right.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.14.130 and 2013 c 23 s 607 are each amended to read as follows:

When ((it appears to)) the department of ecology has conclusive evidence demonstrating that a person entitled to the use of water has not beneficially used his or her water right or some portion thereof, and it appears that said right ((has or may have reverted to the state)) is or may be subject to relinquishment to the trust consistent with RCW 90.42.040(1)(b) because of such nonuse, ((as provided by RCW 90.14.160, 90.14.170, or 90.14.180,)) the department of ecology shall notify such person by order((: PROVIDED, That where a company, association, district, or the United States has filed a blanket claim under the provisions of RCW 90.14.060 for the total benefits of those served by it, the notice shall be served on such company, association, district or the United States and not upon any of its individual water users who may not have used the water or some portion thereof which they were entitled to use)). The order shall contain: (1) A description of the water right, including the approximate location of the point of diversion, the general description of the lands or places where such waters were used, the water source, the amount involved, the purpose of use, and the apparent authority upon which the right is based; (2) a statement that unless sufficient cause be shown on appeal the water right will be declared relinquished to the trust consistent with RCW 90.42.040(1); and (3) a statement that such order may be appealed to the pollution control hearings board. Any person aggrieved by such an order may appeal it to the pollution control hearings board pursuant to RCW 43.21B.310. The order shall be served by registered or certified mail to the last known address of the person and be posted at the point of division or withdrawal. The order by itself shall not alter the recipient's right to use water, if any.

Sec. 4. RCW 90.42.040 and 2009 c 283 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A trust water right acquired by the state shall be placed in the state trust water rights program to be managed by the department. The department shall exercise its authorities under the law in a manner that protects trust water rights.

(a) Trust water rights acquired by the state, except for trust water rights acquired under RCW 90.14.130, shall be held in trust and authorized for use by the department for instream flows, irrigation, municipal, or other beneficial uses consistent with applicable regional plans for pilot planning areas, or to resolve critical water supply problems.

(b) Trust water rights acquired through relinquishment under RCW 90.14.130 shall be held in trust and made available for irrigation, municipal, and other beneficial uses, made available under water banking programs consistent with RCW 90.42.100 through 90.42.170, or used to resolve critical water supply problems.

(i) Each year, priority use of trust water rights acquired under RCW 90.14.130 may be retained by the person who relinquished the water right upon notification to the department that the person plans in the coming year to put the relinquished water right to the same beneficial use to which the relinquished water right had initially been applied. Upon one such notification, subsequent notification to the department is not required to retain the water right and the person is deemed to have retained the full extent of the original water right, including the original volume, priority, and beneficial use, unless and until the water is relinquished again to trust consistent with RCW 90.14.130.

(ii) In absence of notification by the most recent possessor of the relinquished water right, the department shall apply the water right for the forthcoming year for other uses authorized under this subsection (1)(b).

(iii) The department may not apply trust water rights acquired through relinquishment under RCW 90.14.130 for a period exceeding one year and the application of the water right may not be considered a permanent appropriation or use of the trust water.

(c) The state may acquire a groundwater right to be placed in the state trust water rights program. To the extent practicable and subject to legislative appropriation, trust water rights acquired in an area with an approved watershed plan developed under chapter 90.82 RCW shall be consistent with that plan if the plan calls for such acquisition. Groundwater rights acquired through relinquishment must be used consistent with (b) of this subsection.

(2) The department shall issue a water right certificate in the name of the state of Washington for each permanent trust water right conveyed or relinquished to the state indicating the quantity of water transferred to trust, the reach or reaches of the stream or the body of public groundwater that constitutes the place of use of the trust water right, and the use or uses to which it may be applied. A superseding certificate shall be issued that specifies the amount of water the water right holder would continue to be entitled to as a result of the water conservation project. The superseding certificate shall retain the same priority date as the original right. For nonpermanent conveyances, the department shall issue certificates or such other instruments as are necessary to reflect the changes in purpose or place of use or point of diversion or withdrawal.

(3) A trust water right retains the same priority date as the water right from which it originated, but as between the two rights, the trust right shall be deemed to be inferior in priority unless otherwise specified by an agreement between the state and the party holding the original right.

(4)(a) Exercise of a trust water right may be authorized only if the department first determines that neither water rights existing at the time the trust water right is established, nor the public interest will be impaired.

(b) If impairment becomes apparent during the time a trust water right is being exercised, the department shall cease or modify the use of the trust water right to eliminate the impairment.

(c) A trust water right acquired by the state and held or authorized for beneficial use by the department is considered to be exercised as long as it is in the trust water rights program.

(d) For the purposes of RCW 90.03.380(1) and 90.42.080(9), the consumptive quantity of a trust water right acquired by the state and held or authorized for use by the department is equal to the consumptive quantity of the right prior to transfer into the trust water rights program.

(5)(a) Before any trust water right is created or modified, the department shall, at a minimum, require that a notice be published in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county or counties in which the storage, diversion, and use are to be made, and in other newspapers as the department determines is necessary, once a week for two consecutive weeks.

(b) At the same time the department shall send a notice containing pertinent information to all appropriate state agencies, potentially affected local governments and federally recognized tribal governments, and other interested parties.

(c) For a trust water right donation described in RCW 90.42.080(1)(b), or for a trust water right lease described in RCW 90.42.080(8) that does not exceed five years, the department may post equivalent information on its web site to meet the notice requirements in (a) of this subsection and may send pertinent information by email to meet the notice requirements in (b) of this subsection.

(6) RCW 90.14.140 through 90.14.230 have no applicability to trust water rights held by the department under this chapter or exercised under this section.

(7) RCW 90.03.380 has no applicability to trust water rights acquired by the state through the funding of water conservation projects.

(8) Subsection (4)(a) of this section does not apply to a trust water right resulting from a donation for instream flows described in RCW 90.42.080(1)(b) or to a trust water right leased under RCW 90.42.080(8) if the period of the lease does not exceed five years.

(9) Where a portion of an existing water right that is acquired or donated to the trust water rights program will assist in achieving established instream flows, the department shall process the change or amendment of the existing right without conducting a review of the extent and validity of the portion of the water right that will remain with the water right holder.

Sec. 5. RCW 90.14.160 and 1981 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state through any appropriation authorized by enactments of the legislature prior to enactment of chapter 117, Laws of 1917, or by custom, or by general adjudication, who abandons the same, or who voluntarily fails, without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of said right to divert or withdraw for any period of five successive years after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or portion thereof, and said right or portion thereof shall revert to ((the state, and the waters affected by said right shall become available for appropriation in accordance with RCW 90.03.250)) trust for application consistent with RCW 90.42.040(1)(b).

Sec. 6. RCW 90.14.170 and 2013 c 23 s 608 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state by virtue of his or her ownership of land abutting a stream, lake, or watercourse, who abandons the same, or who voluntarily fails, without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of said right to withdraw or divert said water for any period of five successive years after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or portion thereof, and such right or portion thereof shall revert to ((the state, and the waters affected by said right shall become available for appropriation in accordance with the provisions of RCW 90.03.250)) trust for application consistent with RCW 90.42.040(1)(b).

Sec. 7. RCW 90.14.180 and 1987 c 109 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person hereafter entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state through an appropriation authorized under RCW 90.03.330, 90.44.080, or 90.44.090 who abandons the same, or who voluntarily fails, without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of said right to withdraw for any period of five successive years shall relinquish such right or portion thereof, and such right or portion thereof shall revert to ((the state, and the waters affected by said right shall become available for appropriation in accordance with RCW 90.03.250. All certificates hereafter issued by the department of ecology pursuant to RCW 90.03.330 shall expressly incorporate this section by reference)) trust for application consistent with RCW 90.42.040(1)(b).

Sec. 8. RCW 90.03.360 and 1994 c 264 s 85 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The owner or owners of any water diversion shall maintain, to the satisfaction of the department of ecology, substantial controlling works and a measuring device constructed and maintained to permit accurate measurement and practical regulation of the flow of water diverted. Every owner or manager of a reservoir for the storage of water shall construct and maintain, when required by the department, any measuring device necessary to ascertain the natural flow into and out of said reservoir.

Metering of diversions or measurement by other approved methods shall be required as a condition for all new surface water right permits, and except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and RCW 90.03.380(1), may be required as a condition for all previously existing surface water rights. The department may also require, as a condition for all water rights, metering of diversions, and reports regarding such metered diversions as to the amount of water being diverted. Such reports shall be in a form prescribed by the department.

(2) Where water diversions are from waters in which the salmonid stock status is depressed or critical, as determined by the department of fish and wildlife, or where the volume of water being diverted exceeds one cubic foot per second, the department shall require metering or measurement by other approved methods as a condition for all new and previously existing water rights or claims. The department shall attempt to integrate the requirements of this subsection into its existing compliance workload priorities, but shall prioritize the requirements of this subsection ahead of the existing compliance workload where a delay may cause the decline of wild salmonids. The department shall notify the department of fish and wildlife of the status of fish screens associated with these diversions.

This subsection (2) shall not apply to diversions for public or private hatcheries or fish rearing facilities if the diverted water is returned directly to the waters from which it was diverted.

Sec. 9. RCW 90.03.380 and 2011 c 112 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows, averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right. Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the point of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a written application therefor with the department, and the application shall not be granted until notice of the application is published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. The department may not require the installation of new metering for purposes of measuring annual consumptive quantity of water under this section in support of a transfer, sale, or partial transfer or sale of a water right. Instead, the department must rely on existing water use data that is available to the applicant and the department for purposes of determining whether a change can be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. If it shall appear that such transfer or such change may be made without injury or detriment to existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate in duplicate granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be made a record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued to the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner and with the same effect as provided in the original certificate or permit to divert water. The time period that the water right was banked under RCW 90.92.070, in an approved local water plan created under RCW 90.92.090, or the water right was subject to an agreement to not divert under RCW 90.92.050 will not be included in the most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use for the purpose of determining the annual consumptive quantity under this section. If the water right has not been used during the previous five years but the nonuse of which qualifies for one or more of the statutory good causes or exceptions to relinquishment in RCW 90.14.140 and 90.44.520, the period of nonuse is not included in the most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use for purposes of determining the annual consumptive quantity of water under this section.

(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made without detriment or injury to existing rights.

(4) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by the state through the funding of water conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.

(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.

(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.

(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process applications, including but not limited to the authority to process applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what information is not available and informs the applicant that processing of the next application will begin. The previously filed application does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any other existing authority to process applications.

(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the processing of applications for new water rights.

(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program, or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.

(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions of this section not expressly added or revised.

(8) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by this subsection shall not be construed as requiring a change or transfer of any existing water right to enable the holder of the right to store water governed by the right.

(9) This section does not apply to a water right involved in an approved local water plan created under RCW 90.92.090, a water right that is subject to an agreement not to divert under RCW 90.92.050, or a banked water right under RCW 90.92.070.

(10)(a) The department may only approve an application submitted after July 22, 2011, for an interbasin water rights transfer after providing notice electronically to the board of county commissioners in the county of origin upon receipt of an application.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Interbasin water rights transfer" means a transfer of a water right for which the proposed point of diversion is in a different basin than the proposed place of beneficial use.

(ii) "County of origin" means the county from which a water right is transferred or proposed to be transferred.

(c) This subsection applies to counties located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

Sec. 10. RCW 90.03.380 and 2011 c 112 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows, averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right. Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the point of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a written application therefor with the department, and the application shall not be granted until notice of the application is published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. The department may not require the installation of new metering for purposes of measuring annual consumptive quantity of water under this section in support of a transfer, sale, or partial transfer or sale of a water right. Instead, the department must rely on existing water use data that is available to the applicant and the department for purposes of determining whether a change can be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. If it shall appear that such transfer or such change may be made without injury or detriment to existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate in duplicate granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be made a record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued to the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner and with the same effect as provided in the original certificate or permit to divert water.

(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made without detriment or injury to existing rights.

(4) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by the state through the funding of water conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.

(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.

(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.

(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process applications, including but not limited to the authority to process applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what information is not available and informs the applicant that processing of the next application will begin. The previously filed application does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any other existing authority to process applications.

(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the processing of applications for new water rights.

(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program, or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.

(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions of this section not expressly added or revised.

(8) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by this subsection shall not be construed as requiring a change or transfer of any existing water right to enable the holder of the right to store water governed by the right.

(9)(a) The department may only approve an application submitted after June 30, 2019, for an interbasin water rights transfer after providing notice electronically to the board of county commissioners in the county of origin upon receipt of an application.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Interbasin water rights transfer" means a transfer of a water right for which the proposed point of diversion is in a different basin than the proposed place of beneficial use.

(ii) "County of origin" means the county from which a water right is transferred or proposed to be transferred.

(c) This subsection applies to counties located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

Sec. 11. RCW 90.03.615 and 2009 c 283 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of calculating annual consumptive quantity as defined under RCW 90.03.380(1), if, within the most recent five-year period, the water right has been in the trust water rights program under chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW, or the nonuse of the water right has been excused from relinquishment to trust under RCW 90.14.140, the department shall look to the most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use preceding the date where the excuse for nonuse under RCW 90.14.140 was established and remained in effect.

Sec. 12. RCW 90.03.635 and 2009 c 332 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Within the date set by the court for filing evidence, each claimant shall file with the court evidence to support the claimant's adjudication claims. The court is encouraged to set a date for filing evidence that is reasonable and fair for the timely processing of the adjudication. The evidence may include, without limitation, permits or certificates of water right, statements of claim made under chapter 90.14 RCW, deeds, documents related to issuance of a land patent, aerial photographs, decrees of previous water rights adjudications, crop records, records of livestock purchases and sales, records of power use, metering records, declarations containing testimonial evidence, records of diversion, withdrawal or storage and delivery by irrigation districts or ditch companies, and any other evidence to support that a water right was obtained and was not thereafter abandoned or relinquished to trust. The evidence filed may include matters that are outside the original adjudication claim filed, and within the date set by the court for filing evidence, the claimant may amend the adjudication claim to conform to the evidence filed. Thereafter, except for good cause shown, a claimant may not file additional evidence to support the claim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The department may not retain annual consumptive use data provided pursuant to RCW 90.03.380 for a period longer than is necessary to finalize the determination on the water right transfer application. Within thirty days of a final decision by the department on an application under RCW 90.03.380, the department must transfer all annual consumptive use data to the department of agriculture. Annual consumptive use data in the possession of the department of ecology or the department of agriculture is not subject to disclosure under section 14 of this act. However, the department of agriculture must certify, upon the request of a third party, whether the annual consumptive use was equal to the full amount of the appropriated water right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW to read as follows:

Consistent with section 13 of this act, annual consumptive water use data submitted under RCW 90.03.380 is exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. Section 9 of this act expires June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. Section 10 of this act takes effect June 30, 2019.

--- END ---