BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.56.430 and 2008 c 252 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The following information relating to fish and wildlife is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:

(1) Commercial fishing catch data from logbooks required to be provided to the department of fish and wildlife under RCW 77.12.047, when the data identifies specific catch location, timing, or methodology and the release of which would result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the commercial fisher providing the catch data, however, this information may be released to government agencies concerned with the management of fish and wildlife resources;

(2) Sensitive fish and wildlife data. Sensitive fish and wildlife data may be released to the following entities and their agents for fish, wildlife, land management purposes, or scientific research needs: Government agencies, public utilities, and accredited colleges and universities. Sensitive fish and wildlife data may be released to tribal governments. Sensitive fish and wildlife data may also be released to the owner, lessee, or right-of-way or easement holder of the private land to which the data pertains. The release of sensitive fish and wildlife data may be subject to a confidentiality agreement, except upon release of sensitive fish and wildlife data to the owner, lessee, or right-of-way or easement holder of private land who initially provided the data. Sensitive fish and wildlife data does not include data related to reports of predatory wildlife as specified in RCW 77.12.885. Sensitive fish and wildlife data must meet at least one of the following criteria of this subsection as applied by the department of fish and wildlife:

(a) The nesting sites or specific locations of endangered species designated under RCW 77.12.020, or threatened or sensitive species classified by rule of the department of fish and wildlife;

(b) Radio frequencies used in, or locational data generated by, telemetry studies; or

(c) Other location data that could compromise the viability of a specific fish or wildlife population, and where at least one of the following criteria are met:

(i) The species has a known commercial or black market value;

(ii) There is a history of malicious take of that species and the species behavior or ecology renders it especially vulnerable;

(iii) There is a known demand to visit, take, or disturb the species; or

(iv) The species has an extremely limited distribution and concentration;

(3) The following information regarding any damage prevention cooperative agreement, or nonlethal preventative measures deployed to minimize wolf interactions with pets and livestock:

(a) The name, telephone number, residential address, and other personally identifying information, of any person, including a pet or livestock owner, and his or her employees or immediate family members, who agrees to deploy, or is responsible for the deployment of nonlethal, preventative measures; and

(b) The legal description or name of any residential property, ranch, or farm, that is owned, leased, or used by any person included in (a) of this subsection;

(4) The following information regarding a reported depredation by wolves on pets or livestock:

(a) The name, telephone number, residential address, and other personally identifying information, of:

(i) Any person who reported the depredation;

(ii) Any pet or livestock owner, and his or her employees or immediate family members, whose pet or livestock was the subject of a reported depredation; and

(iii) Any department of fish and wildlife employee, range rider contractor, or trapper contractor who directly:

(A) Responds to a depredation; or

(B) Assists in the lethal removal of a wolf;

(b) The legal description or name of any residential property, ranch, or farm, that is owned, leased, or used by any person included in (a) of this subsection; and

(c) Any information regarding the location of the depredation to the extent that such information contains personally identifying information or reasonably could be used to personally identify any person or the address or location of any private residential property;

(5) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire recreational licenses under RCW 77.32.010 or commercial licenses under chapter 77.65 or 77.70 RCW, except name, address of contact used by the department, and type of license, endorsement, or tag; however, the department of fish and wildlife may disclose personally identifying information to:

(a) Government agencies concerned with the management of fish and wildlife resources;

(b) The department of social and health services, child support division, and to the department of licensing in order to implement RCW 77.32.014 and 46.20.291; and

(c) Law enforcement agencies for the purpose of firearm possession enforcement under RCW 9.41.040; and

(((4))) (6) Information that the department of fish and wildlife has received or accessed but may not disclose due to confidentiality requirements in the Magnuson-Stevens fishery conservation and management reauthorization act of 2006 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1861(h)(3) and (i), and Sec. 1881a(b)).

Sec. 2. RCW 77.12.885 and 2007 c 293 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except for the personal information on reported depredations by wolves that is exempted from disclosure as provided in RCW 42.56.430, the department shall post on its internet web site all reported predatory wildlife interactions, including reported human safety confrontations or sightings as well as the known details of reported depredations by predatory wildlife on humans, pets, or livestock, within ten days of receiving the report. The posted material must include, but is not limited to, the location and time, the known details, and a running summary of such reported interactions by identified specie and interaction type within each affected county. For the purposes of this section and RCW 42.56.430, "predatory wildlife" means grizzly bears, wolves, and cougars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW to read as follows:

By December 1, 2021, the public records exemptions accountability committee, in addition to its duties in RCW 42.56.140, must prepare and submit a report to the legislature that includes recommendations on whether the exemptions created in section 1, chapter . . ., Laws of 2017 (section 1 of this act) should be continued or allowed to expire. The report should focus on whether the exemption continues to serve the intent of the legislature in section 1, chapter . . ., Laws of 2017 (section 1 of this act) to provide protections of personal information during the period the state establishes and implements new policies regarding wolf management. The committee must consider whether the development of wolf management policy, by the time of the report, has diminished risks of threats to personal safety so that the protection of personal information in section 1, chapter . . ., Laws of 2017 (section 1 of this act) is no longer an ongoing necessity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act expires June 30, 2022.

--- END ---