BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.24.070 and 2009 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Declarations of candidacy shall be filed with the following filing officers:

(1) The secretary of state for declarations of candidacy for statewide offices, United States senate, ((and)) United States house of representatives, and for the state legislature;

(2) The secretary of state for declarations of candidacy for ((the state legislature,)) the court of appeals, and the superior court when the candidate is seeking office in a district comprised of voters from two or more counties;

(3)(a) The county auditor for all other offices. For any nonpartisan office, other than judicial offices and school director in joint districts, where voters from a district comprising more than one county vote upon the candidates, a declaration of candidacy shall be filed with the county auditor of the county in which a majority of the registered voters of the district reside. For school directors in joint school districts, the declaration of candidacy shall be filed with the county auditor of the county designated by the superintendent of public instruction as the county to which the joint school district is considered as belonging under RCW 28A.323.040.

(b) Each county auditor must provide access to the state electronic filing system for candidates filing electronically under RCW 29A.24.040.

Each official with whom declarations of candidacy are filed under this section, within one business day following the closing of the applicable filing period, shall transmit to the public disclosure commission the information required in RCW 29A.24.031 (1) through (4) for each declaration of candidacy filed in his or her office during such filing period or a list containing the name of each candidate who files such a declaration in his or her office during such filing period together with a precise identification of the position sought by each such candidate and the date on which each such declaration was filed. Such official, within three days following his or her receipt of any letter withdrawing a person's name as a candidate, shall also forward a copy of such withdrawal letter to the public disclosure commission.

Sec. 2. RCW 29A.24.091 and 2009 c 106 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A filing fee of ten dollars shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any office with a fixed annual salary of one thousand dollars or less; a filing fee equal to one percent of the annual salary of the office at the time of filing shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any office with a fixed annual salary of more than one thousand dollars per annum. No filing fee need accompany a declaration of candidacy for precinct committee officer or any office for which compensation is on a per diem or per meeting attended basis.

A candidate who lacks sufficient assets or income at the time of filing to pay the filing fee required by this section shall submit with his or her declaration of candidacy a filing fee petition. The petition shall contain not less than a number of signatures of registered voters equal to the number of dollars of the filing fee. The signatures shall be of voters registered to vote within the jurisdiction of the office for which the candidate is filing.

When the candidacy is for:

(1) A statewide office, the United States senate, or the United States house of representatives, the fee shall be paid to the secretary of state;

(2) A ((legislative or)) judicial office that includes territory from more than one county or a legislative office, the fee shall be paid to the secretary of state for equal division between the treasuries of the counties comprising ((the)) each district;

(3) A ((legislative or)) judicial office that includes territory from only one county, the fee shall be paid to the county auditor;

(4) A city or town office, the fee shall be paid to the county auditor who shall transmit it to the city or town clerk for deposit in the city or town treasury.

--- END ---