BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.68.113 and 2013 c 306 s 704 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, cities and towns shall provide to the transportation commission, or its successor entity, preservation rating information on at least seventy percent of the total city and town arterial network. Thereafter, the preservation rating information requirement shall increase in five percent increments in subsequent biennia, but in no case shall it exceed eighty percent. The rating system used by cities and towns must be based upon the Washington state pavement rating method or an equivalent standard approved by the department of transportation. Beginning January 1, 2007, the preservation rating information shall be submitted to the department.

(2) ((Cities and towns are exempt from the requirement to report preservation rating information to the department or the transportation commission through the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.)) The requirement that cities and towns report preservation rating information to the department of transportation or the transportation commission under subsection (1) of this section is eliminated during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

(3) The department of transportation shall, in consultation with cities, towns, and the transportation commission, review the pavement preservation rating reporting requirements and recommend to the legislature whether a repeal of the pavement preservation rating report is warranted. In its analysis, the department shall determine (a) what pavement preservation rating information exists through other reporting requirements and how the department's migration toward an asset management accountability framework affects the pavement preservation rating report, and (b) whether such other reporting requirements will serve as a replacement, or an addition, to the report. The department must report its findings to the legislature by December 1, 2017.

--- END ---