BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not preclude counties from authorizing inspections of on-site sewage systems to be conducted by a homeowner, a homeowner's family member, or a homeowner's tenant that has completed certification requirements specified by the county. Nothing in this section eliminates the requirement that counties protect water quality consistent with RCW 36.70A.070 (1) and (5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 70.118A RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter prohibits a county from relying on self-inspection of on-site sewage systems consistent with section 1 of this act or eliminates the requirement that counties protect water quality consistent with RCW 36.70A.070 (1) and (5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 70.05 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter prohibits a county from relying on self-inspection of on-site sewage systems consistent with section 1 of this act or eliminates the requirement that counties protect water quality consistent with RCW 36.70A.070 (1) and (5).

--- END ---