BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.19.010 and 2014 c 124 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A natural person who has a disability that meets one of the following criteria may apply for special parking privileges:

(a) Cannot walk two hundred feet without stopping to rest;

(b) Is severely limited in ability to walk due to arthritic, neurological, or orthopedic condition;

(c) Has such a severe disability that the person cannot walk without the use of or assistance from a brace, cane, another person, prosthetic device, wheelchair, or other assistive device;

(d) Uses portable oxygen;

(e) Is restricted by lung disease to an extent that forced expiratory respiratory volume, when measured by spirometry, is less than one liter per second or the arterial oxygen tension is less than sixty mm/hg on room air at rest;

(f) Impairment by cardiovascular disease or cardiac condition to the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified as class III or IV under standards accepted by the American heart association;

(g) Has a disability resulting from an acute sensitivity to automobile emissions that limits or impairs the ability to walk. The personal physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician assistant of the applicant shall document that the disability is comparable in severity to the others listed in this subsection;

(h) Has limited mobility and has no vision or whose vision with corrective lenses is so limited that the person requires alternative methods or skills to do efficiently those things that are ordinarily done with sight by persons with normal vision;

(i) Has an eye condition of a progressive nature that may lead to blindness; or

(j) Is restricted by a form of porphyria to the extent that the applicant would significantly benefit from a decrease in exposure to light.

(2) The disability must be determined by either:

(a) A licensed physician;

(b) An advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; or

(c) A physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A or 18.57A RCW.

(3) A health care practitioner listed under subsection (2) of this section who is authorizing a parking permit for purposes of this chapter must provide a signed written authorization: On ((tamper-resistant)) a prescription pad or paper, as defined in RCW 18.64.500((, if the practitioner has prescriptive authority. An authorized health care practitioner without prescriptive authority must provide the signed written authorization on his or her office letterhead. Such authorizations must be attached to the application for special parking privileges for persons with disabilities)); on office letterhead; or by electronic means, as described by the director in rule.

(4) The application for special parking privileges for persons with disabilities must contain:

(a) The following statement immediately below the physician's, advanced registered nurse practitioner's, or physician assistant's signature: "A parking permit for a person with disabilities may be issued only for a medical necessity that severely affects mobility or involves acute sensitivity to light (RCW 46.19.010). An applicant or health care practitioner who knowingly provides false information on this application is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. The penalty is up to three hundred sixty-four days in jail and a fine of up to $5,000 or both. In addition, the health care practitioner may be subject to sanctions under chapter 18.130 RCW, the Uniform Disciplinary Act"; and

(b) Other information as required by the department.

(5) A natural person who has a disability described in subsection (1) of this section and is expected to improve within twelve months may be issued a temporary placard for a period not to exceed twelve months. If the disability exists after twelve months, a new temporary placard must be issued upon receipt of a new application with certification from the person's physician as prescribed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section. Special license plates for persons with disabilities may not be issued to a person with a temporary disability.

(6) A natural person who qualifies for special parking privileges under this section must receive an identification card showing the name and date of birth of the person to whom the parking privilege has been issued and the serial number of the placard.

(7) A natural person who qualifies for permanent special parking privileges under this section may receive one of the following:

(a) Up to two parking placards;

(b) One set of special license plates for persons with disabilities if the person with the disability is the registered owner of the vehicle on which the license plates will be displayed;

(c) One parking placard and one set of special license plates for persons with disabilities if the person with the disability is the registered owner of the vehicle on which the license plates will be displayed; or

(d) One special parking year tab for persons with disabilities and one parking placard.

(8) Parking placards and identification cards described in this section must be issued free of charge.

(9) The parking placard and identification card must be immediately returned to the department upon the placard holder's death.

--- END ---