BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds:

(a) The community health worker task force was convened in 2015 to develop policy and system change recommendations related to the community health worker workforce. The task force considered the continuum of community health workers, from volunteers, to generalists who support the health and well-being of individuals and communities, to those who work in specialized roles.

(b) The task force issued a report with recommendations related to: The definition, roles, skills, and qualities of community health workers; community health worker training and education; and finance-related matters.

(c) As part of its report, the task force recommended that the state of Washington adopt the following definition: A "community health worker" is a frontline public health worker who is a trusted member of or who has a uniquely close understanding of the community served. This trusting relationship enables the worker to serve as a liaison, link, or intermediary between health and social services and the community to facilitate access to services and improve the quality and cultural competence of service delivery.

(2) The department of health, in coordination with the health care authority, shall prepare a report describing the progress to date on detailing each agency's work plan for implementing the recommendations of the community health worker task force and supporting the development of a sustainable community health worker workforce in the state. The report must include milestones and progress made to date to meet those milestones. The report must also identify which work plan items require legislative action and describe that action. The department of health shall submit the report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2017.

--- END ---