BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

Narrowing the Use Tax Exemption for Extracted Fuel

Sec. 101. RCW 82.12.0263 and 1980 c 37 s 62 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply in respect to the use of biomass fuel by the extractor or manufacturer thereof when used directly in the operation of the particular extractive operation or manufacturing plant which produced or manufactured the same. For purposes of this section, "biomass fuel" means wood waste and other wood residuals, including forest derived biomass, but does not include firewood or wood pellets. "Biomass fuel" also includes partially organic by-products of pulp, paper, and wood manufacturing processes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The value of the article used with respect to refinery fuel gas under this chapter is the most recent monthly United States natural gas wellhead price, as published by the federal energy information administration.

PART II

Modifying the Nonresident Sales and Use Tax Exemption

Sec. 201. RCW 82.08.0273 and 2014 c 140 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to)) Subject to the conditions and limitations in this section, an exemption from the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 in the form of a remittance from the department is provided for sales to nonresidents of this state of tangible personal property, digital goods, and digital codes((, when)). The exemption only applies if:

(a) The property is for use outside this state;

(b) The purchaser is a bona fide resident of a province or territory of Canada or a state, territory, or possession of the United States, other than the state of Washington; and

(i) Such state, possession, territory, or province does not impose, or have imposed on its behalf, a generally applicable retail sales tax, use tax, value added tax, gross receipts tax on retailing activities, or similar generally applicable tax, of three percent or more; or

(ii) If imposing a tax described in (b)(i) of this subsection, provides an exemption for sales to Washington residents by reason of their residence; and

(c) The purchaser agrees, when requested, to grant the department ((of revenue)) access to such records and other forms of verification at ((his or her)) the purchaser's place of residence to assure that such purchases are not first used substantially in the state of Washington.

(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if parts or other tangible personal property are installed by the seller during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving motor vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a separate charge for the tangible personal property, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the separately stated charge to a nonresident purchaser for the tangible personal property but only if the seller certifies in writing to the purchaser that the separately stated charge does not exceed either the seller's current publicly stated retail price for the tangible personal property or, if no publicly stated retail price is available, the seller's cost for the tangible personal property. However, the exemption provided by this section does not apply if tangible personal property is installed by the seller during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving motor vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a single nonitemized charge for providing the tangible personal property and service. All of the ((requirements)) provisions in subsections (1) and (3) through (((6))) (7) of this section apply to this subsection.

(3)(a) Any person claiming exemption from retail sales tax under the provisions of this section must ((display proof of his or her current nonresident status as provided in this section)) pay the state and local sales tax to the seller at the time of purchase and then request a remittance from the department in accordance with this subsection and subsection (4) of this section. A request for remittance must include proof of the person's status as a nonresident at the time of the purchase for which a remittance is requested. The request for a remittance must also include any additional information and documentation as required by the department, which may include a description of the item purchased for which a remittance is requested, the sales price of the item, the amount of sales tax paid on the item, the date of the purchase, the name of the seller and the physical address where the sale took place, and copies of sales receipts showing the qualified purchases.

(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident person's status includes one piece of identification such as a valid driver's license from the jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid identification card which has a photograph of the holder and is issued by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification under this subsection (3)(b) must show the holder's residential address and have as one of its legal purposes the establishment of residency in that out-of-state jurisdiction.

(((c) In lieu of furnishing proof of a person's nonresident status under (b) of this subsection (3), a person claiming exemption from retail sales tax under the provisions of this section may provide the seller with an exemption certificate in compliance with subsection (4)(b) of this section.

(4)(a) Nothing in this section requires the vendor to make tax exempt retail sales to nonresidents. A vendor may choose to make sales to nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount of sales tax collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If the vendor chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting the sales tax, the vendor must examine the purchaser's proof of nonresidence, determine whether the proof is acceptable under subsection (3)(b) of this section, and maintain records for each nontaxable sale which must show the type of proof accepted, including any identification numbers where appropriate, and the expiration date, if any.

(b) In lieu of using the method provided in (a) of this subsection to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may accept from the purchaser a properly completed uniform exemption certificate approved by the streamlined sales and use tax agreement governing board or any other exemption certificate as may be authorized by the department and properly completed by the purchaser. A nonresident purchaser who uses an exemption certificate authorized in this subsection (4)(b) must include the purchaser's driver's license number or other state-issued identification number and the state of issuance.

(c) In lieu of using the methods provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.

(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements, which includes the offer of fraudulent identification or fraudulently procured identification to a vendor, in order to purchase goods without paying retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

(b) Any person making tax exempt purchases under this section by displaying proof of identification not his or her own, or counterfeit identification, with intent to violate the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the tax due on such purchases.

(6)(a) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the tax and who fails to maintain records of sales to nonresidents as provided in this section is personally liable for the amount of tax due.

(b) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the retail sales tax under this section and who has actual knowledge that the purchaser's proof of identification establishing out-of-state residency is fraudulent is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one thousand dollars or the tax due on such sales. In addition, both the purchaser and the vendor are liable for any penalties and interest assessable under chapter 82.32 RCW)) (4)(a)(i) Beginning January 1, 2018, through December 31, 2018, a person may request a remittance from the department for state sales taxes paid by the person on qualified retail purchases made in Washington between July 1, 2017, and December 31, 2017.

(ii) Beginning January 1, 2019, a person may request a remittance from the department during any calendar year for state sales taxes paid by the person on qualified retail purchases made in Washington during the immediately preceding calendar year only. No application may be made with respect to purchases made before the immediately preceding calendar year.

(b) The remittance request, including proof of nonresident status and any other documentation and information required by the department, must be provided in a form and manner as prescribed by the department. Only one remittance request may be made by a person per calendar year.

(c) The total amount of a remittance request must be at least twenty-five dollars. The department must deny any request for a remittance that is less than twenty-five dollars.

(d) The department will examine the applicant's proof of nonresident status and any other documentation and information as required in the application to determine whether the applicant is entitled to a remittance under this section.

(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements to the department, which includes the offer of fraudulent or fraudulently procured identification or fraudulent sales receipts, in order to receive a remittance of retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW and is ineligible to receive any further remittances from the department under this section.

(b) Any person obtaining a remittance of retail sales tax from the department by providing proof of identification or sales receipts not the person's own, or counterfeit identification or sales receipts is (i) liable for repayment of the remittance, including interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW from the date the remittance was transmitted to the person until repaid in full, (ii) liable for a civil penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the amount of the remittance obtained in violation of this subsection (5)(b), and (iii) ineligible to receive any further remittances from the department under this section.

(c) Any person assisting another person in obtaining a remittance of retail sales tax in violation of (b) of this subsection (5) is jointly and severally liable for amounts due under (b) of this subsection (5) and is also ineligible to receive any further remittances from the department under this section.

(6) A person who receives a refund of sales tax from the seller for any reason with respect to a purchase made in this state is not entitled to a remittance for the tax paid on the purchase. A person who receives both a remittance under this section and a refund of sales tax from the seller with respect to the same purchase must immediately repay the remittance to the department. Interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW applies to amounts due under this section from the date that the department made the remittance until the amount due under this subsection is paid to the department. A person who receives a remittance with respect to a purchase for which the person had, at the time the person submitted the application for a remittance, already received a refund of sales tax from the seller is also liable for a civil penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the amount of the remittance obtained in violation of this subsection (6) and is ineligible to receive any further remittances from the department under this section.

(7) The exemption provided by this section is only for the state portion of the sales tax. For purposes of this section, the state portion of the sales tax is not reduced by any local sales tax that is deducted or credited against the state sales tax as provided by law.

(((7))) (8) The exemption in this section does not apply to sales of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

PART III

Eliminating Sales and Use Tax Exemption for Bottled Water

Sec. 301. RCW 82.08.0293 and 2014 c 140 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of food and food ingredients. "Food and food ingredients" means substances, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed for their taste or nutritional value. "Food and food ingredients" does not include:

(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by volume;

(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco; and

(c) Marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft drinks, bottled water, or dietary supplements. ((For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:)) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Bottled water" means water that is placed in a safety sealed container or package for human consumption. Bottled water is calorie free and does not contain sweeteners or other additives except that it may contain: (i) Antimicrobial agents; (ii) fluoride; (iii) carbonation; (iv) vitamins, minerals, and electrolytes; (v) oxygen; (vi) preservatives; and (vii) only those flavors, extracts, or essences derived from a spice or fruit. "Bottled water" includes water that is delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water.

(b) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco, intended to supplement the diet that:

(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients:

(A) A vitamin;

(B) A mineral;

(C) An herb or other botanical;

(D) An amino acid;

(E) A dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by increasing the total dietary intake; or

(F) A concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination of any ingredient described in this subsection;

(ii) Is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel, gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such form, is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and

(iii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement, identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003.

(((b))) (c)(i) "Prepared food" means:

(A) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;

(B) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller, including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to transport the food; or

(C) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a single item, except:

(I) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller; or

(II) Raw eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the federal food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The Food Code, published by the food and drug administration, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness.

(ii) "Prepared food" does not include the following food or food ingredients, if the food or food ingredients are sold without eating utensils provided by the seller:

(A) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American industry classification system (NAICS) classification is manufacturing in sector 311, except subsector 3118 (bakeries), as provided in the "North American industry classification system—United States, 2002";

(B) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single item; or

(C) Bakery items. The term "bakery items" includes bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, or tortillas.

(((c))) (d) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages that contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice by volume.

(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section applies to food and food ingredients that are furnished, prepared, or served as meals:

(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW 74.38.040(6);

(b) That are provided to senior citizens, individuals with disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or

(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income senior housing facility" means a facility:

(i) That meets the definition of a qualified low-income housing project under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue code, as existing on August 1, 2009;

(ii) That has been partially funded under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1485; and

(iii) For which the lessor or operator has at any time been entitled to claim a federal income tax credit under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue code.

(4)(a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail sale of food and food ingredients is subject to sales tax under RCW 82.08.020 if the food and food ingredients are sold through a vending machine. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the selling price of food and food ingredients sold through a vending machine for purposes of RCW 82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.

(b) For soft drinks and hot prepared food and food ingredients, other than food and food ingredients which are heated after they have been dispensed from the vending machine, the selling price is the total gross receipts of such sales divided by the sum of one plus the sales tax rate expressed as a decimal.

(c) For tax collected under this subsection (4), the requirements that the tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be stated as a separate item are waived.

Sec. 302. RCW 82.12.0293 and 2011 c 2 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of food and food ingredients for human consumption. "Food and food ingredients" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft drinks, bottled water, or dietary supplements. "Prepared food," "soft drinks," "bottled water," and "dietary supplements" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.08.0293.

(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section applies to food and food ingredients which are furnished, prepared, or served as meals:

(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW 74.38.040(6);

(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, individuals with disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or

(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income senior housing facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the conditions in this section, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of bottled water dispensed or to be dispensed to patients pursuant to a prescription for use in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease or medical condition.

(2) For purposes of this section, "prescription" means an order, formula, or recipe issued in any form of oral, written, electronic, or other means of transmission by a duly licensed practitioner authorized by the laws of this state to prescribe.

(3) Except for sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, sellers must collect tax on sales subject to this exemption. Any buyer that has paid at least twenty-five dollars in state and local sales taxes on purchases of bottled water subject to this exemption may apply for a refund of the taxes directly from the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The department must deny any refund application if the amount of the refund requested is less than twenty-five dollars. No refund may be made for taxes paid more than four years after the end of the calendar year in which the tax was paid to the seller.

(4) With respect to sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, buyers claiming the exemption provided in this section must provide the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of bottled water dispensed or to be dispensed to patients pursuant to a prescription for use in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease or medical condition.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "prescription" has the same meaning as provided in section 303 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to the conditions in this section, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of bottled water to persons whose primary source of drinking water is unsafe.

(b) For purposes of this subsection and section 306 of this act, a person's primary source of drinking water is unsafe if:

(i) The public water system providing the drinking water has issued a public notification that the drinking water may pose a health risk, and the notification is still in effect on the date that the bottled water was purchased;

(ii) Test results on the person's drinking water, which are no more than twelve months old, from a laboratory certified to perform drinking water testing show that the person's drinking water does not meet safe drinking water standards applicable to public water systems; or

(iii) The person otherwise establishes, to the department's satisfaction, that the person's drinking water does not meet safe drinking water standards applicable to public water systems.

(2) Except for sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, sellers must collect tax on sales subject to this exemption. Any buyer that has paid at least twenty-five dollars in state and local sales taxes on purchases of bottled water subject to this exemption may apply for a refund of the taxes directly from the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The department must deny any refund application if the amount of the refund requested is less than twenty-five dollars. No refund may be made for taxes paid more than four years after the end of the calendar year in which the tax was paid to the seller.

(3)(a) With respect to sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, buyers claiming the exemption provided in this section must provide the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(b) The department may waive the requirement for an exemption certificate in the event of disaster or similar circumstance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of bottled water by persons whose primary source of drinking water is unsafe as provided in section 305 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307. Sections 303 through 306 of this act are not subject to RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808.

PART IV

Real Estate Excise Tax on Foreclosures

Sec. 401. RCW 82.45.010 and 2014 c 58 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" has its ordinary meaning and includes any conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein or other contract under which possession of the property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of improvements constructed upon leased land.

(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition within any twelve-month period of a controlling interest in any entity with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable consideration.

(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or acquired within a twelve-month period, the date that the option agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons acting in concert must be aggregated for purposes of determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest has taken place. The department must adopt standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a rule for this purpose, the department must consider the following:

(i) Persons must be treated as acting in concert when they have a relationship with each other such that one person influences or controls the actions of another through common ownership; and

(ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they must be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other purchasers, then the acquisitions are considered separate acquisitions.

(3) The term "sale" does not include:

(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.

(b) A transfer by transfer on death deed, to the extent that it is not in satisfaction of a contractual obligation of the decedent owed to the recipient of the property.

(c) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type mentioned above.

(d) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of ((a mortgage)) either a mortgage or deed of trust, except to the extent of any additional consideration provided to the grantor.

(e) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or as the result of a court decree.

(f) The assignment of property or interest in property from one spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.

(g) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.

(h) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.

(i) A mortgage, deed of trust, or other transfer of an interest in real property merely to secure a debt, or the assignment, reconveyance, or release thereof.

(j) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a foreclosure of a mortgage or deed of trust or an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment((, or deed in lieu of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust)) pursuant to chapter 6.17 RCW, but only when:

(i) The transfer or conveyance is to other than the mortgagee, beneficiary of the deed of trust, lienholder, or judgment creditor, and the selling price exceeds the amount of the lien, security interest, or judgment that is the subject of the foreclosure or execution; or

(ii) The transfer or conveyance is to the United States, this state, or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.

(k) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or veterans administration.

(l) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax was first imposed.

(m) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.

(n) A sale by the United States, this state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.

(o) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW 81.112.300.

(p) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner. However, if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (i) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (iii) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, within three years of the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid within sixty days of becoming due, excise taxes become due and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.

(q)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation, liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.

(ii) However, the transfer described in (q)(i) of this subsection cannot be preceded or followed within a twelve-month period by another transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise exempt transfer or transfers described in (q)(i) of this subsection, results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(q)(ii) does not apply to that part of the transfer involving property received that is the real property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under this subsection (3)(q)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who previously held a controlling interest in the entity.

(r) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, that takes place on or after June 12, 2008, but before December 31, 2018.

Sec. 402. RCW 82.45.080 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 210 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the tax levied under this chapter is the obligation of the seller and the department may, at the department's option, enforce the obligation through an action of debt against the seller or the department may proceed in the manner prescribed for the foreclosure of mortgages. The department's use of one course of enforcement is not an election not to pursue the other.

(2) When a transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure of a mortgage, deed of trust, lien, or enforcement of a judgment is subject to tax under this chapter, and notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the tax levied under this chapter is the obligation of the transferee or grantee, and provisions of this chapter applicable to the seller apply to the transferee or grantee. The department may enforce the obligation against the transferee or grantee as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) For purposes of this section and notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the seller is the parent corporation of a wholly owned subsidiary, when such subsidiary is the transferor to a third-party transferee and the subsidiary is dissolved before paying the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to section 401 of this act.

PART V

Limit Trade-In Exclusion

Sec. 501. RCW 82.08.010 and 2014 c 140 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1)(a)(i) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price" means the total amount of consideration, ((except separately stated trade-in property of like kind,)) including cash, credit, property, and services, for which tangible personal property, extended warranties, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or other services or anything else defined as a "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050 are sold, leased, or rented, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise. No deduction from the total amount of consideration is allowed for the following: (A) The seller's cost of the property sold; (B) the cost of materials used, labor or service cost, interest, losses, all costs of transportation to the seller, all taxes imposed on the seller, and any other expense of the seller; (C) charges by the seller for any services necessary to complete the sale, other than delivery and installation charges; (D) delivery charges; and (E) installation charges.

(ii) When tangible personal property is rented or leased under circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the "selling price" must be determined as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe;

(b) "Selling price" or "sales price" does not include:

(i) The value of separately stated trade-in property of like kind, up to a maximum amount of ten thousand dollars;

(ii) Discounts, including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;

(iii) Interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the sale of tangible personal property, extended warranties, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or other services or anything else defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050, if the amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser; and

(iv) Any taxes legally imposed directly on the consumer that are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser;

(c) "Selling price" or "sales price" includes consideration received by the seller from a third party if:

(i) The seller actually receives consideration from a party other than the purchaser, and the consideration is directly related to a price reduction or discount on the sale;

(ii) The seller has an obligation to pass the price reduction or discount through to the purchaser;

(iii) The amount of the consideration attributable to the sale is fixed and determinable by the seller at the time of the sale of the item to the purchaser; and

(iv) One of the criteria in this subsection (1)(c)(iv) is met:

(A) The purchaser presents a coupon, certificate, or other documentation to the seller to claim a price reduction or discount where the coupon, certificate, or documentation is authorized, distributed, or granted by a third party with the understanding that the third party will reimburse any seller to whom the coupon, certificate, or documentation is presented;

(B) The purchaser identifies himself or herself to the seller as a member of a group or organization entitled to a price reduction or discount, however a "preferred customer" card that is available to any patron does not constitute membership in such a group; or

(C) The price reduction or discount is identified as a third party price reduction or discount on the invoice received by the purchaser or on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation presented by the purchaser;

(2)(a) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or principal, except "seller" does not mean:

(i) The state and its departments and institutions when making sales to the state and its departments and institutions; or

(ii) A professional employer organization when a covered employee coemployed with the client under the terms of a professional employer agreement engages in activities that constitute a sale at retail that is subject to the tax imposed by this chapter. In such cases, the client, and not the professional employer organization, is deemed to be the seller and is responsible for collecting and remitting the tax imposed by this chapter.

(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, the terms "client," "covered employee," "professional employer agreement," and "professional employer organization" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.04.540;

(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association, society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;

(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal property or services for preparation and delivery to a location designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including, but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling, crating, and packing;

(5) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed material delivered to a single address;

(6) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging in business," "cash discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state," "within this state," "marijuana," "useable marijuana," and "marijuana-infused products" applies equally to the provisions of this chapter;

(7) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means personal property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or that is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. Tangible personal property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten computer software;

(8) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.050(7);

(9) The definitions in RCW 82.04.192 apply to this chapter;

(10) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW, whenever the terms "property" or "personal property" are used, those terms must be construed to include digital goods and digital codes unless:

(a) It is clear from the context that the term "personal property" is intended only to refer to tangible personal property;

(b) It is clear from the context that the term "property" is intended only to refer to tangible personal property, real property, or both; or

(c) To construe the term "property" or "personal property" as including digital goods and digital codes would yield unlikely, absurd, or strained consequences; and

(11) "Retail sale" or "sale at retail" means any sale, lease, or rental for any purpose other than for resale, sublease, or subrent.

(12) The terms "agriculture," "farming," "horticulture," "horticultural," and "horticultural product" may not be construed to include or relate to marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products unless the applicable term is explicitly defined to include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

PART VI

Business License Fee

Sec. 601. RCW 19.02.075 and 2013 c 144 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

The department must collect a handling fee on each business license application and each renewal application filing. The department must set the amount of the handling fees by rule, as authorized by RCW 19.02.030. The handling fees may not exceed ((nineteen)) fifty dollars for each business license application, and ((eleven)) twenty-five dollars for each business license renewal application filing, and must be deposited in the business license account. The department may increase handling and renewal fees for the purposes of making improvements in the business licensing service program, including improvements in technology and customer services, expanded access, and infrastructure.

Sec. 602. RCW 19.02.210 and 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 916 are each amended to read as follows:

The business license account is created in the state treasury. Unless otherwise indicated in RCW 19.02.075, all receipts from handling and business license delinquency fees must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation beginning in fiscal year 1993. Expenditures from the account may be used only to administer the business licensing service program and for operations of the department of revenue. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, moneys from the business license account may be used for operations of the department of revenue.

PART VII

Interest Rate on Assessments and Refunds

Sec. 701. RCW 82.32.050 and 2008 c 181 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If upon examination of any returns or from other information obtained by the department it appears that a tax or penalty has been paid less than that properly due, the department ((shall)) must assess against the taxpayer such additional amount found to be due and ((shall)) must add thereto interest on the tax only. The department ((shall)) must notify the taxpayer by mail, or electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, of the additional amount and the additional amount ((shall)) becomes due and ((shall)) must be paid within thirty days from the date of the notice, or within such further time as the department may provide.

(((a) For tax liabilities arising before January 1, 1992, interest shall be computed at the rate of nine percent per annum from the last day of the year in which the deficiency is incurred until the earlier of December 31, 1998, or the date of payment. After December 31, 1998, the rate of interest shall be variable and computed as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed shall be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.

(b) For tax liabilities arising after December 31, 1991,))

(b) The rate of interest ((shall)) must be variable and computed as provided in subsection (2) of this section from the last day of the year in which the deficiency is incurred until the date of payment. ((The rate so computed shall be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.))

(c) Interest ((imposed after December 31, 1998, shall)) must be computed from the last day of the month following each calendar year included in a notice, and the last day of the month following the final month included in a notice if not the end of a calendar year, until the due date of the notice. If payment in full is not made by the due date of the notice, additional interest ((shall)) must be computed until the date of payment. The rate of interest ((shall be)) is variable and computed as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed ((shall)) must be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.

(2)(a) For the purposes of this section, the rate of interest to be charged to the taxpayer ((shall be an)) is as follows:

(i) For all interest imposed through December 31, 2017, and for interest imposed after December 31, 2017, except qualifying interest, the rate of interest is the average of the federal short-term rate as defined in Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1274(d) of the internal revenue code plus two percentage points.

(ii) For qualifying interest imposed beginning January 1, 2018, the rate of interest is the average of the federal short-term rate as defined in Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1274(d) of the internal revenue code plus four percentage points.

(b) The rate set for each new year ((shall)) must be computed by taking an arithmetical average to the nearest percentage point of the federal short-term rate, compounded annually. That average ((shall)) must be calculated using the rates from four months: January, April, and July of the calendar year immediately preceding the new year, and October of the previous preceding year.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection (2), the following definitions apply:

(i) "Combined excise tax return" means any version of the return used for reporting the primary excise taxes administered by the department, including taxes due under chapters 82.04, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.16 RCW, whether such return is filed electronically or on a paper document; and

(ii) "Qualifying interest" means interest added to any taxes that are required to be reported on the department's combined excise tax return.

(3) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer affected by the emergency, may extend the due date of any assessment or correction of an assessment for additional taxes, penalties, or interest as the department deems proper.

(4) No assessment or correction of an assessment for additional taxes, penalties, or interest due may be made by the department more than four years after the close of the tax year, except (a) against a taxpayer who has not registered as required by this chapter, (b) upon a showing of fraud or of misrepresentation of a material fact by the taxpayer, or (c) where a taxpayer has executed a written waiver of such limitation. The execution of a written waiver ((shall)) also extends the period for making a refund or credit as provided in RCW 82.32.060(2).

(5) For the purposes of this section, "return" means any document a person is required by the state of Washington to file to satisfy or establish a tax or fee obligation that is administered or collected by the department ((of revenue)) and that has a statutorily defined due date.

Sec. 702. RCW 82.32.060 and 2009 c 176 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If, upon receipt of an application by a taxpayer for a refund or for an audit of the taxpayer's records, or upon an examination of the returns or records of any taxpayer, it is determined by the department that within the statutory period for assessment of taxes, penalties, or interest prescribed by RCW 82.32.050 any amount of tax, penalty, or interest has been paid in excess of that properly due, the excess amount paid within, or attributable to, such period must be credited to the taxpayer's account or must be refunded to the taxpayer, at the taxpayer's option. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no refund or credit may be made for taxes, penalties, or interest paid more than four years prior to the beginning of the calendar year in which the refund application is made or examination of records is completed.

(2)(a) The execution of a written waiver under RCW 82.32.050 or 82.32.100 will extend the time for making a refund or credit of any taxes paid during, or attributable to, the years covered by the waiver if, prior to the expiration of the waiver period, an application for refund of such taxes is made by the taxpayer or the department discovers a refund or credit is due.

(b) A refund or credit must be allowed for an excess payment resulting from the failure to claim a bad debt deduction, credit, or refund under RCW 82.04.4284, 82.08.037, 82.12.037, 82.14B.150, or 82.16.050(5) for debts that became bad debts under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 166, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003, less than four years prior to the beginning of the calendar year in which the refund application is made or examination of records is completed.

(3) Any such refunds must be made by means of vouchers approved by the department and by the issuance of state warrants drawn upon and payable from such funds as the legislature may provide. However, taxpayers who are required to pay taxes by electronic funds transfer under RCW 82.32.080 must have any refunds paid by electronic funds transfer if the department has the necessary account information to facilitate a refund by electronic funds transfer.

(4) Any judgment for which a recovery is granted by any court of competent jurisdiction, not appealed from, for tax, penalties, and interest which were paid by the taxpayer, and costs, in a suit by any taxpayer must be paid in the same manner, as provided in subsection (3) of this section, upon the filing with the department of a certified copy of the order or judgment of the court.

(((a) Interest at the rate of three percent per annum must be allowed by the department and by any court on the amount of any refund, credit, or other recovery allowed to a taxpayer for taxes, penalties, or interest paid by the taxpayer before January 1, 1992. This rate of interest applies for all interest allowed through December 31, 1998. Interest allowed after December 31, 1998, must be computed at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate so computed must be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.

(b) For refunds or credits of amounts paid or other recovery allowed to a taxpayer after December 31, 1991, the rate of interest must be the rate as computed for assessments under RCW 82.32.050(2) less one percent. This rate of interest applies for all interest allowed through December 31, 1998. Interest allowed after December 31, 1998, must be computed at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate so computed must be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.))

(5)(a) Interest must be added to the amount of any refund, credit, or other recovery allowed under this section for taxes, penalties, or interest paid by the taxpayer at the following rates:

(i) For all interest allowed through December 31, 2017, and for interest allowed after December 31, 2017, except qualifying interest, the interest rate is the same as provided in RCW 82.32.050(2)(a)(i).

(ii) For qualifying interest allowed beginning January 1, 2018, the interest rate is the same as provided in RCW 82.32.050(2)(a)(ii), reduced by four percentage points.

(b) The rate so computed under (a) of this subsection (5) must be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.

(c) For purposes of this subsection (5), the following definitions apply:

(i) "Combined excise tax return" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.32.050; and

(ii) "Qualifying interest" means interest due on amounts paid in excess of the proper amount due for any tax required to be reported on the department's combined excise tax return, including any penalties and interest added to such tax.

(6) Interest allowed on a credit notice or refund issued after December 31, 2003, must be computed as follows:

(a) If all overpayments for each calendar year and all reporting periods ending with the final month included in a notice or refund were made on or before the due date of the final return for each calendar year or the final reporting period included in the notice or refund:

(i) Interest must be computed from January 31st following each calendar year included in a notice or refund; or

(ii) Interest must be computed from the last day of the month following the final month included in a notice or refund.

(b) If the taxpayer has not made all overpayments for each calendar year and all reporting periods ending with the final month included in a notice or refund on or before the dates specified by RCW 82.32.045 for the final return for each calendar year or the final month included in the notice or refund, interest must be computed from the last day of the month following the date on which payment in full of the liabilities was made for each calendar year included in a notice or refund, and the last day of the month following the date on which payment in full of the liabilities was made if the final month included in a notice or refund is not the end of a calendar year.

(c) Interest included in a credit notice must accrue up to the date the taxpayer could reasonably be expected to use the credit notice, as defined by the department's rules. If a credit notice is converted to a refund, interest must be recomputed to the date the refund is issued, but not to exceed the amount of interest that would have been allowed with the credit notice.

PART VIII

Trust Fund Accountability

Sec. 801. RCW 82.32.145 and 2015 c 188 s 121 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the department has issued a warrant under RCW 82.32.210 for the collection of unpaid ((trust fund)) recoverable taxes from a limited liability business entity and that business entity has been terminated, dissolved, or abandoned, or is insolvent, the department may pursue collection of the entity's unpaid ((trust fund)) recoverable taxes, including penalties and interest on those taxes, against any or all of the responsible individuals. For purposes of this subsection, "insolvent" means the condition that results when the sum of the entity's debts exceeds the fair market value of its assets. The department may presume that an entity is insolvent if the entity refuses to disclose to the department the nature of its assets and liabilities.

(2) Personal liability under this section may be imposed only for state and local ((trust fund)) recoverable taxes.

(3)(a) For a responsible individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief financial officer, liability under this section applies regardless of fault or whether the individual was or should have been aware of the unpaid ((trust fund)) recoverable tax liability of the limited liability business entity. This subsection (3)(a) applies only with respect to recoverable tax liability described in subsection (4)(a)(i) of this section.

(b) For any other responsible individual, liability under this section applies only if he or she willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid to the department the ((trust fund)) recoverable taxes due from the limited liability business entity.

(4)(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection (4)(((a))), a responsible individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief financial officer is liable under this section only for ((trust fund)) recoverable tax liability accrued during the period that he or she was the chief executive or chief financial officer.

(ii) However, if the responsible individual had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's ((trust fund)) recoverable taxes to the department during any period of time that the person was not the chief executive or chief financial officer, that individual is also liable for ((trust fund)) recoverable tax liability that became due during the period that he or she had the duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's taxes to the department but was not the chief executive or chief financial officer. The provisions of subsection (3)(b) of this section apply to recoverable tax liability imposed under this subsection (4)(a)(ii).

(b) All other responsible individuals are liable under this section only for ((trust fund)) recoverable tax liability that became due during the period he or she had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's taxes to the department.

(5) Persons described in subsection (3)(b) of this section are exempt from liability under this section in situations where nonpayment of the limited liability business entity's ((trust fund)) recoverable taxes is due to reasons beyond their control as determined by the department by rule.

(6) Any person having been issued a notice of assessment under this section is entitled to the appeal procedures under RCW 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.32.180, 82.32.190, and 82.32.200.

(7) This section does not relieve the limited liability business entity of its ((trust fund)) recoverable tax liability or otherwise impair other tax collection remedies afforded by law.

(8) Collection authority and procedures prescribed in this chapter apply to collections under this section.

(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Chief executive" means: The president of a corporation; or for other entities or organizations other than corporations or if the corporation does not have a president as one of its officers, the highest ranking executive manager or administrator in charge of the management of the company or organization.

(b) "Chief financial officer" means: The treasurer of a corporation; or for entities or organizations other than corporations or if a corporation does not have a treasurer as one of its officers, the highest senior manager who is responsible for overseeing the financial activities of the entire company or organization.

(c) "Limited liability business entity" means a type of business entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity, or a business entity that is managed or owned in whole or in part by an entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity. Limited liability business entities include corporations, limited liability companies, limited liability partnerships, trusts, general partnerships and joint ventures in which one or more of the partners or parties are also limited liability business entities, and limited partnerships in which one or more of the general partners are also limited liability business entities.

(d) "Manager" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.006.

(e) "Member" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.006, except that the term only includes members of member-managed limited liability companies.

(f) "Officer" means any officer or assistant officer of a corporation, including the president, vice president, secretary, and treasurer.

(g) "Recoverable tax" means:

(i) State sales and use taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, including spirits taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.150, whether collected by a limited liability business entity or imposed on a limited liability business entity as a purchaser or consumer;

(ii) Local sales and use taxes imposed under the authority of chapter 82.14 RCW, RCW 81.104.170, or any other provision of law, and administered by the department, whether collected by a limited liability business entity or imposed on a limited liability business entity as a purchaser or consumer;

(iii) State business and occupation taxes imposed under chapter 82.04 RCW;

(iv) Cigarette taxes imposed under chapter 82.24 RCW; and

(v) Tobacco products taxes imposed under chapter 82.26 RCW.

(h)(i) "Responsible individual" includes any current or former officer, manager, member, partner, or trustee of a limited liability business entity with an unpaid tax warrant issued by the department.

(ii) "Responsible individual" also includes any current or former employee or other individual, but only if the individual had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's unpaid ((trust fund)) recoverable tax liability reflected in a tax warrant issued by the department.

(iii) Whenever any taxpayer has one or more limited liability business entities as a member, manager, or partner, "responsible individual" also includes any current and former officers, members, or managers of the limited liability business entity or entities or of any other limited liability business entity involved directly in the management of the taxpayer. For purposes of this subsection (9)(((g))) (h)(iii), "taxpayer" means a limited liability business entity with an unpaid tax warrant issued against it by the department.

(((h) "Trust fund taxes" means taxes collected from purchasers and held in trust under RCW 82.08.050, including taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020 and 82.08.150.))

(i) "Willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid" means that the failure was the result of an intentional, conscious, and voluntary course of action.

PART IX

Economic Nexus for Retailing Business and Occupation Tax

Sec. 901. RCW 82.04.066 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 5 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

"Engaging within this state" and "engaging within the state," when used in connection with any apportionable activity as defined in RCW 82.04.460 or ((wholesale sales)) selling activity taxable under RCW 82.04.250(1), 82.04.257(1), or 82.04.270, means that a person generates gross income of the business from sources within this state, such as customers or intangible property located in this state, regardless of whether the person is physically present in this state.

Sec. 902. RCW 82.04.067 and 2016 c 137 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person engaging in business is deemed to have substantial nexus with this state if, in the current or immediately preceding calendar year, the person is:

(a) An individual and is a resident or domiciliary of this state;

(b) A business entity and is organized or commercially domiciled in this state; or

(c) A nonresident individual or a business entity that is organized or commercially domiciled outside this state, and ((in the immediately preceding tax year)) the person had:

(i) More than ((fifty)) fifty-three thousand dollars of property in this state;

(ii) More than ((fifty)) fifty-three thousand dollars of payroll in this state;

(iii) More than two hundred ((fifty)) sixty-seven thousand dollars of receipts from this state; or

(iv) At least twenty-five percent of the person's total property, total payroll, or total receipts in this state.

(2)(a) Property counting toward the thresholds in subsection (1)(c)(i) and (iv) of this section is the average value of the taxpayer's property, including intangible property, owned or rented and used in this state during the current or immediately preceding ((tax)) calendar year.

(b)(i) Property owned by the taxpayer, other than loans and credit card receivables owned by the taxpayer, is valued at its original cost basis. Loans and credit card receivables owned by the taxpayer are valued at their outstanding principal balance, without regard to any reserve for bad debts. However, if a loan or credit card receivable is charged off in whole or in part for federal income tax purposes, the portion of the loan or credit card receivable charged off is deducted from the outstanding principal balance.

(ii) Property rented by the taxpayer is valued at eight times the net annual rental rate. For purposes of this subsection, "net annual rental rate" means the annual rental rate paid by the taxpayer less any annual rental rate received by the taxpayer from subrentals.

(c) The average value of property must be determined by averaging the values at the beginning and ending of the ((tax)) applicable calendar year; but the department may require the averaging of monthly values during the ((tax)) applicable calendar year if reasonably required to properly reflect the average value of the taxpayer's property.

(d)(i) For purposes of this subsection (2), loans and credit card receivables are deemed owned and used in this state as follows:

(A) Loans secured by real property, personal property, or both real and personal property are deemed owned and used in the state if the real property or personal property securing the loan is located within this state. If the property securing the loan is located both within this state and one or more other states, the loan is deemed owned and used in this state if more than fifty percent of the fair market value of the real or personal property is located within this state. If more than fifty percent of the fair market value of the real or personal property is not located within any one state, then the loan is deemed owned and used in this state if the borrower is located in this state. The determination of whether the real or personal property securing a loan is located within this state must be made, as of the time the original agreement was made, and any and all subsequent substitutions of collateral must be disregarded.

(B) Loans not secured by real or personal property are deemed owned and used in this state if the borrower is located in this state.

(C) Credit card receivables are deemed owned and used in this state if the billing address of the cardholder is in this state.

(ii)(A) Except as otherwise provided in (d)(ii)(B) of this subsection (2), the definitions in the multistate tax commission's recommended formula for the apportionment and allocation of net income of financial institutions as existing on June 1, 2010, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, apply to this section.

(B) "Credit card" means a card or device existing for the purpose of obtaining money, property, labor, or services on credit.

(e) Notwithstanding anything else to the contrary in this subsection, property counting toward the thresholds in subsection (1)(c)(i) and (iv) of this section does not include a person's ownership of, or rights in, computer software as defined in RCW 82.04.215, including computer software used in providing a digital automated service; master copies of software; and digital goods and digital codes residing on servers located in this state.

(3)(a) Payroll counting toward the thresholds in subsection (1)(c)(ii) and (iv) of this section is the total amount paid by the taxpayer for compensation in this state during the current or immediately preceding ((tax)) calendar year plus nonemployee compensation paid to representative third parties in this state. Nonemployee compensation paid to representative third parties includes the gross amount paid to nonemployees who represent the taxpayer in interactions with the taxpayer's clients and includes sales commissions.

(b) Employee compensation is paid in this state if the compensation is properly reportable to this state for unemployment compensation tax purposes, regardless of whether the compensation was actually reported to this state.

(c) Nonemployee compensation is paid in this state if the service performed by the representative third party occurs entirely or primarily within this state.

(d) For purposes of this subsection, "compensation" means wages, salaries, commissions, and any other form of remuneration paid to employees or nonemployees and defined as gross income under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 61 of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as existing on June 1, 2010.

(4) Receipts counting toward the thresholds in subsection (1)(c)(iii) and (iv) of this section are:

(a) Those amounts included in the numerator of the receipts factor under RCW 82.04.462;

(b) For financial institutions, those amounts included in the numerator of the receipts factor under the rule adopted by the department as authorized in RCW 82.04.460(2); and

(c) For persons taxable under RCW 82.04.250(1), 82.04.257(1), or 82.04.270 ((with respect to wholesale sales)), the gross proceeds of sales taxable under those statutory provisions and sourced to this state in accordance with RCW 82.32.730.

(5)(a) Each December, the department must review the cumulative percentage change in the consumer price index. The department must adjust the thresholds in subsection (1)(c)(i) through (iii) of this section if the consumer price index has changed by five percent or more since the later of June 1, 2010, or the date that the thresholds were last adjusted under this subsection. For purposes of determining the cumulative percentage change in the consumer price index, the department must compare the consumer price index available as of December 1st of the current year with the consumer price index as of the later of June 1, 2010, or the date that the thresholds were last adjusted under this subsection. The thresholds must be adjusted to reflect that cumulative percentage change in the consumer price index. The adjusted thresholds must be rounded to the nearest one thousand dollars. Any adjustment will apply to tax periods that begin after the adjustment is made.

(b) As used in this subsection, "consumer price index" means the consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U) available from the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.

(6)(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(iii) of this subsection (6), subsections (1) through (5) of this section only apply with respect to the taxes on persons engaged in apportionable activities as defined in RCW 82.04.460 or making wholesale sales taxable under RCW 82.04.257(1) or 82.04.270.

(ii) Subject to the limitation in RCW 82.32.531, for purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter on ((any)) the business of making sales at retail or any other activity not included in the definition of apportionable activities in RCW 82.04.460, other than the business of making wholesale sales taxed under RCW 82.04.257(1) or 82.04.270, ((except as provided in RCW 82.32.531,)) a person is deemed to have a substantial nexus with this state if the person has a physical presence in this state during the ((tax)) current or immediately preceding calendar year, which need only be demonstrably more than a slightest presence.

(iii) For purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter on the business of making sales at retail taxable under RCW 82.04.250(1) or 82.04.257(1), a person is also deemed to have a substantial nexus with this state if the person's receipts from this state, pursuant to subsection (4)(c) of this section, meet either criterion in subsection (1)(c)(iii) or (iv) of this section, as adjusted under subsection (5) of this section.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, a person is physically present in this state if the person has property or employees in this state.

(c)(i) A person is also physically present in this state for the purposes of this subsection if the person, either directly or through an agent or other representative, engages in activities in this state that are significantly associated with the person's ability to establish or maintain a market for its products in this state.

(ii) A remote seller as defined in RCW 82.08.052 is presumed to be engaged in activities in this state that are significantly associated with the remote seller's ability to establish or maintain a market for its products in this state if the remote seller is presumed to have a substantial nexus with this state under RCW 82.08.052. The presumption in this subsection (6)(c)(ii) may be rebutted as provided in RCW 82.08.052. To the extent that the presumption in RCW 82.08.052 is no longer operative pursuant to RCW 82.32.762, the presumption in this subsection (6)(c)(ii) is no longer operative. Nothing in this section may be construed to affect in any way RCW ((82.04.424,)) 82.08.050(11)((,)) or 82.12.040(5) or to narrow the scope of the terms "agent" or "other representative" in this subsection (6)(c).

Sec. 903. RCW 82.04.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 20 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and collected from every person that has a substantial nexus with this state, as provided in RCW 82.04.067, a tax for the act or privilege of engaging in business activities. The tax is measured by the application of rates against value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income of the business, as the case may be.

(2)(a) A person who has a substantial nexus with this state in ((any tax)) the current calendar year under the provisions of RCW 82.04.067 ((will be deemed to have a substantial nexus with this state for the following tax year)), based solely on the person's property, payroll, or receipts in this state during the current calendar year, is subject to the tax imposed under this chapter beginning with business activity occurring on and after the date that the person established a substantial nexus with this state in the current calendar year.

(b) This subsection (2) does not apply to any person who also had a substantial nexus with this state (i) during the immediately preceding calendar year under RCW 82.04.067, or (ii) during the current calendar year under RCW 82.04.067 (1)(a) or (b) or (6)(a)(ii) or (c).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904. RCW 82.04.424 (Exemptions—Certain in-state activities) and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 5 s 206 & 2003 c 76 s 2 are each repealed.

PART X

Public Works Assistance Account

Sec. 1001. RCW 82.45.060 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property at the rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the selling price. Beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2019, an amount equal to two percent of the proceeds of this tax must be deposited in the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050, and an amount equal to four and one-tenth percent must be deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230. ((Thereafter, an amount equal to six and one-tenth percent of the proceeds of this tax to the state treasurer must be deposited in the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050.)) Beginning July 1, 2019, an amount equal to one percent of the proceeds of this tax must be deposited in the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050, and an amount equal to five and one-tenth percent must be deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230. Except as otherwise provided in this section, an amount equal to one and six-tenths percent of the proceeds of this tax to the state treasurer must be deposited in the city-county assistance account created in RCW 43.08.290.

Sec. 1002. RCW 82.16.020 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 703 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and collected from every person a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax is equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after the business, as follows:

(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three and six-tenths percent;

(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths percent;

(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;

(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;

(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats, operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;

(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;

(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent;

(h) Log transportation business: One and twenty-eight one- hundredths percent. The reduced rate established in this subsection (1)(h) is not subject to the ten-year expiration provision in RCW 82.32.805(1)(a).

(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage collection businesses must be deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230 from July 1, 2013, through June 30, 2019, and thereafter in the ((public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050)) education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230.

Sec. 1003. RCW 82.18.040 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Taxes collected under this chapter must be held in trust until paid to the state. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1), taxes received by the state must be deposited in the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050. For the period beginning July 1, 2011, and ending June 30, 2015, taxes received by the state under this chapter must be deposited in the general fund for general purpose expenditures. For fiscal years 2016, 2017, and 2018, one-half of the taxes received by the state under this chapter must be deposited in the general fund for general purpose expenditures and the remainder deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230. ((For fiscal year 2019)) Beginning in fiscal year 2019 and each fiscal year thereafter, taxes received by the state under this chapter must be deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230. Any person collecting the tax who appropriates or converts the tax collected is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the money required to be collected is not available for payment on the date payment is due. If a taxpayer fails to pay the tax imposed by this chapter to the person charged with collection of the tax and the person charged with collection fails to pay the tax to the department, the department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the taxpayer for collection of the tax.

(2) The tax is due from the taxpayer within twenty-five days from the date the taxpayer is billed by the person collecting the tax.

(3) The tax is due from the person collecting the tax at the end of the tax period in which the tax is received from the taxpayer. If the taxpayer remits only a portion of the total amount billed for taxes, consideration, and related charges, the amount remitted must be applied first to payment of the solid waste collection tax and this tax has priority over all other claims to the amount remitted.

Sec. 1004. RCW 43.155.060 and 1988 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to aid the financing of public works projects, the board may:

(((1))) (a) Make low-interest or interest-free loans to local governments from the public works assistance account or other funds and accounts for the purpose of assisting local governments in financing public works projects. The board may require such terms and conditions and may charge such rates of interest on its loans as it deems necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Money received from local governments in repayment of loans made under this section ((shall)) must be paid into the public works assistance account for uses consistent with this chapter until June 30, 2019. Beginning July 1, 2019, all moneys received from local governments in repayment of loans made under this chapter must be deposited into the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230.

(((2))) (b) Pledge money in the public works assistance account, or money to be received by the public works assistance account, to the repayment of all or a portion of the principal of or interest on obligations issued by local governments to finance public works projects. The board ((shall)) may not pledge any amount greater than the sum of money in the public works assistance account plus money to be received from the payment of the debt service on loans made from that account, nor ((shall)) may the board pledge the faith and credit or the taxing power of the state or any agency or subdivision thereof to the repayment of obligations issued by any local government.

(((3))) (c) Create such subaccounts in the public works assistance account as the board deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(((4))) (d) Provide a method for the allocation of loans and financing guarantees and the provision of technical assistance under this chapter.

(2) All local public works projects aided in whole or in part under the provisions of this chapter ((shall)) must be put out for competitive bids, except for emergency public works under RCW 43.155.065 for which the recipient jurisdiction ((shall)) must comply with this requirement to the extent feasible and practicable. The competitive bids called for ((shall)) must be administered in the same manner as all other public works projects put out for competitive bidding by the local governmental entity aided under this chapter.

PART XI

Miscellaneous Provisions

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101. Sections 701 and 702 of this act take effect January 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102. Section 801 of this act applies beginning with assessments issued by the department of revenue under RCW 82.32.145 on or after the effective date of this section, regardless of when the underlying recoverable tax liability of the limited liability business entity was incurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1103. Section 1003 of this act takes effect July 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1104. Sections 1001, 1002, and 1004 of this act take effect June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1105. Except for sections 701, 702, and 1001 through 1004 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2017.

--- END ---