BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall provide health coverage to individuals who:

(a) Are at least nineteen years old and no older than twenty-six years old;

(b) Have an income that is at or below one hundred thirty-three percent of the federal poverty level;

(c) Are not incarcerated; and

(d) Are not eligible for categorically needy medical assistance as defined in the social security Title XIX state plan.

(2) The amount, scope, and duration of health care services provided to individuals under this section must be the same as that provided to individuals eligible for categorically needy medical assistance.

(3) The authority shall seek federal funding, as available, to defray state costs associated with providing coverage to persons under this section.

--- END ---