BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.210 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any person, including students, parents, and school personnel, may possess and apply topical sunscreen products to help prevent sunburn while on school property or at a school-related event or activity. A sunscreen product may be possessed and applied under this section without the prescription or note of a licensed health care professional if the product is regulated by the United States food and drug administration for over-the-counter use.

(2) Schools are encouraged to educate students about sun safety guidelines.

(3) Nothing in this section requires school personnel to assist students in applying sunscreen.

(4) As used in this section, "school" means a public school, school district, educational service district, or private school with any of grades kindergarten through twelve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act does not create any civil liability on the part of the state or any state agency, officer, employee, agent, political subdivision, or school district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act may be known and cited as the student sun safety education act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---