BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.345.020 and 2015 c 129 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person may not:

(a) Use software to circumvent, thwart, interfere with, or evade a security measure, access control system, or other control or measure on a ticket seller's internet web site; or

(b) Sell software that is advertised for profit with the express purpose to circumvent, thwart, interfere with, or evade a security measure, access control system, or other control or measure on a ticket seller's internet web site.

(2) The use or sale of software as described in subsection (1) of this section only violates this section if:

(a) The user ((or seller)) knows or should know that the purpose of the software is to circumvent, thwart, interfere with, or evade a security measure, access control system, or other control or measure on a ticket seller's internet web site; or

(b) The seller knows or markets that the purpose of the software is to circumvent, thwart, interfere with, or evade a security measure, access control system, or other control or measure on a ticket seller's internet web site.

(3) The legislature finds that the conduct described in subsection (1) of this section vitally affects the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Using or selling software to circumvent, thwart, or evade a control or measure, which is used on a ticket seller's internet web site to ensure an equitable distribution of tickets, is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purposes of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

--- END ---