BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

(1) An action by a lead agency that results in the amendment of the allowable uses of an existing right-of-way is not subject to the requirements of this chapter if the following conditions are met:

(a) The action does not result in a physical alteration to the right-of-way; and

(b) The action does not newly allow the use of the right-of-way by a heavier class of vehicles than have historically used the right-of-way.

(2) The classes of vehicles that an action exempt under subsection (1) of this section may newly authorize the use of include, but are not limited to, golf carts.

--- END ---