BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.240.040 and 2008 c 288 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning six months after the department has adopted rules under ((section 8(5) of this act)) chapter 288, Laws of 2008, a manufacturer of a children's product, or a trade organization on behalf of its member manufacturers, shall provide notice to the department that the manufacturer's product contains a high priority chemical. Beginning January 1, 2018, a manufacturer of consumer or children's electronic products specified in RCW 70.240.010(4)(b)(vii) shall provide notice to the department that the manufacturer's product contains a high priority chemical. The notice must be filed annually with the department and must include the following information:

(1) The name of the chemical used or produced and its chemical abstracts service registry number;

(2) A brief description of the product or product component containing the substance;

(3) A description of the function of the chemical in the product;

(4) The amount of the chemical used in each unit of the product or product component. The amount may be reported in ranges, rather than the exact amount;

(5) The name and address of the manufacturer and the name, address, and phone number of a contact person for the manufacturer; and

(6) Any other information the manufacturer deems relevant to the appropriate use of the product.

--- END ---