BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.630 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The work-integrated learning initiative is established. The purpose of the initiative is to promote work-integrated learning experiences for students by providing:

(a) An opportunity for students to engage in work-based academic programs with public and private sector employers, such as internships, externships, and registered apprenticeships; and

(b) A framework for the development and replication of successful work-integrated learning programs throughout the state.

(2) Local applicant schools receiving funding through participation in the initiative must:

(a) Provide academic curricula in a work-integrated and career-contextualized manner and include an external mentor for each student in the program;

(b) Demonstrate collaboration with and input from students, parents or guardians, local employers, community members, a workforce development council, and a labor organization. Evidence of local collaborations may include but are not limited to partnerships with a dropout reengagement organization, an apprenticeship sponsor, a community and technical college, a STEM network, or a homeless youth service organization;

(c) Reflect local circumstances, including local industries, employers, and labor markets;

(d) Comply with graduation requirements established by the state board of education; and

(e) Align the high school and beyond plans of participating students to reflect opportunities that may be available through the initiative.

(3)(a) Local applicant schools selected to participate in the work-integrated learning initiative must, in accordance with this section and section 3 of this act, submit to the work-integrated learning advisory committee created in section 3 of this act an interim and an end-of-project report that includes numeric and other data summarizing the effects of their work-integrated learning project programs on high school graduation rates, state test scores, and community partnerships, including partnerships with local employers and industries.

(b) In complying with this subsection (3), local applicant schools must also provide other data and information as requested by the work-integrated learning advisory committee in accordance with section 3 of this act.

(4) For the purposes of this section and sections 2 and 3 of this act, "work-integrated learning" includes but is not limited to early, frequent, and systematic learning experiences that are essential for preparing Washington youth for high-demand, family-wage jobs in Washington state, and that engage students in grades five through twelve or through high school dropout reengagement plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may contract with a statewide nonprofit organization with expertise in promoting and supporting work-integrated learning from early learning through postsecondary education to establish a matching grant program to fund projects implemented by local applicant schools identified in section 1 of this act.

(b) The matching grant program shall include the following minimum requirements for local applicant schools:

(i) Measurable and accountable focus on low-income youth, homeless youth, and youth of color;

(ii) Accountability for increasing registered youth apprenticeships, internships, mentors, career planning, and other work-integrated learning experiences;

(iii) Regional coordinators or liaisons to facilitate links between schools, higher education institutions, business, labor, and the community in developing internships and other work-integrated learning experiences; and

(iv) System-wide support for work-integrated learning experiences, including but not limited to career awareness, career explorations, career counseling, and career preparation and training.

(2)(a) Grant funds awarded in accordance with this section may be expended only to the extent that they are equally matched by private sector cash contributions for the program. Grantees must provide reports to the work-integrated learning advisory committee in accordance with section 3 of this act.

(b) By November 15, 2020, and yearly thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide an evaluation to the governor and the education and economic development committees of the house of representatives and the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the employment security department and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall convene a work-integrated learning advisory committee to provide advice to the legislature and the education and workforce sectors on creating opportunities for students to: Explore and understand a wide range of career-related opportunities through applied learning; engage with industry mentors; and plan for career and college success.

(2) The committee shall:

(a) Assist the office of the superintendent of public instruction in the development of an application process and the selection of local applicant schools to participate in the initiative established in section 1 of this act;

(b) Advise the superintendent of public instruction on the development and implementation of work-integrated learning instructional programs;

(c) Review the instructional programs of projects funded through the career connect Washington program with grant moneys from the federal workforce innovation and opportunity act, P.L. 113-128, related to work-integrated learning, a type of learning that is also referred to as "career connected learning," and of local applicant schools selected to develop and implement work-integrated learning project programs under section 1 of this act. The purpose of the review required by this subsection (2)(c) is to determine:

(i) The impact on in-school progress, high school graduation rates, state test scores, indicators of career and college readiness, employment outcomes, and community partnerships. In accordance with this subsection (2)(c), and to the maximum extent practicable, the review must consider both overall impacts and reductions or other changes in opportunity gaps;

(ii) Best practices for partnering with industry and the local community to create opportunities for applied learning through internships, externships, registered youth apprenticeships, and mentorships; and

(iii) Best practices for linking high school and beyond plans with work-integrated and career-related learning opportunities and increasing college readiness;

(d) Analyze barriers to statewide adoption of work-integrated and career-related learning opportunities and instructional programs;

(e) Recommend policies to implement work-integrated and career-related strategies that increase college and career readiness of students statewide. Policies recommended under this subsection (2)(e) may include, but are not limited to: (i) Policies related to aligning career and technical education programs with statewide and local industry projections and career cluster needs evidenced through economic development data and appropriate longitudinal data; and (ii) the completion of remedial courses required by colleges and universities;

(f) Consult with individuals from the public and private sectors with expertise in career and technical education and work-integrated training, including representatives of labor unions, professional technical organizations, and business and industry; and

(g) Work collaboratively, as appropriate, with the expanded learning opportunities advisory council as provided in chapter . . ., Laws of 2018 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2802).

(3) The committee must, at a minimum, be composed of the following members:

(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(c) The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee;

(d) One educator representing the K-12 career and technical education sector, appointed by the superintendent of public instruction, as determined from recommendations of the association for career and technical education;

(e) One school counselor appointed by the superintendent of public instruction, as determined from recommendations of the school counselor association;

(f) One educator representing the community and technical colleges, appointed by the state board for community and technical colleges;

(g) One member of the governor's office specializing in career and technical education and workforce needs, appointed by the governor; and

(h) One member of the workforce training and education coordinating board, designated by the workforce training and education coordinating board.

(4) The committee shall convene a subcommittee that includes members representing manufacturing, industry, labor, apprenticeships, and other members with specialized expertise.

(5) The chair or cochairs of the committee and subcommittee must be selected by the members of the committee.

(6) Staff support for the committee and the subcommittee must be provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(7) The committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the state board for community and technical colleges, the state board of education, the student achievement council, and, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, the education committees and economic development committees of the house of representatives and the senate by July 1, 2022.

(8) This section expires September 1, 2022.

--- END ---