BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.19.020 and 2009 c 84 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((ECONOMIC TABLE

MONTHLY BASIC SUPPORT OBLIGATION

PER CHILD

KEY: A= AGE 0-11 B= AGE 12-18

COMBINED

MONTHLY

ONE

TWO

NET

CHILD

CHILDREN

INCOME

FAMILY

FAMILY

A

B

A

B

For income less than $1000 the obligation is based upon the resources and living expenses of each household. Minimum support may not be less than $50 per child per month except when allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

1000

220

272

171

211

1100

242

299

188

232

1200

264

326

205

253

1300

285

352

221

274

1400

307

379

238

294

1500

327

404

254

313

1600

347

428

269

333

1700

367

453

285

352

1800

387

478

300

371

1900

407

503

316

390

2000

427

527

331

409

2100

447

552

347

429

2200

467

577

362

448

2300

487

601

378

467

2400

506

626

393

486

2500

526

650

408

505

2600

534

661

416

513

2700

542

670

421

520

2800

549

679

427

527

2900

556

686

431

533

3000

561

693

436

538

3100

566

699

439

543

3200

569

704

442

546

3300

573

708

445

549

3400

574

710

446

551

3500

575

711

447

552

3600

577

712

448

553

3700

578

713

449

554

3800

581

719

452

558

3900

596

736

463

572

4000

609

753

473

584

4100

623

770

484

598

4200

638

788

495

611

4300

651

805

506

625

4400

664

821

516

637

4500

677

836

525

649

4600

689

851

535

661

4700

701

866

545

673

4800

713

882

554

685

4900

726

897

564

697

5000

738

912

574

708

5100

751

928

584

720

5200

763

943

593

732

5300

776

959

602

744

5400

788

974

612

756

5500

800

989

622

768

5600

812

1004

632

779

5700

825

1019

641

791

5800

837

1035

650

803

5900

850

1050

660

815

6000

862

1065

670

827

6100

875

1081

680

839

6200

887

1096

689

851

6300

899

1112

699

863

6400

911

1127

709

875

6500

924

1142

718

887

6600

936

1157

728

899

6700

949

1172

737

911

6800

961

1188

747

923

6900

974

1203

757

935

7000

986

1218

767

946

7100

998

1233

776

958

7200

1009

1248

785

971

7300

1021

1262

794

982

7400

1033

1276

803

993

7500

1044

1290

812

1004

7600

1055

1305

821

1015

7700

1067

1319

830

1026

7800

1078

1333

839

1037

7900

1089

1346

848

1048

8000

1100

1360

857

1059

8100

1112

1374

865

1069

8200

1123

1387

874

1080

8300

1134

1401

882

1091

8400

1144

1414

891

1101

8500

1155

1428

899

1112

8600

1166

1441

908

1122

8700

1177

1454

916

1133

8800

1187

1467

925

1143

8900

1198

1481

933

1153

9000

1208

1493

941

1163

9100

1219

1506

949

1173

9200

1229

1519

957

1183

9300

1239

1532

966

1193

9400

1250

1545

974

1203

9500

1260

1557

982

1213

9600

1270

1570

989

1223

9700

1280

1582

997

1233

9800

1290

1594

1005

1242

9900

1300

1606

1013

1252

10000

1310

1619

1021

1262

10100

1319

1631

1028

1271

10200

1329

1643

1036

1281

10300

1339

1655

1044

1290

10400

1348

1666

1051

1299

10500

1358

1678

1059

1308

10600

1367

1690

1066

1318

10700

1377

1701

1073

1327

10800

1386

1713

1081

1336

10900

1395

1724

1088

1345

11000

1404

1736

1095

1354

11100

1413

1747

1102

1363

11200

1422

1758

1110

1371

11300

1431

1769

1117

1380

11400

1440

1780

1124

1389

11500

1449

1791

1131

1398

11600

1458

1802

1138

1406

11700

1467

1813

1145

1415

11800

1475

1823

1151

1423

11900

1484

1834

1158

1431

12000

1492

1844

1165

1440

COMBINED

MONTHLY

THREE

FOUR

FIVE

NET

CHILDREN

CHILDREN

CHILDREN

INCOME

FAMILY

FAMILY

FAMILY

A

B

A

B

A

B

For income less than $1000 the obligation is based upon the resources and living expenses of each household. Minimum support may not be less than $50 per child per month except when allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

1000

143

177

121

149

105

130

1100

157

194

133

164

116

143

1200

171

211

144

179

126

156

1300

185

228

156

193

136

168

1400

199

246

168

208

147

181

1500

212

262

179

221

156

193

1600

225

278

190

235

166

205

1700

238

294

201

248

175

217

1800

251

310

212

262

185

228

1900

264

326

223

275

194

240

2000

277

342

234

289

204

252

2100

289

358

245

303

213

264

2200

302

374

256

316

223

276

2300

315

390

267

330

233

288

2400

328

406

278

343

242

299

2500

341

421

288

356

251

311

2600

346

428

293

362

256

316

2700

351

435

298

368

259

321

2800

356

440

301

372

262

324

2900

360

445

305

376

266

328

3000

364

449

308

380

268

331

3100

367

453

310

383

270

334

3200

369

457

312

386

272

336

3300

371

459

314

388

273

339

3400

372

460

315

389

274

340

3500

373

461

316

390

275

341

3600

374

462

317

391

276

342

3700

375

463

318

392

277

343

3800

377

466

319

394

278

344

3900

386

477

326

404

284

352

4000

395

488

334

413

291

360

4100

404

500

341

422

298

368

4200

413

511

350

431

305

377

4300

422

522

357

441

311

385

4400

431

532

364

449

317

392

4500

438

542

371

458

323

400

4600

446

552

377

467

329

407

4700

455

562

384

475

335

414

4800

463

572

391

483

341

422

4900

470

581

398

491

347

429

5000

479

592

404

500

353

437

5100

487

602

411

509

359

443

5200

494

611

418

517

365

451

5300

503

621

425

525

371

458

5400

511

632

432

533

377

466

5500

518

641

439

542

383

473

5600

527

651

446

551

389

480

5700

535

661

452

559

395

488

5800

543

671

459

567

401

495

5900

551

681

466

575

407

502

6000

559

691

473

584

413

509

6100

567

701

479

593

418

517

6200

575

710

486

601

424

524

6300

583

721

493

609

430

532

6400

591

731

500

617

436

539

6500

599

740

506

626

442

546

6600

607

750

513

635

448

554

6700

615

761

520

643

454

561

6800

623

770

527

651

460

568

6900

631

780

533

659

466

575

7000

639

790

540

668

472

583

7100

647

800

547

677

478

591

7200

654

809

554

684

484

598

7300

662

818

560

693

490

605

7400

670

828

567

701

496

613

7500

677

837

574

709

502

620

7600

685

846

581

718

507

627

7700

692

855

587

726

513

634

7800

700

865

594

734

519

642

7900

707

874

601

742

525

649

8000

714

883

607

750

531

656

8100

722

892

614

759

536

663

8200

729

901

620

767

542

670

8300

736

910

627

775

548

677

8400

743

919

633

783

553

684

8500

750

928

640

791

559

691

8600

758

936

646

799

565

698

8700

765

945

653

807

570

705

8800

772

954

659

815

576

712

8900

779

962

665

822

582

719

9000

786

971

672

830

587

726

9100

792

980

678

838

593

732

9200

799

988

684

846

598

739

9300

806

996

691

854

604

746

9400

813

1005

697

861

609

753

9500

820

1013

703

869

614

759

9600

826

1021

709

877

620

766

9700

833

1030

716

884

625

773

9800

840

1038

722

892

631

779

9900

846

1046

728

900

636

786

10000

853

1054

734

907

641

793

10100

859

1062

740

915

647

799

10200

866

1070

746

922

652

806

10300

872

1078

752

930

657

812

10400

879

1086

758

937

662

819

10500

885

1094

764

944

668

825

10600

891

1102

770

952

673

832

10700

898

1109

776

959

678

838

10800

904

1117

782

966

683

844

10900

910

1125

788

974

688

851

11000

916

1132

794

981

693

857

11100

922

1140

799

988

698

863

11200

928

1147

805

995

703

869

11300

934

1155

811

1002

708

876

11400

940

1162

817

1009

714

882

11500

946

1170

822

1017

719

888

11600

952

1177

828

1024

723

894

11700

958

1184

834

1031

728

900

11800

964

1191

839

1038

733

906

11900

970

1199

845

1045

738

912

12000

975

1206

851

1051

743

919))

ECONOMIC TABLE

MONTHLY BASIC SUPPORT OBLIGATION

PER CHILD

COMBINED

MONTHLY

NET

INCOME

ONE

CHILD

FAMILY

TWO

CHILDREN

FAMILY

For income less than $1000 the obligation is based upon the resources and living expenses of each household. Minimum support may not be less than $50 per child per month except when allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

1000

216

167

1100

238

184

1200

260

200

1300

281

217

1400

303

234

1500

325

251

1600

346

267

1700

368

284

1800

390

301

1900

412

317

2000

433

334

2100

455

350

2200

477

367

2300

499

384

2400

521

400

2500

543

417

2600

565

433

2700

587

450

2800

609

467

2900

630

483

3000

652

500

3100

674

516

3200

696

533

3300

718

550

3400

740

566

3500

762

583

3600

784

599

3700

803

614

3800

816

624

3900

830

634

4000

843

643

4100

857

653

4200

867

660

4300

877

668

4400

887

675

4500

896

682

4600

906

689

4700

916

697

4800

927

705

4900

939

714

5000

951

723

5100

963

732

5200

975

741

5300

987

750

5400

999

759

5500

1011

768

5600

1023

777

5700

1030

782

5800

1036

786

5900

1042

791

6000

1048

795

6100

1054

800

6200

1061

804

6300

1067

809

6400

1073

813

6500

1081

819

6600

1096

830

6700

1111

842

6800

1126

853

6900

1141

864

7000

1156

875

7100

1170

886

7200

1185

898

7300

1200

909

7400

1212

918

7500

1222

925

7600

1231

932

7700

1241

939

7800

1251

946

7900

1261

953

8000

1270

960

8100

1280

968

8200

1290

975

8300

1299

981

8400

1308

987

8500

1316

994

8600

1325

1000

8700

1334

1007

8800

1343

1013

8900

1352

1019

9000

1361

1026

9100

1370

1032

9200

1379

1040

9300

1387

1047

9400

1396

1055

9500

1405

1062

9600

1414

1069

9700

1423

1077

9800

1432

1084

9900

1441

1092

10000

1451

1099

10100

1462

1107

10200

1473

1114

10300

1484

1122

10400

1495

1129

10500

1507

1136

10600

1518

1144

10700

1529

1151

10800

1539

1159

10900

1542

1161

11000

1545

1164

11100

1548

1166

11200

1551

1169

11300

1554

1172

11400

1556

1174

11500

1559

1177

11600

1562

1179

11700

1565

1182

11800

1568

1184

11900

1571

1187

12000

1573

1190

COMBINED

MONTHLY

NET

INCOME

THREE

CHILDREN

FAMILY

FOUR

CHILDREN

FAMILY

FIVE

CHILDREN

FAMILY

For income less than $1000 the obligation is based upon the resources and living expenses of each household. Minimum support may not be less than $50 per child per month except when allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

1000

136

114

100

1100

150

125

110

1200

163

137

120

1300

177

148

130

1400

191

160

141

1500

204

171

151

1600

218

182

161

1700

231

194

171

1800

245

205

180

1900

258

216

190

2000

271

227

200

2100

285

239

210

2200

298

250

220

2300

311

261

230

2400

325

272

239

2500

338

283

249

2600

351

294

259

2700

365

305

269

2800

378

317

279

2900

391

328

288

3000

405

339

298

3100

418

350

308

3200

431

361

318

3300

444

372

328

3400

458

384

337

3500

471

395

347

3600

484

406

357

3700

496

416

366

3800

503

422

371

3900

511

428

377

4000

518

434

382

4100

526

440

388

4200

531

445

392

4300

537

450

396

4400

543

455

400

4500

548

459

404

4600

554

464

408

4700

559

469

412

4800

566

474

417

4900

573

480

422

5000

580

486

428

5100

587

492

433

5200

594

498

438

5300

602

504

443

5400

609

510

449

5500

616

516

454

5600

623

522

459

5700

627

525

462

5800

630

528

465

5900

634

531

467

6000

637

534

470

6100

641

537

472

6200

644

540

475

6300

648

543

477

6400

651

545

480

6500

656

549

483

6600

665

557

490

6700

674

564

497

6800

683

572

503

6900

692

579

510

7000

701

587

516

7100

710

594

523

7200

719

602

530

7300

727

609

536

7400

734

615

541

7500

740

620

545

7600

745

624

549

7700

751

629

554

7800

756

634

558

7900

762

638

562

8000

767

643

566

8100

773

647

570

8200

778

652

574

8300

783

656

577

8400

788

660

581

8500

793

664

584

8600

797

668

588

8700

802

672

591

8800

807

676

595

8900

812

680

599

9000

817

684

602

9100

822

689

606

9200

828

694

611

9300

835

699

616

9400

841

705

620

9500

848

710

625

9600

854

716

630

9700

861

721

635

9800

867

727

639

9900

874

732

644

10000

879

737

648

10100

885

741

652

10200

890

745

656

10300

895

750

660

10400

900

754

664

10500

906

759

668

10600

911

763

672

10700

916

767

675

10800

921

772

679

10900

924

774

681

11000

926

776

683

11100

928

778

684

11200

931

780

686

11300

933

782

688

11400

936

784

690

11500

938

786

692

11600

940

788

693

11700

943

790

695

11800

945

792

697

11900

948

794

699

12000

950

796

700

The economic table is presumptive for combined monthly net incomes up to and including twelve thousand dollars. When combined monthly net income exceeds twelve thousand dollars, the court may exceed the presumptive amount of support set for combined monthly net incomes of twelve thousand dollars upon written findings of fact.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect October 1, 2018.

--- END ---