BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW to read as follows:

The term "employment" does not include services performed by individuals age fourteen to twenty-two years. This exclusion applies only to the determination of whether state unemployment tax premiums are owed pursuant to chapter 50.24 RCW. It does not affect eligibility for unemployment insurance benefits for workers age fourteen to twenty-two years under chapter 50.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

--- END ---