BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.185A.110 and 2008 c 112 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The affordable housing land acquisition revolving loan fund program is created in the department to assist eligible organizations, described under RCW 43.185A.040, to purchase land for affordable housing development. The department shall contract with the Washington state housing finance commission to administer the affordable housing land acquisition revolving loan fund program. Within this program, the Washington state housing finance commission shall establish and administer the Washington state housing finance commission land acquisition revolving loan fund.

(2) As used in this chapter, "market rate" means the current average market interest rate that is determined at the time any individual loan is closed upon using a widely recognized current market interest rate measurement to be selected for use by the Washington state housing finance commission with the department's approval. This interest rate must be noted in an attachment to the closing documents for each loan.

(3) Under the affordable housing land acquisition revolving loan fund program:

(a) Loans may be made to purchase vacant or improved land on which to develop affordable housing. In addition to affordable housing, facilities intended to provide supportive services to affordable housing residents and low-income households in the nearby community may be developed on the land.

(b) Eligible organizations applying for a loan must include in the loan application a proposed affordable housing development plan indicating the number of affordable housing units planned, a description of any other facilities being considered for the property, and an estimated timeline for completion of the development. The Washington state housing finance commission may require additional information from loan applicants and may consider the efficient use of land, project readiness, organizational capacity, and other factors as criteria in awarding loans.

(c) Forty percent of the loans shall go to eligible applicants operating homeownership programs for low-income households in which the households participate in the construction of their homes. Sixty percent of loans shall go to other eligible organizations. If the entire forty percent for applicants operating self-help homeownership programs cannot be lent to these types of applicants, the remainder shall be lent to other eligible organizations.

(d) Within five years of receiving a loan, a loan recipient must present the Washington state housing finance commission with an updated development plan, including a proposed development design, committed and anticipated additional financial resources to be dedicated to the development, and an estimated development schedule, which indicates completion of the development within eight years of loan receipt. This updated development plan must be substantially consistent with the development plan submitted as part of the original loan application as required in (b) of this subsection.

(e) Within eight years of receiving a loan, a loan recipient must develop affordable housing on the property for which the loan was made and place the affordable housing into service.

(f) A loan recipient must preserve the affordable rental housing developed on the property acquired under this section as affordable housing for a minimum of thirty years.

(4) If a loan recipient does not place affordable housing into service on a property for which a loan has been received under this section within the eight-year period specified in subsection (3)(e) of this section, or if a loan recipient fails to use the property for the intended affordable housing purpose consistent with the loan recipient's original affordable housing development plan, then the loan recipient must pay to the Washington state housing finance commission an amount consisting of the principal of the original loan plus compounded interest calculated at the current market rate. The Washington state housing finance commission shall develop guidelines for the time period in which this repayment must take place, which must be noted in the original loan agreement. The Washington state housing finance commission may grant a partial or total exemption from this repayment requirement if it determines that a development is substantially complete or that the property has been substantially used in keeping with the original affordable housing purpose of the loan. Any repayment funds received as a result of noncompliance with loan requirements shall be deposited into the Washington state housing finance commission land acquisition revolving loan fund for the purposes of the affordable housing land acquisition revolving loan fund program.

(5) The Washington state housing finance commission, with approval from the department, may adopt guidelines and requirements that are necessary to administer the affordable housing land acquisition revolving loan fund program.

(6) Interest rates on property loans granted under this section may not exceed one percent. All loan repayment moneys received shall be deposited into the Washington state housing finance commission affordable housing land acquisition revolving loan fund for the purposes of the affordable housing land acquisition revolving loan fund program.

(7) The Washington state housing finance commission must develop performance measures for the program, which must be approved by the department, including, at a minimum, measures related to:

(a) The ability of eligible organizations to access land for affordable housing development;

(b) The total number of dwelling units by housing type and the total number of low-income households and persons served; and

(c) The financial efficiency of the program as demonstrated by factors, including the cost per unit developed for affordable housing units in different areas of the state and a measure of the effective use of funds to produce the greatest number of units for low-income households.

(8) By December 1st of each year, beginning in 2007, the Washington state housing finance commission shall report to the department and the appropriate committees of the legislature using, at a minimum, the performance measures developed under subsection (7) of this section.

--- END ---