BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)(a) By December 1, 2018, the office of the insurance commissioner shall adopt rules to ensure that an enrollee may obtain an estimate of his or her out-of-pocket costs for a covered health care service prior to the service being provided.

(b) To develop the content of the rules, the insurance commissioner shall convene a work group of interested parties and relevant state agencies. The work group must consider and the rules must address: The information that must be provided to the enrollee; the time frame within which information must be provided to the enrollee; the persons or entities that should be responsible for providing the estimated costs to the enrollee; and how to operationalize the system for providing an enrollee with estimated costs.

(2) For purposes of this section, "enrollee," "health care service," and "health plan" have the same meaning as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(3) This section expires December 31, 2018.

--- END ---