BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that distracted driving is a practice that increases the likelihood of auto accidents, including fatal collisions, and is caused by a variety of activities, including the use of electronic devices, eating and drinking, talking to passengers, grooming, reading, using a navigation system, watching a video, or adjusting an audio device. The legislature further recognizes that distracted driving is one of the top three causes of fatal collisions for young drivers. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to discourage distracted driving by increasing the penalties and fines for traffic infractions when drivers are dangerously distracted and directing the additional revenue from penalties and fines to programs dedicated to reducing distracted driving.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any driver who commits a moving violation, as defined by rule pursuant to RCW 46.20.2891, must be assessed an additional monetary penalty that is equal to one-half of the penalty or fine for that moving violation if the driver was dangerously distracted at the time of the violation.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "dangerously distracted" means a person who engages in any activity not related to the actual operation of a motor vehicle in a manner that interferes with the safe operation of such motor vehicle on any highway.

(2) The additional monetary penalty imposed under this section must be used only to support programs dedicated to reducing distracted driving and improving driver education on distracted driving.

--- END ---