BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By September 1, 2018, and every five years thereafter, the legislative authority of each municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, and each regional transit authority must prepare a plan regarding the continuity of its transit operations in the event of a significant earthquake. This continuity of transit operations plan must contain information as to how the municipality or regional transit authority intends to maintain and restore transit operations in the event of a significant earthquake. Each municipality or regional transit authority shall file the continuity of transit operations plan with the department of transportation, the emergency management division of the Washington state military department, and cities, counties, and regional planning councils within which the municipality or regional transit authority is located.

(2) In developing its continuity of transit operations plan, the municipality or regional transit authority shall consult with the department of transportation and emergency management division of the Washington state military department. The municipality or regional transit authority shall conduct one or more public hearings while developing its plan and for each update.

--- END ---