BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 51.08.142 and 1988 c 161 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall adopt a rule pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW that claims based on mental conditions or mental disabilities caused by stress do not fall within the definition of occupational disease in RCW 51.08.140, except for claims made by a member of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system under chapter 41.26 RCW.

--- END ---