BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

After July 1, 2017, no rule, as defined in RCW 34.05.010, or policy of any state agency may be enforced unless and until the rule or policy has been adopted pursuant to this chapter, codified in the Washington Administrative Code, and ratified by act of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2017.

--- END ---