BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.74.010 and 2014 c 97 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(1) "Commuter ride sharing" means a car pool or van pool arrangement whereby one or more fixed groups not exceeding fifteen persons each including the drivers, and (a) not fewer than five persons including the drivers, ((or)) (b) not fewer than four persons including the drivers where at least two of those persons are confined to wheelchairs when riding, or (c) if the vehicle uses at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and is capable of traveling at least thirty miles using only battery power, not fewer than three persons including the drivers, are transported in a passenger motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight not exceeding ten thousand pounds, excluding special rider equipment, between their places of abode or termini near such places, and their places of employment or educational or other institutions, each group in a single daily round trip where the drivers are also on the way to or from their places of employment or educational or other institution.

(2) "Flexible commuter ride sharing" means a car pool or van pool arrangement whereby a group of at least two but not exceeding fifteen persons including the driver is transported in a passenger motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight not exceeding ten thousand pounds, excluding special rider equipment, between their places of abode or termini near such places, and their places of employment or educational or other institutions, where the driver is also on the way to or from his or her place of employment or educational or other institution.

(3) "Persons with special transportation needs" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 81.66.010.

(4) "Ride sharing for persons with special transportation needs" means an arrangement whereby a group of persons with special transportation needs, and their attendants, is transported by a public social service agency or a private, nonprofit transportation provider, as defined in RCW 81.66.010, serving persons with special needs, in a passenger motor vehicle as defined by the department to include small buses, cutaways, and modified vans not more than twenty-eight feet long: PROVIDED, That the driver need not be a person with special transportation needs.

(5) "Ride-sharing operator" means the person, entity, or concern, not necessarily the driver, responsible for the existence and continuance of commuter ride sharing, flexible commuter ride sharing, or ride sharing for persons with special transportation needs. The term "ride-sharing operator" includes but is not limited to an employer, an employer's agent, an employer-organized association, a state agency, a county, a city, a public transportation benefit area, or any other political subdivision that owns or leases a ride-sharing vehicle.

(6) "Ride-sharing promotional activities" means those activities involved in forming a commuter ride-sharing arrangement or a flexible commuter ride-sharing arrangement, including but not limited to receiving information from existing and prospective ride-sharing participants, sharing that information with other existing and prospective ride-sharing participants, matching those persons with other existing or prospective ride-sharing participants, and making assignments of persons to ride-sharing arrangements.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.08.0287 and 2014 c 97 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax imposed by this chapter does not apply to sales of passenger motor vehicles which are to be used primarily for commuter ride sharing or ride sharing for persons with special transportation needs, as defined in RCW 46.74.010, if the vehicles are used as ride-sharing vehicles for thirty-six consecutive months beginning from the date of purchase.

(2) To qualify for the tax exemption, those passenger motor vehicles with five or six passengers or, if the vehicle uses at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and is capable of traveling at least thirty miles using only battery power, three or more passengers, including the driver, used for commuter ride sharing, must be operated either within the state's eight largest counties that are required to develop commute trip reduction plans as directed by chapter 70.94 RCW or in other counties, or cities and towns within those counties, that elect to adopt and implement a commute trip reduction plan. Additionally at least one of the following conditions must apply: (a) The vehicle must be operated by a public transportation agency for the general public; or (b) the vehicle must be used by a major employer, as defined in RCW 70.94.524 as an element of its commute trip reduction program for their employees; or (c) the vehicle must be owned and operated by individual employees and must be registered either with the employer as part of its commute trip reduction program or with a public transportation agency serving the area where the employees live or work. Individual employee owned and operated motor vehicles will require certification that the vehicle is registered with a major employer or a public transportation agency. Major employers who own and operate motor vehicles for their employees must certify that the commuter ride-sharing arrangement conforms to a carpool/vanpool element contained within their commute trip reduction program.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.12.0282 and 2014 c 97 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax imposed by this chapter does not apply with respect to the use of passenger motor vehicles used primarily for commuter ride sharing or ride sharing for persons with special transportation needs, as defined in RCW 46.74.010, if the vehicles are used as ride-sharing vehicles for thirty-six consecutive months beginning with the date of first use.

(2) To qualify for the tax exemption, those passenger motor vehicles with five or six passengers or, if the vehicle uses at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and is capable of traveling at least thirty miles using only battery power, three or more passengers, including the driver, used for commuter ride sharing, must be operated either within the state's eight largest counties that are required to develop commute trip reduction plans as directed by chapter 70.94 RCW or in other counties, or cities and towns within those counties, that elect to adopt and implement a commute trip reduction plan. Additionally at least one of the following conditions must apply: (a) The vehicle must be operated by a public transportation agency for the general public; or (b) the vehicle must be used by a major employer, as defined in RCW 70.94.524 as an element of its commute trip reduction program for their employees; or (c) the vehicle must be owned and operated by individual employees and must be registered either with the employer as part of its commute trip reduction program or with a public transportation agency serving the area where the employees live or work. Individual employee owned and operated motor vehicles will require certification that the vehicle is registered with a major employer or a public transportation agency. Major employers who own and operate motor vehicles for their employees must certify that the commuter ride-sharing arrangement conforms to a carpool/vanpool element contained within their commute trip reduction program.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.44.015 and 2014 c 97 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Passenger motor vehicles used primarily for commuter ride sharing and ride sharing for persons with special transportation needs, as defined in RCW 46.74.010, are not subject to the motor vehicle excise tax authorized under this chapter if the vehicles are used as ride-sharing vehicles for thirty-six consecutive months beginning from the date of purchase.

(2) To qualify for the motor vehicle excise tax exemption for commuter ride-sharing vehicles, passenger motor vehicles must:

(a)(i) Have a seating capacity of five or six passengers, including the driver; or

(ii) If the vehicle uses at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and is capable of traveling at least thirty miles using only battery power, have a seating capacity of three or more passengers, including the driver;

(b) Be used for commuter ride sharing;

(c) Be operated either within:

(i) The state's eight largest counties that are required to develop commute trip reduction plans as directed by chapter 70.94 RCW; or

(ii) In other counties, or cities and towns within those counties, that elect to adopt and implement a commute trip reduction plan; and

(d) Meet at least one of the following conditions:

(i) The vehicle must be operated by a public transportation agency for the general public;

(ii) The vehicle must be used by a major employer, as defined in RCW 70.94.524 as an element of its commute trip reduction program for their employees; or

(iii) The vehicle must be owned and operated by individual employees and must be registered either with the employer as part of its commute trip reduction program or with a public transportation agency serving the area where the employees live or work. Individual employee owned and operated motor vehicles will require certification that the vehicle is registered with a major employer or a public transportation agency. Major employers who own and operate motor vehicles for their employees must certify that the commuter ride-sharing arrangement conforms to a carpool/vanpool element contained within their commute trip reduction program.

(3) The registered owner of a passenger motor vehicle described in subsection (2) of this section:

(a) Shall notify the department upon the termination of the primary use of the vehicle in commuter ride sharing or ride sharing for persons with special transportation needs; and

(b) Is liable for the motor vehicle excise tax imposed under this chapter, prorated on the remaining months for which the vehicle is registered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect August 1, 2017.

--- END ---