BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.410.280 and 2010 c 235 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Beginning with the 2011-12 school year)) (a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, all professional educator standards board-approved teacher preparation programs must administer to all preservice candidates the evidence-based assessment of teaching effectiveness adopted by the professional educator standards board. The professional educator standards board shall adopt rules that establish a date during the 2012-13 school year after which candidates completing teacher preparation programs must successfully pass this assessment, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. Assessment results from persons completing each preparation program must be reported annually by the professional educator standards board to the governor and the education and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st.

(b) The professional educator standards board must waive the requirement that preservice candidates successfully pass the evidence-based assessment of teaching effectiveness required under (a) of this subsection: (i) When requested by a school district with a subject endorsement shortage area, as defined by the professional educator standards board; and (ii) for a candidate completing a teacher preparation program in an endorsement shortage area, as defined by the professional educator standards board, that meets the need of the school district.

(2) The professional educator standards board and the superintendent of public instruction, as determined by the board, may contract with one or more third parties for:

(a) The administration, scoring, and reporting of scores of the assessment under this section;

(b) Related clerical and administrative activities; or

(c) Any combination of the purposes of this subsection (2).

(3) Candidates for residency certification who are required to successfully complete the assessment under this section, and who are charged a fee for the assessment by a third party contracted with under this section, shall pay the fee charged by the contractor directly to the contractor. Such fees shall be reasonably related to the actual costs of the contractor in providing the assessment.

--- END ---