BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.20.310 and 2012 c 10 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Assisted living facilities are not required to provide assistance with one or more activities of daily living.

(2) If an assisted living facility licensee chooses to provide assistance with activities of daily living, the licensee shall provide at least the minimal level of assistance for all activities of daily living consistent with subsection (3) of this section and consistent with the reasonable accommodation requirements in state or federal laws. "Activities of daily living ((are limited to and include))" means the following self-care activities related to personal care:

(a) Bathing;

(b) Dressing;

(c) Eating;

(d) Personal hygiene;

(e) Transferring;

(f) Toileting; ((and))

(g) Ambulation and mobility; and

(h) Medication assistance, as defined in RCW 69.41.010.

(3) The department shall, in rule, define the minimum level of assistance that will be provided for all activities of daily living, however, such rules shall not require more than occasional stand-by assistance or more than occasional physical assistance.

(4) The licensee shall clarify, through the disclosure form, the assistance with activities of daily living that may be provided, and any limitations or conditions that may apply. The licensee shall also clarify through the disclosure form any additional services that may be provided.

(5) In providing assistance with activities of daily living, the assisted living facility shall observe the resident for changes in overall functioning and respond appropriately when there are observable or reported changes in the resident's physical, mental, or emotional functioning.

--- END ---