BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

In consultation with the Washington administrative office of the courts, Washington superior court judges' association, Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, Washington public defenders' association, and Washington association of county clerks, the department shall develop a mandatory sentencing elements worksheet. The worksheet shall be used to identify and record the elements of the court's order that are required by the department to calculate an offender's confinement term, and community custody term when ordered. The Washington administrative office of the courts must include the mandatory sentencing elements worksheet in a specific section within its felony judgment and sentence forms.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.480 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A current, newly created or reworked judgment and sentence document for each felony sentencing shall record any and all recommended sentencing agreements or plea agreements and the sentences for any and all felony crimes kept as public records under RCW 9.94A.475 shall contain the clearly printed name and legal signature of the sentencing judge. The judgment and sentence document as defined in this section shall also provide additional space for the sentencing judge's reasons for going either above or below the presumptive sentence range for any and all felony crimes covered as public records under RCW 9.94A.475. In addition, each felony judgment and sentence document must contain in a specific section the mandatory sentencing elements worksheet developed by the department of corrections in section 1 of this act. Both the sentencing judge and the prosecuting attorney's office shall each retain or receive a completed copy of each sentencing document as defined in this section for their own records.

(2) The caseload forecast council shall be sent a completed copy of the judgment and sentence document upon conviction for each felony sentencing under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) If any completed judgment and sentence document as defined in subsection (1) of this section is not sent to the caseload forecast council as required in subsection (2) of this section, the caseload forecast council shall have the authority and shall undertake reasonable and necessary steps to assure that all past, current, and future sentencing documents as defined in subsection (1) of this section are received by the caseload forecast council.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.585 and 2002 c 290 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sentence within the standard sentence range, under RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517, for an offense shall not be appealed. For purposes of this section, a sentence imposed on a first-time offender under RCW 9.94A.650 shall also be deemed to be within the standard sentence range for the offense and shall not be appealed.

(2) A sentence outside the standard sentence range for the offense is subject to appeal by the defendant or the state. The appeal shall be to the court of appeals in accordance with rules adopted by the supreme court.

(3) Pending review of the sentence, the sentencing court or the court of appeals may order the defendant confined or placed on conditional release, including bond.

(4) To reverse a sentence which is outside the standard sentence range, the reviewing court must find: (a) Either that the reasons supplied by the sentencing court are not supported by the record which was before the judge or that those reasons do not justify a sentence outside the standard sentence range for that offense; or (b) that the sentence imposed was clearly excessive or clearly too lenient.

(5) A review under this section shall be made solely upon the record that was before the sentencing court. Written briefs shall not be required and the review and decision shall be made in an expedited manner according to rules adopted by the supreme court.

(6) The court of appeals shall issue a written opinion in support of its decision whenever the judgment of the sentencing court is reversed and may issue written opinions in any other case where the court believes that a written opinion would provide guidance to sentencing courts and others in implementing this chapter and in developing a common law of sentencing within the state.

(7) The department may petition for a review of a sentence committing an offender to the custody or jurisdiction of the department. The review shall be limited to errors of law or to address a missing, incomplete, or illegible mandatory sentencing elements section required pursuant to RCW 9.94A.480(1). Such petition shall be filed with the court of appeals no later than ninety days after the department has actual knowledge of terms of the sentence. The petition shall include a certification by the department that all reasonable efforts to resolve the dispute at the superior court level have been exhausted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act applies to sentences imposed on or after January 1, 2018.

--- END ---