BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.180.020 and 1984 c 124 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The superintendent of public instruction shall review annually the transitional bilingual instruction program and shall submit a report of such review to the legislature on or before ((January 1)) February 1st of each year.

--- END ---