BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that oil train traffic in Washington state has increased in recent years. This increase brings with it an increased risk of accidents, which may involve spills, fires, and other associated hazards that are injurious to the public's health and safety. An estimated seven hundred seventy-five thousand Washingtonians are exposed to these risks due to their proximity to train tracks that transport oil. The legislature finds that citizen awareness and preparedness are critical components in accident response. Accordingly, the legislature intends to implement measures that will not only increase the overall preparedness of the state to respond to its existing hazards, but will specifically enhance community-based and citizen-based preparation efforts, and will help ensure that local communities and individuals are able to respond appropriately to mitigate the public health and safety impacts associated with oil train accidents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must create public health emergency preparedness guidance for oil train accidents and directly associated hazards, including, but not limited to, explosions, fires, spills, decreased water quality, and other known public health risks. The public health emergency preparedness guidance must include, at a minimum:

(a) Information targeted to the public describing the health risks of the hazardous conditions commonly associated with oil train accidents; and

(b) General guidance on steps citizens can take in response to adverse health conditions created by an oil train accident.

(2) The public health emergency preparedness guidance must be completed by December 1, 2018, and maintained on the department web site.

(3) No later than January 1, 2020, the department must partner with local public health authorities in localities through which oil trains travel to deliver a public awareness and education outreach program to increase awareness among individual citizens and local communities of the potential health hazards associated with oil train accidents.

(4) In developing the public health emergency preparedness guidance and the public awareness and education outreach program, the department shall consult and collaborate with local city and county officials, local public health authorities, and local first responders, including local emergency planning committees, in localities through which oil trains travel.

(5) The public health emergency preparedness guidance and public awareness and education outreach program must be complimentary to and not in conflict with other efforts in the state to address emergency response to oil train accidents and directly associated hazards.

(6) The department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1st of each year through the year 2020, regarding its progress toward development of public health emergency preparedness guidance targeted to hazards associated with oil train accidents, and its progress in developing and delivering a public awareness and education outreach program, under the timelines set forth in this section.

--- END ---