BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person may take a dog meeting the requirements listed in subsection (2) of this section to any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement for the purpose of training the dog as a dog guide or service animal if the person has a disability or the person is training the dog on behalf of or for the benefit of a person with a disability.

(2) A dog that a person brings to any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement under this section must:

(a) Be six months of age or older;

(b) Wear a cape or vest that clearly states "dog guide in training" or "service animal in training"; and

(c) Be kept on a leash and under control by the person who brings the dog.

(3) A person who brings a dog to any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement under this section is liable for any provable damage done to the premises or facilities by the dog.

(4) The commission has no duty to investigate any acts referred to under this section.

--- END ---