BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must reimburse a public agency for the expense of an emergency response to a collision between a motor vehicle and elk that occurs on a highway. The department must do so within thirty days of receiving a written request and summary of expenses from the responding agency.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "public agency" and "expense of an emergency response" have the same meaning as defined in RCW 38.52.010 and "highway" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 46.04.197.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The department of fish and wildlife must, in cooperation with affected landowners and other relevant stakeholders, conduct a review of the wildlife damage claim process, including relevant statutes, program funding, and agency rules and practices. At minimum, the review should identify potential program efficiencies and methods to streamline the process for those affected by damage caused by wildlife.

(2) The department of fish and wildlife must provide a summary of the findings and any legislative or administrative recommendations to the legislature and the fish and wildlife commission by November 1, 2017.

(3) This section expires December 31, 2017.

--- END ---