BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.08.140 and 2011 c 10 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to vote in any primary, special election, or general election, a person who is not registered to vote in Washington must:

(a) Submit a registration application no later than twenty-nine days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election; or

(b) Register in person at the county auditor's office, or other location designated by the county auditor, in his or her county of residence no later than ((eight days before)) 5:00 p.m. on the day of the primary, special election, or general election.

(2) A person who is already registered to vote in Washington may update his or her registration no later than twenty-nine days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election to be in effect for that primary, special election, or general election. A registered voter who fails to transfer his or her residential address by this deadline may vote according to his or her previous registration address.

--- END ---