BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The affordable housing advisory board must conduct a study to identify the existence of potentially surplus publicly owned real property within areas with high rates of increased property value and the potential for holding such properties in a state affordable housing land bank or using the proceeds from the sale of such properties for affordable housing development. The department of commerce may provide additional support and resources to the affordable housing advisory board to conduct the study.

(2) The study must include a catalog of all publicly owned property within designated areas of high rates of increased property value, and may request the inventories of real property from any state or local agency. Any agency whose inventory of real property has been requested must provide the inventory within a reasonable time for the board to complete the study. The board should evaluate the condition of the properties in the catalog for potential development of affordable housing, as well as the location of the property in relation to the need for affordable housing in the surrounding area.

(3) The affordable housing advisory board must consult with state and local agencies regarding the potential sale of public properties that would include a remittance to support funding for affordable housing development. The board must consider the potential sources for receiving such revenue including, but not limited to, the account established for the housing trust fund, pursuant to RCW 43.185.030.

(4) The study must consider the potential for establishing a state affordable housing land bank that could receive and manage surplus public property for the development of affordable housing. The board should consider the potential kinds of mechanisms for obtaining, holding, and leasing such property.

(5) The affordable housing advisory board should rely on the resources of the entities and organizations represented on the board to assist with the expertise and consultation to conduct the study. The board may also consult with experts in the real estate and housing development industry, as well as governmental entities and relevant stakeholders.

(6) By December 31, 2018, the affordable housing advisory board must prepare a report for each appropriate legislative standing committee regarding the results of the study. The report must include:

(a) The catalog of publicly owned properties within designated areas that have high rates of increased property values and development of such properties for affordable housing development and the effectiveness of development in such areas;

(b) The potential for creating a state affordable housing land bank that could hold public property and donated properties for the purpose of using for affordable housing development;

(c) Recommendations for the best uses of surplus publicly owned property for the purpose of increasing affordable housing development, especially in areas within the state where increased property values are decreasing opportunities to identify available land for affordable housing; and

(d) Any other related issues or recommendations the affordable housing advisory board may find relevant in the course of conducting the study.

(7) This section expires December 31, 2018.

--- END ---