BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 64.44.005 and 1990 c 213 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that some properties are being contaminated by hazardous chemicals used in unsafe or illegal ways in the manufacture of illegal drugs or by hazardous drugs contaminating transient accommodations regulated by the department. Innocent members of the public may be harmed by the residue left by these chemicals when the properties are subsequently rented or sold without having been decontaminated.

Sec. 2. RCW 64.44.010 and 2013 c 19 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

The words and phrases defined in this section shall have the following meanings when used in this chapter unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(1) "Authorized contractor" means a person who decontaminates, demolishes, or disposes of contaminated property as required by this chapter who is certified by the department as provided for in RCW 64.44.060.

(2) "Contaminated" or "contamination" means polluted by hazardous chemicals so that the property is unfit for human habitation or use due to immediate or long-term hazards. Property that at one time was contaminated but has been satisfactorily decontaminated according to procedures established by the state board of health is not "contaminated."

(3) "Department" means the department of health.

(4) "Hazardous chemicals" means:

(a) Methamphetamine in amounts exceeding the decontamination standards set by the department when found in transient accommodations such as hotels, motels, bed and breakfasts, resorts, inns, crisis shelters, hostels, and retreats that are regulated by the department; and

(b) The following substances associated with the illegal manufacture of controlled substances: (((a))) (i) Hazardous substances as defined in RCW 70.105D.020; (((b))) (ii) precursor substances as defined in RCW 69.43.010 which the state board of health, in consultation with the pharmacy quality assurance commission, has determined present an immediate or long-term health hazard to humans; and (((c))) (iii) the controlled substance or substances being manufactured, as defined in RCW 69.50.101.

(5) "Officer" means a local health officer authorized under chapters 70.05, 70.08, and 70.46 RCW.

(6) "Property" means any real or personal property, or segregable part thereof, that is involved in or affected by the unauthorized manufacture, distribution, ((or)) storage, or use of hazardous chemicals. This includes but is not limited to single-family residences, units of multiplexes, condominiums, apartment buildings, transient accommodations, boats, motor vehicles, trailers, manufactured housing, any shop, booth, garden, or storage shed, and all contents of the items referenced in this subsection.

Sec. 3. RCW 64.44.060 and 2013 c 251 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A contractor, supervisor, or worker may not perform decontamination, demolition, or disposal work unless issued a certificate by the state department of health. The department shall establish performance standards for contractors, supervisors, and workers by rule in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act. The department shall train and test, or may approve courses to train and test, contractors, supervisors, and workers on the essential elements in assessing contaminated transient accommodations or property used as an illegal controlled substances manufacturing or storage site to determine hazard reduction measures needed, techniques for adequately reducing contaminants, use of personal protective equipment, methods for proper decontamination, demolition, removal, and disposal of contaminated property, and relevant federal and state regulations. Upon successful completion of the training, and after a background check, the contractor, supervisor, or worker shall be certified.

(2) The department may require the successful completion of annual refresher courses provided or approved by the department for the continued certification of the contractor or employee.

(3) The department shall provide for reciprocal certification of any individual trained to engage in decontamination, demolition, or disposal work in another state when the prior training is shown to be substantially similar to the training required by the department. The department may require such individuals to take an examination or refresher course before certification.

(4) The department may deny, suspend, revoke, or place restrictions on a certificate for failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter. A certificate may be denied, suspended, revoked, or have restrictions placed on it on any of the following grounds:

(a) Failing to perform decontamination, demolition, or disposal work under the supervision of trained personnel;

(b) Failing to perform decontamination, demolition, or disposal work using department of health certified decontamination personnel;

(c) Failing to file a work plan;

(d) Failing to perform work pursuant to the work plan;

(e) Failing to perform work that meets the requirements of the department and the requirements of the local health officers;

(f) Failing to properly dispose of contaminated property;

(g) Committing fraud or misrepresentation in: (i) Applying for or obtaining a certification, recertification, or reinstatement; (ii) seeking approval of a work plan; and (iii) documenting completion of work to the department or local health officer;

(h) Failing the evaluation and inspection of decontamination projects pursuant to RCW 64.44.075; or

(i) If the person has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or a residential or visitation order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

(5) A contractor, supervisor, or worker who violates any provision of this chapter may be assessed a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars for each violation.

(6) The department of health shall prescribe fees as provided for in RCW 43.70.250 for: The issuance and renewal of certificates, conducting background checks of applicants, the administration of examinations, and the review of training courses.

--- END ---