BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.405 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If a written or verbal complaint about the performance of professional duties by a substitute teacher is made to a school district by the parent or guardian of a student, or a district employee, the district must, unless it determines the complaint to be without merit or otherwise insufficient to warrant further action, notify the substitute teacher of the complaint. The notification required by this subsection must be made by telephone or via email within twenty-four hours of a complaint received during the school year, or within one week of a complaint received at any other time. The notification required by this section must include all information provided to the district in the complaint and any formal or other opportunities the substitute teacher has to respond to the complaint.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, nothing in this section requires a school district to modify district requirements and practices governing responses to received complaints about the performance of professional duties by a substitute teacher.

--- END ---