BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act may be known and cited as the doctor of medical science act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter, unless context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Doctor of medical science" means an individual who is a graduate of an accredited doctor of medical science program, lawfully renders services, whether diagnostic or therapeutic, in the practice of primary care, and has received a license under section 3 of this act.

(2) "Doctor of medical science program" means a doctoral medical program that trains physician assistants in advanced clinical medicine and prepares physician assistants for clinical practice equivalent to a medical doctor in the practice discipline of primary care.

(3) "Physician assistant" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.71A.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall grant an applicant a license as a doctor of medical science if the person:

(a) Previously has been licensed and served in primary care clinical practice for at least three years in one or more states as a physician assistant;

(b) Is a graduate of a minimum two-year doctor of medical science program accredited by a regional body under the United States department of education;

(c) Has successfully completed an examination, equivalent or comparable to that of a physician or osteopathic physician, on the certification of doctors of medical science, as determined by the commission; and

(d) As determined by the commission pursuant to rules adopted under section 4 of this act, provides satisfactory evidence of an affiliation or association with a hospital, group practice, or a list of physicians with medical expertise outside the expertise of the person seeking licensure as a doctor of medical science.

(2) Upon the issuance of a license by the commission under this section, the person receiving the license is entitled to practice in any county of this state as a doctor of medical science.

(3) A person licensed as a doctor of medical science is subject to the provisions of this chapter and rules or regulations adopted by the commission.

(4) The commission shall provide for renewal of licenses for a person licensed as a doctor of medical science under this chapter in the same manner as provided for physicians under this chapter, with the further requirement that the renewal application include evidence of affiliation or association with a hospital or group practice, or a list of physicians with medical expertise outside the expertise of the licensee with whom the licensee is able to consult, on file with the commission at the time of relicensing.

(a) Every licensed doctor of medical science shall biannually pay a licensing renewal fee as set by the commission and provide evidence to the commission that the licensee, in each year preceding the application for renewal, successfully completed two hundred hours of continuing medical education and meets all of the other licensing requirements under this chapter.

(b) Each person licensed under this section shall be notified prior to the due date of the renewal fee.

(5) When any licensed doctor of medical science fails to renew his or her license and pay the biannual registration fee within sixty days after registration becomes due, his or her license is automatically revoked at the expiration of the sixty days after the registration was required, without further notice or hearing.

(6) Any person whose license is automatically revoked under subsection (5) of this section may apply in writing to the commission for the reinstatement of his or her license, and, upon good cause being shown, the commission, in its discretion, may reinstate the license upon payment of all past due renewal fees and upon further payment of a sum to be set by the commission.

(7)(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the commission shall establish a system of license renewals at alternative intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year.

(b) A renewal application may not be accepted after the last day of the month following the license expiration date under the alternative method authorized in this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Pursuant to authority granted under this chapter, the commission may adopt rules related to the scope of practice, application process, license renewal, penalties, and other areas the commission determines necessary for licensed doctors of medical science.

(2) The commission may also establish a committee on doctors of medical science to assist with the adoption of rules and regulations. Any rules and regulations adopted by the commission must comply with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

--- END ---