BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.02 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any hospital or health care facility in which an abortion is performed must report to the department of health whether an intrafetal injection was used in an attempt to induce fetal demise, such as intrafetal potassium chloride or digoxin. The department of health shall adopt standards for hospitals and facilities to report the information in a process that corresponds to other reporting requirements regarding abortions. The department of health shall summarize the information for inclusion in its reports related to abortion.

(2) By January 1, 2018, the department of health shall adopt guidelines for hospitals and health care facilities to use as best practices for the environmentally responsible use and disposal of potassium chloride and digoxin for medical procedures. The department of health shall make the guidelines available on its web site.

--- END ---