BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 10.01.100 and 1925 ex.s. c 101 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((Every corporation guilty of a violation of any law of the state of Washington, where the prescribed penalty is, for any reason, incapable of execution or enforcement against such corporation, shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars, if such offense is a felony; or, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars if such offense is a gross misdemeanor; or, by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars if such offense is a misdemeanor.)) (1) When imposed on a corporation for any criminal offense for which no special corporate fine is specified, a sentence to pay a fine may not exceed:

(a) One million dollars for a class A or B felony;

(b) Seven hundred fifty thousand dollars for a class C felony;

(c) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars for a gross misdemeanor; and

(d) Fifty thousand dollars for a misdemeanor.

(2) If a special fine for a corporation is expressly specified in the statute that defines an offense, the fine fixed must be within the limits specified in the statute.

--- END ---