BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall contract with a private nonprofit organization that agrees to work collaboratively with independent living providers and the department and is selected after a competitive application process to provide driver's license support for foster youth, including youth receiving extended foster care services.

(2) The nonprofit organization selected pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall provide support for foster youth ages fifteen through twenty-one, including youth receiving extended foster care services, in navigating the driver's licensing process. This support must include:

(a) Reimbursement of fees necessary for a foster youth to obtain a driver's instruction permit, an intermediate license, and a standard or enhanced driver's license, including any required examination fees, as described in chapter 46.20 RCW;

(b) Reimbursement of fees required for a foster youth to complete a driver training education course, if the foster youth is under the age of eighteen, as outlined in chapter 46.82 or 28A.220 RCW;

(c) Reimbursement of the increase in motor vehicle liability insurance costs incurred by foster parents, relative placements, or other foster placements adding a foster youth to his or her motor vehicle liability insurance policy, with a preference on reimbursements for those foster youth who practice safe driving and avoid moving violations and at-fault collisions.

(3) By December 1, 2019, the nonprofit organization selected pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall submit a report to the department and the appropriate committees of the legislature, including the transportation committees of the legislature, documenting the number of foster youth served by the program; the average cost per youth served; the extent to which foster youth report any negative outcomes of the program, including a foster parent's inappropriate use of a foster youth's driving authorization; and recommendations for future policy or statutory or funding changes necessary to more effectively allow foster youth to obtain drivers' licenses and motor vehicle liability insurance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If specific funding for the purposes of this act is not provided by June 30, 2017, in the omnibus transportation appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---