BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that a prioritized recommendation of the children's mental health work group as reported in December 2016 is to reduce burdensome and duplicative paperwork requirements for providers of children's mental health services.

The legislature further finds that these duplicative documentation requirements for providers have a negative impact on the adequacy of the network of mental health providers and create costly barriers to the efficient provision of services for children and their families.

Therefore, the legislature intends to require the department of social and health services to take steps to reduce paperwork and documentation requirements which are inefficient or duplicative for providers of children's mental health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must immediately perform a review of its rules, policies, and procedures related to the documentation requirements for behavioral health services with regard to individual initial assessments. The review must identify areas in which duplicative or inefficient documentation requirements can be eliminated or streamlined for providers. The department must complete the review by November 1, 2017. Upon completion of the review, the department must take immediate steps to amend department rules accordingly.

(2) This section expires December 31, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority must immediately perform a review of its rules, policies, and procedures related to the documentation requirements for behavioral health services with regard to individual initial assessments. The review must identify areas in which duplicative or inefficient documentation requirements can be eliminated or streamlined for providers. The authority must complete the review by November 1, 2017. Upon completion of the review, the authority must take immediate steps to amend authority rules accordingly.

(2) This section expires December 31, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act takes effect only if neither Substitute House Bill No. 1388 (including any later amendments or substitutes) nor Substitute Senate Bill No. 5259 (including any later amendments or substitutes) is signed into law by the governor by the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Section 3 of this act takes effect only if Substitute House Bill No. 1388 (including any later amendments or substitutes) or Substitute Senate Bill No. 5259 (including any later amendments or substitutes) is signed into law by the governor by the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2017, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---