BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 7.68.801 and 2015 c 273 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commercially sexually exploited children statewide coordinating committee is established to address the issue of children who are commercially sexually exploited, to examine the practices of local and regional entities involved in addressing sexually exploited children, and to make recommendations on statewide laws and practices.

(2) The committee is convened by the office of the attorney general with the department of commerce assisting with agenda planning and administrative and clerical support. The committee consists of the following members:

(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house;

(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate appointed by the speaker of the senate;

(c) A representative of the governor's office appointed by the governor;

(d) The secretary of the children's administration or his or her designee;

(e) The secretary of the juvenile rehabilitation administration or his or her designee;

(f) The attorney general or his or her designee;

(g) The superintendent of public instruction or his or her designee;

(h) A representative of the administrative office of the courts appointed by the administrative office of the courts;

(i) The executive director of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs or his or her designee;

(j) The executive director of the Washington state criminal justice training commission or his or her designee;

(k) A representative of the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys appointed by the association;

(l) The executive director of the office of public defense or his or her designee;

(m) Three representatives of community service providers that provide direct services to commercially sexually exploited children appointed by the attorney general;

(n) Two representatives of nongovernmental organizations familiar with the issues affecting commercially sexually exploited children appointed by the attorney general;

(o) The president of the superior court judges' association or his or her designee;

(p) The president of the juvenile court administrators or his or her designee;

(q) Any existing chairs of regional task forces on commercially sexually exploited children;

(r) A representative from the criminal defense bar;

(s) A representative of the center for children and youth justice;

(t) A representative from the office of crime victims advocacy;

(u) The executive director of the Washington coalition of sexual assault programs;

(v) A representative of an organization that provides in-patient chemical dependency treatment to youth, appointed by the attorney general;

(w) A representative of an organization that provides mental health treatment to youth, appointed by the attorney general; and

(x) A survivor of human trafficking, appointed by the attorney general.

(3) The duties of the committee include, but are not limited to:

(a) Overseeing and reviewing the implementation of the Washington state model protocol for commercially sexually exploited children at ((pilot)) task force sites;

(b) Receiving reports and data from local and regional entities regarding the incidence of commercially sexually exploited children in their areas as well as data information regarding perpetrators, geographic data and location trends, and any other data deemed relevant;

(c) Receiving reports on local coordinated community response practices and results of the community responses;

(d) Reviewing recommendations from local and regional entities regarding policy and legislative changes that would improve the efficiency and effectiveness of local response practices;

(e) Making recommendations regarding policy and legislative changes that would improve the effectiveness of the state's response to and promote best practices for suppression of the commercial sexual exploitation of children;

(f) Making recommendations regarding data collection useful to understanding or addressing the problem of commercially sexually exploited children;

(g) Reviewing and making recommendations regarding strategic local investments or opportunities for federal and state funding to address the commercial sexual exploitation of children;

(h) Reviewing the extent to which chapter 289, Laws of 2010 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6476) is understood and applied by enforcement authorities; and

(i) Researching any barriers that exist to full implementation of chapter 289, Laws of 2010 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6476) throughout the state.

(4) The committee must meet no less than annually.

(5) The committee shall annually report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and to any other known statewide committees addressing trafficking or the commercial sex trade ((by June 30, 2017)).

(6) ((In addition to its report under subsection (5) of this section, the committee shall report its findings regarding its duties under subsection (3)(h) and (i) of this section to the appropriate committees of the legislature by February 1, 2016.

(7))) This section expires June 30, ((2017)) 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---