BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

It is a goal of the legislature to ensure that state support for the four-year institutions of higher education is at least fifty percent of the total amount of funding the institutions receive from general fund and education legacy trust account appropriations and the operating fee portion of tuition and fees. This funding goal should be recognized as a mechanism to gauge college affordability. By January 1st of each biennium, each four-year institution of higher education and the state board for community and technical colleges shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the percentages of funding each institution or sector receives from general fund and education legacy trust account appropriations compared to tuition.

--- END ---