BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority and the department of social and health services shall convene a work group consisting of representatives of skilled nursing facilities, hospitals, and managed health care systems. The work group shall identify barriers that may prevent skilled nursing facilities from accepting and admitting enrollees from acute care hospitals in a timely and appropriate manner. The work group shall consider what additional resources are needed to allow for faster transfers of enrollees, including those with complex needs. By December 1, 2017, the authority shall report the work group findings to the governor and the committees of the legislature with jurisdiction over health care matters.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2018.

--- END ---