BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW to be codified between RCW 19.28.041 and 19.28.141 to read as follows:

(1) Any licensed self-propelled motor vehicle used by a general or specialty electrical contractor while engaged in the electrical construction trade must be marked with the contractor's legal business name and license number issued by the department.

(2) The marking must:

(a) Appear on both sides of the vehicle;

(b) Be in letters that contrast sharply in color with the background on which the letters are placed;

(c) Be readily legible during daylight hours from a distance of fifty feet while the vehicle is stationary; and

(d) Be kept and maintained in a manner that retains the legibility required by (c) of this subsection.

(3) The marking may be affixed by adhesive, painted on the vehicle, or consist of a removable device, if the other requirements of this section are met.

--- END ---