BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.106.150 and 2013 c 23 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require that a person obtain a license or a certified plumber in order to do plumbing work at his or her residence or farm or place of business or on other property owned by him or her.

(2) A current certificate of competency or apprentice permit is not required for:

(a) Persons performing plumbing work on a farm; or

(b) Certified journey level electricians, certified residential specialty electricians, or electrical trainees working for an electrical contractor and performing exempt work under RCW 18.27.090(18).

(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be intended to derogate from or dispense with the requirements of any valid plumbing code enacted by a political subdivision of the state, except that no code shall require the holder of a certificate of competency to demonstrate any additional proof of competency or obtain any other license or pay any fee in order to engage in the trade of plumbing.

(4) This chapter shall not apply to common carriers subject to Part I of the Interstate Commerce Act, nor to their officers and employees.

(5) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to any farm, business, industrial plant, or corporation doing plumbing work on premises it owns or operates.

(6) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict the right of any householder to assist or receive assistance from a friend, neighbor, relative, or other person when none of the individuals doing such plumbing hold themselves out as engaged in the trade or business of plumbing.

(7) This section does not apply to regularly employed employees working on the premises of a state agency employer. For purposes of this subsection, "state agency" means any state board, commission, bureau, committee, department, institution, division, or tribunal in state government, including statewide elected offices and institutions of higher education created and supported by the state government, but does not mean the parks and recreation commission.

Sec. 2. RCW 19.28.261 and 2013 c 23 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed to require that a person obtain a license or a certified electrician in order to do electrical work at his or her residence or farm or place of business or on other property owned by him or her unless the electrical work is on the construction of a new building intended for rent, sale, or lease. However, if the construction is of a new residential building with up to four units intended for rent, sale, or lease, the owner may receive an exemption from the requirement to obtain a license or use a certified electrician if he or she provides a signed affidavit to the department stating that he or she will be performing the work and will occupy one of the units as his or her principal residence. The owner shall apply to the department for this exemption and may only receive an exemption once every twenty-four months. It is intended that the owner receiving this exemption shall occupy the unit as his or her principal residence for twenty-four months after completion of the units.

(2) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be intended to derogate from or dispense with the requirements of any valid electrical code enacted by a city or town pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3), except that no code shall require the holder of a certificate of competency to demonstrate any additional proof of competency or obtain any other license or pay any fee in order to engage in the electrical construction trade.

(3) RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply to common carriers subject to Part I of the Interstate Commerce Act, nor to their officers and employees.

(4) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be deemed to apply to the installation or maintenance of telephone, telegraph, radio, or television wires and equipment; nor to any electrical utility or its employees in the installation, repair, and maintenance of electrical wiring, circuits, and equipment by or for the utility, or comprising a part of its plants, lines, or systems.

(5) The licensing provisions of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply to:

(a) Persons making electrical installations on their own property or to regularly employed employees working on the premises of their employer, unless the electrical work is on the construction of a new building intended for rent, sale, or lease. The exemption in this subsection (5)(a) does not apply to regularly employed employees working on the premises of a state agency employer. For purposes of this subsection, "state agency" means any state board, commission, bureau, committee, department, institution, division, or tribunal state government, including statewide elected offices and institutions of higher education created and supported by the state government, but does not include the parks and recreation commission;

(b) Employees of an employer while the employer is performing utility type work of the nature described in RCW 19.28.091 so long as such employees have registered in the state of Washington with or graduated from a state-approved outside lineworker apprenticeship course that is recognized by the department and that qualifies a person to perform such work;

(c) Any work exempted under RCW 19.28.091(6); and

(d) Certified plumbers, certified residential plumbers, or plumber trainees meeting the requirements of chapter 18.106 RCW and performing exempt work under RCW 19.28.091(8).

(6) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed to restrict the right of any householder to assist or receive assistance from a friend, neighbor, relative, or other person when none of the individuals doing the electrical installation hold themselves out as engaged in the trade or business of electrical installations.

(7) Nothing precludes any person who is exempt from the licensing requirements of this chapter under this section from obtaining a journey level or specialty certificate of competency if they otherwise meet the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW to read as follows:

The department of labor and industries shall study and make recommendations on the development of apprenticeship programs under which state government employees who perform electrical and plumbing work may obtain electrician and plumber certificates of competency. The department shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 and 2 of this act take effect January 1, 2022.

--- END ---