BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All public employees in this state are prohibited from assisting or otherwise expending state resources of any kind to knowingly aid or assist the federal government with respect to any activity or inquiry directly or indirectly related to any federal action or effort that might have the effect of impeding, obstructing, or otherwise interfering with the functioning or continued operation of the laws, regulations, procedures, systems, or public agencies of this state related to the production, processing, sale, use, or possession of marijuana as governed by chapters 69.50 and 69.51A RCW or other provisions of state law. This prohibition includes providing aid or assistance, whether directly or indirectly, to any federal official, federal employee, federal contractor, or other person with respect to the federal activities described in this subsection.

(2) A public employee who knowingly violates this section may be subject to disciplinary proceedings or termination of public employment in accordance with the laws and regulations governing the personnel practices of his or her public employer and the laws of this state.

(3) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Public employee" means any employee of the state, local government, special purpose district, or other political subdivision of the state, and includes, but is not limited to, the following categories of publicly employed personnel:

(i) All employees engaged in activities related to law enforcement, public safety, and the criminal corrections system;

(ii) All employees engaged in activities related to the operation, administration, or management of state or local court systems; and

(iii) All employees engaged in activities related to the recording, storage, management, administration, processing, transmission, maintenance, or analysis of information, records, or data of any kind.

(b) "State resource" means:

(i) Any time or effort expended by a public employee during the hours in which they are expected or required to be engaged in employment related activities pursuant to the terms and requirements of his or her employment and for which he or she receives valuable compensation; and

(ii) The use of facilities or equipment owned or operated by the state, local governments, special purpose districts, or other political subdivisions of this state.

--- END ---