BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the legislature to contribute to the economic vitality and resilience of Washington by supporting diverse economic sectors. As the state builds an economic resilience strategy by 2021, as called for in the recommendations of the joint legislative task force on the economic resilience of maritime and manufacturing in Washington, the legislature intends to assess economic impacts of those sectors that provide resilience to local communities throughout the state.

Therefore, the legislature requires an economic impact study on the contributions of two-year and four-year public institutions of higher education to evaluate the economic impact of state investment in areas including jobs, public facilities, critical infrastructure, and financial aid to students in the local economy where these educational institutions are located. The success of these critical institutions is necessary for the economic development and resilience of these local communities and the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)(a) Subject to available funds appropriated specifically for the purpose in this section, the department of commerce must contract for a study on the economic impact of the contributions of public institutions of higher education, two and four-year, in Washington, to assist the legislature in supporting and making strategic investments towards sustaining a diversified economy.

(b) The study must be completed by an entity that has demonstrated an ability to complete economic impact studies on public institutions of higher education. The contracted entity must consult with local governments and community leaders representing diversity in geography, size, and population to complete the study. The study must include, but is not limited to, an assessment of statewide and local impacts of public institutions of higher education by evaluating:

(i) Income and jobs created, including direct, indirect, and induced jobs related to public employment, higher education graduate employment, and higher education students part-time and full-time employment, in the local communities where institutions of higher education are located;

(ii) Public facilities;

(iii) Critical infrastructure;

(iv) Student financial aid, including need-based grants;

(v) Community revitalization;

(vi) Local and state tax revenues;

(vii) Consumer spending; and

(viii) Research and development.

(2) The study must also identify local community efforts to collaborate with public institutions of higher education.

(3) The department of commerce must submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a final study with findings and recommendations by October 1, 2018, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.

(4) This section expires December 31, 2018.

--- END ---