BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.160.900 and 2014 c 112 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The community economic revitalization board ((shall)) must conduct biennial outcome-based evaluations of the financial assistance provided under this chapter. The evaluations ((shall)) must include information on the number of applications for community economic revitalization board assistance; the number and types of projects approved; the grant or loan amount awarded each project; the projected number of jobs created or retained by each project; the actual number and cost of jobs created or retained by each project; the wages and health benefits associated with the jobs; the amount of state funds and total capital invested in projects; the number and types of businesses assisted by funded projects; the location of funded projects; the transportation infrastructure available for completed projects; the local match and local participation obtained; the number of delinquent loans; and the number of project terminations. The evaluations may also include additional performance measures and recommendations for programmatic changes.

(2) The evaluation must be presented to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31st of each even-numbered year. The initial evaluation must be submitted by December 31, 2010.

(3) The community economic revitalization board must utilize the outcome-based evaluation reports required in this section to develop a strategic plan for the funding appropriated for financing public facilities under this chapter. The strategic plan should incorporate the data collected in the evaluation reports to determine the most effective ways of meeting the statutory goals set out in this chapter. By December 31, 2017, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the board must submit the strategic plan to the legislature.

--- END ---