BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.160.050 and 2011 c 331 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) All certificate of competency holders that desire to continue in the fire protection sprinkler business shall annually, prior to January 1st, secure from the state director of fire protection a renewal certificate of competency upon payment of the fee as prescribed by the state director of fire protection. Application for renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by the state director of fire protection and the certificate holder shall furnish the information required by the director.

(b) Failure of any certificate of competency holder to secure his or her renewal certificate of competency within sixty days after the due date shall constitute sufficient cause for the state director of fire protection to suspend the certificate of competency.

(c) The state director of fire protection may, upon the receipt of payment of all delinquent fees including a late charge, restore a certificate of competency that has been suspended for failure to pay the renewal fee.

(d) A certificate of competency holder may voluntarily surrender his or her certificate of competency to the state director of fire protection and be relieved of the annual renewal fee. After surrendering the certificate of competency, he or she shall not be known as a certificate of competency holder and shall desist from the practice thereof. Within two years from the time of surrender of the certificate of competency, he or she may again qualify for a certificate of competency, without examination, by the payment of the required fee. If two or more years have elapsed, he or she shall return to the status of a new applicant.

(2)(a) All licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractors desiring to continue to be licensed shall annually, prior to January 1st, secure from the state director of fire protection a renewal license upon payment of the fee as prescribed by the state director of fire protection. Application for renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by the state director of fire protection and the license holder shall furnish the information required by the director.

(b) Failure of any license holder to secure his or her renewal license within sixty days after the due date shall constitute sufficient cause for the state director of fire protection to suspend the license.

(c) The state director of fire protection may, upon the receipt of payment of all delinquent fees including a late charge, restore a license that has been suspended for failure to pay the renewal fee.

(3) The initial certificate of competency or license fee shall be prorated based upon the portion of the year such certificate of competency or license is in effect, prior to renewal on January 1st.

(4) The fire protection contractor license fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from license and certificate fees and charges or from the money generated by the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter shall be deposited into the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only for purposes authorized under this chapter and ((standards for fire protection and its enforcement, with respect to all hospitals as required by RCW 70.41.080;)) for providing assistance in identifying fire sprinkler system components that have been subject to either a recall or voluntary replacement program by a manufacturer of fire sprinkler products, a nationally recognized testing laboratory, or the federal consumer product safety commission; and for use in developing and publishing educational materials related to the effectiveness of residential fire sprinklers. Assistance shall include, but is not limited to, aiding in the identification of recalled components, information sharing strategies aimed at ensuring the consumer is made aware of recalls and voluntary replacement programs, and providing training and assistance to local fire authorities, the fire sprinkler industry, and the public. Only the state director of fire protection or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.41.100 and 1987 c 75 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An application for license shall be made to the department upon forms provided by it and shall contain such information as the department reasonably requires which may include affirmative evidence of ability to comply with the standards, rules, and regulations as are lawfully prescribed hereunder. An application for renewal of license shall be made to the department upon forms provided by it and submitted thirty days prior to the date of expiration of the license. Each application for a license or renewal thereof by a hospital as defined by this chapter shall be accompanied by a fee as established by the department under RCW 43.20B.110.

(2) The department shall set the fees imposed under subsection (1) of this section to include the costs of inspections for fire protection purposes under RCW 70.41.080. When setting fees under this subsection to include costs for fire protection purposes under RCW 70.41.080, the costs included may not be in excess of the direct cost to perform the inspection and amounts necessary to recover costs associated with rule adoption under this subsection for fire protection purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act takes effect on July 1, 2018, or when the department of health has adopted rules setting fees under section 2 of this act, whichever occurs first. If the department adopts rules prior to July 1, 2018, the department must provide notice of the effective date of section 1 of this act to the office of the code reviser and others as deemed appropriate by the department.

--- END ---