BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any port district that limits entry for the purpose of on-demand passenger service by any motor vehicle licensed and regulated as a for hire vehicle under chapter 46.72 RCW, a limousine under chapter 46.72A RCW, or a taxicab under chapter 81.72 RCW must limit such entry subject to the payment of an entry fee.

(2) The entry fee may be imposed as a per-trip fee or as a permit issued on a weekly, monthly, or other calendar basis. The entry fee imposed for vehicles listed under subsection (1) of this section must not exceed the entry fee assessed to personal vehicles.

(3) Any port district may require that a motor vehicle granted entry to its roadways or facilities and subject to payment of an entry fee under this section be registered with the port district and have affixed to it an electronic or other device enabling the port district to efficiently assess and monitor payment of the entry fee. The port district may recover the cost of such device from the registered owner of the motor vehicle.

(4) Any contract entered into by a port district for the purpose of managing transportation on-demand services after the effective date of this section and subject to the entry fee authorized under this section must be offered subject to competitive public bid for a period of not more than five years. The minimum entry fee must be established by the port commission in advance of the competitive bidding process and may include the cost of managing the transportation on-demand services.

(5) Access entry fees imposed under this section must be borne by the: (a) Commercial transportation services provider or by the provider of such for hire vehicle, limousine, or taxicab; or (b) commercial transportation services provider driver or the driver of such for hire vehicle, limousine, or taxicab.

(6) As used in this section, "commercial transportation services," "commercial transportation services provider," "commercial transportation services provider driver," and "personal vehicle" all have the same meaning as defined in RCW 48.177.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---