BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.450 and 2015 c 70 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this chapter permits anyone other than a validly licensed marijuana processor to use butane or other explosive gases to extract or separate resin from marijuana or to produce or process any form of marijuana concentrates or marijuana-infused products that include marijuana concentrates not purchased from a validly licensed marijuana retailer as an ingredient. The extraction or separation of resin from marijuana, the processing of marijuana concentrates, and the processing of marijuana-infused products that include marijuana concentrates not purchased from a validly licensed marijuana retailer as an ingredient by any person other than a validly licensed marijuana processor each constitute manufacture of marijuana in violation of RCW 69.50.401. Cooking oil, butter, and other nonexplosive home cooking substances may be used to make marijuana extracts for noncommercial personal use.

(2) Except for the use of butane, the state liquor and cannabis board may not enforce this section until it has adopted the rules required by RCW 69.51A.270.

(3)(a) Any inspection of or approval of a marijuana processor's professional closed loop systems, equipment, extraction operation, or facilities to ensure compliance with applicable fire, safety, or building code requirements that must be performed by a local fire code official pursuant to state liquor and cannabis board rule may, instead, be performed by the director of fire protection or designee, if the marijuana processor requests that the local fire code official perform the inspection or approval described in (a) of this subsection and thirty calendar days after the date of the request the local fire code official has not performed the inspection or approval. In addition to the requirements of this chapter, all electrical wiring and equipment must conform to chapter 19.28 RCW requirements for electrical safety to life and property including, but not limited to, electrical contractor licensing, electrician certification, and electrical permitting and inspection.

(b) If an inspection or approval described in (a) of this subsection is performed by the director of fire protection or designee, the county, city, or town in which the licensee is located shall reimburse the director of fire protection or designee, as appropriate, for the costs of performing the inspection or approval within thirty calendar days of receiving a request for reimbursement.

(c) Nothing in this subsection (3) requires a local fire code official or the director of fire protection or designee to approve of a marijuana processor's professional closed loop systems, equipment, extraction operation, or facilities if the systems, equipment, operation, or facilities is not in compliance with applicable fire, safety, or building code requirements.

(d) For purposes of this subsection (3), "director of fire protection" means the director of fire protection described in RCW 43.43.938.

--- END ---