BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.155 and 2013 c 23 s 243 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) When purchasing any hunting license, persons under the age of eighteen shall present certification of completion of a course of instruction of at least ten hours in the safe handling of firearms, safety, conservation, and sporting/hunting behavior. All persons purchasing any hunting license for the first time, if born after January 1, 1972, shall present such certification.

(b)(i) The director may establish a program for training persons in the safe handling of firearms, conservation, and sporting/hunting behavior and shall prescribe the type of instruction and the qualifications of the instructors. The director shall, as part of establishing the training program, exempt ((members of the United States military)) the following individuals from the firearms skills portion of any instruction course completed over the internet:

(A) Members of the United States military;

(B) Current or retired general authority Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020;

(C) Current or retired limited authority Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020, if the officer is duly authorized by his or her employer to carry a concealed pistol;

(D) Current or retired specially commissioned Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020, if the officer is duly authorized by his or her commissioning agency to carry a concealed pistol; and

(E) Current or retired Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 43.101.010 who have met the requirements of RCW 43.101.095 or 43.101.157 and whose certification is in good standing or has not been revoked.

(ii) The director may cooperate with the national rifle association, organized sports/outdoor enthusiasts' groups, or other public or private organizations when establishing the training program.

(c) Upon the successful completion of a course established under this section, the trainee shall receive a hunter education certificate signed by an authorized instructor. The certificate is evidence of compliance with this section.

(d) The director may accept certificates from other states that persons have successfully completed firearm safety, hunter education, or similar courses as evidence of compliance with this section.

(2)(a) The director may authorize a once in a lifetime, one license year deferral of hunter education training for individuals who are accompanied by a nondeferred Washington-licensed hunter who has held a Washington hunting license for the prior three years and is over eighteen years of age. The commission shall adopt rules for the administration of this subsection to avoid potential fraud and abuse.

(b) The director is authorized to collect an application fee, not to exceed twenty dollars, for obtaining the once in a lifetime, one license year deferral of hunter education training from the department. This fee must be deposited into the fish and wildlife enforcement reward account and must be used exclusively to administer the deferral program created in this subsection.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "accompanied" means to go along with another person while staying within a range of the other person that permits continual unaided visual and auditory communication.

(3) To encourage the participation of an adequate number of instructors for the training program, the commission shall develop nonmonetary incentives available to individuals who commit to serving as an instructor. The incentives may include additional hunting opportunities for instructors.

--- END ---