BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.155.010 and 2009 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions ((set forth)) in RCW 82.24.010 ((shall)) apply to this chapter. In addition, ((for the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the context:)) the following definitions apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the Washington state liquor ((control)) and cannabis board.

(2) "Internet" means any computer network, telephonic network, or other electronic network.

(3) "Minor" refers to an individual who is less than eighteen years old.

(4) "Pipe tobacco" means any tobacco which, because of its appearance, type, packaging, or labeling, is suitable for use and likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as tobacco to be smoked in a pipe.

(5) "Sample" means a tobacco product distributed to members of the general public at no cost or at nominal cost for product promotion purposes.

(((5))) (6) "Sampling" means the distribution of samples to members of the public.

(((6))) (7) "Tobacco product" means a product that contains tobacco and is intended for human use, including any product defined in RCW 82.24.010(2) or 82.26.010(((1))) (21), except that for the purposes of RCW 70.155.140 only, "tobacco product" does not include cigars defined in RCW 82.26.010 as to which one thousand units weigh more than three pounds or pipe tobacco as defined in this section.

--- END ---