BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.30.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All meetings of the governing body of a public agency shall be open and public and all persons shall be permitted to attend any meeting of the governing body of a public agency, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(2) Any subcommittee, task force, advisory group, or other work group created by an action of a governing body, and whose membership includes any member of that governing body, must:

(a) Make any meeting open to the public if the meeting relates to a decision to make any policy or fiscal recommendations to a governing body; and

(b) Provide notice of the purpose of any such meeting online no later than twenty-four hours in advance of the published start time of the meeting.

--- END ---