BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.30.140 and 1990 c 98 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If any provision of this chapter conflicts with the provisions of any other statute, the provisions of this chapter shall control: PROVIDED, That this chapter shall not apply to:

(1) The proceedings concerned with the formal issuance of an order granting, suspending, revoking, or denying any license, permit, or certificate to engage in any business, occupation, or profession or to any disciplinary proceedings involving a member of such business, occupation, or profession, or to receive a license for a sports activity or to operate any mechanical device or motor vehicle where a license or registration is necessary; or

(2) That portion of a meeting of a quasi-judicial body which relates to a quasi-judicial matter between named parties as distinguished from a matter having general effect on the public or on a class or group; or

(3) Matters governed by chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act; or

(4)(a) Collective bargaining sessions with employee organizations, including ((contract negotiations,)) grievance meetings((,)) and discussions relating to the interpretation or application of a labor agreement; or (b) that portion of a meeting during which the governing body is planning or adopting the strategy or position to be taken by the governing body during the course of any collective bargaining, professional negotiations, or grievance or mediation proceedings, or reviewing the proposals made in the negotiations or proceedings while in progress.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 42.30 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Collective bargaining sessions with employee organizations involving contract negotiations must be open to the public.

(2) This section does not require a public employer to permit public comment opportunities during collective bargaining negotiations. Public employers may choose to video tape collective bargaining negotiations instead of permitting firsthand observation of negotiations by the public, provided videos of the negotiations are made available online within twenty-four hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Collective bargaining sessions between bargaining representatives and public employers, or their representatives, involving contract negotiations under this chapter must be open to the public.

(2) This section does not require a public employer to permit public comment opportunities during collective bargaining negotiations. Public employers may choose to video tape collective bargaining negotiations instead of permitting firsthand observation of negotiations by the public, provided videos of the negotiations are made available online within twenty-four hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28B.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Collective bargaining sessions between employee organizations, or their representatives, and public employers, or their representatives, involving contract negotiations under this chapter must be open to the public.

(2) This section does not require a public employer to permit public comment opportunities during collective bargaining negotiations. Public employers may choose to video tape collective bargaining negotiations instead of permitting firsthand observation of negotiations by the public, provided videos of the negotiations are made available online within twenty-four hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Collective bargaining sessions between employee organizations, or their representatives, and public employers, or their representatives, involving contract negotiations under this chapter must be open to the public.

(2) This section does not require a public employer to permit public comment opportunities during collective bargaining negotiations. Public employers may choose to video tape collective bargaining negotiations instead of permitting firsthand observation of negotiations by the public, provided videos of the negotiations are made available online within twenty-four hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 41.76 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Collective bargaining sessions between employee organizations, or their representatives, and public employers, or their representatives, involving contract negotiations under this chapter must be open to the public.

(2) This section does not require a public employer to permit public comment opportunities during collective bargaining negotiations. Public employers may choose to video tape collective bargaining negotiations instead of permitting firsthand observation of negotiations by the public, provided videos of the negotiations are made available online within twenty-four hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 41.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Collective bargaining sessions between employee organizations, or their representatives, and public employers, or their representatives, involving contract negotiations under this chapter must be open to the public.

(2) This section does not require a public employer to permit public comment opportunities during collective bargaining negotiations. Public employers may choose to video tape collective bargaining negotiations instead of permitting firsthand observation of negotiations by the public, provided videos of the negotiations are made available online within twenty-four hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Collective bargaining sessions between ferry employee organizations, or their representatives, and public employers, or their representatives, involving contract negotiations under this chapter must be open to the public.

(2) This section does not require a public employer to permit public comment opportunities during collective bargaining negotiations. Public employers may choose to video tape collective bargaining negotiations instead of permitting firsthand observation of negotiations by the public, provided videos of the negotiations are made available online within twenty-four hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 49.39 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Collective bargaining sessions between bargaining representatives and public employers, or their representatives, involving contract negotiations under this chapter must be open to the public.

(2) This section does not require a public employer to permit public comment opportunities during collective bargaining negotiations. Public employers may choose to video tape collective bargaining negotiations instead of permitting firsthand observation of negotiations by the public, provided videos of the negotiations are made available online within twenty-four hours.

--- END ---