BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.28.010 and 2001 c 211 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All wires and equipment, and installations thereof, that convey electric current and installations of equipment to be operated by electric current, in, on, or about buildings or structures, except for telephone, telegraph, radio, and television wires and equipment, and television antenna installations, signal strength amplifiers, and coaxial installations pertaining thereto shall be in strict conformity with this chapter, the statutes of the state of Washington, and the rules issued by the department, and shall be in conformity with approved methods of construction for safety to life and property. All wires and equipment that fall within section 90.2(b)(5) of the National Electrical Code, 1981 edition, are exempt from the requirements of this chapter. The regulations and articles in the National Electrical Code, the national electrical safety code, and other installation and safety regulations approved by the national fire protection association, as modified or supplemented by rules issued by the department in furtherance of safety to life and property under authority hereby granted, shall be prima facie evidence of the approved methods of construction. All materials, devices, appliances, and equipment used in such installations shall be of a type that conforms to applicable standards or be indicated as acceptable by the established standards of any electrical product testing laboratory which is accredited by the department. Industrial control panels, utilization equipment, and their components do not need to be listed, labeled, or otherwise indicated as acceptable by an accredited electrical product testing laboratory unless specifically required by the National Electrical Code, 1993 edition.

(2) Residential buildings or structures moved into or within a county, city, or town are not required to comply with all of the requirements of this chapter, if the original occupancy classification of the building or structure is not changed as a result of the move. This subsection shall not apply to residential buildings or structures that are substantially remodeled or rehabilitated.

(3) This chapter shall not limit the authority or power of any city or town to enact and enforce under authority given by law, any ordinance, rule, or regulation requiring an equal, higher, or better standard of construction and an equal, higher, or better standard of materials, devices, appliances, and equipment than that required by this chapter. A city or town shall require that its electrical inspectors meet the qualifications provided for state electrical inspectors in accordance with RCW 19.28.321. In a city or town having an equal, higher, or better standard the installations, materials, devices, appliances, and equipment shall be in accordance with the ordinance, rule, or regulation of the city or town.

(4) The officials of all incorporated cities and towns where electrical inspections are required by local ordinances may enforce the provisions of RCW 19.28.041(1), 19.28.161, 19.28.271(1), and 19.28.420(1) and applicable licensing and certification rules within their respective jurisdictions. Nothing in this subsection diminishes the authority of the department to enforce the provisions of RCW 19.28.041(1), 19.28.161, 19.28.271(1), and 19.28.420(1), and applicable licensing and certification rules within any city or town.

(5) Electrical equipment associated with spas, hot tubs, swimming pools, and hydromassage bathtubs shall not be offered for sale or exchange unless the electrical equipment is certified as being in compliance with the applicable product safety standard by bearing the certification mark of an approved electrical products testing laboratory.

(((4))) (6) Nothing in this chapter may be construed as permitting the connection of any conductor of any electric circuit with a pipe that is connected with or designed to be connected with a waterworks piping system, without the consent of the person or persons legally responsible for the operation and maintenance of the waterworks piping system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In matters of enforcement of this chapter by officials of incorporated cities and towns where electrical inspections are required by local ordinances, any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity found in violation of RCW 19.28.161 or 19.28.271(1) must be assessed a penalty of not less than fifty dollars or more than five hundred dollars. Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the provisions of RCW 19.28.041(1) must be assessed a penalty of not less than fifty dollars or more than ten thousand dollars. Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the provisions of RCW 19.28.420(1) may be assessed a penalty of not less than one hundred dollars or more than ten thousand dollars per violation.

(2) RCW 19.28.131, 19.28.271 (2) and (3), and 19.28.490 do not apply in matters of enforcement of this chapter by officials of incorporated cities and towns where electrical inspections are required by local ordinances.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.28.311 and 2011 c 336 s 529 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created an electrical board, consisting of fifteen members to be appointed by the governor with the advice of the director of labor and industries as herein provided. It shall be the purpose and function of the board to advise the director on all matters pertaining to the enforcement of this chapter including, but not limited to, standards of electrical and telecommunications installation, minimum inspection procedures, and the adoption of rules pertaining to the electrical inspection division: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no rules shall be amended or repealed until the electrical board has first had an opportunity to consider any proposed amendments or repeals and had an opportunity to make recommendations to the director relative thereto. The members of the electrical board shall be selected and appointed as follows: One member shall be an employee or officer of a corporation or public agency generating or distributing electric power; one member must be an employee or officer of a facilities-based telecommunications service provider regulated by the Washington state utilities and transportation commission; three members shall be licensed electrical contractors: PROVIDED, That one of these members may be a representative of a trade association in the electrical industry; one member shall be a licensed telecommunications contractor; one member shall be an employee, or officer, or representative of a corporation or firm engaged in the business of manufacturing or distributing electrical and telecommunications materials, equipment, or devices; one member shall be a person with knowledge of the electrical industry, not related to the electrical industry, to represent the public; three members shall be certified electricians; one member shall be a telecommunications worker; one member shall be a licensed professional electrical engineer qualified to do business in the state of Washington and designated as a registered communications distribution designer; one member shall be an outside line worker; and one ((nonvoting)) member must be a building official from an incorporated city or town with an electrical inspection program established under RCW 19.28.141. The regular term of each member shall be four years: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, The original board shall be appointed on June 9, 1988, for the following terms: The first term of the member representing a corporation or public agency generating or distributing electric power shall serve four years; two members representing licensed electrical contractors shall serve three years; the member representing a manufacturer or distributor of electrical equipment or devices shall serve three years; the member representing the public and one member representing licensed electrical contractors shall serve two years; the three members selected as certified electricians shall serve for terms of one, two, and three years, respectively; the member selected as the licensed professional electrical engineer shall serve for one year. In appointing the original board, the governor shall give due consideration to the value of continuity in membership from predecessor boards. Thereafter, the governor shall appoint or reappoint board members for terms of four years and to fill vacancies created by the completion of the terms of the original members. When new positions are created, the governor may appoint the initial members to the new positions to staggered terms of one to three years. The governor shall also fill vacancies caused by death, resignation, or otherwise for the unexpired term of such members by appointing their successors from the same business classification. The same procedure shall be followed in making such subsequent appointments as is provided for the original appointments. The board, at this first meeting shall elect one of its members to serve as chair. Any person acting as the chief electrical inspector shall serve as secretary of the board during his or her tenure as chief state inspector. Meetings of the board shall be held at least quarterly in accordance with a schedule established by the board. Each member of the board shall receive compensation in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 which shall be paid out of the electrical license fund, upon vouchers approved by the director of labor and industries.

--- END ---