BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the medical risks to the health of women as a result of obtaining an abortion makes it necessary to clarify that only qualified health care personnel may perform abortions or assist in performing abortions.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.02.110 and 1992 c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The state may not deny or interfere with a woman's right to choose to have an abortion prior to viability of the fetus, or to protect her life or health.

((A physician may terminate and a health care provider may assist a physician in terminating a pregnancy as permitted by this section.)) A person who is not a physician may not perform an abortion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---