BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) As codified in chapter 15.120 RCW, the legislature authorized the growing of industrial hemp as a legal, agricultural activity in this state as part of an agricultural pilot program in conformance with the agricultural act of 2014, 128 Stat. 912 Sec. 7606, P.L. 113-79 (2014). As defined in RCW 15.120.010, the agricultural pilot is known as the "industrial hemp research program" and is supervised by the Washington state department of agriculture to study the growth, cultivation, or marketing of industrial hemp.

(2) Products made from industrial hemp include, but are not limited to, cloth, cordage, fiber, food, fuel, paint, paper, particle board, plastics, seed, seed meal and seed for consumption, and certified seed for cultivation, if the seeds originate from industrial hemp varieties.

(3) The legislature appropriated one hundred forty-five thousand dollars from the general fund for fiscal year 2017 solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6206 and further authorized the department of agriculture to set and collect various fees to continue to fund the industrial hemp research program.

(4) At this nascent stage as farmers and processors gain interest in reintroducing and building the infrastructure for the versatile and valuable industrial hemp crop, it is anticipated that additional appropriations from the general fund will be required to further the industrial hemp research program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of one hundred forty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2018, from the general fund to the agricultural local fund created in RCW 43.23.230 for the purposes of providing funding for the industrial hemp research program created in chapter 15.120 RCW.

--- END ---