BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.320.125 and 2013 c 14 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature considers it to be a matter of public safety for public schools and staff to have current safe school plans and procedures in place, fully consistent with federal law. The legislature further finds and intends, by requiring safe school plans to be in place, that school districts will become eligible for federal assistance. The legislature further finds that schools are in a position to serve the community in the event of an emergency resulting from natural disasters or man-made disasters.

(2) Schools and school districts shall consider the guidance provided by the superintendent of public instruction, including the comprehensive school safety checklist and the model comprehensive safe school plans that include prevention, intervention, all hazard/crisis response, and postcrisis recovery, when developing their own individual comprehensive safe school plans. Each school district shall adopt, no later than September 1, 2008, and implement a safe school plan consistent with the school mapping information system pursuant to RCW 36.28A.060. The plan shall:

(a) Include required school safety policies and procedures;

(b) Address emergency mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery;

(c) Include provisions for assisting and communicating with students and staff, including those with special needs or disabilities;

(d) Use the training guidance provided by the Washington emergency management division of the state military department in collaboration with the Washington state office of the superintendent of public instruction school safety center and the school safety center advisory committee;

(e) Require the building principal to be certified on the incident command system;

(f) Take into account the manner in which the school facilities may be used as a community asset in the event of a community-wide emergency; and

(g) Set guidelines for requesting city or county law enforcement agencies, local fire departments, emergency service providers, and county emergency management agencies to meet with school districts and participate in safety-related drills.

(3) To the extent funds are available, school districts shall annually:

(a) Review and update safe school plans in collaboration with local emergency response agencies;

(b) Conduct an inventory of all hazardous materials;

(c) Update information on the school mapping information system to reflect current staffing and updated plans, including:

(i) Identifying all staff members who are trained on the national incident management system, trained on the incident command system, or are certified on the incident command system; and

(ii) Identifying school transportation procedures for evacuation, to include bus staging areas, evacuation routes, communication systems, parent-student reunification sites, and secondary transportation agreements consistent with the school mapping information system; and

(d) Provide information to all staff on the use of emergency supplies and notification and alert procedures.

(4) To the extent funds are available, school districts shall annually record and report on the information and activities required in subsection (3) of this section to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

(5) School districts are encouraged to work with local emergency management agencies and other emergency responders to conduct one tabletop exercise, one functional exercise, and two full-scale exercises within a four-year period.

(6) Schools shall conduct no less than one safety-related drill each month that school is in session. Schools shall complete no less than one drill using the school mapping information system, three drills for lockdowns, one drill for shelter-in-place, three drills for fire evacuation in accordance with the state fire code, and one other safety-related drill to be determined by the school. Schools should consider drills for earthquakes, tsunamis, or other high-risk local events. Schools shall document the date and time of such drills. This subsection is intended to satisfy all federal requirements for comprehensive school emergency drills and evacuations.

(7) Educational service districts are encouraged to apply for federal emergency response and crisis management grants with the assistance of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington emergency management division of the state military department.

(8) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to implement provisions of this section. These rules may include, but are not limited to, provisions for evacuations, lockdowns, or other components of a comprehensive safe school plan.

(9) Whenever a first responder agency notifies a school of a situation which may necessitate an evacuation or lockdown, the agency must also determine if other schools in the vicinity are similarly threatened and must notify every other school in the vicinity for which an evacuation or lockdown appears reasonably necessary. For purposes of this section, "school" includes a private school under chapter 28A.195 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.28A.060 and 2005 c 274 s 269 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When funded, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall create and operate a statewide first responder building mapping information system.

(2) All state agencies and local governments must utilize building mapping software that complies with the building mapping software standards established under RCW 36.28A.070 for any building mapped for this purpose after the statewide first responder building mapping information system is operational. If, prior to creation of the statewide building mapping information system, a local government has utilized building mapping software standards established under RCW 36.28A.070, the local government may continue to use its own building mapping system unless the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs provides funding to bring the local government's system in compliance with the standards established under RCW 36.28A.070.

(3) All state and local government-owned buildings that are occupied by state or local government employees must be mapped when funding is provided by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, or from other sources. Nothing in chapter 102, Laws of 2003 requires any state agency or local government to map a building unless the entire cost of mapping the building is provided by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, or from other sources.

(4) All school buildings that are occupied by students must be mapped by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, or from other sources. Nothing in this subsection requires any school district or other operator of schools to map a building unless the entire cost of mapping the building is provided by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, or from other sources. For purposes of this subsection, "students" means students of a public school as defined in RCW 28A.150.010 or of a private school under chapter 28A.195 RCW.

(5) Once the statewide first responder building mapping information system is operational, all state and local government buildings that are mapped must forward their building mapping information data to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. All participating privately, federally, and tribally owned buildings may voluntarily forward their mapping and emergency information data to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs may refuse any building mapping information that does not comply with the specifications described in RCW 36.28A.070.

(((5))) (6) Consistent with the guidelines developed under RCW 36.28A.070, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall electronically make the building mapping information available to all state, local, federal, and tribal law enforcement agencies, the military department of Washington state, and fire departments.

(((6))) (7) Consistent with the guidelines developed under RCW 36.28A.070, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall develop building mapping software standards that must be used to participate in the statewide first responder building mapping information system.

(((7))) (8) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall pursue federal funds to:

(a) Create the statewide first responder building mapping information system; and

(b) Develop grants for the mapping of all state and local government buildings in the order determined under RCW 36.28A.070.

(((8))) (9) All tactical and intelligence information provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs under chapter 102, Laws of 2003 is exempt from public disclosure as provided in RCW 42.56.240.

--- END ---