BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.15.030 and 2005 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The association of Washington generals is organized as a private, nonprofit, nonpartisan((,)) corporation in accordance with chapter 24.03 RCW and this section.

(2) The purpose of the association of Washington generals is to:

(a) Provide the state a means of extending formal recognition for an individual's outstanding services to the state; ((and))

(b) Bring together those individuals to serve the state as ambassadors of trade, tourism, civic life, and international goodwill; and

(c) Expand educational and employment opportunities for youth, veterans, uniform service members, military families, and people with disabilities in Washington state.

(3) The association of Washington generals may conduct activities in support of their mission, including but not limited to:

(a) Establishing selection criteria for selecting Washington generals;

(b) ((Operating a statewide essay competition;

(c))) Training Washington generals as ambassadors of the state of Washington, nationally and internationally; and

(((d))) (c) Promoting Washington generals as ambassadors of the state of Washington.

(4) The association of Washington generals is governed by a board of directors. The board is composed of the governor, lieutenant governor, and the secretary of state, who serve as ex officio, ((nonvoting)) voting members, ((and other officers and members as the association of Washington generals designates)) three members appointed by the president of the senate, three members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, and three members appointed by the governor.

(5)(a) Two of the initial appointments by the governor and the speaker of the house of representatives, and one of the initial appointments by the president of the senate under subsection (4) of this section are for two years. Two of the initial appointments by the president of the senate, and one of the initial appointments by the governor and the speaker of the house of representatives under subsection (4) of this section are for four years.

(b) After the initial appointments, all appointments are for four years. No member is eligible for appointment to more than two full terms. Service on the board prior to the effective date of this section would not be considered a full term under this section.

(6) The board must select from its membership the chair of the board and such other officers as it deems appropriate.

(7) The board must create its own bylaws in accordance with the laws of the state of Washington, submit bylaws to the chief clerk of the house of representatives and secretary of the senate, and assure that the tax-exempt status of the association of Washington generals under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code is maintained.

(8) The governor, president of the senate, or speaker of the house of representatives may remove any of their appointed board members.

(9) If a vacancy occurs on the board, a successor must be appointed according to the procedures in subsection (4) of this section. The appointed member must serve the remainder of the term.

(10) The board shall:

(a) Review nominations for and be responsible for the selection of Washington generals; and

(b) Establish the title of honorary Washington general to honor worthy individuals from outside the state of Washington.

(((5))) (11) The lieutenant governor's office may provide technical and financial assistance for the association of Washington generals.

(((6))) (12) The legislature may make appropriations in support of the Washington generals subject to the availability of funds.

--- END ---