BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of this chapter, and in accordance with this section and chapter 84.56 RCW, the county treasurer may retain a portion of the collected taxes each year for administrative costs of the county treasurer. The amount retained from each local jurisdiction must not exceed the amount calculated in (c) of this subsection.

(a) The county treasurer must determine the annual amount budgeted for its administrative costs.

(b) The county treasurer must determine the percent of the total taxes collected that is contributed by each local jurisdiction.

(c) The percentage of taxes contributed by each jurisdiction in (b) of this subsection must be multiplied by the total amount of administrative costs in (a) of this subsection.

(2) The county treasurer shall create a dedicated account solely for administrative costs of the county treasurer. The dedicated account must be used for the deposit of the administrative funds retained pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and used solely for the payment of expenses incurred by the treasurer in administering the system for collecting taxes on behalf of each local jurisdiction.

(3) As used in this section, "local jurisdiction" includes a city, town, or special purpose district located within the county.

--- END ---