BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.82 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The driver training instructor advisory committee is created to assist the director in the director's duties and responsibilities under this chapter. Each member of the advisory committee must be appointed by the director for a two-year term. The advisory committee must consist of the following ten members, two of which must reside east of the crest of the Cascade mountains:

(a) A volunteer representative from the board of directors of a state organization representing the private driver training school industry;

(b) A volunteer representative from the board of directors of a state organization representing public school traffic safety education teachers;

(c) Three volunteer representatives of the private driver training schools actively licensed to conduct driver licensing examinations, with an attempt to represent the variations of company size, geographic influence, and socioeconomic factors within the state;

(d) A volunteer public school traffic safety education teacher actively licensed to conduct driver licensing examinations;

(e) A volunteer independent citizen advocate for traffic safety;

(f) A representative of the office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(g) A representative of the department of licensing; and

(h) A representative from the Washington state traffic safety commission.

(2) The driver training instructor advisory committee must meet at least three times annually and have additional meetings as called by the director. The director or the director's representative must attend all meetings of the advisory committee and serve as chair. All committee meetings must be held at a location in or near the building of the director's primary office.

(3) The driver training instructor advisory committee must:

(a) Advise and confer on department-proposed policy with the director or the director's representative on matters pertaining to the establishment of rules necessary to carry out this chapter;

(b) Review and update, when necessary, curriculum consisting of a list of items of knowledge and the processes of driving a motor vehicle, specifying the minimum requirements determined as necessary to teach a proper and adequate driver training education course;

(c) Review and update, when necessary, driver training instructor certification standards to be consistent with RCW 46.82.330 and consider those standards required to be met by traffic safety education teachers under RCW 28A.220.020(3);

(d) Review and update, when necessary, the training and examination standards for a driver training instructor's initial license and renewal; and

(e) Review and update, when necessary, driver licensing examination standards to be consistent with RCW 46.82.450.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.20.100 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Application. The application of a person under the age of eighteen years for a driver's license or a motorcycle endorsement must be signed by a parent or guardian with custody of the minor. If the person under the age of eighteen has no father, mother, or guardian, then the application must be signed by the minor's employer.

(2) Traffic safety education requirement. For a person under the age of eighteen years to obtain a driver's license he or she must meet the traffic safety education requirements of this subsection.

(a) To meet the traffic safety education requirement for a driver's license the applicant must satisfactorily complete a traffic safety education course as defined in RCW 28A.220.020 for a course offered by a school district, or as defined by the department of licensing for a course offered by a driver training school licensed under chapter 46.82 RCW. The course offered by a school district or an approved private school must meet the standards established by the office of the state superintendent of public instruction. The course offered by a driver training school must meet the standards established by the department of licensing with the advice of the driver training instructor advisory committee pursuant to section 1 of this act. The traffic safety education course may be provided by:

(i) A recognized secondary school; or

(ii) A driver training school licensed under chapter 46.82 RCW that is annually approved by the department of licensing.

(b) To meet the traffic safety education requirement for a motorcycle endorsement, the applicant must successfully complete a motorcycle safety education course that meets the standards established by the department of licensing.

(c) The department may waive the traffic safety education requirement for a driver's license if the applicant demonstrates to the department's satisfaction that:

(i) He or she was unable to take or complete a traffic safety education course;

(ii) A need exists for the applicant to operate a motor vehicle; and

(iii) He or she has the ability to operate a motor vehicle in such a manner as not to jeopardize the safety of persons or property.

The department may adopt rules to implement this subsection (2)(c) in concert with the supervisor of the traffic safety education section of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(d) The department may waive the traffic safety education requirement if the applicant was licensed to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle outside this state and provides proof that he or she has had education equivalent to that required under this subsection.

--- END ---