BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 2301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this ((section)) part, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015.

(2) Parts IV, ((VI,)) VIII, and XIX of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect September 1, 2015.

(3) Part X of this act takes effect October 1, 2016.

(4) Section 1105 of this act takes effect January 1, 2016.

(5) Except for section 2004 of this act, Part XX of this act takes effect January 1, 2019.

(6) Section 2004 of this act takes effect January 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is remedial and curative in nature and applies retroactively to July 1, 2015.

--- END ---