BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.118.021 and 2009 c 351 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Board" means new motor vehicle arbitration board.

(2) "Collateral charges" means any sales or lease related charges including but not limited to sales tax, use tax, arbitration service fees, unused license fees, unused registration fees, unused title fees, finance charges, prepayment penalties, credit disability and credit life insurance costs not otherwise refundable, any other insurance costs prorated for time out of service, transportation charges, dealer preparation charges, or any other charges for service contracts, undercoating, rustproofing, or factory or dealer installed options.

(3) "Condition" means a general problem that results from a defect or malfunction of one or more parts, or their improper installation by the manufacturer, its agents, or the new motor vehicle dealer.

(4) "Consumer" means any person who has entered into an agreement or contract for the transfer, lease, or purchase of a new motor vehicle, other than for purposes of resale or sublease, during the duration of the eligibility period defined under this section.

(5) "Court" means the superior court in the county where the consumer resides, except if the consumer does not reside in this state, then the superior court in the county where an arbitration hearing or determination was conducted or made pursuant to this chapter.

(6) "Eligibility period" means the period ending two years after the date of the original delivery to the consumer of a new motor vehicle, or the first twenty-four thousand miles of operation, whichever occurs first.

(7) "Incidental costs" means any reasonable expenses incurred by the consumer in connection with the repair of the new motor vehicle, including any towing charges and the costs of obtaining alternative transportation.

(8) "Manufacturer" means any person engaged in the business of constructing or assembling new motor vehicles or engaged in the business of importing new motor vehicles into the United States for the purpose of selling or distributing new motor vehicles to new motor vehicle dealers. "Manufacturer" includes to the extent the modification affects the use, value, or safety of a new motor vehicle, a postmanufacturing modifier of a new motor vehicle that modifies or has a modification done to a new motor vehicle before the initial retail sale or lease of a new motor vehicle, except as provided in this chapter. "Manufacturer" does not include any person engaged in the business of set-up of motorcycles as an agent of a new motor vehicle dealer if the person does not otherwise construct or assemble motorcycles.

(9) "Motorcycle" means any motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330 which has an engine displacement of at least seven hundred fifty cubic centimeters.

(10) "Motor home" means:

(a) A vehicular unit designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, built on or permanently attached to a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis or on a chassis cab or van that is an integral part of the completed vehicle; or

(b) A "recreational vehicle" as defined in RCW 46.70.011.

(11) "Motor home manufacturer" means the first stage manufacturer, the component manufacturer, ((and)) the final stage manufacturer, and, if applicable, the additional manufacturer.

(a) "First stage manufacturer" means a person who manufactures incomplete new motor vehicles such as chassis, chassis cabs, or vans, that are directly warranted by the first stage manufacturer to the consumer, and are completed by a final stage manufacturer into a motor home.

(b) "Component manufacturer" means a person who manufactures components used in the manufacture or assembly of a chassis, chassis cab, or van that is completed into a motor home and whose components are directly warranted by the component manufacturer to the consumer.

(c) "Final stage manufacturer" means a person who assembles, installs, or permanently affixes a body, cab, or equipment to an incomplete new motor vehicle such as a chassis, chassis cab, or van provided by a first stage manufacturer, to complete the vehicle into a motor home.

(d) "Additional manufacturer" means a person who manufactures, assembles, or installs any part, equipment, or component of a motor home, and who is not a first stage manufacturer, a component manufacturer, or a final stage manufacturer, and whose parts, equipment, or components of the motor home are directly warranted by the additional manufacturer to the consumer.

(12) "New motor vehicle" means any new self-propelled vehicle, including a new motorcycle, primarily designed for the transportation of persons or property over the public highways that was originally purchased or leased at retail from a new motor vehicle dealer or leasing company in this state, but does not include vehicles purchased or leased by a business as part of a fleet of ten or more vehicles at one time or under a single purchase or lease agreement. This chapter shall apply to a motor vehicle purchased or leased with a manufacturer written warranty by a member of the armed forces regardless of in which state the vehicle was purchased or leased, if the vehicle otherwise meets the definition of a new motor vehicle and the consumer is a member of the armed forces stationed or residing in this state at the time the consumer submits a request for arbitration to the attorney general. If the motor vehicle is a motor home, this chapter ((shall apply)) applies to the entire motor home, including the self-propelled vehicle and chassis, ((but does not include)) if applicable, as well as those portions of the vehicle designated, used, or maintained primarily as a mobile dwelling, office, ((or)) commercial space, or other space. The term "new motor vehicle" includes motor homes that are not self-propelled vehicles, in accordance with subsection (10)(b) of this section. The term "new motor vehicle" does not include trucks with nineteen thousand pounds or more gross vehicle weight rating. The term "new motor vehicle" includes a demonstrator or lease-purchase vehicle as long as a manufacturer's warranty was issued as a condition of sale.

(13) "New motor vehicle dealer" means a person who holds a dealer agreement with a manufacturer for the sale of new motor vehicles, who is engaged in the business of purchasing, selling, servicing, exchanging, or dealing in new motor vehicles, and who is licensed or required to be licensed as a vehicle dealer by the state of Washington.

(14) "Nonconformity" means a defect, serious safety defect, or condition that substantially impairs the use, value, or safety of a new motor vehicle, but does not include a defect or condition that is the result of abuse, neglect, or unauthorized modification or alteration of the new motor vehicle.

(15) "Purchase price" means the cash price of the new motor vehicle appearing in the sales agreement or contract.

(a) "Purchase price" in the instance of a lease means the actual written capitalized cost disclosed to the consumer contained in the lease agreement. If there is no disclosed capitalized cost in the lease agreement the "purchase price" is the manufacturer's suggested retail price including manufacturer installed accessories or items of optional equipment displayed on the manufacturer label, required by 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1232.

(b) "Purchase price" in the instance of both a vehicle purchase or lease agreement includes any allowance for a trade-in vehicle but does not include any manufacturer-to-consumer rebate appearing in the agreement or contract that the consumer received or that was applied to reduce the purchase or lease cost.

Where the consumer is a subsequent transferee and the consumer selects repurchase of the motor vehicle, "purchase price" means the consumer's subsequent purchase price. Where the consumer is a subsequent transferee and the consumer selects replacement of the motor vehicle, "purchase price" means the original purchase price.

(16) "Reasonable offset for use" means the definition provided in RCW 19.118.041(1)(c).

(17) "Reasonable number of attempts" means the definition provided in RCW 19.118.041.

(18) "Replacement motor vehicle" means a new motor vehicle that is identical or reasonably equivalent to the motor vehicle to be replaced, as the motor vehicle to be replaced existed at the time of original purchase or lease, including any service contract, undercoating, rustproofing, and factory or dealer installed options.

(19) "Serious safety defect" means a life-threatening malfunction or nonconformity that impedes the consumer's ability to control or operate the new motor vehicle for ordinary use or reasonable intended purposes or creates a risk of fire or explosion.

(20) "Subsequent transferee" means a consumer who acquires a motor vehicle, within the eligibility period, as defined in this section, with an applicable manufacturer's written warranty and where the vehicle otherwise met the definition of a new motor vehicle at the time of original retail sale or lease.

(21) "Substantially impair" means to render the new motor vehicle unreliable, or unsafe for ordinary use, or to diminish the resale value of the new motor vehicle below the average resale value for comparable motor vehicles.

(22) "Warranty" means any implied warranty, any written warranty of the manufacturer, or any affirmation of fact or promise made by the manufacturer in connection with the sale of a new motor vehicle that becomes part of the basis of the bargain. The term "warranty" pertains to the obligations of the manufacturer in relation to materials, workmanship, a modification by a new motor vehicle dealer installing the new motor vehicle manufacturer's authorized parts or their equivalent for the specific new motor vehicle pursuant to the manufacturer approved specifications, and fitness of a new motor vehicle for ordinary use or reasonably intended purposes throughout the duration of the eligibility period as defined under this section.

--- END ---