BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 64.38.050 and 1995 c 283 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter entitles an aggrieved party to any remedy provided by law or in equity. If a willful violation of this chapter is found, the aggrieved party is entitled to exemplary damages up to two times the actual damages sustained. The court((, in an appropriate case, may)) shall award costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to the prevailing party.

--- END ---