BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

The initial effective date of an action that expands an urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110, removes the designation of agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170, creates or expands a limited area of more intensive rural development designated under RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), establishes a new fully contained community under RCW 36.70A.350, or creates or expands a master planned resort designated under RCW 36.70A.360, is after the latest of the following dates:

(1) Sixty days after the date of publication of notice of adoption of the comprehensive plan, development regulation, or amendment to the plan or regulation, modifying the boundaries of the urban growth area as provided in RCW 36.70A.290(2);

(2) If a petition for review to the growth management hearings board is timely filed by a person with standing in accordance with RCW 34.05.530 or 36.70A.280(2) (a) or (c), upon issuance of the board's final order; or

(3) If a county is determined not to be in compliance with the
rural element of this chapter to protect surface water and groundwater
resources, and must update its county comprehensive plan to address
the noncompliance, the updated comprehensive plan is effective upon
the date of adoption by the county.

--- END ---