BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW to read as follows:

The administrative office of the courts may not display any personally identifying information about individual cases filed in courts in this state that involve parking infractions or infractions processed in the same manner as parking infractions under chapter 46.63 RCW on any publicly accessible online case records portal maintained by the administrative office of the courts.

--- END ---