BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that there are issues that should be addressed with respect to residential property, and the services and processes available when such property is abandoned or in foreclosure, including making some changes in order that services such as housing counseling, mediation, legal services, and consumer protection remain available and that the provision of these services is financially viable.

--- END ---