BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. In the 2016 session, the legislature required the council of presidents to convene a work group to explore ways to improve the process for students with disabilities when they are transferring between institutions of higher education. The work group included representatives from the institutions, the student achievement council, students, and other stakeholders. Among other things, the work group conducted a survey for students and identified barriers and best practices. In the work group's report to the legislature, the work group recognized that improving services to students with disabilities is an ongoing and evolving process that warrants the continued attention of stakeholders. Therefore, the legislature intends to reauthorize the work group for the purposes of continuing its progress.

Sec. 2. 2016 sp.s. c 22 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) The council of presidents shall convene a work group to develop a plan for removing obstacles for students with disabilities. The work group shall include:

(a) Representatives from the state board for community and technical colleges; the state college, regional universities, and state universities, each as defined in RCW 28B.10.016; the student achievement council; and statewide student associations; and

(b) At least two students with disabilities selected by statewide student associations.

(2) The plan shall focus on removing obstacles for students with disabilities transferring between institutions of higher education, including but not limited to: Standardizing medical documentation requirements, standardizing intake and review procedures, and developing best practices for institutions to provide outreach to and help prepare students for transmitting accommodations information and documentation to their next institution of higher education.

(3) The council of presidents shall provide the plan developed in subsection (2) of this section to the higher education committees of the legislature no later than December 31, 2016.

(4) The work group must continue developing a plan that focuses on removing obstacles for students with disabilities, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, and addressing changing methods of delivering course content, availability of course materials in an accessible manner, and the supplemental course material provided by third parties.

(5) The council shall provide the plan developed under this section to the higher education committees of the legislature no later than December 31, 2017.

(6) This section expires August 1, ((2017)) 2018.

--- END ---