BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.345.080 and 2016 sp.s. c 38 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may offer ((a tobacco product or)) a vapor product for sale in an open, unsecured display that is accessible to the public without the intervention of a store employee.

(2) It is unlawful to sell or distribute vapor products from self-service displays.

(3) Retail establishments are exempt from subsections (1) and (2) of this section if minors are not allowed in the store and such prohibition is posted clearly on all entrances.

--- END ---