BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If, in accordance with the omnibus appropriations act, funding is allocated by the superintendent of public instruction for class size reductions to the extent of, and in proportion to, a school district's demonstrated actual weighted average class size for grades kindergarten through three, down to the weighted average class size specified in the omnibus appropriations act, subsection (2) of this section applies.

(2) If the school district is unable to accept the funding specified in subsection (1) of this section for class size reductions because of demonstrated capital facility needs that prevent it from doing so, the school district must provide the classroom teacher or teachers in grades kindergarten through three who have class sizes that exceed the weighted average class size specified in the omnibus appropriations act with the option of having additional support in the classroom in the form of a teaching assistant during the time in which instruction to students is provided.

(3) The legislature does not intend to include the requirements of this section within the state's obligation for basic education funding under Article IX of the state Constitution.

--- END ---