BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. In August 2016, the department of social and health services proposed changes to foster parent licensing forbidding the provision of home-based instruction to all children in the care and custody of the department. This rule was made effective September 19, 2016, as WAC 388-148-1525.

As home-based instruction can be an appropriate and effective educational model for foster youth, the legislature intends to reverse WAC 388-148-1525(1)(b) and allow foster parents to provide home-based instruction to foster youth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall not deny a foster-family home license on the sole basis that a foster youth in his or her care received home-based instruction as described in RCW 28A.225.010(4).

--- END ---