BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW to read as follows:

The department may not adopt or amend rules until July 1, 2019, unless the rule is necessary to:

(1) Implement a state law or federal law or rule enacted after January 1, 2017;

(2) Comply with a collective bargaining agreement adopted under chapter 41.80 RCW or an employment contract entered into by the department; or

(3) Preserve the immediate health or safety of children receiving care, services, or early learning assistance under this chapter and is adopted in accordance with RCW 34.05.350.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.215.020 and 2016 c 57 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of early learning is created as an executive branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

(2) The primary duties of the department are to implement state early learning policy and to coordinate, consolidate, and integrate child care and early learning programs in order to administer programs and funding as efficiently as possible. The department's duties include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) To support both public and private sectors toward a comprehensive and collaborative system of early learning that serves parents, children, and providers and to encourage best practices in child care and early learning programs;

(b) To make early learning resources available to parents and caregivers;

(c) To carry out activities, including providing clear and easily accessible information about quality and improving the quality of early learning opportunities for young children, in cooperation with the nongovernmental private-public partnership;

(d) To administer child care and early learning programs;

(e) To apply data already collected comparing the following factors and make biennial recommendations to the legislature regarding working connections subsidy and state-funded preschool rates and compensation models that would attract and retain high quality early learning professionals:

(i) State-funded early learning subsidy rates and market rates of licensed early learning homes and centers;

(ii) Compensation of early learning educators in licensed centers and homes and early learning teachers at state higher education institutions;

(iii) State-funded preschool program compensation rates and Washington state head start program compensation rates; and

(iv) State-funded preschool program compensation to compensation in similar comprehensive programs in other states;

(f) To serve as the state lead agency for Part C of the federal individuals with disabilities education act (IDEA) and to develop and adopt rules that establish minimum requirements for the services offered through Part C programs, including allowable allocations and expenditures for transition into Part B of the federal individuals with disabilities education act (IDEA);

(g) To standardize internal financial audits, oversight visits, performance benchmarks, and licensing criteria, so that programs can function in an integrated fashion;

(h) To support the implementation of the nongovernmental private-public partnership and cooperate with that partnership in pursuing its goals including providing data and support necessary for the successful work of the partnership;

(i) To work cooperatively and in coordination with the early learning council;

(j) To collaborate with the K-12 school system at the state and local levels to ensure appropriate connections and smooth transitions between early learning and K-12 programs;

(k) To develop and adopt rules for administration of the program of early learning established in RCW 43.215.455;

(l) To develop a comprehensive birth-to-three plan to provide education and support through a continuum of options including, but not limited to, services such as: Home visiting; quality incentives for infant and toddler child care subsidies; quality improvements for family home and center-based child care programs serving infants and toddlers; professional development; early literacy programs; and informal supports for family, friend, and neighbor caregivers; and

(m) Upon the development of an early learning information system, to make available to parents timely inspection and licensing action information and provider comments through the internet and other means.

(3) When additional funds are appropriated for the specific purpose of home visiting and parent and caregiver support, the department must reserve at least eighty percent for home visiting services to be deposited into the home visiting services account and up to twenty percent of the new funds for other parent or caregiver support.

(4) Home visiting services must include programs that serve families involved in the child welfare system.

(5) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the legislature shall fund the expansion in the Washington state preschool program pursuant to RCW 43.215.456 in fiscal year 2014.

(6) The department's programs shall be designed in a way that respects and preserves the ability of parents and legal guardians to direct the education, development, and upbringing of their children, and that recognizes and honors cultural and linguistic diversity. The department shall include parents and legal guardians in the development of policies and program decisions affecting their children.

(7) Until July 1, 2019, the provisions of this section are subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.215.060 and 2006 c 265 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In furtherance of the policy of the state to cooperate with the federal government in all of the programs under the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as may become necessary to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may be adopted, unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal funds. Any section or provision of law dealing with the department that may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to comply with federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the various programs of the department.

(2) Until July 1, 2019, the provisions of this section are subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.215.070 and 2006 c 265 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to other duties under this chapter, the director shall actively participate in a nongovernmental private-public partnership focused on supporting government's investments in early learning and ensuring that every child in the state is prepared to succeed in school and in life. Except for licensing as required by Washington state law and to the extent permitted by federal law, the director of the department of early learning shall grant waivers from the rules of state agencies for the operation of early learning programs requested by the nongovernmental private-public partnership to allow for flexibility to pursue market-based approaches to achieving the best outcomes for children and families.

(2) In addition to other powers granted to the director, the director may:

(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the department to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(b) Accept gifts, grants, or other funds for the purposes of this chapter; and

(c) Adopt, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, rules necessary to implement this chapter, including rules governing child day care and early learning programs under this chapter. This section does not expand the rule-making authority of the director beyond that necessary to implement and administer programs and services existing July 1, 2006, as transferred to the department of early learning under section 501, chapter 265, Laws of 2006. The rule-making authority does not include any authority to set mandatory curriculum or establish what must be taught in child day care centers or by family day care providers.

(3) Until July 1, 2019, the provisions of this section are subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.215.135 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 7 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall establish and implement policies in the working connections child care program to promote stability and quality of care for children from low-income households. These policies shall focus on supporting school readiness for young learners. Policies for the expenditure of funds constituting the working connections child care program must be consistent with the outcome measures defined in RCW 74.08A.410 and the standards established in this section intended to promote stability, quality, and continuity of early care and education programming.

(2) As recommended by Public Law 113-186, authorizations for the working connections child care subsidy shall be effective for twelve months beginning July 1, 2016, unless an earlier date is provided in the omnibus appropriations act.

(3) Existing child care providers serving nonschool-age children and receiving state subsidy payments must complete the following requirements to be eligible for a state subsidy under this section:

(a) Enroll in the early achievers program by August 1, 2016;

(b) Complete level 2 activities in the early achievers program by August 1, 2017; and

(c) Rate at a level 3 or higher in the early achievers program by December 31, 2019. If a child care provider rates below a level 3 by December 31, 2019, the provider must complete remedial activities with the department, and rate at a level 3 or higher no later than June 30, 2020.

(4) Effective July 1, 2016, a new child care provider serving nonschool-age children and receiving state subsidy payments must complete the following activities to be eligible to receive a state subsidy under this section:

(a) Enroll in the early achievers program within thirty days of receiving the initial state subsidy payment;

(b) Complete level 2 activities in the early achievers program within twelve months of enrollment; and

(c) Rate at a level 3 or higher in the early achievers program within thirty months of enrollment. If a child care provider rates below a level 3 within thirty months from enrollment into the early achievers program, the provider must complete remedial activities with the department, and rate at a level 3 or higher within six months of beginning remedial activities.

(5) If a child care provider does not rate at a level 3 or higher following the remedial period, the provider is no longer eligible to receive state subsidy under this section.

(6) If a child care provider serving nonschool-age children and receiving state subsidy payments has successfully completed all level 2 activities and is waiting to be rated by the deadline provided in this section, the provider may continue to receive a state subsidy pending the successful completion of the level 3 rating activity.

(7) The department shall implement tiered reimbursement for early achievers program participants in the working connections child care program rating at level 3, 4, or 5.

(8) The department shall account for a child care copayment collected by the provider from the family for each contracted slot and establish the copayment fee by rule.

(9) Until July 1, 2019, the provisions of this section are subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.215.255 and 2007 c 17 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining a license. The director may waive the fees when, in the discretion of the director, the fees would not be in the best interest of public health and safety, or when the fees would be to the financial disadvantage of the state.

(2) Fees charged shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the department for the licensure of the activity or class of activities and may include costs of necessary inspection.

(3) The director shall establish the fees charged by rule.

(4) Until July 1, 2019, the provisions of this section are subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.215.340 and 2006 c 265 s 315 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any agency operating without a license shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. This section shall not be enforceable against an agency until sixty days after the effective date of new rules, applicable to such agency, have been adopted under this chapter.

(2) Until July 1, 2019, the provisions of this section are subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 8. RCW 43.215.425 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 7 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration of the early childhood education and assistance program. Approved early childhood education and assistance programs shall conduct needs assessments of their service area and identify any targeted groups of children, to include but not be limited to children of seasonal and migrant farmworkers and native American populations living either on or off reservation. Approved early childhood education and assistance programs shall provide to the department a service delivery plan, to the extent practicable, that addresses these targeted populations.

(2) The department, in developing rules for the early childhood education and assistance program, shall consult with the early learning advisory council, and shall consider such factors as coordination with existing head start and other early childhood programs, the preparation necessary for instructors, qualifications of instructors, adequate space and equipment, and special transportation needs. The rules shall specifically require the early childhood programs to provide for parental involvement in participation with their child's program, in local program policy decisions, in development and revision of service delivery systems, and in parent education and training.

(3) By January 1, 2016, the department shall adopt rules requiring early childhood education and assistance program employees who have access to children to submit to a fingerprint background check. Fingerprint background check procedures for the early childhood education and assistance program shall be the same as the background check procedures in RCW 43.215.215.

(4) Until July 1, 2019, the provisions of this section are subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.215.455 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 7 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning September 1, 2011, an early learning program to provide voluntary preschool opportunities for children three and four years of age shall be implemented according to the funding and implementation plan in RCW 43.215.456. The program must offer a comprehensive program of early childhood education and family support, including parental involvement and health information, screening, and referral services, based on family need. Participation in the program is voluntary. On a space available basis, the program may allow enrollment of children who are not otherwise eligible by assessing a fee.

(2) The program shall be implemented by utilizing the program standards and eligibility criteria in the early childhood education and assistance program in RCW 43.215.400 through 43.215.450.

(3)(a) Beginning in the 2015-16 school year, the program implementation in this section shall prioritize early childhood education and assistance programs located in low-income neighborhoods within high-need geographical areas.

(b) Following the priority in (a) of this subsection, preference shall be given to programs meeting at least one of the following characteristics:

(i) Programs offering an extended day program for early care and education;

(ii) Programs offering services to children diagnosed with a special need; or

(iii) Programs offering services to children involved in the child welfare system.

(4) The director shall adopt rules for the following program components, as appropriate and necessary during the phased implementation of the program, consistent with early achievers program standards established in RCW 43.215.100:

(a) Minimum program standards;

(b) Approval of program providers; and

(c) Accountability and adherence to performance standards.

(5) The department has administrative responsibility for:

(a) Approving and contracting with providers according to rules developed by the director under this section;

(b) In partnership with school districts, monitoring program quality and assuring the program is responsive to the needs of eligible children;

(c) Assuring that program providers work cooperatively with school districts to coordinate the transition from preschool to kindergarten so that children and their families are well-prepared and supported; and

(d) Providing technical assistance to contracted providers.

(5) Until July 1, 2019, the provisions of this section are subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 10. RCW 43.215.545 and 2013 c 323 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of early learning shall:

(1) Work in conjunction with the statewide child care resource and referral network as well as local governments, nonprofit organizations, businesses, and community child care advocates to create local child care resource and referral organizations. These organizations may carry out needs assessments, resource development, provider training, technical assistance, and parent information and training;

(2) Actively seek public and private money for distribution as grants to the statewide child care resource and referral network and to existing or potential local child care resource and referral organizations;

(3) Adopt rules regarding the application for and distribution of grants to local child care resource and referral organizations. The rules shall, at a minimum, require an applicant to submit a plan for achieving the following objectives:

(a) Provide parents with information about child care resources, including location of services and subsidies;

(b) Carry out child care provider recruitment and training programs, including training under RCW 74.25.040;

(c) Offer support services, such as parent and provider seminars, toy-lending libraries, and substitute banks;

(d) Provide information for businesses regarding child care supply and demand;

(e) Advocate for increased public and private sector resources devoted to child care;

(f) Provide technical assistance to employers regarding employee child care services; and

(g) Serve recipients of temporary assistance for needy families and working parents with incomes at or below household incomes of two hundred percent of the federal poverty line;

(4) Provide staff support and technical assistance to the statewide child care resource and referral network and local child care resource and referral organizations;

(5) Maintain a statewide child care licensing data bank and work with department licensors to provide information to local child care resource and referral organizations about licensed child care providers in the state;

(6) Through the statewide child care resource and referral network and local resource and referral organizations, compile data about local child care needs and availability for future planning and development;

(7) Coordinate with the statewide child care resource and referral network and local child care resource and referral organizations for the provision of training and technical assistance to child care providers;

(8) Collect and assemble information regarding the availability of insurance and of federal and other child care funding to assist state and local agencies, businesses, and other child care providers in offering child care services;

(9) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, beginning September 1, 2013, increase the base rate for all child care providers by ten percent;

(10) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, provide tiered subsidy rate enhancements to child care providers if the provider meets the following requirements:

(a) The provider enrolls in quality rating and improvement system levels 2, 3, 4, or 5;

(b) The provider is actively participating in the early achievers program;

(c) The provider continues to advance towards level 5 of the early achievers program; and

(d) The provider must complete level 2 within thirty months or the reimbursement rate returns the level 1 rate; ((and))

(11) Require exempt providers to participate in continuing education, if adequate funding is available; and

(12) Until July 1, 2019, the provisions of this section are subject to section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. This act expires July 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---