BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that sexual abuse and exploitation of children robs victims of their childhood and irrevocably interferes with their emotional and psychological development. Victims of child pornography often experience severe and lasting harm from the permanent memorialization of the crimes committed against them. Child victims endure depression, withdrawal, anger, and other psychological disorders. Victims also experience feelings of guilt and responsibility for the sexual abuse as well as feelings of betrayal, powerlessness, worthlessness, and low self-esteem. Each and every time such an image is viewed, traded, printed, or downloaded, the child in that image is victimized again.

(2) The legislature finds that the expansion of the internet and computer-related technologies have led to a dramatic increase in the availability of child pornography by simplifying how it can be created, distributed, and collected. Investigators and prosecutors report dramatic increases in the number and violent character of the sexually abusive images of children being trafficked through the internet. Between 2005 and 2009, the national center for missing and exploited children's child victim identification program has seen a four hundred thirty-two percent increase in child pornography films and files submitted for identification of the children depicted. The United States department of justice estimates that pornographers have recorded the abuse of more than one million children in the United States alone. Furthermore, a well-known study conducted by the crimes against children research center for the national center for missing and exploited children concluded that an estimated forty percent of those who possess child pornography have also directly victimized a child and fifteen percent have attempted to entice a child over the internet.

(3) The legislature finds that due to a lack of dedicated resources, only two percent of known child exploitation offenders are being investigated. The legislature finds that additional funding sources are needed to ensure that law enforcement agencies can adequately investigate and prosecute offenders and victims can receive necessary services, including mental health treatment. Finally, the legislature finds that offenders convicted of crimes relating to child pornography should bear the high cost of investigations and prosecutions of these crimes and also the cost of providing services to victims.

Sec. 2. RCW 67.70.190 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 31 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unclaimed prizes ((shall)) must be retained in the state lottery account for the person entitled thereto for one hundred eighty days after the drawing in which the prize is won, or after the official end of the game for instant prizes. If no claim is made for the prize within this time, all rights to the prize ((shall be)) are extinguished, and the prize ((shall)) must be retained in the state lottery fund for further use as prizes, except that ((one-third)) five percent of all unclaimed prize money must be deposited in the child rescue fund created in RCW 9.68A.200, and thirty three percent of all unclaimed prize money ((shall)) must be deposited in the economic development strategic reserve account created in RCW 43.330.250. On June 30th of each fiscal year, any balance of unclaimed prizes in excess of ten million dollars must be transferred to the Washington opportunity pathways account created in RCW 28B.76.526.

(2) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the education legacy trust account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the state lottery account from unclaimed prizes.

--- END ---