BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.36.111 and 2009 c 414 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary of state, in conjunction with the Washington state association of county auditors, shall develop a uniform ballot format to be used by each county. The format must be implemented by the year 2027, or upon replacement of vote tallying equipment, whichever occurs first.

(2) Every ballot for a single combination of issues, offices, and candidates shall be uniform within a precinct and shall identify the type of primary or election, the county, and the date of the primary or election, and the ballot or voting device shall contain instructions on the proper method of recording a vote, including write-in votes. Each position, together with the names of the candidates for that office, shall be clearly separated from other offices or positions in the same jurisdiction. The offices in each jurisdiction shall be clearly separated from each other. No paper ballot or ballot card may be marked by or at the direction of an election official in any way that would permit the identification of the person who voted that ballot.

(((2))) (3) An ((elections [election])) election official may not enter into or extend any contract with a vendor if such contract may allow the vendor to acquire an ownership interest in any data pertaining to any voter, any voter's address, registration number, or history, or any ballot.

(4) The secretary of state, in consultation with the department of enterprise services and with county auditors, may develop a master contract for vote tallying equipment for purchase by counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 29A.36 RCW to read as follows:

A county auditor or county council may establish an equipment replacement fund that must be used explicitly to replace vote tallying equipment. Only the county auditor may authorize expenditures from the fund. Election billing charges must be sufficient to fund the replacement of vote tallying equipment by the year 2024.

--- END ---