BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.08.140 and 2011 c 10 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to vote in any primary, special election, or general election, a person who is not registered to vote in Washington must:

(a) Submit a registration application no later than ((twenty-nine)) eight days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election; or

(b)(i) Through 2027, register in person at the county auditor's office, or an alternate location designated by the county auditor, in his or her county of residence no later than eight days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election, unless the county has adopted a different deadline pursuant to subsection (3) of this section; and

(ii) Beginning in 2028, register in person at the county auditor's office in his or her county of residence, or an alternate location designated by the county auditor, no later than 5:00 p.m. on the day of the primary, special election, or general election.

(2) A person who is already registered to vote in Washington may update his or her registration no later than twenty-nine days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election to be in effect for that primary, special election, or general election. A registered voter who fails to transfer his or her residential address by this deadline may vote according to his or her previous registration address.

(3) Through 2027, a county may adopt a deadline for a voter to register in person no later than 5:00 p.m. on the day of the primary, special election, or general election, if the county determines it has sufficient resources and infrastructure to implement the deadline.

--- END ---