BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The office of the state chief information officer and the military department shall convene a task force to address the coordination of cybersecurity and emergency management activities by state agencies. Task force membership must include, but not be limited to, representatives from the military department, the office of cybersecurity within the office of the state chief information officer, and representatives of state agencies responsible for information technology systems supporting essential government functions. The state chief information officer and the director of the military department shall serve as cochairs of the task force.

(2) The task force shall review issues including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Information technology security incidents that could trigger state disaster recovery efforts and the execution of continuity of operations plans;

(b) Information technology systems, services, and requirements that support essential functions as defined by agencies' continuity of operations planning;

(c) Roles and responsibilities of state agencies in the event of a significant cybersecurity incident; and

(d) Coordination of emergency management and cybersecurity functions in continuity of operations planning and incident response.

(3) The task force must publish notice of the date, time, location, and subject of any official meetings and provide such information directly to the technology services board and the appropriate committees of both chambers of the legislature no later than one week before the meeting is scheduled to take place.

(4) Staff support for and expenses of the task force shall be provided by the office of the state chief information officer.

(5) In compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the state chief information officer must submit a report detailing the recommendations of the task force to the appropriate committees of both houses of the legislature and the governor by December 12, 2018.

(6) This section expires June 30, 2019.

--- END ---