BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.08.210 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to restaurants of products that impart flavor to food during the cooking process and that:

(a) Are completely or substantially consumed by combustion during the cooking process, such as wood chips, charcoal, charcoal briquettes, and grape vines; or

(b) Support the food during the cooking process and are comprised entirely of wood, such as cedar grilling planks.

(2) The exemption provided by this section does not apply to any type of gas fuel.

(3) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain an exemption certificate from the buyer in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the exemption certificate for the seller's files. In lieu of an exemption certificate, a seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement. For sellers who electronically file their taxes, the department must provide a separate tax reporting line for exemption amounts claimed under this section.

(4) For purposes of this subsection, "restaurant" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.9995.

(5) This section expires ((July 1, 2017)) January 1, 2028.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.12.210 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the provisions of this chapter do not apply to restaurants with respect to the use of products that impart flavor to food during the cooking process and that:

(a) Are completely or substantially consumed by combustion during the cooking process, such as wood chips, charcoal, charcoal briquettes, and grape vines; or

(b) Support the food during the cooking process and are comprised entirely of wood, such as cedar grilling planks.

(2) The exemption provided by this section does not apply to any type of gas fuel.

(3) For purposes of this subsection, "restaurant" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.9995.

(4) This section expires ((July 1, 2017)) January 1, 2028.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2017.

--- END ---