BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.101 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 901 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a patient or research subject by:

(1) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the practitioner's authorized agent); or

(2) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner.

(b) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.

(c) (("CBD concentration" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(d))) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.

(((e))) (d) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or state laws, or federal or commission rules.

(((f))) (e)(1) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:

(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or

(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II.

(2) The term does not include:

(i) a controlled substance;

(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug application;

(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, to the extent conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or

(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.

(((g))) (f) "Deliver" or "delivery((,))" means the actual or constructive transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.

(((h))) (g) "Department" means the department of health.

(((i) "Designated provider" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(j))) (h) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.

(((k))) (i) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.

(((l))) (j) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance.

(((m))) (k) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.

(((n))) (l) "Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to them; (2) controlled substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection. The term does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

(((o))) (m) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its successor agency.

(((p))) (n) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.

(((q))) (o) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:

(1) that the commission has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled substance;

(2) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and

(3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture of the controlled substance.

(((r))) (p) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in subsection (((dd))) (s)(5) of this section, RCW 69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and 69.50.206(b)(4), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c) the term includes any positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and 69.50.208(a) the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.

(((s) "Lot" means a definite quantity of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product identified by a lot number, every portion or package of which is uniform within recognized tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.

(t) "Lot number" must identify the licensee by business or trade name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and the date of harvest or processing for each lot of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product.

(u))) (q) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled substance:

(1) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner's professional practice; or

(2) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.

(((v))) (r) "Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration greater than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin. The term does not include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination.

(((w) "Marijuana concentrates" means products consisting wholly or in part of the resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis and having a THC concentration greater than ten percent.

(x) "Marijuana processor" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to process marijuana into marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, package and label marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products at wholesale to marijuana retailers.

(y) "Marijuana producer" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to produce and sell marijuana at wholesale to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers.

(z) "Marijuana products" means useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products as defined in this section.

(aa) "Marijuana researcher" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to produce, process, and possess marijuana for the purposes of conducting research on marijuana and marijuana-derived drug products.

(bb) "Marijuana retailer" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in a retail outlet.

(cc) "Marijuana-infused products" means products that contain marijuana or marijuana extracts, are intended for human use, are derived from marijuana as defined in subsection (v) of this section, and have a THC concentration no greater than ten percent. The term "marijuana-infused products" does not include either useable marijuana or marijuana concentrates.

(dd))) (s) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

(1) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.

(2) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.

(3) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.

(4) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their salts have been removed.

(5) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(6) Cocaine base.

(7) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(8) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of any substance referred to in subparagraphs (1) through (7).

(((ee))) (t) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.

(((ff))) (u) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L., except its seeds.

(((gg))) (v) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(((hh) "Plant" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(ii))) (w) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing.

(((jj))) (x) "Practitioner" means:

(1) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW; an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.57A.020 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.57A.040; an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW; a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or research in this state.

(2) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state.

(3) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed physician assistant or a licensed osteopathic physician assistant specifically approved to prescribe controlled substances by his or her state's medical quality assurance commission or equivalent and his or her supervising physician, an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed to prescribe controlled substances, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any state of the United States.

(((kk))) (y) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.

(((ll))) (z) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.

(((mm) "Qualifying patient" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(nn) "Recognition card" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(oo) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board for the retail sale of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

(pp))) (aa) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(((qq))) (bb) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(((rr))) (cc) "THC concentration" means percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol content per dry weight of any part of the plant Cannabis, or per volume or weight of marijuana product, or the combined percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant Cannabis regardless of moisture content.

(((ss))) (dd) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a member of the individual's household or for administering to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's household.

(((tt) "Useable marijuana" means dried marijuana flowers. The term "useable marijuana" does not include either marijuana-infused products or marijuana concentrates.))

Sec. 2. RCW 70.345.010 and 2016 sp.s. c 38 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the Washington state liquor and cannabis board.

(2) "Business" means any trade, occupation, activity, or enterprise engaged in for the purpose of selling or distributing vapor products in this state.

(3) "Child care facility" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 70.140.020.

(4) "Closed system nicotine container" means a sealed, prefilled, and disposable container of nicotine in a solution or other form in which such container is inserted directly into an electronic cigarette, electronic nicotine delivery system, or other similar product, if the nicotine in the container is inaccessible through customary or reasonably foreseeable handling or use, including reasonably foreseeable ingestion or other contact by children.

(5) "Delivery sale" means any sale of a vapor product to a purchaser in this state where either:

(a) The purchaser submits the order for such sale by means of a telephonic or other method of voice transmission, the mails or any other delivery service, or the internet or other online service; or

(b) The vapor product is delivered by use of the mails or of a delivery service. The foregoing sales of vapor products constitute a delivery sale regardless of whether the seller is located within or without this state. "Delivery sale" does not include a sale of any vapor product not for personal consumption to a retailer.

(6) "Delivery seller" means a person who makes delivery sales.

(7) "Distributor" means any person who:

(a) Sells vapor products to persons other than ultimate consumers; or

(b) Is engaged in the business of selling vapor products in this state and who brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from outside of the state any vapor products for sale.

(8) "Liquid nicotine container" means a package from which nicotine in a solution or other form is accessible through normal and foreseeable use by a consumer and that is used to hold soluble nicotine in any concentration. "Liquid nicotine container" does not include closed system nicotine containers.

(9) "Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures and sells vapor products.

(10) "Minor" refers to an individual who is less than eighteen years old.

(11) "Person" means any individual, receiver, administrator, executor, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock company, business trust, municipal corporation, the state and its departments and institutions, political subdivision of the state of Washington, corporation, limited liability company, association, society, any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise.

(12) "Place of business" means any place where vapor products are sold or where vapor products are manufactured, stored, or kept for the purpose of sale.

(13) "Playground" means any public improved area designed, equipped, and set aside for play of six or more children which is not intended for use as an athletic playing field or athletic court, including but not limited to any play equipment, surfacing, fencing, signs, internal pathways, internal land forms, vegetation, and related structures.

(14) "Retail outlet" means each place of business from which vapor products are sold to consumers.

(15) "Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of selling vapor products to ultimate consumers.

(16)(a) "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration, and includes and means all sales made by any person.

(b) The term "sale" includes a gift by a person engaged in the business of selling vapor products, for advertising, promoting, or as a means of evading the provisions of this chapter.

(17) "School" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 70.140.020.

(18) "Self-service display" means a display that contains vapor products and is located in an area that is openly accessible to customers and from which customers can readily access such products without the assistance of a salesperson. A display case that holds vapor products behind locked doors does not constitute a self-service display.

(19) "Vapor product" means any noncombustible product that may contain nicotine and that employs a heating element, power source, electronic circuit, or other electronic, chemical, or mechanical means, regardless of shape or size, that can be used to produce vapor or aerosol from a solution or other substance.

(a) "Vapor product" includes any electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or similar product or device and any vapor cartridge or other container that may contain nicotine in a solution or other form that is intended to be used with or in an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or similar product or device.

(b) "Vapor product" does not include any product that meets the definition of ((marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, marijuana-infused products,)) cigarette((,)) or tobacco products.

(((c) For purposes of this subsection (19), "marijuana," "useable marijuana," "marijuana concentrates," and "marijuana-infused products" have the same meaning as provided in RCW 69.50.101.))

Sec. 3. RCW 82.04.213 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 1102 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Agricultural product" means any product of plant cultivation or animal husbandry including, but not limited to: A product of horticulture, grain cultivation, vermiculture, viticulture, or aquaculture as defined in RCW 15.85.020; plantation Christmas trees; short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035; turf; or any animal including but not limited to an animal that is a private sector cultured aquatic product as defined in RCW 15.85.020, or a bird, or insect, or the substances obtained from such an animal including honey bee products. "Agricultural product" does not include ((marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products, or)) animals defined as pet animals under RCW 16.70.020.

(2)(a) "Farmer" means any person engaged in the business of growing, raising, or producing, upon the person's own lands or upon the lands in which the person has a present right of possession, any agricultural product to be sold, and the growing, raising, or producing honey bee products for sale, or providing bee pollination services, by an eligible apiarist. "Farmer" does not include a person growing, raising, or producing such products for the person's own consumption; a person selling any animal or substance obtained therefrom in connection with the person's business of operating a stockyard or a slaughter or packing house; or a person in respect to the business of taking, cultivating, or raising timber.

(b) "Eligible apiarist" means a person who owns or keeps one or more bee colonies and who grows, raises, or produces honey bee products for sale at wholesale and is registered under RCW 15.60.021.

(c) "Honey bee products" means queen honey bees, packaged honey bees, honey, pollen, bees wax, propolis, or other substances obtained from honey bees. "Honey bee products" does not include manufactured substances or articles.

(((3) The terms "agriculture," "farming," "horticulture," "horticultural," and "horticultural product" may not be construed to include or relate to marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products unless the applicable term is explicitly defined to include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

(4) "Marijuana," "useable marijuana," and "marijuana-infused products" have the same meaning as in RCW 69.50.101.))

Sec. 4. RCW 82.04.260 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 602 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 205 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:

(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;

(b) Beginning July 1, 2025, seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;

(c)(i) ((Beginning)) Except as provided otherwise in (c)(iii) of this subsection, from July 1, 2025, until January 1, 2036, dairy products; or selling dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products" means:

(A) Products, not including any marijuana-infused product, that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and

(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by weight or volume.

(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy product;

(d)(((i))) Beginning July 1, 2025, fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state((.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products));

(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and

(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.

(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.

If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.

(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent thereafter.

(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:

(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and

(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.

(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(e)(i) Except as provided in (e)(ii) of this subsection (11), this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.

(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited outside the state of Washington. This subsection (11)(e)(ii) only applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850.

(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i) Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after severance.

(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:

(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.

(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue; kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard, liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of printed materials.

(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.

(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035.

(v) "Timber products" means:

(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;

(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered paper or paper products; and

(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of biocomposite surface products.

(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood windows; and biocomposite surface products.

(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12) must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.

(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.35 percent until July 1, 2024, and 0.484 percent thereafter.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.04.4266 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to the value of products or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:

(a) Manufacturing fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables; or

(b) Selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state. A person taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(2) ((For purposes of this section, "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

(3))) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.

(((4))) (3) This section expires July 1, 2025.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.08.010 and 2014 c 140 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1)(a)(i) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price" means the total amount of consideration, except separately stated trade-in property of like kind, including cash, credit, property, and services, for which tangible personal property, extended warranties, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or other services or anything else defined as a "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050 are sold, leased, or rented, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise. No deduction from the total amount of consideration is allowed for the following: (A) The seller's cost of the property sold; (B) the cost of materials used, labor or service cost, interest, losses, all costs of transportation to the seller, all taxes imposed on the seller, and any other expense of the seller; (C) charges by the seller for any services necessary to complete the sale, other than delivery and installation charges; (D) delivery charges; and (E) installation charges.

(ii) When tangible personal property is rented or leased under circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the "selling price" must be determined as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe;

(b) "Selling price" or "sales price" does not include: Discounts, including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale; interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the sale of tangible personal property, extended warranties, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or other services or anything else defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050, if the amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser; and any taxes legally imposed directly on the consumer that are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser;

(c) "Selling price" or "sales price" includes consideration received by the seller from a third party if:

(i) The seller actually receives consideration from a party other than the purchaser, and the consideration is directly related to a price reduction or discount on the sale;

(ii) The seller has an obligation to pass the price reduction or discount through to the purchaser;

(iii) The amount of the consideration attributable to the sale is fixed and determinable by the seller at the time of the sale of the item to the purchaser; and

(iv) One of the criteria in this subsection (1)(c)(iv) is met:

(A) The purchaser presents a coupon, certificate, or other documentation to the seller to claim a price reduction or discount where the coupon, certificate, or documentation is authorized, distributed, or granted by a third party with the understanding that the third party will reimburse any seller to whom the coupon, certificate, or documentation is presented;

(B) The purchaser identifies himself or herself to the seller as a member of a group or organization entitled to a price reduction or discount, however a "preferred customer" card that is available to any patron does not constitute membership in such a group; or

(C) The price reduction or discount is identified as a third party price reduction or discount on the invoice received by the purchaser or on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation presented by the purchaser;

(2)(a) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or principal, except "seller" does not mean:

(i) The state and its departments and institutions when making sales to the state and its departments and institutions; or

(ii) A professional employer organization when a covered employee coemployed with the client under the terms of a professional employer agreement engages in activities that constitute a sale at retail that is subject to the tax imposed by this chapter. In such cases, the client, and not the professional employer organization, is deemed to be the seller and is responsible for collecting and remitting the tax imposed by this chapter.

(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, the terms "client," "covered employee," "professional employer agreement," and "professional employer organization" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.04.540;

(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association, society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;

(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal property or services for preparation and delivery to a location designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including, but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling, crating, and packing;

(5) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed material delivered to a single address;

(6) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging in business," "cash discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state," and "within this state((,))" ((marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products)) applies equally to the provisions of this chapter;

(7) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means personal property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or that is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. Tangible personal property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten computer software;

(8) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.050(7);

(9) The definitions in RCW 82.04.192 apply to this chapter;

(10) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW, whenever the terms "property" or "personal property" are used, those terms must be construed to include digital goods and digital codes unless:

(a) It is clear from the context that the term "personal property" is intended only to refer to tangible personal property;

(b) It is clear from the context that the term "property" is intended only to refer to tangible personal property, real property, or both; or

(c) To construe the term "property" or "personal property" as including digital goods and digital codes would yield unlikely, absurd, or strained consequences; and

(11) "Retail sale" or "sale at retail" means any sale, lease, or rental for any purpose other than for resale, sublease, or subrent.

(((12) The terms "agriculture," "farming," "horticulture," "horticultural," and "horticultural product" may not be construed to include or relate to marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products unless the applicable term is explicitly defined to include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.))

Sec. 7. RCW 82.08.020 and 2014 c 140 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and collected a tax equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state of:

(a) Tangible personal property, unless the sale is specifically excluded from the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;

(b) Digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services, if the sale is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;

(c) Services, other than digital automated services, included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;

(d) Extended warranties to consumers; and

(e) Anything else, the sale of which is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale.

(2) There is levied and collected an additional tax on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.

(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include:

(a) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181((, unless the farm tractor or farm vehicle is for use in the production of marijuana));

(b) Off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365;

(c) Nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.310; and

(d) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.

(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes collected under subsection (1) of this section must be dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection must be deposited in the performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.

(6) The taxes imposed under this chapter apply to successive retail sales of the same property.

(7) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 8. RCW 82.08.02565 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 5 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used directly in a manufacturing operation or research and development operation, to sales to a person engaged in testing for a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used directly in a testing operation, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the machinery and equipment.

(b) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain from the purchaser an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department by rule. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(c)(i) The exemption under this section is in the form of a remittance for a gas distribution business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010, claiming the exemption for machinery and equipment used for the production of compressed natural gas or liquefied natural gas for use as a transportation fuel.

(ii) A gas distribution business claiming an exemption from state and local tax in the form of a remittance under this section must pay the tax under RCW 82.08.020 and all applicable local sales taxes. Beginning July 1, 2017, the gas distribution business may then apply to the department for remittance of state and local sales and use taxes. A gas distribution business may not apply for a remittance more frequently than once a quarter. The gas distribution business must specify the amount of exempted tax claimed and the qualifying purchases for which the exemption is claimed. The gas distribution business must retain, in adequate detail, records to enable the department to determine whether the business is entitled to an exemption under this section, including: Invoices; proof of tax paid; and documents describing the machinery and equipment.

(iii) The department must determine eligibility under this section based on the information provided by the gas distribution business, which is subject to audit verification by the department. The department must on a quarterly basis remit exempted amounts to qualifying businesses who submitted applications during the previous quarter.

(iv) Beginning July 1, 2028, a gas distribution business may not apply for a refund under this section or RCW 82.12.02565.

(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02565:

(a) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices, and support facilities, and tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component thereof, including repair parts and replacement parts. "Machinery and equipment" includes pollution control equipment installed and used in a manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development operation to prevent air pollution, water pollution, or contamination that might otherwise result from the manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development operation. "Machinery and equipment" also includes digital goods.

(b) "Machinery and equipment" does not include:

(i) Hand-powered tools;

(ii) Property with a useful life of less than one year;

(iii) Buildings, other than machinery and equipment that is permanently affixed to or becomes a physical part of a building; and

(iv) Building fixtures that are not integral to the manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development operation that are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building, such as utility systems for heating, ventilation, air conditioning, communications, plumbing, or electrical.

(c) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in a manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development operation if the machinery and equipment:

(i) Acts upon or interacts with an item of tangible personal property;

(ii) Conveys, transports, handles, or temporarily stores an item of tangible personal property at the manufacturing site or testing site;

(iii) Controls, guides, measures, verifies, aligns, regulates, or tests tangible personal property at the site or away from the site;

(iv) Provides physical support for or access to tangible personal property;

(v) Produces power for, or lubricates machinery and equipment;

(vi) Produces another item of tangible personal property for use in the manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development operation;

(vii) Places tangible personal property in the container, package, or wrapping in which the tangible personal property is normally sold or transported; or

(viii) Is integral to research and development as defined in RCW 82.63.010.

(d) "Manufacturer" means a person that qualifies as a manufacturer under RCW 82.04.110. "Manufacturer" also includes a person that:

(i) Prints newspapers or other materials; or

(ii) Is engaged in the development of prewritten computer software that is not transferred to purchasers by means of tangible storage media.

(e) "Manufacturing" means only those activities that come within the definition of "to manufacture" in RCW 82.04.120 and are taxed as manufacturing or processing for hire under chapter 82.04 RCW, or would be taxed as such if such activity were conducted in this state or if not for an exemption or deduction. "Manufacturing" also includes printing newspapers or other materials. An activity is not taxed as manufacturing or processing for hire under chapter 82.04 RCW if the activity is within the purview of chapter 82.16 RCW.

(f) "Manufacturing operation" means the manufacturing of articles, substances, or commodities for sale as tangible personal property. A manufacturing operation begins at the point where the raw materials enter the manufacturing site and ends at the point where the processed material leaves the manufacturing site. With respect to the production of class A or exceptional quality biosolids by a wastewater treatment facility, the manufacturing operation begins at the point where class B biosolids undergo additional processing to achieve class A or exceptional quality standards. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the term also includes that portion of a cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an integral part. The term does not include the preparation of food products on the premises of a person selling food products at retail.

(g) "Cogeneration" means the simultaneous generation of electrical energy and low-grade heat from the same fuel.

(h) "Research and development operation" means engaging in research and development as defined in RCW 82.63.010 by a manufacturer or processor for hire.

(i) "Testing" means activities performed to establish or determine the properties, qualities, and limitations of tangible personal property.

(j) "Testing operation" means the testing of tangible personal property for a manufacturer or processor for hire. A testing operation begins at the point where the tangible personal property enters the testing site and ends at the point where the tangible personal property leaves the testing site. The term also includes the testing of tangible personal property for use in that portion of a cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an integral part. The term does not include the testing of tangible personal property for use in the production of electricity by a light and power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010 or the preparation of food products on the premises of a person selling food products at retail.

(3) ((This section does not apply (a) to sales of machinery and equipment used directly in the manufacturing, research and development, or testing of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products, or (b) to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving such machinery and equipment.

(4))) The exemptions in this section do not apply to an ineligible person. For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Affiliated group" means a group of two or more entities that are either:

(i) Affiliated as defined in RCW 82.32.655; or

(ii) Permitted to file a consolidated return for federal income tax purposes.

(b) "Ineligible person" means all members of an affiliated group if all of the following apply:

(i) At least one member of the affiliated group was registered with the department to do business in Washington state on or before July 1, 1981;

(ii) As of August 1, 2015, the combined employment in this state of the affiliated group exceeds forty thousand full-time and part-time employees, based on data reported to the employment security department by the affiliated group; and

(iii) The business activities of the affiliated group primarily include development, sales, and licensing of computer software and services.

Sec. 9. RCW 82.12.02565 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 5 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use by a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used directly in a manufacturing operation or research and development operation, to the use by a person engaged in testing for a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used directly in a testing operation, or to the use of labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the machinery and equipment.

(2) The definitions, conditions, and requirements in RCW 82.08.02565 apply to this section.

(3) ((This section does not apply to the use of (a) machinery and equipment used directly in the manufacturing, research and development, or testing of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products, or (b) labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving such machinery and equipment.

(4))) The exemptions in this section do not apply to an ineligible person as defined in RCW 82.08.02565.

Sec. 10. RCW 82.29A.020 and 2014 c 207 s 3 and 2014 c 140 s 26 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context requires otherwise.

(1)(a) "Leasehold interest" means an interest in publicly owned real or personal property which exists by virtue of any lease, permit, license, or any other agreement, written or verbal, between the public owner of the property and a person who would not be exempt from property taxes if that person owned the property in fee, granting possession and use, to a degree less than fee simple ownership. However, no interest in personal property (excluding land or buildings) which is owned by the United States, whether or not as trustee, or by any foreign government may constitute a leasehold interest hereunder when the right to use such property is granted pursuant to a contract solely for the manufacture or production of articles for sale to the United States or any foreign government. The term "leasehold interest" includes the rights of use or occupancy by others of property which is owned in fee or held in trust by a public corporation, commission, or authority created under RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660 if the property is listed on or is within a district listed on any federal or state register of historical sites.

(b) The term "leasehold interest" does not include:

(i) Road or utility easements, rights of access, occupancy, or use granted solely for the purpose of removing materials or products purchased from a public owner or the lessee of a public owner, or rights of access, occupancy, or use granted solely for the purpose of natural energy resource exploration; or

(ii) The preferential use of publicly owned cargo cranes and docks and associated areas used in the loading and discharging of cargo located at a port district marine facility. "Preferential use" means that publicly owned real or personal property is used by a private party under a written agreement with the public owner, but the public owner or any third party maintains a right to use the property when not being used by the private party.

(c) "Publicly owned real or personal property" includes real or personal property owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe in the state and exempt from tax under RCW 84.36.010.

(2)(a) "Taxable rent" means contract rent as defined in (c) of this subsection in all cases where the lease or agreement has been established or renegotiated through competitive bidding, or negotiated or renegotiated in accordance with statutory requirements regarding the rent payable, or negotiated or renegotiated under circumstances, established by public record, clearly showing that the contract rent was the maximum attainable by the lessor. However, after January 1, 1986, with respect to any lease which has been in effect for ten years or more without renegotiation, taxable rent may be established by procedures set forth in (g) of this subsection. All other leasehold interests are subject to the determination of taxable rent under the terms of (g) of this subsection.

(b) For purposes of determining leasehold excise tax on any lands on the Hanford reservation subleased to a private or public entity by the department of ecology, taxable rent includes only the annual cash rental payment made by such entity to the department of ecology as specifically referred to as rent in the sublease agreement between the parties and does not include any other fees, assessments, or charges imposed on or collected by such entity irrespective of whether the private or public entity pays or collects such other fees, assessments, or charges as specified in the sublease agreement.

(c) "Contract rent" means the amount of consideration due as payment for a leasehold interest, including: The total of cash payments made to the lessor or to another party for the benefit of the lessor according to the requirements of the lease or agreement, including any rents paid by a sublessee; expenditures for the protection of the lessor's interest when required by the terms of the lease or agreement; and expenditures for improvements to the property to the extent that such improvements become the property of the lessor. Where the consideration conveyed for the leasehold interest is made in combination with payment for concession or other rights granted by the lessor, only that portion of such payment which represents consideration for the leasehold interest is part of contract rent.

(d) "Contract rent" does not include: (i) Expenditures made by the lessee, which under the terms of the lease or agreement, are to be reimbursed by the lessor to the lessee or expenditures for improvements and protection made pursuant to a lease or an agreement which requires that the use of the improved property be open to the general public and that no profit will inure to the lessee from the lease; (ii) expenditures made by the lessee for the replacement or repair of facilities due to fire or other casualty including payments for insurance to provide reimbursement for losses or payments to a public or private entity for protection of such property from damage or loss or for alterations or additions made necessary by an action of government taken after the date of the execution of the lease or agreement; (iii) improvements added to publicly owned property by a sublessee under an agreement executed prior to January 1, 1976, which have been taxed as personal property of the sublessee prior to January 1, 1976, or improvements made by a sublessee of the same lessee under a similar agreement executed prior to January 1, 1976, and such improvements are taxable to the sublessee as personal property; (iv) improvements added to publicly owned property if such improvements are being taxed as personal property to any person.

(e) Any prepaid contract rent is considered to have been paid in the year due and not in the year actually paid with respect to prepayment for a period of more than one year. Expenditures for improvements with a useful life of more than one year which are included as part of contract rent must be treated as prepaid contract rent and prorated over the useful life of the improvement or the remaining term of the lease or agreement if the useful life is in excess of the remaining term of the lease or agreement. Rent prepaid prior to January 1, 1976, must be prorated from the date of prepayment.

(f) With respect to a "product lease," the value is that value determined at the time of sale under terms of the lease.

(g) If it is determined by the department of revenue, upon examination of a lessee's accounts or those of a lessor of publicly owned property, that a lessee is occupying or using publicly owned property in such a manner as to create a leasehold interest and that such leasehold interest has not been established through competitive bidding, or negotiated in accordance with statutory requirements regarding the rent payable, or negotiated under circumstances, established by public record, clearly showing that the contract rent was the maximum attainable by the lessor, the department may establish a taxable rent computation for use in determining the tax payable under authority granted in this chapter based upon the following criteria: (i) Consideration must be given to rental being paid to other lessors by lessees of similar property for similar purposes over similar periods of time; (ii) consideration must be given to what would be considered a fair rate of return on the market value of the property leased less reasonable deductions for any restrictions on use, special operating requirements or provisions for concurrent use by the lessor, another person or the general public.

(3) "Product lease" as used in this chapter means a lease of property for use in the production of agricultural or marine products((, not including the production of marijuana as defined in RCW 69.50.101,)) to the extent that such lease provides for the contract rent to be paid by the delivery of a stated percentage of the production of such agricultural or marine products to the credit of the lessor or the payment to the lessor of a stated percentage of the proceeds from the sale of such products.

(4) "Renegotiated" means a change in the lease agreement which changes the agreed time of possession, restrictions on use, the rate of the cash rental or of any other consideration payable by the lessee to or for the benefit of the lessor, other than any such change required by the terms of the lease or agreement. In addition "renegotiated" means a continuation of possession by the lessee beyond the date when, under the terms of the lease agreement, the lessee had the right to vacate the premises without any further liability to the lessor.

(5) "City" means any city or town.

(6) "Products" includes natural resource products such as cut or picked evergreen foliage, Cascara bark, wild edible mushrooms, native ornamental trees and shrubs, ore and minerals, natural gas, geothermal water and steam, and forage removed through the grazing of livestock.

Sec. 11. RCW 82.29A.020 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 2003 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context requires otherwise.

(1)(a) "Leasehold interest" means an interest in publicly owned, or specified privately owned, real or personal property which exists by virtue of any lease, permit, license, or any other agreement, written or verbal, between the owner of the property and a person who would not be exempt from property taxes if that person owned the property in fee, granting possession and use, to a degree less than fee simple ownership. However, no interest in personal property (excluding land or buildings) which is owned by the United States, whether or not as trustee, or by any foreign government may constitute a leasehold interest hereunder when the right to use such property is granted pursuant to a contract solely for the manufacture or production of articles for sale to the United States or any foreign government. The term "leasehold interest" includes the rights of use or occupancy by others of property which is owned in fee or held in trust by a public corporation, commission, or authority created under RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660 if the property is listed on or is within a district listed on any federal or state register of historical sites.

(b) The term "leasehold interest" does not include:

(i) Road or utility easements, rights of access, occupancy, or use granted solely for the purpose of removing materials or products purchased from an owner or the lessee of an owner, or rights of access, occupancy, or use granted solely for the purpose of natural energy resource exploration; or

(ii) The preferential use of publicly owned cargo cranes and docks and associated areas used in the loading and discharging of cargo located at a port district marine facility. "Preferential use" means that publicly owned real or personal property is used by a private party under a written agreement with the public owner, but the public owner or any third party maintains a right to use the property when not being used by the private party.

(2)(a) "Taxable rent" means contract rent as defined in (c) of this subsection in all cases where the lease or agreement has been established or renegotiated through competitive bidding, or negotiated or renegotiated in accordance with statutory requirements regarding the rent payable, or negotiated or renegotiated under circumstances, established by public record, clearly showing that the contract rent was the maximum attainable by the lessor. With respect to a leasehold interest in privately owned property, "taxable rent" means contract rent. However, after January 1, 1986, with respect to any lease which has been in effect for ten years or more without renegotiation, taxable rent may be established by procedures set forth in (g) of this subsection. All other leasehold interests are subject to the determination of taxable rent under the terms of (g) of this subsection.

(b) For purposes of determining leasehold excise tax on any lands on the Hanford reservation subleased to a private or public entity by the department of ecology, taxable rent includes only the annual cash rental payment made by such entity to the department of ecology as specifically referred to as rent in the sublease agreement between the parties and does not include any other fees, assessments, or charges imposed on or collected by such entity irrespective of whether the private or public entity pays or collects such other fees, assessments, or charges as specified in the sublease agreement.

(c) "Contract rent" means the amount of consideration due as payment for a leasehold interest, including: The total of cash payments made to the lessor or to another party for the benefit of the lessor according to the requirements of the lease or agreement, including any rents paid by a sublessee; expenditures for the protection of the lessor's interest when required by the terms of the lease or agreement; and expenditures for improvements to the property to the extent that such improvements become the property of the lessor. Where the consideration conveyed for the leasehold interest is made in combination with payment for concession or other rights granted by the lessor, only that portion of such payment which represents consideration for the leasehold interest is part of contract rent.

(d) "Contract rent" does not include: (i) Expenditures made by the lessee, which under the terms of the lease or agreement, are to be reimbursed by the lessor to the lessee or expenditures for improvements and protection made pursuant to a lease or an agreement which requires that the use of the improved property be open to the general public and that no profit will inure to the lessee from the lease; (ii) expenditures made by the lessee for the replacement or repair of facilities due to fire or other casualty including payments for insurance to provide reimbursement for losses or payments to a public or private entity for protection of such property from damage or loss or for alterations or additions made necessary by an action of government taken after the date of the execution of the lease or agreement; (iii) improvements added to publicly owned property by a sublessee under an agreement executed prior to January 1, 1976, which have been taxed as personal property of the sublessee prior to January 1, 1976, or improvements made by a sublessee of the same lessee under a similar agreement executed prior to January 1, 1976, and such improvements are taxable to the sublessee as personal property; (iv) improvements added to publicly owned property if such improvements are being taxed as personal property to any person.

(e) Any prepaid contract rent is considered to have been paid in the year due and not in the year actually paid with respect to prepayment for a period of more than one year. Expenditures for improvements with a useful life of more than one year which are included as part of contract rent must be treated as prepaid contract rent and prorated over the useful life of the improvement or the remaining term of the lease or agreement if the useful life is in excess of the remaining term of the lease or agreement. Rent prepaid prior to January 1, 1976, must be prorated from the date of prepayment.

(f) With respect to a "product lease," the value is that value determined at the time of sale under terms of the lease.

(g) If it is determined by the department of revenue, upon examination of a lessee's accounts or those of a lessor of publicly owned property, that a lessee is occupying or using publicly owned property in such a manner as to create a leasehold interest and that such leasehold interest has not been established through competitive bidding, or negotiated in accordance with statutory requirements regarding the rent payable, or negotiated under circumstances, established by public record, clearly showing that the contract rent was the maximum attainable by the lessor, the department may establish a taxable rent computation for use in determining the tax payable under authority granted in this chapter based upon the following criteria: (i) Consideration must be given to rental being paid to other lessors by lessees of similar property for similar purposes over similar periods of time; (ii) consideration must be given to what would be considered a fair rate of return on the market value of the property leased less reasonable deductions for any restrictions on use, special operating requirements or provisions for concurrent use by the lessor, another person or the general public.

(3) "Product lease" as used in this chapter means a lease of property for use in the production of agricultural or marine products((, not including the production of marijuana as defined in RCW 69.50.101,)) to the extent that such lease provides for the contract rent to be paid by the delivery of a stated percentage of the production of such agricultural or marine products to the credit of the lessor or the payment to the lessor of a stated percentage of the proceeds from the sale of such products.

(4) "Renegotiated" means a change in the lease agreement which changes the agreed time of possession, restrictions on use, the rate of the cash rental or of any other consideration payable by the lessee to or for the benefit of the lessor, other than any such change required by the terms of the lease or agreement. In addition "renegotiated" means a continuation of possession by the lessee beyond the date when, under the terms of the lease agreement, the lessee had the right to vacate the premises without any further liability to the lessor.

(5) "City" means any city or town.

(6) "Products" includes natural resource products such as cut or picked evergreen foliage, Cascara bark, wild edible mushrooms, native ornamental trees and shrubs, ore and minerals, natural gas, geothermal water and steam, and forage removed through the grazing of livestock.

(7) "Publicly owned, or specified privately owned, real or personal property" includes real or personal property:

(a) Owned in fee or held in trust by a public entity and exempt from property tax under the laws or Constitution of this state or the Constitution of the United States;

(b) Owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe in the state and exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.010;

(c) Owned by a nonprofit fair association exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.480(2), but only with respect to that portion of the fair's property subject to the tax imposed in this chapter pursuant to RCW 84.36.480(2)(b); or

(d) Owned by a community center exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.010.

Sec. 12. RCW 82.29A.020 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 2004 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context requires otherwise.

(1)(a) "Leasehold interest" means an interest in publicly owned, or specified privately owned, real or personal property which exists by virtue of any lease, permit, license, or any other agreement, written or verbal, between the owner of the property and a person who would not be exempt from property taxes if that person owned the property in fee, granting possession and use, to a degree less than fee simple ownership. However, no interest in personal property (excluding land or buildings) which is owned by the United States, whether or not as trustee, or by any foreign government may constitute a leasehold interest hereunder when the right to use such property is granted pursuant to a contract solely for the manufacture or production of articles for sale to the United States or any foreign government. The term "leasehold interest" includes the rights of use or occupancy by others of property which is owned in fee or held in trust by a public corporation, commission, or authority created under RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660 if the property is listed on or is within a district listed on any federal or state register of historical sites.

(b) The term "leasehold interest" does not include:

(i) Road or utility easements, rights of access, occupancy, or use granted solely for the purpose of removing materials or products purchased from an owner or the lessee of an owner, or rights of access, occupancy, or use granted solely for the purpose of natural energy resource exploration; or

(ii) The preferential use of publicly owned cargo cranes and docks and associated areas used in the loading and discharging of cargo located at a port district marine facility. "Preferential use" means that publicly owned real or personal property is used by a private party under a written agreement with the public owner, but the public owner or any third party maintains a right to use the property when not being used by the private party.

(2)(a) "Taxable rent" means contract rent as defined in (c) of this subsection in all cases where the lease or agreement has been established or renegotiated through competitive bidding, or negotiated or renegotiated in accordance with statutory requirements regarding the rent payable, or negotiated or renegotiated under circumstances, established by public record, clearly showing that the contract rent was the maximum attainable by the lessor. With respect to a leasehold interest in privately owned property, "taxable rent" means contract rent. However, after January 1, 1986, with respect to any lease which has been in effect for ten years or more without renegotiation, taxable rent may be established by procedures set forth in (g) of this subsection. All other leasehold interests are subject to the determination of taxable rent under the terms of (g) of this subsection.

(b) For purposes of determining leasehold excise tax on any lands on the Hanford reservation subleased to a private or public entity by the department of ecology, taxable rent includes only the annual cash rental payment made by such entity to the department of ecology as specifically referred to as rent in the sublease agreement between the parties and does not include any other fees, assessments, or charges imposed on or collected by such entity irrespective of whether the private or public entity pays or collects such other fees, assessments, or charges as specified in the sublease agreement.

(c) "Contract rent" means the amount of consideration due as payment for a leasehold interest, including: The total of cash payments made to the lessor or to another party for the benefit of the lessor according to the requirements of the lease or agreement, including any rents paid by a sublessee; expenditures for the protection of the lessor's interest when required by the terms of the lease or agreement; and expenditures for improvements to the property to the extent that such improvements become the property of the lessor. Where the consideration conveyed for the leasehold interest is made in combination with payment for concession or other rights granted by the lessor, only that portion of such payment which represents consideration for the leasehold interest is part of contract rent.

(d) "Contract rent" does not include: (i) Expenditures made by the lessee, which under the terms of the lease or agreement, are to be reimbursed by the lessor to the lessee or expenditures for improvements and protection made pursuant to a lease or an agreement which requires that the use of the improved property be open to the general public and that no profit will inure to the lessee from the lease; (ii) expenditures made by the lessee for the replacement or repair of facilities due to fire or other casualty including payments for insurance to provide reimbursement for losses or payments to a public or private entity for protection of such property from damage or loss or for alterations or additions made necessary by an action of government taken after the date of the execution of the lease or agreement; (iii) improvements added to publicly owned property by a sublessee under an agreement executed prior to January 1, 1976, which have been taxed as personal property of the sublessee prior to January 1, 1976, or improvements made by a sublessee of the same lessee under a similar agreement executed prior to January 1, 1976, and such improvements are taxable to the sublessee as personal property; (iv) improvements added to publicly owned property if such improvements are being taxed as personal property to any person.

(e) Any prepaid contract rent is considered to have been paid in the year due and not in the year actually paid with respect to prepayment for a period of more than one year. Expenditures for improvements with a useful life of more than one year which are included as part of contract rent must be treated as prepaid contract rent and prorated over the useful life of the improvement or the remaining term of the lease or agreement if the useful life is in excess of the remaining term of the lease or agreement. Rent prepaid prior to January 1, 1976, must be prorated from the date of prepayment.

(f) With respect to a "product lease," the value is that value determined at the time of sale under terms of the lease.

(g) If it is determined by the department of revenue, upon examination of a lessee's accounts or those of a lessor of publicly owned property, that a lessee is occupying or using publicly owned property in such a manner as to create a leasehold interest and that such leasehold interest has not been established through competitive bidding, or negotiated in accordance with statutory requirements regarding the rent payable, or negotiated under circumstances, established by public record, clearly showing that the contract rent was the maximum attainable by the lessor, the department may establish a taxable rent computation for use in determining the tax payable under authority granted in this chapter based upon the following criteria: (i) Consideration must be given to rental being paid to other lessors by lessees of similar property for similar purposes over similar periods of time; (ii) consideration must be given to what would be considered a fair rate of return on the market value of the property leased less reasonable deductions for any restrictions on use, special operating requirements or provisions for concurrent use by the lessor, another person or the general public.

(3) "Product lease" as used in this chapter means a lease of property for use in the production of agricultural or marine products((, not including the production of marijuana as defined in RCW 69.50.101,)) to the extent that such lease provides for the contract rent to be paid by the delivery of a stated percentage of the production of such agricultural or marine products to the credit of the lessor or the payment to the lessor of a stated percentage of the proceeds from the sale of such products.

(4) "Renegotiated" means a change in the lease agreement which changes the agreed time of possession, restrictions on use, the rate of the cash rental or of any other consideration payable by the lessee to or for the benefit of the lessor, other than any such change required by the terms of the lease or agreement. In addition "renegotiated" means a continuation of possession by the lessee beyond the date when, under the terms of the lease agreement, the lessee had the right to vacate the premises without any further liability to the lessor.

(5) "City" means any city or town.

(6) "Products" includes natural resource products such as cut or picked evergreen foliage, Cascara bark, wild edible mushrooms, native ornamental trees and shrubs, ore and minerals, natural gas, geothermal water and steam, and forage removed through the grazing of livestock.

(7) "Publicly owned, or specified privately owned, real or personal property" includes real or personal property:

(a) Owned in fee or held in trust by a public entity and exempt from property tax under the laws or Constitution of this state or the Constitution of the United States;

(b) Owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe in the state and exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.010;

(c) Owned by a nonprofit fair association exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.480(2), but only with respect to that portion of the fair's property subject to the tax imposed in this chapter pursuant to RCW 84.36.480(2)(b); or

(d) Owned by a community center exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.010.

Sec. 13. RCW 69.50.401 and 2015 c 265 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance.

(2) Any person who violates this section with respect to:

(a) A controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II which is a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, classified in Schedule IV, is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, or (i) fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars if the crime involved less than two kilograms of the drug, or both such imprisonment and fine; or (ii) if the crime involved two or more kilograms of the drug, then fined not more than one hundred thousand dollars for the first two kilograms and not more than fifty dollars for each gram in excess of two kilograms, or both such imprisonment and fine;

(b) Amphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, or methamphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, or (i) fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars if the crime involved less than two kilograms of the drug, or both such imprisonment and fine; or (ii) if the crime involved two or more kilograms of the drug, then fined not more than one hundred thousand dollars for the first two kilograms and not more than fifty dollars for each gram in excess of two kilograms, or both such imprisonment and fine. Three thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended. As collected, the first three thousand dollars of the fine must be deposited with the law enforcement agency having responsibility for cleanup of laboratories, sites, or substances used in the manufacture of the methamphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers. The fine moneys deposited with that law enforcement agency must be used for such clean-up cost;

(c) Any other controlled substance classified in Schedule I, II, or III, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW;

(d) A substance classified in Schedule IV, except flunitrazepam, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW; or

(e) A substance classified in Schedule V, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) ((The production, manufacture, processing, packaging, delivery, distribution, sale, or possession of marijuana in compliance with the terms set forth in RCW 69.50.360, 69.50.363, or 69.50.366 shall not constitute a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

(4))) The fines in this section apply to adult offenders only.

Sec. 14. RCW 69.50.4013 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to possess a controlled substance unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by this chapter.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 69.50.4014, any person who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3)(((a))) The possession((, by a person)) of marijuana in pill form is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law if the person in possession:

(a) Is twenty-one years of age or older((, of useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products in amounts that do not exceed those set forth in RCW 69.50.360(3) is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.));

(b) ((The possession of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products being physically transported or delivered within the state, in amounts not exceeding those that may be established under RCW 69.50.385(3), by a licensed employee of a common carrier when performing the duties authorized in accordance with RCW 69.50.382 and 69.50.385, is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

(4) No person under twenty-one years of age may possess, manufacture, sell, or distribute marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or marijuana concentrates, regardless of THC concentration. This does not include qualifying patients with a valid authorization.

(5) The possession by a qualifying patient or designated provider of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or plants in accordance with chapter 69.51A RCW is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law)) Has been advised by a physician about the risks and benefits of medical use of marijuana and that the person may benefit from the medical use of marijuana; and

(c) Has been provided by the physician with certification of that advice, along with a valid prescription.

Sec. 15. RCW 69.50.412 and 2013 c 3 s 22 and 2012 c 117 s 368 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to use drug paraphernalia to plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled substance. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) It is unlawful for any person to deliver, possess with intent to deliver, or manufacture with intent to deliver drug paraphernalia, knowing, or under circumstances where one reasonably should know, that it will be used to plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled substance. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(3) Any person eighteen years of age or over who violates subsection (2) of this section by delivering drug paraphernalia to a person under eighteen years of age who is at least three years his or her junior is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(4) It is unlawful for any person to place in any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or other publication any advertisement, knowing, or under circumstances where one reasonably should know, that the purpose of the advertisement, in whole or in part, is to promote the sale of objects designed or intended for use as drug paraphernalia. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(5) It is lawful for any person over the age of eighteen to possess sterile hypodermic syringes and needles for the purpose of reducing blood-borne diseases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 69.50.325 (Marijuana producer's license, marijuana processor's license, marijuana retailer's license) and 2016 c 170 s 1, 2015 c 70 s 5, 2014 c 192 s 2, & 2013 c 3 s 4;

(2) RCW 69.50.328 (Marijuana producers, processors—No direct or indirect financial interest in licensed marijuana retailers) and 2013 c 3 s 5;

(3) RCW 69.50.331 (Application for license) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 301, 2015 c 70 s 6, & 2013 c 3 s 6;

(4) RCW 69.50.334 (Denial of application—Opportunity for hearing) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 201 & 2013 c 3 s 7;

(5) RCW 69.50.339 (Transfer of license to produce, process, or sell marijuana—Reporting of proposed sales of outstanding or issued stock of a corporation) and 2013 c 3 s 8;

(6) RCW 69.50.342 (State liquor and cannabis board may adopt rules) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1601, 2015 c 70 s 7, & 2013 c 3 s 9;

(7) RCW 69.50.345 (State liquor and cannabis board—Rules—Procedures and criteria) and 2015 c 70 s 8 & 2013 c 3 s 10;

(8) RCW 69.50.348 (Representative samples of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products) and 2013 c 3 s 11;

(9) RCW 69.50.351 (Interest—Members and employees of state liquor control board) and 2013 c 3 s 12;

(10) RCW 69.50.354 (Retail outlet licenses) and 2015 c 70 s 9, 2014 c 192 s 3, & 2013 c 3 s 13;

(11) RCW 69.50.357 (Retail outlets—Rules) and 2016 c 171 s 1, 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 203, 2015 c 70 s 12, 2014 c 192 s 4, & 2013 c 3 s 14;

(12) RCW 69.50.360 (Marijuana retailers, employees of retail outlets—Certain acts not criminal or civil offenses) and 2015 c 207 s 6, 2015 c 70 s 13, 2014 c 192 s 5, & 2013 c 3 s 15;

(13) RCW 69.50.363 (Marijuana processors, employees—Certain acts not criminal or civil offenses) and 2015 c 207 s 7 & 2013 c 3 s 16;

(14) RCW 69.50.366 (Marijuana producers, employees—Certain acts not criminal or civil offenses) and 2015 c 207 s 8 & 2013 c 3 s 17;

(15) RCW 69.50.369 (Marijuana producers, processors, researchers, retailers—Advertisements—Penalty) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 204 & 2013 c 3 s 18;

(16) RCW 69.50.372 (Marijuana research license) and 2016 sp.s. c 9 s 1, 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1501, & 2015 c 71 s 1;

(17) RCW 69.50.375 (Marijuana retailers—Medical marijuana endorsement) and 2015 c 70 s 10;

(18) RCW 69.50.378 (Marijuana retailer holding medical marijuana endorsement—THC concentration in products) and 2015 c 70 s 11;

(19) RCW 69.50.380 (Marijuana producers, processors, retailers prohibited from making certain sales of marijuana, marijuana products) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 211;

(20) RCW 69.50.382 (Common carriers—Transportation or delivery of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products—Employees prohibited from carrying or using firearm during such services—Exceptions—Use of state ferry routes) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 501;

(21) RCW 69.50.385 (Common carriers—Licensing—State liquor and cannabis board to adopt rules) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 502;

(22) RCW 69.50.390 (Licensed retailers prohibited from operating vending machines, drive-through purchase facilities for the sale of marijuana products) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1301;

(23) RCW 69.50.445 (Opening package of or consuming marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or marijuana concentrates in view of general public or public place—Penalty) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 401 & 2013 c 3 s 21;

(24) RCW 69.50.450 (Butane or other explosive gases) and 2015 c 70 s 15;

(25) RCW 69.50.465 (Conducting or maintaining marijuana club—Penalty) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1401;

(26) RCW 69.50.515 (Pharmacies—Marijuana—Notification and disposal) and 2013 c 133 s 1;

(27) RCW 69.50.530 (Dedicated marijuana account) and 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 942, 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1101, & 2013 c 3 s 26;

(28) RCW 69.50.535 (Marijuana excise tax—State liquor and cannabis board to review tax level—Reports—State and federal antitrust laws) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 205, 2014 c 192 s 7, & 2013 c 3 s 27;

(29) RCW 69.50.540 (Dedicated marijuana account—Appropriations) and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 967, 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 206, & 2013 c 3 s 28;

(30) RCW 69.50.545 (Departments of social and health services, health—Adoption of rules for disbursement of marijuana excise taxes) and 2013 c 3 s 29;

(31) RCW 69.50.550 (Cost-benefit evaluations) and 2013 c 3 s 30;

(32) RCW 69.50.555 (Taxes, fees, assessments, charges—Commercial activities covered by marijuana agreement between state and tribe) and 2015 c 207 s 3;

(33) RCW 69.50.560 (Controlled purchase programs—Persons under age twenty-one—Violation—Criminal penalty—Exceptions) and 2015 c 70 s 33;

(34) RCW 69.50.565 (Unpaid trust fund taxes—Limited liability business entities—Liability of responsible individuals—Administrative hearing) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 202;

(35) RCW 69.50.570 (Bundled transactions—Retail sales—Subject to tax—Exception) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 210;

(36) RCW 69.50.575 (Cannabis health and beauty aids) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 701;

(37) RCW 69.50.580 (Applicants for marijuana producer's, processor's, researcher's, or retailer's licenses—Signage—Public notice requirements) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 801;

(38) RCW 69.50.585 (Branded promotional items—Nominal value—Personal services) and 2016 sp.s. c 17 s 1;

(39) RCW 69.51A.005 (Purpose and intent) and 2015 c 70 s 16, 2011 c 181 s 102, 2010 c 284 s 1, 2007 c 371 s 2, & 1999 c 2 s 2;

(40) RCW 69.51A.010 (Definitions) and 2015 c 70 s 17, 2010 c 284 s 2, 2007 c 371 s 3, & 1999 c 2 s 6;

(41) RCW 69.51A.030 (Acts not constituting crimes or unprofessional conduct—Health care professionals not subject to penalties or liabilities) and 2015 c 70 s 18, 2011 c 181 s 301, 2010 c 284 s 3, 2007 c 371 s 4, & 1999 c 2 s 4;

(42) RCW 69.51A.040 (Compliance with chapter—Qualifying patients and designated providers not subject to penalties—Law enforcement not subject to liability) and 2015 c 70 s 24, 2011 c 181 s 401, 2007 c 371 s 5, & 1999 c 2 s 5;

(43) RCW 69.51A.043 (Failure to enter into the medical marijuana authorization database—Affirmative defense) and 2015 c 70 s 25 & 2011 c 181 s 402;

(44) RCW 69.51A.045 (Possession of plants, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products exceeding lawful amount—Affirmative defense) and 2015 c 70 s 29 & 2011 c 181 s 405;

(45) RCW 69.51A.050 (Medical marijuana, lawful possession—State not liable) and 1999 c 2 s 7;

(46) RCW 69.51A.055 (Limitations of chapter—Persons under supervision) and 2015 c 70 s 30 & 2011 c 181 s 1105;

(47) RCW 69.51A.060 (Crimes—Limitations of chapter) and 2015 c 70 s 31, 2011 c 181 s 501, 2010 c 284 s 4, 2007 c 371 s 6, & 1999 c 2 s 8;

(48) RCW 69.51A.100 (Qualifying patient's designation of a specific designated provider—Provider's service as designated provider—Termination—Department may adopt rules) and 2015 c 70 s 34 & 2011 c 181 s 404;

(49) RCW 69.51A.110 (Suitability for organ transplant) and 2011 c 181 s 408;

(50) RCW 69.51A.120 (Parental rights or residential time—Not to be restricted) and 2011 c 181 s 409;

(51) RCW 69.51A.130 (State and municipalities—Not subject to liability) and 2011 c 181 s 1101;

(52) RCW 69.51A.210 (Qualifying patients or designated providers—Authorization—Health care professional may include recommendations on amount of marijuana) and 2015 c 70 s 19;

(53) RCW 69.51A.220 (Health care professionals may authorize medical use of marijuana—Qualifying patients under age eighteen) and 2015 c 70 s 20;

(54) RCW 69.51A.230 (Medical marijuana authorization database—Recognition cards) and 2015 c 70 s 21;

(55) RCW 69.51A.240 (Unlawful actions—Criminal penalty) and 2015 c 70 s 23;

(56) RCW 69.51A.250 (Cooperatives—Qualifying patients or designated providers may form—Requirements—Restrictions on locations—State liquor and cannabis board may adopt rules) and 2016 c 170 s 2, 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1001, & 2015 c 70 s 26;

(57) RCW 69.51A.260 (Housing unit—No more than fifteen plants may be grown or located—Exception—Civil penalties) and 2015 c 70 s 27;

(58) RCW 69.51A.270 (Extracting or separating marijuana resin, producing or processing any form of marijuana concentrates or marijuana-infused products—State liquor and cannabis board to adopt rules) and 2015 c 70 s 28;

(59) RCW 69.51A.280 (Topical, ingestible products—THC concentration) and 2015 c 70 s 35;

(60) RCW 69.51A.290 (Medical marijuana consultant certificate) and 2015 c 70 s 37;

(61) RCW 69.51A.300 (Continuing education programs for health care providers) and 2015 c 70 s 38;

(62) RCW 69.51A.900 (Short title—1999 c 2) and 2011 c 181 s 1106 & 1999 c 2 s 1;

(63) RCW 15.120.010 (Definitions) and 2016 sp.s. c 11 s 2;

(64) RCW 42.56.620 (Marijuana research licensee reports) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1504 & 2015 c 71 s 4;

(65) RCW 42.56.625 (Medical marijuana authorization database) and 2015 c 70 s 22;

(66) RCW 42.56.630 (Registration information of members of cooperatives to produce and process medical marijuana) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1002;

(67) RCW 43.06.490 (Marijuana agreements—Federally recognized Indian tribes—Tribal marijuana tax—Tax exemption) and 2015 c 207 s 2;

(68) RCW 82.04.756 (Exemptions—Marijuana cooperatives) and 2015 c 70 s 40;

(69) RCW 82.08.9997 (Exemptions—Retail sale of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products covered by marijuana agreement between state and tribe) and 2015 c 207 s 4;

(70) RCW 82.08.9998 (Exemptions—Marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products beneficial for medical use—Products containing THC) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 207;

(71) RCW 82.12.9997 (Exemptions—Marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products covered by marijuana agreement between state and tribe) and 2015 c 207 s 5;

(72) RCW 82.12.9998 (Exemptions—Marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products beneficial for medical use—Products containing THC) and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 208;

(73) RCW 84.34.410 (Application—Marijuana land uses) and 2014 c 140 s 27;

(74) 2016 c 199 s 1;

(75) 2014 c 140 s 1;

(76) 2014 c 140 s 2;

(77) 2014 c 140 s 8;

(78) 2014 c 140 s 10;

(79) 2014 c 140 s 15;

(80) 2014 c 140 s 16;

(81) 2014 c 140 s 17;

(82) 2014 c 140 s 18;

(83) 2014 c 140 s 19;

(84) 2014 c 140 s 20;

(85) 2014 c 140 s 21;

(86) 2014 c 140 s 22;

(87) 2014 c 140 s 23;

(88) 2014 c 140 s 24;

(89) 2014 c 140 s 25;

(90) 2014 c 140 s 29;

(91) 2014 c 140 s 30;

(92) 2014 c 140 s 31;

(93) 2014 c 140 s 32;

(94) 2014 c 140 s 33;

(95) 2014 c 140 s 34;

(96) 2014 c 140 s 35;

(97) 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1502;

(98) 2015 c 71 s 2;

(99) 2014 c 192 s 6;

(100) 2016 c 178 s 1;

(101) 2016 sp.s. c 9 s 3;

(102) 2015 c 70 s 3;

(103) 2015 c 70 s 39;

(104) 2013 c 3 s 2;

(105) 2013 c 3 s 22;

(106) 2013 c 3 s 23;

(107) 2013 c 3 s 24;

(108) 2013 c 3 s 25;

(109) 2013 c 3 s 1 (uncodified);

(110) 2014 c 140 s 40 (uncodified);

(111) 2014 c 140 s 41 (uncodified); and

(112) 2014 c 140 s 42 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. Section 10 of this act expires January 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. Section 11 of this act expires January 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. Section 11 of this act takes effect January 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. Section 12 of this act takes effect January 1, 2022.

--- END ---