BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The office of crime victims advocacy shall develop best practices that local communities may use on a voluntary basis to create more access to sexual assault nurse examiners, including, but not limited to, partnerships to serve multiple facilities, mobile sexual assault nurse examiner teams, and multidisciplinary teams to serve sexual assault survivors in local communities.

(a) When developing the best practices, the office of crime victims advocacy shall consult with:

(i) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(ii) The Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(iii) The Washington coalition of sexual assault programs;

(iv) The Harborview center for sexual assault and traumatic stress;

(v) The Washington state hospital association;

(vi) The Washington state association of counties;

(vii) The association of Washington cities; and

(viii) Other organizations deemed appropriate by the office of crime victims advocacy.

(b) The office of crime victims advocacy shall complete the best practices no later than January 1, 2019, and publish them on its web site.

(2) The office of crime victims advocacy shall develop strategies to make sexual assault nurse examiner training available to nurses in all regions of the state without requiring the nurses to travel unreasonable distances or incur unreasonable expenses.

(a) When developing the strategies, the office of crime victims advocacy shall consult with:

(i) The Harborview center for sexual assault and traumatic stress;

(ii) The department of health;

(iii) The nursing care quality assurance commission;

(iv) The Washington state nurses association;

(v) The Washington state hospital association; and

(vi) Other organizations deemed appropriate by the office of crime victims advocacy.

(b) The office of crime victims advocacy shall report the strategies to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than January 1, 2019.

--- END ---