BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.52.320 and 1994 c 154 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative ethics board shall enforce this chapter and rules adopted under it with respect to members and employees of the legislature.

(2) The legislative ethics board shall:

(a) Develop educational materials and training with regard to legislative ethics for legislators and legislative employees;

(b) Issue written advisory opinions upon the written request of any person or upon its own motion;

(c) Adopt rules or policies governing the conduct of business by the board, and adopt rules defining working hours for purposes of RCW 42.52.180 and where otherwise authorized under chapter 154, Laws of 1994;

(d) Investigate, hear, and determine complaints by any person or on its own motion;

(e) Impose sanctions including reprimands and monetary penalties;

(f) Recommend suspension or removal to the appropriate legislative entity, or recommend prosecution to the appropriate authority; and

(g) Establish criteria regarding the levels of civil penalties appropriate for different types of violations of this chapter and rules adopted under it.

(3) The board may:

(a) Issue subpoenas for the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence relating to any matter under examination by the board or involved in any hearing;

(b) Administer oaths and affirmations;

(c) Examine witnesses; and

(d) Receive evidence.

(4) Subject to RCW 42.52.540, the board has jurisdiction over any alleged violation that occurred before January 1, 1995, and that was within the jurisdiction of any of the boards established under chapter 44.60 RCW. The board's jurisdiction with respect to any such alleged violation shall be based on the statutes and rules in effect at (([the])) the time of the violation.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.52.360 and 2013 c 190 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The executive ethics board shall enforce this chapter and rules adopted under it with respect to statewide elected officers and all other officers and employees in the executive branch, boards and commissions, and institutions of higher education.

(2) The executive ethics board shall enforce this chapter with regard to the activities of university research employees as provided in this subsection.

(a) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.030, 42.52.110, 42.52.130, 42.52.140, and 42.52.150, the administrative process shall be consistent with and adhere to no less than the current standards in regulations of the United States public health service and the office of the secretary of the department of health and human services in Title 42 C.F.R. Part 50, Subpart F relating to promotion of objectivity in research.

(b) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.040, 42.52.080, and 42.52.120, the administrative process shall include a comprehensive system for the disclosure, review, and approval of outside work activities by university research employees while assuring that such employees are fulfilling their employment obligations to the university.

(c) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.160, the administrative process shall include a reasonable determination by the university of acceptable private uses having de minimis costs to the university and a method for establishing fair and reasonable reimbursement charges for private uses the costs of which are in excess of de minimis.

(3) The executive ethics board shall:

(a) Develop educational materials and training;

(b) Adopt rules and policies governing the conduct of business by the board, and adopt rules defining working hours for purposes of RCW 42.52.180 and where otherwise authorized under chapter 154, Laws of 1994;

(c) Issue written advisory opinions upon the written request of any person or upon its own motion;

(d) Investigate, hear, and determine complaints by any person or on its own motion;

(e) Impose sanctions including reprimands and monetary penalties;

(f) Recommend to the appropriate authorities suspension, removal from position, prosecution, or other appropriate remedy; and

(g) Establish criteria regarding the levels of civil penalties appropriate for violations of this chapter and rules adopted under it.

(4) The board may:

(a) Issue subpoenas for the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence relating to any matter under examination by the board or involved in any hearing;

(b) Administer oaths and affirmations;

(c) Examine witnesses; and

(d) Receive evidence.

(5) The board shall not delegate to the board's executive director its authority to issue advisories, advisory letters, or opinions.

(6) Except as provided in RCW 42.52.220, the executive ethics board may review and approve agency policies as provided for in this chapter.

(7) This section does not apply to state officers and state employees of the judicial branch.

--- END ---