BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds as follows:

(1) Quality ambulance services are essential to ensuring quality of life for Washingtonians.

(2) A recent Washington state health care authority study found that current medicaid reimbursement is between sixteen and twenty-eight percent of what other payers reimburse for equivalent services and is substantially below the level needed to cover the costs of service. The previous study resulting in a fee increase specifically for ambulance services occurred in 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

Medicaid payment for ambulance services furnished by state licensed ambulance services, must be at a rate not less than one hundred percent of the payment rate that applies to those services and providers under medicare.

--- END ---