BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)(a) The legislative advisory committee on aging is established, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) The president of the senate must appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives must appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(iii) The department of social and health services and the health care authority shall cooperate with the committee and maintain liaison representatives, who are nonvoting members.

(b) The committee must choose its cochairs from among its legislative membership. The members representing the majority caucus of the senate must convene the initial meeting of the committee.

(c) The committee, where appropriate, may consult with individuals from the public and private sector or ask the individuals to establish an advisory committee. Members of such an advisory committee are not entitled to expense reimbursement.

(2) The committee may review issues of importance to the state's aging community. These may include housing issues, long-term care issues, health and wellness issues, transportation issues, financial issues, and other issues determined by the committee.

(3) Staff support for the committee must be provided by the senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research.

(4) Legislative members of the committee are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(5) The expenses of the committee must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Committee expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(6) This section expires July 1, 2019.

--- END ---