BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.50 RCW to read as follows:

Prior to changing a system of providing sick, vacation, compensatory, or other forms of leave offered to employees, a local government employer participating in a retirement plan administered by the department shall:

(1) Submit a detailed summary of the proposed changes to the system of leave to the department, including any information related to the proposal requested by the department; and

(2) Prior to implementing the change to the leave policy, receive a formal analysis from the department of any impacts from the leave policy change on retirement benefit calculations, and the department shall provide that analysis to employees.

--- END ---