BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the city of Mercer Island has unique access issues that require the use of Interstate 90 to leave Mercer Island, and that this access may be impeded by the I-90/Two-Way Transit and HOV Improvements project. One of the most heavily traveled on-ramps from Mercer Island to the westbound Interstate 90 general purpose lanes is from Island Crest Way, and the legislature further finds that the access provided to Mercer Island by this on-ramp must be preserved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) To maintain the access provided by the westbound on-ramp from Island Crest Way to the current westbound Interstate 90 general purpose lanes, the department must work with the city of Mercer Island and other appropriate parties to allow the portions of the planned westbound high occupancy vehicle lane on Interstate 90 between Island Crest Way and West Mercer Way to be accessed by all vehicles using the westbound on-ramp from Island Crest Way, thus grandfathering-in the current use of the on-ramp for both high occupancy vehicles as well as other vehicles seeking to access the general purpose lanes of Interstate 90.

(2) The department must work with the city of Mercer Island to address the potential access solution identified in subsection (1) of this section, or any other reasonable access solution, and may not close or restrict, in any way, the westbound on-ramp from Island Crest Way to the current westbound Interstate 90 general purpose lanes until a mutually acceptable agreement between the department and the city of Mercer Island regarding the continued operation of this on-ramp has been reached.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The secretary of transportation must provide written notice that the agreement required under section 2(2) of this act has taken effect to the affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---