BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that a skilled technical masonry trade workforce is necessary for maintaining, preserving, and improving Washington's built environment and masonry manufacturing industry. The masonry trades are showing signs of a workforce that is insufficiently skilled to meet workforce demands at its highest level and showing a high level of retirements in the coming years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of this section:

(a) "Masonry trades" means individuals who install or repair brick, stone, concrete masonry units, tile, terrazzo, marble, or any facet therein.

(b) "Cross-training" means training in multiple masonry trades, including scopes of work, as currently identified in the standards for apprenticeship, and prevailing wage, so that masonry craft workers will be proficient and trained in all masonry trades as it pertains to the installation of masonry products.

(2) The Washington state apprenticeship council shall adopt rules and standards that provide for cross-training among the masonry trades, incorporating the latest technology and teaching methods. The adopted rules and standards for the masonry trades may consider applicable national and international standards.

(3) As part of its rule making, the council shall evaluate and incorporate, where appropriate, the existing apprenticeship and training standards for the masonry trades so that all masonry craft workers will be cross-trained with all the skills in one program needed to install brick, stone, concrete masonry units, tile, terrazzo, marble and refractory and pointers cleaners and caulkers of masonry products; and deliver its findings to the department of labor and industries and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 31, 2018.

--- END ---