BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the legislature to examine current and future needs of a state entity that performs an essential public function on state-owned property located in one of the state's designated manufacturing industrial centers. The legislature further intends to explore the potential future uses of this state-owned property in the event that the state entity determines that it must relocate in order to protect its ability to perform its essential public function. In order to protect the state's and public's interests in any future development considerations for this site, a limited purpose state public development advisory committee is created to make recommendations regarding the highest public benefit and future economic development uses for the Washington army national guard armory facility in the city of Seattle, commonly known as the pier 91 property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A limited-purpose state public development advisory committee, hereafter known as the Interbay committee, is created to make recommendations regarding the highest public benefit and future economic development uses for the Washington army national guard armory facility in the city of Seattle, pier 91 property, located at the descriptions referred to in the quit claim deeds for two parcels of land, 24.75 acres total, dated January 8, 1971, and December 22, 2009.

(2) The Interbay committee shall be governed by a board of seven persons appointed as follows:

(a) One person appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(b) One person appointed by the majority leader of the senate; and

(c) Five persons appointed by the governor, who must collectively have experience in determining needs for the Washington military department; forming public-private partnerships to develop workforce housing or affordable housing; knowledge of project financing options for public-private partnerships related to housing; architectural design and development experience related to industrial lands and mixed-use zoning to include housing; and experience leading public processes to engage communities and other stakeholders in public discussions regarding economic development decisions.

(3) The Interbay committee must:

(a) Work in partnership with the military department to determine the needs of the military department if it is relocated from the land described in subsection (1) of this section, including identifying:

(i) Current uses;

(ii) Future needs of the units currently at this location;

(iii) Potential suitable publicly owned sites in Washington for relocation of current units; and

(iv) The costs associated with acquisition, construction, and relocation to another site or sites for these units;

(b) Explore the future economic development opportunities if the land described in subsection (1) of this section is vacated by the military department, and make recommendations, including identifying:

(i) Suitable and unsuitable future uses for the land;

(ii) Environmental issues and associated costs;

(iii) Current public infrastructure availability, future public infrastructure plans by local or regional entities, and potential public infrastructure needs;

(iv) Transportation corridors in the immediate area and any potential right-of-way needs; and

(v) Existing zoning regulations for the land and potential future zoning needs to evaluate workforce housing, affordable housing, and other commercial and industrial development compatible with the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center designation;

(c) Explore the potential funding sources and partners as well as any needed transactions, and make recommendations, including:

(i) Any potential private partners or investors;

(ii) Necessary real estate transactions;

(iii) Federal funding opportunities; and

(iv) State and local funding sources, including any tax-related programs;

(d) Conduct at least three public meetings at a location within the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center, where a quorum of the Interbay committee members are present, at which members of the public are invited to present to the Interbay committee regarding the future uses of the site and potential issues such as industrial land use, commercial development, residential zoning, and public infrastructure needs; and

(e) Provide a report to the legislature and office of the governor with recommendations for each area described in subsection (3) of this section by December 31, 2019. The Interbay committee's recommendations must include recommendations regarding the structure, composition, and scope of authority of any subsequent state public development authority that may be established to implement the recommendations of the Interbay committee created in this section.

(4) The Interbay committee created in this section dissolves July 1, 2020.

(5) Nothing in this section shall authorize the solicitation of interest or bids for work related to the purposes of this section.

(6) The department of commerce shall provide staff support to the Interbay committee. The department may contract with outside consultants to provide any needed expertise.

(7) The members of the board created in subsection (2) of this section must be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Nothing in this act shall be construed to interfere with any existing statutory authority of the Washington military department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act expires July 1, 2020.

--- END ---