BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2013 3rd sp.s. c 2 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that the people of Washington have benefited enormously from the presence of the aerospace industry in Washington state. The legislature further finds that the industry continues to provide good wages and benefits for the thousands of engineers, mechanics, and support staff working directly in the industry throughout the state. The legislature further finds that suppliers and vendors that support the aerospace industry in turn provide a range of well-paying jobs. In 2003, and again in 2006, and 2007, the legislature determined it was in the public interest to encourage the continued presence of the aerospace industry through the provision of tax incentives. Certain tax incentives provided to the aerospace industry, however, have not fully lived up to the legislature's intent, as evidenced by the loss of twelve thousand two hundred fifty-nine jobs at Washington's largest aerospace employer since the tax incentives were last extended while other states have experienced net gains in their employment. To this end, and in recognition of the continuing extreme importance of the aerospace industry in Washington, it is the legislature's intent to reaffirm and build upon prior aerospace tax incentive legislation in a fiscally prudent manner.

(2) The legislature categorizes the tax preferences extended in this act as intended to create or retain jobs in Washington, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(c).

(3) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to maintain and grow Washington's aerospace industry workforce. To help achieve this public policy objective, it is the legislature's intent to conditionally extend aerospace industry tax preferences until July 1, 2040, in recognition of intent by the state's aerospace industry sector to maintain and grow its workforce within the state. It is also the legislature's specific public policy objective to provide tangible taxpayer accountability for Washington's largest aerospace company by adopting a minimum employment baseline that must be met by the company to fully qualify for aerospace tax incentives, similar to aerospace job standards created in other states such as Alabama, South Carolina, and Missouri, to ensure taxpayer dollars are used to create jobs here in Washington. If it is determined that the legislature's intent is not being met, this aerospace incentive should be reinvested to encourage job growth at small businesses in Washington and to fulfill the state's paramount duty.

(4) The joint legislative audit and review committee must review the tax preferences provided in this act and report to the legislature by December 1, 2019, and every five years thereafter. As part of its tax preference reviews, the committee must specifically assess changes in aerospace industry employment in Washington in comparison with other states and internationally. To the extent practicable, the committee must use occupational data statistics provided by the bureau of labor statistics and state agencies responsible for administering unemployment insurance to perform this assessment.

(5) If the department of revenue, in consultation with the employment security department, determines that aerospace industry job losses that have occurred at Washington's largest aerospace company are due to industry-wide cyclical downturns as outlined in RCW 82.04.260(11)(f)(ii)(C), rather than outsourcing to other states or internationally at the expense of jobs in Washington, then the legislature intends that the tax preferences in this act remain in place for the remainder of their term.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.260 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 602 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 205 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:

(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;

(b) Beginning July 1, 2025, seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;

(c)(i) ((Beginning July 1, 2025)) Except as provided otherwise in (c)(iii) of this subsection, from July 1, 2025, until January 1, 2036, dairy products; or selling dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products" means:

(A) Products, not including any marijuana-infused product, that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and

(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by weight or volume.

(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy product;

(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2025, fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products;

(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and

(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.

(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.

If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.

(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent thereafter.

(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:

(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and

(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.

(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(e)(i) Except as provided in (e)(ii) and (f) of this subsection (11), this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.

(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited outside the state of Washington. This subsection (11)(e)(ii) only applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850.

(f)(i) Beginning with the taxes due and payable in the first calendar year subsequent to the effective date of this section, and adjusted for taxes due and payable each calendar year thereafter, the preferential tax rate under (a) and (b) of this subsection must be reduced as provided in (f)(ii) of this subsection, if the employment level of a significant aerospace firm is below the employment baseline, except as provided otherwise in (f)(ii)(C) of this subsection.

(ii)(A) If a significant aerospace firm has an employment level that is below the employment baseline, except as provided otherwise in (f)(ii)(B) and (C) of this subsection, the following rates apply:

(I) A rate of 0.3807 percent for the manufacturing of commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and

(II) A rate of 0.3807 percent of making sales at retail of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes.

(B) If a significant aerospace firm has an employment level that is two thousand five hundred or more employment positions below the employment baseline, (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply.

(C) A tax rate adjustment under (f)(ii)(A) or (B) of this subsection does not apply, and the tax rate for the current calendar year continues to apply, if the number of direct employees in the aerospace industry nationally declines by at least five percent for three or more consecutive months as determined by the state economic and revenue forecast council, or successor entity.

(iii) The tax rate adjustment under this subsection (11)(f) only applies to a significant aerospace firm claiming the preferential rate under this subsection (11).

(iv) The department must make a determination of any required tax rate adjustment under this subsection (11)(f) by January 1st of the calendar year in which the rate of adjustment is required.

(v) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(A) "Employment baseline" means seventy thousand employment positions.

(B) "Employment level" means the average number of employment positions reported to the state employment security department for the months of January through September.

(C) "Employment position" means a job in which the employee has worked for a significant aerospace firm at an average rate of at least thirty-five hours per week.

(D) "Significant aerospace firm" means a manufacturer that has made a final decision to site a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850.

(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i) Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.

(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after severance.

(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:

(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.

(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue; kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard, liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of printed materials.

(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.

(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035.

(v) "Timber products" means:

(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;

(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered paper or paper products; and

(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of biocomposite surface products.

(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood windows; and biocomposite surface products.

(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12) must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.

(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.35 percent until July 1, 2024, and 0.484 percent thereafter.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.04.4461 and 2013 3rd sp.s. c 2 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is allowed for each person for qualified aerospace product development. For a person who is a manufacturer or processor for hire of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, credit may be earned for expenditures occurring after December 1, 2003. For all other persons, credit may be earned only for expenditures occurring after June 30, 2008.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection, "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.

(b) Before July 1, 2005, any credits earned under this section must be accrued and carried forward and may not be used until July 1, 2005. These carryover credits may be used at any time thereafter, and may be carried over until used. Refunds may not be granted in the place of a credit.

(2) The credit is equal to the amount of qualified aerospace product development expenditures of a person, multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent and is further multiplied by fifty percent if the credit is claimed by a significant aerospace firm that has an increased rate under RCW 82.04.260(11)(f)(ii)(A). No credit is allowed for a significant aerospace firm that has an increased rate under RCW 82.04.260(11)(f)(ii)(B).

(3) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section the credit must be claimed against taxes due for the same calendar year in which the qualified aerospace product development expenditures are incurred. Credit earned on or after July 1, 2005, may not be carried over. The credit for each calendar year may not exceed the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year. Refunds may not be granted in the place of a credit.

(4) Any person claiming the credit must file a form prescribed by the department that must include the amount of the credit claimed, an estimate of the anticipated aerospace product development expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, an estimate of the taxable amount during the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, and such additional information as the department may prescribe.

(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Aerospace product" has the meaning given in RCW 82.08.975.

(b) "Aerospace product development" means research, design, and engineering activities performed in relation to the development of an aerospace product or of a product line, model, or model derivative of an aerospace product, including prototype development, testing, and certification. The term includes the discovery of technological information, the translating of technological information into new or improved products, processes, techniques, formulas, or inventions, and the adaptation of existing products and models into new products or new models, or derivatives of products or models. The term does not include manufacturing activities or other production-oriented activities, however the term does include tool design and engineering design for the manufacturing process. The term does not include surveys and studies, social science and humanities research, market research or testing, quality control, sale promotion and service, computer software developed for internal use, and research in areas such as improved style, taste, and seasonal design.

(c) "Qualified aerospace product development" means aerospace product development performed within this state.

(d) "Qualified aerospace product development expenditures" means operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a partner in a partnership as determined by the department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly incurred in qualified aerospace product development by a person claiming the credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts paid to a person or to the state and any of its departments and institutions, other than a public educational or research institution to conduct qualified aerospace product development. The term does not include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land, structures, or depreciable property.

(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's tax returns during the year in which the credit is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under RCW 82.04.440.

(6) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person claiming the credit under this section must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(7) Credit may not be claimed for expenditures for which a credit is claimed under RCW 82.04.4452.

(8) This section expires July 1, 2040.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.32.534 and 2016 c 175 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax preference that requires a report under this section must file a complete annual report with the department. The report is due by May 31st of the year following any calendar year in which a person becomes eligible to claim the tax preference that requires a report under this section. The department may extend the due date for timely filing of annual reports under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.

(b) The report must include information detailing employment, wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits for employment positions in Washington for the year that the tax preference was claimed. ((However, persons engaged in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes may report employment, wage, and benefit information per job at the manufacturing site for the year that the tax preference was claimed.)) The report ((must)) may not include names of employees. The report must also detail employment by the total number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions for the year that the tax preference was claimed.

(c) Persons receiving the benefit of the tax preference provided by RCW 82.16.0421 or claiming any of the tax preferences provided by RCW 82.04.2909, 82.04.4481, 82.08.805, 82.12.805, or 82.12.022(5) must indicate on the annual report the quantity of product produced in this state during the time period covered by the report.

(d) If a person filing a report under this section did not file a report with the department in the previous calendar year, the report filed under this section must also include employment, wage, and benefit information for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year for which a tax preference was claimed.

(2) As part of the annual report, the department may request additional information necessary to measure the results of, or determine eligibility for, the tax preference.

(3) Other than information requested under subsection (2) of this section, the information contained in an annual report filed under this section is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.

(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a tax preference that requires an annual report under this section but fails to submit a complete report by the due date or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the department must declare:

(i) Thirty-five percent of the amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable; and

(ii) An additional fifteen percent of the amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable if the person has previously been assessed under this subsection (4) for failure to submit a report under this section for the same tax preference.

(b) The department may not assess interest or penalties on amounts due under this subsection.

(5) The department must use the information from this section to prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must report these statistics to the legislature each year by December 31st.

(6) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also includes the state and its departments and institutions.

(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and includes only the tax preferences requiring a survey under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By the last workday of the third calendar quarter, the state treasurer must transfer the amount specified in subsection (3) of this section from the general fund to the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230. The first transfer under this subsection (1), if applicable, must occur by September 30, 2018.

(2) By the last workday of the third calendar quarter, the state treasurer must transfer the amount specified in subsection (3) of this section from the general fund to the small business tax credit account created in section 6 of this act. The first transfer under this subsection (2), if applicable, must occur by September 30, 2018.

(3) If the department determines that the rate adjustment provisions in RCW 82.04.260(11)(f) are triggered, the department must estimate the increase in state general fund revenue collections for the prior fiscal year based on the rate adjustments. The department must notify the state treasurer of this amount at least twenty days prior to the September transfers under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. This amount will be equally distributed between the education legacy trust account and the small business tax credit account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

The small business tax credit account is created in the state treasury. All receipts received pursuant to section 5(2) of this act must be deposited into this account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for small business tax credits authorized by section 8 of this act. Any amounts remaining at the end of a biennium must revert to the education legacy trust account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preference contained in section 8, chapter . . ., Laws of 2017 (section 8 of this act). This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or to be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(2) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to induce certain designated taxpayers under RCW 82.32.808(2) (c) and (e).

(3) The legislature's public policy objective is to encourage job growth by providing tax relief to small businesses in Washington.

(4) The measure of the effectiveness of the tax preference of the following must be reviewed: The number of firms utilizing the credit, the value of the credits awarded, and the growth of full-time employees employed by small businesses. If the review finds that more than twenty small businesses participate and the growth of employees by all participating small businesses exceeds one thousand, then the public policy objective is being met.

(5) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in subsection (4) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may refer to approved applications on file at the department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the limits of this section, a credit against the tax owed under this chapter may be taken by a small business pursuant to this section.

(2) The credit amount is one thousand dollars multiplied by the net number of additional employees at the small business in the calendar year for which the credit is claimed as compared to the immediately preceding calendar year. This credit amount is per person per calendar year and subject to an annual statewide maximum as set by the department under subsection (3) of this section.

(3) By December 1st of each year, the department must notify taxpayers if there are funds available for tax credits based on the transfers in section 6 of this act. The amount available in the small business tax credit account on November 1st of each calendar year shall be the statewide maximum credit amount allowed for the subsequent calendar year.

(4) The credit is available on a first in-time basis up to the annual statewide maximum. Once the statewide maximum amount is reached, the department shall notify taxpayers that the credit is no longer available for that year. The department must disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the total amount of the credits claimed under this section in any calendar year to exceed the statewide maximum as set in subsection (3) of this section.

(5) A tax credit claimed under this section may not be carried over to another year.

(6) The credit is nonrefundable.

(7) To claim a credit under this section, a person must electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any other information required by the department, in an electronic format as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or information required to be filed in an electronic format under this section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic format.

(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Employee" means a person who is employed directly by a small business and who works thirty-five hours per week, averaged over a calendar year for the small business.

(b) "Small business" means any sole proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or any other legal entity with gross revenue of less than five million dollars as reported on the small business's federal income tax return or its return filed with the department over the previous three consecutive years.

(9) This section expires January 1, 2028.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

RCW 43.135.034(4) does not apply to transfers under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. This act may be known and cited as the aerospace tax incentive accountability act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. This act takes effect August 1, 2017.

--- END ---