BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. In November 2016, the voters within the sound transit district approved a fifty-four billion dollar, taxpayer-funded light rail, heavy rail, and bus expansion in the Puget Sound region. Ensuring that taxpayers understand how funds collected by sound transit are used is critical to achieving trust between the agency and the public. The legislature finds that the opportunities to provide transparency and understanding regarding the use of taxpayer dollars should be maximized. To achieve this end, a sound transit taxpayer accountability statement will be placed on the annual registration renewal notifications provided by the department of licensing, which will contain easy-to-access and easy-to-understand information on sound transit project status and financial audits.

Sec. 2. RCW 81.104.190 and 2009 c 280 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation benefit areas, high capacity transportation corridor areas, and regional transit systems may contract with the state department of revenue or other appropriate entities for administration and collection of any tax authorized by RCW 81.104.150, 81.104.160, and 81.104.170.

(2)(a) A regional transit authority that includes a county with a population of more than one million five hundred thousand, if it contracts for the collection of a tax authorized by RCW 81.104.160, must require the inclusion of a taxpayer accountability statement when notification is sent to any person regarding the amount of tax levied under RCW 81.104.160.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, a taxpayer accountability statement must include the following:

(i) A statement indicating which of the regional transit authority's projects are in scope, on time, and on budget and which are not;

(ii) A link or web site address to audited financial statements for the regional transit authority;

(iii) A link or web site address to fiscal information on the regional transit authority's projects; and

(iv) The number of a hotline to be provided by the department of licensing to expedite contact with the appropriate regional transit authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---