BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Part I

Eliminating or Narrowing Tax Preferences

Subpart A

Eliminating the Sales and Use Tax Exemption for Bottled Water

Sec. 101. RCW 82.08.0293 and 2014 c 140 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of food and food ingredients. "Food and food ingredients" means substances, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed for their taste or nutritional value. "Food and food ingredients" does not include:

(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by volume;

(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco; and

(c) Marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft drinks, bottled water, or dietary supplements. ((For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:)) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Bottled water" means water that is placed in a safety sealed container or package for human consumption. Bottled water is calorie free and does not contain sweeteners or other additives except that it may contain: (i) Antimicrobial agents; (ii) fluoride; (iii) carbonation; (iv) vitamins, minerals, and electrolytes; (v) oxygen; (vi) preservatives; and (vii) only those flavors, extracts, or essences derived from a spice or fruit. "Bottled water" includes water that is delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water.

(b) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco, intended to supplement the diet that:

(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients:

(A) A vitamin;

(B) A mineral;

(C) An herb or other botanical;

(D) An amino acid;

(E) A dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by increasing the total dietary intake; or

(F) A concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination of any ingredient described in this subsection;

(ii) Is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel, gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such form, is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and

(iii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement, identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003.

(((b))) (c)(i) "Prepared food" means:

(A) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;

(B) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller, including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to transport the food; or

(C) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a single item, except:

(I) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller; or

(II) Raw eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the federal food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The Food Code, published by the food and drug administration, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness.

(ii) "Prepared food" does not include the following food or food ingredients, if the food or food ingredients are sold without eating utensils provided by the seller:

(A) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American industry classification system (NAICS) classification is manufacturing in sector 311, except subsector 3118 (bakeries), as provided in the "North American industry classification system—United States, 2002";

(B) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single item; or

(C) Bakery items. The term "bakery items" includes bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, or tortillas.

(((c))) (d) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages that contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice by volume.

(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section applies to food and food ingredients that are furnished, prepared, or served as meals:

(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW 74.38.040(6);

(b) That are provided to senior citizens, individuals with disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or

(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income senior housing facility" means a facility:

(i) That meets the definition of a qualified low-income housing project under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue code, as existing on August 1, 2009;

(ii) That has been partially funded under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1485; and

(iii) For which the lessor or operator has at any time been entitled to claim a federal income tax credit under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue code.

(4)(a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail sale of food and food ingredients is subject to sales tax under RCW 82.08.020 if the food and food ingredients are sold through a vending machine. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the selling price of food and food ingredients sold through a vending machine for purposes of RCW 82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.

(b) For soft drinks, bottled water, and hot prepared food and food ingredients, other than food and food ingredients which are heated after they have been dispensed from the vending machine, the selling price is the total gross receipts of such sales divided by the sum of one plus the sales tax rate expressed as a decimal.

(c) For tax collected under this subsection (4), the requirements that the tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be stated as a separate item are waived.

Sec. 102. RCW 82.12.0293 and 2011 c 2 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of food and food ingredients for human consumption. "Food and food ingredients" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft drinks, bottled water, or dietary supplements. "Prepared food," "soft drinks," "bottled water," and "dietary supplements" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.08.0293.

(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section applies to food and food ingredients which are furnished, prepared, or served as meals:

(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW 74.38.040(6);

(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, individuals with disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or

(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income senior housing facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the conditions in this section, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of bottled water dispensed or to be dispensed to patients pursuant to a prescription for use in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease or medical condition.

(2) For purposes of this section, "prescription" means an order, formula, or recipe issued in any form of oral, written, electronic, or other means of transmission by a duly licensed practitioner authorized by the laws of this state to prescribe.

(3) Except for sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, sellers must collect tax on sales subject to this exemption. Any buyer that has paid at least twenty-five dollars in state and local sales taxes on purchases of bottled water subject to this exemption may apply for a refund of the taxes directly from the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The department must deny any refund application if the amount of the refund requested is less than twenty-five dollars. No refund may be made for taxes paid more than four years after the end of the calendar year in which the tax was paid to the seller.

(4) With respect to sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, buyers claiming the exemption provided in this section must provide the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of bottled water dispensed or to be dispensed to patients pursuant to a prescription for use in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease or medical condition.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "prescription" has the same meaning as provided in section 103 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to the conditions in this section, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of bottled water to persons whose primary source of drinking water is unsafe.

(b) For purposes of this subsection and section 106 of this act, a person's primary source of drinking water is unsafe if:

(i) The public water system providing the drinking water has issued a public notification that the drinking water may pose a health risk, and the notification is still in effect on the date that the bottled water was purchased;

(ii) Test results on the person's drinking water, which are no more than twelve months old, from a laboratory certified to perform drinking water testing show that the person's drinking water does not meet safe drinking water standards applicable to public water systems; or

(iii) The person otherwise establishes, to the department's satisfaction, that the person's drinking water does not meet safe drinking water standards applicable to public water systems.

(2) Except for sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, sellers must collect tax on sales subject to this exemption. Any buyer that has paid at least twenty-five dollars in state and local sales taxes on purchases of bottled water subject to this exemption may apply for a refund of the taxes directly from the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The department must deny any refund application if the amount of the refund requested is less than twenty-five dollars. No refund may be made for taxes paid more than four years after the end of the calendar year in which the tax was paid to the seller.

(3)(a) With respect to sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, buyers claiming the exemption provided in this section must provide the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(b) The department may waive the requirement for an exemption certificate in the event of disaster or similar circumstance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of bottled water by persons whose primary source of drinking water is unsafe as provided in section 105 of this act.

Subpart B

Narrowing a Use Tax Exemption for Self-Produced Fuel

Sec. 107. RCW 82.12.0263 and 1980 c 37 s 62 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply in respect to the use of biomass fuel by the extractor or manufacturer thereof when used directly in the operation of the particular extractive operation or manufacturing plant which produced or manufactured the same. For purposes of this section, "biomass fuel" means wood waste and other wood residuals, including forest derived biomass, but does not include firewood or wood pellets. "Biomass fuel" also includes partially organic by-products of pulp, paper, and wood manufacturing processes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The value of the article used with respect to refinery fuel gas under this chapter is the most recent monthly United States natural gas wellhead price, as published by the federal energy information administration.

(2) In lieu of the use tax rate provided in RCW 82.12.020, refinery fuel gas is subject to a rate of 3.852 percent.

(3) The use of fuel by the extractor or manufacturer thereof when used directly in the operation of the particular extractive operation or manufacturing plant that produced or manufactured the same is not subject to local use tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109. Sections 107 through 109 of this act apply with respect to fuel, other than biomass fuel, consumed within this state on or after the effective date of this section, regardless of whether such fuel was produced or manufactured before the effective date of this section. For purposes of this section, "consumed" means the use of fuel resulting in the release of usable energy.

Part II

Remote Sellers, Referrers, and Marketplace Facilitators

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. (1) The legislature finds that states fail to collect more than twenty-three billion dollars annually in sales taxes from remote sales over the internet and through catalogs. The legislature further finds that Washington and its local governments will lose out on an estimated three hundred fifty-three million dollars in sales and use taxes in fiscal year 2018 from remote sales, reducing funds that would otherwise be available for the public education system, health care services, infrastructure, and other vital public services.

(2) The legislature finds that Colorado adopted a law requiring out-of-state retailers that do not collect Colorado's sales tax to report tax-related information to their Colorado customers and the Colorado department of revenue. The legislature further finds that in 2016 the United States court of appeals for the tenth circuit upheld that law.

(3) The legislature intends by this act to address the significant harm and unfairness brought about by the physical presence nexus rule. To achieve this objective, this act adopts a new program. Under the new program, remote sellers meeting a specified threshold of gross receipts from retail sales into this state would have the option to either collect retail sales or use tax on taxable retail sales into this state or comply with certain sales and use tax notice and reporting provisions. This option is also available to other persons such as marketplace facilitators for facilitated sales on behalf of third-party remote sellers. The sales and use tax notice and reporting provisions in this act are similar to the multistate tax commission's draft model sales and use tax notice and reporting statute and Colorado's sales and use tax notice and reporting law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to be codified between RCW 82.08.052 and 82.08.054 to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection, beginning January 1, 2018, and for any calendar year thereafter, remote sellers, referrers, and marketplace facilitators meeting the criteria in subsection (2) of this section or that have a physical presence in this state, must elect to either collect and remit retail sales or use tax on all taxable retail sales into this state pursuant to this chapter and chapters 82.12 and 82.32 RCW or comply with section 205 of this act.

(ii) Until January 1, 2020, the requirement under (a)(i) of this subsection (1) to collect and remit tax or comply with section 205 of this act does not apply with respect to the retail sale of digital products and digital codes, other than (A) specified digital products and digital games and (B) digital codes used to redeem specified digital products and digital games, by a marketplace seller through a marketplace facilitator or directly resulting from a referral.

(b) For marketplace facilitators, the election provided in (a) of this subsection (1) applies only with respect to:

(i) Retail sales through the marketplace facilitator's marketplace by or on behalf of marketplace sellers who do not have a physical presence in this state; and

(ii) A marketplace facilitator's own retail sales, if the marketplace facilitator does not have a physical presence in this state.

(c)(i) For referrers, the election provided in (a) of this subsection (1) applies only with respect to:

(A) Retail sales directly resulting from a referral of the purchaser to a marketplace seller who does not have a physical presence in this state; and

(B) A referrer's own retail sales, if the referrer does not have a physical presence in this state.

(ii) A referrer may make different elections with respect to retail sales described in (c)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection.

(d) An election under (a) of this subsection (1) to collect retail sales or use tax is binding on the remote seller, referrer, or marketplace facilitator until January 1st of the calendar year that is at least twelve consecutive months after the remote seller, referrer, or marketplace facilitator began collecting retail sales or use tax under such election. A remote seller, referrer, or marketplace facilitator who has made an election under this subsection to collect retail sales or use tax may change its election and comply with section 205 of this act by providing written notice to the department in a form and manner required by the department. Such an election change may take effect only on the first day of the calendar year that is at least thirty days following the date that the department received written notice from the remote seller, referrer, or marketplace facilitator of its change in election.

(e)(i) Remote sellers, referrers, and marketplace facilitators complying with section 205 of this act may change their election under this subsection (1) at any time by collecting and remitting retail sales or use taxes under this chapter or chapter 82.12 RCW on taxable retail sales sourced to this state. Such an election is binding as provided in (d) of this subsection (1).

(ii) Remote sellers, referrers, and marketplace facilitators electing for the first time to collect retail sales or use tax must begin collecting state and local retail sales or use taxes on taxable retail sales sourced to this state beginning on the first day of the calendar month that is at least thirty days from the date that the remote seller, referrer, or marketplace facilitator met either threshold described in subsection (2) of this section.

(f) If the department discovers that any remote seller, referrer, or marketplace facilitator required to make an election under this subsection (1) is not registered with the department and collecting retail sales or use tax, the remote seller, referrer, or marketplace facilitator is conclusively presumed to have elected to comply with the notice and reporting requirements of section 205 of this act.

(2)(a) A remote seller is subject to subsection (1) of this section if, during the current or immediately preceding calendar year, its gross receipts from retail sales sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 are at least ten thousand dollars.

(b) A marketplace facilitator is subject to subsection (1) of this section if, during the current or immediately preceding calendar year, the gross receipts from retail sales sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 by the marketplace facilitator, whether in its own name or as an agent of a marketplace seller, total at least ten thousand dollars.

(c) A referrer is subject to subsection (1) of this section if, during the current or immediately preceding calendar year, the gross income of the business received from the referrer's referral services apportioned to Washington under RCW 82.04.462, whether or not subject to tax under chapter 82.04 RCW, and from retail sales sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730, if any, is at least two hundred sixty-seven thousand dollars.

(3) This section is subject to the provisions of section 214 of this act.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "marketplace facilitator," "referral," "referrer," and "remote seller" have the same meaning as provided in section 204 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to be codified between section 202 of this act and RCW 82.08.054 to read as follows:

(1)(a) For purposes of this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW, a marketplace facilitator or referrer is deemed to be an agent of any marketplace seller making retail sales through the marketplace facilitator's physical or electronic marketplace or directly resulting from a referral of the purchaser by the referrer.

(b) In addition to other applicable recordkeeping requirements, the department may require a marketplace facilitator or referrer to provide or make available to the department any information the department determines is reasonably necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter and chapter 82.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 501 of this act). Such information may include documentation of sales made by marketplace sellers through the marketplace facilitator's physical or electronic marketplace or directly resulting from a referral by the referrer. The department may prescribe by rule the form and manner for providing this information.

(2) A marketplace facilitator or referrer is relieved of liability under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW for failure to collect the correct amount of tax to the extent that the marketplace facilitator or referrer can show to the department's satisfaction that the error was due to incorrect information given to the marketplace facilitator or referrer by the marketplace seller, unless the marketplace facilitator, or referrer, and marketplace seller are affiliated persons. Where the marketplace facilitator or referrer is relieved of liability under this subsection (2), the marketplace seller is solely liable for the amount of uncollected tax due.

(3)(a) Subject to the limits in (b) and (c) of this subsection (3), a marketplace facilitator or referrer is relieved of liability under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW for the failure to collect tax on taxable retail sales to the extent that the marketplace facilitator or referrer can show to the department's satisfaction that:

(i) The taxable retail sale was made through the marketplace facilitator's marketplace or directly resulting from a referral of the purchaser by the referrer;

(ii) The taxable retail sale was made solely as the agent of a marketplace seller, and the marketplace facilitator, or referrer, and marketplace seller are not affiliated persons; and

(iii) The failure to collect sales tax was not due to an error in sourcing the sale under RCW 82.32.730.

(b) Liability relief for a marketplace facilitator under (a) of this subsection (3) for a calendar year is limited as follows:

(i) For calendar year 2018, the liability relief may not exceed ten percent of the total tax due under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW on taxable retail sales by the marketplace facilitator as agent of a marketplace seller and sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 during the same calendar year.

(ii) For calendar years 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023, the liability relief may not exceed five percent of the total tax due under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW on taxable retail sales by the marketplace facilitator as agent of a marketplace seller and sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 during the same calendar year.

(iii) Beginning in calendar year 2024, the liability relief may not exceed three percent of the total tax due under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW on taxable retail sales by the marketplace facilitator as agent of a marketplace seller and sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 during the same calendar year.

(c) Liability relief for a referrer under (a) of this subsection (3) for a calendar year is limited as follows:

(i) For calendar year 2018, the liability relief may not exceed ten percent of the total tax due under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW on taxable retail sales directly resulting from a referral of the purchaser to the marketplace seller by the referrer and sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 during the same calendar year.

(ii) For calendar years 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023, the liability relief may not exceed five percent of the total tax due under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW on taxable retail sales directly resulting from a referral of the purchaser to the marketplace seller by the referrer and sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 during the same calendar year.

(iii) Beginning in calendar year 2024, the liability relief may not exceed three percent of the total tax due under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW on taxable retail sales directly resulting from a referral of the purchaser to the marketplace seller by the referrer and sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 during the same calendar year.

(d) Where the marketplace facilitator or referrer is relieved of liability under this subsection (3), the marketplace seller is also relieved of liability for the amount of uncollected tax due, subject to the limitations in subsection (4) of this section.

(e) The department may by rule determine the manner in which a taxpayer may claim the liability relief provided under this subsection.

(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a marketplace seller obligated or electing to collect the taxes imposed under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW is not required to collect such taxes on all taxable retail sales through a marketplace operated by a marketplace facilitator or directly resulting from a referral of the purchaser to the marketplace seller by the referrer if the marketplace seller has obtained documentation from the marketplace facilitator or referrer indicating that the marketplace facilitator or referrer is registered with the department and will collect all applicable taxes due under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW on all taxable retail sales made on behalf of the marketplace seller through the marketplace operated by the marketplace facilitator or taxable retail sales directly resulting from a referral of the purchaser to the marketplace seller by the referrer. The documentation required by this subsection (4) must be provided in a form and manner prescribed by or acceptable to the department. This subsection (4) does not relieve a marketplace seller from liability for uncollected taxes due under this chapter or chapter 82.12 RCW resulting from a marketplace facilitator's or referrer's failure to collect the proper amount of tax due when the error was due to incorrect information given to the marketplace facilitator or referrer by the marketplace seller.

(5) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a marketplace seller that is also a remote seller subject to section 202(1) of this act is relieved of its obligation to collect sales or use taxes imposed under section 202 of this act with respect to all taxable retail sales through a marketplace operated by a marketplace facilitator that provides the marketplace seller with written confirmation that the marketplace facilitator has elected to comply with the notice and reporting requirements of section 205 of this act in lieu of collecting sales and use taxes.

(6) Notwithstanding subsections (4) and (5) of this section, a marketplace seller is not relieved of the obligation to collect taxes imposed under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW or comply with section 202 of this act with respect to retail sales of digital products and digital codes, other than (a) specified digital products and digital games and (b) digital codes used to redeem specified digital products and digital games, until January 1, 2020.

(7) No class action may be brought against a marketplace facilitator or referrer in any court of this state on behalf of purchasers arising from or in any way related to an overpayment of sales or use tax collected by the marketplace facilitator or referrer, regardless of whether that claim is characterized as a tax refund claim. Nothing in this subsection affects a purchaser's right to seek a refund from the department as provided under chapter 82.32 RCW.

(8) Nothing in this section affects the obligation of any purchaser to remit sales or use tax as to any applicable taxable transaction in which the seller or the seller's agent does not collect and remit sales tax.

(9) This section is subject to the provisions of section 214 of this act.

(10) The definitions in section 204 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Affiliated person" means a person that, with respect to another person:

(a) Has an ownership interest of more than five percent, whether direct or indirect, in the other person; or

(b) Is related to the other person because a third person, or group of third persons who are affiliated persons with respect to each other, holds an ownership interest of more than five percent, whether direct or indirect, in the related persons.

(2) "Consumer" has the same meaning as provided in chapters 82.04, 82.08, and 82.12 RCW.

(3) "Marketplace facilitator" means a person that contracts with sellers to facilitate for consideration, regardless of whether deducted as fees from the transaction, the sale of the seller's products through a physical or electronic marketplace operated by the person, and engages:

(a) Directly or indirectly, through one or more affiliated persons in any of the following:

(i) Transmitting or otherwise communicating the offer or acceptance between the buyer and seller;

(ii) Owning or operating the infrastructure, electronic or physical, or technology that brings buyers and sellers together;

(iii) Providing a virtual currency that buyers are allowed or required to use to purchase products from the seller; or

(iv) Software development or research and development activities related to any of the activities described in (b) of this subsection (3), if such activities are directly related to a physical or electronic marketplace operated by the person or an affiliated person; and

(b) In any of the following activities with respect to the seller's products:

(i) Payment processing services;

(ii) Fulfillment or storage services;

(iii) Listing products for sale;

(iv) Setting prices;

(v) Branding sales as those of the marketplace facilitator;

(vi) Order taking;

(vii) Advertising or promotion; or

(viii) Providing customer service or accepting or assisting with returns or exchanges.

(4) "Marketplace seller" means a seller that makes retail sales through any physical or electronic marketplaces operated by a marketplace facilitator or directly resulting from a referral by a referrer, regardless of whether the seller is required to be registered with the department as provided in RCW 82.32.030.

(5) "Platform" means an electronic or physical medium, including a web site or catalog, operated by a referrer.

(6) "Product" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.32.023.

(7) "Purchaser" means any consumer who purchases or leases a product sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730.

(8) "Referral" means the transfer by a referrer of a potential customer to a marketplace seller who advertises or lists products for sale on the referrer's platform.

(9)(a) "Referrer" means a person, other than a person engaging in the business of printing a newspaper or publishing a newspaper as defined in RCW 82.04.214, who contracts or otherwise agrees with a seller to list or advertise for sale one or more items in any medium, including a web site or catalog; receives a commission, fee, or other consideration from the seller for the listing or advertisement; transfers, via telephone, internet link, or other means, a purchaser to a seller or an affiliated person to complete the sale; and does not collect receipts from the purchasers for the transaction.

(b) "Referrer" does not include a person that:

(i) Provides internet advertising services; and

(ii) Does not ever provide either the marketplace seller's shipping terms or advertise whether a marketplace seller charges sales tax.

(10) "Remote seller" means any seller, other than a marketplace facilitator or referrer, who does not have a physical presence in this state and makes retail sales to purchasers.

(11) "Retail sale" and "sale" have the same meaning as provided in chapter 82.04 RCW.

(12) "Seller" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010 and includes marketplace facilitators, whether making sales in their own right or on behalf of marketplace sellers, and referrers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, a seller that does not collect the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW on a taxable retail sale must comply with the applicable notice and reporting requirements of this section. For taxable retail sales made through a marketplace facilitator, or other agent, the marketplace facilitator, or other agent must comply with the notice and reporting requirements of this section, and the principal is not subject to the notice and reporting requirements of this section with respect to those sales. If the referrer makes an election to comply with the applicable notice and reporting requirements of this section, marketplace sellers to whom a referral is made by the referrer remain subject to the applicable notice and reporting requirements under this section for their sales unless the marketplace sellers collect the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW on taxable retail sales sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730.

(2)(a) A seller, other than a referrer acting in its capacity as a referrer, subject to the notice and reporting requirements of this section must:

(i) Post a conspicuous notice on its marketplace, platform, web site, catalog, or any other similar medium that informs Washington purchasers that:

(A) Sales or use tax is due on certain purchases;

(B) Washington requires the purchaser to file a use tax return; and

(C) The notice is provided under the requirements of this section; and

(ii) Provide a notice to each consumer at the time of each retail sale. The notice under this subsection (2)(a)(ii) must include the following information:

(A) A statement that neither sales nor use tax is being collected or remitted upon the sale;

(B) A statement that the consumer may be required to remit sales or use tax directly to the department; and

(C) Instructions for obtaining additional information from the department regarding whether and how to remit the sales or use tax to the department.

(b) The notice under (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) must be prominently displayed on all invoices and order forms including, where applicable, electronic and catalog invoices and order forms, and upon each sales receipt or similar document provided to the purchaser, whether in paper or electronic form. No indication may be made that sales or use tax is not imposed upon the transaction, unless:

(i) Such indication is followed immediately with the notice required by (a)(ii) of this subsection (2); or

(ii) The transaction with respect to which the indication is given is exempt from sales and use tax pursuant to law.

(3) A referrer subject to the notice and reporting requirements of this section must:

(a) Post a conspicuous notice on its platform that informs Washington purchasers:

(i) That sales or use tax is due on certain purchases;

(ii) That the seller may or may not collect and remit retail sales tax on a purchase;

(iii) That Washington requires the purchaser to file a use tax return if retail sales tax is not assessed at the time of a taxable sale by the seller;

(iv) That the notice is provided under the requirements of this section;

(v) Of the instructions for obtaining additional information from the department regarding whether and how to remit the sales or use tax to the department; and

(vi) That if the seller to whom the purchaser is referred does not collect retail sales tax on a subsequent purchase by the purchaser, the seller may be required to provide information to the purchaser and the department about the purchaser's potential sales or use tax liability.

(b) The notice under (a) of this subsection (3) must be prominently displayed on the platform and may include pop-up boxes or notification by other means that appear when the referrer transfers a purchaser to a marketplace seller or an affiliated person to complete the sale.

(4)(a) A seller, other than a referrer acting in its capacity as a referrer, subject to the notice and reporting requirements of subsection (2) of this section must, no later than February 28th of each year, provide a report to each consumer for whom the seller was required to provide a notice under subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section.

(b) The report under this subsection (4) must include:

(i) A statement that the seller did not collect sales or use tax on the consumer's transactions with the seller and that the consumer may be required to remit such tax directly to the department;

(ii) A list, by date, generally indicating the type of product purchased or leased during the immediately preceding calendar year by the consumer from the seller, sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730, and the price of each product;

(iii) Instructions for obtaining additional information from the department regarding whether and how to remit the sales or use tax to the department;

(iv) A statement that the seller is required to submit a report to the department pursuant to subsection (6) of this section stating the total dollar amount of the consumer's purchases from the seller; and

(v) Any information as the department may reasonably require.

(c)(i) The report required under this subsection (4) must be sent to the consumer's billing address or, if unknown, the consumer's shipping address, by first-class mail, in an envelope marked prominently with words indicating important tax information is enclosed.

(ii) If no billing or shipping address is known, the report must be sent electronically to the consumer's last known email address with a subject heading indicating important tax information is enclosed.

(5)(a) A referrer subject to the notice requirements under subsection (3) of this section must, no later than February 28th of each year, provide notice to each marketplace seller to whom the referrer transferred a potential purchaser located in Washington during the previous calendar year.

(b) The notice under this subsection (5) must include:

(i) A statement that Washington imposes a sales or use tax on retail sales;

(ii) A statement that a seller, meeting the threshold in section 202(2) of this act, is required to either collect and remit retail sales or use tax on all taxable retail sales sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 or to comply with this section; and

(iii) Instructions for obtaining additional information from the department.

(c) By February 28th of each year, a referrer required to provide the notice under this subsection must provide the department with:

(i) A list of sellers who received the referrer's notice under this subsection. The information must be provided electronically in a form and manner required by the department.

(ii) An affidavit signed under penalty of perjury from an officer of the referrer affirming that the referrer made reasonable efforts to comply with the applicable sales and use tax notice and reporting requirements of this section.

(6)(a) A seller, other than a referrer acting in its capacity as a referrer, subject to the notice and reporting requirements of this section must, no later than February 28th of each year, file a report with the department.

(b) The report under this subsection (6) must include, with respect to each consumer to whom the seller is required to provide a report under subsection (4) of this section by February 28th of the current calendar year:

(i) The consumer's name;

(ii) The billing address and, if different, the last known mailing address;

(iii) The shipping address for each product sold or leased to such consumer for delivery to a location in this state during the immediately preceding calendar year; and

(iv) The total dollar amount of all such purchases by such consumer.

(c) The report under this subsection (6) must also include an affidavit signed under penalty of perjury from an officer of the seller affirming that the seller made reasonable efforts to comply with the applicable sales and use tax notice and reporting requirements in this section.

(d) Except for the affidavit, the report under this subsection (6) must be filed electronically in a form and manner required by the department.

(7) A seller who is registered with the department to collect and remit retail sales and use tax, and who makes a reasonable effort to comply with the requirements of RCW 82.08.050 and 82.12.040, is not required to provide notice or file reports under this section.

(8) Every seller subject to this chapter must keep and preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be necessary for the department to verify the seller's compliance with this chapter. All of the seller's books, records, and invoices must be open for examination at any reasonable time by the department. The department may require the attendance of any officer of the seller or any employee of the seller having knowledge pertinent to the department's investigation of the seller's compliance with this chapter, at a time and place fixed in a subpoena issued under RCW 82.32.117, and may take the person's testimony under oath.

(9) In exercising discretion in enforcing the provisions of this chapter, the department may take into consideration available resources, whether the anticipated benefits from any potential enforcement activities are likely to exceed the department's expected enforcement costs, and any other factors the department deems appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206. (1)(a) The department must assess a penalty against any seller, other than a referrer acting in its capacity as a referrer, that fails to provide notice to consumers pursuant to section 205(2)(a) of this act, in addition to any other applicable penalties, in the amount of twenty thousand dollars. The department may assess the penalty under this subsection only once per calendar year, regardless of the number of notices a seller fails to provide pursuant to section 205(2)(a) of this act during the calendar year. The department may apply this penalty at any time during a calendar year and no more frequently than annually.

(b) The department must assess a penalty against any referrer that fails to provide notice to consumers pursuant to section 205(3) of this act, in addition to any other applicable penalties, in the amount of twenty thousand dollars. The department may apply this penalty at any time during a calendar year and no more frequently than annually.

(2)(a) The department must assess a penalty against a seller who fails to provide a report as required by section 205 (4) or (5) of this act, in addition to any other applicable penalties, as follows:

(i) Five thousand dollars if the gross receipts of the seller and through the seller's marketplace from retail sales sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 are less than fifty thousand dollars for the calendar year for which the report was required to be made;

(ii) Ten thousand dollars if the gross receipts of the seller and through the seller's marketplace from retail sales sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 are at least fifty thousand dollars but less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars;

(iii) Fifty thousand dollars if the gross receipts of the seller and through the seller's marketplace from retail sales sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 are at least one hundred fifty thousand dollars but less than three hundred thousand dollars; or

(iv) If the gross receipts of the seller and through the seller's marketplace from retail sales sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 are three hundred thousand dollars or greater, one hundred thousand dollars plus twenty thousand dollars for every fifty thousand dollars in gross receipts over three hundred thousand dollars.

(b) The department must assess a penalty against a referrer who fails to provide the notice and list required by section 205(5) of this act, in addition to any other applicable penalties. The department may assess the penalty under this subsection only once per calendar year, regardless of the number of failures to comply with section 205(5) of this act during the calendar year. The amount of the penalties assessed are as follows:

(i) Fifty thousand dollars if the gross income of the referrer is at least two hundred sixty-seven thousand dollars but less than three hundred thousand dollars of the gross income of the business received from the referrer's referral services apportioned to Washington under RCW 82.04.460, whether or not subject to tax under chapter 82.04 RCW, for the calendar year for which the notice and list was required to be made; or

(ii) If the gross income of the referrer is three hundred thousand dollars or greater, one hundred thousand dollars plus twenty thousand dollars for every fifty thousand dollars in gross income over three hundred thousand dollars of the gross income of the business received from the referrer's referral services apportioned to Washington under RCW 82.04.460, whether or not subject to tax under chapter 82.04 RCW, for the calendar year for which the notice and list was required to be made.

(3) The department must assess a penalty against any seller, other than a referrer acting in its capacity as a referrer, who fails to provide a report to the department as required by section 205(6) of this act, in addition to any other applicable penalties, in the amount of twenty-five dollars multiplied by the number of consumers that should have been included on such report, but not less than twenty thousand dollars for any calendar year.

(4) The penalties imposed under subsections (1) through (3) of this section are cumulative.

(5) No penalty may be imposed by the department under subsections (1) through (4) of this section more than four years after the close of the calendar year in which the notice or report giving rise to the penalty was required to have been provided. This subsection (5) does not apply to penalties reassessed under subsection (9) of this section.

(6) When assessing a penalty under this section, the department may use any reasonable estimation technique where necessary or appropriate to determine the amount of any penalty.

(7) Interest accrues on the amount of the total penalty that has been assessed under this section until the total penalty amount is paid in full. Interest imposed under this section must be computed and assessed as provided in RCW 82.32.050 as if the penalty imposed under this subsection was a tax liability.

(8) The department must notify a seller by mail, or electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, of the amount of any penalty and interest due under this section. Amounts due under this section must be paid in full within thirty days from the date of the notice, or within such further time as the department may provide in its sole discretion.

(9)(a)(i) A seller is entitled to a conditional waiver of penalties and interest imposed under this section if the seller enters into a written agreement with the department electing to collect retail sales or use tax or fully comply with all applicable notice and reporting requirements of this chapter, beginning by a date acceptable to the department. An election to collect retail sales or use tax must be for a period of at least twelve consecutive months and is subject to the provisions of section 202(1)(d) of this act.

(ii) The department may grant a waiver of penalties and interest under this subsection (9)(a) for penalties and interest assessed for a seller's failure to comply with the notice and reporting requirements for one or more violations.

(iii) The department may not grant more than one request by a seller for a waiver of penalties and interest under this subsection (9)(a).

(iv) The department must reassess penalties and interest conditionally waived under this subsection (9)(a) if the department finds that, after the date that the seller agreed to fully comply with the applicable notice and reporting requirements of this chapter, the seller failed to:

(A) Provide notice under section 205(2)(a)(ii) of this act to at least ninety percent of the consumers entitled to such notice in any given calendar year or portion of the initial calendar year in which the agreement required under this subsection was in effect if the agreement was in effect for less than the entire calendar year;

(B) Timely provide the reports required under section 205(4) of this act to all consumers who received notice from the seller under section 205(2)(a)(ii) of this act during any calendar year, unless the department finds that any such failure was due to circumstances beyond the seller's control;

(C) Timely provide the reports required under section 205(6) of this act during any calendar year, unless the department finds that any such failure was due to circumstances beyond the seller's control; or

(D) With respect to referrers, timely provide the notice required under section 205(3) of this act and the notice and list required under section 205(5) of this act during any calendar year, unless the department finds that any such failure was due to circumstances beyond the referrer's control.

(v) The department must reassess penalties and interest conditionally waived under this subsection (9)(a) if the department finds that, after the date that the seller elected to collect retail sales or use tax, the seller failed to register with the department and make a reasonable effort to comply with the requirements of RCW 82.08.050 and 82.12.040.

(vi) The department may not reassess penalties and interest conditionally waived under this subsection (9)(a) more than four calendar years following the calendar year in which the department granted the conditional waiver under this subsection (9)(a).

(vii) The provisions of subsection (8) of this section apply to penalties and interest reassessed under this subsection (9)(a). The department may add additional interest on penalties reassessed under this subsection (9)(a) only if the total amount of penalties reassessed under this subsection (9)(a) is not paid in full by the date due.

(b) The department must waive penalties and interest imposed under this section if the department determines that the failure of the seller to fully comply with the notice or reporting requirements was due to circumstances beyond the seller's control.

(c) The department may waive penalties imposed under this section if the department determines that the failure of the seller to fully comply with the notice or reporting requirements was due to reasonable cause and not willful neglect. In determining whether reasonable cause exists, the department will consider, among other relevant factors, whether: (i) The failure was due to willful or reckless disregard of the seller's notice or reporting obligations; (ii) the seller made subsequent efforts to avoid future noncompliance; and (iii) the magnitude of the noncompliance was significant in terms of dollars and time when accounting for the seller's size and volume of transactions. On appeal, a court or the board of tax appeals must give great deference to the department's penalty waiver decision under this subsection (9)(c) and affirm the department's decision, unless the taxpayer can show by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the department's decision lacked any reasonable basis.

(d) A request for a waiver of penalties and interest under this subsection must be received by the department in writing and before the penalties and interest for which a waiver is requested are due pursuant to subsection (8) of this section. The department must deny any request for a waiver of penalties and interest that does not fully comply with the provisions of this subsection (9)(d).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208. Nothing in this chapter relieves sellers or consumers who are subject to chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW from any responsibilities imposed under those chapters. Nor does anything in this chapter prevent the department from administering and enforcing the taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW with respect to any seller or consumer who is subject to such taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to be codified between RCW 82.32.045 and 82.32.050 to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW and payable by a consumer directly to the department are due, on returns prescribed by the department, by the earlier of April 1st of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the sale or use occurred or within thirty days of the date of a notice from the department that tax may be due.

(2) This section does not apply to the reporting and payment of taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW:

(a) On the retail sale or use of motor vehicles, vessels, or aircraft; or

(b) By consumers who are engaged in business, unless the department has relieved the consumer of the requirement to file returns pursuant to RCW 82.32.045(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A remote seller, referrer, or marketplace facilitator that is subject to section 202 of this act and is complying with the requirements of chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW may only seek a recovery of retail sales and use taxes, penalties, or interest from the department by following the recovery procedures established under RCW 82.32.060. However, no claim may be granted on the basis that the taxpayer lacked a physical presence in this state and complied with the tax collection provisions of chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW voluntarily.

(2) Neither the state nor any seller who elects under section 202 of this act to collect and remit retail sales or use tax is liable to a purchaser who claims that the retail sales or use tax has been over-collected because a provision of chapter . . ., Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (this act) is later deemed unlawful.

(3) Nothing in chapter . . ., Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (this act) affects the obligation of any purchaser from this state to remit retail sales or use tax as to any applicable taxable transaction in which the seller does not collect and remit retail sales or use tax.

Sec. 211. RCW 82.08.050 and 2010 c 112 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax imposed in this chapter must be paid by the buyer to the seller. Each seller must collect from the buyer the full amount of the tax payable in respect to each taxable sale in accordance with the schedule of collections adopted by the department under the provisions of RCW 82.08.060.

(2) The tax required by this chapter, to be collected by the seller, is deemed to be held in trust by the seller until paid to the department. Any seller who appropriates or converts the tax collected to the seller's own use or to any use other than the payment of the tax to the extent that the money required to be collected is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if any seller fails to collect the tax imposed in this chapter or, having collected the tax, fails to pay it to the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter, whether such failure is the result of the seller's own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the seller's control, the seller is, nevertheless, personally liable to the state for the amount of the tax.

(4) Sellers are not relieved from personal liability for the amount of the tax unless they maintain proper records of exempt or nontaxable transactions and provide them to the department when requested.

(5) Sellers are not relieved from personal liability for the amount of tax if they fraudulently fail to collect the tax or if they solicit purchasers to participate in an unlawful claim of exemption.

(6) Sellers are not relieved from personal liability for the amount of tax if they accept an exemption certificate from a purchaser claiming an entity-based exemption if:

(a) The subject of the transaction sought to be covered by the exemption certificate is actually received by the purchaser at a location operated by the seller in Washington; and

(b) Washington provides an exemption certificate that clearly and affirmatively indicates that the claimed exemption is not available in Washington. Graying out exemption reason types on a uniform form and posting it on the department's web site is a clear and affirmative indication that the grayed out exemptions are not available.

(7)(a) Sellers are relieved from personal liability for the amount of tax if they obtain a fully completed exemption certificate or capture the relevant data elements required under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement within ninety days, or a longer period as may be provided by rule by the department, subsequent to the date of sale.

(b) If the seller has not obtained an exemption certificate or all relevant data elements required under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement within the period allowed subsequent to the date of sale, the seller may, within one hundred twenty days, or a longer period as may be provided by rule by the department, subsequent to a request for substantiation by the department, either prove that the transaction was not subject to tax by other means or obtain a fully completed exemption certificate from the purchaser, taken in good faith.

(c) Sellers are relieved from personal liability for the amount of tax if they obtain a blanket exemption certificate for a purchaser with which the seller has a recurring business relationship. The department may not request from a seller renewal of blanket exemption certificates or updates of exemption certificate information or data elements if there is a recurring business relationship between the buyer and seller. For purposes of this subsection (7)(c), a "recurring business relationship" means at least one sale transaction within a period of twelve consecutive months.

(d) Sellers are relieved from personal liability for the amount of tax if they obtain a copy of a direct pay permit issued under RCW 82.32.087.

(8) The amount of tax, until paid by the buyer to the seller or to the department, constitutes a debt from the buyer to the seller. Any seller who fails or refuses to collect the tax as required with intent to violate the provisions of this chapter or to gain some advantage or benefit, either direct or indirect, and any buyer who refuses to pay any tax due under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(9) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the tax required by this chapter to be collected by the seller must be stated separately from the selling price in any sales invoice or other instrument of sale. On all retail sales through vending machines, the tax need not be stated separately from the selling price or collected separately from the buyer. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for purposes of determining the tax due from the buyer to the seller and from the seller to the department it must be conclusively presumed that the selling price quoted in any price list, sales document, contract or other agreement between the parties does not include the tax imposed by this chapter. But if the seller advertises the price as including the tax or that the seller is paying the tax, the advertised price may not be considered the selling price.

(10) Where a buyer has failed to pay to the seller the tax imposed by this chapter and the seller has not paid the amount of the tax to the department, the department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the buyer for collection of the tax. If the department proceeds directly against the buyer for collection of the tax as authorized in this subsection, the department may add a penalty of ten percent of the unpaid tax to the amount of the tax due for failure of the buyer to pay the tax to the seller, regardless of when the tax may be collected by the department. In addition to the penalty authorized in this subsection, all of the provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW, including those relative to interest and penalties, apply. For the sole purpose of applying the various provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW, the twenty-fifth day of the month following the tax period in which the purchase was made will be considered as the due date of the tax.

(11) ((Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (10) of this section, any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by this chapter if:

(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted directly or through another person, are limited to:

(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;

(ii) The taking of orders; or

(iii) The processing of payments; and

(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.424.

(12) Subsection (11) of this section expires when: (a) The United States congress grants individual states the authority to impose sales and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax collection duties on remote sellers.

(13) For purposes of this section:)) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Exemption certificate" means documentation furnished by a buyer to a seller to claim an exemption from sales tax. An exemption certificate includes a reseller permit or other documentation authorized in RCW 82.04.470 furnished by a buyer to a seller to substantiate a wholesale sale((; and)).

(b) "Seller" includes a certified service provider, as defined in RCW 82.32.020, acting as agent for the seller.

Sec. 212. RCW 82.12.040 and 2015 c 169 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person who ((maintains in this state a place of business or a stock of goods, or engages in business activities within this state)) is subject to a collection obligation under chapter 82.08 RCW, except a person making a valid election to comply with the notice and reporting provisions of section 205 of this act, must obtain from the department a certificate of registration, and must, at the time of making sales of tangible personal property, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, extended warranties, or sales of any service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((b))) (c), or making transfers of either possession or title, or both, of tangible personal property for use in this state, collect from the purchasers or transferees the tax imposed under this chapter. The tax to be collected under this section must be in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied by the rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020. ((For the purposes of this chapter, the phrase "maintains in this state a place of business" includes the solicitation of sales and/or taking of orders by sales agents or traveling representatives. For the purposes of this chapter, "engages in business activity within this state" includes every activity which is sufficient under the Constitution of the United States for this state to require collection of tax under this chapter. The department must in rules specify activities which constitute engaging in business activity within this state, and must keep the rules current with future court interpretations of the Constitution of the United States.))

(2) Every person who engages in this state in the business of acting as an independent selling agent for persons who do not hold a valid certificate of registration, and who receives compensation by reason of sales of tangible personal property, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, extended warranties, or sales of any service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((b))) (c), of his or her principals for use in this state, must, at the time such sales are made, collect from the purchasers the tax imposed on the purchase price under this chapter, and for that purpose is deemed a retailer as defined in this chapter.

(3) The tax required to be collected by this chapter is deemed to be held in trust by the retailer until paid to the department, and any retailer who appropriates or converts the tax collected to the retailer's own use or to any use other than the payment of the tax provided herein to the extent that the money required to be collected is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed is guilty of a misdemeanor. In case any seller fails to collect the tax herein imposed or having collected the tax, fails to pay the same to the department in the manner prescribed, whether such failure is the result of the seller's own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the seller's control, the seller is nevertheless personally liable to the state for the amount of such tax, unless the seller has taken from the buyer a copy of a direct pay permit issued under RCW 82.32.087.

(4) Any retailer who refunds, remits, or rebates to a purchaser, or transferee, either directly or indirectly, and by whatever means, all or any part of the tax levied by this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(5) ((Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by this chapter if:

(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted directly or through another person, are limited to:

(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;

(ii) The taking of orders; or

(iii) The processing of payments; and

(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.424.

(6) Subsection (5) of this section expires when: (a) The United States congress grants individual states the authority to impose sales and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax collection duties on remote sellers.

(7))) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by this chapter if the person would have been obligated to collect retail sales tax on the sale absent a specific exemption provided in chapter 82.08 RCW, and there is no corresponding use tax exemption in this chapter. Nothing in this subsection (((7))) (5) may be construed as relieving purchasers from liability for reporting and remitting the tax due under this chapter directly to the department.

(((8))) (6) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by this chapter if the state is prohibited under the Constitution or laws of the United States from requiring the person to collect the tax imposed by this chapter.

(((9))) (7) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, any licensed dealer facilitating a firearm sale or transfer between two unlicensed persons by conducting background checks under chapter 9.41 RCW is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by this chapter.

Sec. 213. RCW 82.12.040 and 2017 c 323 s 525 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person who ((maintains in this state a place of business or a stock of goods, or engages in business activities within this state)) is subject to a collection obligation under chapter 82.08 RCW, except a person making a valid election to comply with the notice and reporting provisions of section 205 of this act, must obtain from the department a certificate of registration, and must, at the time of making sales of tangible personal property, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, extended warranties, or sales of any service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(c), or making transfers of either possession or title, or both, of tangible personal property for use in this state, collect from the purchasers or transferees the tax imposed under this chapter. The tax to be collected under this section must be in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied by the rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020. ((For the purposes of this chapter, the phrase "maintains in this state a place of business" includes the solicitation of sales and/or taking of orders by sales agents or traveling representatives. For the purposes of this chapter, "engages in business activity within this state" includes every activity which is sufficient under the Constitution of the United States for this state to require collection of tax under this chapter. The department must in rules specify activities which constitute engaging in business activity within this state, and must keep the rules current with future court interpretations of the Constitution of the United States.))

(2) Every person who engages in this state in the business of acting as an independent selling agent for persons who do not hold a valid certificate of registration, and who receives compensation by reason of sales of tangible personal property, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, extended warranties, or sales of any service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(c), of his or her principals for use in this state, must, at the time such sales are made, collect from the purchasers the tax imposed on the purchase price under this chapter, and for that purpose is deemed a retailer as defined in this chapter.

(3) The tax required to be collected by this chapter is deemed to be held in trust by the retailer until paid to the department, and any retailer who appropriates or converts the tax collected to the retailer's own use or to any use other than the payment of the tax provided herein to the extent that the money required to be collected is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed is guilty of a misdemeanor. In case any seller fails to collect the tax herein imposed or having collected the tax, fails to pay the same to the department in the manner prescribed, whether such failure is the result of the seller's own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the seller's control, the seller is nevertheless personally liable to the state for the amount of such tax, unless the seller has taken from the buyer a copy of a direct pay permit issued under RCW 82.32.087.

(4) Any retailer who refunds, remits, or rebates to a purchaser, or transferee, either directly or indirectly, and by whatever means, all or any part of the tax levied by this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(5) ((Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by this chapter if:

(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted directly or through another person, are limited to:

(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;

(ii) The taking of orders; or

(iii) The processing of payments; and

(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.424.

(6) Subsection (5) of this section expires when: (a) The United States congress grants individual states the authority to impose sales and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax collection duties on remote sellers.

(7))) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by this chapter if the person would have been obligated to collect retail sales tax on the sale absent a specific exemption provided in chapter 82.08 RCW, and there is no corresponding use tax exemption in this chapter. Nothing in this subsection (((7))) (5) may be construed as relieving purchasers from liability for reporting and remitting the tax due under this chapter directly to the department.

(((8))) (6) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by this chapter if the state is prohibited under the Constitution or laws of the United States from requiring the person to collect the tax imposed by this chapter.

(((9))) (7) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, any licensed dealer facilitating a firearm sale or transfer between two unlicensed persons by conducting background checks under chapter 9.41 RCW is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If the department determines that a change, taking effect after the effective date of this section, in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement or federal law creates a conflict with any provision of section 202 or 203 of this act, such conflicting provision or provisions of section 202 or 203 of this act, including any related provisions that would not function as originally intended, have no further force and effect as of the date the change in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement or federal law becomes effective.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) A change in federal law conflicts with section 202 or 203 of this act if the change clearly allows states to impose greater sales and use tax collection obligations on remote sellers, referrers, or marketplace facilitators than provided for, or clearly prevents states from imposing sales and use tax collection obligations on remote sellers, referrers, or marketplace facilitators to the extent provided for, under section 202 or 203 of this act.

(b) A change in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement conflicts with section 202 or 203 of this act if one or more provisions of section 202 or 203 of this act causes this state to be found out of compliance with the streamlined sales and use tax agreement by its governing board.

(3) If the department makes a determination under this section that a change in federal law or the streamlined sales and use tax agreement conflicts with one or more provisions of section 202 or 203 of this act, the department:

(a) May adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW that are consistent with the streamlined sales and use tax agreement and that impose sales and use tax collection obligations on remote sellers, referrers, or marketplace facilitators to the fullest extent allowed under state and federal law; and

(b) Must include information on its web site informing taxpayers and the public (i) of the provision or provisions of section 202 or 203 of this act that will have no further force and effect, (ii) when such change will become effective, and (iii) about how to participate in any rule making conducted by the department in accordance with (a) of this subsection (3).

(4) For purposes of this section, "remote seller," "referrer," and "marketplace facilitator" have the same meaning as provided in section 204 of this act.

Part III

Nexus for Excise Tax Purposes

Sec. 301. RCW 82.04.066 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 5 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

"Engaging within this state" and "engaging within the state," when used in connection with any apportionable activity as defined in RCW 82.04.460 or ((wholesale sales)) selling activity taxable under RCW 82.04.250(1), 82.04.257(1), or 82.04.270, means that a person generates gross income of the business from sources within this state, such as customers or intangible property located in this state, regardless of whether the person is physically present in this state.

Sec. 302. RCW 82.04.067 and 2016 c 137 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person engaging in business is deemed to have substantial nexus with this state if, in the current or immediately preceding calendar year, the person is:

(a) An individual and is a resident or domiciliary of this state;

(b) A business entity and is organized or commercially domiciled in this state; or

(c) A nonresident individual or a business entity that is organized or commercially domiciled outside this state, and ((in the immediately preceding tax year)) the person had:

(i) More than fifty-three thousand dollars of property in this state;

(ii) More than fifty-three thousand dollars of payroll in this state;

(iii) More than two hundred ((fifty)) sixty-seven thousand dollars of receipts from this state; or

(iv) At least twenty-five percent of the person's total property, total payroll, or total receipts in this state.

(2)(a) Property counting toward the thresholds in subsection (1)(c)(i) and (iv) of this section is the average value of the taxpayer's property, including intangible property, owned or rented and used in this state during the current or immediately preceding ((tax)) calendar year.

(b)(i) Property owned by the taxpayer, other than loans and credit card receivables owned by the taxpayer, is valued at its original cost basis. Loans and credit card receivables owned by the taxpayer are valued at their outstanding principal balance, without regard to any reserve for bad debts. However, if a loan or credit card receivable is charged off in whole or in part for federal income tax purposes, the portion of the loan or credit card receivable charged off is deducted from the outstanding principal balance.

(ii) Property rented by the taxpayer is valued at eight times the net annual rental rate. For purposes of this subsection, "net annual rental rate" means the annual rental rate paid by the taxpayer less any annual rental rate received by the taxpayer from subrentals.

(c) The average value of property must be determined by averaging the values at the beginning and ending of the ((tax)) applicable calendar year; but the department may require the averaging of monthly values during the ((tax)) applicable calendar year if reasonably required to properly reflect the average value of the taxpayer's property.

(d)(i) For purposes of this subsection (2), loans and credit card receivables are deemed owned and used in this state as follows:

(A) Loans secured by real property, personal property, or both real and personal property are deemed owned and used in the state if the real property or personal property securing the loan is located within this state. If the property securing the loan is located both within this state and one or more other states, the loan is deemed owned and used in this state if more than fifty percent of the fair market value of the real or personal property is located within this state. If more than fifty percent of the fair market value of the real or personal property is not located within any one state, then the loan is deemed owned and used in this state if the borrower is located in this state. The determination of whether the real or personal property securing a loan is located within this state must be made, as of the time the original agreement was made, and any and all subsequent substitutions of collateral must be disregarded.

(B) Loans not secured by real or personal property are deemed owned and used in this state if the borrower is located in this state.

(C) Credit card receivables are deemed owned and used in this state if the billing address of the cardholder is in this state.

(ii)(A) Except as otherwise provided in (d)(ii)(B) of this subsection (2), the definitions in the multistate tax commission's recommended formula for the apportionment and allocation of net income of financial institutions as existing on June 1, 2010, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, apply to this section.

(B) "Credit card" means a card or device existing for the purpose of obtaining money, property, labor, or services on credit.

(e) Notwithstanding anything else to the contrary in this subsection, property counting toward the thresholds in subsection (1)(c)(i) and (iv) of this section does not include a person's ownership of, or rights in, computer software as defined in RCW 82.04.215, including computer software used in providing a digital automated service; master copies of software; and digital goods and digital codes residing on servers located in this state.

(3)(a) Payroll counting toward the thresholds in subsection (1)(c)(ii) and (iv) of this section is the total amount paid by the taxpayer for compensation in this state during the current or immediately preceding ((tax)) calendar year plus nonemployee compensation paid to representative third parties in this state. Nonemployee compensation paid to representative third parties includes the gross amount paid to nonemployees who represent the taxpayer in interactions with the taxpayer's clients and includes sales commissions.

(b) Employee compensation is paid in this state if the compensation is properly reportable to this state for unemployment compensation tax purposes, regardless of whether the compensation was actually reported to this state.

(c) Nonemployee compensation is paid in this state if the service performed by the representative third party occurs entirely or primarily within this state.

(d) For purposes of this subsection, "compensation" means wages, salaries, commissions, and any other form of remuneration paid to employees or nonemployees and defined as gross income under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 61 of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as existing on June 1, 2010.

(4) Receipts counting toward the thresholds in subsection (1)(c)(iii) and (iv) of this section are:

(a) Those amounts included in the numerator of the receipts factor under RCW 82.04.462;

(b) For financial institutions, those amounts included in the numerator of the receipts factor under the rule adopted by the department as authorized in RCW 82.04.460(2); and

(c) For persons taxable under RCW 82.04.250(1), 82.04.257(1), or 82.04.270 ((with respect to wholesale sales)), the gross proceeds of sales taxable under those statutory provisions and sourced to this state in accordance with RCW 82.32.730.

(5)(a) Each December, the department must review the cumulative percentage change in the consumer price index. The department must adjust the thresholds in subsection (1)(c)(i) through (iii) of this section if the consumer price index has changed by five percent or more since the later of June 1, 2010, or the date that the thresholds were last adjusted under this subsection. For purposes of determining the cumulative percentage change in the consumer price index, the department must compare the consumer price index available as of December 1st of the current year with the consumer price index as of the later of June 1, 2010, or the date that the thresholds were last adjusted under this subsection. The thresholds must be adjusted to reflect that cumulative percentage change in the consumer price index. The adjusted thresholds must be rounded to the nearest one thousand dollars. Any adjustment will apply to tax periods that begin after the adjustment is made.

(b) As used in this subsection, "consumer price index" means the consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U) available from the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.

(6)(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(iii) of this subsection (6), subsections (1) through (5) of this section only apply with respect to the taxes on persons engaged in apportionable activities as defined in RCW 82.04.460 or making wholesale sales taxable under RCW 82.04.257(1) or 82.04.270.

(ii) Subject to the limitation in RCW 82.32.531, for purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter on ((any)) the business of making sales at retail or any other activity not included in the definition of apportionable activities in RCW 82.04.460, other than the business of making wholesale sales taxed under RCW 82.04.257(1) or 82.04.270, ((except as provided in RCW 82.32.531,)) a person is deemed to have a substantial nexus with this state if the person has a physical presence in this state during the ((tax)) current or immediately preceding calendar year, which need only be demonstrably more than a slightest presence.

(iii) For purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter on the business of making sales at retail taxable under RCW 82.04.250(1) or 82.04.257(1), a person is also deemed to have a substantial nexus with this state if the person's receipts from this state, pursuant to subsection (4)(c) of this section, meet either criterion in subsection (1)(c)(iii) or (iv) of this section, as adjusted under subsection (5) of this section.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, a person is physically present in this state if the person has property or employees in this state.

(c)(i) A person is also physically present in this state for the purposes of this subsection if the person, either directly or through an agent or other representative, engages in activities in this state that are significantly associated with the person's ability to establish or maintain a market for its products in this state.

(ii) A remote seller as defined in RCW 82.08.052 is presumed to be engaged in activities in this state that are significantly associated with the remote seller's ability to establish or maintain a market for its products in this state if the remote seller is presumed to have a substantial nexus with this state under RCW 82.08.052. The presumption in this subsection (6)(c)(ii) may be rebutted as provided in RCW 82.08.052. To the extent that the presumption in RCW 82.08.052 is no longer operative pursuant to RCW 82.32.762, the presumption in this subsection (6)(c)(ii) is no longer operative. ((Nothing in this section may be construed to affect in any way RCW 82.04.424, 82.08.050(11), or 82.12.040(5) or to narrow the scope of the terms "agent" or "other representative" in this subsection (6)(c).))

Sec. 303. RCW 82.04.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 20 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and collected from every person that has a substantial nexus with this state, as provided in RCW 82.04.067, a tax for the act or privilege of engaging in business activities. The tax is measured by the application of rates against value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income of the business, as the case may be.

(2)(a) A person who has a substantial nexus with this state in ((any tax year under the provisions of RCW 82.04.067 will be deemed to have a substantial nexus with this state for the following tax year)) the current calendar year under the provisions of RCW 82.04.067, based solely on the person's property, payroll, or receipts in this state during the current calendar year, is subject to the tax imposed under this chapter for the current calendar year only on business activity occurring on and after the date that the person established a substantial nexus with this state in the current calendar year.

(b) This subsection (2) does not apply to any person who also had a substantial nexus with this state during:

(i) The immediately preceding calendar year under RCW 82.04.067; or

(ii) The current calendar year under RCW 82.04.067 (1)(a) or (b) or (6)(a)(ii) or (c).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304. RCW 82.04.424 (Exemptions—Certain in-state activities) and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 5 s 206 & 2003 c 76 s 2 are each repealed.

Part IV

Eliminate Streamlined Sales Tax Mitigation to Local Governments

Sec. 401. RCW 82.14.495 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 952 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account is created in the state treasury. Through July 1, 2019, the state treasurer ((shall)) must transfer into the account from the general fund amounts as directed in RCW 82.14.500. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purpose of mitigating the negative fiscal impacts to local taxing jurisdictions as a result of RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to RCW 82.14.020. ((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.))

(2) Beginning July 1, 2008, through September 30, 2019, the state treasurer, as directed by the department, ((shall)) must distribute the funds in the streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account to local taxing jurisdictions in accordance with RCW 82.14.500.

(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section and RCW 82.14.390 and 82.14.500 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Agreement" means the same as in RCW 82.32.020.

(b) "Local taxing jurisdiction" means through June 30, 2017, counties, cities, transportation authorities under RCW 82.14.045, public facilities districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57 RCW, public transportation benefit areas under RCW 82.14.440, and regional transit authorities under chapter 81.112 RCW, that impose a sales and use tax. Beginning July 1, 2017, "local taxing jurisdiction" means cities, counties, and public facilities districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57 RCW.

(c) "Loss" or "losses" means the local sales and use tax revenue reduction to a local taxing jurisdiction resulting from the sourcing provisions in RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to RCW 82.14.020.

(d) "Marketplace facilitator/remote seller revenue" means the local sales and use tax revenue gain, including taxes voluntarily remitted and taxes collected from consumers, to each local taxing jurisdiction from part II of this act as estimated by the department in RCW 82.14.500(6).

(e) "Net loss" or "net losses" means a loss offset by any voluntary compliance revenue and marketplace facilitator/remote seller revenue.

(((e))) (f) "Voluntary compliance revenue" means the local sales tax revenue gain to each local taxing jurisdiction reported to the department from persons registering through the central registration system authorized under the agreement.

(((f))) (g) "Working day" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.45.180.

Sec. 402. RCW 82.14.500 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 974 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a))) In order to mitigate local sales tax revenue net losses as a result of the sourcing provisions of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement under this title, the state treasurer, on July 1, 2011, and each July 1st thereafter through July 1, 2019, must transfer into the streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account from the general fund the sum required to mitigate actual net losses as determined under this section.

(((b) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the amount that would otherwise be transferred under (a) of this subsection must be reduced by 3.4 percent.))

(2) Beginning July 1, 2008, and continuing until the department determines annual losses under subsection (3) of this section, the department must determine the amount of local sales tax net loss each local taxing jurisdiction experiences as a result of the sourcing provisions of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement under this title each calendar quarter. The department must determine losses by analyzing and comparing data from tax return information and tax collections for each local taxing jurisdiction before and after July 1, 2008, on a calendar quarter basis. The department's analysis may be revised and supplemented in consultation with the oversight committee as provided in subsection (4) of this section. To determine net losses, the department must reduce losses by the amount of voluntary compliance revenue for the calendar quarter analyzed. Beginning December 31, 2008, distributions must be made quarterly from the streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account by the state treasurer, as directed by the department, to each local taxing jurisdiction, other than public facilities districts for losses in respect to taxes imposed under the authority of RCW 82.14.390, in an amount representing its net losses for the previous calendar quarter. Distributions must be made on the last working day of each calendar quarter and must cease when distributions under subsection (3) of this section begin.

(3)(a) By December 31, 2009, or such later date the department in consultation with the oversight committee determines that sufficient data is available, the department must determine each local taxing jurisdiction's annual loss. The department must determine annual losses by comparing at least twelve months of data from tax return information and tax collections for each local taxing jurisdiction before and after July 1, 2008. The department is not required to determine annual losses on a recurring basis, but may make any adjustments to annual losses as it deems proper as a result of the annual reviews provided in (b) of this subsection. Beginning the calendar quarter in which the department determines annual losses, and each calendar quarter thereafter through September 30, 2019, distributions must be made from the streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account by the state treasurer on the last working day of the calendar quarter, as directed by the department, to each local taxing jurisdiction, other than public facilities districts for losses in respect to taxes imposed under the authority of RCW 82.14.390, in an amount representing one-fourth of the jurisdiction's annual loss reduced by voluntary compliance revenue reported during the previous calendar quarter and marketplace facilitator/remote seller revenue reported during the previous calendar quarter.

(b) The department's analysis of annual losses must be reviewed by December 1st of each year and may be revised and supplemented in consultation with the oversight committee as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) The department must convene an oversight committee to assist in the determination of losses. The committee includes one representative of one city whose revenues are increased, one representative of one city whose revenues are reduced, one representative of one county whose revenues are increased, one representative of one county whose revenues are decreased, one representative of one transportation authority under RCW 82.14.045 whose revenues are increased, and one representative of one transportation authority under RCW 82.14.045 whose revenues are reduced, as a result of RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to RCW 82.14.020. Beginning July 1, 2008, the oversight committee must meet quarterly with the department to review and provide additional input and direction on the department's analyses of losses. Local taxing jurisdictions may also present to the oversight committee additional information to improve the department's analyses of the jurisdiction's loss. Beginning January 1, 2010, the oversight committee must meet at least annually with the department by December 1st.

(5) The rule-making provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW do not apply to this section.

(6)(a) As a result of part II of this act, local sales and use tax revenue is anticipated to increase due to additional tax remittance by marketplace facilitators, remote sellers, and consumers. This additional revenue will further mitigate the losses that resulted from the sourcing provisions of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement under this title and should be reflected in mitigation payments to negatively impacted local jurisdictions.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2018, and continuing through September 30, 2019, the department must determine the increased sales and use tax revenue each local taxing jurisdiction experiences from marketplace facilitator/remote seller revenue as a result of sections 201 through 213 of this act each calendar quarter. The department must convene the mitigation advisory committee before January 1, 2018, to receive input on the determination of marketplace facilitator/remote seller revenue. Beginning with distributions made after March 31, 2018, distributions from the streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account by the state treasurer, as directed by the department, to each local taxing jurisdiction, must be reduced by the amount of its marketplace facilitator/remote seller revenue reported during the previous calendar quarter. No later than December 1, 2019, the department will determine the total marketplace facilitator/remote seller revenue for each local taxing jurisdiction for reporting periods beginning January 1, 2018, through reporting periods ending June 30, 2019. If the total distribution made from the streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account to a local taxing jurisdiction was not fully reduced by its total amount of marketplace facilitator/remote seller revenue for reporting periods beginning January 1, 2018, through reporting periods ending June 30, 2019, the department must reduce the local taxing jurisdiction's distribution of local sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.060 by the excess amount received.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403. (1)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute from the local sales and use tax account to the counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities districts, and transportation benefit districts the amount of tax collected on behalf of each taxing authority, less:

(i) The deduction provided for in RCW 82.14.050; and

(ii) The amount of any refunds of local sales and use taxes exempted under RCW 82.08.962, 82.12.962, 82.08.02565, 82.12.02565, 82.08.025661, or 82.12.025661, which must be made without appropriation; and

(iii) The deduction required under RCW 82.14.500.

(b) The state treasurer must make the distribution under this section without appropriation.

(2) In the event that any ordinance or resolution imposes a sales and use tax at a rate in excess of the applicable limits contained herein, such ordinance or resolution may not be considered void in toto, but only with respect to that portion of the rate that is in excess of the applicable limits contained herein.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404. The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective October 1, 2019:

(1) RCW 82.14.495 (Streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account—Creation) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c . . . s 401 (section 401 of this act), 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 952, 2009 c 4 s 907, & 2007 c 6 s 902;

(2) RCW 82.14.500 (Streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account—Funding—Determination of losses) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c . . . s 402 (section 402 of this act), 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 974, & 2007 c 6 s 903; and

(3) 2017 3rd sp.s. c . . . s 403 (uncodified) (section 403 of this act).

Part V

Miscellaneous Provisions

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. Sections 204 through 208 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502. This act does not affect any existing right acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections amended or repealed or under any rule or order adopted under those sections, nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under those sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503. (1) If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

(2) If the department of revenue is prevented from enforcing chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW against persons without a physical presence in this state because any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the department of revenue must impose such provisions to the fullest extent allowed under the Constitution and laws of the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504. The tax collection, reporting, and payment obligations imposed by this act apply prospectively only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(2) Part I of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect August 1, 2017.

(3) Section 213 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 23, 2017.

(4) Part III of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506. Section 212 of this act expires July 23, 2017.

--- END ---