BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

The time of the state of Washington shall be Pacific Standard Time throughout the calendar year, as determined by reference to Greenwich Mean Time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 1.20.051 (Daylight saving time) and 1963 c 14 s 1 & 1961 c 3 s 1 are each repealed.

--- END ---