BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act shall be known and cited as the county and city regulatory sanctuary act.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.32.120 and 2003 c 337 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative authorities of the several counties shall:

(1) Provide for the erection and repairing of courthouses, jails, and other necessary public buildings for the use of the county;

(2) Lay out, discontinue, or alter county roads and highways within their respective counties, and do all other necessary acts relating thereto according to law, except within cities and towns which have jurisdiction over the roads within their limits;

(3) License and fix the rates of ferriage; grant grocery and other licenses authorized by law to be by them granted at fees set by the legislative authorities which shall not exceed the costs of administration and operation of such licensed activities;

(4) Fix the amount of county taxes to be assessed according to the provisions of law, and cause the same to be collected as prescribed by law;

(5) Allow all accounts legally chargeable against the county not otherwise provided for, and audit the accounts of all officers having the care, management, collection, or disbursement of any money belonging to the county or appropriated to its benefit;

(6) Have the care of the county property and the management of the county funds and business and in the name of the county prosecute and defend all actions for and against the county, and such other powers as are or may be conferred by law;

(7) Make and enforce, by appropriate resolutions or ordinances, all such police and sanitary regulations as are not in conflict with state law, and within the unincorporated area of the county may adopt by reference Washington state statutes and recognized codes and/or compilations printed in book form relating to the construction of buildings, the installation of plumbing, the installation of electric wiring, health, or other subjects, and may adopt such codes and/or compilations or portions thereof, together with amendments thereto, or additions thereto: PROVIDED, That except for Washington state statutes, there shall be filed in the county auditor's office one copy of such codes and compilations ten days prior to their adoption by reference, and additional copies may also be filed in library or city offices within the county as deemed necessary by the county legislative authority: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no such regulation, code, compilation, and/or statute shall be effective unless before its adoption, a public hearing has been held thereon by the county legislative authority of which at least ten days' notice has been given. Any violation of such regulations, ordinances, codes, compilations, and/or statutes or resolutions shall constitute a misdemeanor or a civil violation subject to a monetary penalty: PROVIDED FURTHER, That violation of a regulation, ordinance, code, compilation, and/or statute relating to traffic including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses is a traffic infraction, except that violation of a regulation, ordinance, code, compilation, and/or statute equivalent to those provisions of Title 46 RCW set forth in RCW 46.63.020 remains a misdemeanor. However, the punishment for any criminal ordinance shall be the same as the punishment provided in state law for the same crime and no act that is a state crime may be made a civil violation. The notice must set out a copy of the proposed regulations or summarize the content of each proposed regulation; or if a code is adopted by reference the notice shall set forth the full official title and a statement describing the general purpose of such code. For purposes of this subsection, a summary shall mean a brief description which succinctly describes the main points of the proposed regulation. When the county publishes a summary, the publication shall include a statement that the full text of the proposed regulation will be mailed upon request. An inadvertent mistake or omission in publishing the text or a summary of the content of a proposed regulation shall not render the regulation invalid if it is adopted. The notice shall also include the day, hour, and place of hearing and must be given by publication in the newspaper in which legal notices of the county are printed;

(8) Have power to compound and release in whole or in part any debt due to the county when in their opinion the interest of their county will not be prejudiced thereby, except in cases where they or any of them are personally interested;

(9) Have power to administer oaths or affirmations necessary in the discharge of their duties and commit for contempt any witness refusing to testify before them with the same power as district judges;

(10) Have power to declare by ordinance what shall be deemed a nuisance within the county, including but not limited to "litter" and "potentially dangerous litter" as defined in RCW 70.93.030; to prevent, remove, and abate a nuisance at the expense of the parties creating, causing, or committing the nuisance; and to levy a special assessment on the land or premises on which the nuisance is situated to defray the cost, or to reimburse the county for the cost of abating it. This assessment shall constitute a lien against the property which shall be of equal rank with state, county, and municipal taxes;

(11) Have the power to designate by ordinance the county to be a regulatory sanctuary county and identify within that ordinance which state agency policies, sections of the Washington Administrative Code, and sections of the Revised Code of Washington to which the county has granted itself and its people sanctuary. No state or local agency as defined in RCW 42.56.010, or state court may compel any person acting within a regulatory sanctuary county to comply with the enumerated provisions of law in the ordinance designating the county to be a regulatory sanctuary county. Noncompliance with any of the enumerated provisions of law in an ordinance adopted pursuant to this subsection are not grounds for: Enforcement actions; fees; penalties; or administrative, criminal, or civil lawsuits, that may normally constitute noncompliance with the enumerated state agency policies, sections of the Washington Administrative Code, and sections of the Revised Code of Washington.

Sec. 3. RCW 35.58.180 and 1974 ex.s. c 84 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the powers specifically granted by this chapter a metropolitan municipal corporation shall have all powers which are necessary to carry out the purposes of the metropolitan municipal corporation and to perform authorized metropolitan functions. A metropolitan municipal corporation may contract with the United States or any agency thereof, any state or agency thereof, any other metropolitan municipal corporation, any county, city, special district, or governmental agency and any private person, firm or corporation for the purpose of receiving gifts or grants or securing loans or advances for preliminary planning and feasibility studies, or for the design, construction or operation of metropolitan facilities and a metropolitan municipal corporation may contract with any governmental agency or with any private person, firm or corporation for the use by either contracting party of all or any part of the facilities, structures, lands, interests in lands, air rights over lands and rights-of-way of all kinds which are owned, leased or held by the other party and for the purpose of planning, constructing or operating any facility or performing any service which the metropolitan municipal corporation may be authorized to operate or perform, on such terms as may be agreed upon by the contracting parties: PROVIDED, That before any contract for the lease or operation of any metropolitan public transportation facilities shall be let to any private person, firm or corporation, a general schedule of rental rates for bus equipment with or without drivers shall be publicly posted applicable to all private certificated carriers, and for other facilities competitive bids shall first be called upon such notice, bidder qualifications and bid conditions as the metropolitan council shall determine.

A metropolitan municipal corporation may sue and be sued in its corporate capacity in all courts and in all proceedings.

A metropolitan municipal corporation shall have the power to designate by ordinance the municipal corporation to be a regulatory sanctuary municipal corporation and identify within that ordinance which state agency policies, sections of the Washington Administrative Code, and sections of the Revised Code of Washington to which the municipal corporation has granted itself and its people sanctuary. No state or local agency as defined in RCW 42.56.010, or state court may compel any person acting within a regulatory sanctuary municipal corporation to comply with the enumerated provisions of law in the ordinance designating the municipal corporation to be a regulatory sanctuary municipal corporation. Noncompliance with any of the enumerated provisions of law in an ordinance adopted pursuant to this section are not grounds for: Enforcement actions; fees; penalties; or administrative, criminal, or civil lawsuits, that may normally constitute noncompliance with the enumerated state agency policies, sections of the Washington Administrative Code, and sections of the Revised Code of Washington.

Sec. 4. RCW 35A.11.020 and 2007 c 218 s 66 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative body of each code city shall have power to organize and regulate its internal affairs within the provisions of this title and its charter, if any; and to define the functions, powers, and duties of its officers and employees; within the limitations imposed by vested rights, to fix the compensation and working conditions of such officers and employees and establish and maintain civil service, or merit systems, retirement and pension systems not in conflict with the provisions of this title or of existing charter provisions until changed by the people: PROVIDED, That nothing in this section or in this title shall permit any city, whether a code city or otherwise, to enact any provisions establishing or respecting a merit system or system of civil service for firefighters and police officers which does not substantially accomplish the same purpose as provided by general law in chapter 41.08 RCW for firefighters and chapter 41.12 RCW for police officers now or as hereafter amended, or enact any provision establishing or respecting a pension or retirement system for firefighters or police officers which provides different pensions or retirement benefits than are provided by general law for such classes.

Such body may adopt and enforce ordinances of all kinds relating to and regulating its local or municipal affairs and appropriate to the good government of the city, and may impose penalties of fine not exceeding five thousand dollars or imprisonment for any term not exceeding one year, or both, for the violation of such ordinances, constituting a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor as provided therein. However, the punishment for any criminal ordinance shall be the same as the punishment provided in state law for the same crime. Such a body alternatively may provide that violation of such ordinances constitutes a civil violation subject to monetary penalty, but no act which is a state crime may be made a civil violation.

The legislative body of each code city shall have all powers possible for a city or town to have under the Constitution of this state, and not specifically denied to code cities by law. By way of illustration and not in limitation, such powers may be exercised in regard to the acquisition, sale, ownership, improvement, maintenance, protection, restoration, regulation, use, leasing, disposition, vacation, abandonment or beautification of public ways, real property of all kinds, waterways, structures, or any other improvement or use of real or personal property, in regard to all aspects of collective bargaining as provided for and subject to the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, and in the rendering of local social, cultural, recreational, educational, governmental, or corporate services, including operating and supplying of utilities and municipal services commonly or conveniently rendered by cities or towns.

In addition and not in limitation, the legislative body of each code city shall have any authority ever given to any class of municipality or to all municipalities of this state before or after the enactment of this title, such authority to be exercised in the manner provided, if any, by the granting statute, when not in conflict with this title. Within constitutional limitations, legislative bodies of code cities shall have within their territorial limits all powers of taxation for local purposes except those which are expressly preempted by the state as provided in RCW 66.08.120, ((82.36.440,)) 48.14.020, and 48.14.080.

The legislative body of each code city shall have the power to designate by ordinance the code city to be a regulatory sanctuary city and identify within that ordinance which state agency policies, sections of the Washington Administrative Code, and sections of the Revised Code of Washington to which the city has granted itself and its people sanctuary. No state or local agency as defined in RCW 42.56.010, or state court may compel any person acting within a regulatory sanctuary city to comply with the enumerated provisions of law in the ordinance designating the city to be a regulatory sanctuary city. Noncompliance with any of the enumerated provisions of law in an ordinance adopted pursuant to this section are not grounds for: Enforcement actions; fees; penalties; or administrative, criminal, or civil lawsuits, that may normally constitute noncompliance with the enumerated state agency policies, sections of the Washington Administrative Code, and sections of the Revised Code of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---