BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of agriculture shall produce a sticker for display on each motor fuel pump from which motor fuel is sold at retail that provides the federal and state motor fuel tax rates. The sticker must display the rate of each tax, in cents per gallon, for each type of motor fuel.

(2) The department of agriculture shall include the notice required under subsection (1) of this section with any other notice displayed or required by department rule to be displayed on motor fuel pumps.

(3) The department of agriculture shall distribute fuel tax stickers to all individuals who conduct fuel pump inspections, including department employees and local government employees. Government employees who conduct fuel pump inspections shall display the fuel tax stickers on each fuel pump at the time of inspection. Fuel tax stickers must:

(a) Be displayed on each face of the motor fuel pump on which the price of the motor fuel sold from the pump is displayed; and

(b) Be displayed in a clear, conspicuous, and prominent manner.

(4) The department of agriculture shall produce updated fuel tax stickers on an annual basis when one or more fuel tax rates have changed. Fuel tax stickers must be replaced at the time of fuel pump inspection if the sticker has been updated with any new fuel tax rates.

--- END ---