BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.04.070 and 1909 c 24 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The supreme court((, from and after February 26, 1909,)) shall consist of nine judges until the second Monday in January 2019. Pursuant to Article IV, section 2 of the Washington state Constitution, the number of judges on the state supreme court is revised as follows:

(1) From the second Monday in January 2019, until the second Monday in January 2021, the supreme court consists of six judges.

(2) From the second Monday in January 2023, and thereafter, the supreme court consists of five judges.

Sec. 2. RCW 2.04.071 and 1971 c 81 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((At the next general election, and at each biennial general election thereafter, there shall be elected three justices of the supreme court, to hold for the full term of six years, and until their successors are elected and qualified, commencing with the second Monday in January succeeding their election.)) At the 2018 general election, no election may be held for the office of justice of the state supreme court. Thereafter, justices of the supreme court are elected at biennial general elections on the following basis:

(1) At the 2020 general election and every six years thereafter, two justices;

(2) At the 2022 general election and every six years thereafter, three justices.

Justices hold their positions for the full term of six years and until their successors, if applicable, are elected and qualified, commencing with the second Monday in January succeeding their election.

--- END ---