BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.215.456 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 7 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Funding for the program of early learning established under this chapter must be appropriated to the department. Allocations must be made on the basis of eligible children enrolled with eligible providers.

(2) The program shall be implemented in phases, so that full implementation is achieved in the ((2020-21)) 2022-23 school year.

(3) For the initial phase of the early learning program in school years 2011-12 and 2012-13, the legislature shall appropriate funding to the department for implementation of the program in an amount not less than the 2009-2011 enacted budget for the early childhood education and assistance program. The appropriation shall be sufficient to fund an equivalent number of slots as funded in the 2009-2011 enacted budget.

(4) Beginning in the 2013-14 school year, additional funding for the program must be phased in beginning in school districts providing all-day kindergarten programs under RCW 28A.150.315.

(5) Funding shall continue to be phased in each year until full statewide implementation of the early learning program is achieved in the ((2020-21)) 2022-23 school year, at which time any eligible child shall be entitled to be enrolled in the program.

(6) School districts and approved community-based early learning providers may contract with the department to provide services under the program. The department shall collaborate with school districts, community-based providers, and educational service districts to promote an adequate supply of approved providers.

--- END ---