BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All current and prospective employees of and contractors with the state of Washington who are or may be authorized by the agency for which he or she is employed to access federal tax information are required to have a criminal history record check through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system and through the federal bureau of investigation. The record check must include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card, which must be forwarded by the state patrol to the federal bureau of investigation.

(2) Agencies must establish background investigation policies applicable to current and prospective employees and contractors subject to subsection (1) of this section. Agency background investigation policies must also satisfy any specific background investigation standards established by the internal revenue service. The office of financial management shall create a model background investigation policy.

(3) The cost of the background investigation for current and prospective employees shall be paid by the agency. The agency may charge contractors the cost of the background investigation.

(4) Information received by the employing agency pursuant to this section may be used only for the purposes of making, supporting, or defending decisions regarding the appointment, hiring, or retention of persons, or for complying with any requirements from the internal revenue service. Further dissemination or use of the information is prohibited, notwithstanding any other provision of law.

(5) The office of financial management may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---