BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature recognizes that airport police play an important role in the efficient operations of this state's public airports. Airport police contribute to the safety and security of travelers while they are on airport property and the security of the many airport tenants.

(2) The legislature also recognizes that airport police have limited resources, and the focus of airport police should be on the safety and welfare of airport tenants and travelers rather than the enforcement of ticketing policies of individual private airline companies.

(3) The legislature finds that, in light of recent events, it is necessary to clarify the appropriate use of airport police officers in this state's public airports.

Sec. 2. RCW 53.08.280 and 1981 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the restrictions established under subsection 2 of this section, any port district operating an airport with a police department as authorized by RCW 14.08.120 or designated as a port of entry by the federal government is authorized to appoint police officers with full police powers to enforce all applicable federal, state, or municipal statutes, rules, regulations, or ordinances upon any port-owned or operated properties or operations: PROVIDED, That such police officers must have successfully graduated from a recognized professional police academy or training institution.

(2) A port district operating an airport with a police department under this section may not permit its police officers or agents of the police department to remove passengers, or assist in the removal of passengers, from an airline's aircraft to enforce the airline's overbooking policies or any other airline policy or procedure that is not related to security or safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Nothing in this act shall be construed to alter the terms, conditions, or practices contained in any collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section, until the expiration date of such agreement.

--- END ---