BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.160.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The community economic revitalization board is hereby created to exercise the powers granted under this chapter.

(2) The board shall consist of one member from each of the two major caucuses of the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one member from each of the two major caucuses of the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate. The speaker of the house of representatives and president of the senate must also appoint an alternate member for each appointed legislative member, one alternate from each of the two major caucuses of the house of representatives and senate, to take the place of the board member upon the member's absence. Appointed alternate members must belong to the same caucus as the member they are serving as an alternate for. The appointed alternate members, when serving in their alternate capacity, have all powers to vote and participate in board deliberations as have the other board members. The board shall also consist of the following members appointed by the director of commerce: A recognized private or public sector economist; one port district official; one county official; one city official; one representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe; one representative of the public; one representative of small businesses each from: (a) The area west of Puget Sound, (b) the area east of Puget Sound and west of the Cascade range, (c) the area east of the Cascade range and west of the Columbia river, and (d) the area east of the Columbia river; one executive from large businesses each from the area west of the Cascades and the area east of the Cascades. The appointive members shall initially be appointed to terms as follows: Three members for one-year terms, three members for two-year terms, and three members for three-year terms which shall include the chair. Thereafter each succeeding term shall be for three years. The chair of the board shall be selected by the director of commerce. The members of the board shall elect one of their members to serve as vice-chair. The director of commerce, the director of revenue, the commissioner of employment security, and the secretary of transportation shall serve as nonvoting advisory members of the board.

(3) Management services, including fiscal and contract services, shall be provided by the department to assist the board in implementing this chapter.

(4) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) If a vacancy occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise of appointive members of the board, the director of commerce shall fill the same for the unexpired term. Members of the board may be removed for malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges by the director of commerce, under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(6) A member appointed by the director of commerce may not be absent from more than fifty percent of the regularly scheduled meetings in any one calendar year. Any member who exceeds this absence limitation is deemed to have withdrawn from the office and may be replaced by the director of commerce.

(7) A majority of members currently appointed constitutes a quorum. Alternate members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives or president of the senate are included in a count for a quorum only when serving in their alternate capacity as referenced in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.160.035 and 2003 c 151 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((Each member of the house of representatives who is appointed to the community economic revitalization board under RCW 43.160.030 may designate another member from the house of representatives to take his or her place on the board for meetings at which the member will be absent, as long as the designated member belongs to the same caucus. The designee shall have all powers to vote and participate in board deliberations as have the other board members. Each member of the senate who is appointed to the community economic revitalization board under RCW 43.160.030 may designate another member from the senate to take his or her place on the board for meetings at which the member will be absent, as long as the designated member belongs to the same caucus. The designee shall have all powers to vote and participate in board deliberations as have the other board members.)) Each agency head of an executive agency who is appointed to serve as a nonvoting advisory member of the community economic revitalization board under RCW 43.160.030 may designate an agency employee to take his or her place on the board for meetings at which the agency head will be absent. The designee will have all powers to participate in board deliberations as have the other board members but shall not have voting powers.

--- END ---