BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.09.400 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall:

(1) Issue registrations ((and temporary ORV use permits)) for off-road vehicles, excluding wheeled all-terrain vehicles subject to subsection (4) of this section;

(2) Issue decals for off-road vehicles, excluding wheeled all-terrain vehicles subject to subsection (4) of this section. The decals serve the same function as license plates for vehicles registered under chapter 46.16A RCW;

(3) Charge a fee for each decal covering the actual cost of the decal; ((and))

(4) Issue metal tags, off-road vehicle registrations, and on-road vehicle registrations for wheeled all-terrain vehicles; and

(5) Issue temporary ORV use permits for off-road vehicles as provided in RCW 46.09.430.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.09.442 and 2016 c 84 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any wheeled all-terrain vehicle operated within this state must display a metal tag to be affixed to the rear of the wheeled all-terrain vehicle. The initial metal tag must be issued with an original off-road vehicle registration and upon payment of the initial vehicle license fee under RCW 46.17.350(1)(s). The metal tag must be replaced every seven years at a cost of two dollars. Revenue from replacement metal tags must be deposited into the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account. The department must design the metal tag, which must:

(a) Be the same size as a motorcycle license plate;

(b) Have the words "RESTRICTED VEHICLE" listed at the top of the tag;

(c) Contain designated identification through a combination of letters and numbers;

(d) Leave space at the bottom left corner of the tag for an off-road tab issued under subsection (2) of this section; and

(e) Leave space at the bottom right corner of the tag for an on-road tab, when required, issued under subsection (3) of this section.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (6)(b) of this section, a person who operates a wheeled all-terrain vehicle must have:

(a) A current and proper off-road vehicle registration, with the appropriate off-road tab, and pay the annual vehicle license fee as provided in RCW 46.17.350(1)(s), which must be deposited into the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account. The off-road tab must be issued annually by the department upon payment of initial and renewal vehicle license fees under RCW 46.17.350(1)(s); or

(b) A current temporary ORV use permit as provided in RCW 46.09.430.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (6)(a) of this section, a person who operates a wheeled all-terrain vehicle upon a public roadway must have a current and proper on-road vehicle registration, with the appropriate on-road tab, which must be of a bright color that can be seen from a reasonable distance, and pay the annual vehicle license fee as provided in RCW 46.17.350(1)(r). The on-road tab must be issued annually by the department upon payment of initial and renewal vehicle license fees under RCW 46.17.350(1)(r).

(4) Beginning July 1, 2017, for purposes of subsection (3) of this section, a special year tab issued pursuant to chapter 46.19 RCW to a person with a disability may be displayed on a wheeled all-terrain vehicle in lieu of an on-road tab.

(5) A wheeled all-terrain vehicle may not be registered for commercial use.

(6)(a) A wheeled all-terrain vehicle registration and a metal tag are not required under this chapter for a wheeled all-terrain vehicle that meets the definition in RCW 46.09.310(19), is owned by a resident of another state, and has a vehicle registration and metal tag or license plate issued in accordance with the laws of the other state allowing for on-road travel in that state. This exemption applies only to the extent that: (i) A similar exemption or privilege is granted under the laws of that state for wheeled all-terrain vehicles registered in Washington, and (ii) the other state has equipment requirements for on-road use that meet or exceed the requirements listed in RCW 46.09.457. The department may publish on its web site a list of states that meet the exemption requirements under this subsection.

(b) Off-road operation in Washington state of a wheeled all-terrain vehicle owned by a resident of another state and meeting the definition in RCW 46.09.310(19) is governed by RCW 46.09.420(4).

Sec. 3. RCW 46.09.430 and 2010 c 161 s 219 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The application for a temporary ORV use permit must be made by the owner or the owner's authorized representative to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director on a form furnished or approved by the department. The application must contain:

(a) The name and address of each owner of the off-road vehicle or wheeled all-terrain vehicle; and

(b) Other information that the department may require.

(2) The owner or the owner's authorized representative shall sign the application for a temporary ORV use permit.

(3) The application for a temporary ORV use permit must be accompanied by the temporary ORV use permit fee required under RCW 46.17.400, in addition to any other fees or taxes due for the application.

(4) A temporary ORV use permit:

(a) Is valid for sixty days; and

(b) Must be carried on the vehicle for which it was issued at all times during its operation in this state.

--- END ---