BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2019, out of the several funds specified in this act.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Fiscal year 2018" or "FY 2018" means the period beginning July 1, 2017, and ending June 30, 2018.

(b) "Fiscal year 2019" or "FY 2019" means the period beginning July 1, 2018, and ending June 30, 2019.

(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose.

(3) Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

(4) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2019-2021 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for the project or program in the future.

(5) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining on June 30, 2017, from previous biennial appropriations for each project.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program and State Land Acquisition Study (92000003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 1001, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess. and section 6005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002. FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

Spokane Court Facility Upgrade (92000001)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$66,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$37,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$103,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects (20064008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 131, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

(2) $235,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to the Spokane river forum. The department shall not execute a contract with the grant recipient unless the Spokane river forum is in receipt of all permits by March 1, 2018. If the terms and conditions of this subsection are not met by March 1, 2018, the funding provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$235,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$45,657,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$45,892,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rural Washington Loan Fund (20074008)

Reappropriation:

Rural Washington Loan Account—State. . . .$840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,187,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,027,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (20074009)

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$199,435,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$199,912,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Development Fund (20084850)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,049,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,867,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,916,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (30000013)

Reappropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$104,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$129,895,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$129,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2010 Local and Community Projects (30000082)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other requirements for community projects administered by the department of commerce.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,447,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, Affordable Housing Trust Fund (30000098)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1026, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$49,523,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program (30000103)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$17,128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$132,896,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$150,024,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects (30000166)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1002, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,525,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,817,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program 2013 Loan List (30000184)

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$16,511,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,630,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$38,141,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (30000185)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1041, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., provided that the "New Life Community Development Agency" project may be combined with the "New Life CDA" project in project number 30000188. If the department of commerce and the grantee have not executed a contract by September 1, 2018, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,691,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building Communities Fund Grants (30000188)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1072, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., provided that the "New Life CDA" project may be combined with the "New Life Community Development Agency" project in project number 30000185. If the department of commerce and the grantee have not executed a contract by September 1, 2018, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,252,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,052,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000190)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1070, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$8,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2013-2015 Energy Efficiency Grants (30000193)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1075, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,596,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6003 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$21,061,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,415,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$31,476,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,924,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$40,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building for the Arts Program (30000731)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1029, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,090,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,707,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,797,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Youth Recreational Facilities Program (30000792)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1030, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,105,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,355,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building Communities Fund Program (30000803)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1031, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,357,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,502,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,859,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Trust Fund Appropriation (30000833)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$59,701,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$62,701,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,299,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$83,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2015-2017 Community Economic Revitalization Board Program (30000834)

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$10,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000835)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1035, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$21,276,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,724,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Ultra-Efficient Affordable Housing Demonstration (30000836)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Weatherization Matchmaker Program (30000838)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1037, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$780,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,220,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Energy Efficiency Program (30000845)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1039, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,918,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,082,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017 Local and Community Projects (30000846)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1008, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,528,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,835,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,363,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rapid Housing Improvement Program (30000863)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1010, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$194,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for the Homeless (91000413)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1011, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$408,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$28,536,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2012 Local and Community Projects (91000417)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 302, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$181,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,442,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,623,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Sand Point Building 9 (91000446)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1068, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,703,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,296,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Mental Health Beds (91000447)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1071, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,329,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,671,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Homeless Veterans (91000455)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1064, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,963,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,367,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Farmworkers (91000457)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1065, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,050,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$27,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for People with Developmental Disabilities (91000458)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$540,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,479,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,019,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (91000582)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1074, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,998,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,052,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$36,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

CERB Administered Econ Dev, Innovation & Expo Grants (92000096)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 304, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,944,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,136,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Brownfield Redevelopment Grants (92000100)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1067, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,340,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Port and Export Related Infrastructure (92000102)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 306, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$25,774,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects for Jobs & Economic Development (92000151)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6005 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$5,368,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$8,368,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$28,741,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Youth & Families (92000227)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1079, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$18,327,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,677,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life (92000230)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$89,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,904,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,135,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,128,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Behavioral Health Beds - Acute & Residential (92000344)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1007, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$38,857,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,542,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$44,399,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local & Community Projects 2016 (92000369)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1012, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$88,204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$41,965,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$130,169,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Disaster Emergency Response (92000377)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,807,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Catastrophic Flood Relief (20084850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1074, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$67,687,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$87,687,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Oversight of State Facilities (30000039)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,229,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,229,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

OFM Capital Budget Staff (30000040)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$611,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$611,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cost Effective K-3 Classrooms Assessment (30000053)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1019, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$55,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$70,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Construction Contingency Pool (90000300)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6006 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,853,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,147,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation (30000722)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1088, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,141,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,550,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,691,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,727,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,418,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Old Capitol - Exterior and Interior Repairs (30000724)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$314,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$360,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$674,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,326,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

West Campus Historic Buildings Exterior Preservation (30000727)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Critical Network Standardization & Connectivity (30000732)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1093, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Exterior Lighting Upgrades (30000736)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1098, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (30000889)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$2,680,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capital Furnishings Preservation Committee Projects (92000013)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$63,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$68,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

K-3 Modular Classrooms (91000437)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1022, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1060. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation - 2015-2017 Biennium (30000702)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,584,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,473,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,057,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,541,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,598,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program - 2015-2017 Biennium (30000744)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$14,235,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,332,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$18,567,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,049,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$21,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1062. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,097,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$865,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,962,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,273,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,235,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Heritage Barn Preservation Program (30000009)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$305,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$145,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Historic County Courthouse Grants Program (30000010)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,031,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,469,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Acquisition/Rehabilitation of Historic Matsuda and Mukai Sites (91000006)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$382,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$118,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building (20081319)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: This facility must house a kitchen, commissary, medical supply, and pharmacy operations to improve operational efficiency at western state hospital and at the special commitment center.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$28,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,190,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School - Back-Up Power & Electrical Feeders (30000415)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Lakeland Village: Code Required Campus Infrastructure Upgrades (30002238)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$150,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study & Treatment Center - Orcas: Acute Treatment Addition (30002733)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - South Hall: Building Systems Replacement (30002735)

Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$3,905,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$545,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen - Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$375,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital - Westlake: Nurse Call System (30002739)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$440,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School: New Acute Mental Health Unit (30002745)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,681,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,031,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - Forensic Services: Two Wards Addition (30002765)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,210,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital - Water System: Improvements (30003215)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,540,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$575,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - South Hall: Wards Preservation & Renewal (30003240)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - East Campus: Wards Preservation & Renewal (30003241)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,355,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$245,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - East Campus: Building Systems Replacement (30003244)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and Treatment Center: CLIP Capacity (30003324)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital - Eastlake: Emergency Generator Replacement (30003326)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Western State Hospital (30003388)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

ESH and WSH - All Wards: Patient Safety Improvements (91000019)

Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,769,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,369,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Project: Statewide (91000037)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,850,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Newborn Screening Wing Addition (30000301)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,549,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,049,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Newborn Screening Lab Conversion (30000302)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$141,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,141,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Preconstruction Loans (30000334)

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State. . . .$5,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000336)

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal. . . .$28,494,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,506,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Walla Walla Nursing Facility (20082008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$39,875,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$40,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Eastern Washington Cemetery Upgrade (30000152)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,052,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$640,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,692,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000174)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,120,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,095,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Transformers and Switches (30000143)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$139,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Roof and Equipment Replacement (30000195)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,910,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,748,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,658,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Security Video System (30000791)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,228,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,568,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,796,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: WSR Security Video System (30000795)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,090,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,143,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,233,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Security Video System (30000800)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,439,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$599,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,038,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: TRU Security Video System (30000801)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$631,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,650,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,281,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: SOU IMU Security Video (30000803)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$440,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,265,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,705,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: MSU Bathroom Renovation (30000975)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$540,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SW: Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30001013)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,896,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,396,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Access Road Culvert Replacement and Road Resurfacing (30001078)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,991,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$509,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: Program and Support Building (30001101)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$856,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,044,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Prison Capacity Expansion (30001105)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2059, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,981,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,819,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,800,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Supply Facilities (19742006)

Reappropriation:

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account (Water Supply Facilities)—State. . . .$295,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,255,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3002, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Site Closure Account—State. . . .$8,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,883,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,433,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (20042951)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$157,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$593,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (20052852)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$116,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,484,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20062003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 136, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$99,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,697,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,796,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (20062950)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State. . . .$3,219,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$88,281,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$91,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (20064008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$624,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$98,276,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$98,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Transfer of Water Rights for Cabin Owners (20081951)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$102,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$348,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (20084008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$92,367,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$92,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20084029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3054, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,013,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,987,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000028)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$373,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,623,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,996,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$5,239,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$757,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,996,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$69,113,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. and section 3002, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$1,014,000

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$549,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,563,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$37,471,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$39,034,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000208)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3003, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,656,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,614,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3030, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$834,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,166,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$22,343,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$40,521,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$62,864,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000217)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3004, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,488,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,634,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$258,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,944,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,202,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima Basin Integrated Water Management Plan Implementation (30000278)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$52,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,827,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,879,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO - Tacoma Smelter Plume and Mines (30000280)

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$3,011,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,636,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,647,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (30000282)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$665,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$135,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds Administration (30000283)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,810,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,390,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$23,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Mercury Switch Removal (30000323)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$138,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$362,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000326)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$13,662,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$36,338,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000327)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3067, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal. . . .$4,032,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State. . . .$154,280,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$158,312,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$91,688,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000328)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$9,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000331)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,007,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000332)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$221,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,834,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Dungeness Water Supply & Mitigation (30000333)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 3082, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,426,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$624,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000334)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $400,000 of the reappropriations in this section are provided solely for the department to contract with the city of Ruston for the cleanup and remediation of the Ruston Way tunnel. Funding for the remediation shall not be released to the city of Ruston unless the city of Ruston signs by January 1, 2018, an interlocal agreement with the city of Tacoma that provides for expediting the issuance of building and other related permits for the Point Ruston development.

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$9,238,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$122,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$9,360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$27,300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$36,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects - Programmatic (30000335)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000337)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3007, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$2,578,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,477,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000351)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,123,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000372)

Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Tax Bond Water Supply

Development Account—State. . . .$2,194,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State. . . .$5,463,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$7,657,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$66,843,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$74,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000373)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,812,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,288,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000374)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$25,385,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$37,152,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$62,537,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000389)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3080, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,410,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000427)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$9,858,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,852,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$16,710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,790,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$22,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (30000428)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$525,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Woodstove Emissions (30000429)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3010, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,152,000

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$347,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,499,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,001,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (30000431)

Reappropriation:

Waste Tire Removal Account—State. . . .$496,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$504,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000432)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$9,413,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$487,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$45,476,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,271,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$52,747,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000490)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,679,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$321,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000534)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3061, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

Federal. . . .$50,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

State. . . .$139,671,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$189,671,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,329,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$203,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Financial Assistance Program (30000535)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$31,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$31,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000536)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design (30000537)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$34,826,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$734,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$35,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000538)

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$7,697,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,449,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,146,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000542)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$12,763,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,618,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,381,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000587)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3067, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,746,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$254,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000588)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3068, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State. . . .$4,957,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State. . . .$2,189,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$7,146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,854,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000589)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,861,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000590)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,053,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,660,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$17,713,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,287,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000591)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,829,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,171,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,342,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,942,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (91000032)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$870,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Skagit Mitigation (91000181)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,024,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,201,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Improvements (92000076)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3016, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$18,525,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$51,528,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$70,053,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,947,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$97,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplain Management and Control Grants (92000078)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3069, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$18,090,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,910,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lower Yakima GWMA Program Development (92000085)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$414,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,614,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Drought Response (92000142)

Reappropriation:

State Drought Preparedness Account—State. . . .$1,757,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,966,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,723,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Treatment Plant (Lakewood) (92000156)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,319,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$181,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Port of Tacoma Arkema/Dunlap Mound (92000158)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$803,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,097,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Program Demonstration and Design (30000001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3085, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust

Account—State. . . .$538,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,262,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Program (30000002)

Reappropriation:

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving

Account—State. . . .$9,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$950,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes State Park: Dry Falls Campground Renovation (30000305)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$402,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$402,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Chelan State Park Moorage Dock Pile Replacement (30000416)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$242,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$248,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cape Disappointment North Head Parking (30000522)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$420,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,870,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane Road Improvements, Stage 2D (30000693)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$106,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,823,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,929,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Goldendale Observatory - Expansion (30000709)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,941,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$708,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,649,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steamboat Rock Build Dunes Campground (30000729)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,707,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$792,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Flaming Geyser State Park Infrastructure (30000810)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$590,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,325,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Belfair Replace Failing Electrical Supply to Main Camp Loop (30000813)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$980,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,180,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Health and Safety (30000839)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$827,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,098,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Facility and Infrastructure Preservation (30000845)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,708,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sequim Bay Address Failing Retaining Wall (30000861)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$940,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$182,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,122,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Dock Grant Match (30000872)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Nordic Area Improvements & Horse Camp Development (30000877)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$77,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$182,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Cabins, Yurts, and Associated Park Improvement (30000883)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$630,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$523,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,153,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Facilities and Infrastructures (30000947)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,008,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,109,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,117,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Field Spring Replace Failed Sewage Syst and Non-ADA Comfort Station (30000951)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$60,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$41,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$101,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation From Harms Way (30000959)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$273,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$111,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$384,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Maintenance Shop Relocat From Center of Hist District (30000960)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,260,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$811,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,071,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes - Dry Falls - Upgrade Failing Water Supply Systems (30000962)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Riverside Fisk Property Lk Spokane (Long Lake) Initial Pk Access (30000971)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$932,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$140,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,072,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Program (30000975)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$445,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$46,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane Guest Services (91000429)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$815,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$185,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (20084011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3146, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$1,587,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$96,905,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$98,492,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000002)

Reappropriation:

Riparian Protection Account—State. . . .$423,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$1,949,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,372,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$67,073,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$69,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000138)

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$767,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,233,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000139)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3A, developed May 24, 2011.

Reappropriation:

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$2,216,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$1,867,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,083,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$37,917,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$42,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000140)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,804,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,269,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,073,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$64,989,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$70,062,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000143)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3B, revised April 10, 2013.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$255,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,206,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,461,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Restoration (30000147)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3149, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,575,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000148)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3150, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$163,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,837,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000205)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3161, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$7,344,000

Farm and Forest Account—State. . . .$2,080,000

Riparian Protection Account—State. . . .$759,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$10,072,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$20,255,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$44,745,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$65,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000206)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3162, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$16,250,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,553,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$18,803,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$56,197,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000207)

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$1,197,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,166,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,363,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000210)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2013-2B, developed April 10, 2013.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$1,162,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,838,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000211)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,806,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$59,194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000212)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,596,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3168, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State. . . .$158,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$642,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Land and Water Conservation (30000216)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,497,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,503,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000218)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$119,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,881,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000220)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-1, developed June 30, 2015.

Reappropriation:

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$13,633,000

Farm and Forest Account—State. . . .$2,572,000

Riparian Protection Account—State. . . .$3,163,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$15,423,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$34,791,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,532,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$55,323,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000221)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3164, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$36,117,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,493,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$48,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,890,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$66,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000222)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3024, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$9,989,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,221,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,210,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000223)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3025, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State. . . .$9,603,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,567,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000224)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3167, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,698,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,302,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000225)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-2, developed June 30, 2015.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$2,372,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,897,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,269,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000226)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3169, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$27,521,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,479,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000227)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,451,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,549,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000228)

Reappropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State. . . .$333,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$247,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreational Trails Program (30000229)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,005,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,995,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Infrastructure Grants (30000230)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Land and Water Conservation (30000231)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,845,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$155,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000233)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,592,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,408,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Coastal Restoration Grants (91000448)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3177, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,485,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,185,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreation and Conservation Office Recreation Grants (92000131)

The reappropriation in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3026, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$26,148,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$4,108,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$30,256,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,525,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Cost Share - State Match (30000009)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,690,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Natural Resources Investment for the Economy and Environment (30000010)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP PIP Loan Program (30000011)

Reappropriation:

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State. . . .$49,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$131,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$180,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Contract Funding (30000012)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,062,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,462,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program (30000017)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3033, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$19,600,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,962,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$23,562,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,438,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Improve Shellfish Growing Areas (30000018)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation Commission Ranch & Farmland Preservation Projects (92000004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6019 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,110,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$412,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,522,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

R&D Grant - Deep Furrow Conservation Drill to Conserve Soil/Water (92000008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3186, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$140,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$210,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Dairy Nutrient Demonstrations Low Interest Loans (92000009)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6020 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Deschutes Watershed Center (20062008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3205, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,995,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$15,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local. . . .$1,350,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal. . . .$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local. . . .$1,900,000

State Wildlife Account—State. . . .$500,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$19,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$84,612,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$104,362,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Samish Hatchery Intakes (30000276)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Kalama Falls Hatchery Renovate Adult Handling Facilities (30000480)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wooten Wildlife Area Improve Flood Plain (30000481)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,600,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$3,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Soos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,933,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,934,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3136. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Edmonds Pier Renovation (30000664)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$265,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$535,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3137. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Marblemount Hatchery - Renovating Jordan Creek Intake (30000666)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,068,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$225,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,293,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3138. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Lake Whatcom Hatchery - Replace Intake and Pipeline (30000667)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$154,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,354,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3139. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Fir Island Farm Estuary Restoration Project (30000673)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$180,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,820,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3140. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hoodsport Hatchery Adult Pond Renovation (30000686)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3141. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation (30000727)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,980,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,230,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3142. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Puget Sound and Adjacent Waters Nearshore Restoration - Match (30000753)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$450,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3143. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitchell Act Federal Grant (91000021)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,372,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,628,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3144. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hatchery Improvements (91000036)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$24,475,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3145. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Access Sites (91000044)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$549,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,857,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3146. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Lake Rufus Woods Fishing Access (91000151)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,864,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$136,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3147. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Leque Island Highway 532 Road Protection (92000019)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$304,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$376,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3148. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Clarks Creek Hatchery Rebuild (92000038)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely to rebuild the Clarks creek (Puyallup) hatchery and fulfill Washington department of transportation mitigation requirements as agreed to with the Puyallup Indian nation for the widening of Interstate 5. The new hatchery must be devoted to salmon production. The department must relocate trout production to other hatcheries.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,267,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,067,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3149. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Land Acquisition Grants (20052021)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$87,518,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$89,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3150. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Legacy (30000060)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$4,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3151. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sustainable Recreation (30000207)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3152. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Hazard Reduction (30000224)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3230, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,900,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3153. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Blanchard Working Forest (30000231)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3154. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2015-2017 Minor Works Preservation (30000238)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$885,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,951,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,836,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3155. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Contaminated Sites Cleanup and Settlement (30000240)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3030, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$95,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$836,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$931,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3156. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000241)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,285,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,815,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3157. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (91000040)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,161,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,673,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,834,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3158. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Puget SoundCorps (91000046)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$18,954,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,454,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Access Road Reconstruction (30000059)

Reappropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$140,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Campus Communication Infrastructure Improvement (30000101)

Reappropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$212,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$188,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$400,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2007-09 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (20084200)

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$98,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$747,225,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$747,323,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Northeast King County Skills Center (20084855)

Reappropriation:

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State. . . .$41,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,163,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Pierce County Skills Center (20084856)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$549,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$34,995,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$35,544,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2009-11 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (30000031)

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$389,439,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$389,569,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$1,202,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$528,850,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$530,052,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

SEA-Tech Branch Campus of Tri-Tech Skills Center (30000078)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$47,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,470,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,517,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Grant County Branch Campus of Wenatchee Valley Skills Center (30000091)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$64,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,144,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,208,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Clark County Skills Center (30000093)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$87,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,814,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,901,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2013-15 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance (30000145)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$37,201,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,181,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$387,382,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tri-Tech Skills Center East Growth (30000159)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,702,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,702,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2015-17 School Construction Assistance Program (30000169)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5013, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$72,988,000

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$228,879,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$301,867,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$252,269,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$554,136,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Capital Program Administration (40000007)

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$1,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

STEM Pilot Program (91000402)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5026, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,238,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,262,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (91000404)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5027, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,872,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids - Healthy Schools Grants (91000406)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5014, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,664,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,336,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Wenatchee Valley Skills Center (92000004)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$269,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,231,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

NEWTECH (Spokane Area Professional-Technical Skills Center) (92000005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5020, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$387,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,450,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$21,837,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Puget Sound Skills Center (92000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5021, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,295,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,638,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center Sunnyside Satellite (92000013)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$238,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,987,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

K-3 Class-size Reduction Grants (92000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5028, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$209,571,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$24,929,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$234,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Campus Preservation (30000088)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$484,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Burke Museum (20082850)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$24,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$29,800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$54,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Bothell (30000378)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for predesign, which may also serve as bridging documents, design, competition honoraria, project management, and other planning activities including permits.

(2) Criteria for selecting the design-build contractor must include life cycle costs, energy costs, or energy use index. Contractors and architectural and engineering firms may be eligible for additional points during the scoring process if they have experience with the state agency, or if they are considered a small business.

(3) The building must be built using sustainable building standards as defined in section 7008, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$370,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Education - T-Wing Renovation/Addition (30000486)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$205,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$418,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$623,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

School of Nursing Simulation Learning Lab (30000600)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Interprofessional Education Classroom (30000602)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,360,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,710,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Computer Science and Engineering Expansion (30000603)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$17,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Minor Capital Repairs - Preservation (30000604)

Reappropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,175,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Ctr for Advanced Materials and Clean Energy Research Test Beds (91000016)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Campus Soil Remediation (92000002)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,850,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Troy Hall Renovation (20061030)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,500,000

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$500,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$27,303,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,303,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Pullman - Plant Sciences Building (REC#5) (30000519)

Reappropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$3,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

2015-17 Minor Works - Preservation (30001188)

Reappropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$27,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Tri-Cities - Academic Building (30001190)

Reappropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Everett University Center (91000026)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$59,563,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$64,563,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Inventory and Condition of Schools Data Collection (91000033)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5008, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,136,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,336,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Interdisciplinary Science Center (30000001)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,391,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,191,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Renewal I (30000506)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,124,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,949,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000513)

Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,017,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,017,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program (30000516)

Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Samuelson Communication and Technology Center (SCTC) (30000451)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$29,084,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,957,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$61,041,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Nutrition Science (30000456)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,522,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,078,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation (30000684)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,835,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,935,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Bouillon Hall Renovation (30000711)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,477,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,977,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Program (30000723)

Reappropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,477,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,777,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Lind Hall Renovation (30000738)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Old Heat - Plant Annex (30000767)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Science Center - Lab I Basement Renovation (30000118)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$719,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,326,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,045,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Seminar I Renovation (30000125)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$225,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Facilities Preservation (30000457)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,195,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$2,217,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$3,412,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,936,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,348,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works Program (30000487)

Reappropriation:

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$439,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$725,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,164,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Lecture Hall Remodel (30000493)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$719,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,142,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$17,861,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Carver Academic Renovation (20081060)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$3,500,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$62,874,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$71,374,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000615)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$1,825,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$3,025,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,856,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,881,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grants Projects (30000170)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$483,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,348,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,831,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Facilities Preservation - Minor Works Projects (30000222)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,534,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,684,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Grants (30000237)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5099, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,653,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,347,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000038)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$410,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$702,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Grays Harbor College: Science and Math Building (20081226)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$257,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$43,887,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$44,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Community College: Health Careers Center (20082701)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,915,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$34,258,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$41,173,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue Community College: Health Science Building (20082702)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$351,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,375,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$31,726,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates Technical College: Mohler Communications Technology Center (20082703)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,339,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$26,447,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia Basin College: Social Science Center (20082704)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,531,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,581,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark College: Health and Advanced Technologies Building (20082705)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$78,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$36,974,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,052,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Seattle Central Community College: Seattle Maritime Academy (30000120)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$363,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,465,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,828,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Community College: Palmer Martin Building (30000121)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,779,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$18,461,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic College: College Instruction Center (30000122)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,174,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,966,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Centralia Community College: Student Services (30000123)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,142,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$32,464,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,606,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Peninsula College: Allied Health and Early Childhood Dev Center (30000126)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,012,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,588,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle Community College: Cascade Court (30000128)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$17,892,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,426,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,318,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Community College: Technology Building Renewal (30000129)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$675,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$24,744,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5072. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Renton Technical College: Automotive Complex Renovation (30000134)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$61,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,772,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,833,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5073. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds Community College: Science, Engineering, Technology Bldg (30000137)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,613,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,207,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5074. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Whatcom Community College: Learning Commons (30000138)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$63,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,759,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,822,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5075. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Big Bend: Professional - Technical Education Center (30000981)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,047,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5076. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane: Main Building South Wing Renovation (30000982)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for predesign and design, which may also serve as bridging documents, design, competition honoraria, project management, and other planning activities including permits.

(2) Criteria for selecting the design-build contractor must include life cycle costs, energy costs, or energy use index. Contractors and architectural and engineering firms may be eligible for additional points during the scoring process if they have experience with the state agency, or if they are considered a small business.

(3) The building must be built using sustainable building standards as defined in section 7008, chapter 3, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,823,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,823,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5077. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline: Health and Life Sciences (30000983)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,564,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,368,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,932,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5078. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover Park: Center for Advanced Manufacturing Technologies (30000984)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for predesign and design, which may also serve as bridging documents, design, competition honoraria, project management, and other planning activities including permits.

(2) Funding authorized pursuant to section 7002(6)(g) of this act for construction may be delivered using design-build, as defined by chapter 39.10 RCW, with a guarantee for energy, operations, and maintenance performance. The term for performance guarantee must not be less than one year. The state may use state employees for services not related to building performance.

(3) Criteria for selecting the design-build contractor must include life cycle costs, energy costs, or energy use index. Contractors and architectural and engineering firms may be eligible for additional points during the scoring process if they have experience with the state agency, or if they are considered a small business.

(4) The building must be built using sustainable building standards as defined in section 7008, chapter 3, Laws of 2015, 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,791,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$353,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,144,000

(End of part)

PART 6

SUPPLEMENTAL CAPITAL BUDGET

Sec. 6001. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Library - Archives Building (30000033)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for a predesign to determine: (a) Necessary program space for the state library currently located in Tumwater, and additional archive space; (b) capital budget requirements, including the use of fees collected by the secretary of state that will support a certificate of participation for the financing of the construction of the facility, and future operating costs; and (c) projected efficiencies of electronic document storage in determining necessary space.

(2) The study must consider the use of the general administration building site as a possible location; and any benefits or consequences may be identified at this site or other sites considered; and lease options.

(3) The office of financial management shall determine the maximum use of the site and consider the consolidation of other state agencies, including separately elected officials.

(4) The building must be a high performance building as described in section 7008 of this act and the construction must be procured using a performance based method including design-build or design-build-operate-maintain.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($400,000))

﻿ $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$55,428,000

TOTAL. . . .(($55,828,000))

﻿ $55,728,000

Sec. 6002. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Renton Aerospace Training Center Construction (30000724)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3, chapter 1, Laws of 2013 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($10,000,000))

﻿ $1,089,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($10,000,000))

﻿ $1,089,000

Sec. 6003. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions or otherwise increase energy independence for the state.

(2) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive bidding processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects;

(b) Require that all expenditures be used for projects that develop and acquire asset that have a useful life of at least thirteen years; and

(c) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(3)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require an applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed or on the firm's governing board during the past twenty-four months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employed by, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of a contract.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a contractor either in procuring or performing under the contract, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the contract by written notice. If the contract is terminated, the department must be entitled to pursue the same remedies against the contractor as it could pursue in the event of a breach of the contract by the contractor.

(4) The requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(5) The department may not obligate or expend any of the amounts provided in this section on new projects that involve the Snohomish county public utilities district or its subcontractors until the executive ethics board responds to the department's June 17, 2015, request for an advisory opinion on poststate employment.

(6)(a) (($10,000,000)) $14,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account is provided solely to create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven energy efficiency and renewable energy, and transportation electrification technologies now inhibited by lack of access to capital.

(b) The department shall provide grant funds to one or more competitively selected nonprofit lenders that will provide matching private capital and will administer the loan fund. The department must select the loan fund administrator or administrators through a competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts, applying criteria specified by the department.

(c) The department must establish guidelines that specify applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and selection criteria. The guidelines must be used by the nonprofit lenders.

(d) Loan applications must disclose all sources of public funds invested in the project. The nonprofit lender must make loans available to the following types of projects that include, but are not limited to: Residential, commercial, industrial, and agricultural energy retrofits((,)); residential and community-scale solar installations((,)); anaerobic digesters to treat dairy and organic waste((, and)); combined heat and power projects using woody biomass as a fuel source; electric vehicle charging infrastructure and equipment for cars, trucks, and buses; upgrades to facilitate such equipment and infrastructure; and acquisition of zero-emission buses and class 4-8 vehicles, including but not limited to trucks and passenger shuttles.

(e) State funds may not exceed fifty percent of the estimated cost of a project, and funding preference must be provided to projects that offer a higher percentage of nonstate match funds.

(7) (($6,600,000)) $100,000 of the state taxable building construction account is provided solely for credit enhancements of advanced solar and renewable energy manufacturing within Washington state. The department shall develop an application process to competitively select projects.

(8)(a) $13,000,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for grants to advance clean and renewable energy technologies and advance transmission and distribution control system improvements for increased reliability, resiliency, and enabling integration of distributed and renewable resources and technology by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible utilities may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding.

(b) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, allow smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding.

(c) The department shall convene an advisory panel of electric utility representatives to identify program objectives, near term priorities and long term goals.

(d) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(e) Grant funds must be used for research, development, or demonstration projects that integrate intermittent renewables through energy storage, information technology or other smart grid technologies, dispatch energy storage resources from utility control rooms, use demand response, transactive control, or the thermal properties and electric load of commercial buildings and district energy systems to store energy, reduce transmission congestion or otherwise improve system reliability and resiliency and enable integration of distributed and renewable energy sources.

(9)(a) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for grants to match federal funds or other nonstate funding sources used to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies.

(b) The department shall consult with the University of Washington, Washington State University, the Pacific Northwest national laboratory and other clean energy organizations to design the program. The program shall offer matching funds for competitively selected clean energy projects including, but not limited to: Advancing energy storage and solar technologies, advancing bioenergy, developing new lightweight materials, and advancing renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies.

(10) $400,000 of the state building construction account—state is provided solely for capital funding of competitively selected wood energy conversion projects at public facilities.

(11) The department must report on number and results of projects that receive grants or loans through the clean energy fund, including the number of job hours created and the number of jobs maintained and created, to the governor and the legislature, by November 1, 2016.

(12) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts and provide a report of the metrics, including at a minimum the current energy used by the building, the energy use after efficiencies are completed, and cost of energy saved, to the house of representatives technology & economic development committee and the senate energy, environment & telecommunications committee. The report must include these metrics from other states.

(13) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided for the Pacific Northwest national laboratory to use demand side management and analyze electricity use by the department of corrections. After the analysis is performed any remaining funds may be used for reducing energy use of the department of corrections. The department must make energy records available.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($17,000,000))

﻿ $14,600,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($23,400,000))

﻿ $25,800,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$40,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$240,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$280,400,000

Sec. 6004. 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 1008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017 Local and Community Projects (30000846)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is released for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) As the most trade dependent state in the nation, the legislature recognizes the significant statewide benefits to be gained from the proposed Asia Pacific cultural center. The multipurpose facility will serve as a needed cultural resource for Washington's Asian and Pacific Islander community; provide affordable housing and educational opportunities; strengthen relations with our Asia-Pacific trading partners; and deliver economic growth as a commercial and tourist destination. The legislature intends to support the development of the project through a grant to be used for project coordination and development of a sustainable financial plan, which the legislature intends as a prerequisite to consideration of any further state capital commitment.

(8) $500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the 242 home development corporation to develop mental health housing, first and broad, Seattle.

(9) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Projects

Amounts

Airway Heights Recreational Complex (Airway Heights)

$200,000

Algona Community Center (Algona)

$500,000

Asia Pacific Cultural Center (Ruston)

$200,000

Bellevue Boys & Girls Club (Bellevue)

$200,000

Bridgeview Education and Employment Resource Center (Vancouver)

$750,000

Central Alarm System (Cook)

$1,000

Chehalis Boys & Girls Club New Facility (Chehalis)

$200,000

Chelatchie Prairie RR Museum & Building Entrance (Yacolt)

$200,000

Chelatchie Prairie RR Museum & Building Maintenance (Yacolt)

$300,000

Coastal Resiliency Project (Ocean Shores)

$200,000

DuPont Historical Museum Renovation (DuPont)

$21,000

Edmonds Veterans Plaza (Edmonds)

$77,000

Ellensburg Train Station (Ellensburg)

$400,000

Evergreen Pool Improvements (White Center)

$90,000

Fort Steilacoom Park (pave and stripe parking lot) (Lakewood)

$257,000

Goldendale Senior Center (Goldendale)

$155,000

Grays Harbor Gateway Center (Aberdeen)

$550,000

Historic Fox Theatre Restoration (Centralia)

$250,000

Historic Ship Preservation Project (Bremerton)

$300,000

Holocaust Center for Humanity (Seattle)

$200,000

Kingston Green Community Village (Kingston)

$85,000

Kitsap Peninsula Water Trails (Multiple, along peninsula)

$52,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center (Lake Stevens)

$309,000

Lyle Activity Center Restoration (Lyle)

$270,000

Mason County Veterans Shelter / Housing (Shelton)

$206,000

Meals on Wheels Kitchen and Café Equipment (Richland)

$206,000

Mental Health Housing, First and ((Denny)) Broad (Seattle)

$500,000

Mill Creek Parks and Public Works Shop (Mill Creek)

$257,000

Mother Joseph Academy Roof Replacement (Vancouver)

$1,000,000

Parkland Prairie Nature Preserve (Parkland)

$30,000

Pasco Early Learning Center (Pasco)

$300,000

Pepin Creek Realignment (Lynden)

$400,000

Performing Arts & Event Center (Federal Way)

$52,000

Port of Sunnyside Demolish Carnation Building (Sunnyside)

$100,000

RAC-Covered Bleachers Project (Lacey)

$26,000

Riverwalk Trail Phase VI (Puyallup)

$500,000

Scott Hill Park of Woodland (Woodland)

$500,000

Shelter and Navigation Center (Seattle)

$600,000

Skagit County Children's Advocacy Center (Mount Vernon)

$318,000

Skyline Community Meeting Space (White Salmon)

$172,000

South Kitsap High School NJROTC (Port Orchard)

$30,000

SR 542 Kendall, Columbia Valley Trail (Kendall)

$77,000

Tenino Depot Museum Roof (Tenino)

$22,000

Wesley Homes (Des Moines)

$100,000

Westport Marina Dredging (Westport)

$200,000

Total

$11,363,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,363,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,363,000

Sec. 6005. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 6005 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects for Jobs and Economic Development (92000151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriations are released for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriations are provided solely for the following list of projects:

Projects for Jobs & Economic Development

Authorized Amount

City of Bremerton Puget Sound Naval Safety Project

$1,300,000

Fairchild Airforce Base

$2,700,000

City of Lynnwood Main Street Improvements

$250,000

Port of Everett: Roll-On/Roll-Off Cargo Berth

$1,500,000

Kittitas County Infrastructure and Facilities

$5,000,000

City of Kennewick Industrial Land

$1,000,000

Perry Tech Institute Building

$1,000,000

City of Buckley Drinking Water Improvements

$350,000

Carbonado Reservoir Replacement

$525,000

Hopelink Cleveland Street Project

$1,000,000

Redmond Connector

$1,300,000

Washougal Wastewater Treatment Plant

$1,000,000

Roslyn Renaissance Northwest Improvement Company Building

$500,000

Everett/Tulalip Water Pipeline Construction

$1,000,000

Renton Riverview Bridge Replacement

$1,100,000

Omak City Sewer, Collection System, and Treatment Plant

$2,000,000

Harper Pier Replacement

$800,000

University Place Main Street Redevelopment

$975,000

Sultan Alder Avenue Water/Sewer Line Replacement

$185,000

Quincy Industrial Water Reclamation & Reuse

$700,000

NW Medical School

$136,000

Ione - 8th St Lift Station Replacement

$165,000

Stevens PUD Projects

$532,000

Port Orchard Bay St. Pedestrian Path - Phase 2

$336,000

Dekalb Pier - Phase 2

$255,000

Kenmore Village

$300,000

South Kirkland TOD/Cross Kirkland Corridor

$1,300,000

Washington Agriculture Discovery Center

$100,000

Mountlake Terrace Mainstreet Grant

$2,000,000

Issaquah - North Roadway Network Improvement

$5,000,000

TRIDEC Development of Small Modular Reactor Proposal

$500,000

((City of Shelton Wastewater)) Basin 3 Sewer Rehabilitation

$1,500,000

Port of Moses Lake Firefighting System

$300,000

Seattle Chinatown/ID Development

$500,000

TOTAL

$37,109,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$30,009,000

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$7,100,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$37,109,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,109,000

Sec. 6006. 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 1015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Construction Contingency Pool (90000300)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for construction projects that confront emergent and unavoidable costs in excess of the construction contingency included in the project appropriation. For requests occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting contingency funds from the office of financial management. Eligible agencies that may apply to the pool include higher education institutions, the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, the department of enterprise services, the department of veterans affairs, the parks and recreation commission, and the department of fish and wildlife. Eligible construction projects are only projects that had cost reductions as kept on file with the office of financial management, and the carver academic renovation project funded in section 5084, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp.s. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee as projects are approved for funding.

(2)(a) The legislature intends to use the 1063 Block building development project as a model of efficient space and energy use for both owned and leased state office buildings.

(b) To achieve this intent, the office of financial management must reconsider tenants for the building, including consideration of the utilities and transportation commission, all current tenants of the general administration building with operations compatible with a high density office building, and other possible tenants. The measure of achieving a higher space efficiency is measured by the average square feet per housed employee.

(c) The office of financial management must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the redesign and the increase space efficiency by October 15, 2015.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

Sec. 6007. 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 1016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repairs (90000301)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected building or grounds failures that will impact public health and safety and the day-to-day operations of the facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, an emergency declaration signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The emergency declaration must include a description of the health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of other funding that may be applied to the project. For emergencies occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting emergency funds from the office of financial management. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee as emergency projects are approved for funding.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($7,000,000))

﻿ $6,662,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($7,000,000))

﻿ $6,662,000

Sec. 6008. 2016 sp.s c 35 s 2011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: New Civil Ward (92000022)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($450,000))

﻿ $0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($450,000))

﻿ $0

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6009. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Behavioral Health: Compliance with Systems Improvement Agreement (30003849)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6010. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCCCW: Critical DNR Replacement (30001170)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$375,000

Sec. 6011. 2016 sp.s c 35 s 3018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low Interest Loans for Drought Wells (92000148)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department shall establish a low-interest loan program to allow agricultural or public entities to drill or retrofit wells to mitigate the effects of drought. For loans that are repaid within five years, the interest rate must be thirty percent of the average rate for twenty year municipal bonds as published in the bond buyer index, and for loans that are repaid between five and twenty years, the rate must be sixty percent of the average rate for twenty year municipal bonds as published in the bond buyer index. A well that is funded by this program may be operated only during a drought declaration.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($4,000,000))

﻿ $0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($4,000,000))

﻿ $0

Sec. 6012. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3118 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Facilities and Infrastructures (30000947)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($11,117,000))

﻿ $10,484,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($250,000))

﻿ $0

TOTAL. . . .(($11,367,000))

﻿ $10,484,000

Sec. 6013. 2015 3rd sp.s c 3 s 3101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Health and Safety (30000839)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($5,160,000))

﻿ $4,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($5,160,000))

﻿ $4,590,000

Sec. 6014. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3198 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Spring Hatchery Renovation (30000214)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($500,000))

﻿ $93,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($11,722,000))

﻿ $13,222,000

TOTAL. . . .(($12,222,000))

﻿ $13,315,000

Sec. 6015. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3200 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minter Hatchery Intakes (30000277)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($250,000))

﻿ $105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($7,948,000))

﻿ $8,948,000

TOTAL. . . .(($8,198,000))

﻿ $9,053,000

Sec. 6016. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

((Nasselle)) Naselle Hatchery Renovation (30000671)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($275,000))

﻿ $132,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($13,556,000))

﻿ $17,056,000

TOTAL. . . .(($13,831,000))

﻿ $17,188,000

Sec. 6017. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Soos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($15,000,000))

﻿ $9,933,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($9,103,000))

﻿ $14,103,000

TOTAL. . . .(($24,103,000))

﻿ $24,036,000

Sec. 6018. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3197 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Clarks Creek Hatchery Rebuild (92000038)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to substantially rebuild the Clarks creek (Puyallup) hatchery and fulfill Washington department of transportation mitigation requirements as agreed to with the Puyallup Indian nation for the widening of Interstate 5. The new hatchery must be devoted to salmon production. The department must relocate trout production to other hatcheries.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $10,067,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $10,067,000

Sec. 6019. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3188 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation Commission Ranch and Farmland Preservation Projects (92000004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of ranch land preservation projects:

Lust family farm and ranch preservation. . . .(($1,619,000))

$2,210,000

Imrie ranches Rock creek agricultural easement. . . .$4,913,000

Kelley ranches agricultural easement. . . .(($2,316,000))

$55,000

Dungeness watershed farmland protection phase 3. . . .$344,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($9,192,000))

﻿ $7,522,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($9,192,000))

﻿ $7,522,000

Sec. 6020. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3187 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Dairy Nutrient Demonstration Low Interest Loans (92000009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for ((low interest loans for two or more)) nonshellfish projects assisting landowners to address impacts to water quality, air quality, and water resources, and other impacts to natural resources. Of this amount, $2,000,000 is provided solely for grants for dairy nutrient management ((demonstration)) projects, with at least one located west of the cascades and one east of the cascades.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction

Account—State. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $2,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $4,000,000

Sec. 6021. 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 5004 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2015-17 School Construction Assistance Program (30000169)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $990,000 of the common school construction account—state is provided solely for the Spokane Valley technical skills center to construct five science classrooms.

(2) $675,000 of the common school construction account—state is provided solely for study and survey grants. In calculating study and survey grants, for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award no more than fifty percent of the dollar amount for the minimum grants and square footage allocations. School districts receiving these grants in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium must use data collected or validated by the Washington State University extension energy office for the inventory and condition of existing school facilities.

(3) School districts receiving funding through the 2015-17 school construction assistance program must map the design of new facilities and remap the design of facilities to be remodeled.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must weight and prioritize grant requests on the following criteria and in the following order: (a) Will provide facility capacity needs to reduce kindergarten through third grade class sizes at high poverty schools; (b) will provide facility capacity needs to reduce kindergarten through third grade class sizes in remaining schools.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must expedite allocation and distribution of any eligible funds under the school construction assistance grant program for the appropriations provided to the superintendent of public instruction in this act for distressed schools, STEM pilot projects, or skill centers. For purposes of determining state funding assistance, eligible area must be calculated as follows: (a) Eligible area for STEM pilot projects is 1,440 square feet per science lab or classroom combination, or both; and 1,040 square feet per science classroom. Total eligible area per STEM pilot project must not exceed 15,840 square feet, and total eligible area of all STEM pilot projects from this section must not exceed 36,880 square feet; (b) eligible area for skill centers is gross square feet of the proposed project as submitted to the office of financial management as requested by the superintendent for consideration in the 2015-2017 capital budget. Eligible area for the Spokane Valley technical skills center must not exceed 5,400 square feet, and; (c) eligible area for replacement of the cafeteria at Marysville-Pilchuck high school is 13,500 square feet.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($305,721,000))

﻿ $293,513,000

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .(($337,135,000))

﻿ $256,873,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal. . . .(($3,000,000))

﻿ $3,750,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($645,856,000))

﻿ $554,136,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,638,150,000

TOTAL. . . .(($4,284,006,000))

﻿ $4,192,286,000

Sec. 6022. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 5034 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Burke Museum (20082850)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$650,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($26,000,000))

﻿ $50,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,150,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($24,200,000))

﻿ $0

TOTAL. . . .$54,000,000

Sec. 6023. RCW 70.340.130 and 2016 c 161 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On July 1, 2016, if the cash balance amount in the pollution liability insurance program trust account exceeds seven million five hundred thousand dollars after excluding the reserves under RCW 70.148.020(2), the state treasurer shall transfer the amount exceeding seven million five hundred thousand dollars, up to a transfer of ten million dollars, from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account. If ten million dollars is not available to be transferred on July 1, 2016, then by the end of fiscal year 2017, if the cash balance amount in the pollution liability insurance program trust account exceeds seven million five hundred thousand dollars after excluding the reserves under RCW 70.148.020(2), the state treasurer shall transfer the amount exceeding seven million five hundred thousand dollars from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account. The total amount transferred in fiscal year 2017 from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account may not exceed ten million dollars.

(2) On July 1, 2017, and every two years thereafter at the start of each successive biennium, if the cash balance amount in the pollution liability insurance program trust account exceeds seven million five hundred thousand dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer the amount exceeding seven million five hundred thousand dollars after excluding the reserves under RCW 70.148.020(2), up to a transfer of twenty million dollars, from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account. If twenty million dollars is not available to be transferred at the beginning of the first fiscal year of the biennium, ((on July 1st)) by the end of the subsequent fiscal year, if the cash balance amount in the pollution liability insurance program trust account exceeds seven million five hundred thousand dollars after excluding the reserves under RCW 70.148.020(2), the state treasurer shall transfer the amount exceeding seven million five hundred thousand dollars from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account. The total amount transferred in a biennium from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account may not exceed twenty million dollars.

(End of part)

PART 7

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7001. To ensure that major construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent, appropriations in this act in excess of $5,000,000, or $10,000,000 for higher education institutions, may not be expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign. The predesign document must include, but not be limited to, program, site, and cost analysis, and an analysis of the life-cycle costs of the alternatives explored, in accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management. The results of life-cycle cost analysis must be a primary consideration in the selection of a building design. Construction may proceed only upon providing to the office of financial management the life-cycle costs. To improve monitoring of major construction projects, progress reports must be submitted by the agency administering the project to the office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate. Reports must be submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a format to be developed by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7002. (1) The legislature finds that use of life-cycle cost analysis will aid public entities, architects, engineers, and contractors in making design and construction decisions that positively impact both the initial construction cost and the ongoing operating and maintenance cost of a project. To ensure that the total cost of a project is accounted for and the most reasonable and cost efficient design is used, agencies shall develop life-cycle costs for any construction project over $10,000,000. The life-cycle costs must represent the present value sum of capital costs, installation costs, operating costs, and maintenance costs over the life expectancy of the project. The legislature further finds the most effective approach to the life-cycle cost analysis is to integrate it into the early part of the design process.

(2) Agencies shall develop a minimum of three project alternatives for use in the life-cycle cost analysis. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. The chosen alternative must be the most reasonable and cost-effective solution. A brief description of each project alternative and why it was chosen must be included in the life-cycle cost analysis section of the predesign.

(3) The office of financial management shall: (a) Make available a life-cycle cost model to be used for analysis; (b) in consultation with the department of enterprise services, provide assistance in using the life-cycle cost model; and (c) update the life-cycle cost model annually including assumptions for inflation rates, discount rates, and energy rates.

(4) Agencies shall consider architectural and engineering firms' and general contractors' experience using life-cycle costs, operating costs, and energy efficiency measures when selecting an architectural and engineering firm, or when selecting contractors using alternative contracting methods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7003. To improve monitoring of major construction projects, progress reports must be submitted by the agency administering the project to the office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate. Reports must be submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a format to be determined by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7004. (1) Allotments for appropriations in this act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and RCW 43.88.110.

(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7005. (1) The office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the completion of such project to another capital project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or institution of higher education and only between capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that govern the grants.

(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in this act.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.

(4) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within thirty days from the date of transfer.

(5) The transfer authority granted in this section does not apply to appropriations for projects for the state parks and recreation commission. Appropriations for commission projects may be spent only for the specified projects, and funding may not be transferred from one commission project to another or from other sources to a commission project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7006. (1) It is expected that projects be ready to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.

(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.

(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and shall use contracted design and construction services wherever necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7007. State agencies, including institutions of higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008. Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005. Agencies shall comply with the requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7009. FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION—ART WORK ALLOWANCE. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210.

(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding $200,000 by colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027.

(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any public building by a state agency identified in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200.

(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission during the 2017-2019 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely for direct acquisition of works of art. Art allocations not expended within the ensuing two biennia will lapse. The commission may use up to $150,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces in the state art collection pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210.

(5) The executive director of the arts commission shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the one-half of one percent for works of art purchased or commissioned as required by RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200. The findings of the review must be reported annually to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by September 15th. The review must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) Projects purchased or commissioned per biennium; (b) partner agencies; (c) funding sources by fiscal year; (d) artwork costs; (e) administrative costs; (f) collection care costs; and (g) project status.

Sec. 7010. RCW 28B.10.027 and 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 6008 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All universities and colleges shall allocate as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding two hundred thousand dollars of any building, an amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state arts commission with the approval of the board of regents or trustees for the acquisition of works of art.

(2) For projects funded in the 2015-2017 capital budget and the 2017-2019 capital budget, an institution of higher education, working with the Washington arts commission, may expend up to ten percent of the projected art allocation for a project during the design phase in order to select an artist and design art to be integrated in the building design. The one-half of one percent to be expended by the Washington arts commission must be adjusted downward by the amount expended by a university or college during the design phase of the capital project.

(3) The works of art may be placed on public lands of institutions of higher education, integral to or attached to a public building or structure of institutions of higher education, detached within or outside a public building or structure of institutions of higher education, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public facilities.

(4) In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of one percent of the appropriation shall be used to provide for the administration of the visual arts program, including conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation of the work of art. For the purpose of this section building shall not include sheds, warehouses, and other buildings of a temporary nature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7011. To carry out the provisions of this act, the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design, construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7012. If any federal moneys appropriated by this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7013. (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW 43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended state share of total project costs.

(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7014. NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS. Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. Portions of prior authorized general obligation bond proceeds for deposit into the state taxable building construction account that are in excess of amounts required to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations shall be deposited into the state building construction account. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building construction account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the state taxable building construction account to the state building construction account may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7015. COLUMBIA RIVER BASIN NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS. Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the Columbia river basin water supply development account may be transferred to the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the Columbia river basin water supply development account and the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account to the Columbia river basin water supply development account may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7016. (1) Funds appropriated in this act for minor works may not be allotted until final project lists are submitted to the office of financial management. Revisions to the project lists are allowed for projects not anticipated at the time of budget development but must be submitted to the office of financial management, the house of representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee for review and comment and must include an explanation of variances from the prior lists before funds may be expended on the revisions. Any project list revisions must be approved by the office of financial management before funds may be expended from the minor works appropriation.

(2)(a) Minor works project lists are single line appropriations that include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000. All projects must meet the criteria included in this subsection (2)(a). These projects should be completed within two years of the appropriation with the funding provided. Agencies are prohibited from including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time, would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works projects. Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the minor works categories.

(b) Minor works appropriations may not be used for the following: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works list; movable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; rolling stock; computers; or to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless expressly authorized. The office of financial management may make an exception to the limitations described in this subsection (2)(b) for exigent circumstances after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the legislature regarding the proposed exception.

(c) Minor works preservation projects may include program improvements of no more than twenty-five percent of the individual minor works preservation project cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7017. To the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of state funds from the state building construction account, or from any other capital project account in the state treasury, for a capital project or program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from the sale of bonds, the legislature declares that any such expenditures for that project or program made prior to the issue date of the applicable bonds are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7018. JOINT LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON IMPROVING STATE FUNDING FOR SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION. (1)(a) A joint legislative task force on improving state funding for school construction is established, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate from the senate committees on ways and means and early learning and K-12 education.

(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives from the house of representatives committees on capital budget and education.

(iii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives jointly shall ensure that at least three of the eight members appointed pursuant to (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection serve legislative districts located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

(iv) The chair of the task force selected pursuant to (b) of this subsection may appoint one additional member representing large school districts and one additional member representing small, rural school districts as voting members of the task force.

(b) The task force shall choose its chair from among its membership. The chair of the house of representatives committee on capital budget shall convene the initial meeting of the task force. All meetings of the task force must be scheduled and conducted in accordance with the requirements of both the senate and the house of representatives.

(2) The task force shall review the following issues:

(a) Improvements to state financial assistance for K-12 school construction to be implemented over several fiscal biennia;

(b) Utilization of school spaces for multiple purposes;

(c) School design and construction approaches that support effective teaching and learning by delivering education through innovative, sustainable, cost-effective, and enduring design and construction methods; and

(d) Recent reports on school construction, including but not limited to the school construction cost study from the educational service district 112 and the efforts of collecting inventory and condition of schools data by the Washington state university extension energy office.

(3) In consideration of the findings pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the task force must recommend a state school construction financial assistance program that:

(a) Supports the construction and preservation of schools; and

(b) Balances the state and local share of school construction and preservation costs considering local school districts' financial capacity, based on measures of relative wealth recommended pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section, and the state's limited bond capacity and common school trust land revenue.

(4) In making recommendations pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the task force must, at a minimum, also recommend:

(a) A methodology to project needs for state financial assistance for school construction and preservation over a ten-year period;

(b) Measures of relative wealth of a school district, including but not limited to assessed land value per student, eligible free and reduced price meal enrollments, income per capita per school district, and costs of construction;

(c) Education specifications recognized by the state for the purpose of providing guidance to school districts when designing school construction projects;

(d) A capital asset model for K-12 school construction that considers space and usage needs to calculate construction assistance for:

(i) New schools to accommodate enrollment growth;

(ii) Major modernization projects to address aging facilities;

(iii) Replacement and renewal of major building systems based on achieving lowest life-cycle building costs, provided that standards of routine maintenance are achieved by local districts; and

(iv) Specialized facility improvements including but not limited to STEM facilities, career and technical education facilities, skills centers, and computer labs; and

(e) Alternative means to fund and accommodate increased classroom capacity to meet K-3 class-size reduction objectives.

(5)(a) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research.

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial management shall cooperate with the task force and maintain liaison representatives, who are nonvoting members.

(c) The task force, where appropriate, may consult with individuals from public schools or related organizations or ask the individuals to establish a committee for technical advice and assistance. Members of such an advisory committee are not entitled to expense reimbursement.

(6) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(7) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures and meetings are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(8) The task force must report its preliminary findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2017. The task force must report its final findings and recommendations to the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2018.

(9) This section expires June 30, 2019.

Sec. 7019. RCW 43.19.501 and 2016 c 202 s 58 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The Thurston county capital facilities account is created in the state treasury. The account is subject to the appropriation and allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. Moneys in the account may be expended for capital projects in facilities owned and managed by the department in Thurston county. ((For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account may be used for predesign identified in section 1037, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.)) For the 2015-2017 biennium, moneys in the account may be used for studies related to real estate.

((During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the Thurston county capital facilities account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.)) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the Thurston county capital facilities account may be used for costs associated with staffing to support capital budget and project activities and lease and facility oversight activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7020. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7021. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---