BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Parents and legal guardians who have legal custody of minor children have a fundamental right to make decisions concerning the care, custody, education, and control of their children.

(2) The legislature hereby codifies these fundamental rights. Parents and legal guardians shall retain the fundamental rights listed in this section regardless of whether they continue to be recognized or articulated as constitutional rights by federal or state courts.

(3) This section's codification of parents' and legal guardians' fundamental rights as now recognized by law shall not be construed to limit any parent or guardian from exercising additional rights under the Constitution and laws of the United States or of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 26 RCW.

--- END ---