BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.10.054 and 2017 c 179 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The institutions of higher education must establish ((a)) coordinated, evidence-based ((policy)) policies for granting as many undergraduate college credits as possible and appropriate for general education requirements or the equivalent to students who have earned:

(a) Minimum scores of three on AP ((exams as possible and appropriate)) examinations; or

(b) Minimum scores of four on international baccalaureate (IB) examinations.

(2) Credit ((policy)) policies regarding all AP ((exams)) examinations must be posted on campus web sites effective for the 2017 fall academic term. Credit policies regarding all IB examinations must be posted on campus web sites effective for the 2018 fall academic term.

(3) The institutions of higher education must conduct biennial reviews of their AP and IB credit ((policy)) policies and report noncompliance to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1st each year beginning November 1, 2019.

--- END ---