BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.71.010 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

The following terms used in this chapter shall have the meanings set forth in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1) "Commission" means the Washington state medical quality assurance commission.

(2) (("Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(3))) "Emergency medical care" or "emergency medical service" has the same meaning as in chapter 18.73 RCW.

(3) "Maintenance of certification" means the satisfactory participation in a formal recertification program to maintain board certification after initial certification from the American board of medical specialties or other accrediting organization recognized by the commission.

(4) "Resident physician" means an individual who has graduated from a school of medicine which meets the requirements set forth in RCW 18.71.055 and is serving a period of postgraduate clinical medical training sponsored by a college or university in this state or by a hospital accredited by this state. For purposes of this chapter, the term shall include individuals designated as intern or medical fellow.

(((4) "Emergency medical care" or "emergency medical service" has the same meaning as in chapter 18.73 RCW.))

(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the commission may not require a physician to participate in a maintenance of certification requirement as a condition of licensure or license renewal. The commission may allow a physician to fulfill license renewal requirements through satisfactory participation in a recognized maintenance of certification program.

(2) This section does not apply to board certification requirements or maintenance of certification requirements included in any of the following:

(a) A stipulation to informal disposition under RCW 18.130.172;

(b) An order issued to resolve a statement of charges under RCW 18.130.090;

(c) An order issued under RCW 18.130.160; or

(d) A reinstatement order issued under RCW 18.130.150.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.57.001 and 1996 c 178 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the Washington state board of osteopathic medicine and surgery;

(2) "Department" means the department of health;

(3) (("Secretary" means the secretary of health; and)) "Maintenance of certification" means the satisfactory participation in a formal recertification program to maintain board certification after initial certification from the American osteopathic association bureau of osteopathic specialists, the American board of medical specialties, or other accrediting organization recognized by the board;

(4) "Osteopathic medicine and surgery" means the use of any and all methods in the treatment of disease, injuries, deformities, and all other physical and mental conditions in and of human beings, including the use of osteopathic manipulative therapy; and

(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 18.57 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the board may not require an osteopathic physician and surgeon to participate in a maintenance of certification requirement as a condition of licensure or license renewal. The board may allow a physician to fulfill license renewal requirements through satisfactory participation in a recognized maintenance of certification program.

(2) This section does not apply to board certification requirements or maintenance of certification requirements included in any of the following:

(a) A stipulation to informal disposition under RCW 18.130.172;

(b) An order issued to resolve a statement of charges under RCW 18.130.090;

(c) An order issued under RCW 18.130.160; or

(d) A reinstatement order issued under RCW 18.130.150.

--- END ---