BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.83 RCW to read as follows:

For the purpose of aiding the board of commissioners of a housing authority in carrying out the board's duties or powers under any applicable law, any state public body may, with or without consideration, provide monetary, in-kind, or other support to the board of commissioners of a housing authority. Such support may not be for the purpose of compensation for a commissioner for his or her services rendered to the housing authority.

--- END ---