BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The state Constitution establishes regular legislative sessions of not more than one hundred five days in odd-numbered years, to be convened on a date established by the legislature in statute. The state Constitution also establishes a biennial appropriations cycle in which expenditures must be incurred no later than one calendar month after the close of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriations were made.

The legislature finds that the current calendar appropriations cycle, in which the June 30th end of the fiscal year falls more than sixty days after the end of the regular session in odd-numbered years, has resulted in undue delays in adopting a budget for the ensuing fiscal biennium. To better align the state's budget cycle with the legislature's regular budget-writing sessions, the legislature therefore intends to change the beginning of the fiscal year to May 1st, effective May 1, 2019.

Sec. 2. RCW 1.16.020 and 1985 c 175 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Through December 31, 2018, the fiscal biennium of the state shall commence on the first day of July in each odd-numbered year and end on the thirtieth day of June of the next succeeding odd-numbered year. Beginning January 1, 2019, the fiscal biennium of the state shall commence on the first day of May in each odd-numbered year and end on the thirtieth day of April in the next succeeding odd-numbered year.

(2) The fiscal biennium of those cities and towns which utilize a biennial budget shall commence on the first day of January in each odd-numbered year and end on the thirty-first day of December of the next succeeding even-numbered year.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.88.020 and 2005 c 319 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Budget" means a proposed plan of expenditures for a given period or purpose and the proposed means for financing these expenditures.

(2) "Budget document" means a formal statement, either written or provided on any electronic media or both, offered by the governor to the legislature, as provided in RCW 43.88.030.

(3) "Director of financial management" means the official appointed by the governor to serve at the governor's pleasure and to whom the governor may delegate necessary authority to carry out the governor's duties as provided in this chapter. The director of financial management shall be head of the office of financial management which shall be in the office of the governor.

(4) "Agency" means and includes every state office, officer, each institution, whether educational, correctional, or other, and every department, division, board, and commission, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(5) "Public funds", for purposes of this chapter, means all moneys, including cash, checks, bills, notes, drafts, stocks, and bonds, whether held in trust, for operating purposes, or for capital purposes, and collected or disbursed under law, whether or not such funds are otherwise subject to legislative appropriation, including funds maintained outside the state treasury.

(6) "Regulations" means the policies, standards, and requirements, stated in writing, designed to carry out the purposes of this chapter, as issued by the governor or the governor's designated agent, and which shall have the force and effect of law.

(7) "Ensuing biennium" means:

(a) Through December 31, 2018, the fiscal biennium beginning on July 1st of the same year in which a regular session of the legislature is held during an odd-numbered year pursuant to Article II, section 12 of the Constitution and which biennium next succeeds the current biennium;

(b) Beginning January 1, 2019, the fiscal biennium beginning on May 1st of the same year in which a regular session of the legislature is held during an odd-numbered year pursuant to Article II, section 12 of the Constitution and which biennium next succeeds the current biennium.

(8) "Dedicated fund" means a fund in the state treasury, or a separate account or fund in the general fund in the state treasury, that by law is dedicated, appropriated, or set aside for a limited object or purpose; but "dedicated fund" does not include a revolving fund or a trust fund.

(9) "Revolving fund" means a fund in the state treasury, established by law, from which is paid the cost of goods or services furnished to or by a state agency, and which is replenished through charges made for such goods or services or through transfers from other accounts or funds.

(10) "Trust fund" means a fund in the state treasury in which designated persons or classes of persons have a vested beneficial interest or equitable ownership, or which was created or established by a gift, grant, contribution, devise, or bequest that limits the use of the fund to designated objects or purposes.

(11) "Administrative expenses" means expenditures for: (a) Salaries, wages, and related costs of personnel and (b) operations and maintenance including but not limited to costs of supplies, materials, services, and equipment.

(12) "Fiscal year" means, through December 31, 2018, the year beginning July 1st and ending the following June 30th. Beginning January 1, 2019, "fiscal year 2019" means the period beginning July 1, 2018, and ending April 30, 2019, and for fiscal year 2020 and each fiscal year thereafter, "fiscal year" means the year beginning on May 1st and ending on April 30th.

(13) "Lapse" means the termination of authority to expend an appropriation.

(14) "Legislative fiscal committees" means the joint legislative audit and review committee, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, and the ways and means and transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives.

(15) "Fiscal period" means the period for which an appropriation is made as specified within the act making the appropriation.

(16) "Primary budget driver" means the primary determinant of a budget level, other than a price variable, which causes or is associated with the major expenditure of an agency or budget unit within an agency, such as a caseload, enrollment, workload, or population statistic.

(17) "State tax revenue limit" means the limitation created by chapter 43.135 RCW.

(18) "General state revenues" means the revenues defined by Article VIII, section 1(c) of the state Constitution.

(19) "Annual growth rate in real personal income" means the estimated percentage growth in personal income for the state during the current fiscal year, expressed in constant value dollars, as published by the office of financial management or its successor agency.

(20) "Estimated revenues" means estimates of revenue in the most recent official economic and revenue forecast prepared under RCW 82.33.020, and prepared by the office of financial management for those funds, accounts, and sources for which the office of the economic and revenue forecast council does not prepare an official forecast, that are prepared by the office of financial management in consultation with the transportation revenue forecast council.

(21) "Estimated receipts" means the estimated receipt of cash in the most recent official economic and revenue forecast prepared under RCW 82.33.020, and prepared by the office of financial management for those funds, accounts, and sources for which the office of the economic and revenue forecast council does not prepare an official forecast.

(22) "State budgeting, accounting, and reporting system" means a system that gathers, maintains, and communicates fiscal information. The system links fiscal information beginning with development of agency budget requests through adoption of legislative appropriations to tracking actual receipts and expenditures against approved plans.

(23) "Allotment of appropriation" means the agency's statement of proposed expenditures, the director of financial management's review of that statement, and the placement of the approved statement into the state budgeting, accounting, and reporting system.

(24) "Statement of proposed expenditures" means a plan prepared by each agency that breaks each appropriation out into monthly detail representing the best estimate of how the appropriation will be expended.

(25) "Undesignated fund balance (or deficit)" means unreserved and undesignated current assets or other resources available for expenditure over and above any current liabilities which are expected to be incurred by the close of the fiscal period.

(26) "Internal audit" means an independent appraisal activity within an agency for the review of operations as a service to management, including a systematic examination of accounting and fiscal controls to assure that human and material resources are guarded against waste, loss, or misuse; and that reliable data are gathered, maintained, and fairly disclosed in a written report of the audit findings.

(27) "Performance verification" means an analysis that (a) verifies the accuracy of data used by state agencies in quantifying intended results and measuring performance toward those results, and (b) verifies whether or not the reported results were achieved.

(28) "Performance audit" has the same meaning as it is defined in RCW 44.28.005.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.88.055 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature must adopt a four-year balanced budget as follows:

(a) Beginning in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature shall enact a balanced omnibus operating appropriations bill that leaves, in total, a positive ending fund balance in the general fund and related funds.

(b) Beginning in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the projected maintenance level of the omnibus appropriations bill enacted by the legislature shall not exceed the available fiscal resources for the next ensuing fiscal biennium.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Available fiscal resources" means the beginning general fund and related fund balances and any fiscal resources estimated for the general fund and related funds, adjusted for enacted legislation, and with forecasted revenues adjusted to the greater of (i) the official general fund and related funds revenue forecast for the ensuing biennium, or (ii) the official general fund and related funds forecast for the second fiscal year of the current fiscal biennium, increased by 4.5 percent for each fiscal year of the ensuing biennium;

(b) "Projected maintenance level" means estimated appropriations necessary to maintain the continuing costs of program and service levels either funded in that appropriations bill or mandated by other state or federal law, and the amount of any general fund moneys projected to be transferred to the budget stabilization account pursuant to Article VII, section 12 of the state Constitution, but does not include in the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia the costs related to the enhanced funding under the new definition of basic education as established in chapter 548, Laws of 2009, and affirmed by the decision in Mathew McCleary et al., v. The State of Washington, 173 Wn.2d 477, 269 P.3d 227, (2012), from which the short-term exclusion of these obligations is solely for the purposes of calculating this estimate and does not in any way indicate an intent to avoid full funding of these obligations;

(c) "Related funds," as used in this section, means the Washington opportunity pathways account and the education legacy trust account.

(3) Through fiscal year 2019, subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section does not apply to an appropriations bill that makes net reductions in general fund and related funds appropriations and is enacted between July 1st and February 15th of any fiscal year. Thereafter, subsection (1) of this section does not apply to an appropriations bill that makes net reductions in general fund or related fund appropriations and that is enacted between May 1st and February 15th of any fiscal year.

(4) Subsection (1)(b) of this section does not apply in a fiscal biennium in which money is appropriated from the budget stabilization account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) By November 1, 2018, the office of financial management must provide a report to the appropriations committee of the house of representatives and the ways and means committee of the senate regarding the transition to the new fiscal year period. The report must include recommendations about any additional changes to state law that are necessary to facilitate the transition. Each state agency and institution of higher education is encouraged to provide information to the office of financial management regarding the impact of the transition on the respective agencies and institutions.

(2) The code reviser shall prepare legislation for the 2019 regular session that makes appropriate conforming amendments to any statute which references or relies on the fiscal year period in effect prior to the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---