BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must provide notice and hold a public hearing prior to department personnel relocating or introducing any wolves, coyotes, lynx, bobcats, and animals defined as big game in RCW 77.08.030, where the action is intended for population maintenance or enhancement.

(2)(a) The notice of the public hearing must be made at least thirty days prior to the date of the hearing. The notice must state the public hearing date, time, and location, and provide a brief explanation of the department's proposed action. The brief explanation must include the species of wildlife, the estimated number of animals, the general location where the wildlife will be released, and the potential range the wildlife is likely to roam.

(b) A press release of the notice of the public hearing must be sent to media outlets providing news services to the communities that are likely to be impacted by the wildlife's presence. The notice of the public hearing must be posted on the department's web site, and if possible, posted on a local government or community web site near where the wildlife will be relocated or introduced; and be provided in writing to the town, city, or county legislative members and the mayor or county executive of any location that is likely to be impacted by the presence of the wildlife.

(3) The public hearing must be open to the public and held within the community most likely to be impacted by the presence of the relocated or introduced wildlife. The presiding official or department personnel must present information explaining the department's proposed actions and related management of the wildlife in sufficient detail to provide an understanding of the reasons for the proposed movement and potential impacts of the action in or near the community. The hearing must be conducted by the presiding official to afford interested persons the opportunity to present comments. Written or electronic submissions will also be accepted and included in the department's hearing record.

--- END ---