BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 21.20.340 and 2016 c 61 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in subsection (15) of this section, the following fees shall be paid in advance under the provisions of this chapter:

(1)(a) For registration of securities by qualification, the fee shall be one hundred dollars for the first one hundred thousand dollars of initial issue, or portion thereof in this state, based on offering price, plus one-twentieth of one percent for any excess over one hundred thousand dollars which are to be offered during that year: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That an issuer may upon the payment of a fifty dollar fee renew for one additional twelve-month period only the unsold portion for which the registration fee has been paid.

(b) For the offer of a federal covered security that (i) is an exempt security pursuant to section 3(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, and (ii) would not qualify for the exemption or a discretionary order of exemption pursuant to RCW 21.20.310(1), the fee shall be one hundred dollars for the first one hundred thousand dollars of initial issue, or portion thereof in this state, based on offering price, plus one-twentieth of one percent for any excess over one hundred thousand dollars which are to be offered during that year: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That an issuer may upon the payment of a fifty dollar fee renew for one additional twelve-month period only the unsold portion for which the filing fee has been paid.

(2)(a) For registration by coordination of securities issued by an investment company, other than a closed-end company, as those terms are defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, the fee shall be one hundred dollars for the first one hundred thousand dollars of initial issue, or portion thereof in this state, based on offering price, plus one-twentieth of one percent for any excess over one hundred thousand dollars which are to be offered in this state during that year: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That an issuer may upon the payment of a fifty dollar fee renew for one additional twelve-month period the unsold portion for which the registration fee has been paid.

(b) For each offering by an investment company, other than a closed-end company, as those terms are defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, making a notice filing pursuant to RCW 21.20.327(1), the initial filing fee shall be one hundred dollars for the first one hundred thousand dollars of initial issue, or portion thereof in this state, based on offering price, plus one-twentieth of one percent for any excess over one hundred thousand dollars which are to be offered in this state during that year. The amount offered in this state during the year may be increased by paying one-twentieth of one percent of the desired increase, based on offering price, prior to the sale of securities to be covered by the fee: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That an issuer may upon the payment of a fifty dollar fee renew for one additional twelve-month period the unsold portion for which the filing fee has been paid.

(3)(a) For registration by coordination of securities not covered by subsection (2) of this section, the initial filing fee shall be one hundred dollars for the first one hundred thousand dollars of initial issue, or portion thereof in this state, based on offering price, plus one-fortieth of one percent for any excess over one hundred thousand dollars for the first twelve-month period plus one hundred dollars for each additional twelve months in which the same offering is continued. The amount offered in this state during the year may be increased by paying one-fortieth of one percent of the desired increase, based on offering price, prior to the sale of securities to be covered by the fee.

(b) For each offering by a closed-end investment company, making a notice filing pursuant to RCW 21.20.327(1), the initial filing fee shall be one hundred dollars for the first one hundred thousand dollars of initial issue, or portion thereof in this state, based on offering price, plus one-fortieth of one percent for any excess over one hundred thousand dollars for the first twelve-month period plus one hundred dollars for each additional twelve months in which the same offering is continued. The amount offered in this state during the year may be increased by paying one-fortieth of one percent of the desired increase, based on offering price, prior to the sale of securities to be covered by the fee.

(4) For filing annual financial statements, the fee shall be twenty-five dollars.

(5)(a) For filing an amended offering circular after the initial registration permit has been granted or pursuant to RCW 21.20.327(1)(b), the fee shall be ten dollars.

(b) For filing a report under RCW 21.20.270(1) or 21.20.327(1)(c), the fee shall be ten dollars.

(6)(a) For registration of a broker-dealer or investment adviser, the fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars for original registration and seventy-five dollars for each annual renewal. When an application is denied or withdrawn the director shall retain one-half of the fee.

(b) For a federal covered adviser filing pursuant to RCW 21.20.050, the fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars for original notification and seventy-five dollars for each annual renewal. A fee shall not be assessed in connection with converting an investment adviser registration to a notice filing when the investment adviser becomes a federal covered adviser.

(7) For registration of a salesperson or investment adviser representative, the fee shall be forty dollars for original registration with each employer and twenty dollars for each annual renewal. When an application is denied or withdrawn the director shall retain one-half of the fee.

(8) If a registration, or filing pursuant to RCW 21.20.050, of a broker-dealer, salesperson, investment adviser, federal covered adviser, or investment adviser representative is not renewed on or before the renewal deadline specified in the central registration depository (CRD) or the investment adviser registration depository (IARD), as applicable, the renewal is delinquent. The director by rule or order may set and assess a fee for delinquency not to exceed two hundred dollars. Acceptance by the director of an application for renewal after the renewal deadline specified in the CRD or the IARD, as applicable, is not a waiver of delinquency. A delinquent application for renewal will not be accepted for filing after March 1st.

(9)(a) For the transfer of a broker-dealer license to a successor, the fee shall be fifty dollars.

(b) For the transfer of a salesperson license from a broker-dealer or issuer to another broker-dealer or issuer, the transfer fee shall be twenty-five dollars.

(c) For the transfer of an investment adviser representative license from an investment adviser to another investment adviser, the transfer fee shall be twenty-five dollars.

(d) For the transfer of an investment adviser license to a successor, the fee shall be fifty dollars.

(10)(a) The director may provide by rule for the filing of notice of claim of exemption under RCW 21.20.320 (1), (9), and (17) and set fees accordingly not to exceed three hundred dollars.

(b) For the filing required by RCW 21.20.327(2), the fee shall be three hundred dollars.

(11) For filing of notification of claim of exemption from registration pursuant to RCW 21.20.310(11), as now or hereafter amended, the fee shall be fifty dollars for each filing.

(12) For rendering interpretative opinions, the fee shall be thirty-five dollars.

(13) For certified copies of any documents filed with the director, the fee shall be the cost to the department of financial institutions.

(14) For a duplicate license the fee shall be five dollars.

(15) Upon a finding by the department of financial institutions that a fee increase is necessary to defray the costs of administering this chapter, the director may by rule adjust the fees specified in this section upward by no more than fifteen dollars.

All fees collected under this chapter shall be turned in to the state treasury and are not refundable, except as herein provided.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.320.110 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 976 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created in the custody of the state treasurer a local fund known as the "financial services regulation fund" which shall consist of all moneys received by the divisions of the department of financial institutions, except ((for)) as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The division of securities ((which)) shall deposit thirteen percent of all moneys received, except as provided in RCW 43.320.115 and subsection (3) of this section, and which shall be used for the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the payment of salaries, wages, and utilities; the establishment of reserves; and other incidental costs required for the proper regulation of individuals and entities subject to regulation by the department. ((The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund.))

(3) The division of securities shall deposit one hundred percent of all moneys received that are attributable to increases in fees implemented by rule pursuant to RCW 21.20.340(15).

(4) Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the director of financial institutions or the director's designee. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.

((During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the financial services regulation fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.)) During the 2015-2017 and 2017-2019 fiscal biennia, moneys from the financial services regulation fund may be appropriated for the family prosperity account program at the department of commerce and for the operations of the department of revenue.

--- END ---