BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.108.070 and 2016 c 53 s 3 and 2016 c 41 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall issue a massage therapist's license to an applicant who demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a) Effective June 1, 1988, successful completion of a course of study in an approved massage program, transfer program, or approved apprenticeship program;

(b) Successful completion of an examination administered or approved by the board; and

(c) Be eighteen years of age or older.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2013, the secretary shall issue a reflexologist certification to an applicant who completes an application form that identifies the name and address of the applicant and the certification request, and demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a) Successful completion of a course of study in reflexologist program approved by the secretary;

(b) Successful completion of an examination administered or approved by the secretary; and

(c) Be eighteen years of age or older.

(3) Applicants for a massage therapist's license or for certification as a reflexologist shall be subject to the grounds for denial or issuance of a conditional credential under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(4) The secretary may require any information and documentation that reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the massage therapist or reflexologist applicant meets the criteria for licensure provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting the criteria.

(5) Beginning January 1, 2020, a licensed massage therapist or a certified reflexologist must have government-issued photo identification on his or her person at all times he or she practices massage therapy or reflexology. The government-issued photo identification must bear the same name as the massage therapy license or reflexology certification.

--- END ---