BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.86.030 and 1965 c 7 s 35.86.030 are each amended to read as follows:

Such cities are authorized to obtain by lease, purchase, donation and/or gift, or by eminent domain in the manner provided by law for the exercise of this power by cities, such real property for off-street parking as the legislative bodies thereof determine to be necessary by ordinance. Such property or any fraction or fractions thereof may be sold, transferred, exchanged, leased, or otherwise disposed of by the city when its legislative body has determined by ordinance such property or fraction or fractions thereof is no longer necessary for off-street parking purposes and either: (1) All bonds issued for their acquisition or construction have been paid in full; or (2) the properties within any local improvement district created for the acquisition or construction of the off-street parking facilities are no longer subject to any assessment for such purpose.

--- END ---