BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the prospect of transitioning from aircraft powered by burning fuel to aircraft powered at least partially by electrical propulsion promises a variety of economic, social, and environmental benefits, including:

(a) Reduced fuel costs that make expanded commercial service of smaller regional airports economically viable;

(b) Support for the type of dispersed and rural economic development already envisioned elsewhere in state policy, including through the state's participation in the western regional short-haul air transportation compact under chapter 81.96 RCW or similar types of multistate collaborative forums that currently exist through the northwest region national association of state aviation officials;

(c) Reduced traffic on state roads as a result of short-haul flights becoming price competitive with driving;

(d) A redistribution of air traffic from overly busy hubs to airports dispersed across the state that would otherwise operate below capacity;

(e) Reduced greenhouse gas emissions from aircraft fuel use; and

(f) Reduced impacts on communities located adjacent to busy airport hubs from decreases in aircraft noise and emissions of conventional air pollutants.

(2) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to continue
Washington's leading role in the aerospace industry by encouraging
the development and adoption of aircraft whose propulsion is fully
or partially powered by electricity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 47.68 RCW to read as follows:

(1) To support realization of the public benefits described in section 1 of this act, the department shall solicit input from the work group established in section 3 of this act and recommend goals for encouraging the use of electric or hybrid-electric aircraft in commercial air travel in Washington state to the legislature for adoption. The recommended goals shall consider the interests of industry and airports, and shall focus on maximizing growth in Washington state regional commercial air service travel. The department, in conjunction with the work group, shall develop and recommend specific, measurable goals for the years 2030, 2040, and 2050, that reflect progressive and substantial increases in the utilization of electric and hybrid-electric commercial aircraft.

(2) By January 1, 2025, and every two years thereafter, the department must submit a report to the legislature consistent with RCW 43.01.036 describing the state's progress towards achieving goals adopted by the legislature as described in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 47.68 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department must convene a work group to analyze the state of the electrically powered aircraft industry and current infrastructure to develop and recommend goals as described in section 1 of this act and to develop a sustainable plan for achieving the goals. The chair of the work group may be a consultant specializing in aeronautics, and the work group must include representation from the electric aircraft industry, the aircraft manufacturing industry, the electric utility districts, the battery industry, the department of commerce, the department of transportation aviation division, the airline pilots association, a primary airport representing an airport association, and the airline industry. The work group may include other members at the discretion of the department.

(b) The work group must consider, at a minimum, and make recommendations on the feasibility of electric or hybrid-electric flight given federal aviation administration certification requirements, the rate at which battery technology is advancing, the necessary infrastructure requirements and capacity impacts at primary airports, whether industry incentives are required and feasible, possible public-private partnerships, impacts to revenues generated from aviation fuel sales, educational requirements for maintaining electric or hybrid-electric powered aircraft, whether or not additional homeland security checkpoints would be required, the public perception of the technology, cost comparison between the use of fossil fuels versus electric or hybrid-electric engines in powering aircraft, emissions reduction potential, and policies needed to facilitate electric or hybrid-electric powered aircraft use for commercial air travel in Washington state. The work group must submit a report with its findings, recommended goals, and recommended plan for achieving those goals to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019. The chair of the work group must provide an interim report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2020.

Sec. 4. RCW 47.68.070 and 1984 c 7 s 344 are each amended to read as follows:

The department has general supervision over aeronautics within this state. It is empowered and directed to encourage, foster, and assist in the development and sustainment of aeronautics in this state, including aeronautics involving electrically powered aircraft, and to encourage the establishment of airports and air navigation facilities. It shall cooperate with and assist the federal government, the municipalities of this state, and other persons in the development of aeronautics, including aeronautics involving electrically powered aircraft, and shall seek to coordinate the aeronautical activities of these bodies and persons. Municipalities are authorized to cooperate with the department in the development of aeronautics and aeronautical facilities in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act may be known and cited as the linking communities by encouraging regional aircraft electrification act or known and cited as the LINK-AIR act.

--- END ---