BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.33A.100 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 457 are each amended to read as follows:

The state investment board shall maintain appropriate offices and employ such personnel as may be necessary to perform its duties. Employment by the investment board shall ((include but not be limited to an executive director, investment officers, and a confidential secretary, which positions are)) be exempt from classified service under chapter 41.06 RCW. Employment of the executive director by the board shall be for a term of three years, and such employment shall be subject to confirmation of the state finance committee: PROVIDED, That nothing shall prevent the board from dismissing the director for cause before the expiration of the term nor shall anything prohibit the board, with the confirmation of the state finance committee, from employing the same individual as director in succeeding terms. Compensation levels for ((the executive director, a confidential secretary, and all investment officers, including the deputy director for investment management,)) personnel employed by the investment board shall be established by the state investment board. ((The investment board is authorized to maintain a retention pool within the state investment board)) This compensation is funded by the expense account under RCW 43.33A.160, from the earnings of the funds managed by the board, pursuant to a performance management and compensation program developed by the investment board, in order to address recruitment and retention problems and to reward performance. The compensation levels and incentive compensation for investment officers shall be limited to the average of total compensation provided by state or other public funds of similar size, based upon a biennial survey conducted by the investment board, with review and comment by the joint legislative audit and review committee. However, in any fiscal year the incentive compensation granted by the investment board from the retention pool to investment officers pursuant to this section may not exceed thirty percent. Disbursements from the retention pool shall be from legislative appropriations and shall be on authorization of the board's executive director or the director's designee.

The investment board shall provide notice to the director of financial management and the chairs of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees of proposed changes to the compensation levels for the positions. The notice shall be provided not less than sixty days prior to the effective date of the proposed changes.

As of July 1, 1981, all employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW and engaged in duties assumed by the state investment board on July 1, 1981, are assigned to the state investment board. The transfer shall not diminish any rights granted these employees under chapter 41.06 RCW nor exempt the employees from any action which may occur thereafter in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW.

All existing contracts and obligations pertaining to the functions transferred to the state investment board in chapter 3, Laws of 1981 shall remain in full force and effect, and shall be performed by the board. None of the transfers directed by chapter 3, Laws of 1981 shall affect the validity of any act performed by a state entity or by any official or employee thereof prior to July 1, 1981.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.33A.160 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state investment board shall be funded from the earnings of the funds managed by the state investment board, proportional to the value of the assets of each fund((, subject to legislative appropriation)).

(2) There is established in the custody of the state ((treasury)) treasurer a state investment board expense account from which shall be paid the operating expenses of the state investment board. Prior to November 1 ((of)) each ((even-numbered)) year, the state investment board shall determine and certify to the state treasurer and the office of financial management the value of the ((various funds)) total assets managed by the investment board ((in order to determine the proportional liability of the funds for the operating expenses of the state investment board. Pursuant to appropriation, the state treasurer is authorized to transfer such moneys from the various funds managed by the investment board to the state investment board expense account as are necessary to pay the operating expenses of the investment board)). However, in any fiscal year the operating expenses of the investment board may not exceed 0.03 percent of the total assets managed by the state investment board, unless authorized by the legislature.

--- END ---