BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A veteran who possesses a valid concealed pistol license issued under chapter 9.41 RCW may carry a concealed pistol on or about the veteran's person while the veteran is on the campus of a community college in this state or carry or store a pistol within a vehicle while on the campus of the community college if in compliance with the requirements of RCW 9.41.250. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a community college in this state may not prohibit, through any rule, regulation, policy, or other provision, a veteran from carrying a concealed pistol on the campus of the community college or carrying or storing a pistol in his or her vehicle while on the campus in accordance with RCW 9.41.050.

(2) After consulting with students, staff, and faculty of the community college regarding the nature of the student population, specific safety considerations, and the uniqueness of the campus environment, the president, chancellor, or other chief executive officer of a community college in this state may establish reasonable rules, regulations, or other provisions regarding the carrying of pistols by veterans who are concealed pistol license holders on the campus of the community college, including rules, regulations, or other provisions that prohibit open carry of pistols or that address the storage of pistols in dormitories or other residential facilities that are located on the campus of the community college. The president, chancellor, or officer may not establish provisions that generally prohibit or have the effect of generally prohibiting veteran concealed pistol license holders from carrying concealed pistols on the campus of the community college. The president, chancellor, or officer may amend the provisions as necessary for campus safety. The provisions take effect as determined by the president, chancellor, or officer unless subsequently amended by the board of trustees under subsection (3) of this section. The community college must give effective notice of any rules or regulations adopted under this section, including with respect to any portion of a premises on which veteran concealed pistol license holders may not carry pistols.

(3) By the ninetieth day after the date that the rules, regulations, or other provisions are established as described by subsection (2) of this section, the board of trustees of the community college shall review the rules, regulations, or other provisions. The board of trustees may, by a vote of not less than two-thirds of the board, amend wholly or partly the rules, regulations, or other provisions established under subsection (2) of this section. If amended, the provisions are considered to be those of the community college as established under subsection (2) of this section.

(4) By September 1st of each even-numbered year, each community college in this state shall submit a report to the legislature and to the standing committees of the legislature with jurisdiction over the implementation and continuation of this section that describes its rules, regulations, or other provisions regarding the carrying of concealed pistols by veterans on the campus of the community college and that explains the reasons the community college has established those provisions.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Campus" means all land and buildings owned, leased, or operated by a community college.

(b) "Community college" has the meaning given in RCW 28B.50.030.

(c) "Veteran" includes every person who, at the time he or she seeks the benefits of RCW 46.18.212, 46.18.235, 72.36.030, 41.04.010, 73.04.090, or 43.180.250, has received an honorable discharge, received a discharge for medical reasons with an honorable record, where applicable, or is in receipt of a United States department of defense discharge document DD form 214, NGB form 22, or their equivalent or successor discharge paperwork, that characterizes his or her service as honorable, and who has served in at least one of the following capacities:

(i) As a member in any branch of the armed forces of the United States, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, and has fulfilled his or her initial military service obligation;

(ii) As a member of the women's air forces service pilots;

(iii) As a member of the armed forces reserves, national guard, or coast guard, and has been called into federal service by a presidential select reserve call up for at least one hundred eighty cumulative days;

(iv) As a civil service crewmember with service aboard a United States army transport service or United States naval transportation service vessel in oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946;

(v) As a member of the Philippine armed forces/scouts during the period of armed conflict from December 7, 1941, through August 15, 1945; or

(vi) As a United States documented merchant mariner with service aboard an oceangoing vessel operated by the department of defense, or its agents, from both June 25, 1950, through July 27, 1953, in Korean territorial waters and from August 5, 1964, through May 7, 1975, in Vietnam territorial waters, and who received a military commendation.

--- END ---