BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 57.08.100 and 1996 c 230 s 316 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to chapter 48.62 RCW, a district, by a majority vote of its board of commissioners, may enter into contracts to provide health care services and/or group insurance and/or term life insurance and/or social security insurance for the benefit of its employees and may pay all or any part of the cost thereof. Any two or more districts, by a majority vote of their respective boards of commissioners, may, if deemed expedient, join in the procuring of such health care services and/or group insurance and/or term life insurance, and the board of commissioners of a participating district may by appropriate resolution authorize its respective district to pay all or any portion of the cost thereof.

A district ((with five thousand or more customers)) providing health, group, or life insurance to its employees may provide its commissioners with the same coverage. However, the per person amounts for such insurance paid by the district shall not exceed the per person amounts paid by the district for its employees.

--- END ---