BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A retail business not licensed under this chapter and whose trade includes the sale of drug paraphernalia may not sell, or offer for sale, any product containing cannabidiol or other cannabinoids intended for ingestion through the mouth unless the retail business conspicuously posts a health safety warning sign in accordance with the requirements of this section.

(2) The Washington state liquor and cannabis board, in consultation with the Washington state department of health, must adopt rules on the text requirements, design characteristics, and display requirements of the health safety warning sign required under subsection (1) of this section. At minimum, the sign must include language expressly disclosing that the retailer's cannabinoid products:

(a) Are neither regulated nor approved as a medical marijuana product by the Washington state department of health or the Washington state liquor and cannabis board;

(b) Have not been subject to product safety testing by a laboratory licensed under this chapter or other laboratory certified by the state as qualified to conduct such product safety testing;

(c) May contain toxins or contaminants that may be injurious to human health; and

(d) Any other information or warnings deemed pertinent to informing the public of the potential health hazards posed by the ingestion of unregulated and untested products containing cannabinoids.

(3) A retail business owner who fails to meet the health safety warning sign requirements of this section is guilty of a class 2 civil infraction under RCW 7.80.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect November 1, 2018.

--- END ---