BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.128.064 and 2001 c 319 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

((In order to prevent disruption to current residents, at the request of the current licensed provider, the department shall give processing priority to the application of a person seeking to be licensed as the new provider for the adult family home. The department may issue a provisional license)) (1) A provisional license permits the operation of an adult family home for a period of time to be determined by the department, not to exceed twelve months, and is not subject to renewal. A provisional license may be issued:

(a) When a currently licensed adult family home provider has applied to be licensed as the new provider for a currently licensed adult family home, the application has been initially processed, and all that remains to complete the application process is an on-site inspection; or

(b) Under exceptional circumstances, such as the sudden and unexpected death of the sole provider of an adult family home.

(2) In order to prevent disruption to current residents, the department shall give priority processing to an application for a change of ownership:

(a) At the request of the currently licensed provider; or

(b) When the department has issued a provisional license.

--- END ---