BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that an additional bridge or other connection between southwest Washington and Oregon will benefit both the economy of southwest Washington and that of the entire state by reducing congestion and improving freight mobility on Interstate 5. Therefore, the joint transportation committee must hire a consultant to evaluate all available options for an additional bridge or other connection west of Interstate 5 between southwest Washington and Oregon. The study must provide high-level conceptual designs of the options put forth and include a cost estimate for each option. The joint transportation committee must submit a report on the study to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of three hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2019, from the motor vehicle account to the joint transportation committee for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---