BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature of the state of Washington acknowledges that the pine mushroom, Tricholoma murrillianum, notably sought after for its distinct smell and delicious flavor, is an important part of the Washington state ecosystem due to its integral relationship with Washington state forests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

The pine mushroom, Tricholoma murrillianum, is hereby designated as the official state fungus of the state of Washington.

--- END ---