BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of commerce shall convene and facilitate a child care collaborative task force to examine the effects of child care affordability and accessibility on the workforce and on businesses. The director of the department of commerce or his or her designee must convene the first meeting of the task force by September 1, 2018.

(2) The task force shall develop policies and recommendations to incentivize employer-supported child care and improve child care access and affordability for employees. To accomplish its duties, the task force shall evaluate current available data including, but not limited to:

(a) Child care market rate survey reports, including data related to the geographic distribution of licensed child care providers and the demand for, cost, and availability of such providers;

(b) Best practices for employer-supported child care; and

(c) Research related to the economic and workforce impacts of employee access to high quality, affordable child care.

(3) The governor shall appoint additional voting task force members as follows:

(a) Five representatives of private business, including: One representative of a small business; one representative of a medium-sized business; one representative of a large business; and two chamber of commerce representatives, one located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(b) One representative from a union representing child care providers;

(c) One representative from the statewide child care resource and referral network;

(d) One representative of an organization representing the interests of licensed child day care centers;

(e) One representative of a statewide nonprofit organization comprised of senior executives of major private sector employers;

(f) One representative of a nongovernmental private-public partnership supporting home visiting service delivery;

(g) One representative of a federally recognized tribe; and

(h) One representative from an association representing business interests.

(4) One representative from each of the following agencies shall serve as a nonvoting member of the task force and provide data and information to the task force upon request:

(a) The department of commerce;

(b) The department of children, youth, and families;

(c) The employment security department;

(d) The department of revenue;

(e) The department of social and health services; and

(f) The office of the governor.

(5) The president of the senate shall appoint one member to the task force from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate to serve as nonvoting members of the task force.

(6) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member to the task force from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of representatives to serve as nonvoting members of the task force.

(7) The governor shall appoint the following nonvoting members:

(a) Three representatives from the child care industry. At least one of the child care industry representatives must be a provider from a rural community. The three representatives must include: One licensed child day care center provider; one licensed family day care provider; and one representative of family, friend, and neighbor child care providers;

(b) Two representatives of economic development organizations, one located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(c) Four representatives of advocacy organizations representing parents, early learning, foster care youth, and expanded learning opportunity interests;

(d) One representative from an association representing statewide transit interests;

(e) One representative of an institution of higher education; and

(f) One representative of a nonprofit organization providing training and professional development for family day care providers and family, friend, and neighbor child care providers.

(8) The director of commerce or his or her designee may invite additional representatives to participate as nonvoting members of the task force.

(9) The task force chair and vice chair must be elected by a majority vote of voting task force members.

(10) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the department of commerce.

(11) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with chapter 43.03 RCW.

(12) In accordance with RCW 43.01.036 the task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2019. The report must include findings related to:

(a) Options for the state to incentivize the provision of:

(i) Employer-supported child care by public and private employers; and

(ii) Back-up child care by public and private employers;

(b) Opportunities for streamlining permitting and licensing requirements to facilitate the development and construction of child care facilities;

(c) Potential tax incentives for private businesses providing employer-supported child care;

(d) A model policy for the establishment of a "bring your infant to work" program for public and private sector employees; and

(e) Policy recommendations that address racial, ethnic, and geographic disparity and disproportionality in service delivery and accessibility to services for families.

(13) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Back-up child care" means a temporary child care arrangement that is provided when normal child care arrangements are unavailable.

(b) "Employer-supported child care" includes:

(i) A licensed child care center operated at or near the workplace by an employer for the benefit of employees; or

(ii) Financial assistance provided by an employer for licensed child care expenses incurred by an employee.

(14) This section expires December 30, 2019.

--- END ---