BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that there is a critical need to increase the membership of the public works board to include legislators. The legislature also finds that the representatives from counties, cities, public utility districts, water-sewer districts, and the legislature thoroughly vetted the changes to the public works board. The legislature further finds it is necessary for legislators to serve on the public works board as voting members in order to keep the legislature informed and to serve as champions supporting the board's goals and mission. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to increase the membership of the public works board to include legislators as voting members and maintain the current composition of experts on the board.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.155.030 and 1999 c 153 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The public works board is hereby created.

(2) The board shall be composed of seventeen members as provided in this subsection:

(a) Thirteen members appointed by the governor for terms of four years, except that five members initially shall be appointed for terms of two years. The board shall include: (((a))) (i) Three members, two of whom shall be elected officials and one shall be a public works manager, appointed from a list of at least six persons nominated by the association of Washington cities or its successor; (((b))) (ii) three members, two of whom shall be elected officials and one shall be a public works manager, appointed from a list of at least six persons nominated by the Washington state association of counties or its successor; (((c))) (iii) three members appointed from a list of at least six persons nominated jointly by the Washington public utility districts association and a state association of water-sewer districts, or their successors; and (((d))) (iv) four members appointed from the general public. In appointing the four general public members, the governor shall endeavor to balance the geographical composition of the board and to include members with special expertise in relevant fields such as public finance, architecture and civil engineering, and public works construction. The governor shall appoint one of the general public members of the board as chair. The term of the chair shall coincide with the term of the governor.

(b) Four members from the legislature appointed for terms of four years. The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two major caucuses of the house of representatives and the president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two major caucuses of the senate. Additionally, the speaker of the house of representatives may designate one member from each of the two major caucuses of the house of representatives and the president of the senate may appoint one member from each of the two major caucuses of the senate as alternate members to take the place of the appointed member on the board for meetings at which the member will be absent. The alternate member shall have all powers to vote and participate in board deliberations as the other board members.

(3) Staff support to the board shall be provided by the department.

(4) Nonlegislative members of the board shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislative members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.

(5) If a vacancy on the board in a nonlegislative position occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise, the governor shall fill the vacant position for the unexpired term. Each vacancy in a position appointed from lists provided by the associations under subsection (2) of this section shall be filled from a list of at least three persons nominated by the relevant association or associations. Any vacancy in a legislative position shall be filled by the appointing authority for that position. Any members of the board, appointive or otherwise, may be removed by the governor for cause in accordance with RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080.

--- END ---