BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 63.32.050 and 2007 c 219 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any other method of disposition of unclaimed property provided under this chapter, the police authorities of a city or town may donate unclaimed personal property to nonprofit charitable organizations. A nonprofit charitable organization receiving personal property donated under this section must use the property, or its proceeds, to benefit needy persons. Such organization must qualify for tax-exempt status under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code. Police authorities of a city or town may also donate unclaimed personal property to museums or historical societies. For purposes of this section, "museum or historical society" has the same definition as in RCW 63.26.010.

Sec. 2. RCW 63.35.065 and 2007 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any other method of disposition of unclaimed property provided under this chapter, the state patrol may donate unclaimed personal property to nonprofit charitable organizations. A nonprofit charitable organization receiving personal property donated under this section must use the property, or its proceeds, to benefit needy persons. Such organization must qualify for tax-exempt status under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code. The state patrol may also donate unclaimed personal property to museums or historical societies. For purposes of this section, "museum or historical society" has the same definition as in RCW 63.26.010.

Sec. 3. RCW 63.40.060 and 2007 c 219 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any other method of disposition of unclaimed property provided under this chapter, the county sheriff may donate unclaimed personal property to nonprofit charitable organizations. A nonprofit charitable organization receiving personal property donated under this section must use the property, or its proceeds, to benefit needy persons. Such organization must qualify for tax-exempt status under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code. The county sheriff may also donate unclaimed personal property to museums or historical societies. For purposes of this section, "museum or historical society" has the same definition as in RCW 63.26.010.

--- END ---