BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.04.216 and 2013 c 11 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The county auditor of each county shall be ex officio the supervisor of all primaries and elections, general or special, and it shall be the county auditor's duty to provide places for holding such primaries and elections; to provide the supplies and materials necessary for the conduct of elections; and to publish and post notices of calling such primaries and elections in the manner provided by law. The auditor shall also apportion to each city, town, or district, and to the state of Washington ((in the odd-numbered year)) consistent with RCW 29A.04.420, its share of the expense of such primaries and elections. This section does not apply to general or special elections for any city, town, or district that is not subject to RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330, but all such elections must be held and conducted at the time, in the manner, and by the officials (with such notice, requirements for filing for office, and certifications by local officers) as provided and required by the laws governing such elections.

Sec. 2. RCW 29A.04.420 and 2013 c 11 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever state officers or measures are voted upon at a state primary or general election held in an odd-numbered year under RCW 29A.04.321, the state of Washington shall assume a prorated share of the costs of that state primary or general election.

(2) Whenever state officers or measures are voted upon at a state primary or general election held in an even-numbered year under RCW 29A.04.321, the state shall assume the percentage of its prorated share of the costs of that state primary or general election according to the following schedule:

(a) Twenty-five percent in 2020;

(b) Thirty-five percent in 2022;

(c) Forty-five percent in 2024;

(d) Fifty-five percent in 2026;

(e) Sixty-five percent in 2028;

(f) Seventy-five percent in 2030;

(g) Eighty-five percent in 2032;

(h) Ninety-five percent in 2034; and

(i) One hundred percent in 2036 and thereafter.

(3) Whenever a primary or vacancy election is held to fill a vacancy in the position of United States senator or United States representative under chapter 29A.28 RCW, the state of Washington shall assume a prorated share of the costs of that primary or vacancy election.

(((3))) (4) The county auditor shall apportion the state's share of these expenses when prorating election costs under RCW 29A.04.410 and shall file such expense claims with the secretary of state.

(((4))) (5) The secretary of state shall include in his or her biennial budget requests sufficient funds to carry out this section. Reimbursements for election costs shall be from appropriations specifically provided by law for that purpose.

--- END ---