BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.92.030 and 2013 c 248 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Council" means the student achievement council.

(2) "Disadvantaged student" means a posthigh school student who by reason of adverse cultural, educational, environmental, experiential, familial or other circumstances is unable to qualify for enrollment as a full-time student in an institution of higher education, who would otherwise qualify as a needy student, and who is attending an institution of higher education under an established program designed to qualify the student for enrollment as a full-time student.

(3) "Financial aid" means loans and/or grants to needy students enrolled or accepted for enrollment as a student at institutions of higher education.

(4)(a) "Institution" or "institutions of higher education" means:

(((a))) (i) Any public university, college, community college, or technical college operated by the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof; or

(((b))) (ii) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any other university, college, school, or institute in the state of Washington offering instruction beyond the high school level that is a member institution of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the council for the purposes of this section and that agrees to and complies with program rules adopted pursuant to RCW 28B.92.150. However, any institution, branch, extension or facility operating within the state of Washington that is affiliated with an institution operating in another state must be:

(((i))) (A) A separately accredited member institution of any such accrediting association;

(((ii))) (B) A branch of a member institution of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the council for purposes of this section, that is eligible for federal student financial aid assistance and has operated as a nonprofit college or university delivering on-site classroom instruction for a minimum of twenty consecutive years within the state of Washington, and has an annual enrollment of at least seven hundred full-time equivalent students; or

(((iii))) (C) A nonprofit institution recognized by the state of Washington as provided in RCW 28B.77.240.

(b) "Institution" or "institutions of higher education" does not include any university, college, school, or institute owned or operated by a corporation for profit, or any university, college, school, or institute owned, operated, purchased, or acquired by a not-for-profit corporation if the university, college, school, or institute previously operated in the state of Washington under the ownership of a corporation for profit, unless the university, college, school, or institute is participating in the state financial aid programs as of the effective date of this section or has been approved to participate in the 2018-19 academic year.

(5) "Needy student" means a posthigh school student of an institution of higher education who demonstrates to the office the financial inability, either through the student's parents, family and/or personally, to meet the total cost of board, room, books, and tuition and incidental fees for any semester or quarter. "Needy student" also means an opportunity internship graduate as defined by RCW 28C.18.162 who enrolls in a postsecondary program of study as defined in RCW 28C.18.162 within one year of high school graduation.

(6) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.

(7) "Placebound student" means a student who (a) is unable to complete a college program because of family or employment commitments, health concerns, monetary inability, or other similar factors; and (b) may be influenced by the receipt of an enhanced student financial aid award to complete a baccalaureate degree at an eligible institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.92 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning on the effective date of this section, the council may not approve any new applications from any university, college, school, or institute owned or operated by a corporation for profit, or any university, college, school, or institute owned, operated, purchased, or acquired by a not-for-profit corporation if the university, college, school, or institute previously operated in the state of Washington under the ownership of a corporation for profit.

(2) A university, college, school, or institute owned or operated by a corporation for profit, or a university, college, school, or institute owned, operated, purchased, or acquired by a not-for-profit corporation that previously operated in the state of Washington under the ownership of a corporation for profit, that is participating in the state financial aid programs as of the effective date of this section or has been approved to participate for the 2018-19 academic year may continue to be eligible to participate.

--- END ---