BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the internet crimes against children task force program, through the United States department of justice, helps state and local law enforcement agencies develop an effective response to technology-facilitated child sexual exploitation and internet crimes against children. This help encompasses forensic and investigative components, training and technical assistance, victim services, and community education. The program is a national network of sixty-one coordinated task forces representing over three thousand five hundred federal, state, and local law enforcement and prosecutorial agencies.

(2) The legislature created the Washington internet crimes against children account in 2015 to support the Washington internet crimes against children task force. The account is dedicated to combat internet-facilitated crimes against children, promote education on internet safety to the public and to minors, and rescue children victims from abuse and exploitation.

(3) The legislature finds that perpetrators use wireless devices used to access the internet to commit internet crimes against children. It is the intent of the legislature to collect a forty cent tax on each retail sale of wireless devices used to access the internet and dedicate the revenue to the Washington internet crimes against children account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) There is levied and collected a tax equal to forty cents on each retail sale in this state of wireless devices used to access the internet.

(2) The revenue collected under this section must be deposited in the Washington internet crimes against children account.

(3) "Wireless devices used to access the internet" means smartphones, laptops, desktops, tablets, and gaming consoles used to access the internet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration of this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.32.145 and 2015 c 188 s 121 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the department has issued a warrant under RCW 82.32.210 for the collection of unpaid trust fund taxes from a limited liability business entity and that business entity has been terminated, dissolved, or abandoned, or is insolvent, the department may pursue collection of the entity's unpaid trust fund taxes, including penalties and interest on those taxes, against any or all of the responsible individuals. For purposes of this subsection, "insolvent" means the condition that results when the sum of the entity's debts exceeds the fair market value of its assets. The department may presume that an entity is insolvent if the entity refuses to disclose to the department the nature of its assets and liabilities.

(2) Personal liability under this section may be imposed for state and local trust fund taxes.

(3)(a) For a responsible individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief financial officer, liability under this section applies regardless of fault or whether the individual was or should have been aware of the unpaid trust fund tax liability of the limited liability business entity.

(b) For any other responsible individual, liability under this section applies only if he or she willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid to the department the trust fund taxes due from the limited liability business entity.

(4)(a) Except as provided in this subsection (4)(a), a responsible individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief financial officer is liable under this section only for trust fund tax liability accrued during the period that he or she was the chief executive or chief financial officer. However, if the responsible individual had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's trust fund taxes to the department during any period of time that the person was not the chief executive or chief financial officer, that individual is also liable for trust fund tax liability that became due during the period that he or she had the duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's taxes to the department but was not the chief executive or chief financial officer.

(b) All other responsible individuals are liable under this section only for trust fund tax liability that became due during the period he or she had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's taxes to the department.

(5) Persons described in subsection (3)(b) of this section are exempt from liability under this section in situations where nonpayment of the limited liability business entity's trust fund taxes is due to reasons beyond their control as determined by the department by rule.

(6) Any person having been issued a notice of assessment under this section is entitled to the appeal procedures under RCW 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.32.180, 82.32.190, and 82.32.200.

(7) This section does not relieve the limited liability business entity of its trust fund tax liability or otherwise impair other tax collection remedies afforded by law.

(8) Collection authority and procedures prescribed in this chapter apply to collections under this section.

(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Chief executive" means: The president of a corporation; or for other entities or organizations other than corporations or if the corporation does not have a president as one of its officers, the highest ranking executive manager or administrator in charge of the management of the company or organization.

(b) "Chief financial officer" means: The treasurer of a corporation; or for entities or organizations other than corporations or if a corporation does not have a treasurer as one of its officers, the highest senior manager who is responsible for overseeing the financial activities of the entire company or organization.

(c) "Limited liability business entity" means a type of business entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity, or a business entity that is managed or owned in whole or in part by an entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity. Limited liability business entities include corporations, limited liability companies, limited liability partnerships, trusts, general partnerships and joint ventures in which one or more of the partners or parties are also limited liability business entities, and limited partnerships in which one or more of the general partners are also limited liability business entities.

(d) "Manager" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.006.

(e) "Member" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.006, except that the term only includes members of member-managed limited liability companies.

(f) "Officer" means any officer or assistant officer of a corporation, including the president, vice president, secretary, and treasurer.

(g)(i) "Responsible individual" includes any current or former officer, manager, member, partner, or trustee of a limited liability business entity with an unpaid tax warrant issued by the department.

(ii) "Responsible individual" also includes any current or former employee or other individual, but only if the individual had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's unpaid trust fund tax liability reflected in a tax warrant issued by the department.

(iii) Whenever any taxpayer has one or more limited liability business entities as a member, manager, or partner, "responsible individual" also includes any current and former officers, members, or managers of the limited liability business entity or entities or of any other limited liability business entity involved directly in the management of the taxpayer. For purposes of this subsection (9)(g)(iii), "taxpayer" means a limited liability business entity with an unpaid tax warrant issued against it by the department.

(h) "Trust fund taxes" means taxes collected from purchasers and held in trust under RCW 82.08.050, including taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020 ((and)), 82.08.150, and section 2 of this act.

(i) "Willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid" means that the failure was the result of an intentional, conscious, and voluntary course of action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect January 1, 2019.

--- END ---