BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A supplemental capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2019, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 1001. 2018 c 2 s 1005 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000097)

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction

Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$8,020,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$13,020,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($13,020,000))

﻿ $18,020,000

Sec. 1002. 2018 c 2 s 1006 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Housing Trust Fund Program (30000872)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $58,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation, (($43,400,000)) $44,131,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation, and (($5,370,000)) $8,658,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for affordable housing and preservation of affordable housing. Of the amounts in this subsection:

(a) $24,370,000 is provided solely for housing projects that provide supportive housing and case-management services to persons with chronic mental illness. The department must prioritize low-income supportive housing unit proposals that provide services or include a partner community behavioral health treatment provider;

(b) $10,000,000 is provided solely for housing preservation grants or loans to be awarded competitively. The grants may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require that a capital needs assessment is performed to estimate the cost of the preservation project at contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property. To receive grants, housing projects must meet the following requirements:

(i) The property is more than fifteen years old;

(ii) At least 50 percent of the housing units are occupied by families and individuals at or below 30 percent area median income.

(iii) The improvements will result in reduction of operating or utilities costs, or both; and

(iv) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(c) $5,000,000 is provided solely for housing projects that benefit people at or below 80 percent of the area median income who have been displaced by a natural disaster declared by the governor, including people who have been displaced within the last two biennia.

(d) $1,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to work with the communities of concern commission to focus on creating capital assets that will help reduce poverty and build stronger and more sustainable communities using the communities' cultural understanding and vision. The funding must be used for predevelopment costs for capital projects identified by the commission and for other activities to assist communities in developing capacity to create community-owned capital assets.

(e) $1,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for a nonprofit, public development authority, local government, or housing authority to purchase the south annex properties located at 1531 Broadway, 1534 Broadway, and 909 East Pine street owned by the state board of community and technical colleges. The property must be used to provide services and housing for homeless youth and young adults.

(f) (($21,987,000)) $26,006,000 is provided solely for the following list of housing projects:

(i) Cross Laminated Timber Spokane Housing Predesign. . . .$500,000

(ii) El Centro de la Raza. . . .$737,000

(iii) Highland Village Preservation. . . .$1,500,000

(iv) King County Modular Housing Project. . . .$3,000,000

(v) Nisqually Tribal Housing. . . .$1,250,000

(vi) Othello Homesight Community Center. . . .$3,000,000

(vii) Firs Mobile Home Park. . . .$2,500,000

(viii) Parkview Apartments Affordable Housing. . . .$100,000

(ix) Supported Housing and Employment (Longview). . . .$129,000

(x) $6,000,000 is provided solely for grants for high quality low-income housing projects that will quickly move people from homelessness into secure housing, and are significantly less expensive to construct than traditional housing. It is the intent of the legislature that these grants serve projects with a total project development cost per housing unit of less than $125,000, excluding the value of land, and with a commitment by the applicant to maintain the housing units for at least a twenty-five year period. Amounts provided that are subject to this subsection must be used to plan, predesign, design, provide technical assistance and financial services, purchase land for, and build innovative low-income housing units. $3,000,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection is provided solely for innovative affordable housing in Shelton and $3,000,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection is provided solely for innovative affordable housing for veterans in Orting. Mental health and substance abuse counseling services must be offered to residents of housing projects supported by appropriations in this subsection.

(((viii) $6,000,000)) (xi) $7,290,000 is provided solely for grants to the following organizations using innovative methods to address homelessness: (($3,000,000)) $4,290,000 for THA Arlington drive youth campus in Tacoma and $3,000,000 for a King county housing project.

(g) Of the amounts appropriated remaining after (a) through (f) of this subsection, the department must allocate the funds as follows:

(i) 10 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit veterans;

(ii) 10 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit homeownership;

(iii) 5 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit people with developmental disabilities;

(iv) The remaining amount is provided solely for projects that serve low-income and special needs populations in need of housing, including, but not limited to, homeless families with children, homeless youth, farmworkers, and seniors.

(2) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(3) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in subsection (1) of this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($43,400,000))

﻿ $44,131,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$58,000,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .(($5,370,000))

﻿ $8,658,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($106,770,000))

﻿ $110,789,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$400,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($506,770,000))

﻿ $510,789,000

Sec. 1003. 2018 c 2 s 1013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Funds 3 (30000881)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state.

(2) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section; and

(b) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(3)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require a project applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed by the firm or on the firm's governing board during the past twenty-four months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employing the individual, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of funding.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a grantee who received funding under this section, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the funding grant by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(4) The requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(5) $11,000,000 of the state building construction account, is provided solely for grid modernization grants for projects that advance clean and renewable energy technologies, and transmission and distribution control systems; that support integration of renewable energy sources, deployment of distributed energy resources, and sustainable microgrids; and that increase utility customer options for energy sources, energy efficiency, energy equipment, and utility services.

(a) Projects must be implemented by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible utilities may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding.

(b) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, allow smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding.

(c) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(6) $7,900,000 of the state building construction account and $3,100,000 of the energy efficiency account are provided solely for grants to demonstrate new approaches to electrification of transportation systems.

(a) Projects must be implemented by local governments, or by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible parties may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding. The department of commerce must coordinate with other electrification programs, including projects the department of transportation is developing and projects funded by the Volkswagen consent decree, to determine the most effective distribution of the systems.

(b) Priorities must be given to eligible technologies that reduce the top two hundred hours of demand and the demand side.

(c) Eligible technologies for these projects include, but are not limited to:

(i) Electric vehicle and transportation system charging and open source control infrastructure, including inductive charging systems;

(ii) Electric vehicle sharing in low-income, multi-unit housing communities in urban areas;

(iii) Grid-related vehicle electrification, connecting vehicle fleets to grid operations, including school and transit buses;

(iv) Electric vehicle fleet management tools with open source software;

(v) Maritime electrification, such as electric ferries, water taxis, and shore power infrastructure.

(7)(a) $8,600,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for strategic research and development for new and emerging clean energy technologies, as needed to match federal or other nonstate funds to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies.

(b) The department shall consult and coordinate with the University of Washington, Washington State University, the Pacific Northwest national laboratory and other clean energy organizations to design the grant program unless the organization prefers to compete for the grants. If the organization prefers to receive grants from the program they may not participate in the consultant process determining how the grant process is structured. The program shall offer matching funds for competitively selected clean energy projects, including but not limited to: Solar technologies, advanced bioenergy and biofuels, development of new earth abundant materials or lightweight materials, advanced energy storage, battery components recycling, and new renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies. Criteria for the grant program must include life cycle cost analysis for projects that are part of the competitive process.

(c) $750,000 of this subsection (7) is provided solely for the state efficiency and environmental program.

(8) $8,000,000 of the state taxable construction account is provided solely for scientific instruments to help accelerate research in advanced materials at the proposed science laboratories infrastructure facility at the Pacific Northwest national laboratory. These state funds are contingent on securing federal funds for the new facility, and are provided as match to the federal funding. The instruments will support researchers at the bioproducts sciences and engineering laboratory, the joint center for deployment research in earth abundant materials, the center for advanced materials and clean energy technology, and other energy and materials collaborations with the University of Washington and Washington State University.

(9) $1,600,000 of the state building construction account and $2,400,000 of the energy efficiency account are provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds for the deployment of solar projects located in Washington state.

(a) Priority must be given to distribution side projects that reduce peak electricity demand.

(b) Projects must be capable of generating at least five hundred kilowatts of direct current generating capacity.

(c) Grants shall not exceed $200,000 per megawatt of direct current generating capacity and total grant funds per project shall not exceed $1,000,000 per applicant. Applicants may not use other state grants.

(d) At least 25 percent of the total allocation of a project shall be provided solely for projects that provide direct benefits to low-income residents or communities. The department must attempt to prioritize an equal geographic distribution.

(e) Priority must be given to major components made in Washington.

(10) (($2,400,000)) $4,800,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for a project which, when fully deployed, will reduce emissions of greenhouse gases by a minimum of seven hundred fifty thousand tons per year, increase energy efficiency, and protect or create manufacturing jobs located in a county with a population of less than three hundred thousand.

(11) $1,100,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the public utility district no. 1 of Klickitat county for the remediation, survey, and evaluation of a closed-loop pump storage hydropower project at the John Day pool.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($32,600,000))

﻿ $35,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Energy Efficiency Account—State. . . .$5,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($46,100,000))

﻿ $48,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$200,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($246,100,000))

﻿ $248,500,000

Sec. 1004. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 1003 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects (20064008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 131, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

(2) $235,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to the Spokane river forum. The department shall not execute a contract with the grant recipient unless the Spokane river forum is in receipt of all permits by ((March)) June 1, 2018. If the terms and conditions of this subsection are not met by ((March)) June 1, 2018, the funding provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$235,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$45,657,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$45,892,000

Sec. 1005. 2018 c 2 s 1016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriations in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Aberdeen Gateway Center (Aberdeen). . . .$1,750,000

Adams County Industrial Wastewater and Treatment

Center (Othello). . . .$1,250,000

Adna Elementary Playshed (Chehalis). . . .$104,000

Airway Heights Recreation Complex (Airway Heights). . . .$515,000

Alder Creek Pioneer Museum Expansion (Bickelton). . . .$500,000

Anderson Island Historical Society (Anderson Island). . . .$26,000

Appleway Trail Amenities (Spokane Valley). . . .$556,000

ARC Community Center Renovation (Bremerton). . . .$81,000

Arlington Pocket Park Downtown Business District

(Arlington). . . .$46,000

Asia Pacific Cultural Center (Tacoma). . . .$250,000

Belfair Sewer Extension to Puget Sound Industrial

Ctr (Belfair). . . .$515,000

Billy Frank Jr. Heritage Center (Olympia). . . .$206,000

Bloodworks NW Bloodmobiles. . . .$425,000

Bothell Parks Projects (Bothell). . . .$309,000

Bridgeview Education and Employment Resource Center

(Vancouver). . . .$500,000

Brier ADA Ramp Updates Phase (Brier). . . .$115,000

Camp Schechter New Infrastructure and Dining Hall

(Tumwater). . . .$200,000

Capitol Campus E. WA Butte (Olympia). . . .$52,000

Captain Joseph House (Port Angeles). . . .$225,000

Carnation Central Business District Revitalization

(Carnation). . . .$1,545,000

Castle Rock Fair LED Lighting (Castle Rock). . . .$10,000

Centennial Trail - Southern Extension #1 (Snohomish). . . .$1,000,000

Centerville Grange Renovation (Centerville). . . .$134,000

Centralia Fox Theatre Restoration (Centralia). . . .$299,000

Chamber Economic Development Project (Federal Way). . . .$250,000

Chelan County Emergency Operations Center (Wenatchee). . . .$1,000,000

Chelatchie Prairie Railroad Maintenance Bldg.

Phase 2 (Yacolt). . . .$250,000

Cherry St. Fellowship (Seattle). . . .$360,000

Children's Playgarden (Seattle). . . .$315,000

Chimacum Ridge Forest Pilot (Port Townsend). . . .$3,400,000

City of Brewster Manganese Abatement (Brewster). . . .$752,000

Cityview Conversion to Residential Treatment

(Moses Lake). . . .$250,000

Clark County Historical Museum (Vancouver). . . .$300,000

Clymer Museum and Gallery Remodel (Ellensburg). . . .$258,000

Coastal Harvest Roof Replacement (Hoquiam). . . .$206,000

Cocoon House (Everett). . . .$1,000,000

College Place Well Consolidation and Replacement

(College Place). . . .$900,000

Columbia River Trail (Washougal). . . .$1,000,000

Confluence Park Improvements (P2&3) (Issaquah). . . .$206,000

((Coordinated and Safe Service Center (Redmond). . . .$309,000))

Country Doctor Community Health Centers (Seattle). . . .$280,000

Covington Town Center Civic Plaza Development

(Covington). . . .$820,000

Cross Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,500,000

Daffodil Heritage Float Barn (Puyallup). . . .$103,000

Darrington Rodeo Grounds (Darrington). . . .$250,000

Des Moines Marina Bulkhead & Fishing Pier Renovation

(Des Moines). . . .$2,000,000

Disaster Response Communications Project (Colville). . . .$1,000,000

District 5 Public Safety Center (Sultan). . . .$1,500,000

Downtown Pocket Park at Rockwell (Port Orchard). . . .$309,000

DuPont Historical Museum Renovation HVAC (DuPont). . . .$53,000

East Grays Harbor Fiber Project (Elma). . . .$463,000

East Hill YMCA/Park Renovation (Kent). . . .$1,000,000

Eastside Community Center (Tacoma). . . .$2,550,000

Ebey Waterfront Trail and Shoreline Access

(Marysville). . . .$1,000,000

Emmanuel Life Center Kitchen (Spokane). . . .$155,000

Ethiopian Community Affordable Senior Housing (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Evergreen Pool Resurfacing (White Center). . . .$247,000

Fall City Wastewater Infrastructure Planning & Design

(Fall City). . . .$1,000,000

Family Medicine Remodel (Goldendale). . . .$195,000

Federal Way Camera Replacement (Federal Way). . . .$250,000

Federal Way Senior Center (Federal Way). . . .$175,000

Flood Protection Wall & Storage Building (Sultan). . . .$286,000

Food Lifeline Food Bank. . . .$1,250,000

Forestry Museum Building (Tenino). . . .$16,000

Fox Island Catastrophic Emergency Preparation

(Fox Island). . . .$17,000

Francis Anderson Center Roofing Project (Edmonds). . . .$391,000

Freeland Water and Sewer District Sewer Project

(Freeland). . . .$1,500,000

FUSION Transitional Hse Pgm/FUSION Decor Boutique

(Federal Way). . . .$500,000

Gig Harbor Sports Complex (Gig Harbor). . . .$206,000

Granger Historical Society Museum Acquisition

(Granger). . . .$255,000

Greater Maple Valley Veterans Memorial Foundation

(Maple Valley). . . .$258,000

GreenBridge/4th Ave Streetscaping (White Center). . . .$1,195,000

Harmony Sports Complex Infrastructure & Safety Imprve

(Vancouver). . . .$1,177,000

Harrington School District #204, Pool Renovation

(Harrington). . . .$97,000

Historic Mukai Farm and Garden Restoration (Vashon). . . .$250,000

Holly Ridge Center Building (Bremerton). . . .$475,000

Honor Point Military and Aerospace Museum (Spokane). . . .$100,000

HopeWorks TOD Center (Everett). . . .$2,760,000

Hoquiam Library (Hoquiam). . . .$250,000

HUB Sports Center (Liberty Lake). . . .$516,000

Industrial Park No. 5 Road Improvements (George). . . .$412,000

Industrial Park No. 5 Water System Improvements

(George). . . .$700,000

Inland Northwest Rail Museum (Reardan). . . .$170,000

Innovative Health Care Learning Center (Yakima). . . .$1,000,000

Interbay PDAC (Seattle). . . .$900,000

Intrepid Spirit Center (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Islandwood Comm Dining Hall and Kitchen

(Bainbridge Island). . . .$200,000

((Japanese Gulch Creek Restoration Project (Mukilteo). . . .$721,000))

Kenmore Public Boathouse (Kenmore). . . .$250,000

Key Peninsula Civic Center Generator (Vaughn). . . .$60,000

Key Peninsula Elder Community (Lakebay). . . .$515,000

Kitchen Upgrade Belfair Senior Center Meals on Wheels

(Belfair). . . .$12,000

Kitsap Reg. Library Foundation, Silverdale Library

(Silverdale). . . .$250,000

Kona Kai Coffee Training Center (Tukwila). . . .$407,000

La Conner New Regional Library (La Conner). . . .$500,000

Lacey Boys and Girls Club (Lacey). . . .$30,000

Lake Chelan Community Hospital & Clinic Replacement

(Chelan). . . .$300,000

Lake City Comm Center, Renovate Magnuson Comm Center

(Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center (Lake Stevens). . . .$3,100,000

Lake Stevens Food Bank (Lake Stevens). . . .$300,000

Lake Sylvia State Park Legacy Pavilion (Montesano). . . .$696,000

Lake Tye All-Weather Fields (Monroe). . . .$800,000

Lakewood Playhouse Lighting System Upgrade (Lakewood). . . .$60,000

Lambert House Purchase (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Larson Playfield Lighting Renovation (Moses Lake). . . .$146,000

Lewis Co Fire Dist #1 Emergency Svcs Bldg & Resrce Ctr

(Onalaska). . . .$80,000

LIGO STEM Exploration Center (Richland). . . .$411,000

Longbranch Marina (Longbranch). . . .$248,000

Longview Police Department Range and Training

(Castle Rock). . . .$271,000

Lyon Creek, SR 104 Fish Barrier Removal

(Lake Forest Park). . . .$1,200,000

Maury Island Open Space Remediation (Maury Island). . . .$2,000,000

McChord Airfield North Clear Zone (Lakewood). . . .$2,000,000

Mill Creek Flood Control Project (Kent). . . .$2,000,000

Millionair Club Charity Kitchen (Seattle). . . .$167,000

Moorlands Park Improvements (Kenmore). . . .$250,000

Morrow Manor (Poulsbo). . . .$773,000

Mount Baker Properties Cleanup Site (Seattle). . . .$1,100,000

Mount Rainier Early Warning System (Pierce County). . . .$1,751,000

Mukilteo Tank Farm Remediation (Mukilteo). . . .$257,000

Multicultural Community Center (Seattle). . . .$1,300,000

NE Snohomish County Community Services Campus

(Granite Falls). . . .$375,000

NeighborCare Health (Vashon). . . .$3,000,000

New Fire Station at Lake Lawrence (Yelm). . . .$252,000

North Cove Erosion Control (South Bend). . . .$650,000

Northshore Athletic Fields (Woodinville). . . .$400,000

Northwest Improvement Company Building (Roslyn). . . .$1,000,000

Olmstead-Smith Historical Gardens Replacement Well

(Ellensburg). . . .$17,000

Orting's Pedestrian Evacuation Crossing SR162 (Orting). . . .$500,000

Othello Regional Water Project (Othello). . . .$1,000,000

Paradise Point Water Supply System Phase IV

(Ridgefield). . . .$500,000

Pepin Creek Realignment (Lynden). . . .$3,035,000

Performing Arts & Events Center (Federal Way). . . .$1,000,000

Pioneer Village ADA Accessible Pathways (Ferndale). . . .$154,000

((Ponders Wells Treatment Replacement (Lakewood). . . .$500,000))

Port Ilwaco/Port Chinook Marina Mtce Drdg & Matl Disps

(Chinook). . . .$77,000

Port Orchard Marina Breakwater Refurbishment

(Port Orchard). . . .$1,019,000

Poulsbo Outdoor Salmon Observation Area (Poulsbo). . . .$475,000

Puyallup Meeker Mansion Public Plaza (Puyallup). . . .$500,000

Quincy Square on 4th (Bremerton). . . .$250,000

R.A. Long Park (Longview). . . .$296,000

Redondo Beach Rocky Reef (Des Moines). . . .$500,000

Ridgefield Outdoor Recreation Complex (Ridgefield). . . .$750,000

Rochester Boys & Girls Club upgrades (Rochester). . . .$26,000

Save the Old Tower (Pasco). . . .$300,000

Schilling Road Fire Station (Lyle). . . .$448,000

Scott Hill Park (Woodland). . . .$750,000

Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Seattle Opera (Seattle). . . .$465,000

Shelton Basin 3 Sewer Rehabilitation Project (Shelton). . . .$1,500,000

Skagit Co Public Safety Emgcy Commun Ctr Exp/Remodel

(Mt. Vernon). . . .$525,000

Skagit County Veterans Community Park (Sedro-Woolley). . . .$500,000

Skagit Valley YMCA (Mt. Vernon). . . .$400,000

Snohomish JROTC Program (Snohomish). . . .$189,000

South Gorge Trail (Spokane). . . .$250,000

South Snohomish County Community Resource Center

(Lynnwood). . . .$2,210,000

South Thurston County Meals on Wheels Kitchen

Upgrade (Yelm). . . .$30,000

Southwest WA Agricultural Business Park (Tenino). . . .$618,000

Southwest Washington Fair Grange Building Re-Roof

(Chehalis). . . .$54,000

Spanaway Lake Management Plan (Spanaway). . . .$26,000

Squalicum Waterway Maintenance Dredging (Bellingham). . . .$750,000

Steilacoom Historical Museum Storage Building

(Steilacoom). . . .$31,000

Sunnyside Community Hospital (Sunnyside). . . .$2,000,000

Sunset Career Center (Renton). . . .$412,000

Sunset Neighborhood Park (Renton). . . .$3,050,000

Tacoma's Historic Theater District (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Tam O'Shanter Athletic Arena (Kelso). . . .$1,000,000

Toledo Beautification (Toledo). . . .$52,000

Trout Lake School/Community Soccer & Track Facility

(Trout Lake). . . .$77,000

Tumwater Boys and Girls Club (Olympia). . . .$36,000

Turning Pointe Domestic Violence Svc: Shelter Imprv/Rep

(Shelton). . . .$27,000

Twisp Civic Building (Twisp). . . .$750,000

University YMCA (Seattle). . . .$600,000

Veterans Memorial Museum (Chehalis). . . .$354,000

Washington Agricultural Education Center (Lynden). . . .$1,500,000

Washington Care Services (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Washington State Horse Park Covered Arena (Cle Elum). . . .$2,000,000

Waste Treatment and Sewer Collection System

(Toppenish). . . .$1,405,000

Wastewater Collection & Water Distribution Replacemnt

(Carbonado). . . .$1,500,000

Water Treatment for Kidney Dialysis. . . .$499,000

Wayne Golf Course Region Park (Bothell). . . .$1,000,000

Wesley Homes Bradley Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,380,000

Westport Marina (Westport). . . .$2,500,000

Weyerhaeuser Land Preservation

(Federal Way). . . .(($250,000)) $750,000

Whidbey Island Youth Project (Oak Harbor). . . .$300,000

White Pass Country Historical Museum (Packwood). . . .$283,000

Whitehouse Additional Capital Campaign (Pasco). . . .$1,500,000

Willows Road Regional Trail Connection (Kirkland). . . .$1,442,000

Winlock HS Track (Winlock). . . .$103,000

Winlock Industrial Infrastructure Development

(Winlock). . . .$1,500,000

Wishram School CTE Facility (Wishram). . . .$150,000

Yakima Valley SunDome Repairs (Yakima). . . .$206,000

Yelm City Park Playground Modernization (Yelm). . . .$247,000

Youth Eastside Services (Bellevue). . . .$26,000

YWCA Family Justice Center (Spokane). . . .$103,000

(8) $26,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of the Spanaway lake management plan((, contingent on commitment of local funding to support the on-going operational costs of the project, including but not limited to the creation of a lake management district)).

(9) (($250,000)) $750,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the planning, development, acquisition, and other activities pursing open space conservation strategies for the historic Federal Way Weyerhaeuser campus. The grant recipient must be a regional nonprofit nature conservancy that works to conserve keystone properties selected by the city of Federal Way.

(10)(a) $900,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for an Interbay public development advisory committee. It is the intent of the legislature to examine current and future needs of a state entity that performs an essential public function on state-owned property located in one of the state's designated manufacturing industrial centers. The legislature further intends to explore the potential future uses of this state-owned property in the event that the state entity determines that it must relocate in order to protect its ability to perform its essential public function.

(b) The Interbay public development advisory committee is created to make recommendations regarding the highest public benefit and future economic development uses for the Washington army national guard armory facility in the city of Seattle, pier 91 property, located at the descriptions referred to in the quit claim deeds for two parcels of land, 24.75 acres total, dated January 8, 1971, and December 22, 2009.

(c) The Interbay advisory committee consists of seven persons appointed as follows:

(i) One person appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(ii) One person appointed by the president of the senate; and

(iii) Five persons appointed by the governor, who must collectively have experience in forming public-private partnerships to develop workforce housing or affordable housing; knowledge of project financing options for public-private partnerships related to housing; architectural design and development experience related to industrial lands and mixed-use zoning to include housing; and experience leading public processes to engage communities and other stakeholders in public discussions regarding economic development decisions.

(d) The Interbay public development advisory committee must:

(i) Work in collaboration with the military department to determine the needs of the military department if it is relocated from the land described in subsection (1) of this section, including identifying:

(A) Current uses;

(B) Future needs of the units currently at this location;

(C) Potential suitable publicly owned sites in Washington for relocation of current units; and

(D) The costs associated with acquisition, construction, and relocation to another site or sites for these units;

(ii) Explore the future economic development opportunities if the land described in subsection (1) of this section is vacated by the military department, and make recommendations, including identifying:

(A) Suitable and unsuitable future uses for the land;

(B) Environmental issues and associated costs;

(C) Current public infrastructure availability, future public infrastructure plans by local or regional entities, and potential public infrastructure needs;

(D) Transportation corridors in the immediate area and any potential right-of-way needs; and

(E) Existing zoning regulations for the land and potential future zoning needs to evaluate workforce housing, affordable housing, and other commercial and industrial development compatible with the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center designation;

(iii) Explore the potential funding sources and partners as well as any needed transactions, and make recommendations, including:

(A) Any potential private partners or investors;

(B) Necessary real estate transactions;

(C) Federal funding opportunities; and

(D) State and local funding sources, including any tax-related programs;

(iv) Conduct at least three public meetings at a location within the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center, where a quorum of the Interbay public development advisory committee members are present, at which members of the public are invited to present to the Interbay advisory committee regarding the future uses of the site and potential issues such as industrial land use, commercial development, residential zoning, and public infrastructure needs; and

(v) Provide a report to the legislature and office of the governor with recommendations for each area described in this subsection (10)(d) by June 29, 2019. The Interbay advisory committee's recommendations must include recommendations regarding the structure, composition, and scope of authority of any subsequent state public development authority that may be established to implement the recommendations of the Interbay advisory committee created in this section.

(e) The Interbay advisory committee created in this section terminates June 30, 2019.

(f) Nothing in this section authorizes the solicitation of interest or bids for work related to the purposes of this section.

(g) The department of commerce shall provide staff support to the Interbay advisory committee. The department may contract with outside consultants to provide any needed expertise.

(h) Legislative members of the Interbay advisory committee are reimbursed for travel in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(11) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the city of Lakewood for the purchase of property within the federally designated north clear zone at joint base Lewis-McChord. Once acquired, the property must be zoned for use compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. The city may lease or resell the acquired property for fair market value, but any such lease or sale must include restrictions or covenants ensuring that the use of the property is safely compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. If the city subsequently resells, rezones, develops, or leases the property for commercial or industrial uses contrary to the allowed uses in the north clear zone, the city must repay to the state the amount spent on the purchase of the property in its entirety within ten years.

(12) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Federal Way chamber of commerce for two economic development projects focused in the south Puget Sound area. The amounts in this section must be used for a business retention and expansion program to conduct economic research in collaboration with stakeholders, develop data-driven economic strategies, and produce a written evaluation; and a tourism enhancement program to develop and inventory the Federal Way area tourism sector, analyze data regarding visitation, and produce a written evaluation.

(13) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Northshore athletic field which shall be named "Andy Hill Sports Complex."

(14) $1,177,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Harmony sports complex infrastructure and safety improvements in Vancouver and is contingent upon the facility being open to the public.

(15) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Asia Pacific cultural center in Tacoma. ((These state funds are contingent on securing at least $1,000,000 in private funds.))

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($130,529,000))

﻿ $129,499,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($130,529,000))

﻿ $129,499,000

Sec. 1006. 2018 c 2 s 1017 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Early Learning Facility Grants (40000006)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($3,504,000)) $4,504,000 of the early learning facilities development account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects in the following amounts:

Pasco Early Learning Center. . . .$1,030,000

Discover! Children's Museum. . . .$1,030,000

West Hills Early Learning Center. . . .$464,000

Franklin Pierce Early Learning Center. . . .$980,000

Refugee Women's Alliance Early Learning Facility. . . .$1,000,000

(2) (($11,996,000)) $10,996,000 of the early learning facilities revolving account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for early learning facility grants and loans specified in sections 3 through 11, chapter 12, Laws of 2017, 3rd sp. sess. to provide state assistance for designing, constructing, purchasing, or modernizing public or private early learning education facilities for eligible organizations.

(((3) If the bill referenced in subsection (2) of this section is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amount provided in subsection (2) of this section shall lapse.))

Appropriation:

Early Learning Facilities Development

Account—State. . . .(($3,504,000))

﻿ $4,504,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving

Account—State. . . .(($11,996,000))

﻿ $10,996,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$15,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$52,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$67,500,000

Sec. 1007. 2018 c 2 s 1018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Dental Clinic Capacity Grants (40000007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Funding provided in this section may be used for the construction and equipment directly associated with dental facilities. The funding provided in this section is for projects that are maintained for at least a ten-year period and provide capacity to address unmet patient need and increase efficiency in dental access.

(b) (($12,286,000)) $13,036,000 of the amount provided in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in (a) of this subsection:

Community Health Association of Spokane

(Spokane Valley). . . .$581,000

Community Health Association of Spokane

(Clarkston). . . .$391,000

Community Health of Central Washington

(Ellensburg). . . .$1,800,000

Columbia Valley Community Health (Chelan). . . .$753,000

East Central Community Center (Spokane). . . .$500,000

HealthPoint (Federal Way). . . .$900,000

International Community Health Services (Shoreline). . . .$605,000

Jefferson Healthcare Dental Clinic (Port Townsend). . . .$1,000,000

Neighborcare (Seattle). . . .$1,388,000

North East Washington Health Programs (Springdale). . . .$465,000

North ((Olympia)) Olympic Healthcare Network

(Port Angeles). . . .$610,000

Peninsula Community Health Services (Poulsbo). . . .$395,000

Sea Mar (Seattle). . . .$183,000

Sea Mar (Oak Harbor). . . .$149,000

Sea Mar (Tacoma). . . .$149,000

Sea Mar (Vancouver). . . .$167,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$250,000

Unity Care NW (Ferndale). . . .$750,000

Valley View Health Center (Chehalis). . . .$1,000,000

Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic (Kennewick). . . .$1,000,000

(c) $2,800,000 is provided solely for the following list of projects to increase the capacity of dental residencies:

Spokane Dental Residency (Spokane). . . .$2,000,000

St. Peter Dental Residency (Olympia). . . .$800,000

(((d) In order to assess the impact these projects may have on the omnibus operating appropriations act, the department must, in consultation with the medical assistance forecast work group, assess each federally qualified health center project to determine the impact the project may have on state expenditures from the expansion of dental clinic capacity, including the additional impact of change of scope of service for the receiving clinics. Each project must be assessed no later than December 1, 2018. The department must report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on the results of the assessments by January 1, 2019.))

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($15,086,000))

﻿ $15,836,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($15,086,000))

﻿ $15,836,000

Sec. 1008. 2018 c 2 s 1020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Behavioral Health Community Capacity (40000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department of commerce, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the health care authority, to issue grants to community hospitals or other community entities to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the facilities. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services. The department shall establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more behavioral health organizations, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, or entities that assume the responsibilities of behavioral health organizations in regions in which the health care authority is purchasing medical and behavioral health services through fully integrated contracts pursuant to RCW 71.24.380;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(d) A commitment by the applicant to maintain the beds or facility for at least a ten-year period;

(e) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(f) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds; and

(g) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(2) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (3), the department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and behavioral health organizations, must strive for geographic distribution and allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(3) (($36,600,000)) $35,600,000 is provided solely for a competitive process for each category listed and is subject to the criteria in subsections (1) and (2) of this section:

(a) $4,600,000 is provided solely for at least two enhanced service facilities for long-term placement of ((geriatric or traumatic brain injury)) patients discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(b) $2,000,000 is provided solely for at least one facility with secure detox treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(c) $2,000,000 is provided solely for at least one facility with acute detox treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(d) (($11,400,000)) $10,400,000 is provided solely for crisis diversion or stabilization facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases. At least two of the facilities must be located in King county and one must be located in Pierce county;

(e) $10,000,000 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment providers to develop capacity for beds to serve individuals on ninety or one hundred eighty day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health, and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the department of social and health services;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the department of social and health services that it is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The department of social and health services has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes; and

(f) $6,600,000 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community providers to develop psychiatric residential treatment beds to serve individuals being diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, the department of health, and the local behavioral health organization jurisdiction for which a proposal has been submitted and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the behavioral health organization in the region or the entity that assumes the responsibilities of the behavioral health organization pursuant to RCW 71.24.380;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the department of social and health services that it is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The behavioral health organization or the entity that assumes the responsibilities of the behavioral health organization pursuant to RCW 71.24.380 has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes.

(4) (($26,000,000)) $35,276,000 is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

North Sound Behavioral Health Organization Denny

Youth Center. . . .$5,000,000

North Sound Behavioral Health Organization Substance

Use Disorder Intensive Treatment. . . .$5,000,000

North Sound Stabilization Campus (Sedro-Woolley). . . .$1,550,000

Bellingham Mental Health Triage . . . .$5,000,000

Bellingham Acute Detox. . . .$2,000,000

SWWA Diversion Crisis and Involuntary Treatment. . . .$3,000,000

Daybreak Center for Adolescent Recovery. . . .$3,000,000

Nexus Youth and Families. . . .$500,000

Valley City Recovery Place. . . .$2,000,000

Geriatric Diversion. . . .$500,000

Skagit Triage Expansion (Mount Vernon). . . .$326,000

Spokane Jail Diversion. . . .$2,400,000

Tri-county Detox and Crisis Center. . . .$4,000,000

Toppenish Hospital. . . .$1,000,000

(5) $3,000,000 is provided solely for the Evergreen treatment services building purchase, contingent on matching funds.

(6)(a) $3,000,000 is provided solely for a grant to a joint venture between MultiCare-Franciscan to provide community based behavioral health services. Funding provided in this subsection is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section. The department of commerce may not release funding for this project unless MultiCare-Franciscan enters into a memorandum of understanding with the department of social and health services by October 31, 2018, to collaborate on development and implementation of strategies to expand the behavioral health workforce in the region. At a minimum, the agreement must include strategies for increasing recruitment of health professionals required to staff psychiatric inpatient facilities, including psychiatrists, psychologists, nurses and other health care professionals. The agreement must also identify opportunities for coordination between the parties to expand access to clinical skill development and training opportunities in the region and strategies for collaborative service delivery between the parties when possible. To objectively evaluate the efficacy of the strategies implemented to achieve the desired outcomes of the agreement, performance measures and targets must be established to include:

(((a))) (b) MultiCare-Franciscan and the department of social and health services must work collaboratively to decrease vacancy rates for hard-to-recruit health care professionals employed by each facility. The parties must develop strategies to attract more qualified health care professionals to the area and ensure comparable exposure to the benefits of working for each organization. The parties must measure the success of these strategies by the decrease in vacancy rate for health care professionals necessary to provide safe, quality inpatient psychiatric care in MultiCare-Franciscan and department facilities following the first year as the baseline of the partnership/consortium and with updated goals for each subsequent year. MultiCare-Franciscan and the department of social and health services must work to increase the competency and skills of health care professionals across both facilities by establishing organized joint- and cross-training programs. The parties must measure the success of this strategy by the number of health care professionals in total and by discipline complete cross-training activities and by the number and hours of cross-training opportunities offered under the agreement.

(((6))) (7) The department of commerce shall notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(((7))) (8) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department of health and the department of commerce, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, shall establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, detox, or secure detox.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($65,600,000))

﻿ $76,876,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($65,600,000))

﻿ $76,876,000

Sec. 1009. 2018 c 2 s 1021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

CERB Administered Broadband Infrastructure (91000943)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the community economic revitalization board may make grants and loans to local governments and federally recognized tribes to build infrastructure to provide high-speed, open-access broadband service, with a minimum of 25 megabits per second download speed, to rural and underserved communities, for the purpose of economic development or community development.

(1) "Local governments" means cities, towns, counties, municipal corporations, public port districts, quasi-municipal corporations, and special purpose districts.

(2) "Broadband" means networks of deployed telecommunications equipment and technologies necessary to provide high-speed Internet access and other advanced telecommunications services.

(3) The board is authorized to make rural broadband loans to local governments and to federally recognized Indian tribes for the purposes of financing the cost to build infrastructure to provide high-speed, open-access broadband service, to rural and underserved communities, for the purpose of economic development or community development. Grants may also be authorized for purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the local government or the federally recognized Indian tribe, and subject to a finding by the board that financial circumstances require grant assistance to enable the project to move forward. However, no more than 25 percent of all financial assistance approved by the board in any biennium may consist of grants to local governments and federally recognized Indian tribes.

(4) Application for funding must be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board must conform to the following requirements:

(a) The board may not provide financial assistance:

(i) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail shopping development or expansion.

(ii) For any project that evidence exists would result in a development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other community in the state.

(iii) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote gambling.

(iv) For a project located outside the jurisdiction of the applicant local government or federally recognized Indian tribe.

(v) For equipment or facilities which would enable a public entity to provide retail telecommunications services or services that the entity is not authorized by statute to provide.

(vi) For the deployment of publicly-owned telecommunication network infrastructure ("backbone") solely for the sake of creating competitive, publicly-owned telecommunication network infrastructure.

(b) The board may provide financial assistance only((:

(i) For projects demonstrating convincing evidence that a specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the public facility improvement is made that:

(A) Results in the creation of significant private sector jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by the board;

(B) Will improve the opportunities for the successful maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities; and

(C) Is located in a rural community as defined by the board, or a rural county; or

(ii) For a project that does not meet the requirements of (b)(i) of this subsection but is a project that:

(A) Results in the creation of significant private sector jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by the board;

(B) Is part of a local economic development plan consistent with applicable state planning requirements;

(C) Can demonstrate project feasibility using standard economic principles; and

(D) Is located in a rural community as defined by the board, or a rural county;

(c) The board must develop guidelines for local participation and allowable match and activities.

(d) An application must demonstrate local match and local participation, in accordance with guidelines developed by the board.

(e))) for projects located in a rural community as defined by the board, or located in a rural county, that encourage, foster, develop, and improve broadband within the state in order to:

(i) Drive job creation, promote innovation, and expand markets for local businesses; or

(ii) Serve the ongoing and growing needs of local education systems, health care systems, public safety systems, industries and businesses, governmental operations, and citizens; and

(iii) Improve accessibility for underserved communities and populations.

(c) An application must be approved by the local government and supported by the local associate development organization or local workforce development council or approved by the governing body of the federally recognized Indian tribe.

(((f))) (d) The board may allow de minimis general system improvements to be funded if they are critically linked to the viability of the project.

(((g) An application must demonstrate convincing evidence that the median hourly wage of the private sector jobs created after the project is completed will exceed the countywide median hourly wage.

(h) The board must prioritize each proposed project according to:

(i) The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the project would create, not just the total number of jobs it would create after the project is completed, but also giving consideration to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs would be located;

(ii) The rate of return of the state's investment, including, but not limited to, the leveraging of private sector investment, anticipated job creation and retention, and expected increases in state and local tax revenues associated with the project;

(iii) Whether the proposed project offers a health insurance plan for employees that includes an option for dependents of employees;

(iv) Whether the public facility investment will increase existing capacity necessary to accommodate projected population and employment growth in a manner that supports infill and redevelopment of existing urban or industrial areas that are served by adequate public facilities. Projects should maximize the use of existing infrastructure and provide for adequate funding of necessary transportation improvements;

(v) Whether the applicant's permitting process has been certified as streamlined by the office of regulatory assistance; and

(vi) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines regarding its permitting process for those applying for development permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007.

(i))) (e) When evaluating and prioritizing projects, the board must give consideration, at a minimum, to the following factors:

(i) The project's value to the community, including evidence of support from affected local businesses and government;

(ii) The project's feasibility, using standard economic principles;

(iii) Commitment of local matching resources and local participation;

(iv) The project's inclusion in a capital facilities plan, comprehensive plan, or local economic development plan consistent with applicable state planning requirements; and

(v) The project's readiness to proceed.

(5) A responsible official of the local government or the federally recognized Indian tribe must be present during board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.

(((5))) (6) Before any financial assistance application is approved, the local government or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from the community economic revitalization board.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction

Account—State. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $10,000,000

Sec. 1010. 2018 c 2 s 1022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Seismic Inventory: Unreinforced Masonry Buildings (91000959)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for the department, in cooperation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation, to contract for a seismic study regarding suspected unreinforced masonry buildings in Washington state. The study must include a list and map of suspected unreinforced masonry buildings, excluding single-family housing, and be produced by utilizing existing survey and data sources, including the state's historic resources database, to the greatest extent possible. The study may incorporate random sampling, site visits, and other means to inform the study. The study must identify the number of unreinforced masonry buildings with vacant or underutilized upper floors. The study must be provided to the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature by ((September 1)) December 15, 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

Sec. 1011. 2018 c 2 s 1023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Stormwater Pilot Project (91001099)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce to establish a community-based public-private partnership stormwater pilot program using the United States environmental protection agency guidelines for local governments. The department must establish goals and geographical areas and identify ongoing revenue structures, as well as develop a request for qualifications with the department of ecology using the environmental protection agency guidelines to support future stormwater public-private partnerships. The department must report to the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature by ((September 1)) December 15, 2018, regarding the establishment of the pilot project and any barriers in implementing projects using this model.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

Sec. 1012. 2018 c 2 s 1025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Seattle Vocational Institute Adaptive Reuse Study (91001154)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for the department to contract for an adaptive reuse study for the Seattle vocational institute building and property located at 2120 south Jackson street. The study must quantify the costs of repair and improvements for the various potential uses and analyze financing under different ownership scenarios. The evaluation must be provided to the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature by ((September 1)) December 15, 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019 Local and Community Projects (91001157)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriations in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Arlington Innovation Center (Arlington). . . .$275,000

Ballard Fish Ladder Renovation (Seattle). . . .$100,000

Boys and Girls Club (Oak Harbor). . . .$20,000

Chamber of Commerce Renovation Project (Federal Way). . . .$250,000

Chelan Moderate Risk Waste Facility (Wenatchee). . . .$556,000

Cheney Well #3 Re-Drill (Cheney). . . .$155,000

Colby Avenue Youth Center (Everett). . . .$207,000

Covington Town Center (Covington). . . .$500,000

East Blaine Infrastructure Extension Project (Blaine). . . .$300,000

East Whatcom Regional Resource Center (Maple Falls). . . .$125,000

Family First Community Center (Renton). . . .$1,500,000

Fort Steilacoom Park (Lakewood). . . .$400,000

Grays Harbor County Courthouse (Montesano). . . .$412,000

Greenwood Cemetery (Centralia). . . .$250,000

Habitat for Humanity Veterans Project (Pacific). . . .$250,000

Harrison/Eastside Employment Center (Bremerton). . . .$280,000

Historic Water Tower Renovation (Yelm). . . .$155,000

Interurban Trail and Trailhead (Fife). . . .$200,000

Lake City Community Center (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Lake Sammamish Park Predesign (Issaquah). . . .$103,000

Lake Stevens Food Bank (Lake Stevens). . . .$206,000

Mariner Sno-Isle Library (Everett). . . .$322,000

Mary's Place Burien Hub (Burien). . . .$500,000

Masonic Temple Window Replacement (Centralia). . . .$27,000

Mobile CTE Training Project (Centralia). . . .$515,000

Mukilteo Parking Lot Design (Mukilteo). . . .$129,000

MultiService Center Food Bank (Federal Way). . . .$50,000

North Mason Teen Center (Belfair). . . .$412,000

North Shore Levee (Aberdeen). . . .$2,500,000

Northwest African American Museum Exhibit (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Olympic Natural Resource Center CLT Design (Forks). . . .$10,000

Omak Airport Improvement (Omak). . . .$309,000

Pe Ell Infrastructure (Pe Ell). . . .$340,000

Peace Park (Mukilteo). . . .$400,000

Port of Allyn Marina Utility (Allyn). . . .$376,000

Port of Vancouver (Vancouver). . . .$824,000

Ports of Ilwaco and Chinook Marina Dredging (Ilwaco). . . .$450,000

Puyallup River Boat Launch (Puyallup). . . .$100,000

Ridgefield Police Station Expansion (Ridgefield). . . .$124,000

River View Performing Arts Center (Kennewick). . . .$206,000

Roslyn Community and Cultural Center (Roslyn). . . .$523,000

Sedro-Woolley Regional Library (Sedro-Woolley). . . .$350,000

Shelton Timberland Library Repair (Shelton). . . .$288,000

Skagit Children's Advocacy & Family Support Center

(Mount Vernon). . . .$310,000

Snohomish Community Food Bank Freezer (Snohomish). . . .$29,000

Spokane County Medical Examiner (Spokane). . . .$1,250,000

Sultan Decant Facility/Clean-up (Sultan). . . .$340,000

Town Hall Historic Restoration (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Waterfront Trail Development (Stevenson). . . .$103,000

West Central Community Center Roof/Skylight (Spokane). . . .$75,000

William Shore Pool Expansion (Port Angeles). . . .$1,500,000

Yacolt Railroad Bldg. and Museum Project (Yacolt). . . .$412,000

Yelm Historic Building (Yelm). . . .$39,000

(8) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the purchase of the Greenwood cemetery located at 1905 Johnson road. The city of Centralia must establish a cemetery district for the Greenwood cemetery.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,757,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,757,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Port of Willapa Harbor Energy Innovation District (91001195)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

Sec. 1015. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 1021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Trust Fund Appropriation (30000833)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

(2) $1,500,000 of the reappropriation from section 1005(11), chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess. is instead provided solely for purchase of the south annex properties. The state board of community and technical colleges must transfer the south annex properties located at 1531 Broadway, 1534 Broadway, and 909 East Pine street to a nonprofit or public development authority, if the entity agrees to use the properties to provide services and housing for homeless youth and young adults for a minimum of ten years. The transfer agreement must specify a mutually agreed transfer date. The transfer agreement must require the nonprofit or public development authority to cover any closing costs and must specify a purchase price of eight million dollars.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$59,701,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$62,701,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,299,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$83,000,000

Sec. 1016. 2018 c 2 s 1011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Weatherization Plus Health Matchmaker Program (30000879)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,000,000 is provided solely for lead remediation projects, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

(2) $5,000,000 is provided solely for projects pursuant to chapter 285, Laws of 2017 (Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5647), and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose. The department may prioritize rehabilitation projects in coordination with weatherization projects.

(3) $5,000,000 is provided solely for grants for the Washington State University energy extension community energy efficiency program (CEEP) to support homeowners, tenants, and small business owners to make sound energy efficiency investments by providing consumer education and marketing, workforce support via training and lead generation, and direct consumer incentives for upgrades to existing homes and small commercial buildings, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($16,000,000))

﻿ $18,500,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($21,000,000))

﻿ $23,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($101,000,000))

﻿ $103,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017. 2018 c 2 s 1030 (uncodified) is repealed.

Sec. 1018. 2018 c 2 s 1032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Behavioral Health Statewide Plan (91000434)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office of financial management, in collaboration with the department of commerce, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and behavioral health organizations, shall establish a statewide plan to inform future grant allocations by assessing and prioritizing facility needs and gaps in the behavioral health continuum of care. The department must provide the plan to the fiscal committees of the legislature by ((September 1)) December 15, 2018. The plan must include:

(1) An assessment of the continuum of care, including new community hospital inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced service facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities for short-term detention services through the publicly funded mental health system, crisis walk-in clinics, residential treatment facilities, and supportive housing units;

(2) A prioritization of facility type by geographic region covering the full continuum of care defined in subsection (1) of this section;

(3) A systematic method to distribute resources across geographical regions so that over time all regions are moving forward in strengthening the local continuum of behavioral health facilities; and

(4) An assessment of the feasibility of establishing state-operated, community-based mental health hospitals.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

Sec. 1019. 2018 c 2 s 1033 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

State Parks Capital Projects Study (91000437)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The office of financial management, in consultation with the state parks and recreation commission, shall develop a study of the commission's capital budget process. The study shall be contracted to an independent third-party consultant with expertise in the state capital budget development process, capital project cost estimating, value engineering, and related professional fields. The study must be provided to the fiscal committees of the legislature by ((September 1)) December 15, 2018. The purpose of the study is to evaluate commission practices in comparison with best practices in public sector capital program design and execution.

The study must include an assessment of:

(1) The commission's capital budget development process for its 2019-2021 biennial budget and ten-year capital plan, including analysis of:

(a) Project identification and scoping processes;

(b) Project cost estimation methods and tools; and

(c) Project prioritization criteria and methods.

(2) State parks capital budget staffing compared to other public and private industry standards, including the percent of project funding that is used for staff FTEs and the number and function of:

(a) Design professionals (including engineers and landscape architects);

(b) Construction and Design project managers; and

(c) Other staff supported by capital funds.

(3) Historical capital project funding including, at a minimum:

(a) 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 capital budgets and expenditures;

(b) An analysis of actual project costs in comparison to budgeted costs including the percentage that projects were over and under the construction cost estimate and the total project cost estimate, both individually and in aggregate; and

(c) Percentage of reappropriations.

(4) The basis for cabin and comfort station project costs to include:

(a) Project objectives and customer requirements;

(b) Project elements (scale, materials, utilities, location, aesthetics, and other considerations significantly affecting project costs); and

(c) Operational fiscal analysis including projected operating costs and revenue from cabins; and

(d) Detailed cost estimates of previous and future cabin and comfort station projects.

(5) Costs compared to at least two other states with similar state parks and two other Washington state or local governments.

(6) An analysis of development costs associated with state park projects that differ from other public works projects and commercial private sector projects.

(7) Alternative procurement options for cabins, including premanufactured cabins, cabin kits, tiny homes, and modular construction.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000

Sec. 1020. 2018 c 2 s 1040 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus Physical Security and Safety Improvements (30000812)

$550,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a study to include: (1) An assessment of current capitol campus security, to include infrastructure, technology, and staffing; (2) an assessment of security systems at comparable state capitol campuses; (3) options for security to meet the needs of the capitol campus; and (4) a phased plan for improving campus physical security and safety, including estimated costs. The following must be included in the development of the study: House of representatives security personnel, senate security personnel, legislative building facility and security personnel, and temple of justice security personnel. The study must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by ((August 31)) December 15, 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,200,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$550,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$2,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($550,000))

﻿ $2,750,000

Sec. 1021. 2018 c 2 s 1041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Statewide Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30000825)

Appropriation:

Enterprise Services Account—State. . . .$314,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,664,000))

﻿ $3,506,000

State Vehicle Parking Account—State. . . .$80,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($3,058,000))

﻿ $3,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,970,000

TOTAL. . . .(($13,028,000))

﻿ $13,870,000

Sec. 1022. 2018 c 2 s 1042 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Building Envelope Repairs (30000829)

Appropriation:

Capitol Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,364,000))

﻿ $4,864,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($4,936,000))

﻿ $358,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($8,300,000))

﻿ $5,222,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($8,300,000))

﻿ $5,222,000

Sec. 1023. 2018 c 2 s 1043 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (30000889)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for architectural and engineering services to manage public works contracting for all state facilities pursuant to RCW 43.19.450.

(2) At the end of each fiscal year, the department must report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature on performance, including the following:

(a) The number of projects managed by each manager compared to previous biennia;

(b) Projects that were not completed on schedule and the reasons for the delays; and

(c) The number and cost of the change orders and the reason for each change order.

(3) At least twice per year, the department shall convene a group of private sector architects, contractors, and state agency facilities personnel to share, at a minimum, information on high performance methods, ideas, operating and maintenance issues, and cost. The facilities personnel must be from the community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher education, and any other state agencies that have recently completed a new building or are currently in the construction phase.

(4) The department shall create a plan for scheduled renovations on the capitol campus, to include phasing and swing space for the predesigns for the department of transportation building, temple of justice, and employment security building.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($10,220,000))

﻿ $9,220,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .(($2,680,000))

﻿ $4,780,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($12,900,000))

﻿ $14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($12,900,000))

﻿ $14,000,000

Sec. 1024. 2018 c 2 s 1045 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

1063 Building Furniture and Equipment (40000029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($2,414,000)) $1,835,000 is provided solely for the department for furniture, fixtures, and equipment for common areas in the building.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities

Account—State. . . .(($2,414,000))

﻿ $1,835,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,414,000))

﻿ $1,835,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Insurance Building Roof (91000444)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$105,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Buy Clean Washington Pilot (91000447)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) By June 15, 2018, the department must coordinate with the following projects: (a) University of Washington Bothell, project number 30000378; (b) Washington State University Tri-Cities academic building, project number 30001190; (c) Western Washington University sciences building addition and renovation, project number 30000768; (d) Shoreline Community College allied health, science, and manufacturing replacement, project number 30000990; (e) secretary of state library archive building, project number 30000033; and (f) the department of transportation SR9/Snohomish river bridge replacement, project number N00900R. The awarding authorities for these projects must collaborate with the University of Washington college of built environments study in section 5010 of this act to test proposed methods and availability of environmental product declarations.

(2) An awarding authority for the projects listed in subsection (1) of this section shall require the successful bidder for a contract to submit current third-party verified environmental product declarations for the eligible materials used if available and currently utilized.

(3) The awarding authority shall report to the department the quantities and any environmental product declarations collected in this section.

(4) The department shall provide a preliminary report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2019, of the findings in subsection (1) of this section, and on any obstacles to the implementation of this section, and the effectiveness of this section with respect to reducing carbon emissions.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Eligible materials" include any of the following that function as part of a structural system or structural assembly:

(i) Concrete, including structural cast in place, shotcrete, and precast;

(ii) Unit masonry;

(iii) Metal of any type; and

(iv) Wood of any type including, but not limited to, wood composites and wood laminated products.

(b) "Environmental product declaration" means a facility-specific type III environmental product declaration, as defined by the international organization for standardization standard 14025, or similarly robust life-cycle assessment methods that have uniform standards in data collection consistent with international organization for standardization standard 14025, industry acceptance, and integrity.

(c) "Structural" means a building material or component that has, but is not limited to having, the following properties: Supports gravity loads of either building floors or roofs, or both, and is the primary lateral system resisting wind and earthquake loads, such as shear walls, braced frames, or moment frames, and includes foundations, below-grade walls, and floors.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$65,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$65,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Building Exterior Preservation Cleaning (40000033)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,400,000

Sec. 1028. 2018 c 2 s 1049 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Relocate Mural from GA to 1063 (92000018)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($275,000))

﻿ $393,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($275,000))

﻿ $393,000

Sec. 1029. 2018 c 2 s 1036 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Lake Long-Term Management Planning (30000740)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department shall develop an environmental impact statement to consider alternatives for Capitol Lake. The alternatives considered must include, at a minimum, a lake option, an estuary option, and a hybrid option. The environmental impact statement will also consider sediment transport and locations within lower Budd Inlet. The department must work with affected stakeholders to develop mitigation plans. The environmental impact statement must also consider an expanded area around Capitol Lake and Budd Inlet including the Port of Olympia for the economic analysis. The environmental impact statement must consider the use of equal funding from nonstate entities including, but not limited to, local governments, special purpose districts, tribes, and not-for-profit organizations.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,500,000))

﻿ $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($940,000))

﻿ $0

TOTAL. . . .(($3,440,000))

﻿ $4,000,000

Sec. 1030. 2018 c 2 s 1050 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$33,315,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($7,863,000))

﻿ $8,600,000

Military Department Capital Account—State. . . .(($375,000))

﻿ $802,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($41,553,000))

﻿ $42,717,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($41,553,000))

﻿ $42,717,000

Sec. 1031. 2018 c 2 s 1051 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation 2017-19 Biennium (30000811)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .(($3,776,000))

﻿ $3,933,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,821,000

Military Department Capital Account—State. . . .$51,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($5,597,000))

﻿ $5,805,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($5,597,000))

﻿ $5,805,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

Sec. 2001. 2018 c 2 s 2001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Omnibus Minor Works (30000021)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($740,000))

﻿ $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($740,000))

﻿ $800,000

Sec. 2002. 2018 c 2 s 2002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Behavioral Health: Compliance with Systems Improvement Agreement (30003849)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6008, chapter 4, Laws of 2017, 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,720,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,280,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($6,000,000))

﻿ $8,900,000

Sec. 2003. 2018 c 2 s 2006 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide (30002235)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($12,000,000))

﻿ $12,530,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$171,510,000

TOTAL. . . .(($183,510,000))

﻿ $184,040,000

Sec. 2004. 2018 c 2 s 2008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen - Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($9,520,000))

﻿ $9,806,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($9,520,000))

﻿ $9,806,000

Sec. 2005. 2018 c 2 s 2009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide - RA Community Facilities: Safety & Security Improvements (30002737)

Appropriation:

((Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$2,000,000))

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide: Telecommunication Systems Modernization (30002746)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School - Nursing Facilities: Replacement (30002755)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: A predesign must include at least two options: One option with capacity for the ninety beds of existing skilled nursing residents only and one option with capacity for the ninety to one hundred fifty beds of skilled nursing residents and half of the intermediate care facilities residents. Both options must include the number of beds required, necessary staffing models, and total operating costs with fund sources. The report must include methods to include up to ten percent of the beds as adaptive for other uses. The predesign must be reported to the fiscal committees of the house and senate by November 1, 2018. The design allotment may not be made until February 28, 2019.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$15,815,000

TOTAL. . . .$17,415,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School - Nursing Facility (92000027)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: A predesign must include at least two options: One option with capacity for one hundred beds of the intermediate care facility residents and one option with capacity for one hundred to one hundred fifty beds of the intermediate care facility residents. Both options must include the number of beds required, necessary staffing models, and total operating costs with fund sources. The report must include methods to include up to ten percent of the beds as adaptive for other uses. The report must also address moving residents with an option for a compressed schedule. The predesign must be reported to the fiscal committees of the house and senate by November 1, 2018. The design allotment may not be made until February 28, 2019.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$15,815,000

TOTAL. . . .$17,415,000

Sec. 2009. 2018 c 2 s 2012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School - Recreation Building: Replacement (30003237)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,312,000))

﻿ $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($12,312,000))

﻿ $12,200,000

Sec. 2010. 2018 c 2 s 2013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and Treatment Center: CLIP Capacity (30003324)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($12,130,000))

﻿ $12,494,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($12,130,000))

﻿ $12,494,000

Sec. 2011. 2018 c 2 s 2014 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center - King County SCTF: Expansion (30003564)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: No funds may be allotted until the department consults with the city of Seattle.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,570,000))

﻿ $2,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,570,000))

﻿ $2,610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Yakima Valley School - Multiple Buildings: Safety Improvements (30003573)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

Sec. 2013. 2018 c 2 s 2021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School: Campus Master Plan & Rezone (30003601)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is for the fircrest school campus master plan and rezone.

(2) At any time during the 2017-2019 biennium, the department of social and health services may transfer to the department of health approximately five acres east of the existing department of health property for the purpose of future expansion of the public health laboratory by the department of health, in accordance with the master plans of both agencies. Funds appropriated in this section may be used for expenses incidental to the transfer of the property.

(3) The department must include the north city water district in any planning meetings on the fircrest master plan.

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

Sec. 2014. 2018 c 2 s 2024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - Building 28: Treatment & Recovery Center (40000024)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,000,000))

﻿ $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,475,000

TOTAL. . . .(($7,475,000))

﻿ $7,075,000

Sec. 2015. 2018 c 2 s 2025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital Forensic Ward (91000050)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,800,000))

﻿ $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,800,000))

﻿ $3,000,000

Sec. 2016. 2018 c 2 s 2026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Wards Renovations for Forensic Services (40000026)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Up to $1,560,000 of the appropriation is for predesign and design of the building 29 civil to forensic capacity conversion project. However, the renovation of sixty beds in building 29 for forensic capacity is not subject to predesign requirements. The department must immediately start the sixty bed renovation project and may use a general contractor/construction manager or progressive design build for the renovation of the sixty beds.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,560,000))

﻿ $10,560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,600,000

TOTAL. . . .(($11,160,000))

﻿ $20,160,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Renovations for Treatment Recovery Center (40000029)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,875,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,275,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018. 2018 c 2 s 2030 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Pine Lodge Behavioral Rehabilitation Services (91000061)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Westlake: New HVAC DDC Controls (30002759)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital: Additional Forensic Ward (91000062)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,500,000

Sec. 2022. 2018 c 2 s 2031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Newborn Screening Wing Addition (30000301)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,510,000))

﻿ $2,585,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,510,000))

﻿ $2,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Retsil Building 10 (40000004)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Soldiers Home Cemetery Restoration and Preservation (91000011)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

Sec. 2025. 2018 c 2 s 2042 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Boiler Replacement (30000130)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The ((appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a predesign. The)) department shall develop a predesign for replacing the current boilers. The alternatives must include replacing the current boiler configuration with three or less boilers with a life cycle cost analysis that identifies the most efficient solution over thirty years. At least one alternative must consider cogeneration. The office of financial management must approve the predesign before design funds are ((alloted)) allotted.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Replace Fire Alarm System (30000748)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$355,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$355,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCCW: Bldg E Roof Replacement (30000810)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,696,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,696,000

Sec. 2028. 2018 c 2 s 2046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Access Road Culvert Replacement and Road Resurfacing (30001078)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,100,000))

﻿ $2,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,100,000))

﻿ $2,180,000

Sec. 2029. 2018 c 2 s 2047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: Program and Support Building (30001101)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($8,685,000))

﻿ $9,685,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($8,685,000))

﻿ $9,685,000

Sec. 2030. 2018 c 2 s 2054 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Correctional Industries: Laundry Feasibility Study (40000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall conduct a feasibility study to assess whether correctional industries can efficiently provide laundry services to Lakeland Village, eastern state hospital, and/or the Spokane veteran's home.

The study shall include: (a) The identification of the resources required, including the estimated capital and operating investment costs and ongoing operating costs for the department at the airway heights corrections center to provide laundry services to the facilities referenced in this section; (b) an assessment of contraband management and the resources needed to do so; (c) an assessment of how the department will meet health regulations for laundry in a hospital setting; (d) the advantages and disadvantages of the department providing laundry services to the facilities referenced in this section; and (e) identification of logistics and operations to meet the demands.

The department shall provide the feasibility study to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature by ((October 15)) December 15, 2018.

(2) The department of social and health services and the department of veterans affairs shall provide to the department of corrections detailed information on their current laundry operations at Lakeland Village, eastern state hospital and the Spokane veteran's home including but not limited to pounds of laundry per day, staffing, equipment inventory, materials purchased, and estimated utility costs.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 3001. 2018 c 2 s 3010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design 2017-19 (30000706)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $75,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department of ecology to convene and facilitate a stakeholder process to review and make recommendations for the statutory authorizations and improvements of the floodplains by design grant program.

(b) The review must include an analysis of:

(i) Statewide funding needs;

(ii) Program design, including criteria, information and coordination required for projects to proceeds through the selection and funding processes in a transparent and efficient manner; and

(iii) Mechanisms to improve efficiency and transparency of project funding and implementation.

(c) The department of ecology may convene stakeholders and facilitate activities as needed. The department must develop recommendations in consultation with the Puget Sound partnership. The department must seek input and meaningfully involve a broad base of tribal governments and interested stakeholders, including city and county governments, and agricultural, flood risk reduction, and conservation interests. The department must seek broad and diverse legislative input and invite interested legislators to provide information and ideas including, at a minimum, the majority and minority leadership of the committees responsible for the capital budget in the senate and house of representatives.

(d) The final report must include recommended statutory and policy changes to the appropriate committees of the legislature on or before December 1, 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($35,389,000))

﻿ $35,464,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($35,389,000))

﻿ $35,464,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Remedial Action Grants (30000707)

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$5,877,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$85,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000742)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$41,740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Clean Up Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (30000749)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$41,800,000

Sec. 3005. 2018 c 2 s 3021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000796)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $10,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants for stormwater retrofit projects consistent with the immediate actions and recommendations developed by the southern resident killer whale task force that reduce stormwater pollutants in areas where southern resident killer whales are regularly present.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($25,000,000))

﻿ $30,000,000

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$6,400,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$36,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$120,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($145,000,000))

﻿ $156,400,000

Sec. 3006. 2018 c 2 s 3015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000712)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $10,000,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for the east Columbia basin irrigation district.

(2) $5,000,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for a ((forty-seven and one-half mile pipeline for full capacity. Funds must be prioritized to constructing the distribution system to a capacity serving no less than eleven thousand acres)) ground water replacement distribution system with a pump station located at east low canal mile 47.5. Funds must be prioritized to include costs associated with the pump station, pumps and electrical/power grid system that has the capacity to ultimately serve 10,500 eligible acres in the distribution service area. Any remaining funds must be directed to the Odessa groundwater replacement program.

(3) $2,000,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for Icicle Creek integrated planning.

(4) $16,800,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for the department to fund existing projects and staffing.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$19,550,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State. . . .$12,250,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue Recovery

Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$33,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$72,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$105,800,000

Sec. 3007. 2018 c 2 s 3025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

VW Settlement Funded Projects (40000018)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature finds that it is appropriate to provide a framework for the administration of mitigation funds provided to the state as a beneficiary under the terms of the consent decrees entered into by the United States, Volkswagen AG, and other participating parties that settle emissions-related claims for 2.0 and 3.0 liter diesel vehicles of certain models and years. The legislature deems the department of ecology the responsible agency for the administration and expenditure of funds provided by the trustee under the terms of the consent decrees, including the development of a mitigation plan to guide the use of the funds, whether or not the department receives funds directly for projects included in the plan.

(2)(a) The department of ecology shall develop the mitigation plan through an open, transparent public process consistent with direction in the consent decrees. The department shall provide ample opportunity using a variety of engagement options, as appropriate, for stakeholders and the public to shape, review, and comment throughout the development of the mitigation plan, including at least two meetings of the legislative advisory group as described in (c) of this subsection.

(b) The department of ecology shall work collaboratively with other agencies to develop and implement the elements of the mitigation plan that address categories of projects for which other agencies have already developed programs or expertise. In doing so, the department of ecology must consider and utilize, where appropriate and to the extent possible, the following existing programs for alternative fuels and zero emission vehicles:

(i) The department of transportation's electric vehicle infrastructure bank program;

(ii) The state alternative fuel commercial vehicle tax credit;

(iii) The state sales and use tax exemption for clean vehicles; and

(iv) Public transportation grant programs administered by the department of transportation.

(c)(i) For the purposes of providing legislative input and gathering public feedback on the development of the mitigation plan, a legislative advisory group is established. The advisory group is comprised of eight legislators, including the chairs and ranking members, or designees of the chairs and ranking members, of the transportation and capital budget committees in the House and in the Senate; the director of the department of ecology; and the secretary of the department of transportation.

(ii) The advisory group must select a chair from among its membership. Meetings of the advisory group must be open to the public and allow for public comment.

(iii) The advisory group must meet at least twice, once immediately prior to the date that the draft mitigation plan is released publicly, and again after public comment has been incorporated but before the department submits the plan to the trustee.

(iv) The office of program research and the senate committee services must provide staff support to the advisory group. The department of ecology staff must provide technical support, as needed. Legislative members of the advisory group are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, government entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW. Advisory group expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(3) The mitigation plan and the stewardship of project implementation must adhere to the following principles:

(a) Maximize air quality and public health benefits relating to the reduction of nitrogen oxides emissions;

(b) Give priority to projects that improve air quality relating to the reduction of nitrogen oxides emissions in areas that bear a disproportionate share of the burden from nitrogen oxides emissions;

(c) Achieve substantial additional air quality benefits relating to the reduction of nitrogen oxides emissions beyond that which would already occur, absent trust funding;

(d) Investments in clean vehicles or investments in clean engine replacements must be shown to be cost-effective. For the purposes of leveraging funding, investments in clean vehicles may not exceed the incremental cost of the clean vehicle, relative to the cost of a similar conventionally fueled vehicle. To incentivize the replacement of standard engines, investments may be made up to the full cost of the clean engine replacement;

(e) Consideration must be given to investments across a range of fueling technologies and emissions reduction technologies; and

(f) Priority must be given to projects that have the highest benefit-cost ratios, in terms of the amount of nitrogen oxides emissions reduced per dollar invested.

(4) Funding must be allocated to eligible projects under the terms of the consent decrees in the following manner:

(a)(i) No more than thirty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for commercial vehicle class four through eight transit buses, shuttle buses, and school buses;

(ii) No more than thirty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for commercial vehicle class eight local freight trucks and port drayage trucks;

(iii) No more than twenty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for commercial vehicle class four through seven local freight trucks;

(iv) No more than twenty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for airport ground support equipment;

(v) No more than twenty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for ocean-going vessels' shore power;

(vi) No more than fifteen percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for light duty, zero emission vehicle supply equipment;

(vii) No more than twenty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for nonfederal matching funds for projects eligible under the diesel emission reduction act option; and

(viii) For each of the other categories of mitigation actions that are eligible under the consent decrees but not otherwise specified under this subsection (4)(a), no more than ten percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium.

(b) Projects that receive funding under subsection (4)(a)(ii) and (iii) of this section and ocean-going vessels shorepower projects that receive funding under subsection (4)(a)(viii) of this section must include electric technologies, if practicable.

(5) To the extent this section conflicts with the consent decrees, the consent decrees supersede it.

(6) The department of ecology may modify the mitigation plan as needed to comply with trustee requirements, including to the extent these modifications conflict with this section. In making any adjustments, the department of ecology shall consult with the department of transportation and the office of the superintendent of public instruction and provide notice to the steering committee of any significant changes to the plan submitted.

(7) The department of ecology shall provide a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2018, and each year thereafter, on any plans or efforts to change the mitigation plan, its progress in implementing the mitigation plan, and the specific projects funded through these mitigation funds for the previous fiscal year.

(8) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Project" means an eligible mitigation action under the terms of the consent decrees entered into by the United States, Volkswagen AG, and other participating parties that settle emissions-related claims for 2.0 and 3.0 liter diesel vehicles of certain models and years.

(b) "Trustee" means the entity selected under the terms of the consent decrees to administer the disbursement of funds to eligible projects for the purposes of mitigating nitrogen oxides emission pollution.))

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The legislature finds that it is appropriate to provide a framework for the administration of mitigation funds provided to the state as a beneficiary under the terms of the consent decrees entered into by the United States, Volkswagen AG, and other participating parties that settle emissions-related claims for 2.0 and 3.0 liter diesel vehicles of certain models and years. The legislature deems the department of ecology the responsible agency for the administration and expenditure of funds provided by the trustee under the terms of the consent decrees, including the development of a mitigation plan to guide the use of the funds, whether or not the department receives funds directly for projects included in the plan.

(b) The department of ecology shall work collaboratively with other agencies to implement the elements of the mitigation plan that address categories of projects for which other agencies have already developed programs or expertise. In doing so, the department of ecology must consider and utilize, where appropriate and to the extent practical, the following existing programs for alternative fuels and zero-emission vehicles:

(i) The department of transportation's electric vehicle infrastructure bank program;

(ii) The state alternative fuel commercial vehicle tax credit;

(iii) The state sales and use tax exemption for clean vehicles; and

(iv) Public transportation grant programs administered by the department of transportation.

(c)(i) For the purposes of providing legislative input and gathering public feedback on the mitigation plan, a steering committee is established. The steering committee is comprised of the following members: Four legislators, one from each major caucus, and one alternate for each of the four legislators; the director of the department of ecology, or his or her designee; the director of enterprise services, or his or her designee; the director of the office of financial management, or his or her designee; the governor, or his or her designee; and the secretary of the department of transportation, or his or her designee.

(ii) As the responsible agency for administration of funds provided by the trustee under the terms of the consent decree, the department of ecology shall chair the steering committee. Meetings of the steering committee must be open to the public.

(iii) The steering committee shall meet as needed to review the mitigation plan and review project category selection principles and priorities, and project proposals.

(iv) The department of ecology staff shall provide support to the steering committee as needed. Legislative members and alternates of the advisory group are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, government entity, or other organization.

(2) The stewardship of project implementation must adhere to the following principles:

(a) Maximize air quality and public health benefits relating to the reduction of nitrogen oxides emissions, other toxic air pollutant emissions and carbon emissions;

(b) Encouraging projects that improve air quality in areas that bear a disproportionate share of the burden from nitrogen oxides emissions and reduce carbon emissions.

(c) In making project selections, consider distribution of projects across many areas of the state;

(d) Achieve substantial additional air quality benefits relating to the reduction of nitrogen oxides emissions beyond that which would already occur, absent trust funding;

(e) Investments in clean vehicles and vessels or investments in clean engine replacements are encouraged to be cost-effective. For the purposes of leveraging funding, investments in clean vehicles may not exceed the incremental cost of the clean vehicle, relative to the cost of a similar conventionally fueled vehicle. To incentivize the replacement while maximizing achievement of complimentary state goals of standard engines, investments may be made up to the full cost of the clean engine replacement;

(f) Investments must be across a range of low and zero emission fueling technologies including, but not limited to, electric, hybrid, zero emission, and compressed natural gas and other emissions reduction fuels and technologies; and

(g) Encouragement of projects that have high benefit-cost ratios for reductions of nitrogen oxides emissions and carbon emissions.

(3) Funding must be allocated to eligible projects under the terms of the consent decrees in the following manner:

(a)(i) No more than sixty percent of funding may be provided for on-road heavy duty vehicles; class four through eight school buses, shuttle buses, or transit buses; commercial vehicle class four through eight transit buses, shuttle buses, and school buses; and commercial vehicle class eight local freight trucks and port drayage trucks;

(ii) No more than twenty percent of funding may be provided for commercial vehicle class four through seven local freight trucks;

(iii) No more than five percent of funding may be provided for freight switchers;

(iv) No more than five percent of funding may be provided for airport ground support equipment;

(v) No more than forty-five percent of funding may be provided for marine vessels including ferries and tugs, and for ocean-going vessels' shore power;

(vi) No more than fifteen percent of funding may be provided for light duty, zero emission vehicle supply equipment. Priority must be given to those projects for which grant funds were sought under the department of transportation's grant opportunity for DC fast chargers for Washington's interregional corridors program in 2017, that ranked high in the grant evaluation but did not receive funding; and

(vii) No more than five percent of funding may be provided for nonfederal matching funds for projects eligible under the diesel emission reduction act option.

(4) To the extent this section conflicts with the consent decrees, the consent decrees supersede it.

(5) The department of ecology may modify the mitigation plan as needed to comply with trustee requirements, including to the extent these modifications conflict with this section. In making any adjustments, the department of ecology shall provide notice to the steering committee of any significant changes to the plan submitted.

(6) The department of ecology shall provide a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2019, and each year thereafter, on any plans or efforts to change the mitigation plan, its progress in implementing the mitigation plan, and the specific projects funded through these mitigation funds for the previous fiscal year.

(7) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Project" means an eligible mitigation action under the terms of the consent decrees entered into by the United States, Volkswagen AG, and other participating parties that settle emissions-related claims for 2.0 and 3.0 liter diesel vehicles of certain models and years.

(b) "Trustee" means the entity selected under the terms of the consent decrees to administer the disbursement of funds to eligible projects for the purposes of mitigating nitrogen oxides emission pollution.

Appropriation:

General Fund—Private/Local. . . .(($20,000,000))

﻿ $112,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($20,000,000))

﻿ $112,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reduce Air Pollution from Transit/Sch. Buses/State-Owned Vehicles and Vehicles Serving Ports (40000109)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the department of ecology to enter into and administer grants to scrap and replace old, high-polluting diesel school buses, transit buses, and other vehicles with low-emission and zero-emission vehicles.

(2) All expenditures from this appropriation must be spent on projects that will reduce air pollution, improve public health for thousands of Washington residents, help prevent violations of federal air quality standards, reduce operating costs, and improve transportation reliability for public fleet operators.

(3) Up to $12,000,000 of the appropriation is for scrapping and replacing pre-2001, high polluting school buses across the state with diesel or alternate fueled (propane, compressed natural gas, zero emission, etc.) school buses that meet current federal emissions standards.

(4) Up to $9,750,000 of the appropriation is for scrapping and replacing pre-2007 diesel, high polluting transit buses across the state with new electric, zero-emission buses.

(5) Up to $5,450,000 of the appropriation is for replacing state government-owned gas or diesel powered passenger vehicles with all electric vehicles.

(6) $1,200,000 is for the Northwest seaport alliance for a clean truck fund managed by a certified community development alliance.

Appropriation:

Air Pollution Control Account—State. . . .$28,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Mount Baker Properties Cleanup and Affordable Housing Development (40000096)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$5,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,915,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,015,000

Sec. 3010. 2018 c 2 s 3027 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Availability (91000343)

(1) The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for watershed restoration and enhancement projects. If chapter 1 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 6091 (water availability)), Laws of 2018 is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

(2) $2,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Dungeness off-channel reservoir, including transaction-related expenses by the department of natural resources.

(3) $900,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Methow valley piping, pressurization, and conveyance system consolidation project.

(4) $5,735,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Colville river watershed plan update and water resource mitigation and enhancement project.

Appropriation:

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$280,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$300,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Skagit Water (91000347)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department of agriculture, the department of fish and wildlife, and the office of the Columbia river in the department of ecology to jointly pursue on a pilot basis the development of new water supplies to benefit both instream and out-of-stream uses within Skagit river water resource inventory area 3 (Lower Skagit-Samish) and 4 (Upper Skagit) regulated by chapter 173-503 WAC. The departments' initial report of joint findings on actions and/or statutory changes needed to better meet the economic and community development needs of people and the instream flow needs of fish in the Skagit watersheds must be provided to the legislature by December 1, 2018.

(2) Up to $2,000,000 of the appropriation is for studies and actions needed to make water available for agricultural water uses in a manner that also supports the instream flow needs of fish. The department of ecology, department of fish and wildlife, and department of agriculture shall jointly agree on the appropriate entities to complete needed studies and actions under this subsection, which include, but are not limited to, an update to current hydrodynamic modeling (up to $100,000 estimated), an instream flow incremental methodology study (up to $100,000 estimated), and installation of groundwater monitoring stations (up to $100,000 estimated) and any other action needed to support a department of ecology determination of water availability for proposed new agricultural water uses diverted or withdrawn from the Skagit river below the PUD Pipeline Crossing east of Sedro Woolley and the existing USGS Station 12200500, near Mt. Vernon.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

Sec. 3012. 2018 c 2 s 3029 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financing Assistance Pgm 2017-19 (92000001)

Appropriation:

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving

Account—State. . . .(($20,000,000))

﻿ $12,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($100,000,000))

﻿ $92,700,000

Sec. 3013. 2018 c 2 s 3031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Twin Harbors State Park: Renovation (30000086)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($471,000))

﻿ $496,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$25,986,000

TOTAL. . . .(($26,457,000))

﻿ $26,482,000

Sec. 3014. 2018 c 2 s 3032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler - WW1 Historic Facilities Preservation (30000100)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,217,000))

﻿ $3,386,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,823,000

TOTAL. . . .(($7,040,000))

﻿ $7,209,000

Sec. 3015. 2018 c 2 s 3033 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Casey - Lighthouse Historic Preservation (30000109)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($206,000))

﻿ $217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,399,000

TOTAL. . . .(($1,605,000))

﻿ $1,616,000

Sec. 3016. 2018 c 2 s 3034 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Simcoe - Historic Officers Quarters Renovation (30000155)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($277,000))

﻿ $292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,478,000

TOTAL. . . .(($1,755,000))

﻿ $1,770,000

Sec. 3017. 2018 c 2 s 3035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Chelan State Park Moorage Dock Pile Replacement (30000416)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,516,000))

﻿ $1,596,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,516,000))

﻿ $1,596,000

Sec. 3018. 2018 c 2 s 3036 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Marine Facilities - Various Locations Moorage Float Replacement (30000496)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($541,000))

﻿ $569,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,639,000

TOTAL. . . .(($11,180,000))

﻿ $11,208,000

Sec. 3019. 2018 c 2 s 3037 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Willapa Hills Trail Develop Safe Multi-Use Trail Crossing at SR 6 (30000519)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($401,000))

﻿ $422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,817,000

TOTAL. . . .(($4,218,000))

﻿ $4,239,000

Sec. 3020. 2018 c 2 s 3038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Beacon Rock Entrance Road Realignment (30000647)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($348,000))

﻿ $366,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$17,346,000

TOTAL. . . .(($17,694,000))

﻿ $17,712,000

Sec. 3021. 2018 c 2 s 3039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Goldendale Observatory - Expansion (30000709)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,250,000))

﻿ $2,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,250,000

TOTAL. . . .(($4,500,000))

﻿ $4,950,000

Sec. 3022. 2018 c 2 s 3040 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Kopachuck Day Use Development (30000820)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($5,538,000))

﻿ $5,619,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$296,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,812,000

TOTAL. . . .(($8,646,000))

﻿ $8,727,000

Sec. 3023. 2018 c 2 s 3044 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden – Replace Failing Sewer Lines (30000860)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,204,000))

﻿ $2,320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$234,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,438,000))

﻿ $2,554,000

Sec. 3024. 2018 c 2 s 3045 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Birch Bay - Replace Failing Bridge (30000876)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($320,000))

﻿ $337,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,032,000

TOTAL. . . .(($1,352,000))

﻿ $1,369,000

Sec. 3025. 2018 c 2 s 3046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Pier & Marine Learning Center Improve or Replace (30000950)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($697,000))

﻿ $734,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,072,000

TOTAL. . . .(($9,769,000))

﻿ $9,806,000

Sec. 3026. 2018 c 2 s 3047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Field Spring Replace Failed Sewage Syst and Non-ADA Comfort Station (30000951)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for a pilot program for new Firelight toilets. The commission may sole source for the equipment. The commission must operate and maintain the equipment for a minimum of two years and report annually to legislative fiscal committees on: (1) The ease of use by parks patrons and (2) the cost and time to maintain the equipment.))

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,109,000))

﻿ $1,167,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,109,000))

﻿ $1,167,000

Sec. 3027. 2018 c 2 s 3048 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation From Harms Way (30000959)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,018,000))

﻿ $2,124,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,018,000))

﻿ $2,124,000

Sec. 3028. 2018 c 2 s 3049 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Depression Era Structures Restoration Assessment (30000966)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,093,000))

﻿ $1,151,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$121,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,859,000

TOTAL. . . .(($5,073,000))

﻿ $5,131,000

Sec. 3029. 2018 c 2 s 3051 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Dash Point - Replace Bridge (Pedestrian) (30000972)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($553,000))

﻿ $582,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$165,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($718,000))

﻿ $747,000

Sec. 3030. 2018 c 2 s 3052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Parkland Acquisition (30000976)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The commission must grant access to the Iron Horse/John Wayne trail for any person who owns land adjacent to the trail and applies for access or easement for agricultural purposes. The commission may request twenty-four hour notice prior to any agricultural use for transporting goods or machinery along the length of the trail. No prior notice may be required of adjacent landowners to cross the trail. Access may not be unreasonably denied and must be granted within one month of application or within thirty days of the effective date of this section for applications previously submitted from landowners.))

Appropriation:

Parkland Acquisition Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,000,000

Sec. 3031. 2018 c 2 s 3055 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Program (30000979)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,845,000))

﻿ $1,491,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,845,000))

﻿ $1,491,000

Sec. 3032. 2018 c 2 s 3056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Moran Summit Learning Center - Interpretive Facility (30000980)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($964,000))

﻿ $1,015,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($964,000))

﻿ $1,015,000

Sec. 3033. 2018 c 2 s 3057 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Penrose Point Sewer Improvements (30000981)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($428,000))

﻿ $450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($428,000))

﻿ $450,000

Sec. 3034. 2018 c 2 s 3058 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Palouse Falls Day Use Area Renovation (30000983)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($209,000))

﻿ $220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,359,000

TOTAL. . . .(($4,568,000))

﻿ $4,579,000

Sec. 3035. 2018 c 2 s 3059 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Sunset Beach Picnic Area (30000984)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,622,000))

﻿ $2,760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,622,000))

﻿ $2,760,000

Sec. 3036. 2018 c 2 s 3060 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Water System Renovation (30001016)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($475,000))

﻿ $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,996,000

TOTAL. . . .(($5,471,000))

﻿ $5,496,000

Sec. 3037. 2018 c 2 s 3061 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Septic System Renovation (30001017)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($238,000))

﻿ $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,016,000

TOTAL. . . .(($5,254,000))

﻿ $5,266,000

Sec. 3038. 2018 c 2 s 3062 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Electrical System Renovation (30001018)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($713,000))

﻿ $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,058,000

TOTAL. . . .(($5,771,000))

﻿ $5,808,000

Sec. 3039. 2018 c 2 s 3063 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide New Park (30001019)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($297,000))

﻿ $313,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,114,000

TOTAL. . . .(($11,411,000))

﻿ $11,427,000

Sec. 3040. 2018 c 2 s 3064 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Trail Renovations (Footbridges) (30001021)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($266,000))

﻿ $280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$798,000

TOTAL. . . .(($1,064,000))

﻿ $1,078,000

Sec. 3041. 2018 c 2 s 3065 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden Replace Failing Water Lines (30001022)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($358,000))

﻿ $377,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,817,000

TOTAL. . . .(($4,175,000))

﻿ $4,194,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Comfort Station Pilot Project (91000433)

The appropriation is provided solely for a pilot program for new fire light toilets. The commission may sole source for the equipment. The commission must operate and maintain the equipment for a minimum of two years and report annually to legislative fiscal committees on: (1) The ease of use by parks patrons and (2) the cost and time to maintain the equipment.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,167,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,167,000

Sec. 3043. 2018 c 2 s 3067 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steptoe Butte Road Improvements (30001076)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($443,000))

﻿ $466,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,789,000

TOTAL. . . .(($4,232,000))

﻿ $4,255,000

Sec. 3044. 2018 c 2 s 3068 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cape Disappointment North Head Buildings and Ground Improvements (40000005)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,560,000))

﻿ $2,695,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,560,000))

﻿ $2,695,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Fish Barrier Removal (40000010)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$400,000

TOTAL. . . .$700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - ADA Compliance (30000985)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Schafer Relocate Campground (30000532)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$742,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,829,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,571,000

Sec. 3048. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 3072 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steamboat Rock Build Dunes Campground (30000729)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,707,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$172,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$792,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($3,499,000))

﻿ $3,671,000

Sec. 3049. 2018 c 2 s 3075 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000413)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the ((Barnum Point waterfront)) list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2018-8H, developed February 26, 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,725,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$11,725,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,000,000))

﻿ $11,725,000

Sec. 3050. 2018 c 2 s 3091 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Improve Shellfish Growing Areas 2017-19 (92000012)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Up to five percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the conservation commission to acquire services of licensed engineers for project development, predesign and design services, and construction oversight for natural resource enhancement and conservation projects. Funding may be used for beach restoration, erosion control, sediment abatement, soft berm, and dynamic revetment projects.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$24,000,000

Sec. 3051. 2018 c 2 s 3092 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program 2017-19 (92000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a state match to the United States department of agriculture regional conservation partnership.

(2) The commission will, to the greatest extent possible, leverage other state and local projects in funding the match and development of the regional conservation partnership program grant applications.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,000,000))

﻿ $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,752,000

TOTAL. . . .(($3,752,000))

﻿ $5,752,000

Sec. 3052. 2018 c 2 s 3107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Programmatic (30000782)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,000,000))

﻿ $2,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,000,000))

﻿ $2,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hurd Creek - Relocate Facilities out of Floodplain (30000830)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,849,000

TOTAL. . . .$6,649,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Scatter Creek Wildlife Area Fire Damage (40000005)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,331,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,331,000

Sec. 3055. 2018 c 2 s 3119 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Replacement (30000264)

Appropriation:

Resources Management Cost Account—State. . . .$30,000,000

Natural Resources Real Property Replacement—State. . . .(($30,000,000))

﻿ $20,731,000

Community and Technical College Forest Reserve

Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($61,000,000))

﻿ $51,731,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($61,000,000))

﻿ $51,731,000

Sec. 3056. 2018 c 2 s 3122 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Transfer Program (30000269)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely to the department of natural resources to transfer from trust status certain trust lands of statewide significance deemed appropriate for state parks, fish and wildlife habitats, natural area preserves, natural resources conservation areas, department of natural resources community forest open spaces, or recreation purposes. The approved property for transfer is identified in the LEAP capital document no. 2017-2H, developed June 30, 2017.

(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and transferred at fair market value. By ((September 30, 2018)) June 30, 2019, the department must deposit in the common school construction account the portion of the appropriation in this section that represents the estimated value of the timber on the transferred properties. This transfer must be made in the same manner as timber revenues from other common school trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The portion of the appropriation in this section that represents the value of the land transferred must be deposited in the natural resources real property replacement account.

(3) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement this section are authorized to be paid out of the appropriations. Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time, environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs, and may not exceed one and nine-tenths percent of the appropriation.

(4) By June 30, ((2018)) 2019, land within the common school trust shall be exchanged for land of equal value held for other trust beneficiaries of the property identified in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department shall execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section. Fee transfer agreements for properties identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that perpetually restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose. Transfer agreements may include provisions for receiving agencies to request alternative uses of the property, provided the alternative uses are compatible with the originally intended public purpose and the department and legislature approves such uses.

(6) The department shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this section.

(7) By June 30, 2019, the state treasurer shall transfer to the common school construction account any unexpended balance of the appropriation in this section.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

Sec. 3057. 2018 c 2 s 3123 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

State Forest Land Replacement (30000277)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $60,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department to assess options to replace timber trust revenues for counties with populations of twenty-five thousand or fewer that are subject to timber harvest deferrals greater than thirty years due to the presence of wildlife species listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered species act. The department must consult with the qualifying counties and other stakeholders in conducting the assessment. The department shall report the findings of its assessment, including recommendations for addressing decreased revenues from state forestlands and improving the forest products economy in the qualifying counties, by December 15, 2018.

(2)(a) The remaining portion of the appropriation is provided solely to the department to transfer from state forestland status to natural resources conservation area status certain state forestlands in counties:

(i) With a population of twenty-five thousand or fewer; and

(ii) With risks of timber harvest deferrals greater than thirty years due to the presence of wildlife species listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered species act.

(b) This appropriation must be used equally for the transfer of qualifying state forestlands in the qualifying counties.

(3) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and other valuable materials transferred must be distributed as provided in RCW 79.64.110. The value of the land transferred must be deposited in the park land trust revolving account and be used solely to buy replacement state forestland, consistent with RCW 79.22.060.

(4) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department shall execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (2) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties identified in subsection (2) of this section must include terms that restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.

(5) The department and applicable counties shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this section. The department will identify eligible properties for transfer, consistent with subsections (2) and (3) of this section, in consultation with the applicable counties, and will not execute any property transfers that are not in the statewide interest of either the state forest trust or the natural resources conservation area program.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,000,000))

﻿ $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($3,000,000))

﻿ $4,500,000

Sec. 3058. 2018 c 2 s 3127 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2017-2019 Minor Works Programmatic (30000287)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $230,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for survey, design, permitting, purchase, and delivery of the bridge and substructure that accesses Tunerville campground.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,000,000))

﻿ $1,230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,990,000

TOTAL. . . .(($3,990,000))

﻿ $4,220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

NE Region Storm Damage Road Repair (40000002)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$429,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$429,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Paterson Pipeline (91000092)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for developing and constructing an irrigation system, known as the Paterson pipeline, to deliver water from existing water rights owned by the department from the Columbia river to common school trust lands pursuant to conditions and limitations described in section 7004 of this act.

(2) The legislature recognizes and declares that the appropriation in this section constitutes a loan from an asset of the common school trust. The legislature finds that the provisions in section 7004 of this act regarding review and approval of the Paterson pipeline, improvements to common school trust lands by the Paterson pipeline and associated increased value of those lands, eventual loan repayment to the natural resources real property replacement account, and interest to the common school construction account ensure that the interest of the common school trust beneficiaries are protected.

Appropriation:

Natural Resources Real Property Replacement

Account—State. . . .$9,269,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,431,000

TOTAL. . . .$17,700,000

Sec. 3061. 2018 c 2 s 3132 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Public School Seismic Safety Assessment (91000091)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department, in consultation with the office of emergency management, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the state board of education, shall develop a prioritized seismic risk assessment that includes seismic safety surveys of public facilities that are subject to high seismic risk as a consequence of high earthquake hazard and soils that amplify that hazard. The seismic safety surveys must be conducted for the following types of public facilities in the following order:

(a) Facilities that have a capacity of two hundred fifty or more persons and are routinely used for student activities by kindergarten through twelfth grade public schools; and

(b) Fire stations located within a one-mile radius of a facility described in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

(2) The initial phase of the prioritized seismic needs assessment of the facilities specified in subsections (1)(a) and (b) shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) An on-site assessment, under the supervision of licensed geologists, of the seismic site class of the soils at the facilities;

(b) An on-site inspection of the facility buildings, including structural systems using structural plans where available, condition, maintenance, and nonstructural seismic hazards following standardized methods by licensed structural engineers;

(c) An estimate of costs to retrofit facilities specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section to life safety standards as defined by the American society of civil engineers; and

(d) An estimate of costs to retrofit facilities specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section to immediate occupancy standards as defined by the American society of civil engineers.

(3) The department shall develop geographic information system databases of survey data and must share that data with the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and the appropriate legislative committees.

(4) A preliminary report on the progress of the statewide seismic needs assessment specified in this section shall be submitted to the ((office of financial management and the)) appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2018. The final report and statewide seismic needs assessment shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2019.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Community Forest Program Development (91000093)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $75,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to perform an economic and ownership modeling analysis using as a case study one or more projects proposed through the department's rural communities partnership initiative, and based on that analysis, further prioritize a list of community forest projects to submit to the legislature as required under chapter 79.155 RCW.

(2) The department must also consult with nonprofit stakeholders, and other interested parties, such as counties, municipalities, tribes, and small and large private forest landowners, in developing a nonstate-owned community forest project list, including a process to prioritize and recommend to the legislature a list of nonstate-owned community forests. This project list must include projects solicited from both east and west of the crest of the Cascade mountains that have demonstrable community support.

(3) DNR shall develop a list composed of both nonstate-owned and state-owned community forest projects for legislative consideration by November 1, 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Castle Rock/DNR Land Swap (91000094)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$13,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,000

Sec. 3064. 2018 c 2 s 3135 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Grants to Improve Safety and Access at Fairs (92000003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Grant county fairgrounds rodeo arena seating replacement.

(2) $100,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Ellensburg rodeo project.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,000,000))

﻿ $2,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,000,000))

﻿ $2,100,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

Sec. 4001. 2018 c 2 s 4001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire Training Academy Stormwater Remediation (30000030)

Appropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .(($3,000,000))

﻿ $3,132,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($3,000,000))

﻿ $3,132,000

Sec. 4002. 2018 c 2 s 4002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

Aviation Revitalization Loans (92000003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This appropriation is provided solely for deposit into the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account created in section 7028 ((of this act)), chapter 2, Laws of 2018 and section 7011 of this act for direct loans to ((political subdivisions of)) airport sponsors of public use airports in the state ((and privately owned airports)) for the purpose of improvements ((at public use airports)) that primarily support general aviation activities.

(2) The department must convene a community aviation revitalization board to develop criteria for selecting loan recipients, to develop a process for evaluating applications, and to make decisions. The board must consist of the ((capital budget)) chairs and ranking minority members of the ((capital budget)) transportation committees of the house of representatives and the senate ((ways and means committee)), and a representative from both the department of transportation's aviation division and the department of commerce. The board must also consist of the following members appointed by the secretary of transportation: One port district official, one county official, one city official, one representative of airport managers, and one representative of a general aviation pilots organization within Washington that has an active membership and established location, chapter, or appointed representative within Washington. The appointive members must initially be appointed to terms as follows: Two members for two-year terms, and three members for three-year terms which must include the chair. Thereafter, each succeeding term must be for three years. The chair of the board must be selected by the secretary of transportation. The members of the board must elect one of their members to serve as vice chair. The director of commerce and the secretary of transportation must serve as nonvoting advisory members of the board.

(3) The board may provide loans ((to privately owned airports)) for the purpose of airport improvements only if the state is receiving commensurate public benefit, ((such as guaranteed long-term)) which must include, as a condition of the loan, a commitment to provide public access to the airport ((as)) for a ((condition)) period of time equivalent to one and one-half times the term of the loan. For purposes of this subsection, "public use airports" ((that primarily support general aviation activities")) means all public use airports not listed as having more than fifty thousand annual commercial air service passenger enplanements as published by the federal aviation administration.

(4) An application for loan funds under this section must be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. When evaluating loan applications, the board must prioritize applications that provide conclusive justification that completion of the loan application project will create revenue-generating opportunities. The board is not limited to, but must also use, the following expected outcome conditions when evaluating loan applications:

(a) A specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the aviation facility improvement is made;

(b) The loan application project results in the creation of jobs or private sector capital investment as determined by the board;

(c) The loan application project improves opportunities for the successful maintenance, operation, or expansion of an airport or adjacent airport business park;

(d) The loan application project results in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities; and

(e) The loan application project results in leveraging additional federal funding for an airport.

(5) The repayment of any loan made from the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account under the contracts for aviation loans must be paid into the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

Sec. 5001. 2018 c 2 s 5006 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2017-19 School Construction Assistance Program (40000003)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,005,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($672,423,000))

﻿ $746,896,000

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .(($255,581,000))

﻿ $223,998,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal. . . .$3,000,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State. . . .$1,559,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($932,563,000))

﻿ $975,453,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,136,856,000

TOTAL. . . .(($6,069,419,000))

﻿ $6,112,309,000

Sec. 5002. 2018 c 2 s 5007 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Capital Program Administration (40000007)

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,600,000))

﻿ $3,390,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$13,097,000

TOTAL. . . .(($16,697,000))

﻿ $16,487,000

Sec. 5003. 2018 c 2 s 5008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Career and Technical Education Equipment Grants (91000408)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $72,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Bellevue school district for career and technical education equipment.

(2) $50,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Issaquah school district for career and technical education equipment.

(3) $30,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Elma school district for career and technical education equipment.

(4) The remaining portion of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to provide career and technical education equipment grants to school districts. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with school districts and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall develop criteria for providing funding and outcomes for specific projects to stay within the appropriation level provided in this section consistent with the following priorities. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Districts or schools must demonstrate that the request provides necessary equipment to deliver career and technical education; and

(b) ((Districts or schools must demonstrate a consistent commitment to maintaining school facilities and equipment by participating in the asset preservation program administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and

(c))) Prioritizing applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program.

(5) The superintendent must award grants to applicants on a first-come, first-serve basis if the district or school demonstrates that the request meets the criteria set by the office of superintendent of public instruction as described in subsection (4) of this section and the site is prepared to receive the equipment.

(6) No single district may receive more than $100,000 of the appropriation.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

Sec. 5004. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 5016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

NEWTECH Skill Center (Spokane Area Professional-Technical) (92000005)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($387,000))

﻿ $339,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State. . . .$38,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$377,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($21,450,000))

﻿ $21,460,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$21,837,000

Sec. 5005. 2018 c 2 s 5010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (92000041)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $19,586,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for Seattle public schools to address challenges related to extraordinary growth and to maintain and repair existing buildings.

(2) $1,100,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Black Diamond elementary school.

(3) $500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for maintenance to improve the health and environment for students and staff at the Eckstein middle school in Seattle.

(4) $4,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Frantz H. Coe elementary school in Seattle.

(5)(a) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Toledo school district;

(b) The Toledo school district must provide a local match equivalent to a minimum of $7,000,000. The local match may consist of cash; furniture, finishes, and equipment; or like-kind.

(c) If the Toledo school district cannot demonstrate to the office of the superintendent of public instruction that a local match pursuant to (b) of this subsection has been secured by June 30, 2019, the appropriation in (a) of this subsection shall lapse.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($21,186,000))

﻿ $35,186,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($21,186,000))

﻿ $35,186,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

Academic and Physical Education Building (30000036)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$45,445,000

TOTAL. . . .$46,445,000

Sec. 5007. 2018 c 2 s 5016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Burke Museum (20082850)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($24,200,000))

﻿ $24,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$29,800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($54,000,000))

﻿ $54,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

College of Engineering Interdisciplinary/Education Research Center (30000492)

Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$49,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$49,600,000

Sec. 5009. 2018 c 2 s 5021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Major Infrastructure (30000808)

Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .(($14,500,000))

﻿ $17,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$30,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($44,500,000))

﻿ $47,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Buy Clean Washington Study (91000022)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The University of Washington, led by the college of built environments, in collaboration with the department of enterprise services, shall analyze existing embodied carbon policy and propose methods to categorize structural materials and report structural material quantities and origins.

(2) The University of Washington college of built environments shall report to the legislature the methods developed in this section by December 31, 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000

Sec. 5011. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 5048 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Seminar I Renovation (30000125)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($175,000))

﻿ $188,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($225,000))

﻿ $212,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Historic Lord Mansion (91000029)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) By July 1, 2018, and subject to approval by The Evergreen State College board of trustees, responsibility for the maintenance, operation, and any subsequent leasing of the historic Lord mansion shall be transferred from the Washington state historical society to The Evergreen State College.

(2) If the transfer pursuant to subsection (1) of this section does not occur by July 1, 2018, the following must occur:

(a) Custody and control of the historic Lord mansion is transferred from the Washington state historical society to the department of enterprise services to be maintained pursuant to the duties of the director defined in RCW 43.19.125; and

(b) The appropriation in this section is made to the department of enterprise services rather than The Evergreen State College.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$504,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$504,000

Sec. 5013. 2018 c 2 s 5051 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000781)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .(($6,179,000))

﻿ $4,679,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$6,179,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$30,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$36,179,000

Sec. 5014. 2018 c 2 s 5053 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000288)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,000,000))

﻿ $2,721,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,000,000))

﻿ $2,721,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Grays Harbor College: Student Services and Instructional Building (30000127)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,151,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$41,162,000

TOTAL. . . .$45,313,000

Sec. 5016. 2018 c 2 s 5057 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark College: North County Satellite (30000135)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($5,212,000))

﻿ $5,688,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($48,603,000))

﻿ $49,235,000

TOTAL. . . .(($53,815,000))

﻿ $54,923,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett Community College: Learning Resource Center (30000136)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,015,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$45,080,000

TOTAL. . . .$49,095,000

Sec. 5018. 2018 c 2 s 5058 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds Community College: Science, Engineering, Technology Bldg (30000137)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($37,757,000))

﻿ $39,257,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($37,757,000))

﻿ $39,257,000

Sec. 5019. 2018 c 2 s 5059 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Whatcom Community College: Learning Commons (30000138)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($33,960,000))

﻿ $34,952,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($33,960,000))

﻿ $34,952,000

Sec. 5020. 2018 c 2 s 5060 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Big Bend: Professional - Technical Education Center (30000981)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($35,063,000))

﻿ $35,346,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($35,063,000))

﻿ $35,346,000

Sec. 5021. 2018 c 2 s 5061 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane: Main Building South Wing Renovation (30000982)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for predesign, design, and construction, which may also serve as bridging documents, design, competition honoraria, project management, and other planning activities including permits.

(2) Criteria for selecting the design-build contractor must include life cycle costs, energy costs, or energy use index. Contractors and architectural and engineering firms may be eligible for additional points during the scoring process if they have experience with the state agency, or if they are considered a small business.

(3) The building must be built using sustainable building standards as defined in section 7009 ((of this act)), chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($24,919,000))

﻿ $25,683,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($24,919,000))

﻿ $25,683,000

Sec. 5022. 2018 c 2 s 5062 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline: Health and Life Sciences (30000983)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($23,372,000))

﻿ $24,221,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($23,372,000))

﻿ $24,221,000

Sec. 5023. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 5076 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover Park: Center for Advanced Manufacturing Technologies (30000984)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation ((is subject to the provisions of section 5140, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess)) in this section is provided solely for predesign and design, which may also serve as bridging documents, design, competition honoria, project management, and other planning activities including permits.

(2) Funding authorized pursuant to section 7002(7)(f) of this act for construction may be delivered using design-build, as defined by chapter 39.10 RCW, with a guarantee for energy, operations, and maintenance performance. The term for performance guarantee must not be less than one year. The state may use state employees for services not related to building performance.

(3) Criteria for selecting the design-build contractor must include life cycle costs, energy costs, or energy use index. Contractors and architectural and engineering firms may be eligible for additional points during the scoring process if they have experience with the state agency, or if they are considered a small business.

(4) The building may be built using sustainable building standards as defined in section 7009, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,791,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$353,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,144,000

Sec. 5024. 2018 c 2 s 5063 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee Valley: Wells Hall Replacement (30000985)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,772,000))

﻿ $2,840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($29,048,000))

﻿ $29,340,000

TOTAL. . . .(($31,820,000))

﻿ $32,180,000

Sec. 5025. 2018 c 2 s 5064 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic: Shop Building Renovation (30000986)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($929,000))

﻿ $953,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($7,368,000))

﻿ $7,594,000

TOTAL. . . .(($8,297,000))

﻿ $8,547,000

Sec. 5026. 2018 c 2 s 5065 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Building Renovation - Phase 3 (30000987)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,438,000))

﻿ $3,508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($29,982,000))

﻿ $31,035,000

TOTAL. . . .(($33,420,000))

﻿ $34,543,000

Sec. 5027. 2018 c 2 s 5066 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle: Automotive Technology Renovation and Expansion (30000988)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,241,000))

﻿ $2,501,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($21,873,000))

﻿ $23,187,000

TOTAL. . . .(($24,114,000))

﻿ $25,688,000

Sec. 5028. 2018 c 2 s 5067 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates: Medical Mile Health Science Center (30000989)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,150,000))

﻿ $3,238,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($39,208,000))

﻿ $40,484,000

TOTAL. . . .(($42,358,000))

﻿ $43,722,000

Sec. 5029. 2018 c 2 s 5068 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline: Allied Health, Science & Manufacturing Replacement (30000990)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,546,000))

﻿ $3,592,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($35,972,000))

﻿ $36,138,000

TOTAL. . . .(($39,518,000))

﻿ $39,730,000

Sec. 5030. 2018 c 2 s 5070 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof Repairs (30001293)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical Colleges Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .(($8,433,000))

﻿ $5,307,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($8,433,000))

﻿ $5,307,000

Sec. 5031. 2018 c 2 s 5071 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Facility Repairs (30001294)

Appropriation:

((State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,218,000))

Community/Technical Colleges Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .(($25,458,000))

﻿ $16,587,000

((Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$26,676,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($26,676,000))

﻿ $16,587,000

Sec. 5032. 2018 c 2 s 5072 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site Repairs (30001295)

Appropriation:

((State Building Construction)) Community/Technical

Colleges Capital Projects Account—State. . . .$4,166,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,166,000

Sec. 5033. 2018 c 2 s 5073 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Program (30001368)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($26,630,000))

﻿ $14,558,000

Community/Technical Colleges Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$1,831,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$16,389,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($26,630,000))

﻿ $16,389,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Library Building Renovation (30001451)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,448,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$28,359,000

TOTAL. . . .$31,807,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Walla Walla Science and Technology Building Replacement (30001452)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,727,000

TOTAL. . . .$9,883,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia Center for Science and Technology (30001453)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,421,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$37,726,000

TOTAL. . . .$41,147,000

Sec. 5037. 2018 c 2 s 5075 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls: Fine and Applied Arts Replacement (30001458)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,766,000))

﻿ $2,827,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($34,728,000))

﻿ $35,449,000

TOTAL. . . .(($37,494,000))

﻿ $38,276,000

(End of part)

PART 6

RESERVED

(End of part)

PART 7

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 7001. 2018 c 2 s 7001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are ((fifteen million, fifty seven)) sixteen million, three hundred four thousand dollars for the 2017-2019 biennium, ((two hundred sixty-two million, two hundred ninety)) two hundred eighty two million, two hundred seventeen thousand dollars for the 2019-2021 biennium, and ((three hundred sixty-six million, four hundred seventy-five)) three hundred ninety-seven million, nine hundred fifty-two thousand dollars for the 2021-2023 biennium.

Sec. 7002. 2018 c 2 s 7002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. (1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Department of enterprise services:

(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $5,323,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to repair the east plaza garage in Olympia.

(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for Tacoma Rhodes elevators.

(4) Washington state patrol:

(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $7,450,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a burn building for live fire training.

(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $2,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for furnishings and equipment at the 1063 building.

(5) Department of labor and industries: Enter into a financing contract for up to (($12,700,000)) $12,504,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to modernize a lab and training facility.

(6) Department of social and health services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $2,900,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the King county secure community transition center.

(((6))) (7) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Cascadia College for up to (($29,500,000)) $30,225,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a parking structure.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Renton Community College for up to $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to acquire property in Renton.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Seattle College for up to $10,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student wellness and fitness center.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Shoreline Community College for up to $31,100,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build student housing.

(e) ((Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark College for up to $35,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student recreation center.

(f))) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College for up to (($3,000,000)) $3,400,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the main building.

(((g))) (f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clover Park Technical College for up to (($33,288,000)) $35,821,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a center for advanced manufacturing technologies.

(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Yakima Valley Community College for up to $22,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build additional instructional and lab classroom space.

(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bellevue College for up to $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student success center.

(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom Community College for up to $26,475,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build student housing.

(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community College for up to $16,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a health and wellness center.

(k) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community College for up to $7,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to acquire property.

(l) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Grays Harbor College for up to $1,100,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate a campus parking lot.

Sec. 7003. 2018 c 2 s 7022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
STATE TREASURER TRANSFER AUTHORITY

State Toxics Control Account: For transfer

to the environmental legacy stewardship account,

$13,000,000 for fiscal year 2018 and (($13,000,000))

$7,760,000 for fiscal year 2019. . . .(($26,000,000))

$20,760,000

Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer

to the environmental legacy stewardship account,

$15,250,000 in fiscal year 2018 and (($15,250,000))

$9,050,000 in fiscal year 2019. . . .(($30,500,000))

$24,300,000

State Toxics Control Account: For transfer

to the cleanup settlement account as repayment

of the loan provided in section 6015(2), chapter

35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess. (ESHB 2380, 2016

supplemental capital budget), $8,150,000 for fiscal

year 2019. . . .$8,150,000

(1)(a) As directed by the department of ecology in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer amounts among the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account as needed during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium to maintain positive account balances in all three accounts.

(b) If, after using the interfund transfer authority granted in this section, the department of ecology determines that further reductions are needed to maintain positive account balances in the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account, the department is authorized to delay the start of any projects based on acuity of need, readiness to proceed, cost-efficiency, purposes of increasing affordable housing, or need to ensure geographic distribution. If the department uses this authority, the department must submit a prioritized list of projects that may be delayed to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

(2) As directed by the pollution liability insurance agency in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer from the pollution liability insurance program trust account to the underground storage tank revolving account the lesser of $20,000,000 or the balance of the fund exceeding $7,500,000 after excluding the reserves during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7004. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department of natural resources is authorized to develop and construct an irrigation system, known as the Paterson pipeline, to deliver water from existing water rights owned by the department from the Columbia river to common school trust lands.

(2)(a) The development and construction of the Paterson pipeline must be reviewed and approved by the board of natural resources; and

(b) Any investment in the Paterson pipeline with moneys belonging to an asset of the common school trust constitutes a loan from the common school trust and may only be made if first determined to be a prudent investment by the board of natural resources.

(3)(a) A payment of principal and annual interest of six percent on remaining principal of the loan described in subsection (2)(b) of this section must be paid annually to be disbursed as follows:

(i) The principal portion of the payment shall be deposited into the natural resources real property replacement account;

(ii) The interest portion of the payment shall be deposited into the common school construction account;

(b) Interest begins to accrue on the date the Paterson pipeline is completed; and

(c) Once interest begins to accrue, the annual payment is due and payable on July 1st, following the completion of the state fiscal year, until the principal is fully repaid for a term of no more than twenty years.

(4) Revenues generated from leases of the irrigated acreage in the common school trust improved by the Paterson pipeline are assumed to be sufficient for the payments on the loan principal and interest described in subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 7005. RCW 79.17.210 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7041 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that the department has a need to maintain the real property asset base it manages and needs an accounting mechanism to complete transactions without reducing the real property asset base.

(2) The natural resources real property replacement account is created in the state treasury. This account shall consist of funds transferred or paid for the disposal or transfer of real property by the department under RCW 79.17.200 and the transfer of state lands or state forestlands into community forest trust lands under RCW 79.155.040. The funds in this account shall be used solely for the acquisition of replacement real property and may be spent only when, and as, authorized by legislative appropriation. ((During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, funds in the account may also be appropriated for the land purchase in section 3245, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. under the provisions of section 3245, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. and chapter 11, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.)) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be appropriated for developing and constructing the pipeline and irrigation system in section 3060 of this act under the provisions of section 7004 of this act.

Sec. 7006. 2018 c 2 s 7007 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the completion of such project to another capital project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or institution of higher education and only between capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that govern the grants.

(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in this act.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.

(4) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within thirty days from the date of transfer.

(((5) The transfer authority granted in this section does not apply to appropriations for projects for the state parks and recreation commission. Appropriations for commission projects may be spent only for the specified projects, and funding may not be transferred from one commission project to another or from other sources to a commission project.))

Sec. 7007. 2018 c 2 s 7017 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS. Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. Portions of the general obligation bond proceeds authorized by chapter ((. . .)) 3, Laws of 2018, (((Senate)) House Bill No. ((. . .)) 1080, the general obligation bond bill) for deposit into the state taxable building construction account that are in excess of amounts required to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations shall be deposited into the state building construction account. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building construction account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the state taxable building construction account to the state building construction account may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:

The military department shall transfer title of the Port Orchard armory to the South Kitsap school district, the Kitsap Transit, and the city of Port Orchard, jointly. When the property is transferred, the South Kitsap school district shall develop property lines between the South Kitsap school district, the Kitsap Transit, and the city of Port Orchard. The city of Port Orchard and the Kitsap Transit shall cover any closing costs. The transfer must specify a purchase price of one dollar, and require the school district, the Kitsap Transit, and the city to own the property for a minimum of ten years.

Sec. 7009. 2018 c 2 s 7024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The energy efficiency account is hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the energy ((recovery act)) efficiency account shall be appropriated and expended for loans, loan guarantees, and grants for projects that encourage the establishment and use of innovative and sustainable industries for renewable energy and energy efficiency technology. The balance of state funds, federal funds, and loan repayments, from the energy recovery act account, are deposited in this account.

Sec. 7010. 2018 c 2 s 7026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

JOINT LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON IMPROVING STATE FUNDING FOR SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION. (1)(a) A joint legislative task force on improving state funding for school construction is established, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate from the senate committees on ways and means and early learning and K-12 education.

(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives from the house of representatives committees on capital budget and education.

(iii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives jointly shall ensure that at least three of the eight members appointed pursuant to (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection serve legislative districts located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

(iv) The chair of the task force selected pursuant to (b) of this subsection may appoint one additional member representing large school districts and one additional member representing small, rural school districts as voting members of the task force.

(b) The task force shall choose its chair from among its membership. The chair of the house of representatives committee on capital budget shall convene the initial meeting of the task force. All meetings of the task force must be scheduled and conducted in accordance with the requirements of both the senate and the house of representatives.

(2) The task force shall review the following issues:

(a) Improvements to state financial assistance for K-12 school construction to be implemented over several fiscal biennia;

(b) Utilization of school spaces for multiple purposes;

(c) School design and construction approaches that support effective teaching and learning by delivering education through innovative, sustainable, cost-effective, and enduring design and construction methods; and

(d) Recent reports on school construction, including but not limited to the school construction cost study from the educational service district 112 and the efforts of collecting inventory and condition of schools data by the Washington state university extension energy office.

(3) In consideration of the findings pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the task force must recommend a state school construction financial assistance program that:

(a) Supports the construction and preservation of schools; and

(b) Balances the state and local share of school construction and preservation costs considering local school districts' financial capacity, based on measures of relative wealth recommended pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section, and the state's limited bond capacity and common school trust land revenue.

(4) In making recommendations pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the task force must, at a minimum, also recommend:

(a) A methodology to project needs for state financial assistance for school construction and preservation over a ten-year period;

(b) Measures of relative wealth of a school district, including but not limited to assessed land value per student, eligible free and reduced price meal enrollments, income per capita per school district, and costs of construction;

(c) Education specifications recognized by the state for the purpose of providing guidance to school districts when designing school construction projects;

(d) A capital asset model for K-12 school construction that considers space and usage needs to calculate construction assistance for:

(i) New schools to accommodate enrollment growth;

(ii) Major modernization projects to address aging facilities;

(iii) Replacement and renewal of major building systems based on achieving lowest life-cycle building costs, provided that standards of routine maintenance are achieved by local districts; and

(iv) Specialized facility improvements including but not limited to STEM facilities, career and technical education facilities, skills centers, and computer labs; and

(e) Alternative means to fund and accommodate increased classroom capacity to meet K-3 class-size reduction objectives.

(5)(a) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research.

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial management shall cooperate with the task force and maintain liaison representatives, who are nonvoting members.

(c) The task force, where appropriate, may consult with individuals from public schools or related organizations or ask the individuals to establish a committee for technical advice and assistance. Members of such an advisory committee are not entitled to expense reimbursement.

(6) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(7) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures and meetings are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(8) The task force must report its final findings and recommendations to the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and the appropriate committees of the legislature by ((October 1)) December 15, 2018.

(9) This section expires June 30, 2019.

Sec. 7011. 2018 c 2 s 7028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The public use general aviation airport loan revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from moneys collected under ((this chapter)) section 4002, chapter 2, Laws of 2018, section 4002 of this act, and sections 1 through 8, chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1656), Laws of 2018 must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes described in section 4002 ((of this act)), chapter 2, Laws of 2018, section 4002 of this act, and sections 1 through 8, chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1656), Laws of 2018. Only the community aviation revitalization board or the board's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7012. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:

JOINT LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON WATER SUPPLY. (1) A joint legislative task force is established to review surface water and groundwater uses as they relate to agricultural uses, domestic potable water uses, instream flows, and fish habitat, and to develop and recommend projects that would increase total water supply available for competing water uses.

(2) The task force must consist of the following members:

(a) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(b) Two members from each of the two larges caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(c) A representative from the department of ecology, appointed by the director of the department of ecology;

(d) A representative from the department of fish and wildlife, appointed by the director of the department of fish and wildlife;

(e) A representative from the department of agriculture, appointed by the director of the department of agriculture;

(f) One representative from each of the following groups, appointed by the consensus of the cochairs of the task force:

(i) Two organizations representing the farming industry in Washington;

(ii) A representative designated by each county within water resource inventory areas 3 and 4;

(iii) A representative designated by each city within water resource inventory areas 3 and 4;

(iv) Two representatives from an environmental advocacy organization or organizations;

(v) A representative designated by each public utility district located in water resource inventory areas 3 and 4;

(vi) An organization representing business interests;

(vii) Representatives from federally recognized Indian tribes with reservations located within water resource inventory areas 3 and 4; and

(viii) Representatives from federally recognized tribes with usual and accustomed harvest area within water resource inventory areas 3 and 4.

(3) One cochair of the task force must be a member of the majority caucus of one chamber of the legislature, and one cochair must be a member of the minority caucus of the other chamber of the legislature, as those caucuses existed on the effective date of this section.

(4) The first meeting of the task force must occur by June 30, 2018.

(5) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the office of program research and senate committee services. The department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife shall cooperate with the task force and provide information as the cochairs reasonably request.

(6) Within existing appropriations, the expenses of the operations of the task force, including the expenses associated with the task force's meetings, must be paid jointly and in equal amounts by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures and meetings are subject to approval by the house executive rules committee and the senate facility and operations committee. Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(7)(a) The joint legislative task force must convene meetings during the 2017-2019 biennium with the goal of making recommendations to the legislature in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 during the 2019-2021 biennium.

(b) Recommendations of the joint legislative task force must be made by a seventy-five percent majority of the members of the task force. The representatives of the departments of fish and wildlife, ecology, and agriculture are not eligible to vote on the recommendations. Minority recommendations that achieve the support of at least five of the named voting members of the task force may also be submitted to the legislature.

(8) In developing recommendations, the task force shall review and compare the 1996 Skagit basin water resource memorandum of agreement, and chapter 173-503 WAC, as adopted by the department of ecology in 2001 and amended in 2006. The task force shall evaluate possible statutory and rule changes needed to balance the needs of instream flows, while providing legal and predictable water supply for new agriculture and domestic uses.

(9) The joint legislative task force expires June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7013. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7014. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---