BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.63.170 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 406 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The use of automated traffic safety and transit-only lane enforcement cameras for issuance of notices of infraction is subject to the following requirements:

(a) The appropriate local legislative authority must prepare an analysis of the locations within the jurisdiction where automated traffic safety cameras are proposed to be located: (i) Before enacting an ordinance allowing for the initial use of automated traffic safety cameras; and (ii) before adding additional cameras or relocating any existing camera to a new location within the jurisdiction. Automated traffic safety cameras may be used to detect one or more of the following: Stoplight, railroad crossing, or school speed zone violations; or speed violations subject to (((c))) (e) of this subsection. At a minimum, the local ordinance must contain the restrictions described in this section and provisions for public notice and signage. Cities and counties using automated traffic safety cameras before July 24, 2005, are subject to the restrictions described in this section, but are not required to enact an authorizing ordinance. Beginning one year after June 7, 2012, cities and counties using automated traffic safety cameras must post an annual report of the number of traffic accidents that occurred at each location where an automated traffic safety camera is located as well as the number of notices of infraction issued for each camera and any other relevant information about the automated traffic safety cameras that the city or county deems appropriate on the city's or county's web site.

(b)(i) A pilot project is authorized for up to three transit lane corridors for the testing of automated transit-only lane enforcement cameras in cities with populations greater than five hundred thousand. Pilot projects are authorized from September 1, 2018, to December 31, 2020. A work group must be established for any pilot project to include the local transportation authority of the city in which an included transit lane corridor is located, the metropolitan municipal corporation that operates transit on an included transit lane corridor, and the Washington state department of transportation. The work group must recommend the transit lane corridors to be selected for inclusion in the pilot project.

(ii) The appropriate local legislative authority must prepare an analysis of the locations within the jurisdiction where transit-only lane enforcement cameras are proposed to be located as part of a pilot project: (A) Before enacting an ordinance allowing for the initial use of transit-only lane enforcement cameras; and (B) before adding additional cameras or relocating any existing camera to a new location within the jurisdiction. Transit-only lane enforcement cameras may be used to detect transit-only lane violations. At a minimum, the local ordinance must contain the restrictions described in this section and provisions for public notice and signage.

(iii) The pilot project work group must provide an update by November 30, 2019, and a report by December 31, 2020, to the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include:

(A) A recommendation for how transit lane usage policies may be used to address significant current and near-term building and roadway construction projects in the city that are adversely impacting or that will adversely impact traffic in the city; and

(B) A recommendation for enforcement policies for traffic infractions generated through the use of automated transit-only lane enforcement cameras that considers how drivers may be educated regarding the use of these cameras and the penalties that may result from infractions captured by them.

(c) Except as provided in (((c))) (e) of this subsection, use of automated traffic safety cameras is restricted to the following locations only: (i) Intersections of two arterials with traffic control signals that have yellow change interval durations in accordance with RCW 47.36.022, which interval durations may not be reduced after placement of the camera; (ii) railroad crossings; and (iii) school speed zones.

(d) Use of transit-only lane enforcement cameras is restricted to specifically-designated areas of transit lane exclusivity.

(((c))) (e) Any city west of the Cascade mountains with a population of more than one hundred ninety-five thousand located in a county with a population of fewer than one million five hundred thousand may operate an automated traffic safety camera to detect speed violations subject to the following limitations:

(i) A city may only operate one such automated traffic safety camera within its respective jurisdiction; and

(ii) The use and location of the automated traffic safety camera must have first been authorized by the Washington state legislature as a pilot project for at least one full year.

(((d))) (f) Automated traffic safety or transit-only lane enforcement cameras may only take pictures of the vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction is occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of passengers in the vehicle. The primary purpose of camera placement is to take pictures of the vehicle and vehicle license plate when an infraction is occurring. Cities and counties shall consider installing cameras in a manner that minimizes the impact of camera flash on drivers.

(((e))) (g)(i) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered owner of the vehicle within fourteen days of the violation, or to the renter of a vehicle within fourteen days of establishing the renter's name and address under subsection (3)(a) of this section. The law enforcement officer issuing the notice of infraction shall include with it a certificate or facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images produced by an automated traffic safety or a transit-only lane enforcement camera, stating the facts supporting the notice of infraction. This certificate or facsimile is prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding charging a violation under this chapter. The photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images evidencing the violation must be available for inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate the liability for the infraction. A person receiving a notice of infraction based on evidence detected by an automated traffic safety or a transit-only lane enforcement camera may respond to the notice by mail.

(ii)(A) A notice of infraction for an infraction generated through the use of an automated transit-only lane enforcement camera may only be issued for the second or subsequent violation within a five-year period by the registered owner of the vehicle or the renter of the vehicle for an infraction generated through the use of an automated transit-only lane enforcement camera. A warning of infraction must be mailed in place of a notice of infraction for the first violation by the registered owner of the vehicle or the renter of the vehicle for an infraction generated through the use of an automated transit-only lane enforcement camera.

(B) A warning of infraction must be issued in the same manner and is subject to the same evidentiary, inspection, and admission requirements, and opportunity for the recipient to respond by mail, applicable to a notice of infraction as provided in (g)(i) of this subsection.

(C) No fine may be issued for a warning of infraction for a first infraction by the registered owner of the vehicle or the renter of the vehicle within a five-year period generated through the use of an automated transit-only lane enforcement camera.

(((f))) (h) The registered owner of a vehicle is responsible for an infraction under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d) unless the registered owner overcomes the presumption in RCW 46.63.075, or, in the case of a rental car business, satisfies the conditions under subsection (3) of this section. If appropriate under the circumstances, a renter identified under subsection (3)(a) of this section is responsible for an infraction.

(((g))) (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images prepared under this section are for the exclusive use of law enforcement in the discharge of duties under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding relates to a violation under this section. No photograph, microphotograph, or electronic image may be used for any purpose other than enforcement of violations under this section nor retained longer than necessary to enforce this section.

(((h))) (j) All locations where an automated traffic safety or transit-only lane enforcement camera is used must be clearly marked at least thirty days prior to activation of the camera by placing signs in locations that clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone where traffic laws are enforced by an automated traffic safety or transit-only lane enforcement camera. Signs placed in automated traffic safety camera locations after June 7, 2012, must follow the specifications and guidelines under the manual of uniform traffic control devices for streets and highways as adopted by the department of transportation under chapter 47.36 RCW.

(((i))) (k) If a county or city has established an authorized automated traffic safety or transit-only lane enforcement camera program under this section, the compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based only upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in support of the system, and may not be based upon a portion of the fine or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the equipment.

(2) Infractions detected through the use of automated traffic safety or transit-only lane enforcement cameras are not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated by the use of automated traffic safety or transit-only lane enforcement cameras under this section shall be processed in the same manner as parking infractions, including for the purposes of RCW 3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16A.120, and 46.20.270(2). The amount of the fine issued for an infraction generated through the use of an automated traffic safety or transit-only lane enforcement camera shall not exceed the amount of a fine issued for other parking infractions within the jurisdiction. However, the amount of the fine issued for a traffic control signal violation detected through the use of an automated traffic safety camera shall not exceed the monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.61.050 as provided under RCW 46.63.110, including all applicable statutory assessments.

(3) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of infraction being issued under this section, provide a written notice to the rental car business that a notice of infraction may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car business does not, within eighteen days of receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing agency by return mail:

(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the infraction occurred; or

(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction. A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft; or

(c) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car business may pay the applicable penalty.

Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this chapter for the notice of infraction.

(4) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a), (b), or (c).

(5) For the purposes of this section, "automated traffic safety camera" means a device that uses a vehicle sensor installed to work in conjunction with an intersection traffic control system, a railroad grade crossing control system, or a speed measuring device, and a camera synchronized to automatically record one or more sequenced photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images of the rear of a motor vehicle at the time the vehicle fails to stop when facing a steady red traffic control signal or an activated railroad grade crossing control signal, or exceeds a speed limit as detected by a speed measuring device.

(6) For the purposes of this section, "automated transit-only lane enforcement camera" means a device that uses a vehicle sensor installed to monitor nontraffic transit vehicles in violation of designated transit-only lanes.

(7) During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, this section does not apply to automated traffic safety cameras for the purposes of section 216(5), chapter 367, Laws of 2011 and section 216(6), chapter 306, Laws of 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act expires December 31, 2020.

--- END ---