BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.09.105 and 2009 c 476 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a child support order is entered or modified under this chapter, the court shall require both parents to provide medical support for any child named in the order as provided in this section.

(a) The child support order must include an obligation to provide health care coverage that is both accessible to all children named in the order and available at reasonable cost to the obligated parent.

(b) The court must allocate the cost of health care coverage between the parents.

(2) Medical support consists of:

(((i))) (a) Health ((insurance)) care coverage, which may consist of health insurance coverage or public health care coverage; and

(((ii) Cash medical support.))

(b) Cash medical support, which consists of:

(i) A parent's monthly payment toward the premium paid for coverage provided by ((either the other parent or the state)) a public entity or by another parent, which represents the obligated parent's proportionate share of the premium paid, but no more than twenty-five percent of the obligated parent's basic support obligation; and

(ii) A parent's proportionate share of uninsured medical expenses.

(((c))) (3) The parents share the obligation to provide medical support for the child or children specified in the order, by providing health care coverage or contributing a cash medical support obligation when appropriate, and paying a proportionate share of any uninsured medical expenses.

(4) Under appropriate circumstances, the court may excuse one parent from the responsibility to provide health ((insurance)) care coverage or the monthly payment toward the premium. The child's receipt of public health care coverage may not be the sole basis for excusing a parent from providing health insurance coverage through an employer or union.

(((d) The court shall always require both parents to contribute their proportionate share of uninsured medical expenses.

(2) Both parents share the obligation to provide medical support for the child or children specified in the order, by providing health insurance coverage or contributing a cash medical support obligation when appropriate, and paying a proportionate share of any uninsured medical expenses.

(3))) (5)(a) The court may specify how medical support must be provided by each parent under subsection (((4))) (6) of this section.

(b) If the court does not specify how medical support will be provided or if neither parent provides proof that he or she is providing health ((insurance)) care coverage for the child at the time the support order is entered, the division of child support or either parent may enforce a parent's obligation to provide medical support under RCW 26.18.170.

(((4))) (6)(a) If there is sufficient evidence provided at the time the order is entered, the court may make a determination of which parent must provide health care coverage and which parent must contribute a sum certain amount as his or her monthly payment toward the premium.

(b) If both parents have available health insurance coverage or health care coverage that is accessible to the child at the time the support order is entered, the court has discretion to order the parent with better coverage to provide the ((health insurance)) coverage for the child and the other parent to pay a monthly payment toward the premium. In making the determination of which coverage is better, the court shall consider the needs of the child, the cost and extent of each parent's coverage, and the accessibility of the coverage.

(c) Each parent shall ((remain)) be responsible for his or her proportionate share of uninsured medical expenses.

(((5))) (7) The order must provide that if the parties' circumstances change, the parties' medical support obligations will be enforced as provided in RCW 26.18.170.

(((6))) (8) A parent who is ordered to maintain or provide health ((insurance)) care coverage may comply with that requirement by:

(a) Providing proof of accessible ((private insurance)) health care coverage for any child named in the order; or

(b) Providing coverage that can be extended to cover the child that is available to that parent through employment or that is union-related, if the cost of such coverage does not exceed twenty-five percent of that parent's basic child support obligation.

(((7))) (9) The order must provide that, while an obligated parent may satisfy his or her health care coverage obligation by enrolling the child in public health care coverage, that parent is also required to provide accessible health insurance coverage for the child if it is available at no cost through the parent's employer or union.

(10) The order must provide that the fact that one parent enrolled the child in public health care coverage does not satisfy the other parent's health care coverage obligation unless the support order provides otherwise. A parent may satisfy the obligation to provide health care coverage by:

(a) First enrolling the child in available and accessible health insurance coverage through the parent's employer or union if such coverage is available for no more than twenty-five percent of the parent's basic support obligation; or

(b) If there is no accessible health insurance coverage for the child available through the parent's employer or union, contributing a proportionate share of any premium paid by the other parent or the state for public health care coverage for the child.

(11) The court may order a parent to provide health ((insurance)) care coverage that exceeds twenty-five percent of that parent's basic support obligation if it is in the best interests of the child to provide coverage.

(((8) If the child receives state-financed medical coverage through the department under chapter 74.09 RCW for which there is an assignment, the obligated parent shall pay a monthly payment toward the premium.

(9))) (12) Each parent is responsible for his or her proportionate share of uninsured medical expenses for the child or children covered by the support order.

(((10))) (13) The parents must maintain health ((insurance)) care coverage as required under this section until:

(a) Further order of the court;

(b) The child is emancipated, if there is no express language to the contrary in the order; or

(c) Health insurance is no longer available through the parents' employer or union and no conversion privileges exist to continue coverage following termination of employment.

(((11))) (14) A parent who is required to extend health insurance coverage to a child under this section is liable for any covered health care costs for which the parent receives direct payment from an insurer.

(((12) This section shall not be construed to limit the authority of the court to enter or modify support orders containing provisions for payment of uninsured health expenses, health care costs, or insurance premiums which are in addition to and not inconsistent with this section.

(13))) (15) A parent ordered to provide health ((insurance)) care coverage must provide proof of such coverage or proof that such coverage is unavailable within twenty days of the entry of the order to:

(a) The other parent; or

(b) The department of social and health services if the parent has been notified or ordered to make support payments to the Washington state support registry.

(((14))) (16) Every order requiring a parent to provide health care or insurance coverage must be entered in compliance with RCW 26.23.050 and be subject to direct enforcement as provided under chapter 26.18 RCW.

(((15))) (17) When a parent is providing health insurance or health care coverage at the time the order is entered, the premium shall be included in the worksheets for the calculation of child support under chapter 26.19 RCW.

(((16))) (18) As used in this section:

(a) "Accessible" means health ((insurance)) care coverage which provides primary care services to the child or children with reasonable effort by the custodian.

(b) "Cash medical support" means a combination of: (i) A parent's monthly payment toward the premium paid for coverage provided by ((either the other)) a public entity or by another parent ((or the state)), which represents the obligated parent's proportionate share of the premium paid, but no more than twenty-five percent of the obligated parent's basic support obligation; and (ii) a parent's proportionate share of uninsured medical expenses.

(c) (("Health insurance coverage" does not include medical assistance provided under chapter 74.09 RCW.

(d))) "Uninsured medical expenses" includes premiums, copays, deductibles, along with other health care costs not covered by ((insurance)) health care coverage.

(((e))) (d) "Obligated parent" means a parent ordered to provide health insurance coverage for the children.

(((f))) (e) "Proportionate share" means an amount equal to a parent's percentage share of the combined monthly net income of both parents as computed when determining a parent's child support obligation under chapter 26.19 RCW.

(((g))) (f) "Monthly payment toward the premium" means a parent's contribution toward premiums paid for coverage provided by a public entity or by ((the other)) another parent ((or the state for insurance coverage for the child)), which is based on the obligated parent's proportionate share of the premium paid, but no more than twenty-five percent of the obligated parent's basic support obligation.

(((17))) (g) "Premium" means the amount paid for coverage provided by a public entity or by another parent for a child covered by the order. This term may also mean "cost of coverage."

(19) This section does not limit the authority of the court to enter or modify support orders containing provisions for payment of uninsured health expenses, health care costs, or insurance premiums which are in addition to and not inconsistent with this section.

(20) The department of social and health services has rule-making authority to enact rules in compliance with 45 C.F.R. Parts 302, 303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 2. RCW 26.18.020 and 2008 c 6 s 1027 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Dependent child" means any child for whom a support order has been established or for whom a duty of support is owed.

(2) "Duty of maintenance" means the duty to provide for the needs of a spouse or former spouse or domestic partner or former domestic partner imposed under chapter 26.09 RCW.

(3) "Duty of support" means the duty to provide for the needs of a dependent child, which may include necessary food, clothing, shelter, education, and health care. The duty includes any obligation to make monetary payments, to pay expenses, including maintenance in cases in which there is a dependent child, or to reimburse another person or an agency for the cost of necessary support furnished a dependent child. The duty may be imposed by court order, by operation of law, or otherwise.

(4) "Obligee" means the custodian of a dependent child, the spouse or former spouse or domestic partner or former domestic partner, or person or agency, to whom a duty of support or duty of maintenance is owed, or the person or agency to whom the right to receive or collect support or maintenance has been assigned.

(5) "Obligor" means the person owing a duty of support or duty of maintenance.

(6) "Support or maintenance order" means any judgment, decree, or order of support or maintenance issued by the superior court or authorized agency of the state of Washington; or a judgment, decree, or other order of support or maintenance issued by a court or agency of competent jurisdiction in another state or country, which has been registered or otherwise made enforceable in this state.

(7) "Employer" includes the United States government, a state or local unit of government, and any person or entity who pays or owes earnings or remuneration for employment to the obligor.

(8) "Earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services or remuneration for employment, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to satisfy support or maintenance obligations, specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.

(9) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an individual remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be withheld.

(10) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(11) "Health insurance coverage" is another term for, and included in the definition of, "health care coverage." Health insurance coverage includes any coverage under which medical services are provided by an employer or a union whether that coverage is provided through a self-insurance program, under the employee retirement income security act of 1974, a commercial insurer pursuant to chapters 48.20 and 48.21 RCW, a health care service contractor pursuant to chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health maintenance organization pursuant to chapter 48.46 RCW, and the state through chapter 41.05 RCW.

(12) "Insurer" means a commercial insurance company providing disability insurance under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service contractor providing health care coverage under chapter 48.44 RCW, a health maintenance organization providing comprehensive health care services under chapter 48.46 RCW, and shall also include any employer or union which is providing health insurance coverage on a self-insured basis.

(13) "Remuneration for employment" means moneys due from or payable by the United States to an individual within the scope of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 659 and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 662(f).

(14) "Health care coverage" means fee for service, health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, and other types of private health insurance and public health care coverage under which medical services could be provided to a dependent child or children. The term "health care coverage" includes, but is not limited to, health insurance coverage.

(15) "Public health care coverage," sometimes called "state purchased health care," means state-financed or federally financed medical coverage, whether or not there is an assignment of rights. For children residing in Washington state, this includes coverage through the department of social and health services or the health care authority, except for coverage under chapter 41.05 RCW; for children residing outside of Washington, this includes coverage through another state's agencies that administer state purchased health care programs.

Sec. 3. RCW 26.18.170 and 2009 c 476 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a parent has been ordered to provide medical support for a dependent child, the department or the other parent may seek enforcement of the medical support as provided under this section.

(a) If the obligated parent provides proof that he or she provides accessible health care coverage for the child ((through private insurance)), that parent has satisfied his or her obligation to provide health ((insurance)) care coverage.

(b) If the obligated parent does not provide proof of coverage, either the department or the other parent may take appropriate action as provided in this section to enforce the obligation.

(2) An obligated parent may satisfy his or her health care coverage obligation by enrolling the child in public health care coverage, but that parent is also required to provide accessible health insurance coverage for the child if it is available at no cost through the parent's employer or union.

(3) The fact that one parent enrolled the child in public health care coverage does not satisfy the other parent's health care coverage obligation unless the support order provides otherwise. A parent may satisfy the obligation to provide health care coverage by:

(a) First enrolling the child in available and accessible health insurance coverage through the parent's employer or union if such coverage is available for no more than twenty-five percent of the parent's basic support obligation;

(b) If there is no accessible health insurance coverage for the child available through the parent's employer or union, contributing a proportionate share of any premium paid by the other parent or the state for public health care coverage for the child.

(4) The department may attempt to enforce a parent's obligation to provide health insurance coverage for the dependent child. If health insurance coverage is not available through the parent's employment or union at a cost not to exceed twenty-five percent of the parent's basic support obligation, or as otherwise provided in the support order, the department may enforce any monthly payment toward the premium ordered to be provided under RCW 26.09.105 or 74.20A.300.

(((3))) (5) A parent seeking to enforce another parent's monthly payment toward the premium under RCW 26.09.105 may:

(a) Apply for support enforcement services from the division of child support as provided by rule; or

(b) Take action on his or her own behalf by:

(i) Filing a motion in the underlying superior court action; or

(ii) Initiating an action in superior court to determine the amount owed by the obligated parent, if there is not already an underlying superior court action.

(((4))) (6)(a) The department may serve a notice of support owed under RCW 26.23.110 on a parent to determine the amount of that parent's monthly payment toward the premium.

(b) Whether or not the child receives temporary assistance for needy families or medicaid, the department may enforce the responsible parent's monthly payment toward the premium. When the child receives ((state-financed medical)) public health care coverage ((through the department under chapter 74.09 RCW)) for which there is an assignment, the department may disburse amounts collected to the custodial parent to be used for the medical costs of the child or the department may retain amounts collected and apply them toward the cost of providing the child's state-financed medical coverage. The department may disregard monthly payments toward the premium which are passed through to the family in accordance with federal law.

(((5))) (7)(a) If the order to provide health insurance coverage contains language notifying the parent ordered to provide coverage that failure to provide such coverage or proof that such coverage is unavailable may result in direct enforcement of the order and orders payments through, or has been submitted to, the Washington state support registry for enforcement, then the department may, without further notice to the parent, send a national medical support notice pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19), and sections 401 (e) and (f) of the federal child support and performance incentive act of 1998 to the parent's employer or union. The notice shall be served:

(i) By regular mail;

(ii) In the manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action;

(iii) By certified mail, return receipt requested; or

(iv) By electronic means if there is an agreement between the secretary of the department and the person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States to accept service by electronic means.

(b) The notice shall require the employer or union to enroll the child in the health insurance plan as provided in subsection (((8))) (10) of this section.

(c) The returned part A of the national medical support notice to the division of child support by the employer constitutes proof of service of the notice in the case where the notice was served by regular mail.

(((6))) (8) Upon receipt of a national medical support notice from a child support agency operating under Title IV-D of the federal social security act:

(a) The parent's employer or union shall comply with the provisions of the notice, including meeting response time frames and withholding requirements required under part A of the notice;

(b) The parent's employer or union shall also be responsible for complying with forwarding part B of the notice to the child's plan administrator, if required by the notice;

(c) The plan administrator is responsible for complying with the provisions of the notice.

(((7))) (9) If the parent's order to provide health insurance coverage does not order payments through, and has not been submitted to, the Washington state support registry for enforcement:

(a) The parent seeking enforcement may, without further notice to the obligated parent, send a certified copy of the order requiring health insurance coverage to the parent's employer or union by certified mail, return receipt requested; and

(b) The parent seeking enforcement shall attach a notarized statement to the order declaring that the order is the latest order addressing coverage entered by the court and require the employer or union to enroll the child in the health insurance plan as provided in subsection (((8))) (10) of this section.

(((8))) (10) Upon receipt of an order that provides for health insurance coverage:

(a) The parent's employer or union shall answer the party who sent the order within twenty days and confirm that the child:

(i) Has been enrolled in the health insurance plan;

(ii) Will be enrolled; or

(iii) Cannot be covered, stating the reasons why such coverage cannot be provided;

(b) The employer or union shall withhold any required premium from the parent's income or wages;

(c) If more than one plan is offered by the employer or union, and each plan may be extended to cover the child, then the child shall be enrolled in the parent's plan. If the parent's plan does not provide coverage which is accessible to the child, the child shall be enrolled in the least expensive plan otherwise available to the parent;

(d) The employer or union shall provide information about the name of the health insurance coverage provider or issuer and the extent of coverage available to the parent and shall make available any necessary claim forms or enrollment membership cards.

(((9))) (11) If the order for coverage contains no language notifying either or both parents that failure to provide health insurance coverage or proof that such coverage is unavailable may result in direct enforcement of the order, the department or the parent seeking enforcement may serve a written notice of intent to enforce the order on the obligated parent by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by personal service. If the parent required to provide medical support fails to provide written proof that such coverage has been obtained or applied for or fails to provide proof that such coverage is unavailable within twenty days of service of the notice, the department or the parent seeking enforcement may proceed to enforce the order directly as provided in subsection (((5))) (7) of this section.

(((10))) (12) If the parent ordered to provide health insurance coverage elects to provide coverage that will not be accessible to the child because of geographic or other limitations when accessible coverage is otherwise available, the department or the parent seeking enforcement may serve a written notice of intent to purchase health insurance coverage on the obligated parent by certified mail, return receipt requested. The notice shall also specify the type and cost of coverage.

(((11))) (13) If the department serves a notice under subsection (((10))) (12) of this section the parent required to provide medical support shall, within twenty days of the date of service:

(a) File an application for an adjudicative proceeding; or

(b) Provide written proof to the department that the obligated parent has either applied for, or obtained, coverage accessible to the child.

(((12))) (14) If the parent seeking enforcement serves a notice under subsection (((10))) (12) of this section, within twenty days of the date of service the parent required to provide medical support shall provide written proof to the parent seeking enforcement that he or she has either applied for, or obtained, coverage accessible to the child.

(((13))) (15) If the parent required to provide medical support fails to respond to a notice served under subsection (((10))) (12) of this section to the party who served the notice, the party who served the notice may purchase the health insurance coverage specified in the notice directly.

(a) If the obligated parent is the responsible parent, the amount of the monthly premium shall be added to the support debt and be collectible without further notice.

(b) If the obligated parent is the custodial parent, the responsible parent may file an application for enforcement services and ask the department to establish and enforce the custodial parent's obligation.

(c) The amount of the monthly premium may be collected or accrued until the parent required to provide medical support provides proof of the required coverage.

(((14))) (16) The signature of the parent seeking enforcement or of a department employee shall be a valid authorization to the coverage provider or issuer for purposes of processing a payment to the child's health services provider. An order for health insurance coverage shall operate as an assignment of all benefit rights to the parent seeking enforcement or to the child's health services provider, and in any claim against the coverage provider or issuer, the parent seeking enforcement or his or her assignee shall be subrogated to the rights of the parent obligated to provide medical support for the child. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section regarding assignment of benefits, this section shall not require a health care service contractor authorized under chapter 48.44 RCW or a health maintenance organization authorized under chapter 48.46 RCW to deviate from their contractual provisions and restrictions regarding reimbursement for covered services. If the coverage is terminated, the employer shall mail a notice of termination to the department or the parent seeking enforcement at that parent's last known address within thirty days of the termination date.

(((15))) (17) This section shall not be construed to limit the right of the parents or parties to the support order to bring an action in superior court at any time to enforce, modify, or clarify the original support order.

(((16))) (18) Where a child does not reside in the issuer's service area, an issuer shall cover no less than urgent and emergent care. Where the issuer offers broader coverage, whether by policy or reciprocal agreement, the issuer shall provide such coverage to any child otherwise covered that does not reside in the issuer's service area.

(((17))) (19) If a parent required to provide medical support fails to pay his or her portion, determined under RCW 26.19.080, of any premium, deductible, copay, or uninsured medical expense incurred on behalf of the child, pursuant to a child support order, the department or the parent seeking reimbursement of medical expenses may enforce collection of the obligated parent's portion of the premium, deductible, copay, or uninsured medical expense incurred on behalf of the child.

(a) If the department is enforcing the order and the responsible parent is the obligated parent, the obligated parent's portion of the premium, deductible, copay, or uninsured medical expenses incurred on behalf of the child added to the support debt and be collectible without further notice, following the reduction of the expenses to a sum certain either in a court order or by the department, pursuant to RCW 26.23.110.

(b) If the custodial parent is the obligated parent, the responsible parent may file an application for enforcement services and ask the department to establish and enforce the custodial parent's obligation.

(((18))) (20) As used in this section:

(a) "Accessible" means health insurance coverage which provides primary care services to the child or children with reasonable effort by the custodian.

(b) "Cash medical support" means a combination of: (i) A parent's monthly payment toward the premium paid for coverage by either the other parent or the state, which represents the obligated parent's proportionate share of the premium paid, but no more than twenty-five percent of the obligated parent's basic support obligation; and (ii) a parent's proportionate share of uninsured medical expenses.

(c) (("Health insurance coverage" does not include medical assistance provided under chapter 74.09 RCW.

(d))) "Uninsured medical expenses" includes premiums, copays, deductibles, along with other health care costs not covered by insurance.

(((e))) (d) "Obligated parent" means a parent ordered to provide health insurance coverage for the children.

(((f))) (e) "Monthly payment toward the premium" means a parent's contribution toward premiums paid by the other parent or the state for insurance coverage for the child, which is based on the obligated parent's proportionate share of the premium paid, but no more than twenty-five percent of the obligated parent's basic support obligation.

(((19))) (21) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005. Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement regulations required under 45 C.F.R. Parts 302, 303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 4. RCW 26.23.050 and 2009 c 476 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the division of child support is providing support enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, or if a party is applying for support enforcement services by signing the application form on the bottom of the support order, the superior court shall include in all court orders that establish or modify a support obligation:

(a) A provision that orders and directs the responsible parent to make all support payments to the Washington state support registry;

(b) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the responsible parent at any time after entry of the court order, unless:

(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or

(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an alternate arrangement;

(c) A statement that the receiving parent might be required to submit an accounting of how the support, including any cash medical support, is being spent to benefit the child;

(d) A statement that any parent required to provide health ((insurance)) care coverage for the child or children covered by the order must notify the division of child support and the other parent when the coverage terminates; and

(e) A statement that the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320.

As used in this subsection and subsection (3) of this section, "good cause not to require immediate income withholding" means a written determination of why implementing immediate wage withholding would not be in the child's best interests and, in modification cases, proof of timely payment of previously ordered support.

(2) In all other cases not under subsection (1) of this section, the court may order the responsible parent to make payments directly to the person entitled to receive the payments, to the Washington state support registry, or may order that payments be made in accordance with an alternate arrangement agreed upon by the parties.

(a) The superior court shall include in all orders under this subsection that establish or modify a support obligation:

(i) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the responsible parent at any time after entry of the court order, unless:

(A) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or

(B) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an alternate arrangement;

(ii) A statement that the receiving parent may be required to submit an accounting of how the support is being spent to benefit the child;

(iii) A statement that any parent required to provide health ((insurance)) care coverage for the child or children covered by the order must notify the division of child support and the other parent when the coverage terminates; and

(iv) A statement that a parent seeking to enforce the obligation to provide health ((insurance)) care coverage may:

(A) File a motion in the underlying superior court action; or

(B) If there is not already an underlying superior court action, initiate an action in the superior court.

As used in this subsection, "good cause not to require immediate income withholding" is any reason that the court finds appropriate.

(b) The superior court may order immediate or delayed income withholding as follows:

(i) Immediate income withholding may be ordered if the responsible parent has earnings. If immediate income withholding is ordered under this subsection, all support payments shall be paid to the Washington state support registry. The superior court shall issue a mandatory wage assignment order as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW when the support order is signed by the court. The parent entitled to receive the transfer payment is responsible for serving the employer with the order and for its enforcement as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW.

(ii) If immediate income withholding is not ordered, the court shall require that income withholding be delayed until a payment is past due. The support order shall contain a statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the responsible parent, after a payment is past due.

(c) If a mandatory wage withholding order under chapter 26.18 RCW is issued under this subsection and the division of child support provides support enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, the existing wage withholding assignment is prospectively superseded upon the division of child support's subsequent service of an income withholding notice.

(3) The office of administrative hearings and the department of social and health services shall require that all support obligations established as administrative orders include a provision which orders and directs that the responsible parent shall make all support payments to the Washington state support registry. All administrative orders shall also state that the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. All administrative orders shall also state that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state without further notice to the responsible parent at any time after entry of the order, unless:

(a) One of the parties demonstrates, and the presiding officer finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding; or

(b) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the presiding officer that provides for an alternate agreement.

(4) If the support order does not include the provision ordering and directing that all payments be made to the Washington state support registry and a statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits if a support payment is past due or at any time after the entry of the order, or that a parent's licensing privileges may not be renewed, or may be suspended, the division of child support may serve a notice on the responsible parent stating such requirements and authorizations. Service may be by personal service or any form of mail requiring a return receipt.

(5) Every support order shall state:

(a) The address where the support payment is to be sent;

(b) That withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the responsible parent at any time after entry of a support order, unless:

(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding; or

(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an alternate arrangement;

(c) The income of the parties, if known, or that their income is unknown and the income upon which the support award is based;

(d) The support award as a sum certain amount;

(e) The specific day or date on which the support payment is due;

(f) The names and ages of the dependent children;

(g) A provision requiring both the responsible parent and the custodial parent to keep the Washington state support registry informed of whether he or she has access to health ((insurance)) care coverage at reasonable cost and, if so, the health ((insurance policy)) care coverage information;

(h) That either or both the responsible parent and the custodial parent shall be obligated to provide medical support for his or her child through health ((insurance)) care coverage if:

(i) The obligated parent provides accessible coverage for the child through private ((insurance)) or public health care coverage; or

(ii) Coverage that can be extended to cover the child is or becomes available to the parent through employment or is union-related; or

(iii) In the absence of such coverage, through an additional sum certain amount, as that parent's monthly payment toward the premium as provided under RCW 26.09.105;

(i) That a parent providing health ((insurance)) care coverage must notify both the division of child support and the other parent when coverage terminates;

(j) That if proof of health ((insurance)) care coverage or proof that the coverage is unavailable is not provided within twenty days, the parent seeking enforcement or the department may seek direct enforcement of the coverage through the employer or union of the parent required to provide medical support without further notice to the parent as provided under chapter 26.18 RCW;

(k) The reasons for not ordering health ((insurance)) care coverage if the order fails to require such coverage;

(l) That the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320;

(m) That each parent must:

(i) Promptly file with the court and update as necessary the confidential information form required by subsection (7) of this section; and

(ii) Provide the state case registry and update as necessary the information required by subsection (7) of this section; and

(n) That parties to administrative support orders shall provide to the state case registry and update as necessary their residential addresses and the address of the responsible parent's employer. The division of child support may adopt rules that govern the collection of parties' current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, social security numbers, the names of the children, social security numbers of the children, dates of birth of the children, driver's license numbers, and the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties' employers to enforce an administrative support order. The division of child support shall not release this information if the division of child support determines that there is reason to believe that release of the information may result in physical or emotional harm to the party or to the child, or a restraining order or protective order is in effect to protect one party from the other party.

(6) After the responsible parent has been ordered or notified to make payments to the Washington state support registry under this section, the responsible parent shall be fully responsible for making all payments to the Washington state support registry and shall be subject to payroll deduction or other income-withholding action. The responsible parent shall not be entitled to credit against a support obligation for any payments made to a person or agency other than to the Washington state support registry except as provided under RCW 74.20.101. A civil action may be brought by the payor to recover payments made to persons or agencies who have received and retained support moneys paid contrary to the provisions of this section.

(7) All petitioners and parties to all court actions under chapters 26.09, 26.10, 26.12, 26.18, 26.21A, 26.23, 26.26, and 26.27 RCW shall complete to the best of their knowledge a verified and signed confidential information form or equivalent that provides the parties' current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, social security numbers, driver's license numbers, and the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties' employers. The clerk of the court shall not accept petitions, except in parentage actions initiated by the state, orders of child support, decrees of dissolution, or paternity orders for filing in such actions unless accompanied by the confidential information form or equivalent, or unless the confidential information form or equivalent is already on file with the court clerk. In lieu of or in addition to requiring the parties to complete a separate confidential information form, the clerk may collect the information in electronic form. The clerk of the court shall transmit the confidential information form or its data to the division of child support with a copy of the order of child support or paternity order, and may provide copies of the confidential information form or its data and any related findings, decrees, parenting plans, orders, or other documents to the state administrative agency that administers Title IV-A, IV-D, IV-E, or XIX of the federal social security act. In state initiated paternity actions, the parties adjudicated the parents of the child or children shall complete the confidential information form or equivalent or the state's attorney of record may complete that form to the best of the attorney's knowledge.

(8) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005. Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement regulations required under 45 C.F.R. Parts 302, 303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 5. RCW 26.26.165 and 1994 c 230 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In entering or modifying a support order under this chapter, the court shall require either or both parents to maintain or provide health ((insurance)) care coverage for any dependent child as provided under RCW 26.09.105.

(2) This section shall not be construed to limit the authority of the court to enter or modify support orders containing provisions for payment of uninsured health expenses, health costs, or insurance premiums which are in addition to and not inconsistent with this section. (("Health insurance coverage" as used in this section does not include medical assistance provided under chapter 74.09 RCW.))

(3) A parent ordered to provide health ((insurance)) care coverage shall provide proof of such coverage or proof that such coverage is unavailable within twenty days of the entry of the order to:

(a) The physical custodian; or

(b) The department of social and health services if the parent has been notified or ordered to make support payments to the Washington state support registry.

(4) Every order requiring a parent to provide health ((insurance)) care coverage shall be entered in compliance with RCW 26.23.050 and be subject to direct enforcement as provided under chapter 26.18 RCW.

Sec. 6. RCW 26.26.375 and 2011 c 283 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After the period for rescission of an acknowledgment of paternity provided in RCW 26.26.330 has passed, a parent executing an acknowledgment of paternity of the child named therein may commence a judicial proceeding for:

(a) Making residential provisions or a parenting plan with regard to the minor child on the same basis as provided in chapter 26.09 RCW; or

(b) Establishing a child support obligation under chapter 26.19 RCW and maintaining health ((insurance)) care coverage under RCW 26.09.105.

(2) Pursuant to RCW 26.09.010(3), a proceeding authorized by this section shall be titled "In re the parenting and support of...."

(3) Before the period for a challenge to the acknowledgment or denial of paternity has elapsed under RCW 26.26.335, the petitioner must specifically allege under penalty of perjury, to the best of the petitioner's knowledge, that: (a) No man other than the man who executed the acknowledgment of paternity is the father of the child; (b) there is not currently pending a proceeding to adjudicate the parentage of the child or that another man is adjudicated the child's father; and (c) the petitioner has provided notice of the proceeding to any other men who have claimed parentage of the child. Should the respondent or any other person appearing in the action deny the allegations, a permanent parenting plan or residential schedule may not be entered for the child without the matter being converted to a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment of paternity under RCW 26.26.335 and 26.26.340. A copy of the acknowledgment of paternity or the birth certificate issued by the state in which the child was born must be filed with the petition or response. The court may convert the matter to a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment on its own motion.

Sec. 7. RCW 74.20A.055 and 2009 c 476 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary may, if there is no order that establishes the responsible parent's support obligation or specifically relieves the responsible parent of a support obligation or pursuant to an establishment of paternity under chapter 26.26 RCW, serve on the responsible parent or parents and custodial parent a notice and finding of financial responsibility requiring the parents to appear and show cause in an adjudicative proceeding why the finding of responsibility and/or the amount thereof is incorrect, should not be finally ordered, but should be rescinded or modified. This notice and finding shall relate to the support debt accrued and/or accruing under this chapter and/or RCW 26.16.205, including periodic payments to be made in the future. The hearing shall be held pursuant to this section, chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act, and the rules of the department. A custodian who has physical custody of a child has the same rights that a custodial parent has under this section.

(2) The notice and finding of financial responsibility shall be served in the same manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action or may be served on the responsible parent by certified mail, return receipt requested. The receipt shall be prima facie evidence of service. The notice shall be served upon the debtor within sixty days from the date the state assumes responsibility for the support of the dependent child or children on whose behalf support is sought. If the notice is not served within sixty days from such date, the department shall lose the right to reimbursement of payments made after the sixty-day period and before the date of notification: PROVIDED, That if the department exercises reasonable efforts to locate the debtor and is unable to do so the entire sixty-day period is tolled until such time as the debtor can be located. The notice may be served upon the custodial parent who is the nonassistance applicant or public assistance recipient by first-class mail to the last known address. If the custodial parent is not the nonassistance applicant or public assistance recipient, service shall be in the same manner as for the responsible parent.

(3) The notice and finding of financial responsibility shall set forth the amount the department has determined the responsible parent owes, the support debt accrued and/or accruing, and periodic payments to be made in the future. The notice and finding shall also include:

(a) A statement of the name of the custodial parent and the name of the child or children for whom support is sought;

(b) A statement of the amount of periodic future support payments as to which financial responsibility is alleged;

(c) A statement that the responsible parent or custodial parent may object to all or any part of the notice and finding, and file an application for an adjudicative proceeding to show cause why the terms set forth in the notice should not be ordered;

(d) A statement that, if neither the responsible parent nor the custodial parent files in a timely fashion an application for an adjudicative proceeding, the support debt and payments stated in the notice and finding, including periodic support payments in the future, shall be assessed and determined and ordered by the department and that this debt and amounts due under the notice shall be subject to collection action;

(e) A statement that the property of the debtor, without further advance notice or hearing, will be subject to lien and foreclosure, distraint, seizure and sale, order to withhold and deliver, notice of payroll deduction or other collection action to satisfy the debt and enforce the support obligation established under the notice;

(f) A statement that ((either)) one or both parents are responsible for either:

(i) Providing health ((insurance)) care coverage for ((his or her)) the child if accessible coverage that can ((be extended to)) cover the child ((either)):

(A) Is available through ((private)) health insurance ((which is accessible to the child or through coverage that)) or public health care coverage; or

(B) Is or becomes available to the parent through that parent's employment or ((is union-related,)) union; or ((for))

(ii) Paying a monthly payment toward the premium if no such coverage is available, as provided under RCW 26.09.105.

(4) A responsible parent or custodial parent who objects to the notice and finding of financial responsibility may file an application for an adjudicative proceeding within twenty days of the date of service of the notice or thereafter as provided under this subsection.

(a) If the responsible parent or custodial parent files the application within twenty days, the office of administrative hearings shall schedule an adjudicative proceeding to hear the parent's or parents' objection and determine the support obligation for the entire period covered by the notice and finding of financial responsibility. The filing of the application stays collection action pending the entry of a final administrative order;

(b) If both the responsible parent and the custodial parent fail to file an application within twenty days, the notice and finding shall become a final administrative order. The amounts for current and future support and the support debt stated in the notice are final and subject to collection, except as provided under (c) and (d) of this subsection;

(c) If the responsible parent or custodial parent files the application more than twenty days after, but within one year of the date of service, the office of administrative hearings shall schedule an adjudicative proceeding to hear the parent's or parents' objection and determine the support obligation for the entire period covered by the notice and finding of financial responsibility. The filing of the application does not stay further collection action, pending the entry of a final administrative order, and does not affect any prior collection action;

(d) If the responsible parent or custodial parent files the application more than one year after the date of service, the office of administrative hearings shall schedule an adjudicative proceeding at which the parent who requested the late hearing must show good cause for failure to file a timely application. The filing of the application does not stay future collection action and does not affect prior collection action:

(i) If the presiding officer finds that good cause exists, the presiding officer shall proceed to hear the parent's objection to the notice and determine the support obligation;

(ii) If the presiding officer finds that good cause does not exist, the presiding officer shall treat the application as a petition for prospective modification of the amount for current and future support established under the notice and finding. In the modification proceeding, the presiding officer shall set current and future support under chapter 26.19 RCW. The petitioning parent need show neither good cause nor a substantial change of circumstances to justify modification of current and future support;

(e) If the responsible parent's support obligation was based upon imputed median net income, the grant standard, or the family need standard, the division of child support may file an application for adjudicative proceeding more than twenty days after the date of service of the notice. The office of administrative hearings shall schedule an adjudicative proceeding and provide notice of the hearing to the responsible parent and the custodial parent. The presiding officer shall determine the support obligation for the entire period covered by the notice, based upon credible evidence presented by the division of child support, the responsible parent, or the custodial parent, or may determine that the support obligation set forth in the notice is correct. The division of child support demonstrates good cause by showing that the responsible parent's support obligation was based upon imputed median net income, the grant standard, or the family need standard. The filing of the application by the division of child support does not stay further collection action, pending the entry of a final administrative order, and does not affect any prior collection action.

(f) The department shall retain and/or shall not refund support money collected more than twenty days after the date of service of the notice. Money withheld as the result of collection action shall be delivered to the department. The department shall distribute such money, as provided in published rules.

(5) If an application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed, the presiding or reviewing officer shall determine the past liability and responsibility, if any, of the alleged responsible parent and shall also determine the amount of periodic payments to be made in the future, which amount is not limited by the amount of any public assistance payment made to or for the benefit of the child. If deviating from the child support schedule in making these determinations, the presiding or reviewing officer shall apply the standards contained in the child support schedule and enter written findings of fact supporting the deviation.

(6) If either the responsible parent or the custodial parent fails to attend or participate in the hearing or other stage of an adjudicative proceeding, upon a showing of valid service, the presiding officer shall enter an order of default against each party who did not appear and may enter an administrative order declaring the support debt and payment provisions stated in the notice and finding of financial responsibility to be assessed and determined and subject to collection action. The parties who appear may enter an agreed settlement or consent order, which may be different than the terms of the department's notice. Any party who appears may choose to proceed to the hearing, after the conclusion of which the presiding officer or reviewing officer may enter an order that is different than the terms stated in the notice, if the obligation is supported by credible evidence presented by any party at the hearing.

(7) The final administrative order establishing liability and/or future periodic support payments shall be superseded upon entry of a superior court order for support to the extent the superior court order is inconsistent with the administrative order.

(8) Debts determined pursuant to this section, accrued and not paid, are subject to collection action under this chapter without further necessity of action by a presiding or reviewing officer.

(9) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005. Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement regulations required under 45 C.F.R. Parts 302, 303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 8. RCW 74.20A.056 and 2009 c 476 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an alleged father has signed an affidavit acknowledging paternity which has been filed with the state registrar of vital statistics before July 1, 1997, the division of child support may serve a notice and finding of parental responsibility on him and the custodial parent. Procedures for and responsibility resulting from acknowledgments filed after July 1, 1997, are in subsections (8) and (9) of this section. Service of the notice shall be in the same manner as a summons in a civil action or by certified mail, return receipt requested, on the alleged father. The custodial parent shall be served by first-class mail to the last known address. If the custodial parent is not the nonassistance applicant or public assistance recipient, service shall be in the same manner as for the responsible parent. The notice shall have attached to it a copy of the affidavit or certification of birth record information advising of the existence of a filed affidavit, provided by the state registrar of vital statistics, and shall state that:

(a) Either or both parents are responsible for providing health ((insurance)) care coverage for their child either through ((private)) health insurance or public health care coverage, which is accessible to the child, or through coverage that if coverage that can be extended to cover the child is or becomes available to the parent through employment or is union-related, or for paying a monthly payment toward the premium if no such coverage is available, as provided under RCW 26.09.105;

(b) The alleged father or custodial parent may file an application for an adjudicative proceeding at which they both will be required to appear and show cause why the amount stated in the notice as to support is incorrect and should not be ordered;

(c) An alleged father or mother, if she is also the custodial parent, may request that a blood or genetic test be administered to determine whether such test would exclude him from being a natural parent and, if not excluded, may subsequently request that the division of child support initiate an action in superior court to determine the existence of the parent-child relationship; and

(d) If neither the alleged father nor the custodial parent requests that a blood or genetic test be administered or files an application for an adjudicative proceeding, the amount of support stated in the notice and finding of parental responsibility shall become final, subject only to a subsequent determination under RCW 26.26.500 through 26.26.630 that the parent-child relationship does not exist.

(2) An alleged father or custodial parent who objects to the amount of support requested in the notice may file an application for an adjudicative proceeding up to twenty days after the date the notice was served. An application for an adjudicative proceeding may be filed within one year of service of the notice and finding of parental responsibility without the necessity for a showing of good cause or upon a showing of good cause thereafter. An adjudicative proceeding under this section shall be pursuant to RCW 74.20A.055. The only issues shall be the amount of the accrued debt, the amount of the current and future support obligation, and the reimbursement of the costs of blood or genetic tests if advanced by the department. A custodian who is not the parent of a child and who has physical custody of a child has the same notice and hearing rights that a custodial parent has under this section.

(3) If the application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed within twenty days of service of the notice, collection action shall be stayed pending a final decision by the department. If no application is filed within twenty days:

(a) The amounts in the notice shall become final and the debt created therein shall be subject to collection action; and

(b) Any amounts so collected shall neither be refunded nor returned if the alleged father is later found not to be a responsible parent.

(4) An alleged father or the mother, if she is also the custodial parent, may request that a blood or genetic test be administered at any time. The request for testing shall be in writing, or as the department may specify by rule, and served on the division of child support. If a request for testing is made, the department shall arrange for the test and, pursuant to rules adopted by the department, may advance the cost of such testing. The department shall mail a copy of the test results by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the alleged father's and mother's, if she is also the custodial parent, last known address.

(5) If the test excludes the alleged father from being a natural parent, the division of child support shall file a copy of the results with the state registrar of vital statistics and shall dismiss any pending administrative collection proceedings based upon the affidavit in issue. The state registrar of vital statistics shall remove the alleged father's name from the birth certificate and change the child's surname to be the same as the mother's maiden name as stated on the birth certificate, or any other name which the mother may select.

(6) The alleged father or mother, if she is also the custodial parent, may, within twenty days after the date of receipt of the test results, request the division of child support to initiate an action under RCW 26.26.500 through 26.26.630 to determine the existence of the parent-child relationship. If the division of child support initiates a superior court action at the request of the alleged father or mother and the decision of the court is that the alleged father is a natural parent, the parent who requested the test shall be liable for court costs incurred.

(7) If the alleged father or mother, if she is also the custodial parent, does not request the division of child support to initiate a superior court action, or fails to appear and cooperate with blood or genetic testing, the notice of parental responsibility shall become final for all intents and purposes and may be overturned only by a subsequent superior court order entered under RCW 26.26.500 through 26.26.630.

(8)(a) Subsections (1) through (7) of this section do not apply to acknowledgments of paternity filed with the state registrar of vital statistics after July 1, 1997.

(b) If an acknowledged father has signed an acknowledgment of paternity that has been filed with the state registrar of vital statistics after July 1, 1997:

(i) The division of child support may serve a notice and finding of financial responsibility under RCW 74.20A.055 based on the acknowledgment. The division of child support shall attach a copy of the acknowledgment or certification of the birth record information advising of the existence of a filed acknowledgment of paternity to the notice;

(ii) The notice shall include a statement that the acknowledged father or any other signatory may commence a proceeding in court to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial of paternity under RCW 26.26.330 and 26.26.335;

(iii) A statement that either or both parents are responsible for providing health ((insurance)) care coverage for ((his or her)) the child if accessible coverage that can be extended to cover the child is or becomes available to the parent through employment or is union-related as provided under RCW 26.09.105; and

(iv) The party commencing the action to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial must serve notice on the division of child support and the office of the prosecuting attorney in the county in which the proceeding is commenced. Commencement of a proceeding to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial stays the establishment of the notice and finding of financial responsibility, if the notice has not yet become a final order.

(c) If neither the acknowledged father nor the other party to the notice files an application for an adjudicative proceeding or the signatories to the acknowledgment or denial do not commence a proceeding to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment of paternity, the amount of support stated in the notice and finding of financial responsibility becomes final, subject only to a subsequent determination under RCW 26.26.500 through 26.26.630 that the parent-child relationship does not exist. The division of child support does not refund nor return any amounts collected under a notice that becomes final under this section or RCW 74.20A.055, even if a court later determines that the acknowledgment is void.

(d) An acknowledged father or other party to the notice who objects to the amount of support requested in the notice may file an application for an adjudicative proceeding up to twenty days after the date the notice was served. An application for an adjudicative proceeding may be filed within one year of service of the notice and finding of parental responsibility without the necessity for a showing of good cause or upon a showing of good cause thereafter. An adjudicative proceeding under this section shall be pursuant to RCW 74.20A.055. The only issues shall be the amount of the accrued debt and the amount of the current and future support obligation.

(i) If the application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed within twenty days of service of the notice, collection action shall be stayed pending a final decision by the department.

(ii) If the application for an adjudicative proceeding is not filed within twenty days of the service of the notice, any amounts collected under the notice shall be neither refunded nor returned if the alleged father is later found not to be a responsible parent.

(e) If neither the acknowledged father nor the custodial parent requests an adjudicative proceeding, or if no timely action is brought to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial after service of the notice, the notice of financial responsibility becomes final for all intents and purposes and may be overturned only by a subsequent superior court order entered under RCW 26.26.500 through 26.26.630.

(9) Acknowledgments of paternity that are filed after July 1, 1997, are subject to requirements of chapters 26.26, the uniform parentage act, and 70.58 RCW.

(10) The department and the department of health may adopt rules to implement the requirements under this section.

(11) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005. Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement regulations required under 45 C.F.R. Parts 302, 303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 9. RCW 74.20A.059 and 2009 c 476 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, the physical custodian, or the responsible parent may petition for a prospective modification of a final administrative order if:

(a) The administrative order has not been superseded by a superior court order; and

(b) There has been a substantial change of circumstances, except as provided under RCW 74.20A.055(4)(d).

(2) An order of child support may be modified one year or more after it has been entered without showing a substantial change of circumstances:

(a) If the order in practice works a severe economic hardship on either party or the child; or

(b) If a party requests an adjustment in an order for child support that was based on guidelines which determined the amount of support according to the child's age, and the child is no longer in the age category on which the current support amount was based; or

(c) If a child is a full-time student and reasonably expected to complete secondary school or the equivalent level of vocational or technical training before the child becomes nineteen years of age upon a finding that there is a need to extend support beyond the eighteenth birthday.

(3) An order may be modified without showing a substantial change of circumstances if the requested modification is to:

(a) Require medical support under RCW 26.09.105 for a child covered by the order; or

(b) Modify an existing order for health ((insurance)) care coverage.

(4) Support orders may be adjusted once every twenty-four months based upon changes in the income of the parents without a showing of substantially changed circumstances.

(5)(a) All administrative orders entered on, before, or after September 1, 1991, may be modified based upon changes in the child support schedule established in chapter 26.19 RCW without a substantial change of circumstances. The petition may be filed based on changes in the child support schedule after twelve months has expired from the entry of the administrative order or the most recent modification order setting child support, whichever is later. However, if a party is granted relief under this provision, twenty-four months must pass before another petition for modification may be filed pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

(b) If, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section or (a) of this subsection, the order modifies a child support obligation by more than thirty percent and the change would cause significant hardship, the change may be implemented in two equal increments, one at the time of the entry of the order and the second six months from the entry of the order. Twenty-four months must pass following the second change before a petition for modification under subsection (4) of this section may be filed.

(6) An increase in the wage or salary of the parent or custodian who is receiving the support transfer payments is not a substantial change in circumstances for purposes of modification under subsection (1)(b) of this section. An obligor's voluntary unemployment or voluntary underemployment, by itself, is not a substantial change of circumstances.

(7) The department shall file the petition and a supporting affidavit with the secretary or the secretary's designee when the department petitions for modification.

(8) The responsible parent or the physical custodian shall follow the procedures in this chapter for filing an application for an adjudicative proceeding to petition for modification.

(9) Upon the filing of a proper petition or application, the secretary or the secretary's designee shall issue an order directing each party to appear and show cause why the order should not be modified.

(10) If the presiding or reviewing officer finds a modification is appropriate, the officer shall modify the order and set current and future support under chapter 26.19 RCW.

Sec. 10. RCW 74.20A.300 and 2009 c 476 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a support order is entered or modified under this chapter, the department shall require either or both parents to provide medical support for any dependent child, in the nature of health ((insurance)) care coverage or a monthly payment toward the premium, as provided under RCW 26.09.105.

(2) (("Health insurance coverage" as used in this section does not include medical assistance provided under chapter 74.09 RCW.

(3))) A parent ordered to provide health ((insurance)) care coverage shall provide proof of such coverage or proof that such coverage is unavailable to the department within twenty days of the entry of the order.

(((4))) (3) A parent required to provide health ((insurance)) care coverage must notify the department and the other parent when coverage terminates.

(((5))) (4) Every order requiring a parent to provide health ((insurance)) care coverage shall be entered in compliance with RCW 26.23.050 and be subject to direct enforcement as provided under chapter 26.18 RCW.

--- END ---