BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.04.050 and 1986 c 282 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Original estimates shall show in detail the estimated cost of the work; the estimated quantities of each class of work; the estimated unit cost for each class; the estimated total cost for each class; the time limit, allowed for the completion of the work and the estimated dates of commencement and completion.

(2)(a) A public owner or public agency that administers funds for public projects must collect the following data per project:

(i) If steel or concrete purchased from out of state is used, where the steel or concrete, or both, was sourced;

(ii) A detailed reason why steel or concrete, or both, was purchased from out of state; and

(iii) The cost of the steel or concrete, or both.

(b) The public owner must report the information in (a) of this subsection to the fiscal committees of the legislature by November 30th of each even-numbered year.

(c) For purposes of this subsection (2), "public project" means a project using public funds from the state capital budget or state transportation budget that is:

(i) Over five thousand square feet;

(ii) Financed through a financing contract, as defined in RCW 39.94.020; or

(iii) A road or bridge project over one million dollars.

--- END ---