BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the wasting of food represents a misuse of resources, including the water, land, energy, labor, and capital that go into growing, harvesting, processing, transporting, and retailing food for human consumption. Wasting edible food occurs all along the food production supply chain, and reducing the waste of edible food is a goal that can be achieved only with the collective efforts of growers, processors, distributors, retailers, and consumers of food. Inedible food waste can be managed in ways that reduce negative environmental impacts and provide beneficial results to the land, air, soil, and energy infrastructure. Efforts to reduce the waste of food and expand the diversion of food waste to beneficial end uses will also require the mindful support of government policies that shape the behavior and waste-reduction opportunities of each of those participants in the food supply chain.

(2) Food waste represents an oft-overlooked human tragedy in a world where millions of people go hungry on a daily basis. Worldwide, the United Nations food and agriculture organization has estimated that if one-fourth of the food lost or wasted globally could be saved, it would be enough to feed eight hundred seventy million hungry people. Recent data from the department of ecology indicate that Washington is not immune to food waste problems, and recent estimates indicate that seventeen percent of all garbage sent to Washington disposal facilities is food waste, and eight percent of all garbage is food that was determined to be edible at the time of disposal. In recognition of the widespread benefits that would accrue from reductions in food waste, in 2015, the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency and the secretary of the United States department of agriculture announced a national goal of reducing food waste by fifty percent by 2030.

(3) By establishing state food waste reduction goals and developing a state food waste reduction strategy, it is the intent of the legislature to continue its national leadership in solid waste reduction efforts by:

(a) Fighting hunger by more efficiently diverting surplus food to feed hungry individuals and families in need;

(b) Reducing the cradle-to-grave greenhouse gas emissions associated with wasted food; and

(c) Making more efficient use of the state's food waste management infrastructure by reducing the volumes of food waste that flow through those facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 70.93 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A goal is established for the state to reduce by fifty percent the amount of wasted food generated annually by 2030, relative to 2017 levels.

(2) The department may estimate 2017 levels of wasted food in Washington using any combination of solid waste reporting data obtained under this chapter and surveys and studies measuring wasted food and food waste in other jurisdictions. For purposes of measuring progress towards the goal in subsection (1) of this section, the department must adopt standardized metrics and processes for measuring or estimating volumes of wasted food and food waste generated in the state.

(3) By October 1, 2020, the department, in consultation with the department of agriculture and the department of health, must develop and adopt a state wasted food reduction and food waste diversion plan designed to achieve the goal established in subsection (1) of this section.

(a) The wasted food reduction and food waste diversion plan must include strategies, in descending order of priority, to:

(i) Reduce the wasting of edible food by residents and businesses;

(ii) Help match edible food that would otherwise be wasted with food banks and other distributors that will ensure the food reaches those who need it; and

(iii) Support productive uses of inedible food materials, including using it for animal feed, energy production, or other commercial uses, and for industrial or on-site compost production.

(b) The wasted food reduction and food waste diversion plan must include suggested best practices that local governments may incorporate into solid waste management plans developed under RCW 70.95.080.

(c) The department must solicit feedback from the public and interested stakeholders throughout the process of developing and adopting the wasted food reduction and food waste diversion plan. To assist with its food waste reduction plan development responsibilities, the department may designate a stakeholder advisory panel. If the department designates a stakeholder advisory panel, it must consist of representatives of, at minimum: Local government health departments, local government solid waste departments, food banks, hunger-focused nonprofit organizations, and food businesses or food business associations.

(d) In conjunction with the development of the wasted food reduction and food waste diversion plan, the department must consider recommending changes to state law in order to achieve the goal established in subsection (1) of this section. Any such recommendations must be explained via a report to the legislature submitted consistent with RCW 43.01.036 by December 1, 2020.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.93.030 and 2007 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Conveyance" means a boat, airplane, or vehicle.

(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.

(4) "Disposable package or container" means all packages or containers defined as such by rules adopted by the department of ecology.

(5) "Junk vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 46.55.010.

(6) "Litter" means all waste material including but not limited to disposable packages or containers thrown or deposited as herein prohibited and solid waste that is illegally dumped, but not including the wastes of the primary processes of mining, logging, sawmilling, farming, or manufacturing. "Litter" includes the material described in subsection (11) of this section as "potentially dangerous litter."

(7) "Litter bag" means a bag, sack, or other container made of any material which is large enough to serve as a receptacle for litter inside the vehicle or watercraft of any person. It is not necessarily limited to the state approved litter bag but must be similar in size and capacity.

(8) "Litter receptacle" means those containers adopted by the department of ecology and which may be standardized as to size, shape, capacity, and color and which shall bear the state anti-litter symbol, as well as any other receptacles suitable for the depositing of litter.

(9) "Official gathering" means an event where authorization to hold the event is approved, recognized, or issued by a government, public body, or authority, including but not limited to fairs, musical concerts, athletic games, festivals, tournaments, or any other formal or ceremonial event, during which beverages are sold by a vendor or vendors in single-use aluminum, glass, or plastic bottles or cans.

(10) "Person" means any political subdivision, government agency, municipality, industry, public or private corporation, copartnership, association, firm, individual, or other entity whatsoever.

(11) "Potentially dangerous litter" means litter that is likely to injure a person or cause damage to a vehicle or other property. "Potentially dangerous litter" means:

(a) Cigarettes, cigars, or other tobacco products that are capable of starting a fire;

(b) Glass;

(c) A container or other product made predominantly or entirely of glass;

(d) A hypodermic needle or other medical instrument designed to cut or pierce;

(e) Raw human waste, including soiled baby diapers, regardless of whether or not the waste is in a container of any sort; and

(f) Nails or tacks.

(12) "Public place" means any area that is used or held out for use by the public whether owned or operated by public or private interests.

(13) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing waste materials into a finished product for use other than landfill disposal or incineration.

(14) "Recycling center" means a central collection point for recyclable materials.

(15) "Sports facility" means an outdoor recreational sports facility, including but not limited to athletic fields and ballparks, at which beverages are sold by a vendor or vendors in single-use aluminum, glass, or plastic bottles or cans.

(16) "To litter" means a single or cumulative act of disposing of litter.

(17) "Vehicle" includes every device capable of being moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway, excepting devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

(18) "Waste reduction" means reducing the amount or toxicity of waste generated or reusing materials.

(19) "Watercraft" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or other floating craft.

(20) "Food waste" means landfilled, incinerated, or otherwise discarded inedible organic material that spoiled or was produced as a by-product of organic material that was intended for human consumption.

(21) "Wasted food" means landfilled, incinerated, or otherwise discarded edible food that was intended for human consumption.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.93.180 and 2015 c 15 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created an account within the state treasury to be known as the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account shall be used as follows:

(a) Fifty percent to the department of ecology, for use by the departments of ecology, natural resources, revenue, transportation, and corrections, and the parks and recreation commission, for use in litter collection programs, to be distributed under RCW 70.93.220. The amount to the department of ecology shall also be used for a central coordination function for litter control efforts statewide; for statewide public awareness programs under RCW 70.93.200(7); and to support employment of youth in litter cleanup as intended in RCW 70.93.020, and for litter pick up using other authorized agencies. The amount to the department shall also be used to defray the costs of administering the funding, coordination, and oversight of local government programs for waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, litter control, recycling, and composting, so that local governments can apply one hundred percent of their funding to achieving program goals. The amount to the department of revenue shall be used to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed in chapter 82.19 RCW;

(b)(i) Twenty percent to the department for local government funding programs for waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, litter control, recycling activities, and composting activities by cities and counties under RCW 70.93.250, to be administered by the department of ecology; (ii) any unspent funds under (b)(i) of this subsection may be used to create and pay for a matching fund competitive grant program to provide funding to qualified local governments and nonprofit organizations for local or statewide education programs designed to help the public with litter control, waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, recycling, and composting of primarily the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW. Grants must adhere to the following requirements: (A) No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars; (B) grant recipients shall match the grant funding allocated by the department by an amount equal to twenty-five percent of eligible expenses. A local government's share of these costs may be met by cash or contributed services; (C) the obligation of the department to make grant payments is contingent upon the availability of the amount of money appropriated for this subsection (1)(b); and (D) grants are managed under the guidelines for existing grant programs; and

(c) Thirty percent to the department of ecology to: (i) Implement activities under RCW 70.93.200 for waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, recycling, and composting efforts; (ii) provide technical assistance to local governments for commercial business and residential recycling and composting programs primarily for the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW designed to educate the public about waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, litter control, and recyclable and compostable products and programs; and (iii) increase access to waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, composting, and recycling programs, particularly for food packaging and plastic bags and appropriate composting techniques.

(2) All moneys directed to the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account under RCW 82.19.040 and fines and bail forfeitures collected or received pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the account and used for the programs under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Not less than five percent and no more than ten percent of the amount appropriated into the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account every biennium shall be reserved for capital needs, including the purchase of vehicles for transporting crews and for collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be distributed among state agencies and local governments according to the same criteria provided in RCW 70.93.220 for the remainder of the funds, so that the most effective waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, litter control, recycling, and composting programs receive the most funding. The intent of this subsection is to provide funds for the purchase of equipment that will enable the department to account for the greatest return on investment in terms of reaching a zero litter goal.

(4) Funds in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account, collected under chapter 82.19 RCW, must be prioritized for the products identified under RCW 82.19.020 solely for the purposes of waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, recycling, composting, and litter collection, reduction, and control programs.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.93.180 and 2015 c 15 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created an account within the state treasury to be known as the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account shall be used as follows:

(a) Fifty percent to the department of ecology, for use by the departments of ecology, natural resources, revenue, transportation, and corrections, and the parks and recreation commission, for use in litter collection programs, to be distributed under RCW 70.93.220. The amount to the department of ecology shall also be used for a central coordination function for litter control efforts statewide; for statewide public awareness programs under RCW 70.93.200(7); and to support employment of youth in litter cleanup as intended in RCW 70.93.020, and for litter pick up using other authorized agencies. The amount to the department shall also be used to defray the costs of administering the funding, coordination, and oversight of local government programs for waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, litter control, recycling, and composting so that local governments can apply one hundred percent of their funding to achieving program goals. The amount to the department of revenue shall be used to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed in chapter 82.19 RCW;

(b)(i) Twenty percent to the department for local government funding programs for waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, litter control, recycling activities, and composting activities by cities and counties under RCW 70.93.250, to be administered by the department of ecology; (ii) any unspent funds under (b)(i) of this subsection may be used to create and pay for a matching fund competitive grant program to be used by local governments and nonprofit organizations for local or statewide education programs designed to help the public with litter control, waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, recycling, and composting of primarily the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW. Grants must adhere to the following requirements: (A) No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars; (B) grant recipients shall match the grant funding allocated by the department by an amount equal to twenty-five percent of eligible expenses. A local government's share of these costs may be met by cash or contributed services; (C) the obligation of the department to make grant payments is contingent upon the availability of the amount of money appropriated for this subsection (1)(b); and (D) grants are managed under the guidelines for existing grant programs; and

(c) Thirty percent to the department of ecology to: (i) Implement activities under RCW 70.93.200 for waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, recycling, and composting efforts; (ii) provide technical assistance to local governments for commercial business and residential recycling programs primarily for the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW designed to educate citizens about waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, litter control, and recyclable and compostable products and programs; and (iii) increase access to waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, composting, and recycling programs, particularly for food packaging and plastic bags and appropriate composting techniques.

(2) All taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 and fines and bail forfeitures collected or received pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account and used for the programs under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Not less than five percent and no more than ten percent of the amount appropriated into the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account every biennium shall be reserved for capital needs, including the purchase of vehicles for transporting crews and for collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be distributed among state agencies and local governments according to the same criteria provided in RCW 70.93.220 for the remainder of the funds, so that the most effective waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, litter control, recycling, and composting programs receive the most funding. The intent of this subsection is to provide funds for the purchase of equipment that will enable the department to account for the greatest return on investment in terms of reaching a zero litter goal.

(4) Funds in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account, collected under chapter 82.19 RCW, must be prioritized for the products identified under RCW 82.19.020 solely for the purposes of recycling, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, composting, and litter collection, reduction, and control programs.

Sec. 6. RCW 70.93.200 and 2015 c 15 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the foregoing, the department of ecology shall use the moneys from RCW 70.93.180 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account to:

(1) Serve as the coordinating agency between the various industry organizations seeking to aid in the waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, anti-litter, recycling, and composting efforts;

(2) Serve as the coordinating and administrating agency for all state agencies and local governments receiving funds for waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, litter control, recycling, and composting under this chapter;

(3) Recommend to the governing bodies of all local governments that they adopt ordinances similar to the provisions of this chapter;

(4) Cooperate with all local governments to accomplish coordination of local waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, anti-litter, recycling, and composting efforts;

(5) Encourage, organize, and coordinate all voluntary local waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, anti-litter, and recycling campaigns seeking to focus the attention of the public on the programs of this state to reduce waste, to reduce wasted food and divert food waste to productive uses, control and remove litter, and foster recycling and composting;

(6) Investigate the availability of, and apply for funds available from any private or public source to be used in the program outlined in this chapter;

(7) Develop statewide programs by working with local governments, payers of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control tax, and industry organizations that are active in waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, anti-litter, recycling, and composting efforts to:

(a) Increase public awareness of and participation in recycling, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, and composting; and

(b) Stimulate and encourage local private recycling and composting centers, public participation in recycling and composting, and research and development in the field of litter control, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, and recycling, removal, and disposal of litter-related recycling materials, and composting; and

(8) Provide on the department's web site a summary of all waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, litter control, recycling, and composting efforts statewide including those of the department and other state agencies and local governments funded for such programs under this chapter.

Sec. 7. RCW 70.93.250 and 2014 c 76 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall provide funding to local units of government to establish, conduct, and evaluate community restitution and other programs for waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, litter and illegal dump cleanup, and recycling. Programs eligible for funding under this section shall include, but not be limited to, programs established pursuant to RCW 72.09.260.

(2) Funds may be offered for costs associated with community waste reduction, wasted food reduction, food waste diversion, litter cleanup and prevention, and recycling activities. The funding program must be flexible, allowing local governments to use funds broadly to meet their needs to reduce waste, reduce wasted food, divert food waste, control litter and illegal dumping, and promote recycling. Local governments are required to contribute resources or in-kind services. The department shall evaluate funding requests from local government according to the same criteria as those developed in RCW 70.93.220, provide funds according to the effectiveness and efficiency of local government litter control programs, and monitor the results of all local government programs under this section.

(3) Local governments shall report information as requested by the department in funding agreements entered into by the department and a local government.

Sec. 8. RCW 70.95.090 and 1991 c 298 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Each county and city comprehensive solid waste management plan shall include the following:

(1) A detailed inventory and description of all existing solid waste handling facilities including an inventory of any deficiencies in meeting current solid waste handling needs.

(2) The estimated long-range needs for solid waste handling facilities projected twenty years into the future.

(3) A program for the orderly development of solid waste handling facilities in a manner consistent with the plans for the entire county which shall:

(a) Meet the minimum functional standards for solid waste handling adopted by the department and all laws and regulations relating to air and water pollution, fire prevention, flood control, and protection of public health;

(b) Take into account the comprehensive land use plan of each jurisdiction;

(c) Contain a six year construction and capital acquisition program for solid waste handling facilities; and

(d) Contain a plan for financing both capital costs and operational expenditures of the proposed solid waste management system.

(4) A program for surveillance and control.

(5) A current inventory and description of solid waste collection needs and operations within each respective jurisdiction which shall include:

(a) Any franchise for solid waste collection granted by the utilities and transportation commission in the respective jurisdictions including the name of the holder of the franchise and the address of his or her place of business and the area covered by the franchise;

(b) Any city solid waste operation within the county and the boundaries of such operation;

(c) The population density of each area serviced by a city operation or by a franchised operation within the respective jurisdictions;

(d) The projected solid waste collection needs for the respective jurisdictions for the next six years.

(6) A comprehensive waste reduction and recycling element that, in accordance with the priorities established in RCW 70.95.010, provides programs that (a) reduce the amount of waste generated, (b) provide incentives and mechanisms for source separation, and (c) establish recycling opportunities for the source separated waste.

(7) The waste reduction and recycling element shall include the following:

(a) Waste reduction strategies, which may include strategies to reduce wasted food and food waste that are designed to achieve the goals established in section 2(1) of this act and that are consistent with the plan developed in section 2(3) of this act;

(b) Source separation strategies, including:

(i) Programs for the collection of source separated materials from residences in urban and rural areas. In urban areas, these programs shall include collection of source separated recyclable materials from single and multiple-family residences, unless the department approves an alternative program, according to the criteria in the planning guidelines. Such criteria shall include: Anticipated recovery rates and levels of public participation, availability of environmentally sound disposal capacity, access to markets for recyclable materials, unreasonable cost impacts on the ratepayer over the six-year planning period, utilization of environmentally sound waste reduction and recycling technologies, and other factors as appropriate. In rural areas, these programs shall include but not be limited to drop-off boxes, buy-back centers, or a combination of both, at each solid waste transfer, processing, or disposal site, or at locations convenient to the residents of the county. The drop-off boxes and buy-back centers may be owned or operated by public, nonprofit, or private persons;

(ii) Programs to monitor the collection of source separated waste at nonresidential sites where there is sufficient density to sustain a program;

(iii) Programs to collect yard waste and food waste, if the county or city submitting the plan finds that there are adequate markets or capacity for composted yard waste and food waste within or near the service area to consume the majority of the material collected; and

(iv) Programs to educate and promote the concepts of waste reduction and recycling;

(c) Recycling strategies, including a description of markets for recyclables, a review of waste generation trends, a description of waste composition, a discussion and description of existing programs and any additional programs needed to assist public and private sector recycling, and an implementation schedule for the designation of specific materials to be collected for recycling, and for the provision of recycling collection services;

(d) Other information the county or city submitting the plan determines is necessary.

(8) An assessment of the plan's impact on the costs of solid waste collection. The assessment shall be prepared in conformance with guidelines established by the utilities and transportation commission. The commission shall cooperate with the Washington state association of counties and the association of Washington cities in establishing such guidelines.

(9) A review of potential areas that meet the criteria as outlined in RCW 70.95.165.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Section 4 of this act expires June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. Section 5 of this act takes effect June 30, 2019.

--- END ---