BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it is unlawful for a person to participate as a player in any gambling conducted by an operator of a gambling activity authorized under this chapter if the person is employed by the operator of the gambling activity and has employment-related duties that require the person to hold an individual license or permit issued by the commission in accordance with RCW 9.46.070(17).

(2) This section does not apply to a person who:

(a) Is employed by a federally recognized Indian tribe or an entity owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe that conducts class III gaming in accordance with a compact entered pursuant to RCW 9.46.360 and who participates as a player in gambling conducted by the tribe or tribal entity; or

(b) Is employed by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization that conducts gambling activities in accordance with this chapter and who participates as a player in gambling conducted by the bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization.

(3) A violation of this section is punishable as a misdemeanor under RCW 9A.20.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---