BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.15.020 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 814 are each amended to read as follows:

The lieutenant governor serves as president of the senate and is responsible for making appointments to, and serving on, the committees and boards as set forth in this section.

(1) The lieutenant governor serves on the following boards and committees:

(a) Capitol furnishings preservation committee, RCW 27.48.040;

(b) Washington higher education facilities authority, RCW 28B.07.030;

(c) Productivity board, also known as the employee involvement and recognition board, RCW 41.60.015;

(d) State finance committee, RCW 43.33.010;

(e) State capitol committee, RCW 43.34.010;

(f) Washington health care facilities authority, RCW 70.37.030;

(g) State medal of merit nominating committee, RCW 1.40.020;

(h) Medal of valor committee, RCW 1.60.020; and

(i) Association of Washington generals, RCW 43.15.030.

(2) The lieutenant governor, and when serving as president of the senate, appoints members to the following boards and committees:

(a) Civil legal aid oversight committee, RCW 2.53.010;

(b) Office of public defense advisory committee, RCW 2.70.030;

(c) Washington state gambling commission, RCW 9.46.040;

(d) Sentencing guidelines commission, RCW 9.94A.860;

(e) State building code council, RCW 19.27.070;

(f) Financial education public-private partnership, RCW 28A.300.450;

(g) Joint administrative rules review committee, RCW 34.05.610;

(h) Capital projects advisory review board, RCW 39.10.220;

(i) Select committee on pension policy, RCW 41.04.276;

(j) Legislative ethics board, RCW 42.52.310;

(k) Washington citizens' commission on salaries, RCW 43.03.305;

(l) Legislative oral history committee, RCW 44.04.325;

(m) State council on aging, RCW 43.20A.685;

(n) State investment board, RCW 43.33A.020;

(o) Capitol campus design advisory committee, RCW 43.34.080;

(p) Washington state arts commission, RCW 43.46.015;

(q) PNWER-Net working subgroup under chapter 43.147 RCW;

(r) Community economic revitalization board, RCW 43.160.030;

(s) Washington economic development finance authority, RCW 43.163.020;

(t) Life sciences discovery fund authority, RCW 43.350.020;

(u) Joint legislative audit and review committee, RCW 44.28.010;

(v) Joint committee on energy supply and energy conservation, RCW 44.39.015;

(w) Legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, RCW 44.48.010;

(x) Agency council on coordinated transportation, RCW 47.06B.020;

(y) Washington horse racing commission, RCW 67.16.014;

(z) Correctional industries board of directors, RCW 72.09.080;

(aa) Joint committee on veterans' and military affairs, RCW 73.04.150;

(bb) Joint legislative committee on water supply during drought, RCW 90.86.020; and

(cc) Statute law committee, RCW 1.08.001((; and

(dd) Joint legislative oversight committee on trade policy, RCW 44.55.020)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 44.55.010 (Findings—Intent) and 2003 c 404 s 1;

(2) RCW 44.55.020 (Committee membership) and 2003 c 404 s 2;

(3) RCW 44.55.030 (Chair—Officers—Rules) and 2003 c 404 s 3;

(4) RCW 44.55.040 (Powers, duties) and 2003 c 404 s 4;

(5) RCW 44.55.050 (Staff support) and 2003 c 404 s 5; and

(6) RCW 44.55.060 (Compensation) and 2003 c 404 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---