BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that:

(a) The community health worker task force was convened by the healthier Washington initiative in 2015 to develop policy and system change recommendations related to the community health worker workforce. The task force considered the continuum of community health workers, from volunteers, to generalists who support the health and well-being of individuals and communities, to those who work in specialized roles.

(b) The task force issued a report with recommendations related to: The definition, roles, skills, and qualities of community health workers; community health worker training and education; and finance related matters.

(c) The nine accountable communities of health across the state as part of the medicaid transformation demonstration are all pursuing projects that incorporate community health workers, in addition to many other programs utilizing community health workers across the state.

(2) Therefore the legislature intends to create consistency across the state by defining community health workers and their roles as recommended by the task force's report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A "community health worker" means a frontline public health worker who is a trusted member of or who has a uniquely close understanding of the community served. This trusting relationship enables the worker to serve as a liaison, link, or intermediary between health and social services and the community to facilitate access to services and improve the quality and cultural competence of service delivery.

(2) A "frontline public health worker" means someone who works to improve community health or the health of populations.

--- END ---