BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.80.020 and 2013 c 11 s 79 are each amended to read as follows:

The state committee of each major political party consists of ((one committeeman and one committeewoman)) two committee persons, each of different declared gender identity, from each county elected by the county central committee at its organization meeting. It must have a chair and vice chair ((of opposite sexes)) who are persons of different declared gender identity. This committee shall meet during January of each odd-numbered year for the purpose of organization at a time and place designated by a notice mailed at least one week before the date of the meeting to all new state ((committeemen and committeewomen)) committee persons, as herein described, by the authorized officers of the retiring committee. At its organizational meeting it shall elect its chair and vice chair, and such officers as its bylaws may provide, and adopt bylaws, rules, and regulations. It may:

(1) Call conventions at such time and place and under such circumstances and for such purposes as the call to convention designates. The manner, number, and procedure for selection of state convention delegates is subject to the committee's rules and regulations duly adopted;

(2) Provide for the election of delegates to national conventions;

(3) Provide for the nomination of presidential electors; and

(4) Perform all functions inherent in such an organization.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the committee may not adopt rules governing the conduct of the actual proceedings at a party state convention.

Sec. 2. RCW 29A.80.030 and 2003 c 111 s 2003 are each amended to read as follows:

The county central committee of each major political party consists of the precinct committee officers of the party from the several voting precincts of the county. Following each state general election held in even-numbered years, this committee shall meet for the purpose of organization at an easily accessible location within the county, subsequent to the certification of precinct committee officers by the county auditor and no later than the second Saturday of the following January. The authorized officers of the retiring committee shall cause notice of the time and place of the meeting to be mailed to each precinct committee officer at least seventy-two hours before the date of the meeting.

At its organization meeting, the county central committee shall elect a chair and vice chair ((of opposite sexes)) who are persons of different declared gender identity.

--- END ---