BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.517 and 2015 c 291 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)

TABLE 3

DRUG OFFENSE SENTENCING GRID

Seriousness

Level

Offender Score

0 to 2

Offender Score

3 to 5

Offender Score

6 to 9 or more

III

51 to 68 months

68+ to 100 months

100+ to 120 months

II

12+ to 20 months

20+ to 60 months

60+ to 120 months

I

0 to 6 months

6+ to ((18)) 12 months

12+ to 24 months

References to months represent the standard sentence ranges. 12+ equals one year and one day.

(2) The court may utilize any other sanctions or alternatives as authorized by law, including but not limited to the special drug offender sentencing alternative under RCW 9.94A.660 or drug court under chapter 2.30 RCW.

(3) Nothing in this section creates an entitlement for a criminal defendant to any specific sanction, alternative, sentence option, or substance abuse treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---