BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislative authority of a city, town, or county may enact an ordinance prohibiting the siting and operation within its jurisdictional boundaries of a marijuana producer, processor, or retailer licensed under this chapter. Except as otherwise provided under subsection (2) of this section, a state licensed marijuana producer, processor, or retailer may not operate within the jurisdictional boundaries of a city, county, or town that has enacted an ordinance under this section.

(2) A state licensed marijuana producer, processor, or retailer that has lawfully begun operating before the passage of an ordinance adopted under subsection (1) of this section may continue operating within the jurisdiction until such time as its state license expires and license renewal is required. Upon expiration of the state license issued under this chapter, a marijuana producer, processor, or retailer subject to an ordinance adopted under subsection (1) of this section must cease operating within the territorial boundaries of the jurisdiction enacting the ordinance.

(3) Following the passage of a local government ordinance enacted in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, the state liquor and cannabis board may not issue or renew any license under RCW 69.50.325 for the production, processing, or retail sale of marijuana with respect to businesses that are either located or proposed to be located within an area subject to the ordinance.

--- END ---