BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that:

(a) Water is a finite resource whose importance is heightened during the periodic drought conditions that the state experiences;

(b) The maintenance of lawns of green grass during the summer months for aesthetic purposes can be responsible for a noteworthy portion of summer water use by households; and

(c)(i) In the event of a drought, state law already grants extraordinary powers to the department of ecology to manage water resources and provides for other policy responses to encourage efficient use of the state's limited water supplies;

(ii) However, in certain instances, property association rules are at odds with the public goal of making efficient use of water supplies: These association rules can prohibit private property owners from deciding to use low-water plants or landscaping practices in place of grass lawns. Similar laws also sometimes prohibit private property owners from allowing their grass to go dormant and brown during droughts.

(2) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to empower private property owners and remove an obstacle to water use efficiency by prohibiting unreasonable homeowner association and condominium association restrictions that limit private property owners' ability to deploy low-water landscaping techniques. It is also the intent of the legislature to ensure that state-funded buildings achieve the highest landscaping water efficient benchmarks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The governing documents may not prohibit the installation of drought resistant landscaping or wildfire ignition resistant landscaping. However, the governing documents may include reasonable rules regarding the placement and aesthetic appearance of drought resistant landscaping or wildfire ignition resistant landscaping, as long as the rules do not render the use of drought resistant landscaping or wildfire ignition resistant landscaping arbitrarily costly or otherwise effectively infeasible.

(2) If a property is located within the geographic designation of an order of a drought condition issued by the department of ecology under RCW 43.83B.405, an association may not sanction or impose a fine or assessment against an owner, or resident on the owner's property, for reducing or eliminating the watering of vegetation or lawns for the duration of the drought condition order.

(3) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit or restrict the establishment and maintenance of a fire buffer within the building ignition zone.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Building ignition zone" means a building and surrounding area up to two hundred feet from the foundation.

(b) "Drought resistant landscaping" means the use of any noninvasive vegetation adapted to arid or dry conditions, or stone or gravel.

(c) "Firewise" means the firewise communities program developed by the national fire protection association, which encourages local solutions for wildfire safety by involving homeowners, community leaders, planners, developers, firefighters, and others in the effort to protect people and property from wildfire risks.

(d) "Wildfire ignition resistant landscaping" includes:

(i) Any landscaping tools or techniques, or noninvasive vegetation, that do not readily ignite from a flame or other ignition source; or

(ii) The use of firewise methods to reduce ignition risk in a building ignition zone.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 64.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The declaration of a condominium and any bylaws, rules, and regulations adopted by the association may not prohibit the installation of drought resistant landscaping or wildfire ignition resistant landscaping. However, the declaration or bylaws, rules, and regulations may include reasonable rules regarding the placement and aesthetic appearance of drought resistant landscaping or wildfire ignition resistant landscaping, as long as the rules do not render the use of drought resistant landscaping or wildfire ignition resistant landscaping arbitrarily costly or otherwise effectively infeasible.

(2) If a property is located within the geographic designation of an order of a drought condition issued by the department of ecology under RCW 43.83B.405, an association may not impose a fine or assessment against an owner, or resident on the owner's property, for reducing or eliminating the watering of vegetation or lawns for the duration of the drought condition order.

(3) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit or restrict the establishment and maintenance of a fire buffer within the building ignition zone.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Building ignition zone" means a building and surrounding area up to two hundred feet from the foundation.

(b) "Drought resistant landscaping" means the use of any noninvasive vegetation adapted to arid or dry conditions, or stone or gravel.

(c) "Firewise" means the firewise communities program developed by the national fire protection association, which encourages local solutions for wildfire safety by involving homeowners, community leaders, planners, developers, firefighters, and others in the effort to protect people and property from wildfire risks.

(d) "Wildfire ignition resistant landscaping" includes:

(i) Any landscaping tools or techniques, or noninvasive vegetation, that do not readily ignite from a flame or other ignition source; or

(ii) The use of firewise methods to reduce ignition risk in a building ignition zone.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 39.35D RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all major facility projects subject to the requirements of RCW 39.35D.030 or 39.35D.040 must, to the extent practicable and economically feasible, be designed and constructed to receive all possible credits made available for water efficient landscaping under the United States green building council rating system, international green construction code, other nationally recognized consensus standard, or the Washington sustainable school design protocol as each standard existed on the effective date of this section.

(2) This section does not apply to athletic fields or other project elements that are eligible for exclusion from water efficient landscaping standards under either the United States green building council rating system, other nationally recognized consensus standards, or the Washington sustainable school design protocol as each standard existed on the effective date of this section.

(3)(a) Nothing in this section may prohibit or restrict the use of wildfire ignition resistant landscaping, including the establishment and maintenance of a fire buffer in the building ignition zone, in the design and construction of major facility projects subject to the requirements of RCW 39.35D.030 or 39.35D.040.

(b) The definitions in this subsection (3)(b) apply throughout this subsection unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(i) "Building ignition zone" means a building and surrounding area up to two hundred feet from the foundation.

(ii) "Firewise" means the firewise communities program developed by the national fire protection association, which encourages local solutions for wildfire safety by involving homeowners, community leaders, planners, developers, firefighters, and others in the effort to protect people and property from wildfire risks.

(iii) "Wildfire ignition resistant landscaping" includes:

(A) Any landscaping tools or techniques, or noninvasive vegetation, that do not readily ignite from a flame or other ignition source; or

(B) The use of firewise methods to reduce ignition risk in a building ignition zone.

--- END ---