BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.71.205 and 2015 c 93 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary of the department of health shall prescribe:

(a) Practice parameters, training standards for, and levels of, physician's trained advanced emergency medical technicians and paramedics;

(b) Minimum standards and performance requirements for the certification and recertification of physician's trained advanced emergency medical technicians and paramedics; and

(c) Procedures for certification, recertification, and decertification of physician's trained advanced emergency medical technicians and paramedics.

(2) Initial certification shall be for a period established by the secretary pursuant to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(3) Recertification shall be granted upon proof of continuing satisfactory performance and education, and shall be for a period established by the secretary pursuant to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(4) As used in this chapter and chapter 18.73 RCW, "approved medical program director" means a person who:

(a) Is licensed to practice medicine and surgery pursuant to this chapter or osteopathic medicine and surgery pursuant to chapter 18.57 RCW; and

(b) Is qualified and knowledgeable in the administration and management of emergency care and services; and

(c) Is so certified by the department of health for a county, group of counties, or cities with populations over four hundred thousand in coordination with the recommendations of the local medical community and local emergency medical services and trauma care council.

(5) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs uncertified practice, the issuance and denial of certificates, and the disciplining of certificate holders under this section. The secretary shall be the disciplining authority under this section. Disciplinary action shall be initiated against a person credentialed under this chapter in a manner consistent with the responsibilities and duties of the medical program director under whom such person is responsible.

(6) Such activities of physician's trained advanced emergency medical technicians and paramedics shall be limited to actions taken under the express written or oral order of medical program directors and shall not be construed at any time to include freestanding or nondirected actions, for actions not presenting an emergency or life-threatening condition, except nonemergency activities performed pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.

(7) Nothing in this section prohibits a physician's trained advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic, acting under the responsible supervision and direction of an approved medical program director, from participating in a community assistance referral and education services program established under RCW 35.21.930 if such participation does not exceed the participant's training and certification.

(8) When establishing standards for the reciprocal certification of physician's trained advanced emergency medical technicians and paramedics who are licensed in another state or accredited by a national accrediting organization approved by the department of health, the secretary may not adopt standards that require applicants who are military spouses or state registered domestic partners of military persons to, as a prior condition of certification:

(a) Receive the recommendation of an approved medical program director; and

(b) Obtain active membership with an emergency medical services agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:

The department of health shall grant a limited certification to a physician's trained advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic who is a military spouse or state registered domestic partner of a military person and is licensed in another state or is accredited by an accrediting organization approved by the department of health which has a more limited scope of authorized services than Washington. The applicant must meet all other requirements for reciprocal certification in Washington. The limited license shall state the restricted services that the physician's trained advanced emergency medical technician and paramedic is prohibited from performing in Washington. The limited license may be renewed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 18.73 RCW to read as follows:

When establishing standards for the reciprocal certification of emergency medical technicians and first responders who are licensed in another state or accredited by a national accrediting organization approved by the department, the secretary may not adopt standards that require applicants who are military spouses or state registered domestic partners of military persons to, as a prior condition of certification:

(1) Receive the recommendation of an approved medical program director; and

(2) Obtain active membership with an emergency medical services agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 18.73 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall grant a limited certification to an emergency medical technician or first responder who is a military spouse or state registered domestic partner of a military person and is licensed in another state or is accredited by an accrediting organization approved by the department which has a more limited scope of authorized services than Washington. The applicant must meet all other requirements for reciprocal certification in Washington. The limited license shall state the restricted services that the emergency medical technician or first responder is prohibited from performing in Washington. The limited license may be renewed.

--- END ---