BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.09.860 and 2015 c 283 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall issue a request for proposals to provide integrated managed health and behavioral health care for foster children receiving care through the medical assistance program. Behavioral health services provided under chapters 71.24((,)) and 71.34((, and 70.96A)) RCW must be integrated into the managed health care plan for foster children beginning ((October 1, 2018)) January 1, 2019. The request for proposals must address the program elements described in section 110, chapter 225, Laws of 2014, including development of a service delivery system, benefit design, reimbursement mechanisms, incorporation or coordination of services currently provided by the regional support networks, and standards for contracting with health plans. The request for proposals must be issued and completed in time for services under the integrated managed care plan to begin on October 1, 2016.

(2) The parent or guardian of a child who is no longer a dependent child pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW may choose to continue in the transitional foster care eligibility category for up to twelve months following reunification with the child's parents or guardian if the child:

(a) Is under eighteen years of age;

(b) Was in foster care under the legal responsibility of the department of social and health services, the department of children, youth, and families, or a federally recognized Indian tribe located within the state; and

(c) Meets income and other eligibility standards for medical assistance coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---