BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.56.250 and 2001 c 299 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

If any county treasurer willfully refuses ((or neglects)) to collect any taxes assessed upon personal property, where the same is collectible, or to file the delinquent list and affidavit, as ((herein)) provided in RCW 84.56.300, the treasurer shall be held, in his or her next settlement with the county legislative authority, liable for the whole amount of such taxes uncollected, and the same shall be deducted from his or her salary and applied to the several funds for which they were levied.

--- END ---