BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.64.080 and 2015 c 95 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court must examine each application for judgment foreclosing a tax lien, and if a defense (specifying in writing the particular cause of objection) is offered by any person interested in any of the lands or lots to the entry of judgment, the court must hear and determine the matter in a summary manner, without other pleadings, and pronounce judgment. However, the court may, in its discretion, continue a case in which a defense is offered, to secure substantial justice to the contestants.

(2) In all judicial proceedings for the collection of taxes, and interest and costs thereon, all amendments which by law can be made in any personal action in the court must be allowed. No assessments of property or charge for any of the taxes is illegal on account of any irregularity in the tax list or assessment rolls, or on account of the assessment rolls or tax list not having been made, completed, or returned within the time required by law, or on account of the property having been charged or listed in the assessment or tax lists without name, or in any other name than that of the owner, and no error or informality in the proceedings of any of the officers connected with the assessment, levying or collection of the taxes, vitiates or in any manner affects the tax or the assessment of the tax. Any irregularities or informality in the assessment rolls or tax lists or in any of the proceedings connected with the assessment or levy of the taxes, or any omission or defective act of any officer connected with the assessment or levying of the taxes, may be, in the discretion of the court, corrected, supplied, and made to conform to the law by the court.

(3) The court must give judgment for the taxes, interest, and costs that appear to be due upon the several lots or tracts described in the notice of application for judgment. The judgment must be a several judgment against each tract or lot or part of a tract or lot for each kind of tax included therein, including all interest and costs. The court must order and direct the clerk to make and enter an order for the sale of the real property against which judgment is made, or vacate and set aside the certificate of delinquency, or make such other order or judgment as in law or equity may be just. The order must be signed by the judge of the superior court and delivered to the county treasurer. The order is full and sufficient authority for the treasurer to proceed to sell the property for the sum set forth in the order and to take further steps provided by law.

(4) The county treasurer must immediately after receiving the order and judgment proceed to sell the property as provided in this chapter to the highest and best bidder. The acceptable minimum bid must be the total amount of taxes, interest, and costs. The property must be sold "as is." There is no guarantee or warranty of any kind, express or implied, relative to: Title, eligibility to build upon or subdivide the property; zoning classification; size; location; fitness for any use or purpose; or any other feature or condition of a foreclosed property sold pursuant to this chapter or sold pursuant to chapter 36.35 RCW as a tax title property.

(5) All sales must be made at a location in the county on a date and time (except Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays) as the county treasurer may direct, and continue from day to day (Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays excepted) during the same hours until all lots or tracts are sold. The county treasurer must first give notice of the time and place where the sale is to take place for ten days successively by posting notice thereof in three public places in the county, one of which must be in the office of the treasurer.

(6) Unless a sale is conducted pursuant to RCW 84.64.225, notice of a sale must be substantially in the following form:

TAX JUDGMENT SALE

Public notice is hereby given that pursuant to real property tax judgment of the superior court of the county of . . . . . . in the state of Washington, and an order of sale duly issued by the court, entered the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., in proceedings for foreclosure of tax liens upon real property, as per provisions of law, I shall on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., at . . . . o'clock a.m., at . . . . . . in the city of . . . . . ., and county of . . . . . ., state of Washington, sell the real property to the highest and best bidder for cash, to satisfy the full amount of taxes, interest and costs adjudged to be due.

In witness whereof, I have hereunto affixed my hand and seal this . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . . .

Treasurer of . . . . county.

(7) As an alternative to the sale procedure specified in subsections (5) and (6) of this section, the county treasurer may conduct a public auction sale by electronic media pursuant to RCW 84.64.225.

(8) No county officer or employee may directly or indirectly be a purchaser of the property at the sale.

(9) If any buildings or improvements are upon an area encompassing more than one tract or lot, the same must be advertised and sold as a single unit.

(10) If the highest amount bid for any separate unit tract or lot exceeds the minimum bid due upon the whole property included in the certificate of delinquency, the excess must be refunded, following payment of all recorded water-sewer district liens, on application therefor, to the record owner of the property. The record owner of the property is the person who held title on the date of issuance of the certificate of delinquency. Assignments of interests, deeds, or other documents executed or recorded after filing the certificate of delinquency do not affect the payment of excess funds to the record owner. In the event that no claim for the excess is received by the county treasurer within three years after the date of the sale, the treasurer must at expiration of the three year period deposit the excess in the current expense fund of the county, which extinguishes all claims by any owner to the excess funds.

(11) The county treasurer must execute to the purchaser of any piece or parcel of land a tax deed. The tax deed so made by the county treasurer, under the official seal of the treasurer's office, must be recorded in the same manner as other conveyances of real property, and vests in the grantee, his or her heirs and assigns the title to the property therein described, without further acknowledgment or evidence of the conveyance.

(12) Tax deeds must be substantially in the following form:

State of Washington

County of . . . .











ss.

This indenture, made this . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . . . ., between . . . . . ., as treasurer of . . . . . . county, state of Washington, party of the first part, and . . . . . ., party of the second part:

Witnesseth, that, whereas, at a public sale of real property held on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., pursuant to a real property tax judgment entered in the superior court in the county of . . . . . . on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., in proceedings to foreclose tax liens upon real property and an order of sale duly issued by the court, . . . . . . duly purchased in compliance with the laws of the state of Washington, the following described real property, to wit: (Here place description of real property conveyed) and that the . . . . . . has complied with the laws of the state of Washington necessary to entitle (him, or her or them) to a deed for the real property.

Now, therefore, know ye, that, I . . . . . ., county treasurer of the county of . . . . . ., state of Washington, in consideration of the premises and by virtue of the statutes of the state of Washington, in such cases provided, do hereby grant and convey unto . . . . . ., his or her heirs and assigns, forever, the real property hereinbefore described.

Given under my hand and seal of office this . . . . day of . . . . . ., A.D. . . . .

. . . .

County Treasurer.

--- END ---