BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The commissioner of public lands must direct the wildland fire advisory committee established in RCW 76.04.179 to review, analyze, and make recommendations on the following issues related to wild fire prevention, response, and suppression activities within our state:

(a) The committee, with the assistance of department of natural resources' personnel, must approximately quantify the areas in the state that are not contained within an established fire district nor subject to a planned fire response and make recommendations as to how these areas could be protected as well as a source of funding for any recommended activities.

(b) The committee must examine the value of community programs that educate homeowners and engage in preventive projects within wild fire risk communities, such as firewise, and make recommendations on whether these programs should be advanced, and if so, how, including potential sources of ongoing funding for the programs.

(2) The department of natural resources must provide to the appropriate committees of the legislature a status report of the committee's efforts by December 31, 2018, and issue a report with the committee's recommendations by November 15, 2019.

(3) This section expires December 31, 2019.

--- END ---