BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A retailer licensed under this title to conduct retail sales of spirits for off-premises consumption must display to the public the total sale price, inclusive of all state and federal taxes and fees except state and local sales taxes, for each container or package of spirits offered to the consumer for consumption off the licensed premises, in accordance with the requirements of this section.

(2) The total sale price notification required under subsection (1) of this section must be displayed in the location most likely to be seen and understood by the consumer, as follows:

(a) Immediately adjacent to the spirits product being offered for sale and must be done in a manner that provides the consumer with clear notice of the total sale price; or

(b) In the event it is impracticable for the retailer to display the total sale price on shelving or other display area in accordance with the requirements of (a) of this subsection, the retailer must affix a label or tag on each container or package of spirits clearly stating the total sale price.

(3) Any advertisement of spirits by a retailer licensed under this title to conduct retail sales of spirits for off-premises consumption must include the total sale price, inclusive of all state and federal taxes and fees except state and local sales taxes, of the spirits product advertised.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "total sale price" means the actual dollar amount that the consumer must pay to the retailer at the time of completion of the retail sales transaction, including all state and federal taxes and fees except state and local sales taxes.

(5) The board may adopt rules necessary to implement and enforce this section.

--- END ---