BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is a wine and beer retailer's license to be designated as an art activity license, issued by the state liquor and cannabis board to an applicant meeting the requirements of this section. An art activity license authorizes the holder to provide the following products for on-premises consumption by participants in an art activity:

(a) Wine by the glass; and

(b) Beer by the glass, bottle, or can.

(2) A customer may consume no more than one six ounce glass of wine or one twelve ounce glass of beer per day on the licensed premises.

(3) An applicant for an art activity license must meet all of the following requirements:

(a) The applicant must be a business the primary purpose of which is providing instruction to its customers who participate in an art activity such as painting, pottery, or sculpting.

(b) The licensee may not conduct retail sales of beer or wine to customers on the licensed premises.

(c) Wine and beer must be consumed in a designated seating area, which may include an area where an instructor leads group activities.

(4) The fee for a license issued under this section is one hundred twenty-five dollars per year.

--- END ---