BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.170 and 2017 c 238 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is a license for domestic wineries; fee to be computed only on the liters manufactured: Less than two hundred fifty thousand liters per year, one hundred dollars per year; and two hundred fifty thousand liters or more per year, four hundred dollars per year.

(2) The license allows for the manufacture of wine in Washington state from grapes or other agricultural products.

(3) Any domestic winery licensed under this section may also act as a retailer of wine of its own production. Any domestic winery licensed under this section may act as a distributor of its own production. Notwithstanding any language in this title to the contrary, a domestic winery may use a common carrier to deliver up to one hundred cases of its own production, in the aggregate, per month to licensed Washington retailers. A domestic winery may not arrange for any such common carrier shipments to licensed retailers of wine not of its own production. Except as provided in this section, any winery operating as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection must comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers, except that a winery operating as a distributor may maintain a warehouse off the premises of the winery for the distribution of wine of its own production provided that: (a) The warehouse has been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; and (b) the number of warehouses off the premises of the winery does not exceed one. Any person selling or serving wine at a domestic winery for on-premises consumption must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server permit.

(4) A domestic winery licensed under this section, at locations separate from any of its production or manufacturing sites, may serve samples of its own products, with or without charge, may sell wine of its own production at retail, and may sell for off-premises consumption wines of its own production in kegs or sanitary containers meeting the applicable requirements of federal law brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap at the time of sale, provided that: (a) Each additional location has been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; (b) the total number of additional locations does not exceed four; (c) a winery may not act as a distributor at any such additional location; and (d) any person selling or serving wine at an additional location for on-premises consumption must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server permit. Each additional location is deemed to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. At additional locations operated by multiple wineries under this section, if the board cannot connect a violation of RCW 66.44.200 or 66.44.270 to a single licensee, the board may hold all licensees operating the additional location jointly liable. Nothing in this subsection may be construed to prevent a domestic winery from holding multiple domestic winery licenses.

(5)(a) A domestic winery licensed under this section may apply to the board for an endorsement to sell wine of its own production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars. An endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection does not count toward the four additional retail locations limit specified in this section.

(b) For each month during which a domestic winery will sell wine at a qualifying farmers market, the winery must provide the board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled wine may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board before the winery may offer wine for sale at a qualifying farmers market.

(c) The wine sold at qualifying farmers markets must be made entirely from grapes grown in a recognized Washington appellation or from other agricultural products grown in this state.

(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection include tasting or sampling privileges subject to the conditions pursuant to RCW 66.24.175. The winery may not store wine at a farmers market beyond the hours that the winery offers bottled wine for sale. The winery may not act as a distributor from a farmers market location.

(e) Before a winery may sell bottled wine at a qualifying farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization for any winery with an endorsement approved under this subsection to sell bottled wine at retail at the farmers market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved winery may sell bottled wine; and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify the locations at which bottled wine may be sold. Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved winery to sell bottled wine at retail at its farmers market location, the board must notify the persons or entities of such application for authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under this subsection (5)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.

(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be necessary to implement this section.

(g) For the purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following minimum requirements:

(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers selling their own agricultural products;

(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are processors or resellers. However, if a farmers market does not satisfy this subsection (5)(g)(i)(B), a farmers market is still considered a "qualifying farmers market" if the total combined gross annual sales of farmers and processors at the farmers market is one million dollars or more;

(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;

(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor is prohibited; and

(E) No vendor is a franchisee.

(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.

(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.

(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the consumer.

(6) Wine produced in Washington state by a domestic winery licensee may be shipped out-of-state for the purpose of making it into sparkling wine and then returned to such licensee for resale. Such wine is deemed wine manufactured in the state of Washington for the purposes of RCW 66.24.206, and ((shall)) may not require a special license.

(7) During an event held by a nonprofit holding a special occasion license issued under RCW 66.24.380, a domestic winery licensed under this section may take orders, either in writing or electronically, and accept payment for wines of its own production under the following conditions:

(a) Wine produced by the domestic winery may be served for on-premises consumption by the special occasion licensee;

(b) The domestic winery delivers wine to the consumer on a date after the conclusion of the special occasion event;

(c) The domestic winery delivers wine to the consumer at a location different from the location at which the special occasion event is held;

(d) The domestic winery complies with all requirements in chapter 66.20 RCW for direct sale of wine to consumers;

(e) The wine is not sold for resale; and

(f) The domestic winery is entitled to all proceeds from the sale and delivery of its wine to a consumer after the conclusion of the special occasion event, but may enter into an agreement to share a portion of the proceeds of these sales with the special occasion licensee licensed under RCW 66.24.380.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.24.240 and 2011 c 195 s 6 and 2011 c 119 s 212 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a license for domestic breweries; fee to be two thousand dollars for production of sixty thousand barrels or more of malt liquor per year.

(2) Any domestic brewery, except for a brand owner of malt beverages under RCW 66.04.010(7), licensed under this section may also act as a distributor and/or retailer for beer of its own production. Any domestic brewery operating as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers. Any person selling or serving beer at a domestic brewery for on-premises consumption must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server permit. A domestic brewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license may sell beer of its own production for off-premises consumption from its restaurant premises in kegs or in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the licensee at the time of sale.

(3) Any domestic brewery licensed under this section may also sell beer produced by another domestic brewery or a microbrewery for on and off-premises consumption from its premises as long as the other breweries' brands do not exceed twenty-five percent of the domestic brewery's on-tap offering of its own brands.

(4) A domestic brewery may hold up to two retail licenses to operate an on or ((off-premise [off-premises])) off-premises tavern, beer and/or wine restaurant, or spirits, beer, and wine restaurant. This retail license is separate from the brewery license. A brewery that holds a tavern license, a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, or a beer and/or wine restaurant license shall hold the same privileges and endorsements as permitted under RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, and 66.24.420.

(5) Any domestic brewery licensed under this section may contract-produce beer for a brand owner of malt beverages defined under RCW 66.04.010(7), and this contract-production is not a sale for the purposes of RCW 66.28.170 and 66.28.180.

(6)(a) A domestic brewery licensed under this section and qualified for a reduced rate of taxation pursuant to RCW 66.24.290(3)(b) may apply to the board for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars.

(b) For each month during which a domestic brewery will sell beer at a qualifying farmers market, the domestic brewery must provide the board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board before the domestic brewery may offer beer for sale at a qualifying farmers market.

(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in Washington.

(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed to be part of the domestic brewery license for the purpose of this title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection do not include the tasting or sampling privilege of a domestic brewery. The domestic brewery may not store beer at a farmers market beyond the hours that the domestic brewery offers bottled beer for sale. The domestic brewery may not act as a distributor from a farmers market location.

(e) Before a domestic brewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization for any domestic brewery with an endorsement approved under this subsection to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved domestic brewery may sell bottled beer; and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify the locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved domestic brewery to sell bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board shall notify the persons or entities of such application for authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under this subsection (6)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.

(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be necessary to implement this section.

(g) For the purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following minimum requirements:

(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers selling their own agricultural products;

(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are processors or resellers;

(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;

(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor is prohibited; and

(E) No vendor is a franchisee.

(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.

(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.

(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the consumer.

Sec. 3. RCW 66.24.244 and 2015 c 42 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a license for microbreweries; fee to be one hundred dollars for production of less than sixty thousand barrels of malt liquor, including strong beer, per year.

(2)(a) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also act as a distributor and/or retailer for beer and strong beer of its own production.

(b) Any microbrewery operating as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection must comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers, except that a microbrewery operating as a distributor may maintain a warehouse off the premises of the microbrewery for the distribution of beer provided that:

(i) The warehouse has been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; and

(ii) The number of warehouses off the premises of the microbrewery does not exceed one.

(c) Any person selling or serving beer or cider at a microbrewery for on-premises consumption must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server permit.

(d) A microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license may sell beer of its own production for off-premises consumption from its restaurant premises in kegs or in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the licensee at the time of sale.

(3) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also sell from its premises for on-premises and off-premises consumption:

(a) Beer produced by another microbrewery or a domestic brewery as long as the other breweries' brands do not exceed twenty-five percent of the microbrewery's on-tap offerings; or

(b) Cider produced by a domestic winery.

(4) The board may issue up to two retail licenses allowing a microbrewery to operate an on or off-premises tavern, beer and/or wine restaurant, or spirits, beer, and wine restaurant.

(5) A microbrewery that holds a tavern license, spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, or a beer and/or wine restaurant license holds the same privileges and endorsements as permitted under RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, and 66.24.420.

(6)(a) A microbrewery licensed under this section may apply to the board for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars. However, strong beer may not be sold at a farmers market or under any endorsement which may authorize microbreweries to sell beer at farmers markets.

(b) For each month during which a microbrewery will sell beer at a qualifying farmers market, the microbrewery must provide the board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board before the microbrewery may offer beer for sale at a qualifying farmers market.

(c) Any person selling or serving beer must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server permit.

(d) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in Washington.

(e) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed to be part of the microbrewery license for the purpose of this title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection (6) include tasting or sampling privileges subject to the conditions pursuant to RCW 66.24.175. The microbrewery may not store beer at a farmers market beyond the hours that the microbrewery offers bottled beer for sale. The microbrewery may not act as a distributor from a farmers market location.

(f) Before a microbrewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization for any microbrewery with an endorsement approved under this subsection (6) to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers market. This application must include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved microbrewery may sell bottled beer; and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify the locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved microbrewery to sell bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board must notify the persons or entities of the application for authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under this subsection (6)(f) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.

(g) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and approval process under this section and any additional rules necessary to implement this section.

(h) For the purposes of this subsection (6):

(i) "Qualifying farmers market" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 66.24.170.

(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.

(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.

(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the consumer.

(7) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may contract-produce beer for another microbrewer. This contract-production is not a sale for the purposes of RCW 66.28.170 and 66.28.180.

--- END ---