BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The state liquor and cannabis board must conduct a study of regulatory options and issues related to the creation of a system for the home delivery of medical marijuana products to qualifying medical marijuana patients by licensed medical marijuana retailers. The goal of the study is to examine the legal and regulatory issues related to the creation of a medical marijuana home delivery system and to provide the legislature with recommendations for the establishment of a regulatory scheme that provides for the safe home delivery of marijuana products for medical use, while at the same time ensuring the effective monitoring of the delivery process in order to minimize the likelihood of illicit activity.

(2) In conducting the study, the state liquor and cannabis board must consult with the state department of health, industry representatives, local government officials, law enforcement officials, and any other person or entity deemed necessary to properly complete the study.

(3) The issues that must be considered by the state liquor and cannabis board during the course of the study include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Eligibility requirements for marijuana retailers applying for a medical marijuana delivery endorsement;

(b) Verification procedures regarding age, identity, and registration in the medical marijuana authorization database with respect to the medical marijuana patient receiving delivery;

(c) Qualifications for, and the training of, persons delivering medical marijuana products on behalf of the medical marijuana retailer;

(d) Methods of ordering and payment;

(e) Maintaining the integrity of the marijuana traceability system during the course of the delivery process;

(f) Safe and secure transportation of marijuana products from the retailer to the purchaser, including delivery vehicle requirements;

(g) Methods of ensuring that a retailer's delivery employees and delivery system are in compliance with regulatory requirements;

(h) Medical marijuana deliveries by retailers operating out of Indian country; and

(i) Civil penalties and administrative actions for regulatory violations by a retailer holding a medical marijuana delivery endorsement.

(4) By December 1, 2018, the state liquor and cannabis board must provide the appropriate committees of the legislature with findings and recommendations regarding the implementation of a medical marijuana home delivery system.

(5) The study, findings, and recommendations required under this section must be done through the use of the existing resources of the state liquor and cannabis board.

(6) This section expires January 1, 2019.

--- END ---