BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By July 1, 2019, any hospital that does not provide sexual assault evidence kit collection, or may not have appropriate providers available to provide sexual assault evidence kit collection at all times, shall develop a plan, in consultation with the local community sexual assault agency, to assist individuals with obtaining sexual assault evidence kit collection at a facility that provides such collection.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2019:

(a) If a hospital does not perform sexual assault evidence kit collection or does not have appropriate providers available, the hospital shall, within two hours of a request, provide notice to every individual who presents in the emergency department of the hospital and requests a sexual assault evidence kit collection that the hospital does not perform such collection or does not have appropriate providers available; and

(b) Pursuant to the plan required in subsection (1) of this section, if the hospital does not perform sexual assault evidence kit collection or does not have appropriate providers available, hospital staff must coordinate care with the local community sexual assault agency and assist the patient in finding a facility with an appropriate provider available.

(3) Failure of a hospital to comply with this section is punishable by a civil penalty of two thousand dollars.

--- END ---