BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By July 1, 2019, the commission shall adopt rules regarding:

(a) The schedule II and III oral narcotics that manufacturers must offer for sale in graded dosage packs under section 2 of this act;

(b) The strength and dosage regimen for each narcotic to be offered for sale in a dosage pack under (a) of this subsection, with appropriate strengths and dosages to last three days, five days, and seven days based upon the most commonly prescribed dosages and relevant prescribing guidelines; and

(c) The design of dose packaging that is consumer-friendly and child-resistant.

(2) When adopting the rules the commission shall consult with prescribers, manufacturers, and pharmacists and must consider the most commonly prescribed dosages and relevant prescribing guidance.

(3) "Graded dosage pack" means a clearly delineated three, five, or seven day pharmaceutical regimen, that may include multiple strengths of the same narcotic packaged in a consumer-friendly, child-resistant form by the manufacturer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning January 1, 2020, a manufacturer, as defined in RCW 69.45.010, shall offer graded dosage packs of schedule II or III oral narcotics for sale in this state if the manufacturer manufactures, sells, distributes, or dispenses a schedule II or III oral narcotic in this state that the pharmacy quality assurance commission has determined should be available in a graded dosage pack under section 1 of this act.

(2) The narcotics must be packaged in consumer-friendly, child-resistant packaging as required in the rules adopted under section 1 of this act.

(3) The packs must clearly indicate the regimen the consumer should follow, indicating the day and time all doses should be consumed, as required in the rules adopted under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning January 1, 2020, every health carrier that provides coverage for prescription drugs may only charge one copayment to the enrollee for graded dosage packs as defined in section 1 of this act.

(2) For purposes of this section, "health carrier," in addition to the definition in RCW 48.43.005, also includes health care service contractors, limited health care service contractors, and disability insurers, offering dental only coverage.

--- END ---