BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.02 RCW to read as follows:

Prior to the delivery of nonemergency outpatient services, a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that charges a facility fee or an ambulatory surgical facility licensed under chapter 70.230 RCW that charges a facility fee shall provide written notice to the patient:

(1) That the hospital or ambulatory surgical facility charges a facility fee;

(2) The amount of the fee;

(3) That the patient may be able to obtain the same nonemergency outpatient services at another facility, such as a clinic or an ambulatory surgical facility, that does not charge the fee; and

(4) That, if the patient chooses to receive the services at another facility, he or she should ask the other facility whether it charges a facility fee.

--- END ---