BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of ecology, in consultation with the Puget Sound clean air agency, must complete a study to distinguish the sources of emissions of the toxic air pollutant that poses the greatest cancer risk at the air monitoring station that is located closest to a port in the state with the highest volume of container traffic in domestic and foreign waterborne trade, as measured by the United States bureau of transportation statistics for the most recent year such statistics were available, as of January 1, 2017.

(2) By January 1, 2023, the department of ecology must complete the study required in subsection (1) of this section. The department of ecology must submit an interim progress report to the legislature by January 1, 2021, and a final report by January 1, 2023, consistent with RCW 43.01.036. The final report must summarize the results of the study. The final report may include recommendations for changes to state law, voluntary or mandatory changes to port operations, or other recommendations to reduce the cancer risks associated with the toxic air pollutant that is the focus of the study in subsection (1) of this section in the areas nearby the air monitoring station described in subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---