BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.14.007 and 2014 c 96 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the purpose of this chapter to encourage increased residential opportunities, including affordable housing opportunities, in cities that are required to plan or choose to plan under the growth management act within urban centers where the governing authority of the affected city has found there is insufficient housing opportunities, including affordable housing opportunities. It is further the purpose of this chapter to stimulate the construction of new multifamily housing and the rehabilitation of existing vacant and underutilized buildings for multifamily housing in urban centers having insufficient housing opportunities that will increase and improve residential opportunities, including affordable housing opportunities, within these urban centers. To achieve these purposes, this chapter provides for special valuations in residentially deficient urban centers for eligible improvements associated with multiunit housing, which includes affordable housing. It is an additional purpose of this chapter to allow unincorporated areas of rural counties that are within urban growth areas to stimulate housing opportunities and for certain counties to stimulate housing opportunities and redevelopment of areas in urban growth areas to promote transit supportive densities and more efficient land use, and near college campuses to promote dense, transit-oriented, walkable college communities.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.14.040 and 2014 c 96 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following criteria must be met before an area may be designated as a residential targeted area:

(a) The area must be within an urban center, as determined by the governing authority;

(b) The area must lack, as determined by the governing authority, sufficient available, desirable, and convenient residential housing, including affordable housing, to meet the needs of the public who would be likely to live in the urban center, if the affordable, desirable, attractive, and livable places to live were available;

(c) The providing of additional housing opportunity, including affordable housing, in the area, as determined by the governing authority, will assist in achieving one or more of the stated purposes of this chapter; and

(d) If the residential targeted area is designated by a county, the area must be located in an unincorporated area of the county that is within an urban growth area under RCW 36.70A.110 and the area must be: (i) In a rural county, served by a sewer system and designated by a county prior to January 1, 2013; ((or)) (ii) in a county that includes a campus of an institution of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.92.030, where at least one thousand two hundred students live on campus during the academic year; or (iii) in a county seeking to promote transit supportive densities and efficient land use in an area that is: (A) Located no further than one and one-half miles from the boundary of a city with a population of at least two hundred thousand; and (B) within three quarters of a mile of a corridor where bus service is scheduled at least every fifteen minutes for no less than ten hours per day and is in service or is planned for service to begin within five years of designation.

(2) For the purpose of designating a residential targeted area or areas, the governing authority may adopt a resolution of intention to so designate an area as generally described in the resolution. The resolution must state the time and place of a hearing to be held by the governing authority to consider the designation of the area and may include such other information pertaining to the designation of the area as the governing authority determines to be appropriate to apprise the public of the action intended.

(3) The governing authority must give notice of a hearing held under this chapter by publication of the notice once each week for two consecutive weeks, not less than seven days, nor more than thirty days before the date of the hearing in a paper having a general circulation in the city or county where the proposed residential targeted area is located. The notice must state the time, date, place, and purpose of the hearing and generally identify the area proposed to be designated as a residential targeted area.

(4) Following the hearing, or a continuance of the hearing, the governing authority may designate all or a portion of the area described in the resolution of intent as a residential targeted area if it finds, in its sole discretion, that the criteria in subsections (1) through (3) of this section have been met.

(5) After designation of a residential targeted area, the governing authority must adopt and implement standards and guidelines to be utilized in considering applications and making the determinations required under RCW 84.14.060. The standards and guidelines must establish basic requirements for both new construction and rehabilitation, which must include:

(a) Application process and procedures;

(b) Requirements that address demolition of existing structures and site utilization; and

(c) Building requirements that may include elements addressing parking, height, density, environmental impact, and compatibility with the existing surrounding property and such other amenities as will attract and keep permanent residents and that will properly enhance the livability of the residential targeted area in which they are to be located.

(6) The governing authority may adopt and implement, either as conditions to eight-year exemptions or as conditions to an extended exemption period under RCW 84.14.020(1)(a)(ii)(B), or both, more stringent income eligibility, rent, or sale price limits, including limits that apply to a higher percentage of units, than the minimum conditions for an extended exemption period under RCW 84.14.020(1)(a)(ii)(B). For any multiunit housing located in an unincorporated area of a county, a property owner seeking tax incentives under this chapter must commit to renting or selling at least twenty percent of the multifamily housing units as affordable housing units to low and moderate-income households. In the case of multiunit housing intended exclusively for owner occupancy, the minimum requirement of this subsection (6) may be satisfied solely through housing affordable to moderate-income households.

--- END ---