BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that efficiency and public safety is served by consolidating the multiple license plates currently required on the vehicles of registered tow truck operators. These registered tow truck operators currently have up to four separate license plates that are required to be displayed on the vehicle at all times. The operators have the highest training and qualifications of any towing operators in Washington state.

(2) The legislature further finds that a single unified license plate with separate endorsement tabs prevents confusion and allows for easy identification and review of tow trucks by law enforcement and the motoring public. The unified license plate also saves resources by reducing the need for license plate production and reduces fraud by limiting access to these commercial license plates.

(3) A unified license plate for registered tow truck operators serves the purposes of Washington residents, the motoring public, and law enforcement, and saves money as well.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.55 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If a tow truck, the registered owner of which is a registered tow truck operator, is to conduct transporter business under chapter 46.76 RCW, the license plate that is required to be displayed under RCW 46.16A.030 must contain an indicator tab that the vehicle is licensed to perform transporter services. The fee for an original transporter's license plate indicator tab for a tow truck, the registered owner of which is a registered tow truck operator, is twenty-five dollars. Vehicles that are used to conduct transporter business and are not owned by a registered tow truck operator must follow the requirements of chapter 46.76 RCW.

(2) If a tow truck, the registered owner of which is a registered tow truck operator, is used for a hulk hauler or scrap processor business under chapter 46.79 RCW, the license plate that is required under RCW 46.16A.030 must contain an indicator tab that the vehicle is licensed to perform hulk hauler or scrap processor purposes under the laws of the state of Washington. The fee for a hulk hauler or scrap processor business license plate indicator tab is five dollars for the original tab and two dollars for each additional tab bearing the same license number. Vehicles that are used to conduct hulk hauler or scrap processor business and are not owned by a registered tow truck operator must follow the requirements of chapter 46.79 RCW.

(3) If a tow truck, the registered owner of which is a registered tow truck operator, is used for a wrecker business under chapter 46.80 RCW, the license plate displayed that is required under RCW 46.16A.030 must contain an indicator tab that the vehicle is licensed to perform wrecker services. The fee for a wrecker license plate indicator tab is five dollars for the original tab and two dollars for each additional tab bearing the same license number. Vehicles that are used to conduct wrecker business and are not owned by a registered tow truck operator must follow the requirements of chapter 46.80 RCW.

(4)(a) The license plate indicator tabs must:

(i) Affix to the license plate required to be displayed under RCW 46.16A.030;

(ii) Clearly identify the business purpose of the licensed vehicle;

(iii) Use some combination of letters and numbers to indicate a vehicle is licensed to conduct transporter business under chapter 46.76 RCW, hulk hauler or scrap processor business under chapter 46.79 RCW, or wrecker business under chapter 46.80 RCW; and

(iv) Be approved by the department.

(b) All other requirements concerning registration and display of plates as required under chapter 46.16A RCW may not conflict with this section.

(5) This act does not allow for the use of indicator tabs, authorized in this section, on a special or personalized license plate authorized in chapter 46.18 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.76.030 and 1967 c 32 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon receiving an application for transporter's license the director, if satisfied that the applicant is entitled thereto, shall issue a proper certificate of license registration and a distinctive set of license plates or an indicator tab pursuant to section 2 of this act and shall transmit the fees obtained therefor with a proper identifying report to the state treasurer, who shall deposit such fees in the motor vehicle fund. The certificate of license registration and license plates or indicator tab issued by the director shall authorize the holder of the license to drive or tow any motor vehicle or trailers upon the public highways.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.76.060 and 2010 c 8 s 9093 are each amended to read as follows:

Transporter's license plates or indicator tabs pursuant to section 2 of this act shall be conspicuously displayed on all vehicles being delivered by the driveaway or towaway methods. These plates or indicator tabs shall not be loaned to or used by any person other than the holder of the license or his or her employees.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.76.065 and 1977 ex.s. c 254 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The following conduct shall be sufficient grounds pursuant to RCW 34.05.422 for the director or a designee to deny, suspend, or revoke the license of a motor vehicle transporter:

(1) Using transporter plates or indicator tabs pursuant to section 2 of this act for driveaway or towaway of any vehicle owned by such transporter;

(2) Knowingly, as that term is defined in RCW 9A.08.010(1)(b), having possession of a stolen vehicle or a vehicle with a defaced, missing, or obliterated manufacturer's identification serial number;

(3) Loaning transporter plates or indicator tabs;

(4) Using transporter plates or indicator tabs for any purpose other than as provided under RCW 46.76.010; or

(5) Violation of provisions of this chapter or of rules and regulations adopted relating to enforcement and proper operation of this chapter.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.76.067 and 1988 c 239 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person or organization that transports any mobile home or other vehicle for hire shall comply with this chapter and chapter 81.80 RCW. Persons or organizations that do not have a valid permit or meet other requirements under chapter 81.80 RCW shall not be issued a transporter license or transporter plates or an indicator tab pursuant to section 2 of this act to transport mobile homes or other vehicles. RCW 46.76.065(5) applies to persons or organizations that have transporter licenses or plates or indicator tabs and do not meet the requirements of chapter 81.80 RCW.

(2) This section does not apply to mobile home manufacturers or dealers that are licensed and delivering the mobile home under chapter 46.70 RCW.

Sec. 7. RCW 46.76.080 and 1979 ex.s. c 136 s 96 are each amended to read as follows:

The violation of any provision of this chapter is a traffic infraction. In addition to any other penalty imposed upon a violator of the provisions of this chapter, the director may confiscate any transporter license plates or indicator tabs used in connection with such violation.

Sec. 8. RCW 46.79.060 and 2010 c 8 s 9096 are each amended to read as follows:

The hulk hauler or scrap processor shall obtain a special set of license plates or an indicator tab pursuant to section 2 of this act in addition to the regular licenses and plates required for the operation of vehicles owned and/or operated by him or her and used in the conduct of his or her business. Such special license shall be displayed on the operational vehicles and shall be in lieu of a trip permit or current license on any vehicle being transported. The fee for these plates shall be five dollars for the original plates and two dollars for each additional set of plates bearing the same license number.

Sec. 9. RCW 46.80.060 and 1995 c 256 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The vehicle wrecker shall obtain a special set of license plates or an indicator tab pursuant to section 2 of this act in addition to the regular licenses and plates required for the operation of such vehicles. The special plates must be displayed on vehicles owned and/or operated by the wrecker and used in the conduct of the business. The fee for these plates shall be five dollars for the original plates and two dollars for each additional set of plates bearing the same license number. A wrecker with more than one licensed location in the state may use special plates bearing the same license number for vehicles operated out of any of the licensed locations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. This act takes effect June 1, 2019.

--- END ---