BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.40.110 and 2011 c 349 s 18, 2011 c 348 s 4, and 2011 c 10 s 41 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for any primary or election may begin upon receipt. The tabulation of absentee ballots must not commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election.

(2) All received return envelopes must be placed in secure locations from the time of delivery to the county auditor until their subsequent opening. After opening the return envelopes, the county canvassing board shall place all of the ballots in secure storage until processing. Ballots may be taken from the inner envelopes and all the normal procedural steps may be performed to prepare these ballots for tabulation.

(3) The canvassing board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the postmark on the return envelope and signature on the declaration before processing the ballot. The ballot must either be received no later than 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election, or must be postmarked no later than the day of the primary or election. All personnel assigned to verify signatures must receive training on statewide standards for signature verification. Personnel shall verify that the voter's signature on the ballot declaration is the same as the signature of that voter in the registration files of the county. Verification may be conducted by an automated verification system approved by the secretary of state. A variation between the signature of the voter on the ballot declaration and the signature of that voter in the registration files due to the substitution of initials or the use of common nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting are clearly the same.

(4) If the postmark is missing or illegible, the date on the ballot declaration to which the voter has attested determines the validity, as to the time of voting, for that ballot. For overseas voters and service voters, the date on the declaration to which the voter has attested determines the validity, as to the time of voting, for that ballot.

(a) Any overseas voter or service voter may return the signed declaration and voted ballot by fax or email by 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election, and the county auditor must use established procedures to maintain the secrecy of the ballot.

(b) For ballots returned electronically by a voter who is not an overseas voter or service voter, the signed declaration must be received no later than the day before the county canvassing board certifies the election or primary results. Other than the deadline, the auditor must process a signed declaration the same as for completing an unsigned declaration, as provided under RCW 29A.60.165.

Sec. 2. RCW 29A.60.185 and 2005 c 242 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Prior to certification of the election as required by RCW 29A.60.190, the county auditor shall conduct an audit of results of votes cast on the direct recording electronic voting devices used in the county. This audit must be conducted by randomly selecting by lot up to four percent of the direct recording electronic voting devices or one direct recording electronic voting device, whichever is greater, and, for each device, comparing the results recorded electronically with the results recorded on paper. For purposes of this audit, the results recorded on paper must be tabulated as follows: On one-fourth of the devices selected for audit, the paper records must be tabulated manually; on the remaining devices, the paper records may be tabulated by a mechanical device determined by the secretary of state to be capable of accurately reading the votes cast and printed thereon and qualified for use in the state under applicable state and federal laws. Three races or issues, randomly selected by lot, must be audited on each device. This audit procedure must be subject to observation by political party representatives if representatives have been appointed and are present at the time of the audit.

(2) Prior to certification of the election, for ballots returned electronically, pursuant to RCW 29A.40.110, the county auditor shall conduct an audit of such ballots if at least forty of such ballots are returned by 8:00 p.m. on the day of the election.

(a) Upon providing notice to each voter, pursuant to RCW 29A.40.110, the auditor must randomly select twenty-five percent of such voters and include in their notice a request for the voter to return his or her original ballot along with the signed declaration.

(b) The auditor must analyze any original ballot returned no later than one week before the county canvassing board certifies the election or primary results, to ensure it matches the electronically returned ballot. If the auditor finds that any electronically returned ballot was manipulated, altered, or intercepted by another person, then the auditor must request every voter who submitted an electronic ballot, pursuant to RCW 29A.40.110, to return the original ballot. The request must be made in the same manner as providing notice to return the voter's signed declaration. The request must clearly indicate that the failure to return the original ballot does not affect the validity of that person's electronically submitted ballot.

(c) The auditor must analyze each returned original ballot to ensure it matches the electronically returned ballot. The auditor must conduct the audit in a manner to ensure the secrecy of the vote is maintained.

--- END ---