BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.180.030 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1) "Eligible pupil" means any enrollee of the school district whose ((primary)) native language is other than English and whose English language skills are sufficiently deficient or absent to impair learning.

(2) "Exited pupil" means a student previously enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program who is no longer eligible for the program based on his or her performance on an English proficiency assessment approved by the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) (("Primary language" means the language most often used by the student for communication in his/her home.)) "Native language" means:

(a) The language normally used by an individual; or

(b) In the case of a child or youth, the language normally used by the parents of the child or youth.

(4) "Transitional bilingual instruction" means:

(a) A system of instruction which uses two languages, one of which is English, as a means of instruction to build upon and expand language skills to enable the pupil to achieve competency in English. Concepts and information are introduced in the ((primary)) native language and reinforced in the second language: PROVIDED, That the program shall include testing in the subject matter in English; or

(b) In those cases in which the use of two languages is not practicable as established by the superintendent of public instruction and unless otherwise prohibited by law, an alternative system of instruction which may include English as a second language and is designed to enable the pupil to achieve competency in English.

--- END ---