BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 19.340 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No contract for pharmacy services entered into in this state between an insurer or pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy or pharmacist shall contain a provision prohibiting or penalizing, including through increased utilization review, reduced payments, or other financial disincentives, a pharmacist's disclosure to an individual purchasing prescription medication of information regarding:

(a) The cost of the prescription medication to the individual; or

(b) Alternative methods of purchasing the prescription medication including, but not limited to, paying a cash price, that are less expensive than the cost of the prescription medication to the individual.

(2) This section applies to contracts entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---