BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.61.150 and 2007 c 469 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Metropolitan park commissioners selected by election according to RCW 35.61.050(2) shall perform their duties and may provide, by resolution passed by the commissioners, for the payment of compensation to each of its commissioners at a rate ((of)) up to ((ninety dollars)) the daily compensation maximum amount provided in subsection (3) of this section for each day or portion of a day spent in actual attendance at official meetings or in performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the district. However, the compensation for each commissioner must not exceed ((eight thousand six hundred forty dollars)) the annual compensation maximum amount provided in subsection (3) of this section per year.

(2) Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the clerk of the board. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

(3)(a) For purposes of the references in subsection (1) of this section, the daily compensation maximum amount is one hundred fourteen dollars and the annual compensation maximum amount is ten thousand nine hundred forty-four dollars. However, for any metropolitan park district with facilities including an aquarium, a wildlife park, and a zoo, accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency, the annual compensation maximum amount is twenty-two thousand dollars.

(b) The dollar thresholds established in this ((section)) subsection (3) must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning July 1, ((2008)) 2018, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.

(4) A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

--- END ---