BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) "Commissary" means an approved food establishment where food is stored, prepared, portioned, or packaged for service elsewhere.

(b) "Mobile food unit" means a readily movable food establishment.

(c) "Servicing area" means an operating base location to which a mobile food unit or transportation vehicle returns regularly for such things as vehicle and equipment cleaning, discharging liquid or solid wastes, refilling water tanks and ice bins, and boarding food.

(2) The regulatory authority must approve a request for a mobile food unit to be exempt from state board of health or local health jurisdiction requirements to operate from an approved commissary or servicing area if:

(a) The mobile food unit contains all equipment and utensils needed for complete onboard preparation of an approved menu;

(b) The mobile food unit is protected from environmental contamination when not in use;

(c) The mobile food unit can maintain required food storage temperatures during storage, preparation, service, and transit;

(d) The mobile food unit has a dedicated handwashing sink to allow frequent handwashing at all times;

(e) The mobile food unit has adequate water capacity and warewashing facilities to clean all multiuse utensils used on the mobile unit at a frequency specified in state board of health rules;

(f) The mobile food unit is able to store tools onboard needed for cleaning and sanitizing;

(g) All food, water, and ice used on the mobile food unit is prepared onboard or otherwise obtained from approved sources;

(h) Wastewater and garbage will be sanitarily removed from the mobile food unit following an approved written plan or by a licensed service provider; and

(i) The local health officer approves the menu and plan of operations for the mobile food unit.

--- END ---