BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 15.60 RCW to read as follows:

A person who owns or operates an apiary, is a registered apiarist under RCW 15.60.021, abides by all applicable city, town, or county ordinances regarding beekeeping, and operates the apiary in a reasonable manner and in accordance with generally accepted beekeeping practices, is not liable for any civil damages that occur in connection with the keeping and maintaining of bees, bee equipment, queen breeding equipment, apiaries, and appliances. The limitation of liability established in this section does not apply to acts or omissions that are reckless.

--- END ---