BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.700 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By September 1, 2019, each school district must adopt a policy to promote the recruitment and use of industry and trade expert volunteers in career and technical education courses offered in grades seven and eight. Policies adopted under this section must seek to expand the use of industry and trade expert volunteers in classrooms for the purpose of:

(a) Deepening students' subject matter understanding, including increasing student knowledge related to the practical application of specific skills that are taught and employed in professional and adult education settings;

(b) Increasing students' awareness of additional career and technical education concepts and practices, including concepts and practices not necessarily discussed in the course, and new or emerging concepts and practices; and

(c) Providing forums for students to learn directly from industry and trade practitioners who understand the opportunities and educational requirements for successful industry and trade careers.

(2) District policies adopted in accordance with this section may be updated periodically as necessary and must include:

(a) Provisions for ensuring that the actions of industry and trade expert volunteers are directed by and coordinated with the applicable classroom teacher or teachers;

(b) Suggestions and strategies for outreach to community, industry, and trade personnel and organizations who may serve as, recommend, or provide industry and trade expert volunteers; and

(c) Other items as necessary including, but not limited to, recommendations from industry and trade experts, classroom teachers, parents, and students.

(3) By March 1, 2019, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in coordination with the Washington state school directors' association established in RCW 28A.345.010, and a state association representing career and technical education, must develop materials, including a model policy and other supporting documents, to assist districts in complying with the requirements of this section.

--- END ---