BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.161 and 2014 c 185 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, upon receipt of a fee of forty-five dollars from October 1, 2012, to June 30, 2013, and fifty-four dollars after June 30, 2013, unless the driver's license is issued for a period other than five years from October 1, 2012, to June 30, 2013, or six years after June 30, 2013, in which case the fee shall be nine dollars for each year that the license is issued, which includes the fee for the required photograph, shall issue to every qualifying applicant a driver's license. A driver's license issued to a person under the age of eighteen is an intermediate license, subject to the restrictions imposed under RCW 46.20.075, until the person reaches the age of eighteen. The license must include a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee, the name of record, date of birth, Washington residence address, photograph, a brief description of the licensee, either a facsimile of the signature of the licensee or a space upon which the licensee shall write his or her usual signature with pen and ink immediately upon receipt of the license, and, if applicable, the person's status as a veteran as provided in subsection (2) of this section. No license is valid until it has been so signed by the licensee.

(2) A ((person)) veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007, or an individual who otherwise meets the criteria of RCW 41.04.007 but who has received a general discharge under honorable conditions, may apply to the department to obtain a veteran designation on a driver's license issued under this section by providing ((the)):

(a) A United States department of veterans affairs identification card or proof of service letter;

(b) A United States department of defense discharge document, DD Form 214 or DD Form 215, as it exists on ((August 30, 2017)) the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, or equivalent or successor discharge paperwork, that shows a discharge status of "honorable" or "general under honorable conditions" that establishes the person's service in the armed forces of the United States;

(c) A national guard state-issued report of separation and military service, NGB Form 22, as it exists on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, or equivalent or successor discharge paperwork, that shows a discharge status of "honorable" or "general under honorable conditions" that establishes the person's active duty or reserve service in the national guard; or

(d) A United States uniformed services identification card, DD Form 2, that displays on its face that it has been issued to a retired member of any of the armed forces of the United States, including the national guard and armed forces reserves.

The department may permit a veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007, or an individual who otherwise meets the criteria of RCW 41.04.007 but who has received a general discharge under honorable conditions, to submit an alternate form of documentation to apply to obtain a veteran designation on a driver's license, as specified by rule, that requires a discharge status of "honorable" or "general under honorable conditions" and that establishes the person's service as required under RCW 41.04.007.

--- END ---