BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.155.065 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 216 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Each school district shall provide or contract for)) The state lead agency is the department of children, youth, and families, and it shall oversee the provision of early intervention services to all eligible children with disabilities from birth to three years of age. Eligibility shall be determined according to Part C of the federal individuals with disabilities education act or other applicable federal and state laws, and as specified in the Washington Administrative Code adopted by the state lead agency((, which is the department of children, youth, and families)). ((School districts shall provide or contract, or both, for)) The state lead agency shall oversee the provision of early intervention services in partnership with local birth-to-three lead agencies and birth-to-three services providers. Services provided under this section shall not supplant services or funding currently provided in the state for early intervention services to eligible children with disabilities from birth to three years of age. The state-designated birth-to-three lead agency shall be payor of last resort for birth-to-three early intervention services provided under this section.

(2)(((a) By October 1, 2016, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide the department of early learning, in its role as state lead agency, with a full accounting of the school district expenditures from the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, disaggregated by district, for birth-to-three early intervention services provided under this section.

(b) The reported expenditures must include, but are not limited to per student allocations, per student expenditures, the number of children served, detailed information on services provided by school districts and contracted for by school districts, coordination and transition services, and administrative costs.

(3))) The services in this section are not part of the state's program of basic education pursuant to Article IX of the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 28A.155.065 is recodified as a section in chapter 43.216 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---