BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.09.340 and 2017 c 270 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((Effective July 1, 2017)) (1) Except as provided in RCW 72.36.160, beginning January 1, 2019, the personal needs allowance for clients being served in medical institutions and in residential settings is seventy dollars.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2020, and each ((fiscal)) year thereafter, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the personal needs allowance shall be adjusted for economic trends and conditions by increasing the allowance by the percentage cost-of-living adjustment for old-age, survivors, and disability social security benefits as published by the federal social security administration. However, in no case shall the personal needs allowance exceed the maximum personal needs allowance permissible under the federal social security act.

--- END ---