BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds that students are best prepared for success in postsecondary education when they complete the most rigorous high school curriculum they have access to and are capable of completing.

The legislature further acknowledges issues of equity and access to quality college preparatory experiences and college courses for high school students and seeks to support efficient, high quality programs that reduce financial and access barriers for students.

The legislature further recognizes the difference between college courses and high school courses that offer rigorous college preparation. Concurrent enrollment programs, such as running start and college in the high school are college courses. College preparatory programs with examination, such as AP, Cambridge international, and international baccalaureate (IB), are examples of high school courses that offer substantial rigor. The legislature further finds that the role and value of quality learning is key and that a student's high school curriculum choices should be determined by the student's personal, career, and educational goals and interests, with an emphasis on fit, including academic readiness and preparation identified in a student's high school and beyond plan.

The legislature further recognizes the continued work of K-12 education and higher education to build on the launch year act, chapter 277, Laws of 2011, and to continue to collaborate to clearly communicate with students about concurrent enrollment and college preparatory programs with examination.

Therefore, the legislature intends to establish a clear student-focused policy for concurrent enrollment and college preparatory programs with examination in Washington that recognizes, without preference for any single program, the rich and diverse selection of quality programs leading to a credential, certificate, or degree completion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this title and Title 28A RCW unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "College preparatory programs with examination" means high school courses for which students may earn college credit through recognized standardized examinations, such as AP, international baccalaureate (IB), and Cambridge international A levels.

(2) "Concurrent enrollment programs" means partnerships between K-12 schools and postsecondary education institutions through which credit-bearing college courses offered by a public or private institution of higher education and taught by higher education faculty or appropriately qualified high school teachers, are taken by high school students who have not yet received the credits required for the award of a high school diploma, either in high school or at a public or private institution of higher education, and for which earned credits are recorded on a college or university transcript, with the exception of career technical education dual credit. Career technical education dual credit is a concurrent enrollment program, however, credits earned through career technical education dual credit may not be recorded on a college transcript until a student enrolls in a public or private institution of higher education.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.10.054 and 2017 c 179 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The institutions of higher education must establish ((a)) coordinated, evidence-based ((policy)) policies for granting as many undergraduate college credits as possible and appropriate for general education requirements or the equivalent to students who have ((earned minimum scores of three on AP exams as possible and appropriate.

(2) Credit policy regarding all AP exams must be posted on campus web sites effective for the 2017 fall academic term. The institutions of higher education must conduct biennial reviews of their AP credit policy and report noncompliance to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1st each year beginning November 1, 2019)) successfully completed advanced placement (AP), international baccalaureate (IB), or Cambridge international courses and demonstrated mastery of college-level curriculum, as shown by the students' examination scores for those programs. The institutions shall take into account the evidence for student success and the relevance of the AP, IB, or Cambridge international curriculum and test scores in consideration of granting college credit or waiving course requirements, with appropriate consideration of the institutions' degree distribution requirements or curriculum for specific degree programs. Policies may consider, for example:

(a) Whether a three or a four on an AP examination, a four or a five on a standard level or higher level IB examination, and an equivalent score on a Cambridge international examination indicates that the student has mastered college-level coursework for which undergraduate college credits may be granted; and

(b) What test score for specific subjects indicates if graduation distribution requirements or prerequisite courses may be waived, while preserving the integrity of the institutions' faculty process for determining degree and major curriculum requirements.

(2) The credit policies regarding all AP, IB, and Cambridge international examinations must be posted on campus web sites effective for the fall 2018 academic term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) The state board for community and technical colleges and the four-year institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 must convene a work group to collaborate on the benefits, challenges, and best practices surrounding concurrent enrollment and college preparation programs in Washington.

(2) The purpose of the work group is to:

(a) Identify opportunities and challenges related to awareness, access, and completion of concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs with examination;

(b) Identify best practices that institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, private nonprofit four-year institutions of higher education, and K-12 schools may employ to promote awareness, access, and completion of concurrent enrollment and college preparatory programs; and

(c) Make recommendations for improving collaboration and communication with regard to awareness, access, and completion of concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs with examination among institutions of higher education and between institutions of higher education and K-12 schools.

(3) The work group includes the following members:

(a) One representative appointed by the executive director of the council of presidents;

(b) One representative appointed by the director of the state board for community and technical colleges;

(c) One representative appointed by the executive director of the student achievement council;

(d) One representative appointed by the director of an association representing Washington private nonprofit colleges;

(e) One representative appointed by the superintendent of public instruction who is responsible for agency policy;

(f) One representative appointed by the superintendent of public instruction who is responsible for concurrent enrollment and accelerated learning opportunity programs;

(g) One representative appointed by the president of an organization focusing on college and high school relations, representing both Washington colleges and high schools;

(h) Two representatives appointed by the executive director of an association representing Washington high school principals, one from each side of the Cascade mountains;

(i) One representative appointed by the executive director of an association of Washington school district administrators;

(j) One representative appointed by the executive director of an association representing Washington high school counselors;

(k) One representative appointed by the executive director of an organization representing Washington state parent teacher associations;

(l) One representative appointed by the executive director of the state board of education;

(m) One representative appointed by the executive director of an association of Washington school directors;

(n) One representative appointed by an association representing community and technical college faculty;

(o) One representative appointed by an association representing public four-year institutions of higher education faculty;

(p) Three representatives from faculty, one each from a public four-year institution of higher education appointed by the council of presidents; a private, nonprofit four-year institution of higher education appointed by the executive director of an association representing private, nonprofit colleges; and a community or technical college appointed by the director of the state board for community and technical colleges;

(q) Three admissions directors or registrars, one each from a public four-year institution of higher education appointed by the council of presidents; a private, nonprofit four-year institution of higher education appointed by the executive director of an association representing private, nonprofit colleges; and a community or technical college appointed by the director of the state board for community and technical colleges;

(r) Three representatives from high schools with expertise in teaching college preparatory programs with examination, with one representing international baccalaureate, one representing AP, and one representing Cambridge international, all to be appointed by an organization representing K-12 teachers; and

(s) Three representatives who work on intersector issues relating to transfer, one each from a public four-year institution of higher education appointed by the council of presidents; a private, nonprofit four-year institution of higher education appointed by the executive director of an association representing private, nonprofit colleges; and a community or technical college appointed by the director of the state board for community and technical colleges; and

(4) The work group may invite, at its discretion, representatives from other agencies and organizations.

(5) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

(6) The work group shall report to the legislature and the institutions of higher education on its goals by October 31, 2019.

(7) This section expires October 31, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) To establish a uniform standard by which concurrent enrollment programs and professional development activities may be measured, any college or university offering concurrent enrollment program courses as defined in section 2 of this act at a public high school as defined in RCW 28A.150.010 or under RCW 28A.600.290 must receive accreditation by a national accrediting body for concurrent enrollment by the 2024-25 school year.

(2) Any college or university engaged in concurrent enrollment program courses as defined in section 2 of this act at a public high school as defined in RCW 28A.150.010 or under RCW 28A.600.290 during or before the 2017-18 academic year that are not accredited by a national accrediting body for concurrent enrollment must continue to undergo the annual state authorization review by the college in the high school standards report review committee in WAC 392-725-150 and must obtain approval from the review committee until the program is accredited by a national accrediting body for concurrent enrollment.

(3) After the 2024-25 school year, any college or university with concurrent enrollment program courses in place during or before the 2017-18 academic year that have not been accredited in accordance with subsection (1) of this section or do not have an active application pending further action by the accrediting body under subsection (1) of this section may not offer a concurrent enrollment program course as defined in section 2 of this act at a public high school as defined in RCW 28A.150.010 or college in the high school program under RCW 28A.600.290.

(4) New college and university concurrent enrollment program courses that are implemented after the 2017-18 academic year have six years from the beginning of the first term of classes to comply with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) The education data center established in RCW 43.41.400 must convene a work group to provide consistent, easily understood concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs by examination data among institutions of higher education and K-12 schools within Washington.

(2) The work group shall include representatives from public four-year institutions of higher education appointed by the executive director of the council of presidents; representatives from the community and technical colleges appointed by the director of the state board for community and technical colleges; representatives of the council of presidents appointed by the executive director of the council of presidents; representatives of the state board for community and technical colleges appointed by the director of the state board for community and technical colleges; representatives of the office of the superintendent of public instruction appointed by the superintendent of public instruction; representatives of private, nonprofit colleges appointed by the executive director of an association representing private, nonprofit colleges; representatives of the state board of education appointed by the executive director of the state board of education; and representatives of the student achievement council appointed by the executive director of the student achievement council.

(3) The purpose of the work group is to:

(a) Determine what data is collected at the state level;

(b) Identify gaps in the state-level data and determine what data should be collected; and

(c) Make recommendations for improvement of data collection and communication with stakeholders.

(4) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

(5) The work group must report its findings to the legislature by December 31, 2019.

(6) This section expires December 31, 2019.

Sec. 7. RCW 28B.10.053 and 2013 c 23 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By December 1, 2011, and by June of each odd-numbered year thereafter, the institutions of higher education shall collaboratively develop a master list of postsecondary courses that can be fulfilled by ((taking the advanced placement, international baccalaureate)) earning college credit through concurrent enrollment programs, college preparatory programs with examination, or other recognized college-level proficiency examinations, including but not limited to examinations by a national multidisciplinary science, technology, engineering, and mathematics program, and meeting the qualifying examination score or demonstrated competencies for lower division general education requirements or postsecondary professional technical requirements. The master list of postsecondary courses fulfilled by proficiency examinations or demonstrated competencies are those that fulfill lower division general education requirements or career and technical education requirements and qualify for postsecondary credit. From the master list, each institution shall create and publish a list of its courses that can be satisfied by successful ((proficiency examination)) scores or demonstrated competencies for lower division general education requirements or postsecondary professional technical requirements. The qualifying examination scores and demonstrated competencies shall be included in the published list. The requirements to develop a master list under this section do not apply if an institution has a clearly published policy of awarding credit for the advanced placement, international baccalaureate, or other recognized ((college-level placement exams)) standardized examinations and does not require those credits to meet specific course requirements but generally applies those credits towards degree requirements.

(2) To the maximum extent possible, institutions of higher education shall agree on examination qualifying scores and demonstrated competencies for the credits or courses under subsection (3) of this section, with scores equivalent to qualified or well-qualified. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent an institution of higher education from adopting policies using higher scores for additional purposes.

(3) Each institution of higher education, in designing its certificate, technical degree program, two-year academic transfer program, or first-year student and sophomore courses of a baccalaureate program or baccalaureate degree, must recognize the equivalencies of at least one year of course credit and maximize the application of the credits toward lower division general education requirements that can be earned through ((successfully demonstrating proficiency on examinations, including but not limited to advanced placement and international baccalaureate)) concurrent enrollment programs or college preparatory programs with examination((s)). The successful completion of the examination and the award of credit shall be noted on the student's college transcript.

(4) Each institution of higher education must clearly include in its admissions materials and on its web site the credits or the institution's list of postsecondary courses that can be fulfilled by ((proficiency)) college preparatory programs with examination((s)) or demonstrated competencies and the agreed-upon examination scores and demonstrated competencies that qualify for postsecondary credit. Each institution must provide the information to the student achievement council and state board for community and technical colleges in a form that the superintendent of public instruction is able to distribute to school districts.

Sec. 8. RCW 28B.15.820 and 2009 c 215 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each institution of higher education, including technical colleges, shall deposit a minimum of three and one-half percent of revenues collected from tuition and services and activities fees in an institutional financial aid fund that is hereby created and which shall be held locally. Moneys in the fund shall be used only for the following purposes: (a) To make guaranteed long-term loans to eligible students as provided in subsections (3) through (8) of this section; (b) to make short-term loans as provided in subsection (9) of this section; (c) to provide financial aid to needy students as provided in subsection (10) of this section; or (d) to provide financial aid to students as provided in subsection (11) of this section.

(2) An "eligible student" for the purposes of subsections (3) through (8) and (10) of this section is a student registered for at least three credit hours or the equivalent, who is eligible for resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013, and who is a "needy student" as defined in RCW 28B.92.030.

(3) The amount of the guaranteed long-term loans made under this section shall not exceed the demonstrated financial need of the student. Each institution shall establish loan terms and conditions which shall be consistent with the terms of the guaranteed loan program established by 20 U.S. Code Section 1071 et seq., as now or hereafter amended. All loans made shall be guaranteed by the Washington student loan guaranty association or its successor agency. Institutions are hereby granted full authority to operate as an eligible lender under the guaranteed loan program.

(4) Before approving a guaranteed long-term loan, each institution shall analyze the ability of the student to repay the loan based on factors which include, but are not limited to, the student's accumulated total education loan burdens and the employment opportunities and average starting salary characteristics of the student's chosen fields of study. The institution shall counsel the student on the advisability of acquiring additional debt, and on the availability of other forms of financial aid.

(5) Each institution is responsible for collection of guaranteed long-term loans made under this section and shall exercise due diligence in such collection, maintaining all necessary records to insure that maximum repayments are made. Institutions shall cooperate with other lenders and the Washington student loan guaranty association, or its successor agency, in the coordinated collection of guaranteed loans, and shall assure that the guarantability of the loans is not violated. Collection and servicing of guaranteed long-term loans under this section shall be performed by entities approved for such servicing by the Washington student loan guaranty association or its successor agency: PROVIDED, That institutions be permitted to perform such servicing if specifically recognized to do so by the Washington student loan guaranty association or its successor agency. Collection and servicing of guaranteed long-term loans made by community colleges under subsection (1) of this section shall be coordinated by the state board for community and technical colleges and shall be conducted under procedures adopted by the state board.

(6) Receipts from payment of interest or principal or any other subsidies to which institutions as lenders are entitled, that are paid by or on behalf of borrowers of funds under subsections (3) through (8) of this section, shall be deposited in each institution's financial aid fund and shall be used to cover the costs of making the guaranteed long-term loans under this section and maintaining necessary records and making collections under subsection (5) of this section: PROVIDED, That such costs shall not exceed five percent of aggregate outstanding loan principal. Institutions shall maintain accurate records of such costs, and all receipts beyond those necessary to pay such costs, shall be deposited in the institution's financial aid fund.

(7) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College, and the state board for community and technical colleges, on behalf of the community colleges and technical colleges, shall each adopt necessary rules and regulations to implement this section.

(8) First priority for any guaranteed long-term loans made under this section shall be directed toward students who would not normally have access to educational loans from private financial institutions in Washington state, and maximum use shall be made of secondary markets in the support of loan consolidation.

(9) Short-term loans, not to exceed one year, may be made from the institutional financial aid fund to students enrolled in the institution. No such loan shall be made to any student who is known by the institution to be in default or delinquent in the payment of any outstanding student loan. A short-term loan may be made only if the institution has ample evidence that the student has the capability of repaying the loan within the time frame specified by the institution for repayment.

(10) Any moneys deposited in the institutional financial aid fund that are not used in making long-term or short-term loans may be used by the institution for locally administered financial aid programs for needy students, such as need-based institutional employment programs or need-based tuition and fee scholarship or grant programs. These funds shall be used in addition to and not to replace institutional funds that would otherwise support these locally administered financial aid programs. First priority in the use of these funds shall be given to needy students who have accumulated excessive educational loan burdens. An excessive educational loan burden is a burden that will be difficult to repay given employment opportunities and average starting salaries in the student's chosen fields of study. Second priority in the use of these funds shall be given to needy single parents, to assist these students with their educational expenses, including expenses associated with child care and transportation.

(11) Any moneys deposited in the institutional financial aid fund may be used by the institution for a locally administered financial aid program for high school students enrolled in ((dual credit programs)) concurrent enrollment programs or college preparatory programs with examination. If institutions use funds in this manner, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state board for community and technical colleges shall each adopt necessary rules to implement this subsection. Moneys from this fund may be used for all educational expenses related to a student's participation in ((a dual credit program)) concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs with examination including but not limited to tuition, fees, course materials, and transportation.

Sec. 9. RCW 28B.15.821 and 2009 c 215 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, (("dual credit program" means a program, administered by either an institution of higher education or a high school, through which high school students in the eleventh or twelfth grade who have not yet received the credits required for the award of a high school diploma apply to a participating institution of higher education to enroll in courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education and simultaneously earn high school and college credit)) "college preparatory programs with examination" and "concurrent enrollment programs" have the definitions in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 10. RCW 28B.50.531 and 2008 c 170 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the legislature's intent to recognize and support the work of community and technical colleges, high schools, and skill centers in creating articulation and ((dual credit)) concurrent enrollment agreements for career and technical education students, in part by codifying current practice.

(2) Community and technical colleges shall create agreements with high schools and skill centers to offer ((dual high school and)) opportunities to earn college credit for ((secondary career and technical courses)) concurrent enrollment programs. Agreements shall be subject to approval by the chief instructional officer of the college and the principal and the career and technical education director of the high school or the executive director of the skill center.

(3) Community and technical colleges may create ((dual credit)) concurrent enrollment program agreements with high schools and skill centers that are located outside the college district boundary or service area.

(4) If a community or technical college has created an agreement with a high school or skill center to offer college credit for a secondary career and technical course, all community and technical colleges shall accept the course for an equal amount of college credit.

(5) As used in this section, "college preparatory programs with examination" and "concurrent enrollment programs" have the definitions in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 11. RCW 28B.92.086 and 2009 c 215 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Institutions of higher education are encouraged to review their policies and procedures regarding financial aid for students enrolled in ((dual credit programs as defined in RCW 28B.15.821)) concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs with examination. Institutions of higher education are further encouraged to implement policies and procedures providing students enrolled in ((dual credit programs)) concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs with examination with the same access to institutional aid, including all educational expenses, as provided to resident undergraduate students.

(2) As used in this section, "college preparatory programs with examination" and "concurrent enrollment programs" have the definitions in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 12. RCW 28B.95.030 and 2016 c 69 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program shall be administered by the committee on advanced tuition payment which shall be chaired by the director of the office. The committee shall be supported by staff of the office.

(2)(a) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program shall consist of the sale of tuition units, which may be redeemed by the beneficiary at a future date for an equal number of tuition units regardless of any increase in the price of tuition, that may have occurred in the interval, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(b) Each purchase shall be worth a specific number of or fraction of tuition units at each state institution of higher education as determined by the governing body, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(c) The number of tuition units necessary to pay for a full year's, full-time undergraduate tuition and fee charges at a state institution of higher education shall be set by the governing body at the time a purchaser enters into a tuition unit contract, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(d) The governing body may limit the number of tuition units purchased by any one purchaser or on behalf of any one beneficiary, however, no limit may be imposed that is less than that necessary to achieve four years of full-time, undergraduate tuition charges at a state institution of higher education. The governing body also may, at its discretion, limit the number of participants, if needed, to ensure the actuarial soundness and integrity of the program.

(e) While the Washington advanced college tuition payment program is designed to help all citizens of the state of Washington, the governing body may determine residency requirements for eligible purchasers and eligible beneficiaries to ensure the actuarial soundness and integrity of the program.

(3)(a) No tuition unit may be redeemed until two years after the purchase of the unit.

(b) Units may be redeemed for enrollment at any institution of higher education that is recognized by the internal revenue service under chapter 529 of the internal revenue code. Units may also be redeemed to pay for ((dual credit)) concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs with examination fees.

(c) Units redeemed at a nonstate institution of higher education or for graduate enrollment shall be redeemed at the rate for state public institutions in effect at the time of redemption.

(4) The governing body shall determine the conditions under which the tuition benefit may be transferred to another family member. In permitting such transfers, the governing body may not allow the tuition benefit to be bought, sold, bartered, or otherwise exchanged for goods and services by either the beneficiary or the purchaser.

(5) The governing body shall administer the Washington advanced college tuition payment program in a manner reasonably designed to be actuarially sound, such that the assets of the trust will be sufficient to defray the obligations of the trust including the costs of administration. The governing body may, at its discretion, discount the minimum purchase price for certain kinds of purchases such as those from families with young children, as long as the actuarial soundness of the account is not jeopardized.

(6) The governing body shall annually determine current value of a tuition unit.

(7) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 academic years only, the governing body shall set the payout value for units redeemed during that academic year only at one hundred seventeen dollars and eighty-two cents per unit. For academic years after the 2016-17 academic year, the governing body shall make program adjustments it deems necessary and appropriate to ensure that the total payout value of each account on October 9, 2015, is not decreased or diluted as a result of the initial application of any changes in tuition under section 3, chapter 36, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. In the event the committee or governing body provides additional units under chapter 36, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., the committee and governing body shall also increase the maximum number of units that can be redeemed in any year to mitigate the reduction in available account value during any year as a result of chapter 36, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. The governing body must notify holders of tuition units after the adjustment in this subsection is made and must include a statement concerning the adjustment.

(8) The governing body shall promote, advertise, and publicize the Washington advanced college tuition payment program. Materials and online publications advertising the Washington advanced college tuition payment program shall include a disclaimer that the Washington advanced college tuition payment program's guarantee is that one hundred tuition units will equal one year of full-time, resident, undergraduate tuition at the most expensive state institution of higher education, and that if resident, undergraduate tuition is reduced, a tuition unit may lose monetary value.

(9) In addition to any other powers conferred by this chapter, the governing body may:

(a) Impose reasonable limits on the number of tuition units or units that may be used in any one year;

(b) Determine and set any time limits, if necessary, for the use of benefits under this chapter;

(c) Impose and collect administrative fees and charges in connection with any transaction under this chapter;

(d) Appoint and use advisory committees and the state actuary as needed to provide program direction and guidance;

(e) Formulate and adopt all other policies and rules necessary for the efficient administration of the program;

(f) Consider the addition of an advanced payment program for room and board contracts and also consider a college savings program;

(g) Purchase insurance from insurers licensed to do business in the state, to provide for coverage against any loss in connection with the account's property, assets, or activities or to further insure the value of the tuition units;

(h) Make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and other instruments necessary to the exercise and discharge of its powers and duties under this chapter;

(i) Contract for the provision for all or part of the services necessary for the management and operation of the program with other state or nonstate entities authorized to do business in the state;

(j) Contract for other services or for goods needed by the governing body in the conduct of its business under this chapter;

(k) Contract with financial consultants, actuaries, auditors, and other consultants as necessary to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter;

(l) Solicit and accept cash donations and grants from any person, governmental agency, private business, or organization; and

(m) Perform all acts necessary and proper to carry out the duties and responsibilities of this program under this chapter.

(10) As used in this section, "college preparatory programs with examination" and "concurrent enrollment programs" have the definitions in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 13. RCW 28B.95.032 and 2016 c 69 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington college savings program shall be administered by the committee, which shall be chaired by the director of the office. The committee shall be supported by staff of the office.

(2) The Washington college savings program shall consist of the college savings program account and the individual college savings program accounts, and shall allow an eligible purchaser to establish an individual college savings program account for an eligible beneficiary whereby the money in the account may be invested and used for enrollment at any institution of higher education that is recognized by the internal revenue service under chapter 529 of the internal revenue code. Money in the account may also be used to pay for ((dual credit)) concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs with examination fees.

(3) The Washington college savings program is open to eligible purchasers and eligible beneficiaries who are residents or nonresidents of Washington state.

(4) The Washington college savings program shall not require eligible purchasers to make an initial minimum contribution in any amount that exceeds twenty-five dollars when establishing a new account.

(5) The committee may contract with other state or nonstate entities that are authorized to do business in the state for the investment of moneys in the college savings program, including other college savings plans established pursuant to section 529 of the internal revenue code. The investment of eligible contributors' deposits may be in credit unions, savings and loan associations, banks, mutual savings banks, purchase life insurance, shares of an investment company, individual securities, fixed annuity contracts, variable annuity contracts, any insurance company, other 529 plans, or any investment company licensed to contract business in this state.

(6) The governing body shall determine the conditions under which control or the beneficiary of an individual college savings program account may be transferred to another family member. In permitting such transfers, the governing body may not allow the individual college savings program account to be bought, sold, bartered, or otherwise exchanged for goods and services by either the beneficiary or the purchaser.

(7) The governing body shall promote, advertise, and publicize the Washington college savings program.

(8) The governing body shall develop materials to educate potential account owners and beneficiaries on (a) the differences between the advanced college tuition payment program and the Washington college savings program, and (b) how the two programs can complement each other to save towards the full cost of attending college.

(9) In addition to any other powers conferred by this chapter, the governing body may:

(a) Impose limits on the amount of contributions that may be made on behalf of any eligible beneficiary;

(b) Determine and set age limits and any time limits for the use of benefits under this chapter;

(c) Establish incentives to encourage participation in the Washington college savings program to include but not be limited to entering into agreements with any public or private employer under which an employee may agree to have a designated amount deducted in each payroll period from the wages due the employee for the purpose of making contributions to a participant college savings program account;

(d) Impose and collect administrative fees and charges in connection with any transaction under this chapter;

(e) Appoint and use advisory committees and the state actuary as needed to provide program direction and guidance;

(f) Formulate and adopt all other policies and rules necessary for the efficient administration of the program;

(g) Purchase insurance from insurers licensed to do business in the state, to provide for coverage against any loss in connection with the account's property, assets, or activities;

(h) Make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and other instruments necessary to the exercise and discharge of its powers and duties under this chapter;

(i) Contract for the provision for all or part of the services necessary for the management and operation of the Washington college savings program with other state or nonstate entities authorized to do business in the state for the investment of moneys;

(j) Contract for other services or for goods needed by the governing body in the conduct of its business under this chapter;

(k) Contract with financial consultants, actuaries, auditors, and other consultants as necessary to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter;

(l) Review advisor sold 529 college savings plan programs used by other states to supplement direct-sold channels, provide additional program access and options, increase overall college savings by residents, and, if deemed appropriate, establish an advisor sold option for the Washington college savings program;

(m) Solicit and accept gifts, bequests, cash donations, and grants from any person, governmental agency, private business, or organization; and

(n) Perform all acts necessary and proper to carry out the duties and responsibilities of the Washington college savings program under this chapter.

(10) It is the intent of the legislature to establish policy goals for the Washington college savings program. The policy goals established under this section are deemed consistent with creating a nationally competitive 529 savings plan. The Washington college savings program should support achievement of these policy goals:

(a) Process: To have an investment manager design a thoughtful, well-diversified glide path for age-based portfolios and offer a robust suite of investment options;

(b) People: To have a well-resourced, talented, and long-tenured investment manager;

(c) Parent: To demonstrate that the committee is a good caretaker of college savers' capital and can manage the plan professionally;

(d) Performance: To demonstrate that the program's options have earned their keep with solid risk-adjusted returns over relevant time periods; and

(e) Price: To demonstrate that the investment options are a good value.

(11) The powers, duties, and functions of the Washington college savings program must be performed in a manner consistent with the policy goals in subsection (10) of this section.

(12) The policy goals in this section are intended to be the basis for establishing detailed and measurable objectives and related performance measures.

(13) It is the intent of the legislature that the committee establish objectives and performance measures for the investment manager to progress toward the attainment of the policy goals in subsection (10) of this section. The committee shall submit objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its review and shall provide an updated report on the objectives and measures before the regular session of the legislature during even-numbered years thereafter.

(14) As used in this section, "college preparatory programs with examination" and "concurrent enrollment programs" have the definitions in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 14. RCW 28A.300.560 and 2013 c 184 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to data on student enrollment in ((dual credit courses)) concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs with examination, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collect and post on the Washington state report card web site the rates at which students earn college credit through ((a dual credit course)) concurrent enrollment or college preparatory programs with examination, using the following criteria:

(1) Students who achieve a score of three or higher on an AP examination;

(2) Students who achieve a score of four or higher on an examination of the international baccalaureate diploma programme;

(3) Students who successfully complete a Cambridge advanced international certificate of education examination;

(4) Students who successfully complete a course through the college in the high school program under RCW 28A.600.290 and are awarded credit by the partnering institution of higher education; ((and))

(5) Students who satisfy the dual enrollment and class performance requirements to earn college credit through a ((tech prep)) career technical education dual credit course; and

(6) Students who successfully complete a course through the running start program under RCW 28A.600.300 and are awarded credit by the institution of higher education.

(7) As used in this section, "college preparatory programs with examination" and "concurrent enrollment programs" have the definitions in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 15. RCW 28A.320.195 and 2013 c 184 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each school district board of directors is encouraged to adopt an academic acceleration policy for high school students as provided under this section.

(2) Under an academic acceleration policy:

(a) The district automatically enrolls any student who meets level three of the state standard on the high school statewide student assessment in the next most rigorous level of advanced courses offered by the high school. Students who successfully complete such an advanced course are then enrolled in the next most rigorous level of advanced course, with the objective that students will eventually be automatically enrolled in courses that offer the opportunity to earn ((dual)) college credit ((for high school and college)).

(b) The subject matter of the advanced courses in which the student is automatically enrolled depends on the content area or areas of the statewide student assessment where the student has met the state standard. ((Students who meet the state standard on both end-of-course mathematics assessments are considered to have met the state standard for high school mathematics. Students who meet the state standard in both reading and writing are eligible for enrollment in advanced courses in English, social studies, humanities, and other related subjects.))

(c) The district must notify students and parents or guardians regarding the academic acceleration policy and the advanced courses available to students.

(d) The district must provide a parent or guardian with an opportunity to opt out of the academic acceleration policy and enroll a student in an alternative course.

Sec. 16. RCW 28A.320.196 and 2015 c 202 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, the academic acceleration incentive program is established as provided in this section. The intent of the legislature is that the funds awarded under the program be used to support teacher training, curriculum, technology, examination fees, textbook fees, and other costs associated with offering ((dual credit courses)) concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs with examination to high school students, including transportation for running start students to and from the institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28A.600.300.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate half of the funds appropriated for the purposes of this section on a competitive basis to provide one-time grants for high schools to expand the availability of ((dual credit courses)) concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs with examination. To be eligible for a grant, a school district must have adopted an academic acceleration policy as provided under RCW 28A.320.195. In making grant awards, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must give priority to grants for high schools with a high proportion of low-income students and high schools seeking to develop new capacity for ((dual credit courses)) concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs with examination rather than proposing marginal expansion of current capacity.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate half of the funds appropriated for the purposes of this section to school districts as an incentive award for each student who earned dual high school and college credit, as described under subsection (4) of this section, for courses offered by the district's high schools during the previous school year. School districts must distribute the award to the high schools that generated the funds. The award amount for low-income students eligible to participate in the federal free and reduced-price meals program who earn ((dual)) college credits in high school must be set at one hundred twenty-five percent of the base award for other students. A student who earns more than one ((dual)) college credit in the same school year counts only once for the purposes of the incentive award.

(4) For the purposes of this section, the following students are considered to have earned ((dual)) high school and college credit in a course offered by a high school:

(a) Students who achieve a score of three or higher on an AP examination;

(b) Students who achieve a score of four or higher on an examination of the international baccalaureate diploma programme;

(c) Students who successfully complete a Cambridge advanced international certificate of education examination;

(d) Students who successfully complete a course through the college in the high school program under RCW 28A.600.290 and are awarded credit by the partnering institution of higher education; and

(e) Students who satisfy the dual enrollment and class performance requirements to earn college credit through a ((tech prep)) career technical education dual credit course.

(5) If a high school provides access to online courses for students to earn dual high school and college credit at no cost to the student, such a course is considered to be offered by the high school.

(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the education policy committees and the fiscal committees of the legislature, by January 1st of each year, information about the demographics of the students earning dual credits in the schools receiving grants under this section for the prior school year. Demographic data shall be disaggregated pursuant to RCW 28A.300.042.

(7) As used in this section, "college preparatory programs with examination" and "concurrent enrollment programs" have the definitions in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 17. RCW 28A.600.280 and 2012 c 229 s 505 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges, the Washington state apprenticeship and training council, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the student achievement council, the public baccalaureate institutions, and the education data center, shall report by ((September 1)) December 31, 2010, and annually thereafter to the education and higher education committees of the legislature regarding participation in ((dual credit programs)) concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs with examination. The report shall include:

(a) Data about student participation rates and academic performance including but not limited to running start, college in the high school, ((tech prep)) Cambridge international examination, career technical education dual credit, international baccalaureate, advanced placement, and running start for the trades;

(b) Data on the total unduplicated head count of students enrolled in at least one ((dual credit program course)) concurrent enrollment program or college preparatory program with examination; and

(c) ((The)) As a percentage of students who enrolled in at least one ((dual credit program)) concurrent enrollment program or college preparatory program with examination as percent of all students enrolled in grades nine through twelve.

(2) Data on student participation shall be disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, and receipt of free or reduced-price lunch.

(3) As used in this section, "college preparatory programs with examination" and "concurrent enrollment programs" have the definitions in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 18. RCW 28A.600.285 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 131 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction and the office of student financial assistance shall develop advising guidelines to assure that students and parents understand that college credits earned in high school ((dual credit programs)) concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs with examination may impact eligibility for financial aid.

(2) As used in this section, "college preparatory programs with examination" and "concurrent enrollment programs" have the definitions in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 19. RCW 28A.600.290 and 2015 c 202 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose and commencing with the 2015-16 school year, funding may be allocated at an amount per college credit for eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not yet received a high school diploma or its equivalent and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth grade who are enrolled in college in the high school courses under this section as specified in the omnibus appropriations act and adjusted for inflation from the 2015-16 school year. The maximum annual number of allocated credits per participating student shall be specified in the omnibus appropriations act, which must not exceed ten credits. Funding shall be prioritized in the following order:

(i) High schools offering a running start in the high school program in school year 2014-15. These schools shall only receive prioritized funding in school year 2015-16;

(ii) Students whose residence or the high school in which they are enrolled is located twenty driving miles or more as measured by the most direct route from the nearest eligible institution of higher education offering a running start program, whichever is greater; and

(iii) High schools eligible for the small school funding enhancement in the omnibus appropriations act.

(b)(i) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose and commencing with the 2015-16 school year, and only after the programs in (a) of this subsection are funded, a subsidy may be provided per college credit for eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not yet received a high school diploma or its equivalent and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth grade who have been deemed eligible for free or reduced-price lunch and are enrolled in college in the high school courses under this section as specified in the omnibus appropriations act and adjusted for inflation from the 2015-16 school year. The maximum annual number of subsidized credits per participating student shall be specified in the omnibus appropriations act, which must not exceed five credits.

(ii) Districts wishing to participate in the subsidy program must apply to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by July 1st of each year and report the preliminary estimate of eligible students to receive the subsidy and the total number of projected credit hours.

(iii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall notify districts by September 1st of each school year if the district's students will receive the subsidy. If more districts apply than funding is available, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall prioritize the district applications. The superintendent shall develop factors to determine priority including, but not limited to, the number of ((dual credit opportunities)) concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs with examination available for low-income students in the districts.

(c) Districts shall remit any allocations or subsidies on behalf of participating students under (a) and (b) of this subsection to the participating institution of higher education and those students shall not be required to pay for the credits.

(d) The minimum allocation and subsidy under this section is sixty-five dollars per quarter credit for credit-bearing postsecondary coursework. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, the student achievement council, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the public baccalaureate institutions shall review funding levels for the program every four years beginning in 2017 and recommend changes.

(e) Students may pay college in the high school fees with advanced college tuition payment program tuition units at a rate set by the advanced college tuition payment program governing body under chapter 28B.95 RCW.

(2) For the purposes of funding students enrolled in the college in the high school program in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, college in the high school is defined as a ((dual credit program)) concurrent enrollment programs and college preparatory programs with examination located on a high school campus or in a high school environment in which a high school student is able to earn both high school and postsecondary credit by completing postsecondary level courses with a passing grade.

(3) College in the high school programs may include both academic and career and technical education.

(4) College in the high school programs shall each be governed by a local contract between the district and the participating institution of higher education, in compliance with the rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction under this section.

(5) The college in the high school program must include the provisions in this subsection.

(a) The high school and participating institution of higher education together shall define the criteria for student eligibility. The institution of higher education may charge tuition fees to participating students. If specific funding is provided in the omnibus appropriations act for the per credit allocations and per credit subsidies under subsection (1) of this section, the maximum per credit fee charged to any enrolled student may not exceed the amount of the per credit allocation or subsidy.

(b) The funds received by the participating institution of higher education may not be deemed tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the institution of higher education.

(c) Enrollment information on persons registered under this section must be maintained by the institution of higher education separately from other enrollment information and may not be included in official enrollment reports, nor may such persons be considered in any enrollment statistics that would affect higher education budgetary determinations.

(d) A school district must grant high school credit to a student enrolled in a program course if the student successfully completes the course. If no comparable course is offered by the school district, the school district superintendent shall determine how many credits to award for the course. The determination shall be made in writing before the student enrolls in the course. The credits shall be applied toward graduation requirements and subject area requirements. Evidence of successful completion of each program course shall be included in the student's secondary school records and transcript.

(e) A participating institution of higher education must grant college credit to a student enrolled in a program course if the student successfully completes the course. The college credit shall be applied toward general education requirements or degree requirements at institutions of higher education. Evidence of successful completion of each program course must be included in the student's college transcript.

(f) Tenth, eleventh, and twelfth grade students or students who have not yet received a high school diploma or its equivalent and are eligible to be in the tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grades may participate in the college in the high school program.

(g) Participating school districts must provide general information about the college in the high school program to all students in grades nine through twelve and to the parents and guardians of those students.

(h) Full-time and part-time faculty at institutions of higher education, including adjunct faculty, are eligible to teach program courses.

(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules for the administration of this section. The rules shall be jointly developed by the superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the public baccalaureate institutions. The association of Washington school principals must be consulted during the rules development. The rules must outline quality and eligibility standards that are informed by nationally recognized standards or models. In addition, the rules must encourage the maximum use of the program and may not narrow or limit the enrollment options.

(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Institution of higher education" has the definition in RCW 28B.10.016, and also includes a public tribal college located in Washington and accredited by the Northwest commission on colleges and universities or another accrediting association recognized by the United States department of education.

(b)(i) As used in this section, "program course" means a ((college course offered in a high school under the college in the high school program)) credit-bearing college course offered by a college or university, taught by credentialed teachers, and exclusively offered to tenth, eleventh, and twelfth grade students or students who have not yet received a high school diploma or its equivalent and are eligible to be in the tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade for which earned credits are recorded on a college or university transcript.

(ii) As used in this section, "college preparatory programs with examination" and "concurrent enrollment programs" have the definitions in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 20. RCW 28A.700.005 and 2008 c 170 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that many secondary career and technical education programs have made progress in retooling for the twenty-first century by aligning with state and nationally certified programs that meet industry standards and by increasing the rigor of academic content in core skills such as reading, writing, mathematics, and science.

(2) However, the legislature also finds that increased expectations for students to meet the state's academic learning standards require students to take remedial courses. ((The state board of education is considering increasing credit requirements for high school graduation.)) Together these policies could restrict students from pursuing high quality career and technical education programs because students would not have adequate time in their schedules to enroll in a progressive sequence of career and technical courses.

(3) The legislature further finds that teachers, counselors, students, and parents are not well-informed about the opportunities presented by high quality career and technical education. Secondary career and technical education is not a stopping point but a beginning point for further education, including through a bachelor's degree. Secondary preapprenticeships and courses aligned to industry standards can lead directly to workforce entry as well as to additional education. Career and technical education is a proven strategy to engage and motivate students, including students at risk of dropping out of school entirely.

(4) Finally, the legislature finds that state policies have been piecemeal in support of career and technical education. Laws exist to require state approval of career and technical programs, but could be strengthened by requiring alignment with industry standards and focusing on high-demand fields. ((Tech prep)) Career technical education dual credit consortia have developed articulation agreements for ((dual credit)) concurrent enrollment programs and smooth transitions between high schools and colleges, but agreements remain highly decentralized between individual faculty and individual schools. Laws require school districts to create equivalences between academic and career and technical courses, but more support and professional development is needed to expand these opportunities.

(5) Therefore it is the legislature's intent to identify the gaps in current laws and policies regarding secondary career and technical education and fill those gaps in a comprehensive fashion to create a coherent whole. This act seeks to increase the quality and rigor of secondary career and technical education, improve links to postsecondary education, encourage and facilitate academic instruction through career and technical courses, and expand access to and awareness of the opportunities offered by high quality career and technical education.

(6) As used in this section, "concurrent enrollment programs" has the definition in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 21. RCW 28A.700.010 and 2008 c 170 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To ensure high quality career and technical programs, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall periodically review and approve the plans of local districts for the delivery of career and technical education. Standards for career and technical programs shall be established by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop a schedule for career and technical education plan reapproval under this section that includes an abbreviated review process for programs reapproved after 2005, but before June 12, 2008. All school district career and technical education programs must meet the requirements of this section by August 31, 2010.

(2) To receive approval, school district plans must:

(a) Demonstrate how career and technical education programs will ensure academic rigor; align with the state's education reform requirements; help address the skills gap of Washington's economy; and maintain strong relationships with local career and technical education advisory councils for the design and delivery of career and technical education;

(b) Demonstrate a strategy to align the five-year planning requirement under the federal Carl Perkins act with the state and district career and technical program planning requirements that include:

(i) An assessment of equipment and technology needs to support the skills training of technical students;

(ii) An assessment of industry internships required for teachers to ensure the ability to prepare students for industry-defined standards or certifications, or both;

(iii) An assessment of the costs of supporting job shadows, mentors, community service and industry internships, and other activities for student learning in the community;

(iv) A description of the leadership activities to be provided for technical education students; and

(v) Annual local school board approval;

(c) Demonstrate that all preparatory career and technical education courses offered by the district meet the requirements of RCW 28A.700.030;

(d) Demonstrate progress toward meeting or exceeding the targets established under RCW 28A.700.040 of an increased number of career and technical programs in high-demand fields; and

(e) Demonstrate that approved career and technical programs maximize opportunities for students to earn ((dual credit)) concurrent enrollment programs for high school and college.

(3) To ensure high quality career education programs and services in secondary schools, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may provide technical assistance to local districts and develop state guidelines for the delivery of career guidance in secondary schools.

(4) To ensure leadership development, the staff of the office of the superintendent of public instruction may serve as the state advisors to Washington state FFA, Washington future business leaders of America, Washington DECA, Washington SkillsUSA, Washington family, career and community leaders, and Washington technology students association, and any additional career or technical student organizations that are formed. Working with the directors or executive secretaries of these organizations, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may develop tools for the coordination of leadership activities with the curriculum of technical education programs.

(5)(a) As used in this section, "career and technical education" means a planned program of courses and learning experiences that begins with exploration of career options; supports basic academic and life skills; and enables achievement of high academic standards, leadership, options for high skill, high wage employment preparation, and advanced and continuing education.

(b) As used in this section, "concurrent enrollment programs" has the definition in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 22. RCW 28A.700.030 and 2008 c 170 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All approved preparatory secondary career and technical education programs must meet the following minimum criteria:

(((1))) (a) Either:

(((a))) (i) Lead to a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized by trades, industries, or other professional associations as necessary for employment or advancement in that field; or

(((b))) (ii) Allow students to earn dual credit for high school and college through ((tech prep, advanced placement)) concurrent enrollment programs, college preparatory programs with examination, or other agreements or programs;

(((2))) (b) Be comprised of a sequenced progression of multiple courses that are technically intensive and rigorous; and

(((3))) (c) Lead to workforce entry, state or nationally approved apprenticeships, or postsecondary education in a related field.

(2) As used in this section, "college preparatory programs with examination" and "concurrent enrollment programs" have the definitions in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 23. RCW 28A.700.040 and 2008 c 170 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish performance measures and targets and monitor the performance of career and technical education programs in at least the following areas:

(a) Student participation in and completion of high-demand programs as identified under RCW 28A.700.020;

(b) Student((s earning dual credit)) participation in concurrent enrollment or college preparatory programs with examination for high school and college; and

(c) Performance measures and targets established by the workforce training and education coordinating board, including but not limited to student academic and technical skill attainment, graduation rates, postgraduation employment or enrollment in postsecondary education, and other measures and targets as required by the federal Carl Perkins act, as amended.

(2) If a school district fails to meet the performance targets established under this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may require the district to submit an improvement plan. If a district fails to implement an improvement plan or continues to fail to meet the performance targets for three consecutive years, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may use this failure as the basis to deny the approval or reapproval of one or more of the district's career and technical education programs.

(3) As used in this section, "college preparatory programs with examination" and "concurrent enrollment programs" have the definitions in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 24. RCW 28A.700.080 and 2008 c 170 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and conduct an ongoing campaign for career and technical education to increase awareness among teachers, counselors, students, parents, principals, school administrators, and the general public about the opportunities offered by rigorous career and technical education programs. Messages in the campaign shall emphasize career and technical education as a high quality educational pathway for students, including for students who seek advanced education that includes a bachelor's degree or beyond. In particular, the office shall provide information about the following:

(a) The model career and technical education programs of study developed under RCW 28A.700.060;

(b) Career and technical education course equivalencies and ((dual credit)) concurrent enrollment programs for high school and college;

(c) The career and technical education alternative assessment guidelines under RCW 28A.655.065;

(d) The availability of scholarships for postsecondary workforce education, including the Washington award for vocational excellence, and apprenticeships through the opportunity grant program under RCW 28B.50.271, grants under RCW 28A.700.090, and other programs; and

(e) Education, apprenticeship, and career opportunities in emerging and high-demand programs.

(2) The office shall use multiple strategies in the campaign depending on available funds, including developing an interactive web site to encourage and facilitate career exploration; conducting training and orientation for guidance counselors and teachers; and developing and disseminating printed materials.

(3) The office shall seek advice, participation, and financial assistance from the workforce training and education coordinating board, higher education institutions, foundations, employers, apprenticeship and training councils, workforce development councils, and business and labor organizations for the campaign.

(4) As used in this section, "concurrent enrollment programs" has the definition in section 2 of this act.

--- END ---