BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.575 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, every vehicle stopped or parked upon a two-way roadway shall be so stopped or parked with the right-hand wheels parallel to and within twelve inches of the right-hand curb or as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder.

(2) Except when otherwise provided by local ordinance, every vehicle stopped or parked upon a one-way roadway shall be so stopped or parked parallel to the curb or edge of the roadway, in the direction of authorized traffic movement, with its right-hand wheels within twelve inches of the right-hand curb or as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder, or with its left-hand wheels within twelve inches of the left-hand curb or as close as practicable to the left edge of the left-hand shoulder.

(3) Local authorities may by ordinance or resolution permit:

(a) Angle parking on any roadway, including the angle parking solely of motorcycles, except that angle parking shall not be permitted on any federal-aid or state highway unless the secretary of transportation has determined by order that the roadway is of sufficient width to permit angle parking without interfering with the free movement of traffic; and

(b) More than one motorcycle to occupy a parking space, provided that the parked motorcycles occupying the parking space do not exceed the boundaries of that parking space.

(4) The secretary with respect to highways under his or her jurisdiction may place official traffic control devices prohibiting, limiting, or restricting the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles on any highway where the secretary has determined by order, such stopping, standing, or parking is dangerous to those using the highway or where the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles would unduly interfere with the free movement of traffic thereon. No person shall stop, stand, or park any vehicle in violation of the restrictions indicated by such devices.

--- END ---