BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall require that supported employment providers that include job coaches in their program provide training to those job coaches regarding the support required for activities of daily living as defined by RCW 18.20.310 and identified in the assessment of each individual client that the job coach supports.

(2) The department shall require that supported employment provider job coaches provide verbal or physical assistance to individual clients with activities of daily living as defined by RCW 18.20.310 and identified in the assessment of each individual client that the job coach supports.

--- END ---