BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.43.250 and 2007 c 87 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a) Until July 1, 2007, any member who has attained the age of sixty years shall be retired on the first day of the calendar month next succeeding that in which the member has attained the age of sixty. However, the requirement to retire at age sixty does not apply to a member serving as chief of the Washington state patrol.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2007,)) Any active member who has obtained the age of ((sixty-five)) sixty-eight years shall be retired on the first day of the calendar month next succeeding that in which the member has attained the age of ((sixty-five)) sixty-eight. However, the requirement to retire at age ((sixty-five)) sixty-eight does not apply to a member serving as chief of the Washington state patrol.

(2) Any member who has completed twenty-five years of credited service or has attained the age of fifty-five may apply to retire as provided in RCW 43.43.260, by completing and submitting an application form to the department, setting forth at what time the member desires to be retired.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---