BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.10.020 and 1995 c 374 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A food storage warehouse that is inspected for compliance with the current good manufacturing practices (Title 21 C.F.R. part 110) on at least an annual basis by an independent sanitation consultant approved by the department ((shall be exempted from licensure)) is not required to be licensed under this chapter. A report identifying the inspector and the inspecting entity, the date of the inspection, and any violations noted on such inspection shall be forwarded to the department by the food storage warehouse within sixty days of the completion of the inspection. An inspection shall be conducted and an inspection report for a food storage warehouse shall be filed with the department at least once every twelve months or the warehouse shall be licensed under this chapter and inspected by the department for a period of two years.

(2) A food storage warehouse used to store alcohol beverages manufactured or distributed under a license issued pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW is not required to be licensed under this chapter, provided alcohol beverages are the only food stored in the warehouse.

--- END ---