BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.03.040 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 319 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to RCW 41.04.820, the directors of the several departments and members of the several boards and commissions, whose salaries are fixed by the governor and the chief executive officers of the agencies named in RCW 43.03.028(1) as now or hereafter amended shall each severally receive such salaries, payable in monthly installments, as shall be fixed by the governor or the appropriate salary fixing authority, and, unless set according to RCW 41.26.717(1), in an amount not to exceed the recommendations of the office of financial management. From February 18, 2009, through June 30, 2013, a salary or wage increase shall not be granted to any position under this section, except that increases may be granted for positions for which the employer has demonstrated difficulty retaining qualified employees if the following conditions are met:

(1) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources;

(2) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of client services; and

(3) For any state agency of the executive branch, not including institutions of higher education, the salary increase is approved by the director of the office of financial management.

Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010, through June 30, 2011, to a position under this section shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than July 31, 2011, detailing the positions for which salary increases were granted, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the increases.

Any agency granting a salary increase from July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2013, to a position under this section shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 31, 2012, and July 31, 2013, detailing the positions for which salary increases were granted during the preceding fiscal year, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the increases.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.26.717 and 2003 c 92 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board established in section 4, chapter 2, Laws of 2003 has the following duties and powers in addition to any other duties or powers authorized or required by law. The board:

(1) Shall hire an executive director, and shall fix the salary of the executive director subject to periodic review by the board;

(2) Shall employ other staff as necessary to implement the purposes of chapter 2, Laws of 2003. Staff must be state employees under Title 41 RCW;

(((2))) (3) Shall adopt an annual budget as provided in section 5, chapter 2, Laws of 2003. Expenses of the board are paid from the expense fund created in RCW 41.26.732;

(((3))) (4) May make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and other instruments necessary to exercise and discharge its powers and duties;

(((4))) (5) May contract for all or part of the services necessary for the management and operation of the board with other state or nonstate entities authorized to do business in the state; and

(((5))) (6) May contract with actuaries, auditors, and other consultants as necessary to carry out its responsibilities.

--- END ---