BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.26.110 and 2013 c 213 s 1 and 2013 c 23 s 69 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All claims for disability shall be acted upon and either approved or disapproved by either type of disability board authorized to be created in this section.

(a)(i) Each city ((having a population of twenty thousand or more)) shall:

(A) Establish a city disability board having jurisdiction over all members employed by that city if the city has a population of thirty thousand or more; and

(B) Maintain a city disability board having jurisdiction over all members employed by that city if the city has a population of at least twenty thousand and such city established its disability board on or before the effective date of this section. The operations of an existing city disability board created on or before the effective date of this section shall be maintained by the city and the city shall continue to carry out the benefits as provided by the established city disability board.

(ii) A city operated disability board has jurisdiction over all members employed by those cities and must be composed of the following five members: Two members of the city legislative body to be appointed by the mayor; one active or retired firefighter employed by or retired from the city to be elected by the firefighters employed by or retired from the city who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; one active or retired law enforcement officer employed by or retired from the city to be elected by the law enforcement officers employed by or retired from the city who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; and one member from the public at large who resides within the city to be appointed by the other four members designated in this subsection. Only those active or retired firefighters and law enforcement officers who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect under this section. All firefighters and law enforcement officers employed by or retired from the city are eligible for election. Each of the elected members shall serve a two year term. If there are either no firefighters or law enforcement officers under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second eligible employee representative shall be elected by the law enforcement officers or firefighters eligible to vote. The members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two year terms: PROVIDED, That cities of the first class only, shall retain existing firefighters' pension boards established pursuant to RCW 41.16.020 and existing boards of trustees of the relief and pension fund of the police department as established pursuant to RCW 41.20.010 which such boards shall have authority to act upon and approve or disapprove claims for disability by firefighters or law enforcement officers as provided under the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system act.

(b)(i) Each county shall establish a county disability board ((having)) and have jurisdiction over all members employed by a city whose population reaches twenty thousand after the effective date of this section, if such city has never established a disability board under this section and the city has entered into an interlocal agreement with the county to have jurisdiction over the members employed by that city to carry out the benefits as provided by the county disability board.

(ii) A county operated disability board shall also have jurisdiction over all members employed by or retired from an employer within the county and not employed by a city in which a disability board is established. The county disability board so created shall be composed of five members to be chosen as follows: One member of the legislative body of the county to be appointed by the county legislative body; one member of a city or town legislative body located within the county which does not contain a city disability board established pursuant to (a) of this subsection to be chosen by a majority of the mayors of such cities and towns within the county which does not contain a city disability board; one active firefighter or retired firefighter employed by or retired from an employer within the county to be elected by the firefighters employed or retired from an employer within the county who are not employed by or retired from a city in which a disability board is established and who are subject to the jurisdiction of that board; one law enforcement officer or retired law enforcement officer employed by or retired from an employer within the county to be elected by the law enforcement officers employed in or retired from an employer within the county who are not employed by or retired from a city in which a disability board is established and who are subject to the jurisdiction of that board; and one member from the public at large who resides within the county but does not reside within a city in which a city disability board is established, to be appointed by the other four members designated in this subsection. However, in counties with a population less than sixty thousand, the member of the disability board appointed by a majority of the mayors of the cities and towns within the county that do not contain a city disability board must be a resident of one of the cities and towns but need not be a member of a city or town legislative body. Only those active or retired firefighters and law enforcement officers who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect under this section. All firefighters and law enforcement officers employed by or retired from an employer within the county who are not employed by or retired from a city in which a disability board is established are eligible for election. All members appointed or elected pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two year terms. If there are no firefighters under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second eligible employee representative shall be elected by the law enforcement officers eligible to vote. If there are no law enforcement officers under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second eligible representative shall be elected by the firefighters eligible to vote.

(2) The members of both the county and city disability boards shall not receive compensation for their service upon the boards but the members shall be reimbursed by their respective county or city for all expenses incidental to such service as to the amount authorized by law.

(3) The disability boards authorized for establishment by this section shall perform all functions, exercise all powers, and make all such determinations as specified in this chapter.

--- END ---