BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.150.200 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The program of basic education established under this chapter is deemed by the legislature to comply with the requirements of Article IX, section 1 of the state Constitution, which states that "It is the paramount duty of the state to make ample provision for the education of all children residing within its borders, without distinction or preference on account of race, color, caste, or sex," and is adopted pursuant to Article IX, section 2 of the state Constitution, which states that "The legislature shall provide for a general and uniform system of public schools."

(2) The legislature defines the program of basic education under this chapter as that which is necessary to provide the opportunity to develop the knowledge and skills necessary to meet the state-established high school graduation requirements that are intended to allow students to have the opportunity to graduate with a meaningful diploma that prepares them for postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship. Basic education by necessity is an evolving program of instruction intended to reflect the changing educational opportunities that are needed to equip students for their role as productive citizens and includes the following:

(a) The instructional program of basic education the minimum components of which are described in RCW 28A.150.220;

(b) The program of education provided by chapter 28A.190 RCW for students in residential schools as defined by RCW 28A.190.020 and for juveniles in detention facilities as identified by RCW 28A.190.010;

(c) The program of education provided by chapter 28A.193 RCW for individuals under the age of eighteen who are incarcerated in adult correctional facilities;

(d) Transportation and transportation services to and from school for eligible students as provided under RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.180; and

(e) Statewide salary allocations necessary to hire and retain qualified staff for the state's statutory program of basic education.

(3) For the 2018–19 and 2019-20 school years, a school district qualifies for a hold harmless payment if the sum of the school district's state basic education allocations plus its enrichment levy and local effort assistance under chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. is less than the sum of state basic education allocations, local maintenance and operation levy, and local effort assistance provided under the law as it existed on January 1, 2017. For the purposes of this subsection, the local levy is limited to the lesser of the voter-approved levy as of January 1, 2017, or the maximum levy allowed under the law as of January 1, 2017.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.150.203 and 2017 c 237 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Basic education goal" means the student learning goals and the student knowledge and skills described under RCW 28A.150.210.

(2) "Certificated administrative staff" means all those persons who are chief executive officers, chief administrative officers, confidential employees, supervisors, principals, or assistant principals within the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(4).

(3) "Certificated employee" as used in this chapter and RCW 28A.195.010, 28A.405.100, 28A.405.210, 28A.405.240, 28A.405.250, 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380, and chapter 41.59 RCW, means those persons who hold certificates as authorized by rule of the Washington professional educator standards board.

(4) "Certificated instructional staff" means those persons employed by a school district who are nonsupervisory certificated employees within the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(8), except for paraeducators.

(5) "Class size" means an instructional grouping of students where, on average, the ratio of students to teacher is the number specified.

(6) "Classified employee" means a person who is employed as a paraeducator and a person who does not hold a professional education certificate or is employed in a position that does not require such a certificate.

(7) "Classroom teacher" means a person who holds a professional education certificate and is employed in a position for which such certificate is required whose primary duty is the daily educational instruction of students. In exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without certification may teach students so long as a certificated person exercises general supervision, but the hiring of such classified employees shall not occur during a labor dispute, and such classified employees shall not be hired to replace certificated employees during a labor dispute.

(8) "Instructional program of basic education" means the minimum program required to be provided by school districts and includes instructional hour requirements and other components under RCW 28A.150.220.

(9) "Program of basic education" means the overall program under RCW 28A.150.200 and deemed by the legislature to comply with the requirements of Article IX, section 1 of the state Constitution.

(10) "Resident student" means a student residing within the geographic boundaries of the school district and excludes students who:

(a) Transfer into the district by choice; or

(b) Are enrolled in prekindergarten.

(11) "School day" means each day of the school year on which pupils enrolled in the common schools of a school district are engaged in academic and career and technical instruction planned by and under the direction of the school.

(((11))) (12) "School year" includes the minimum number of school days required under RCW 28A.150.220 and begins on the first day of September and ends with the last day of August, except that any school district may elect to commence the annual school term in the month of August of any calendar year and in such case the operation of a school district for such period in August shall be credited by the superintendent of public instruction to the succeeding school year for the purpose of the allocation and distribution of state funds for the support of such school district.

(((12))) (13) "Teacher planning period" means a period of a school day as determined by the administration and board of directors of the district that may be used by teachers for instruction-related activities including but not limited to preparing instructional materials; reviewing student performance; recording student data; consulting with other teachers, instructional assistants, mentors, instructional coaches, administrators, and parents; or participating in professional development.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.150.260 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as follows:

(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a basic education instructional allocation for each common school district.

(2)(a) The distribution formula under this section shall be for allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under subsections (4)(b) and (c) and (9) of this section, chapter 28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use basic education instructional funds to implement a particular instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning period.

(b) To promote transparency ((in state funding allocations)), the superintendent of public instruction must report state per-pupil ((allocations)) expenditures for each school district for the general apportionment, special education, learning assistance, transitional bilingual, highly capable, and career and technical education programs. The superintendent must also report state general apportionment ((per-pupil allocations by grade)) expenditures for each school ((district)). The superintendent must report this information in a user-friendly format on the main page of the office's web site and on school district apportionment reports. School districts must include a link to the superintendent's per-pupil ((allocations)) expenditures report on the main page of the school district's web site. ((In addition, the budget documents published by the legislature for the enacted omnibus operating appropriations act must report statewide average per-pupil allocations for general apportionment and the categorical programs listed in this subsection.))

(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high, middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section. The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus appropriations act.

(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are defined as follows:

(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;

(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight; and

(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through six.

(4)(a)(i) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following general education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher:

General education

average class size

Grades K-3. . . . 17.00

Grade 4. . . .27.00

Grades 5-6. . . .27.00

Grades 7-8. . . .28.53

Grades 9-12. . . .28.74

(ii) The minimum class size allocation for each prototypical high school shall also provide for enhanced funding for class size reduction for two laboratory science classes within grades nine through twelve per full-time equivalent high school student multiplied by a laboratory science course factor of 0.0833, based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual instructional hours in RCW 28A.150.220, and providing at least one teacher planning period per school day:

Laboratory science

average class size

Grades 9-12. . . .19.98

(b)(i) Beginning ((September 1, 2018)) with the 2019-20 school year, funding for average K-3 class sizes in this subsection (4) may be provided only to the extent of, and proportionate to, the school district's demonstrated actual class size in grades K-3, up to the funded class sizes.

(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules to implement this subsection (4)(b).

(c)(i) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical

education average

class size

Approved career and technical education offered at

the middle school and high school level. . . . 23.00

Skill center programs meeting the standards established

by the office of the superintendent of public

instruction. . . . 20.00

(ii) Funding allocated under this subsection (4)(c) is subject to RCW 28A.150.265.

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum specify:

(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price meals; and

(ii) A specialty average class size for advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses.

(5) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition to classroom teachers:

Elementary School

Middle School

High School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level administrators. . . .

1.253

1.353

1.880

Teacher-librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology, and media to support school library media programs. . . .

0.663

0.519

0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses. . . .

0.076

0.060

0.096

Social workers. . . .

0.042

0.006

0.015

Psychologists. . . .

0.017

0.002

0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and graduation advising. . . .

0.493

1.216

2.539

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional services provided by classified employees. . . .

0.936

0.700

0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides. . . .

2.012

2.325

3.269

Custodians. . . .

1.657

1.942

2.965

Classified staff providing student and staff safety. . . .

0.079

0.092

0.141

Parent involvement coordinators. . . .

0.0825

0.00

0.00

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as follows:

Staff per 1,000

K-12 students

Technology. . . .0.628

Facilities, maintenance, and grounds. . . .1.813

Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics. . . .0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district to support certificated and classified staffing of central administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under subsections (4)(a) and (5) of this section and (a) of this subsection.

(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to school districts for career and technical education and skill center administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified in the omnibus appropriations act.

(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum allocation for each school district shall include allocations per annual average full-time equivalent student for the following materials, supplies, and operating costs as provided in the 2017-18 school year, after which the allocations shall be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus appropriations act:

Per annual average

full-time equivalent student

in grades K-12

Technology. . . . $130.76

Utilities and insurance. . . . $355.30

Curriculum and textbooks. . . . $140.39

Other supplies and library materials. . . . $298.05

Instructional professional development for certificated and

classified staff. . . . $21.71

Facilities maintenance. . . . $176.01

Security and central office administration. . . . $121.94

(b) In addition to the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, beginning in the 2014-15 school year, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide the following minimum allocation for each annual average full-time equivalent student in grades nine through twelve for the following materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted annually for inflation:

Per annual average

full-time equivalent student

in grades 9-12

Technology. . . .$36.35

Curriculum and textbooks. . . .$39.02

Other supplies and library materials. . . .$82.84

Instructional professional development for certificated and

classified staff. . . .$6.04

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this section and subject to RCW 28A.150.265, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:

(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students in grades seven through twelve;

(b) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and

(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.

(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs and services:

(a)(i) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students who are not meeting academic standards through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.3975 hours per week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen learning assistance program students per teacher.

(ii) In addition to funding allocated under (a)(i) of this subsection, to provide supplemental instruction and services for students who are not meeting academic standards in schools where at least fifty percent of students are eligible for free and reduced-price meals. The minimum allocation for this additional high poverty-based allocation must provide for each level of prototypical school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 1.1 hours per week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen learning assistance program students per teacher, under RCW 28A.165.055, school districts must distribute the high poverty-based allocation to the schools that generated the funding allocation.

(b)(i) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be based on the head count number of students in each school who are eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in extra instruction for students in grades kindergarten through six and 6.7780 hours per week in extra instruction for students in grades seven through twelve, with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction program students per teacher. Notwithstanding other provisions of this subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled to provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations act.

(ii) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students who have exited the transitional bilingual program, allocations shall be based on the head count number of students in each school who have exited the transitional bilingual program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment and are eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g). The minimum allocation for each prototypical school shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 3.0 hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen exited students per teacher.

(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030, allocations shall be based on 5.0 percent of each school district's full-time equivalent basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590 hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program students per teacher.

(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a), (5), (6), and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW 28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental instructional resources for students with disabilities.

(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.

(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4), (7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter 28A.700 RCW.

(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or rejection by the legislature.

(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall remain in effect.

(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.

(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.150.276 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Beginning September 1, 2019, school districts may use local revenues only for documented and demonstrated enrichment of the state's statutory program of basic education as authorized in subsection (2) of this section.

(b) Nothing in this section revises the definition of the program of basic education under RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.260.

(c) For purposes of this section, "local revenues" means enrichment levies collected under RCW 84.52.053, ((transportation vehicle enrichment levies,)) local effort assistance funding received under chapter 28A.500 RCW, and other school district local revenues including, but not limited to, grants, donations, and state and federal payments in lieu of taxes, except that "local revenues" does not include other federal revenues, or local revenues that operate as an offset to the district's basic education allocation under RCW 28A.150.250.

(2)(a) Enrichment activities are permitted under this section if they provide supplementation beyond the state:

(i) Minimum instructional offerings of RCW 28A.150.220 or 28A.150.260;

(ii) Staffing ratios or program components of RCW 28A.150.260, including providing additional staff for class size reduction beyond class sizes allocated in the prototypical school model and additional staff beyond the staffing ratios allocated in the prototypical school formula;

(iii) Program components of RCW 28A.150.200, 28A.150.220, or 28A.150.260; or

(iv) Program of professional learning as defined by RCW 28A.415.430 beyond that allocated pursuant to RCW 28A.150.415.

(b) Permitted enrichment activities consist of:

(i) Extracurricular activities, extended school days, or an extended school year;

(ii) Additional course offerings beyond the minimum instructional program established in the state's statutory program of basic education;

(iii) Activities associated with early learning programs;

(iv) Any additional salary costs attributable to the provision or administration of the enrichment activities allowed under this subsection; and

(v) Additional activities or enhancements that the office of the superintendent of public instruction determines to be a documented and demonstrated enrichment of the state's statutory program of basic education under (a) of this subsection and for which the superintendent approves proposed expenditures during the preballot approval process required by RCW 84.52.053 ((and 28A.505.240)).

(3) ((In addition to the limitations of subsections (1) and (2) of this section and of RCW 28A.400.200, permitted enrichment activities are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) If a school district spends local revenues for salary costs attributable to the administration of enrichment programs, the portion of administrator salaries attributable to that purpose may not exceed the proportion of the district's local revenues to its other revenues; and

(b) Supplemental contracts under RCW 28A.400.200 are subject to the limitations of this section.

(4))) The superintendent of public instruction must adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.150.415 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the 2018-19 school year, the legislature shall begin phasing in funding for professional learning days for certificated instructional staff. At a minimum, the state must allocate funding for:

(a) One professional learning day in the 2018-19 school year;

(b) Two professional learning days in the 2019-20 school year; and

(c) Three professional learning days in the 2020-21 school year.

(2) The calculation for the professional development allocation is as follows:

(a) Multiply the number of state allocated certificated instructional staff units by the statewide average salary allocation and the regionalization factor;

(b) Divide the result of (a) of this subsection by one hundred eighty to derive a daily rate; and

(c) Multiply the daily rate resulting from (b) of this subsection by the number of professional development days described in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Nothing in this section entitles an individual certificated instructional staff to any particular number of professional learning days.

(((3))) (4) Nothing in this section requires a school district to provide professional learning days in excess of the days that are funded by this allotment.

(5) The professional learning days must meet the definitions and standards provided in RCW 28A.415.430, 28A.415.432, and 28A.415.434.

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.165.055 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 405 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The funds for the learning assistance program shall be appropriated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.260 and the omnibus appropriations act. The distribution formula is for school district allocation purposes only, except as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a)(ii), but all funds appropriated for the learning assistance program must be expended for the purposes of RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065.

(2) A district's high poverty-based allocation is generated by its qualifying school buildings and must be expended by the district for those buildings. This funding must supplement and not supplant the district's expenditures under this chapter for those school buildings.

(3) A school may continue to receive funding for one year after it no longer meets the definition of qualifying school.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "qualifying school" means a school in which the three-year rolling average of the prior year total annual average enrollment that qualifies for free or reduced price lunches equals or exceeds fifty percent or more of its total annual average enrollment.

Sec. 7. RCW 28A.320.330 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

School districts shall establish the following funds in addition to those provided elsewhere by law:

(1)(a) A general fund for the school district to account for all financial operations of the school district except those required to be accounted for in another fund.

(b) By the 2019-20 school year, a local revenue subfund of its general fund to account for the financial operations of a school district that are paid from local revenues. The local revenues that must be deposited in the local revenue subfund are enrichment levies ((and transportation vehicle enrichment levies)) collected under RCW 84.52.053, local effort assistance funding received under chapter 28A.500 RCW, and other school district local revenues including, but not limited to, grants, donations, and state and federal payments in lieu of taxes, but do not include other federal revenues, or local revenues that operate as an offset to the district's basic education allocation under RCW 28A.150.250. School districts must track expenditures from this subfund separately to account for the expenditure of each of these streams of revenue by source, and must provide any supplemental expenditure schedules required by the superintendent of public instruction or state auditor for purposes of RCW 43.09.2856.

(2) A capital projects fund shall be established for major capital purposes. All statutory references to a "building fund" shall mean the capital projects fund so established. Money to be deposited into the capital projects fund shall include, but not be limited to, bond proceeds, proceeds from excess levies authorized by RCW 84.52.053, state apportionment proceeds as authorized by RCW 28A.150.270, earnings from capital projects fund investments as authorized by RCW 28A.320.310 and 28A.320.320, and state forest revenues transferred pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

Money derived from the sale of bonds, including interest earnings thereof, may only be used for those purposes described in RCW 28A.530.010, except that accrued interest paid for bonds shall be deposited in the debt service fund.

Money to be deposited into the capital projects fund shall include but not be limited to rental and lease proceeds as authorized by RCW 28A.335.060, and proceeds from the sale of real property as authorized by RCW 28A.335.130.

Money legally deposited into the capital projects fund from other sources may be used for the purposes described in RCW 28A.530.010, and for the purposes of:

(a) Major renovation and replacement of facilities and systems where periodical repairs are no longer economical or extend the useful life of the facility or system beyond its original planned useful life. Such renovation and replacement shall include, but shall not be limited to, major repairs, exterior painting of facilities, replacement and refurbishment of roofing, exterior walls, windows, heating and ventilating systems, floor covering in classrooms and public or common areas, and electrical and plumbing systems.

(b) Renovation and rehabilitation of playfields, athletic fields, and other district real property.

(c) The conduct of preliminary energy audits and energy audits of school district buildings. For the purpose of this section:

(i) "Preliminary energy audits" means a determination of the energy consumption characteristics of a building, including the size, type, rate of energy consumption, and major energy using systems of the building.

(ii) "Energy audit" means a survey of a building or complex which identifies the type, size, energy use level, and major energy using systems; which determines appropriate energy conservation maintenance or operating procedures and assesses any need for the acquisition and installation of energy conservation measures, including solar energy and renewable resource measures.

(iii) "Energy capital improvement" means the installation, or modification of the installation, of energy conservation measures in a building which measures are primarily intended to reduce energy consumption or allow the use of an alternative energy source.

(d) Those energy capital improvements which are identified as being cost-effective in the audits authorized by this section.

(e) Purchase or installation of additional major items of equipment and furniture: PROVIDED, That vehicles shall not be purchased with capital projects fund money.

(f)(i) Costs associated with implementing technology systems, facilities, and projects, including acquiring hardware, licensing software, and online applications and training related to the installation of the foregoing. However, the software or applications must be an integral part of the district's technology systems, facilities, or projects.

(ii) Costs associated with the application and modernization of technology systems for operations and instruction including, but not limited to, the ongoing fees for online applications, subscriptions, or software licenses, including upgrades and incidental services, and ongoing training related to the installation and integration of these products and services. However, to the extent the funds are used for the purpose under this subsection (2)(f)(ii), the school district shall transfer to the district's general fund the portion of the capital projects fund used for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop accounting guidelines for these transfers in accordance with internal revenue service regulations.

(g) Major equipment repair, painting of facilities, and other major preventative maintenance purposes. However, to the extent the funds are used for the purpose under this subsection (2)(g), the school district shall transfer to the district's general fund the portion of the capital projects fund used for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop accounting guidelines for these transfers in accordance with internal revenue service regulations. Based on the district's most recent two-year history of general fund maintenance expenditures, funds used for this purpose may not replace routine annual preventive maintenance expenditures made from the district's general fund.

(3) A debt service fund to provide for tax proceeds, other revenues, and disbursements as authorized in chapter 39.44 RCW. State forestland revenues that are deposited in a school district's debt service fund pursuant to RCW 79.64.110 and to the extent not necessary for payment of debt service on school district bonds may be transferred by the school district into the district's capital projects fund.

(4) An associated student body fund as authorized by RCW 28A.325.030.

(5) Advance refunding bond funds and refunded bond funds to provide for the proceeds and disbursements as authorized in chapter 39.53 RCW.

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.400.205 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) School district employees shall be provided an annual salary inflationary increase in accordance with this section.

(a) The inflationary increase shall be calculated by applying the rate of the yearly increase in the inflationary adjustment index to any state-funded salary base used in state funding formulas for teachers and other school district employees. Beginning with the 2020-21 school year, each school district shall be provided an inflationary adjustment allocation sufficient to grant this inflationary increase.

(b) A school district shall distribute its inflationary adjustment allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with the district's collective bargaining agreements and compensation policies. No later than the end of the school year, each school district shall certify to the superintendent of public instruction that it has spent funds provided for inflationary increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.

(c) Any funded inflationary increase shall be included in the salary base used to determine inflationary increases for school employees in subsequent years. For teachers and other certificated instructional staff, the rate of the annual inflationary increase funded for certificated instructional staff shall be applied to the base salary used with the statewide salary allocation methodology established under RCW 28A.150.410 and to any other salary allocation methodologies used to recognize school district personnel costs.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "inflationary adjustment index" means, for ((any)) the school year beginning September 1st, the annual change in the implicit price deflator for ((that fiscal year, using the official current base, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the state of Washington)) personal expenditure consumption as reported in the March publication of the Washington economic and revenue forecast council for that calendar year.

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.500.015 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in calendar year 2019 and each calendar year thereafter, the state must provide state local effort assistance funding to supplement school district enrichment levies as provided in this section.

(2) For an eligible school district, annual local effort assistance funding is equal to ((the school district's maximum local effort assistance multiplied)) the state local effort assistance threshold. If a school district's actual enrichment levy is less than the maximum allowable enrichment levy, the state local effort assistance threshold is reduced by a fraction equal to the school district's actual enrichment levy divided by the school district's maximum allowable enrichment levy.

(3) The state local effort assistance funding provided under this section is not part of the state's program of basic education deemed by the legislature to comply with the requirements of Article IX, section 1 of the state Constitution.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Eligible school district" means a school district whose maximum allowable enrichment levy divided by the school district's ((total student enrollment)) resident students in the prior school year is less than the state local effort assistance threshold.

(b) "Inflation" means inflation as defined in RCW 84.55.005.

(c) "Maximum allowable enrichment levy" means the maximum levy permitted by RCW 84.52.0531 divided by the school district's resident students in the prior school year.

(d) "Maximum local effort assistance" means the amount that results from multiplying the school district's resident students ((enrollment)) in the prior school year ((multiplied)) by the difference of the state local effort assistance threshold and a school district's maximum allowable enrichment levy ((divided by the school district's student enrollment in the prior school year)).

(e) "Prior school year" means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the state local effort assistance funding is to be distributed.

(f) "State local effort assistance threshold" means ((one thousand five)) two thousand one hundred dollars per resident student in the prior school year, adjusted for inflation beginning in calendar year 2020.

(g) "Resident student ((enrollment))" means the average annual ((resident)) full-time equivalent student enrollment of students who meet the definition of "resident student" under RCW 28A.150.203.

Sec. 10. RCW 28A.710.280 and 2016 c 241 s 128 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature intends that state funding for charter schools be distributed equitably with state funding provided for other public schools.

(2) For eligible students enrolled in a charter school established and operating in accordance with this chapter, the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit to each charter school an amount calculated as provided in this section and based on the statewide average ((staff mix factor)) salaries set forth in RCW 28A.150.410 for certificated instructional staff adjusted by the regionalization factor that applies to the school district in which the charter school is geographically located, including any enrichment to those statutory formulae that is specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The amount must be the sum of (a) and (b) of this subsection, as applicable.

(a) The superintendent shall, for purposes of making distributions under this section, separately calculate and distribute to charter schools moneys appropriated for general apportionment under the same ratios as in RCW 28A.150.260.

(b) The superintendent also shall, for purposes of making distributions under this section, and in accordance with the applicable formulae for categorical programs specified in (b)(i) through (v) of this subsection (2) and any enrichment to those statutory formulae that is specified in the omnibus appropriations act, separately calculate and distribute moneys appropriated by the legislature to charter schools for:

(i) Supplemental instruction and services for underachieving students through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065;

(ii) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled students and exited students whose primary language is other than English through the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080;

(iii) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020;

(iv) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030; and

(v) Pupil transportation services to and from school in accordance with RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.180. Distributions for pupil transportation must be calculated on a per eligible student basis based on the allocation for the previous school year to the school district in which the charter school is located.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction must adopt rules necessary for the distribution of funding required by this section and to comply with federal reporting requirements.

Sec. 11. RCW 28A.715.040 and 2013 c 242 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact must report student enrollment. Reporting must be done in the same manner and use the same definitions of enrolled students and annual average full-time equivalent enrollment as is required of school districts. The reporting requirements in this subsection are required for a school to receive state or federal funding that is allocated based on student characteristics.

(2) Funding for a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact shall be apportioned by the superintendent of public instruction according to the schedule established under RCW 28A.510.250, including general apportionment, special education, categorical, and other nonbasic education moneys. Allocations for certificated instructional staff must be based on the statewide average ((staff mix ratio of the school, as calculated by the superintendent of public instruction using the statewide salary allocation schedule and related documents, conditions, and limitations established by the omnibus appropriations act)) salary set forth in RCW 28A.150.410 adjusted by the regionalization factor that applies to the school district in which the school is located. Allocations for classified staff and certificated administrative staff must be based on the salary allocations of the school district in which the school is located((, subject to conditions and limitations established by the omnibus appropriations act)) as set forth in RCW 28A.150.410 adjusted by the regionalization factor that applies to the school district in which the school is located. Nothing in this section requires a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact to use the statewide salary allocation schedule. Such a school is eligible to apply for state grants on the same basis as a school district.

(3) Any moneys received by a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact from any source that remain in the school's accounts at the end of any budget year must remain in the school's accounts for use by the school during subsequent budget years.

Sec. 12. RCW 41.56.800 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A school district collective bargaining agreement that is executed or modified after July 6, 2017, and that is in effect for the 2018-19 school year may not ((provide)) increase total school district expenditures for classified staff ((with a percentage increase to total salary)) salaries for the 2018-19 school year((, including supplemental contracts, that exceeds)) by more than the previous calendar year's annual average consumer price index, using the official current base compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor, for the city of Seattle. However, if a district's average classified staff salary is less than the average classified salary allocated by the state for that year, the district may increase salaries not to exceed the point where the district's average classified staff salary equals the average classified staff salary allocated by the state.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits individuals from receiving additional compensation for service including, but not limited to, additional days or hours of service, additional responsibilities, step increases, and expansions of academic programs that require additional personnel or increased service provided by current personnel.

(3) This section expires August 31, 2019.

Sec. 13. RCW 41.59.800 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A school district collective bargaining agreement that is executed or modified after July 6, 2017, and that is in effect for the 2018-19 school year may not ((provide)) increase total school district expenditures for certificated instructional staff ((with a percentage increase to total salary)) salaries for the 2018-19 school year((, including supplemental contracts, that exceeds)) by more than the previous calendar year's annual average consumer price index, using the official current base compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor, for the city of Seattle. However, if a district's average certificated instructional staff salary is less than the average certificated instructional staff salary allocated by the state for that year, the district may increase salaries not to exceed the point where the district's average certificated instructional staff salary equals the average certificated instructional staff salary allocated by the state.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits individuals from receiving additional compensation for service including, but not limited to, additional days or hours of service, additional responsibilities, step increases, and expansions of academic programs that require additional personnel or increased service provided by current personnel.

(3) This section expires August 31, 2019.

Sec. 14. RCW 28A.400.006 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 703 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A school district may not ((provide any)) increase total school district expenditures for certificated administrative staff ((with a percentage increase to total salary)) for the 2018-19 school year((, including supplemental contracts, that exceeds)) by more than the previous calendar year's annual average consumer price index, using the official current base compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor, for the city of Seattle. However, if a district's average certificated administrative staff salary is less than the average certificated administrative salary allocated by the state for that year, the district may increase salaries not to exceed the point where the district's average certificated administrative staff salary equals the average certificated administrative staff salary allocated by the state.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits individuals from receiving additional compensation for service including, but not limited to, additional days or hours of service, additional responsibilities, step increases, and expansions of academic programs that require additional personnel or increased service provided by current personnel.

(3) This section expires August 31, 2019.

Sec. 15. RCW 84.52.053 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and 84.52.043 shall not prevent the levy of taxes by school districts, when authorized so to do by the voters of such school district in the manner and for the purposes and number of years allowable under Article VII, section 2(a) and Article IX, section 1 of the Constitution of this state. Elections for such taxes shall be held in the year in which the levy is made or, in the case of propositions authorizing two-year through four-year levies for enrichment funding for a school district, authorizing two-year levies for transportation vehicle funds established in RCW 28A.160.130 through calendar year 2019, authorizing two-year levies for transportation vehicle ((enrichment)) levies beginning with calendar year 2020, or authorizing two-year through six-year levies to support the construction, modernization, or remodeling of school facilities, which includes the purposes of RCW 28A.320.330(2) (f) and (g), in the year in which the first annual levy is made.

(2)(a) Once additional tax levies have been authorized for enrichment funding for a school district for a two-year through four-year period as provided under subsection (1) of this section, no further additional tax levies for enrichment funding for the district for that period may be authorized, except for additional levies to provide for subsequently enacted increases affecting the district's maximum levy.

(b) Notwithstanding (a) of this subsection, any school district that is required to annex or receive territory pursuant to a dissolution of a financially insolvent school district pursuant to RCW 28A.315.225 may call either a replacement or supplemental levy election within the school district, including the territory annexed or transferred, as follows:

(i) An election for a proposition authorizing two-year through four-year levies for enrichment funding for a school district may be called and held before the effective date of dissolution to replace existing enrichment levies and to provide for increases due to the dissolution.

(ii) An election for a proposition authorizing additional tax levies may be called and held before the effective date of dissolution to provide for increases due to the dissolution.

(iii) In the event a replacement levy election under (b)(i) of this subsection is held but does not pass, the affected school district may subsequently hold a supplemental levy election pursuant to (b)(ii) of this subsection if the supplemental levy election is held before the effective date of dissolution. In the event a supplemental levy election is held under (b)(ii) of this subsection but does not pass, the affected school district may subsequently hold a replacement levy election pursuant to (b)(i) of this subsection if the replacement levy election is held before the effective date of dissolution. Failure of a replacement levy or supplemental levy election does not affect any previously approved and existing enrichment levy within the affected school district or districts.

(c) For the purpose of applying the limitation of this subsection (2), a two-year through six-year levy to support the construction, modernization, or remodeling of school facilities shall not be deemed to be a tax levy for enrichment funding for a school district.

(3) A special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by the board of school directors, by giving notice thereof by publication in the manner provided by law for giving notices of general elections, at which special election the proposition authorizing such excess levy shall be submitted in such form as to enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote "yes" and those opposed thereto to vote "no."

(4)(a) Beginning September 1, 2019, school districts may use enrichment levies ((and transportation vehicle enrichment levies)) solely to enrich the state's statutory program of basic education as authorized under RCW 28A.150.276.

(b) Beginning with propositions for enrichment levies ((and transportation vehicle enrichment levies)) for collection in calendar year 2020 and thereafter, a district must receive approval of an enrichment levy expenditure plan from the superintendent of public instruction ((under RCW 28A.505.240)) before submission of the proposition to the voters.

Sec. 16. RCW 84.52.0531 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with taxes levied for collection in 2019, the maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school district for enrichment levies under RCW 84.52.053 is ((equal to the lesser of one dollar and fifty cents per thousand dollars of the assessed value of property in the school district)) the dollar amount approved by voters for the 2018 tax year or the maximum per-pupil limit.

(2) If the local levy rate produced by subsection (1) of this section exceeds the sum of one dollar and fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation plus the rate of the state property tax levy under RCW 84.52.065(2), the local levy rate must be reduced by the amount of the state property tax levy under RCW 84.52.065(2).

(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Inflation" means inflation as defined in RCW 84.55.005.

(b) "Maximum per-pupil limit" means two thousand five hundred dollars, multiplied by the number of average annual resident full-time equivalent students enrolled in the school district in the prior school year. Beginning with property taxes levied for collection in 2020, the maximum per-pupil limit shall be increased by inflation.

(c) "Prior school year" means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies are to be collected.

(((3) Beginning with propositions for enrichment levies for collection in calendar year 2020 and thereafter, a district must receive approval of an enrichment levy expenditure plan under RCW 28A.505.240 before submission of the proposition to the voters.))

(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

(5) Beginning with taxes levied for collection in 2020, enrichment levy revenues must be deposited in a separate subfund of the school district's general fund pursuant to RCW 28A.320.330, and are subject to the restrictions of RCW 28A.150.276 and the audit requirements of RCW 43.09.2856.

(6) Funds collected from transportation vehicle ((enrichment)) levies shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. RCW 28A.505.240 (Enrichment levy spending plans—Preballot approval—Revised spending plan for voter-approved levies) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 204 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. Sections 9, 15, and 16 of this act take effect January 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. Section 1 of this act expires August 31, 2020.

--- END ---