BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.17.160 and 2011 c 326 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Before accepting an application for a quick title of a vehicle under RCW 46.12.555, the department, participating county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant to pay a ((fifty)) twenty-five dollar quick title service fee in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law. The quick title service fee must be distributed under RCW 46.68.025.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.68.025 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The quick title service fee imposed under RCW 46.17.160 must be distributed as follows:

(a) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited to the motor vehicle fund established under RCW 46.68.070.

(b) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or other agent appointed by the director, ((twenty-five dollars)) the fee must be ((deposited to the motor vehicle fund established under RCW 46.68.070. The remainder must be)) retained by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the county auditor.

(c) If the fee is paid to a subagent appointed by the director, ((twenty-five dollars must be deposited to the motor vehicle fund established under RCW 46.68.070. The remaining twenty-five dollars must be distributed as follows:)) twelve dollars and fifty cents must be retained by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the county auditor and twelve dollars and fifty cents must be retained by the subagent.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "quick title" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.12.555.

Sec. 3. RCW 88.02.640 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 17 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any other fees and taxes required by law, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must charge the following vessel fees and surcharge:

FEE

AMOUNT

AUTHORITY

DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary permit

$5.00

RCW 88.02.800(2)

General fund

(b) Derelict vessel and invasive species removal

Subsection (3) of this section

Subsection (3) of this section

Subsection (3) of this section

(c) Derelict vessel removal surcharge

$1.00

Subsection (4) of this section

Subsection (4) of this section

(d) Duplicate certificate of title

$1.25

RCW 88.02.530(1)(c)

General fund

(e) Duplicate registration

$1.25

RCW 88.02.590(1)(c)

General fund

(f) Filing

RCW 46.17.005

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.400

(g) License plate technology

RCW 46.17.015

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.370

(h) License service

RCW 46.17.025

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.220

(i) Nonresident vessel permit

Subsection (5) of this section

RCW 88.02.620(4)

Subsection (5) of this section

(j) Quick title service

(($50.00)) $25.00

RCW 88.02.540(3)

Subsection (7) of this section

(k) Registration

$10.50

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 88.02.650

(l) Replacement decal

$1.25

RCW 88.02.595(1)(c)

General fund

(m) Service fee

RCW 46.17.040

RCW 88.02.515 and 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.17.040

(n) Title application

$5.00

RCW 88.02.515

General fund

(o) Transfer

$1.00

RCW 88.02.560(7)

General fund

(p) Vessel visitor permit

$30.00

RCW 88.02.610(3)

Subsection (6) of this section

(2) The five dollar dealer temporary permit fee required in subsection (1) of this section must be credited to the payment of registration fees at the time application for registration is made.

(3) The derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee required in subsection (1) of this section is five dollars and must be distributed as follows:

(a) Two dollars must be deposited in the aquatic invasive species management account created in RCW 77.135.200;

(b) One dollar must be deposited into the aquatic algae control account created in RCW 43.21A.667; and

(c) Two dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100.

(4) In addition to other fees required in this section, an annual derelict vessel removal surcharge of one dollar must be charged with each vessel registration. The surcharge is to address the significant backlog of derelict vessels accumulated in Washington waters that pose a threat to the health and safety of the people and to the environment and must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100.

(5)(a) The amount of the nonresident vessel permit fee is:

(i) For a vessel owned by a nonresident natural person, twenty-five dollars; and

(ii) For a nonresident vessel owner that is not a natural person, the fee is equal to:

(A) Twenty-five dollars per foot for vessels between thirty and ninety-nine feet in length;

(B) Thirty dollars per foot for vessels between one hundred and one hundred twenty feet in length; and

(C) Thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents per foot for vessels between one hundred twenty-one and one hundred sixty-four feet in length. The fee must be multiplied by the extreme length of the vessel in feet, rounded up to the nearest whole foot.

(b) The fee must be paid by the vessel owner to the department. Any moneys remaining from the fee after the payment of costs to administer the permit must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650.

(c) A nonresident vessel owner that is not a natural person may not obtain more than two nonresident vessel permits under RCW 88.02.620 within any thirty-six month period.

(6) The thirty dollar vessel visitor permit fee must be distributed as follows:

(a) Five dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100;

(b) The department may keep an amount to cover costs for providing the vessel visitor permit;

(c) Any moneys remaining must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650; and

(d) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.17.005 are in addition to any other fee or tax due for the titling and registration of vessels.

(7)(a) The ((fifty)) twenty-five dollar quick title service fee must be distributed as follows:

(i) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited to the general fund.

(ii) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or other agent appointed by the director, ((twenty-five dollars)) the fee must be ((deposited to the general fund. The remainder must be)) retained by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the county auditor.

(iii) If the fee is paid to a subagent appointed by the director, ((twenty-five dollars must be deposited to the general fund. The remaining twenty-five dollars must be distributed as follows:)) twelve dollars and fifty cents must be retained by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the county auditor and twelve dollars and fifty cents must be retained by the subagent.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "quick title" has the same meaning as in RCW 88.02.540.

(8) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall charge the service fee under subsection (1)(m) of this section beginning January 1, 2016.

Sec. 4. RCW 88.02.640 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 17 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any other fees and taxes required by law, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must charge the following vessel fees and surcharge:

FEE

AMOUNT

AUTHORITY

DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary permit

$5.00

RCW 88.02.800(2)

General fund

(b) Derelict vessel and invasive species removal

Subsection (3) of this section

Subsection (3) of this section

Subsection (3) of this section

(c) Derelict vessel removal surcharge

$1.00

Subsection (4) of this section

Subsection (4) of this section

(d) Duplicate certificate of title

$1.25

RCW 88.02.530(1)(c)

General fund

(e) Duplicate registration

$1.25

RCW 88.02.590(1)(c)

General fund

(f) Filing

RCW 46.17.005

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.400

(g) License plate technology

RCW 46.17.015

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.370

(h) License service

RCW 46.17.025

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.220

(i) Nonresident vessel permit

Subsection (5) of this section

RCW 88.02.620(4)

Subsection (5) of this section

(j) Quick title service

(($50.00)) $25.00

RCW 88.02.540(3)

Subsection (7) of this section

(k) Registration

$10.50

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 88.02.650

(l) Replacement decal

$1.25

RCW 88.02.595(1)(c)

General fund

(m) Service fee

RCW 46.17.040

RCW 88.02.515 and 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.17.040

(n) Title application

$5.00

RCW 88.02.515

General fund

(o) Transfer

$1.00

RCW 88.02.560(7)

General fund

(p) Vessel visitor permit

$30.00

RCW 88.02.610(3)

Subsection (6) of this section

(2) The five dollar dealer temporary permit fee required in subsection (1) of this section must be credited to the payment of registration fees at the time application for registration is made.

(3) The derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee required in subsection (1) of this section is five dollars and must be distributed as follows:

(a) Two dollars must be deposited in the aquatic invasive species management account created in RCW 77.135.200;

(b) One dollar must be deposited into the aquatic algae control account created in RCW 43.21A.667; and

(c) Two dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100.

(4) In addition to other fees required in this section, an annual derelict vessel removal surcharge of one dollar must be charged with each vessel registration. The surcharge is to address the significant backlog of derelict vessels accumulated in Washington waters that pose a threat to the health and safety of the people and to the environment and must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100.

(5)(a) The amount of the nonresident vessel permit fee is:

(i) For a vessel owned by a nonresident natural person, twenty-five dollars; and

(ii) For a nonresident vessel owner that is not a natural person, the fee is equal to:

(A) Twenty-five dollars per foot for vessels between thirty and ninety-nine feet in length;

(B) Thirty dollars per foot for vessels between one hundred and one hundred twenty feet in length; and

(C) Thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents per foot for vessels between one hundred twenty-one and one hundred sixty-four feet in length. The fee must be multiplied by the extreme length of the vessel in feet, rounded up to the nearest whole foot.

(b) The fee must be paid by the vessel owner to the department. Any moneys remaining from the fee after the payment of costs to administer the permit must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650.

(c) A nonresident vessel owner that is not a natural person may not obtain more than two nonresident vessel permits under RCW 88.02.620 within any thirty-six month period.

(6) The thirty dollar vessel visitor permit fee must be distributed as follows:

(a) Five dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100;

(b) The department may keep an amount to cover costs for providing the vessel visitor permit;

(c) Any moneys remaining must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650; and

(d) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.17.005 are in addition to any other fee or tax due for the titling and registration of vessels.

(7)(a) The ((fifty)) twenty-five dollar quick title service fee must be distributed as follows:

(i) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited to the general fund.

(ii) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or other agent appointed by the director, ((twenty-five dollars)) the fee must be ((deposited to the general fund. The remainder must be)) retained by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the county auditor.

(iii) If the fee is paid to a subagent appointed by the director, ((twenty-five dollars must be deposited to the general fund. The remaining twenty-five dollars must be distributed as follows:)) twelve dollars and fifty cents must be retained by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the county auditor and twelve dollars and fifty cents must be retained by the subagent.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "quick title" has the same meaning as in RCW 88.02.540.

(8) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall charge the service fee under subsection (1)(m) of this section beginning January 1, 2016.

Sec. 5. RCW 88.02.640 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 17 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any other fees and taxes required by law, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall charge the following vessel fees and surcharge:

FEE

AMOUNT

AUTHORITY

DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary permit

$5.00

RCW 88.02.800(2)

General fund

(b) Derelict vessel and invasive species removal

Subsection (3) of this section

Subsection (3) of this section

Subsection (3) of this section

(c) Derelict vessel removal surcharge

$1.00

Subsection (4) of this section

Subsection (4) of this section

(d) Duplicate certificate of title

$1.25

RCW 88.02.530(1)(c)

General fund

(e) Duplicate registration

$1.25

RCW 88.02.590(1)(c)

General fund

(f) Filing

RCW 46.17.005

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.400

(g) License plate technology

RCW 46.17.015

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.370

(h) License service

RCW 46.17.025

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.220

(i) Nonresident vessel permit

$25.00

RCW 88.02.620(3)

Subsection (5) of this section

(j) Quick title service

(($50.00)) $25.00

RCW 88.02.540(3)

Subsection (7) of this section

(k) Registration

$10.50

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 88.02.650

(l) Replacement decal

$1.25

RCW 88.02.595(1)(c)

General fund

(m) Service fee

RCW 46.17.040

RCW 88.02.515 and 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.17.040

(n) Title application

$5.00

RCW 88.02.515

General fund

(o) Transfer

$1.00

RCW 88.02.560(7)

General fund

(p) Vessel visitor permit

$30.00

RCW 88.02.610(3)

Subsection (6) of this section

(2) The five dollar dealer temporary permit fee required in subsection (1) of this section must be credited to the payment of registration fees at the time application for registration is made.

(3) The derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee required in subsection (1) of this section is five dollars and must be distributed as follows:

(a) Two dollars must be deposited in the aquatic invasive species management account created in RCW 77.135.200;

(b) One dollar must be deposited into the aquatic algae control account created in RCW 43.21A.667; and

(c) Two dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100.

(4) In addition to other fees required in this section, an annual derelict vessel removal surcharge of one dollar must be charged with each vessel registration. The surcharge is to address the significant backlog of derelict vessels accumulated in Washington waters that pose a threat to the health and safety of the people and to the environment and must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100.

(5) The twenty-five dollar nonresident vessel permit fee must be paid by the vessel owner to the department for the cost of providing the identification document by the department. Any moneys remaining from the fee after the payment of costs must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650.

(6) The thirty dollar vessel visitor permit fee must be distributed as follows:

(a) Five dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100;

(b) The department may keep an amount to cover costs for providing the vessel visitor permit;

(c) Any moneys remaining must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650; and

(d) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.17.005 are in addition to any other fee or tax due for the titling and registration of vessels.

(7)(a) The ((fifty)) twenty-five dollar quick title service fee must be distributed as follows:

(i) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited to the general fund.

(ii) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or other agent appointed by the director, ((twenty-five dollars)) the fee must be ((deposited to the general fund. The remainder must be)) retained by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the county auditor.

(iii) If the fee is paid to a subagent appointed by the director, ((twenty-five dollars must be deposited to the general fund. The remaining twenty-five dollars must be distributed as follows:)) twelve dollars and fifty cents must be retained by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the county auditor and twelve dollars and fifty cents must be retained by the subagent.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "quick title" has the same meaning as in RCW 88.02.540.

(8) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall charge the service fee under subsection (1)(m) of this section beginning January 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. Section 4 of this act expires January 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Section 5 of this act takes effect January 1, 2026.

--- END ---