BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The Washington state institute for public policy shall conduct a study of medical debt in Washington. The study must include:

(a) A systematic review of the prevalence and impact of medical debt on Washingtonians including, but not limited to, if available:

(i) The nature and amount of medical debt;

(ii) The amount of prejudgment interest sought;

(iii) Attorneys' fees and other collection costs sought by collection agencies;

(iv) Number and rate of default judgments in medical debt collection cases;

(v) The amount of postjudgment interest, garnishment fees, and other costs after judgment; and

(vi) Hospital debt collection policies; and

(b) A comparison of the laws and practices regarding medical debt collection in Washington with those in other states.

(2) In conducting its analysis, the Washington state institute for public policy may work with the administrative office of the courts and individual courts throughout the state in order to access necessary data.

(3) The Washington state institute for public policy shall report the findings of the study under subsection (1) of this section to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019.

(4) This section expires January 1, 2020.

--- END ---