BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A producer, processor, or research entity licensed under this chapter is prohibited from engaging in any marijuana production, processing, or storage activity that can either be readily seen by normal unaided vision, or readily smelled, from a public place or private property on which a housing unit is located.

(2) Cities, towns, and counties may enact and enforce ordinances creating civil penalties and legal remedies, including abatement procedures, for the growing, processing, or storage of marijuana in violation of the provisions of this section.

--- END ---