BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.08.068 and 2009 c 549 s 5038 are each amended to read as follows:

The state treasurer or other issuing officer shall keep a full and complete record of all warrants, bonds or other instruments alleged to have been lost or destroyed, which were issued by such agency, and of the issue of any duplicate therefor; and upon the issuance of any duplicate, the officer shall enter upon his or her books the cancellation of the original instrument and immediately notify the state treasurer, the state auditor, and all trustees and paying agents authorized to redeem such instruments on behalf of the state of Washington, of such cancellation. ((The treasurer shall keep a similar list of all warrants, bonds or other instruments so canceled.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.08 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Cancel or cancellation" means to void.

(2) "Redeem or redemption" means to clear or pay.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.08.066 and 2009 c 549 s 5037 are each amended to read as follows:

Before a duplicate instrument is issued, the state treasurer or other issuing officer shall require the person making application for its issue to file in his or her office a written affidavit specifically alleging on oath that he or she is the proper owner, payee, or legal representative of such owner or payee of the original instrument, giving the date of issue, the number, amount, and for what services or claim or purpose the original instrument or series of instruments of which it is a part was issued, and that the same has been lost or destroyed, and has not been paid, or has not been received by him or her((: PROVIDED, That in the event that an original and its duplicate instrument are both presented for payment as a result of forgery or fraud, the issuing officer shall be the state agency responsible for endeavoring to recover any losses suffered by the state)).

Sec. 4. RCW 43.08.064 and 1979 ex.s. c 71 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In case of the loss or destruction of a state warrant for the payment of money, or any bond or other instrument or evidence of indebtedness, issued by any state officer, or agency, such officer, or such agency through its appropriate officer may issue or cause to be issued a duplicate in lieu thereof, ((bearing the same number, class, or designation)) in all respects and for the same amount as the original((, except that the word duplicate shall plainly appear upon the face of the new instrument in such a manner as to clearly identify it as a duplicate instrument)). The duplicate instrument so issued shall be subject in all other respects to the same provisions of law as the original instrument.

--- END ---