BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.20.030 and 2014 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any district or municipal court judge, in the county in which the offense is alleged to have occurred, may issue a search warrant for any person or evidence located anywhere within the state. If the jurisdiction of a district or municipal court encompasses all or part of more than one county, a judge for that district or municipal court may issue a search warrant for any person or evidence located anywhere within the state as long as the county in which the offense is alleged to have occurred is one of the counties encompassed within that court's jurisdiction.

--- END ---