BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.56.340 and 2003 c 111 s 1427 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The electors of the president and vice president shall convene at the seat of government on the day fixed by federal statute, at the hour of twelve o'clock noon of that day. If there is any vacancy in the office of an elector occasioned by death, refusal to act, neglect to attend, disqualification under subsection (2) of this section, or otherwise, the remaining electors present shall immediately proceed to fill it by voice vote, and plurality of votes. When all of the electors have appeared and the vacancies have been filled, including any vacancies due to disqualification under subsection (2) of this section, they shall constitute the college of electors of the state of Washington, and shall proceed to perform the duties required of them by the Constitution and laws of the United States. ((Any elector who votes for a person or persons not nominated by the party of which he or she is an elector is subject to a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars.))

(2) Every elector shall vote for the persons nominated by the party which has nominated the elector under RCW 29A.56.320. Any elector who fails to vote for the persons nominated by the party shall be immediately disqualified, and the remaining electors shall immediately fill the vacancy as provided in subsection (1) of this section. The elector chosen to fill the vacancy shall vote for the persons nominated by the party of which he or she is an elector, and if that elector fails to do so, the remaining electors shall immediately fill the vacancy thus created as provided under subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---