BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.56.460 and 2005 c 274 s 426 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All records obtained and all reports produced as required by state fireworks law, chapter 70.77 RCW, are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

(2) All records obtained and all reports submitted as required by the Washington state explosives act, chapter 70.74 RCW, are exempt from disclosure under this chapter. Nothing in this subsection (2) shall be construed to restrict access to information related to the regulatory duties or actions of any agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW to read as follows:

By December 1, 2022, the public records exemptions accountability committee, in addition to its duties in RCW 42.56.140, must prepare and submit a report to the legislature that includes recommendations on whether the exemption created in RCW 42.56.460(2) should be continued, modified, or terminated. No recommendations or action from the committee or the legislature will result in the continuation of the exemption created in RCW 42.56.460(2).

--- END ---