BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.07.200 and 2011 c 298 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state and the director of revenue ((may)) must enter into agreements designating the department of revenue as the secretary of state's agent for issuing all ((or a portion)) of the legal entity renewals within the jurisdiction of the secretary of state.

--- END ---