BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.04.169 and 1997 c 328 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"Electric-assisted bicycle" means a bicycle with two or three wheels, a saddle, fully operative pedals for human propulsion, and an electric motor. The electric-assisted bicycle's electric motor must have a power output of no more than ((one thousand)) seven hundred fifty watts((, be incapable of propelling the device at a speed of more than twenty miles per hour on level ground, and be incapable of further increasing the speed of the device when human power alone is used to propel the device beyond twenty miles per hour)). The electric-assisted bicycle must meet the requirements of one of the following three classifications:

(1) "Class 1 electric-assisted bicycle" means an electric-assisted bicycle in which the motor provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour;

(2) "Class 2 electric-assisted bicycle" means an electric-assisted bicycle in which the motor may be used exclusively to propel the bicycle and is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour; or

(3) "Class 3 electric-assisted bicycle" means an electric-assisted bicycle in which the motor provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty-eight miles per hour and is equipped with a speedometer.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.04.071 and 1982 c 55 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

"Bicycle" means every device propelled solely by human power, or an electric-assisted bicycle as defined in RCW 46.04.169, upon which a person or persons may ride, having two tandem wheels either of which is sixteen inches or more in diameter, or three wheels, any one of which is more than twenty inches in diameter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 46.37 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A manufacturer or distributor of new electric-assisted bicycles, where electric-assisted bicycles are defined in RCW 46.04.169, offered for sale or distribution in Washington state must:

(a) Beginning July 1, 2018, permanently affix, in a prominent location, a label printed in arial font and at least nine-point type that contains the classification number, top assisted speed, and motor wattage;

(b) Comply with the equipment and manufacturing requirements for bicycles adopted by the United States consumer product safety commission.

(2) A person shall not tamper with or modify an electric-assisted bicycle, as defined in RCW 46.04.169, so as to change the speed capability of the electric-assisted bicycle, unless the label in subsection (1)(a) of this section is appropriately replaced.

(3) Except as otherwise provided, an electric-assisted bicycle

or a rider of an electric-assisted bicycle is subject to the same

provisions of this title as a bicycle or the rider of a bicycle.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.20.500 and 2013 c 174 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may drive either a two-wheeled or a three-wheeled motorcycle, or a motor-driven cycle unless such person has a valid driver's license specially endorsed by the director to enable the holder to drive such vehicles.

(2) However, a person sixteen years of age or older, holding a valid driver's license of any class issued by the state of the person's residence, may operate a moped without taking any special examination for the operation of a moped.

(3) No driver's license is required for operation of an electric-assisted bicycle ((if the operator is at least sixteen years of age)). Persons under sixteen years of age may not operate ((an)) a class 3 electric-assisted bicycle.

(4) No driver's license is required to operate an electric personal assistive mobility device or a power wheelchair.

(5) No driver's license is required to operate a motorized foot scooter. Motorized foot scooters may not be operated at any time from a half hour after sunset to a half hour before sunrise without reflectors of a type approved by the state patrol.

(6) A person holding a valid driver's license may operate a motorcycle as defined under RCW 46.04.330(2) without a motorcycle endorsement.

(7) A person operating a motorcycle with a stabilizing conversion kit must have a valid driver's license specially endorsed by the director for a three-wheeled motorcycle to enable the holder to operate such a motorcycle.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.61.710 and 2011 c 171 s 81 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person shall operate a moped upon the highways of this state unless the moped has been assigned a moped registration number and displays a moped permit in accordance with RCW 46.16A.405(2).

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a moped may not be operated on a bicycle path or trail, bikeway, equestrian trail, or hiking or recreational trail.

(3) Operation of a moped, electric personal assistive mobility device, or motorized foot scooter((, or an electric-assisted bicycle)) on a fully controlled limited access highway is unlawful. Operation of a moped((,)) on a sidewalk is unlawful. Operation of a motorized foot scooter((,)) or ((an)) class 3 electric-assisted bicycle on a sidewalk is unlawful, unless there is no alternative for a motorized foot scooter or a class 3 electric-assisted bicycle to travel over a sidewalk as part of a bicycle or pedestrian path.

(4) Removal of any muffling device or pollution control device from a moped is unlawful.

(5) Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section do not apply to electric-assisted bicycles.

(6) Electric-assisted bicycles and motorized foot scooters may have access to highways((, other than limited access highways,)) of the state to the same extent as bicycles, subject to RCW 46.61.160.

(7) Subject to subsection (((6))) (10) of this section, class 1 and class 2 electric-assisted bicycles and motorized foot scooters may be operated on a ((multipurpose trail)) shared-use path or ((bicycle lane)) any part of a highway designated for the use of bicycles, but local jurisdictions or state agencies may restrict or otherwise limit the access of electric-assisted bicycles and motorized foot scooters, and local jurisdictions or state agencies may regulate the use of electric-assisted bicycles and motorized foot scooters on facilities and properties under their jurisdiction and control.

(((6))) (8) Class 3 electric-assisted bicycles may be operated on facilities that are within or adjacent to a highway. Class 3 electric-assisted bicycles may not be operated on a shared-use path, except where local jurisdictions may allow the use of class 3 electric-assisted bicycles. State or local agencies may regulate the use of class 3 electric-assisted bicycles on facilities and properties under their jurisdiction and control.

(9) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an electric-assisted bicycle shall not be operated on a trail that is specifically designated as nonmotorized and that has a natural surface tread that is made by clearing and grading the native soil with no added surfacing materials. A local jurisdiction or state agency having jurisdiction over a trail described in this subsection may allow the operation of an electric-assisted bicycle on that trail.

(10) Subsections (1) and (4) of this section do not apply to motorized foot scooters. Subsection (2) of this section applies to motorized foot scooters when the bicycle path, trail, bikeway, equestrian trail, or hiking or recreational trail was built or is maintained with federal highway transportation funds. Additionally, any new trail or bicycle path or readily identifiable existing trail or bicycle path not built or maintained with federal highway transportation funds may be used by persons operating motorized foot scooters only when appropriately signed.

(((7))) (11) A person operating an electric personal assistive mobility device (EPAMD) shall obey all speed limits and shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians and human-powered devices at all times. An operator must also give an audible signal before overtaking and passing a pedestrian. Except for the limitations of this subsection, persons operating an EPAMD have all the rights and duties of a pedestrian.

(((8))) (12) The use of an EPAMD may be regulated in the following circumstances:

(a) A municipality and the department of transportation may prohibit the operation of an EPAMD on public highways within their respective jurisdictions where the speed limit is greater than twenty-five miles per hour;

(b) A municipality may restrict the speed of an EPAMD in locations with congested pedestrian or nonmotorized traffic and where there is significant speed differential between pedestrians or nonmotorized traffic and EPAMD operators. The areas in this subsection must be designated by the city engineer or designee of the municipality. Municipalities shall not restrict the speed of an EPAMD in the entire community or in areas in which there is infrequent pedestrian traffic;

(c) A state agency or local government may regulate the operation of an EPAMD within the boundaries of any area used for recreation, open space, habitat, trails, or conservation purposes.

--- END ---