BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature is committed to protecting the safety and well-being of the public from sex offenders. The Washington state community protection act, requiring the registration of sex and kidnapping offenders, is a critical component of a larger system designed to protect the public while reducing recidivism. The legislature finds that the current registration classification system, which is based on risk rather than type of offense, should be utilized by certain educational institutions as a basis for evaluating whether to impose reasonable restrictions on students classified as high risk to reoffend. The legislature intends for restrictions to protect the safety and well-being of personnel and students, especially minors. Restrictions are not intended to be punitive, but instead to accommodate the registered student's access to education without risking the safety and well-being of others.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When a community or technical college receives notice under RCW 9A.44.138 regarding the enrollment of a student who is a registered sex or kidnapping offender classified as a risk level III, the college may impose reasonable restrictions on the student in order to protect the safety of other students, teachers, and personnel at the college. Restrictions may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Prohibiting the student from enrolling in courses or programs where minors will be enrolled or present;

(b) Requiring the student to enroll in online or remote learning courses where he or she will not have in person contact or interactions with other students or teachers;

(c) Prohibiting or restricting the student's access to certain campus facilities or areas where minors or other vulnerable persons regularly congregate.

(2) If a community or technical college authorizes a registered sex or kidnapping offender classified as a risk level III to attend traditional, in person classes, the college may notify the teacher and other students enrolled in the course or program of the name and risk classification of the student. Notice under this subsection must be made in a form likely to be received and read by teachers and students.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "community or technical college" and "college" refer to a community college or technical college as those terms are defined in RCW 28B.50.030.

--- END ---