BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A select committee on supported employment services for individuals with developmental disabilities is established, composed of the following members:

(a) Two members of the senate appointed by the president of the senate from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;

(b) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives;

(c) Three family members of persons with developmental disabilities of varying acuity levels appointed by the governor;

(d) One representative from the governor's office selected by the governor;

(e) The assistant secretary of the developmental disabilities administration or his or her designee;

(f) Three developmental disability self-advocates appointed by the governor; and

(g) One representative from the association of county officials.

(2) The committee shall have two cochairs of the committee, one cochair shall be the representative from the governor's office and the other cochair shall be a legislative member of the committee elected by the membership of the committee.

(3) Meetings of the committee shall be open to the public and shall provide an opportunity for public comment.

(4) Staff support for the committee must be provided by the governor's office, the office of program research, and senate committee services.

(5) The committee shall hold at least three meetings between July and October 2018, and produce a report by December 1, 2018, with the following components:

(a) A descriptive review of group and individual supported employment programs and services, the availability of community access services, and how individuals navigate entry into community access services; and

(b) Any suggested policy, administrative code, or statute changes that would allow for better outcomes for recipients of supported employment or community access services.

(6) Legislative members of the committee must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(7) The expenses of the committee must be paid jointly by the house of representatives and the senate. Committee expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(8) This section expires December 30, 2018.

--- END ---