BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, each community and technical college, as part of a student success program, shall implement a tracking and early alert system that is designed to:

(a) Track students' progress;

(b) Notify faculty, advisors, or other staff when a student may need additional academic support, advising, or other interventions; and

(c) Connect the student to appropriate and available support services.

(2) The college board shall work with the community and technical colleges to implement this section and, if appropriate, may use a purchasing consortium for the purchase of software or other technical assistance.

(3)(a) Every community and technical college shall have a tracking and early alert system in place no later than August 1, 2021.

(b) A community or technical college that is using, as of the effective date of this section, a tracking and early alert system that meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, is deemed to be in compliance with this section.

--- END ---