BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.630.121 and 2014 c 219 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that studies have documented that many students experience learning losses when they do not engage in educational activities during the summer. The legislature further finds that research shows that summer learning loss contributes to educational opportunity gaps between students, and that falling behind in academics can be a predictor of whether a student will drop out of school. The legislature recognizes that such academic regression has a disproportionate impact on low-income students.

(2) The legislature further finds that expanded learning opportunities, including those offered by partnerships between schools and community-based organizations, create enriching experiences for youth, with activities that complement and support classroom-based instruction. The legislature acknowledges that access to quality expanded learning opportunities during the school year and summer helps mitigate summer learning loss and improves academic performance, attendance, on-time grade advancement, and classroom behaviors.

(3) Therefore the legislature intends to build capacity, identify best practices, leverage local resources, and promote a sustainable expanded learning opportunities system by providing an infrastructure that helps coordinate expanded learning opportunities throughout the state. ((To the extent funds are provided for this purpose, the legislature also intends to authorize a pilot program specifically to combat summer learning loss through expanded learning opportunities, which will provide the opportunity to evaluate the effectiveness of an extended school year in improving student achievement, closing the educational opportunity gap, and providing successful models for other districts to follow.))

(4) This section expires June 30, 2021.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.630.122 and 2014 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this section and RCW 28A.630.121, 28A.630.123 ((through 28A.630.127)), and 28A.630.124 (as recodified by this act), "expanded learning opportunities" means:

(1) Culturally responsive enrichment and learning activities, which may focus on academic and nonacademic areas; the arts; civic engagement; service-learning; science, technology, engineering, and mathematics; and competencies for college and career readiness;

(2) School-based programs that provide extended learning and enrichment for students beyond the traditional school day, week, or calendar; and

(3) Structured, intentional, and creative learning environments outside the traditional school day that are provided by community-based organizations in partnership with schools and align in-school and out-of-school learning through activities that complement classroom-based instruction.

(4) This section expires June 30, 2021.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.630.123 and 2015 c 163 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The expanded learning opportunities advisory council is ((established)) reconstituted within the center for the improvement of student learning established in RCW 28A.300.130 to advise the governor, the legislature, and the superintendent of public instruction regarding a comprehensive expanded learning opportunities system, with particular attention paid to solutions to summer learning loss.

(2) The advisory council shall provide a vision, guidance, assistance, and advice related to potential improvement and expansion of summer learning opportunities, school year calendar modifications that will help reduce summer learning loss, increasing partnerships between schools and community-based organizations to deliver expanded learning opportunities, and other current or proposed programs and initiatives across the spectrum of early elementary through secondary education that could contribute to a statewide system of expanded learning opportunities.

(3) The advisory council shall:

(a) Identify fiscal, resource, and partnership opportunities, including identifying funding opportunities under the federal every student succeeds act of 2015 (129 Stat. 1802; 20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 note), and identifying funding partnership opportunities with community-based organizations;

(b) Coordinate policy development;

(c) Set quality standards;

(d) Promote evidence-based strategies; ((and))

(e) As appropriate, work collaboratively with other entities, including the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee established in RCW 28A.300.136, the work-integrated learning advisory committee established in chapter . . ., Laws of 2018 (Second Substitute House Bill 1600), and appropriate staff within the office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(f) Develop a comprehensive action plan designed to implement expanded learning opportunities, address summer learning loss, provide academic supports, build strong partnerships between schools and community-based organizations, and track performance of expanded learning opportunities in closing the opportunity gap; and

(g) Prepare annual reports as required by RCW 28A.630.124 (as recodified by this act).

(4) When making recommendations regarding evidence-based strategies, the advisory council shall consider the best practices ((on the state menus)) developed in accordance with RCW 28A.165.035 and 28A.655.235.

(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall ((convene the expanded learning opportunities)) appoint members to the advisory council. The members of the advisory council must have experience with expanded learning opportunities and include groups and agencies representing diverse student interests and geographical locations across the state. Other participants, agencies, organizations, or individuals may be invited to participate in the advisory council, but the membership ((shall)) must include the following:

(a) Three representatives from nonprofit community-based organizations;

(b) ((One)) Three representatives from regional workforce development councils that reflect industry and geographic diversity;

(c) One representative from each of the following organizations or agencies:

(i) The Washington state school directors' association;

(ii) The state-level association of school administrators;

(iii) The state-level association of school principals;

(iv) The state board of education;

(v) The statewide association representing certificated classroom teachers and educational staff associates;

(vi) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(vii) The state-level parent–teacher association;

(viii) Higher education;

(ix) The statewide association of public libraries;

(x) A person selected by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to represent low-income communities or communities of color;

(xi) A person selected by the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee; ((and))

(xii) A nonprofit organization with statewide experience in expanded learning opportunities frameworks; and

(xiii) The department of children, youth, and families.

(6) Staff support for the ((expanded learning opportunity)) advisory council shall be provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and other state agencies as necessary. Appointees of the advisory council shall be selected by May 30, 2014, or as necessary to comply with the requirements of chapter . . ., Laws of 2018 (this act). The ((council shall hold its first meeting before August 1, 2014. At the first meeting, the)) advisory council shall determine regularly scheduled meeting times and locations, and shall select a chair and vice chair from among its membership.

(8) Members of the advisory council shall serve without compensation but must be reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(9) This section expires June 30, 2021.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.630.124 and 2014 c 219 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The expanded learning opportunities advisory council shall provide a report to the superintendent of public instruction, the governor, and the ((legislature)) education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December 1, 2014, and each December 1st thereafter ((until December 1, 2018,)) that summarizes accomplishments of the advisory council, measures progress, and contains recommendations regarding continued development of an expanded learning opportunities system and reducing summer learning loss. The annual report must also include a gap analysis that identifies, at the school district level, where expanded learning opportunity gaps exist for certain student populations, school districts, or both, and whether the provision of additional expanded learning opportunities would enhance student academic achievement. The analysis required by this subsection (1)(a) for the 2018 annual report must be a preliminary analysis, with a full analysis required in each subsequent annual report.

(b) The December 1, 2018, report must include a review of the Washington community learning center program established in RCW 28A.215.060. The purpose of the review is to ensure that the Washington community learning center program properly and effectively aligns with the duties and objectives of the advisory council. In completing the review, the advisory council shall make any necessary recommendations for better aligning the Washington community learning center program provisions with the duties and objectives of the advisory council.

(2) If funds are appropriated for ((a summer knowledge improvement pilot program as provided under RCW 28A.630.125 through 28A.630.127 or other)) initiatives to reduce summer learning loss or increase expanded learning opportunities, the expanded learning opportunities advisory council shall advise the office of the superintendent of public instruction on the awarding of related grants to prioritize districts with gaps identified in the analysis required by subsection (1) of this section, monitor the progress of the program or initiative and serve as a resource for participating schools and community-based organizations. The advisory council shall also oversee an evaluation of the effectiveness of the program or initiative in reducing summer learning loss and improving student academic progress.

(3) If new funds are not appropriated for ((a summer knowledge improvement pilot program or other)) initiatives to reduce summer learning loss, ((the first report from the council, and any subsequent)) reports from the advisory council, as necessary, shall include recommendations for a framework and action plan for a program to reduce summer learning loss through the provision of state funds for additional student learning days in elementary schools with significant populations of low-income students. The advisory council may also recommend additional strategies to reduce summer learning loss, including through expanded learning opportunities offered in partnership between schools and community-based organizations.

(4) This section expires June 30, 2021.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.300.130 and 2016 c 72 s 804 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To facilitate access to information and materials on educational improvement and research, the superintendent of public instruction, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, shall establish the center for the improvement of student learning. The center shall work in conjunction with parents, educational service districts, institutions of higher education, and education, parent, community, and business organizations.

(2) The center, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, and in conjunction with other staff in the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall:

(a) Serve as a clearinghouse for information regarding successful educational improvement and parental involvement programs in schools and districts, and information about efforts within institutions of higher education in the state to support educational improvement initiatives in Washington schools and districts;

(b) Provide best practices research that can be used to help schools develop and implement: Programs and practices to improve instruction; systems to analyze student assessment data, with an emphasis on systems that will combine the use of state and local data to monitor the academic progress of each and every student in the school district; comprehensive, school-wide improvement plans; school-based shared decision-making models; programs to promote lifelong learning and community involvement in education; school-to-work transition programs; programs to meet the needs of highly capable students; programs and practices to meet the needs of students with disabilities; programs and practices to meet the diverse needs of students based on gender, racial, ethnic, economic, and special needs status; research, information, and technology systems; and other programs and practices that will assist educators in helping students learn the essential academic learning requirements;

(c) Develop and maintain an internet web site to increase the availability of information, research, and other materials;

(d) Work with appropriate organizations to inform teachers, district and school administrators, and school directors about the waivers available and the broadened school board powers under RCW 28A.320.015;

(e) Provide training and consultation services, including conducting regional summer institutes;

(f) Identify strategies for improving the success rates of ethnic and racial student groups and students with disabilities, with disproportionate academic achievement;

(g) Work with parents, teachers, and school districts in establishing a model absentee notification procedure that will properly notify parents when their student has not attended a class or has missed a school day. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consider various types of communication with parents including, but not limited to, email, phone, and postal mail; ((and))

(h) Provide administrative and technical support to the expanded learning opportunities advisory council established in RCW 28A.630.123 (as recodified by this act); and

(i) Perform other functions consistent with the purpose of the center as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall select and employ a director for the center.

(4) The superintendent may enter into contracts with individuals or organizations including but not limited to: School districts; educational service districts; educational organizations; teachers; higher education faculty; institutions of higher education; state agencies; business or community-based organizations; and other individuals and organizations to accomplish the duties and responsibilities of the center. In carrying out the duties and responsibilities of the center, the superintendent, whenever possible, shall use practitioners to assist agency staff as well as assist educators and others in schools and districts.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the legislature by September 1, 2007, and thereafter biennially, regarding the effectiveness of the center for the improvement of student learning, how the services provided by the center for the improvement of student learning have been used and by whom, and recommendations to improve the accessibility and application of knowledge and information that leads to improved student learning and greater family and community involvement in the public education system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 28A.630.125 (Summer knowledge improvement pilot program) and 2014 c 219 s 5;

(2) RCW 28A.630.126 (Applications for participation in the summer knowledge improvement pilot program—"Eligible schools"—Plan requirements) and 2014 c 219 s 6;

(3) RCW 28A.630.127 (Plan review and selection—Criteria) and 2014 c 219 s 7;

(4) RCW 28A.630.129 (Expiration date—2014 c 219) and 2014 c 219 s 9; and

(5) 2015 c 163 s 2 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. RCW 28A.630.121, 28A.630.122, 28A.630.123, and 28A.630.124 are recodified as sections in chapter 28A.300 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. Section 5 of this act expires June 30, 2021.

--- END ---