BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2017 c 15 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Effective July 1, 2017, the department of licensing may not issue any new wholesale vehicle dealer licenses.

(((2))) (b) Effective July 1, 2018, the department of licensing may not renew any wholesale vehicle dealer licenses((.

(3) This section expires October 31, 2019)), except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The department of licensing shall renew a wholesale vehicle dealer license of a wholesale vehicle dealer who has held the license continuously for at least the previous six years from the effective date of this section and who otherwise meets the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2017 c 15 s 2;

(2) 2017 c 15 s 3;

(3) 2017 c 15 s 4;

(4) 2017 c 15 s 5;

(5) 2017 c 15 s 6; and

(6) 2017 c 15 s 8 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act is added to chapter 46.70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---