BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.69.310 and 2005 c 226 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any park and recreation district formed under the provisions of this chapter may be dissolved in its entirety in the manner provided in chapter 53.48 RCW, relating to port districts.

In order to facilitate the dissolution of a park and recreation district, such a district may declare its intent to dissolve and may name a successor taxing district. It may transfer any lands, facilities, equipment, other interests in real or personal property, or interests under contracts, leases, or similar agreements to the successor district, and may take all action necessary to enable the successor district to assume any indebtedness of the park and recreation district relating to the transferred property and interests.

(2) A portion of land may be deannexed and withdrawn from a park and recreation district formed under the provisions of this chapter pursuant to section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 36.69 RCW to read as follows:

(1) As provided in this section, a city, town, or county may deannex that portion of the city, town, or county from a park and recreation district that was formed under this chapter.

(2)(a) In order to deannex from a district, the governing body of a city, town, or county, which is part of the district, must adopt a resolution approving the deannexation of that portion of the city, town, or county, which is part of the district.

(b) After adoption of the resolution approving the deannexation, the governing body of the city, town, or county, which is part of the district, must draft a ballot title, give notice as required by law for ballot measures, and perform other duties as required to put the measure approving or not approving the deannexation before the voters of the city, town, or county, which are part of the district.

The ballot proposition authorizing the deannexation from a proposed park and recreation district shall be submitted to the voters of the district for their approval or rejection at the next general state election. The ballot measure is approved if fifty percent of the total persons voting on the ballot measure vote to approve the deannexation.

(c) The resolution under (a) of this subsection and the ballot under (b) of this subsection must set forth the specific land boundaries being deannexed from the district.

(d) A deannexation under this section is effective at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the ballot measure under (b) of this subsection is approved.

(3) For purposes of this section, "deannex" means to withdraw a specified portion of land from a park and recreation district formed under this chapter.

--- END ---