BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall adopt a standard disclaimer form for each vaccine approved by the federal food and drug administration that informs patients:

(a) That a person who is vaccinated may inadvertently carry the disease that it was intended to protect against and that it may expose vulnerable populations to the disease;

(b) That the receipt of a vaccination is not a guarantee of protection against the disease that it was intended to protect against; and

(c) Of the known effectiveness rate of the particular vaccine, the expected duration of the protection, and the possibility that a person may become infected with the targeted disease.

(2) Each health care provider who holds a license issued by a disciplining authority under RCW 18.130.040 must provide a patient with the relevant disclaimer form adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for each vaccine to be administered prior to its administration.

(3) Failure to comply with subsection (2) of this section constitutes unprofessional conduct under chapter 18.130 RCW.

--- END ---