BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A task force on marijuana odor is established, with members as provided in this subsection.

(a) The governor shall appoint seven members, who must include a representative from the following:

(i) The state liquor and cannabis board;

(ii) The department of ecology;

(iii) The department of health;

(iv) The Washington state department of agriculture;

(v) A state association of counties;

(vi) A state association of cities; and

(vii) A representative from the recreational marijuana community or a marijuana producer, processor, or retailer licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board.

(b) The task force shall choose its chair from among its membership. The state liquor and cannabis board shall convene the initial meeting of the task force.

(2) The task force shall review the following issues: The available and most appropriate ways or methods to mitigate, mask, conceal, or otherwise address marijuana odors and emissions and the potentially harmful impact of marijuana odors and emissions on people who live, work, or are located in close proximity to a marijuana production or processing facility, including but not limited to: (a) Filtering systems; (b) natural odor masking mechanisms or odor concealing mechanisms; (c) zoning and land use controls and regulations; and (d) changes to state laws and regulations including, but not limited to, laws and regulations related to nuisance and public health.

(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the state liquor and cannabis board.

(4) Members of the task force are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(5) The task force must report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the majority and minority leaders of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives and the senate by December 31, 2018.

(6) This section expires June 30, 2019.

--- END ---