BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.832 and 2013 c 270 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In a criminal case where:

(1) The defendant has been convicted of robbery in the first degree or robbery in the second degree; and

(2) There has been a special allegation pleaded and proven beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant committed a robbery of a pharmacy as defined in RCW 18.64.011(((21))) (26); or

(3) There has been a special allegation pleaded and proven beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant committed a robbery of a marijuana retailer, marijuana processor, or marijuana producer under chapters 69.50 and 69.51A RCW;

the court shall make a finding of fact of the special allegation, or if a jury is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also find a special verdict as to the special allegation.

--- END ---