BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 38.40.060 and 2010 c 91 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every officer and employee of the state or of any county, city, or other political subdivision thereof who is a member of the Washington national guard or of the army, navy, air force, coast guard, or marine corps reserve of the United States, or of any organized reserve or armed forces of the United States shall be entitled to and shall be granted military leave of absence from such employment for a period not exceeding twenty-one days during each year beginning October 1st and ending the following September 30th in order that the person may report for required military duty, training, or drills including those in the national guard under Title 10 U.S.C., Title 32 U.S.C., or state active status.

(2) Such military leave of absence shall be in addition to any vacation or sick leave to which the officer or employee might otherwise be entitled, and shall not involve any loss of efficiency rating, privileges, or pay.

(3) During the period of military leave, the officer or employee shall receive from the state, or the county, city, or other political subdivision, his or her normal pay.

(4)(a) The officer or employee shall be charged military leave only for days that he or she is scheduled to work for the state or the county, city, or other political subdivision.

(b) If the officer or employee is scheduled to work a shift that begins on one calendar day and ends on the next calendar day, the officer or employee shall be charged military leave for only the first calendar day. If the officer or employee is scheduled to work a shift that begins on one calendar day and ends later than the next calendar day, the officer or employee shall be charged military leave for each calendar day except the calendar day on which the shift ends.

--- END ---