BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The college board must establish a pilot program to encourage college districts to plan for the unique needs and challenges of students experiencing homelessness. Such accommodations may include, but are not limited to: Laundry facilities, storage, showers, encouraging culinary programs to provide free or reduced-price meals, and providing short-term housing or housing assistance; and plans to develop surplus property for affordable housing to accommodate the needs of students experiencing homelessness. The pilot program must include four college districts, two on each side of the Cascade mountain range. The pilot program expires July 1, 2023. The college districts that participate in the pilot program must provide a joint report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, that includes at least the following information: The number of students experiencing homelessness during the pilot program, the number of students assisted, strategies for accommodating students experiencing homelessness, and legislative recommendations.

(2) This section expires January 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.77 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The council must establish a pilot program to encourage four-year institutions of higher education to plan for the unique needs and challenges of students experiencing homelessness. Such accommodations may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Laundry facilities, storage, showers, encouraging culinary programs to provide free or reduced-price meals, providing an annual stipend to be used for purchasing clothing and technology, and providing short-term housing or housing assistance;

(b) Establishing a case manager program for assisting homeless and at-risk students; and

(c) Plans to develop surplus property for affordable housing to accommodate the needs of students experiencing homelessness.

(2) The pilot program must include two four-year institutions of higher education, one on each side of the Cascade mountain range. The pilot program expires July 1, 2023. The four-year institutions of higher education that participate in the pilot program must provide a joint report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, that includes at least the following information: The number of students experiencing homelessness during the pilot program, the number of students assisted, strategies for accommodating students experiencing homelessness, and legislative recommendations.

(3) This section expires January 1, 2024.

--- END ---