BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Menstrual hygiene products must be available at no cost to students, in restrooms of buildings serving students in any public community or technical college.

(2) The college board may adopt rules to implement this section.

(3) As used in this section, "menstrual hygiene products" means tampons and sanitary napkins for use in connection with the menstrual cycle.

--- END ---