BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.42.100 and 2005 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of the crime of endangerment with a controlled substance if the person knowingly or intentionally permits a dependent child or dependent adult to be exposed to, ingest, inhale, or have contact with ((methamphetamine)):

(a) Any controlled substance listed in Schedule I under RCW 69.50.204 or in Schedule II under RCW 69.50.206, unless the exposure, ingestion, inhalation, or contact is in accordance with a valid prescription or order; or

(b) Ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or anhydrous ammonia, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, that are being used in the manufacture of methamphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers.

(2) Endangerment with a controlled substance is a class B felony.

--- END ---