BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any employee or contractor of the state of Washington or any of its political subdivisions, or of any institution supported, in whole or in part, by the state or any of its political subdivisions, who has been terminated from such employment or has had his or her contract terminated due to harassment, bullying, or any otherwise unethical or illegal behavior, may not serve as a member of a commission, committee, or board created or organized by the state of Washington or any of its political subdivisions, or of any institution supported, in whole or in part, by the state or any of its political subdivisions, if such commission, committee, or board has oversight of law enforcement as part of its duties.

(2) For the purposes of this section, in addition to their common meaning, the terms "employee" and "contractor" include any person receiving compensation for services from the state of Washington or any of its political subdivisions, or from any institution supported, in whole or in part, by the state or any of its political subdivisions including, but not limited to (a) elected officials, (b) persons appointed to office pursuant to statute, ordinance, or resolution for a specified term of office, and (c) persons having management or supervisory duties.

(3) This section applies to all employees and contractors that have been terminated for the reasons described in subsection (1) of this section at any time in the past, including prior to the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect April 1, 2018.

--- END ---