BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)(a) The legislature finds, regarding the don't drip and drive program undertaken by the department of ecology between 2011 and 2017, that the program:

(i) Was designed to improve vehicle owners' awareness of vehicle leaks and to motivate the owners of leaking vehicles to fix the leaks;

(ii) Has achieved progress in addressing a significant source of water pollution in the Puget Sound region: Vehicles that leak fluids that cause significant water quality impairments;

(iii) Was developed in partnership with an extensive coalition of municipalities and other partners in the Puget Sound region;

(iv) Was founded on extensive research and a well-developed educational campaign;

(v) Has been funded by a series of one-time grants; and

(vi) Has resulted in the reduction of the source of water pollution from vehicle fluids, as well as a number of ancillary benefits, including improved vehicle fuel economy for vehicle owners, better air quality, the delayed need for vehicle repairs, improved reliability in vehicle operation, and others;

(b) The legislature further finds that the results of the program demonstrate benefits that could be realized: More comprehensively, were the scope of the program to emphasize all benefits of proper vehicle maintenance; more broadly, were the program to be expanded statewide; and continuously, were the program to be funded with a permanent revenue source;

(c) The legislature further finds that the benefits of proper vehicle maintenance are more pronounced in older vehicles; and

(d) The legislature also recognizes the value of partnerships with local governments and private sector stakeholders in ensuring the development and establishment of a robust and enduring program.

(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to create an ongoing and statewide vehicle maintenance improvement program, led by the department of ecology, in collaboration with the department of commerce, and in concert with local government partners, using the don't drip and drive program initiated by the department of ecology as a model, for the purpose of: Raising awareness of the importance of routine vehicle maintenance, particularly for older vehicles; and achieving actual environmental, economic, vehicle performance and reliability, and other benefits of proper vehicle maintenance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The department of ecology, in collaboration with the department of commerce, and in concert with municipal partners around the state, must establish an ongoing vehicle maintenance improvement program with the goals of:

(a) Improving vehicle owners' awareness of the importance of proper and regular vehicle maintenance, particularly with older vehicles;

(b) Motivating vehicle owners to conduct routine and proper vehicle maintenance; and

(c) Yielding outcomes that provide improvements to the environment, reliability of vehicle travel, and personal economy.

(2) The state's role in the vehicle maintenance improvement program, through the department of ecology, in collaboration with the department of commerce, is to:

(a) Coordinate public outreach and education efforts to promote proper and routine vehicle maintenance;

(b) Provide grant oversight and technical assistance to local government partners;

(c) Develop educational materials in different languages and for different media to engage a broad spectrum of the public;

(d) Develop vehicle maintenance workshops and other events for the purpose of identifying symptoms of vehicle wear, correctable by routine maintenance, thus providing the public with learning opportunities and potential trust building experiences with car mechanics;

(e) Establish an advisory group of public, private, and nonprofit stakeholders for the purposes of guiding the program development;

(f) Develop strategies to reduce costs or perceptions of costs associated with vehicle maintenance, in part through working with private sector stakeholders and associations, in order to motivate vehicle owners to conduct proper vehicle maintenance; and

(g) Measure the behavioral response to the program, as well as environmental, vehicle performance, and other outcomes.

(3) Local governments are authorized to participate in the vehicle maintenance improvement program through:

(a) Disseminating program materials through online advertising, social media, and other localized media channels;

(b) Holding vehicle maintenance workshops and other related events to identify and promote the correction of deficiencies attributable to normal vehicle wear;

(c) Applying to the state for matching grants from the department of ecology or department of commerce;

(d) Engaging nonprofit organizations and other interested parties as a stakeholder advisory committee for the purpose of guiding the local government to implement the program strategically; and

(e) Partnering with participating vehicle maintenance facilities and repair shops to promote vehicle maintenance and discount necessary repairs.

(4) The departments of ecology and commerce may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The vehicle maintenance improvement account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from local governments and private sector stakeholder contributions related to the vehicle maintenance improvement program must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of the vehicle maintenance improvement program established in section 2 of this act, including grants to local governments for the purposes of the program. Any grants must be matched by local contributions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. By December 31, 2020, and every four years thereafter, the departments of ecology and commerce shall evaluate the vehicle maintenance improvement program established in section 2 of this act and shall report to the governor and the environmental and transportation committees of the legislature on the results of the program to date. The evaluation must consider the behavioral response to the program and impacts to the environment, the economy, and vehicle performance and reliability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 and 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---