BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that a number of the collision types that have resulted in a high number of serious injuries and deaths of vulnerable roadway users in the past five years can be associated with certain types of traffic infractions. To address the heightened risk to vulnerable roadway users of violations of these traffic infractions, the legislature intends for an additional fine to be introduced as a penalty for drivers who commit these violations against a vulnerable roadway user. To increase enforcement of all traffic infractions and offenses committed against vulnerable roadway users, the legislature intends for revenue that is collected from this new fine to be dedicated to the education of law enforcement officers, prosecutors, and judges about opportunities for the enforcement of traffic violations committed against vulnerable roadway users. In doing so, the legislature intends to decrease the frequency with which drivers violate these traffic laws to decrease the risk of serious injury and death to vulnerable roadway users.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.61.145 and 1965 ex.s. c 155 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The driver of a motor vehicle shall not follow another vehicle more closely than is reasonable and prudent, having due regard for the speed of such vehicles and the traffic upon and the condition of the highway.

(2) The driver of any motor truck or motor vehicle drawing another vehicle when traveling upon a roadway outside of a business or residence district and which is following another motor truck or motor vehicle drawing another vehicle shall, whenever conditions permit, leave sufficient space so that an overtaking vehicle may enter and occupy such space without danger, except that this shall not prevent a motor truck or motor vehicle drawing another vehicle from overtaking and passing any like vehicle or other vehicle.

(3) Motor vehicles being driven upon any roadway outside of a business or residence district in a caravan or motorcade whether or not towing other vehicles shall be so operated as to allow sufficient space between each such vehicle or combination of vehicles so as to enable any other vehicle to enter and occupy such space without danger. This provision shall not apply to funeral processions.

(4)(a) A driver of a motor vehicle found to be in violation of this section when the violation is determined to have occurred due to that motor vehicle's proximity to a vulnerable user of a public way must be assessed an additional fine equal to the base penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110(3). This fine is not subject to the additional fees and assessments that the base penalty for this violation is subject to under RCW 2.68.040, 3.62.090, and 46.63.110.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "vulnerable user of a public way" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 46.61.526(11)(c).

(5) The additional fine imposed under subsection (4) of this section must be deposited into the vulnerable roadway user education account created in subsection (6) of this section.

(6) The vulnerable roadway user education account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the additional fine in subsection (4) of this section must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only by the Washington traffic safety commission solely to:

(a) Support programs dedicated to increasing awareness by law enforcement officers, prosecutors, and judges of opportunities for the enforcement of traffic infractions and offenses committed against vulnerable roadway users; and

(b) With any funds remaining once the program support specified in (a) of this subsection has been provided, support programs dedicated to increasing awareness by the driving public of the risks and penalties associated with traffic infractions and offenses committed against vulnerable roadway users.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.61.180 and 1975 c 62 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When two vehicles approach or enter an intersection from different highways at approximately the same time, the driver of the vehicle on the left shall yield the right-of-way to the vehicle on the right.

(2) The right-of-way rule declared in subsection (1) of this section is modified at arterial highways and otherwise as stated in this chapter.

(3)(a) A driver of a motor vehicle found to be in violation of this section due to the failure of that driver to grant or yield the right-of-way to a vulnerable user of a public way must be assessed an additional fine equal to the base penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110(3). This fine may not be waived, reduced, or suspended, and is not subject to the additional fees and assessments that the base penalty for this violation is subject to under RCW 2.68.040, 3.62.090, and 46.63.110.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "vulnerable user of a public way" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 46.61.526(11)(c).

(4) The additional fine imposed under subsection (3) of this section must be deposited into the vulnerable roadway user education account created in RCW 46.61.145.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.61.185 and 1965 ex.s. c 155 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The driver of a vehicle intending to turn to the left within an intersection or into an alley, private road, or driveway shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction which is within the intersection or so close thereto as to constitute an immediate hazard.

(2)(a) A driver of a motor vehicle found to be in violation of this section due to the failure of that driver to grant or yield the right-of-way to a vulnerable user of a public way must be assessed an additional fine equal to the base penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110(3). This fine may not be waived, reduced, or suspended, and is not subject to the additional fees and assessments that the base penalty for this violation is subject to under RCW 2.68.040, 3.62.090, and 46.63.110.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "vulnerable user of a public way" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 46.61.526(11)(c).

(3) The additional fine imposed under subsection (2) of this section must be deposited into the vulnerable roadway user education account created in RCW 46.61.145.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.61.190 and 2000 c 239 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Preferential right-of-way may be indicated by stop signs or yield signs as authorized in RCW 47.36.110.

(2) Except when directed to proceed by a duly authorized flagger, or a police officer, or a firefighter vested by law with authority to direct, control, or regulate traffic, every driver of a vehicle approaching a stop sign shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering a marked crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering the roadway, and after having stopped shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another roadway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time when such driver is moving across or within the intersection or junction of roadways.

(3) The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign shall in obedience to such sign slow down to a speed reasonable for the existing conditions and if required for safety to stop, shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering a marked crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering the roadway, and then after slowing or stopping, the driver shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another roadway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time such driver is moving across or within the intersection or junction of roadways: PROVIDED, That if such a driver is involved in a collision with a vehicle in the intersection or junction of roadways, after driving past a yield sign without stopping, such collision shall be deemed prima facie evidence of the driver's failure to yield right-of-way.

(4)(a) A driver of a motor vehicle found to be in violation of this section due, at least in part, to the failure of that driver to grant or yield the right-of-way to a vulnerable user of a public way must be assessed an additional fine equal to the base penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110(3). This fine may not be waived, reduced, or suspended, and is not subject to the additional fees and assessments that the base penalty for this violation is subject to under RCW 2.68.040, 3.62.090, and 46.63.110.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "vulnerable user of a public way" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 46.61.526(11)(c).

(5) The additional fine imposed under subsection (4) of this section must be deposited into the vulnerable roadway user education account created in RCW 46.61.145.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.61.195 and 1984 c 7 s 66 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All state highways are hereby declared to be arterial highways as respects all other public highways or private ways, except that the state department of transportation has the authority to designate any county road or city street as an arterial having preference over the traffic on the state highway if traffic conditions will be improved by such action.

(2) Those city streets designated by the state department of transportation as forming a part of the routes of state highways through incorporated cities and towns are declared to be arterial highways as respects all other city streets or private ways.

(3) The governing authorities of incorporated cities and towns may designate any street as an arterial having preference over the traffic on a state highway if the change is first approved in writing by the state department of transportation. The local authorities making such a change in arterial designation shall do so by proper ordinance or resolution and shall erect or cause to be erected and maintained standard stop signs, or "Yield" signs, to accomplish this change in arterial designation.

(4) The operator of any vehicle entering upon any arterial highway from any other public highway or private way shall come to a complete stop before entering the arterial highway when stop signs are erected as provided by law.

(5)(a) A driver of a motor vehicle found to be in violation of subsection (4) of this section, which results in the failure of that driver to grant or yield the right-of-way to a vulnerable user of a public way, must be assessed an additional fine equal to the base penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110(3). This fine may not be waived, reduced, or suspended, and is not subject to the additional fees and assessments that the base penalty for this violation is subject to under RCW 2.68.040, 3.62.090, and 46.63.110.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "vulnerable user of a public way" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 46.61.526(11)(c).

(6) The additional fine imposed under subsection (5) of this section must be deposited into the vulnerable roadway user education account created in RCW 46.61.145.

Sec. 7. RCW 46.61.200 and 1984 c 7 s 67 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the points of intersection of any public highway with any arterial public highway that is constituted by law or by any proper authorities of this state or any city or town of this state, the state department of transportation with respect to state highways, and the proper authorities with respect to any other public highways, have the power to determine and designate any particular intersection, or any particular highways, roads, or streets or portions thereof, at any intersection with which vehicles shall be required to stop before entering such intersection. Upon the determination and designation of such points at which vehicles will be required to come to a stop before entering the intersection, the proper authorities so determining and designating shall cause to be posted and maintained proper signs of the standard design adopted by the state department of transportation indicating that the intersection has been so determined and designated and that vehicles entering it are required to stop.

(2) It is unlawful for any person operating any vehicle when entering any intersection determined, designated, and bearing the required sign to fail and neglect to bring the vehicle to a complete stop before entering the intersection.

(3)(a) A driver of a motor vehicle found to be in violation of this section, which results in the failure of that driver to yield the right-of-way to a vulnerable user of a public way, must be assessed an additional fine equal to the base penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110(3). This fine may not be waived, reduced, or suspended, and is not subject to the additional fees and assessments that the base penalty for this violation is subject to under RCW 2.68.040, 3.62.090, and 46.63.110.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "vulnerable user of a public way" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 46.61.526(11)(c).

(4) The additional fine imposed under subsection (3) of this section must be deposited into the vulnerable roadway user education account created in RCW 46.61.145.

Sec. 8. RCW 46.61.205 and 1990 c 250 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The driver of a vehicle about to enter or cross a highway from a private road or driveway shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles lawfully approaching on said highway.

(2)(a) A driver of a motor vehicle found to be in violation of this section due to the failure of that driver to grant or yield the right-of-way to a vulnerable user of a public way must be assessed an additional fine equal to the base penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110(3). This fine may not be waived, reduced, or suspended, and is not subject to the additional fees and assessments that the base penalty for this violation is subject to under RCW 2.68.040, 3.62.090, and 46.63.110.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "vulnerable user of a public way" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 46.61.526(11)(c).

(3) The additional fine imposed under subsection (2) of this section must be deposited into the vulnerable roadway user education account created in RCW 46.61.145.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.84.092 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 50, 2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 12, and 2017 c 290 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust account, the diesel idle reduction account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle charging infrastructure account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account, the high capacity transportation account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the high occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the state wildlife account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, the state university permanent fund, and the state reclamation revolving account shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. This act takes effect April 1, 2019.

--- END ---