BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The authority shall administer a program to reimburse the cost of medically appropriate services, drugs, devices, products, and procedures for individuals who can become pregnant and who would be eligible for medical assistance if not for 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1611 or 1612.

(2) The authority shall collect data and analyze the cost-effectiveness of the services, drugs, devices, products, and procedures paid for under this section.

(3) The authority shall explore any and all opportunities to obtain federal financial participation in the costs of implementing this section including, but not limited to, waivers or demonstration projects under Title X of the public health service act or Title XIX or XXI of the social security act. However, the implementation of this section is not contingent upon the authority's receipt of a waiver or authorization to operate a demonstration project.

(4) For purposes of this section, "medically appropriate services, drugs, devices, products, and procedures" include:

(a) Well-woman care, including screenings, assessments, and counseling;

(b) Counseling for sexually transmitted infections, including but not limited to human immunodeficiency virus and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome;

(c) Screening for:

(i) Chlamydia;

(ii) Gonorrhea;

(iii) Hepatitis B;

(iv) Hepatitis C;

(v) Human immunodeficiency virus and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome;

(vi) Human papillomavirus;

(vii) Syphilis;

(viii) Anemia;

(ix) Urinary tract infection;

(x) Pregnancy;

(xi) Rh incompatibility;

(xii) Gestational diabetes;

(xiii) Osteoporosis;

(xiv) Breast cancer; and

(xv) Cervical cancer;

(d) Screening to determine whether counseling related to the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genetic mutations is indicated and counseling related to the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genetic mutations if indicated;

(e) Screening and appropriate counseling or interventions for:

(i) Tobacco use; and

(ii) Domestic and interpersonal violence;

(f) Folic acid supplements;

(g) Abortion;

(h) Breastfeeding comprehensive support, counseling, and supplies;

(i) Breast cancer chemoprevention counseling;

(j) Any contraceptive drug, device, or product approved by the United States food and drug administration, subject to all of the following:

(i) If there is a therapeutic equivalent of a contraceptive drug, device, or product approved by the United States food and drug administration, the authority may provide coverage for either the requested contraceptive drug, device, or product or for one or more therapeutic equivalents of the requested drug, device, or product.

(ii) If a contraceptive drug, device, or product covered by the authority is deemed medically inadvisable by the individual's provider, the authority must cover an alternative contraceptive drug, device, or product prescribed by the provider.

(iii) The authority must provide coverage without a prescription for all contraceptive drugs available for over-the-counter sale that are approved by the United States food and drug administration.

(iv) The authority may not infringe upon an individual's choice of contraception and may not require prior authorization, step therapy, or other utilization control techniques for covered contraceptive drugs, devices, or other products approved by the United States food and drug administration;

(k) Voluntary sterilization;

(l) Patient education and counseling on contraception and sterilization;

(m) Services related to sterilization or the administration and monitoring of contraceptive drugs, devices, and products including, but not limited to:

(i) Management of side effects;

(ii) Counseling for continued adherence to a prescribed regimen;

(iii) Device insertion and removal; and

(iv) Provision of alternative contraceptive drugs, devices, or products deemed medically appropriate in the judgment of an individual's provider;

(n) Any additional preventive services for women that must be covered without cost sharing as identified by the United States preventive services task force or the health resources and services administration of the United States department of health and human services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act may be known and cited as the reproductive health access for all act.

--- END ---