BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Feminine hygiene products must be available at no cost to students, in womens' and gender-neutral restrooms of public school buildings.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to implement this section.

(3) As used in this section, "feminine hygiene products" means tampons and sanitary napkins for use in connection with the menstrual cycle.

--- END ---