BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that:

(1) Registered tow truck operators have continuing problems involving the disposal of recreational vehicles that have been impounded and abandoned pursuant to chapter 46.55 RCW;

(2) Traditional methods of disposal are no longer adequate to meet the increasing problem of abandoned recreational vehicles in Washington state;

(3) Abandoned recreational vehicles continue to be a hazard to the health and safety of citizens, business owners, and the environment; and

(4) Adequate funding is necessary to resolve the problem of abandoned recreational vehicles in a manner that is environmentally friendly and economically sound so that registered tow truck operators may be successful in their duties of public impounding, transporting, and storing unauthorized vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.55 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A registered tow truck operator may transport an abandoned recreational vehicle under section 5 of this act without being licensed as a hulk hauler. The transport of an abandoned recreational vehicle by a registered tow truck operator under this chapter must be completed by utilizing a reasonable, direct, and safe route on the date of transport.

(2) A registered tow truck operator must provide a written record of the delivery to a licensed dismantler or authorized disposal site for each abandoned recreational vehicle by use of an abandoned vehicle report or junk vehicle affidavit to be sent to the department. A copy of the report must be maintained in the vehicle transaction file. Completion of the report relieves the registered tow truck operator from any civil or criminal liability for the disposal of a properly processed abandoned recreational vehicle.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.79.110 and 2001 c 64 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit: Any individual not engaged in business as a hulk hauler or scrap processor from towing any vehicle owned by him or her to any vehicle wrecker or scrap processor, or a registered tow truck operator from transporting an abandoned recreational vehicle under section 5 of this act in compliance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 46.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Before accepting an application for a registration for a recreational vehicle, the department, county auditor, or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director, shall require an applicant to pay a six-dollar fee in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.

(2) The abandoned recreational disposal fee must be distributed as follows:

(a) Ninety percent to the abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account created in section 6 of this act;

(b) Ten percent to the motor vehicle fund;

(c) After one million dollars is deposited into the motor vehicle fund from the fee required in this section, one hundred percent of the fee required in this section must be distributed to the abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account created in section 6 of this act.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "recreational vehicle" means a camper, motor home, or travel trailer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) A registered tow truck operator, as defined in RCW 46.55.010, vehicle wrecker, as defined in RCW 46.80.010, or scrap processor, as defined in RCW 46.79.010, may apply to the department on a form prescribed by the department for financial aid for the transport, storage, dismantling, and disposal of abandoned recreational vehicles from public property.

(2) The department may only use funds under section 6 of this act for financial aid for the transport, storage, dismantling, and disposal of abandoned recreational vehicles.

(3) After consulting with the 2017 stakeholder group, the department may develop rules including, but not limited to, towing, storage, dismantling, and disposal rates, application form and contents, and financial aid and the reimbursement process, to implement this section.

(4) The department shall convene a stakeholder work group every two years, with the first meeting to be held within twelve months of rule adoption, to make recommendations on rule amendments.

(5) An "abandoned recreational vehicle" means a camper, motorhome, or travel trailer that has been impounded from public property, abandoned pursuant to chapter 46.55 RCW, and received no bids at auction, or declared an abandoned junk vehicle by a law enforcement officer, pursuant to chapter 46.55 RCW, while on public property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account is created in the state treasury. All receipts, except for receipts allocated to the motor vehicle fund, from the fee imposed in section 4 of this act must be deposited into the account. The account may receive fund transfers and appropriations from the general fund, as well as gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of this chapter and expend any income according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments, provided that those terms do not conflict with any provisions of this section or any guidelines developed to prioritize reimbursement of removal projects associated with this act.

(2) Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only by the department to reimburse registered tow truck operators and licensed dismantlers for up to one hundred percent of the total reasonable and auditable administrative costs for transport, dismantling, and disposal of abandoned recreational vehicles under section 5 of this act when the last registered owner is unknown after a reasonable search effort. Compliance with RCW 46.55.100 is considered a reasonable effort to locate the last registered owner of the abandoned recreational vehicle. Any funds received by the registered tow truck operators or licensed dismantlers through collection efforts from the last owner of record shall be turned over to the department for vehicles reimbursed under section 5 of this act.

(3) Funds in the account resulting from transfers from the general fund must be used to reimburse one hundred percent of eligible costs.

(4) In each fiscal biennium, up to fifteen percent of the expenditures from the account may be used for administrative expenses of the department in implementing this chapter.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.84.092 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 50, 2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 12, and 2017 c 290 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust account, the diesel idle reduction account, the drinking water assistance account, ((the drinking water assistance administrative account,)) the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle charging infrastructure account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account, the high capacity transportation account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the high occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the state wildlife account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, the state university permanent fund, and the state reclamation revolving account shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 8. RCW 46.80.020 and 2003 c 53 s 253 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, it is unlawful for a person to engage in the business of wrecking vehicles without having first applied for and received a license.

(b) As defined in chapter 70.95 RCW, a solid waste disposal site that is compliant with all applicable regulations may wreck a nonmotorized abandoned recreational vehicle, as defined in section 5 of this act.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person or firm engaged in the unlawful activity described in this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(b) A second or subsequent offense is a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Section 4 of this act applies to vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after May 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. The director of licensing may take necessary steps to ensure that this act is implemented on its effective date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. Section 5 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. This act takes effect May 1, 2019.

--- END ---