BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that it is in the public's interest to have knowledge of the potential influence that campaign finance contributions, lobbying expenditures, and privately funded state employee and contractor positions have over policy-making and other state executive, administrative, and legislative actions. The legislature further finds that existing public disclosure laws provide sunlight on campaign finance and lobbying activities, but not privately funded state employees and contractors. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to shine a light on any current and future state employee or contractor positions that are funded by organizations or individuals other than the state of Washington by requiring the public disclosure of those employees and contractors, their positions, their salaries, and the sources of the private funds used to pay their salaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 42.17A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every executive state officer and every agency, except for institutions of higher education, shall report to the commission the following information for any employee or contractor employed or contracted with such executive state officer or agency whose position is funded, in whole or in part, by private sources:

(a) The name of the employee or contractor;

(b) The scope of the work performed by the employee or contractor;

(c) The annual gross salary of the employee or contractor;

(d) The name of any private sources from which the funding for the salary of the employee or contractor is received and the amount of such funding; and

(e) If the private source is a nonprofit organization as defined by section 501(c) of the internal revenue code, a list of the nonprofit organization's top fifty donors and any donor that has contributed more than fifty thousand dollars to such nonprofit organization, based on donations received during the two calendar years prior to the calendar year in which the information is being reported, and the city, state, and zip code of each donor's residence or domicile.

(2) The information as set forth in subsection (1) of this section must be reported to the commission within thirty days of the first day of work of the employee or contractor, and by January 31st of each year thereafter that the employee or contractor remains employed or contracted with the executive state officer or agency.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Executive state officer" has the same meaning as in RCW 42.17A.705;

(b) "Employee or contractor" means any individual employed or contracted with any department or agency of state government;

(c) "Agency" has the same meaning as in RCW 42.17A.005; and

(d) "Private sources" includes grants or funds received from a tax-exempt nonprofit organization as defined by section 501(c) of the internal revenue code, funds received from a private business entity, or funds received from an individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 42.17A RCW to read as follows:

The commission shall make all information reported under section 2 of this act available for public use or inspection and also allow direct access to all such information on the commission's web site that it operates under RCW 42.17A.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 42.17A RCW to read as follows:

It is a violation of this chapter for an executive state officer as defined in RCW 42.17A.055 or agency as defined in RCW 42.17A.005, except for institutions of higher education, to allow a private source as defined in section 2 of this act to fund more than fifty thousand dollars of the annual gross salary of an employee or contractor employed or contracted with such executive state officer or agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The public disclosure commission may adopt, amend, or repeal rules to implement this act.

--- END ---