BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.07.200 and 2011 c 298 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state and the director of revenue ((may)) must enter into agreements designating the department of revenue as the secretary of state's agent for ((issuing all or)) administering under chapter 19.02 RCW a portion of the legal entity ((renewals)) annual report filings within the jurisdiction of the secretary of state, to include both domestic and foreign:

(1) For profit corporations;

(2) Professional service corporations;

(3) Limited liability companies;

(4) Professional limited liability companies;

(5) Public service corporations;

(6) Massachusetts trusts; and

(7) For profit cooperatives.

--- END ---