BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that in 1996, an agreement entitled memorandum of agreement regarding utilization of Skagit basin water resources for instream and out-of-stream purposes was negotiated and entered into by the Washington department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, Skagit county, public utility district number 1 of Skagit county, the city of Anacortes, the Swinomish Indian tribal community, the Upper Skagit Indian tribe, and the Sauk-Suiattle Indian tribe. The legislature further finds that in 2001, the department of ecology adopted chapter 173-503 WAC, a regulation that conflicted with the 1996 agreement. It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that if the state enters into an agreement with other parties, that rules adopted by the state do not conflict with that agreement. It is the further intent of the legislature that the rule making required by this act is for the purpose of resolving the shortage of water available for development in water resource inventory areas 3 and 4 by providing increased access to potable water.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 90.54 RCW to read as follows:

By June 30, 2019, the department shall amend chapter 173-503 WAC to be consistent with the 1996 memorandum of agreement regarding utilization of Skagit basin water resources for instream and out-of-stream purposes. The purpose of the amendment is to resolve the shortage of water available for development in water resource inventory areas 3 and 4 by providing increased access to potable water.

--- END ---