BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature hereby directs the city of Spokane Valley to rename the portion of the Milwaukee road corridor in the city of Spokane Valley known as the Appleway trail the "Senator Bob McCaslin trail."

The state shall provide and install a proper marker in a suitable location in at least one main activity area of the trail identifying the name of the trail. The state parks and recreation commission shall incur all costs associated with the provision and installation of the sign. The city is not obligated to change any signage that existed as of the effective date of this act, or to provide additional signage.

The legislature finds that it is appropriate to so honor Senator Bob McCaslin for his thirty years of dedicated service to the people of this state.

--- END ---