BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.140 and 2017 c 260 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is a license to distillers, including blending, rectifying, and bottling; fee two thousand dollars per annum, unless provided otherwise as follows:

(a) For distillers producing ((one hundred fifty thousand gallons or less of)) spirits with at least half of the raw materials used in the production grown in Washington, the license fee must be reduced to one hundred dollars per annum;

(b) The board must license stills used and to be used solely and only by a commercial chemist for laboratory purposes, and not for the manufacture of liquor for sale, at a fee of twenty dollars per annum;

(c) The board must license stills used and to be used solely and only for laboratory purposes in any school, college, or educational institution in the state, without fee; and

(d) The board must license stills that have been duly licensed as fruit and/or wine distilleries by the federal government, used and to be used solely as fruit and/or wine distilleries in the production of fruit brandy and wine spirits, at a fee of two hundred dollars per annum.

(2) Any distillery licensed under this section may:

(a) Sell spirits of its own production for consumption off the premises. A distillery selling spirits under this subsection must comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to retailers;

(b) Contract distilled spirits for, and sell contract distilled spirits to, holders of distillers' or manufacturers' licenses, including licenses issued under RCW 66.24.520, or for export; and

(c) Provide samples subject to the following conditions:

(i) For the purposes of this subsection, the maximum amount of alcohol per person per day is two ounces;

(ii) Provide free or for a charge one-half ounce or less samples of spirits of its own production to persons on the premises of the distillery. Spirits samples may be adulterated with nonalcoholic mixers, mixers with alcohol of the distiller's own production, water, and/or ice;

(iii) Sell adulterated samples of spirits of their own production, water, and/or ice to persons on the premises at the distillery; and

(iv) Every person who participates in any manner in the service of these samples must obtain a class 12 alcohol server permit.

--- END ---