BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.05.153 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as the result of a mental disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the information if any, the designated crisis responder may take such person, or cause by oral or written order such person to be taken into emergency custody in an evaluation and treatment facility for not more than seventy-two hours as described in RCW 71.05.180.

(2) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as the result of substance use disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the information if any, the designated crisis responder may take the person, or cause by oral or written order the person to be taken, into emergency custody in a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program for not more than seventy-two hours as described in RCW 71.05.180, if a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program is available and has adequate space for the person.

(3)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, a peace officer may take or cause such person to be taken into custody and immediately delivered to a triage facility, crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or the emergency department of a local hospital under the following circumstances:

(i) Pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section; or

(ii) When he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person is suffering from a mental disorder or substance use disorder and presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled.

(b) A peace officer's delivery of a person, based on a substance use disorder, to a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program is subject to the availability of a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program with adequate space for the person.

(4) Persons delivered to a crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, emergency department of a local hospital, triage facility that has elected to operate as an involuntary facility, secure detoxification facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program by peace officers pursuant to subsection (3) of this section may be held by the facility for a period of up to twelve hours, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance.

(5) Within three hours after arrival, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, the person must be examined by a mental health professional. The facility shall inquire as to a person's veteran status or eligibility for veteran's benefits and report to the veterans health administration, as soon as reasonably possible, and take into consideration the person's emergency care needs, when a person who has been identified as a veteran or a person who is eligible for veterans services is being treated for a mental health or substance use disorder. The facility must request a transfer to a veterans health administration facility for treatment. If the transfer request is approved by the veterans health administration, the person shall be released to the accepting veterans health administration facility upon medical clearance. Within twelve hours of notice of the need for evaluation, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, the designated crisis responder must determine whether the individual meets detention criteria. If the individual is detained, the designated crisis responder shall file a petition for detention or a supplemental petition as appropriate and commence service on the designated attorney for the detained person. If the individual is released to the community, the mental health service provider shall inform the peace officer of the release within a reasonable period of time after the release if the peace officer has specifically requested notification and provided contact information to the provider.

(6) Dismissal of a commitment petition is not the appropriate remedy for a violation of the timeliness requirements of this section based on the intent of this chapter under RCW 71.05.010 except in the few cases where the facility staff or designated mental health professional has totally disregarded the requirements of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.05.153 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 213 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as the result of a mental disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the information if any, the designated crisis responder may take such person, or cause by oral or written order such person to be taken into emergency custody in an evaluation and treatment facility for not more than seventy-two hours as described in RCW 71.05.180.

(2) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as the result of substance use disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the information if any, the designated crisis responder may take the person, or cause by oral or written order the person to be taken, into emergency custody in a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program for not more than seventy-two hours as described in RCW 71.05.180.

(3) A peace officer may take or cause such person to be taken into custody and immediately delivered to a triage facility, crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or the emergency department of a local hospital under the following circumstances:

(a) Pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section; or

(b) When he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person is suffering from a mental disorder or substance use disorder and presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled.

(4) Persons delivered to a crisis stabilization unit, evaluation and treatment facility, emergency department of a local hospital, triage facility that has elected to operate as an involuntary facility, secure detoxification facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program by peace officers pursuant to subsection (3) of this section may be held by the facility for a period of up to twelve hours, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance.

(5) Within three hours after arrival, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, the person must be examined by a mental health professional. The facility shall inquire as to a person's veteran status or eligibility for veteran's benefits and report to the veterans health administration, as soon as reasonably possible, and take into consideration the person's emergency care needs, when a person who has been identified as a veteran or a person who is eligible for veterans services is being treated for a mental health or substance use disorder. The facility must request a transfer to a veterans health administration facility for treatment. If the transfer request is approved by the veterans health administration, the person shall be released to the accepting veterans health administration facility upon medical clearance. Within twelve hours of notice of the need for evaluation, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, the designated crisis responder must determine whether the individual meets detention criteria. If the individual is detained, the designated crisis responder shall file a petition for detention or a supplemental petition as appropriate and commence service on the designated attorney for the detained person. If the individual is released to the community, the mental health service provider shall inform the peace officer of the release within a reasonable period of time after the release if the peace officer has specifically requested notification and provided contact information to the provider.

(6) Dismissal of a commitment petition is not the appropriate remedy for a violation of the timeliness requirements of this section based on the intent of this chapter under RCW 71.05.010 except in the few cases where the facility staff or designated mental health professional has totally disregarded the requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2026.

--- END ---