BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The governor's autonomous vehicle work group, established under state of Washington executive order 17-02, shall prepare a report to the legislature evaluating the merits of a pilot project to test the use of autonomous commercial motor vehicles on public roadways in the state and making recommendations for the design of such a pilot.

(2) The report must include evaluation of the following:

(a) The potential for the use of autonomous commercial motor vehicles to address current and future freight transportation challenges faced by the state;

(b) Any unique safety challenges related to the use of autonomous technology in commercial motor vehicles and how these may best be addressed in the pilot, including any challenges posed by cybersecurity threats;

(c) Any potential conflicts of such a pilot with relevant state laws including, but not limited to, the uniform commercial driver's license act, chapter 46.25 RCW; vehicle inspection, chapter 46.32 RCW; rules of the road, chapter 46.61 RCW; and enforcement, chapter 46.64 RCW; and how these may best be addressed in the pilot;

(d) Any potential conflicts of such a pilot with federal law including, but not limited to, those that could result from the testing of autonomous commercial motor vehicles as part of interstate commerce or with the assistance of drivers with commercial driver's licenses; and

(e) The level of interest of private sector entities to participate in such a pilot.

(3) The report must include recommendations for the following:

(a) Whether the testing of autonomous commercial motor vehicles should be undertaken separately from the general autonomous vehicle pilot program established in executive order 17-02, due to the unique requirements of such a pilot;

(b) The division of state agency responsibilities for the testing of autonomous commercial motor vehicles and how these should best be coordinated;

(c) Any requirements that should be met for autonomous commercial motor vehicles to be authorized to participate in testing, including requirements for vehicle owners, vehicle drivers or operators, and vehicle liability financial responsibility requirements;

(d) The duration and timing for the testing of autonomous commercial motor vehicles; and

(e) The level of monitoring of the testing of autonomous commercial motor vehicles and the criteria by which the testing of these vehicles should be assessed during and following the testing period.

(4)(a) In conducting its evaluation and developing its recommendations, the work group shall consult with the following government entities:

(i) All work group member agencies included under executive order 17-02;

(ii) The freight mobility strategic investment board;

(iii) The utilities and transportation commission; and

(iv) The office of the insurance commissioner.

(b) The work group may consult with other relevant stakeholder groups as it deems appropriate.

(5) By January 2, 2019, the work group shall submit the report required under this section to all relevant committees of the legislature, including the transportation committees; the house public safety committee; the senate law and justice committee; the house technology and economic development committee; and the senate economic development and international trade committee.

(6) As used in this section, "autonomous commercial motor vehicle" means any vehicle that meets the following criteria:

(a) The definition for "commercial motor vehicle" provided in RCW 46.25.010; and

(b) The definition of level 3, 4, or 5 of SAE international standard J3016, as published on September 30, 2016, which is equipped with technology that has the capability of operating or driving the vehicle without the active physical control or monitoring of a human operator, whether or not the technology is engaged, excluding vehicles equipped with one or more systems that enhance safety or provide driver assistance but are not capable of driving or operating the vehicle without the active physical control or monitoring of a human operator.

(7) This section expires July 1, 2019.

--- END ---