BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the revenue to the state general fund pursuant to the state of Washington's regulation of marijuana and marijuana-related products is an important and sustaining resource for state moneys appropriated for the essential governmental functions of providing health care, behavioral health services, education, and other human services. These revenues generated under the state of Washington's critical oversight are also an important part of the state of Washington's economic infrastructure and future economic well-being.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

The Washington state patrol shall create a new drug enforcement task force with the sole purpose of controlling the illicit production of marijuana and marijuana-related products in the state of Washington.

--- END ---