BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.16A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall allow a motorcycle owner to register initially as provided in RCW 46.16A.040 or to renew the registration as provided in RCW 46.16A.110 and, at the same time, to register the vehicle, or renew the vehicle registration, for use as a snow bike under the terms for snowmobile registration in chapter 46.10 RCW. The fees and other terms pertaining to vehicle registration under this chapter and chapter 46.10 RCW apply.

(2) The department shall establish a declaration subject to the requirements of RCW 9A.72.085, which must be submitted by the motorcycle owner when applying for a snowmobile registration or registration renewal under chapter 46.10 RCW for the use of the converted motorcycle as a snow bike. The declaration must include a statement signed by the owner that a motorcycle that had been previously converted to a snow bike must conform with all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards and state standards while in use as a motorcycle upon public roads, streets, or highways.

(3) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.10 RCW to read as follows:

The owner of a motorcycle may apply for a snowmobile registration as provided in section 1 of this act and under the terms of this chapter to use the motorcycle, when properly converted, as a snow bike for the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

A person may operate a motorcycle, that previously had been converted to a snow bike, upon a public road, street, or highway of this state if:

(1) The person files a motorcycle highway use declaration, as provided under section 1 of this act, with the department certifying conformance with all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards and state standards while in use as a motorcycle upon public roads, streets, or highways;

(2) The person obtains a valid driver's license and motorcycle endorsement issued to Washington residents in compliance with chapter 46.20 RCW for a motorcycle; and

(3) The motorcycle conforms to all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards and state standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Snow bike" means a motorcycle or off-road motorcycle that has been modified with a conversion kit to include (1) an endless belt tread or cleats or similar means for the purposes of propulsion on snow and (2) a ski or sled type runner for the purposes of steering.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.10.300 and 2010 c 161 s 225 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The following definitions apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "All terrain vehicle" means any self-propelled vehicle other than a snowmobile, capable of cross-country travel on or immediately over land, water, snow, ice, marsh, swampland, and other natural terrain, including, but not limited to, four-wheel vehicles, amphibious vehicles, ground effect or air cushion vehicles, and any other means of land transportation deriving motive power from any source other than muscle or wind; except any vehicle designed primarily for travel on, over, or in the water, farm vehicles, or any military or law enforcement vehicles.

(2) "Commission" means the Washington state parks and recreation commission.

(3) "Committee" means the Washington state parks and recreation commission snowmobile advisory committee.

(4) "Dealer" means a person, partnership, association, or corporation engaged in the business of selling snowmobiles or all terrain vehicles at wholesale or retail in this state.

(5) "Highway" means the entire width of the right-of-way of a primary and secondary state highway, including any portion of the interstate highway system.

(6) "Hunt" means any effort to kill, injure, capture, or disturb a wild animal or wild bird.

(7) "Public roadway" means the entire width of the right-of-way of any road or street designed and ordinarily used for travel or parking of motor vehicles, which is controlled by a public authority other than the Washington state department of transportation, and which is open as a matter of right to the general public for ordinary vehicular traffic.

(8) "Snowmobile" means both "snowmobile" as defined in RCW 46.04.546 and "snow bike" as defined in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect April 1, 2019.

--- END ---