BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the Richland, Kennewick, and Pasco school districts serve students connected by a common local economy, community, and region. These districts are treated differently in the regionalization factors applied to school salaries under the changes made to basic education funding in the 2017 session, with Richland receiving regional adjustments of six percent, and Pasco and Kennewick receiving no adjustment. In recognition of the similar economic characteristic of the communities served by these school districts and the common economy and region they share, the legislature finds that regionalization factors should treat these school districts equally.

Sec. 2. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION—BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION

(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units as provided in House Bill No. 2242 (fully funding the program of basic education), RCW 28A.150.260, and under section 502 of this act:

(a) For the 2017-18 school year, salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units are determined for each district by multiplying the district's certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 2 by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP document 1.

(b) For the 2017-18 school year, salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units and classified staff units for each district are determined based on the district's certificated administrative and classified salary allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document 2.

(c) For the 2018-19 school year salary allocations for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff units are determined for each school district by multiplying the statewide minimum salary allocation for each staff type by the school district's regionalization factor shown in LEAP Document 3.

Statewide Minimum Salary Allocation

For School Year 2018-19

Certificated Instructional Staff

$59,333.55

Certificated Administrative Staff

$79,127.50

Classified Staff

$39,975.50

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "LEAP Document 1" means the staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff according to education and years of experience, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on June 22, 2017, at 1:14 hours; and

(b) "LEAP Document 2" means the school year salary allocations for certificated administrative staff and classified staff and derived and total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on June 22, 2017, at 1:14 hours.

(c) "LEAP Document 3" means the school district regionalization factors for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on ((June 22, 2017, at 1:14)) January 26, 2018, at 12:59 hours.

(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary adjustments at a rate of 22.85 percent for school year 2017-18 and 22.85 percent for school year 2018-19 for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 21.10 percent for school year 2017-18 and 21.10 percent for the 2018-19 school year for classified staff.

(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary allocation schedule for certificated instructional staff are established for basic education salary allocations for the 2017-18 school year:

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff

For School Year 2017-18

*** Education Experience ***

Years

MA+90

of

OR

Service

BA

BA+15

BA+30

BA+45

BA+90

BA+135

MA

MA+45

Ph.D.

0

36,521

37,507

38,529

39,554

42,840

44,957

43,785

47,072

49,191

1

37,013

38,013

39,048

40,117

43,438

45,543

44,272

47,593

49,697

2

37,481

38,491

39,537

40,688

44,000

46,127

44,762

48,073

50,201

3

37,964

38,983

40,040

41,229

44,534

46,712

45,227

48,529

50,709

4

38,437

39,501

40,565

41,794

45,119

47,313

45,714

49,038

51,234

5

38,926

39,995

41,069

42,367

45,679

47,918

46,209

49,522

51,760

6

39,428

40,474

41,585

42,948

46,244

48,494

46,716

50,013

52,262

7

40,312

41,373

42,498

43,935

47,280

49,593

47,666

51,010

53,324

8

41,604

42,724

43,876

45,431

48,822

51,219

49,161

52,552

54,949

9

44,122

45,332

46,943

50,413

52,892

50,672

54,143

56,623

10

46,805

48,533

52,049

54,611

52,263

55,780

58,340

11

50,169

53,761

56,375

53,899

57,492

60,104

12

51,753

55,520

58,211

55,600

59,250

61,942

13

57,322

60,093

57,360

61,052

63,823

14

59,132

62,046

59,172

62,981

65,776

15

60,671

63,660

60,710

64,618

67,486

16 or more

61,884

64,932

61,924

65,910

68,836

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate degree.

(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection, the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:

(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and

(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.

(b) "MA" means a masters degree.

(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.

(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.

(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and 28A.415.023.

(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in this part V, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a) The employee has a masters degree; or

(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations before January 1, 1992.

(7) The salary allocations established in this section are for allocation purposes only except as provided in this subsection, and do not entitle an individual staff position to a particular paid salary except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200, as amended by House Bill No. 2242 (fully funding the program of basic education).

(8) For school year 2018-19, the salary allocations for each district shall be the greater of:

(a) The derived school year 2018-19 salary allocations in subsection (1) of this section; or

(b) The derived salary allocations for school year 2017-18 increased by 2.3 percent.

--- END ---