BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.07.120 and 2015 c 176 s 8101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary of state must establish by rule and collect the fees in this subsection:

(a) For a copy of any law, resolution, record, or other document or paper on file in the secretary's office;

(b) For any certificate under seal;

(c) For filing and recording trademark;

(d) For each deed or patent of land issued by the governor;

(e) For recording miscellaneous records, papers, or other documents.

(2) The secretary of state may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW establishing reasonable fees for the following services rendered under chapter 23.95 RCW, Title 23B RCW, chapter 18.100, 19.09, 19.34, 19.77, 23.86, 23.90, 24.03, 24.06, 24.12, 24.20, 24.24, 24.28, 24.36, 25.04, 25.15, 25.10, 25.05, or 26.60 RCW:

(a) Any service rendered in-person at the secretary of state's office;

(b) Any expedited service;

(c) The electronic or facsimile transmittal of information from corporation records or copies of documents;

(d) The providing of information by micrographic or other reduced-format compilation;

(e) The handling of checks, drafts, or credit or debit cards upon adoption of rules authorizing their use for which sufficient funds are not on deposit; and

(f) Special search charges.

(3) To facilitate the collection of fees, the secretary of state may establish accounts for deposits by persons who may frequently be assessed such fees to pay the fees as they are assessed. The secretary of state may make whatever arrangements with those persons as may be necessary to carry out this section.

(4) The secretary of state may adopt rules for the use of credit or debit cards for payment of fees.

(5) No member of the legislature, state officer, justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or judge of the superior court may be charged for any search relative to matters pertaining to the duties of his or her office; nor may such official be charged for a certified copy of any law or resolution passed by the legislature relative to his or her official duties, if such law has not been published as a state law.

(6)(a) In addition to the fees authorized under subsection (1) of this section, the secretary of state must collect eleven dollars from each of the following foreign or domestic legal entities when the following legal entities file an annual report:

(i) For profit corporations;

(ii) Professional service corporations;

(iii) Limited liability companies;

(iv) Professional limited liability companies;

(v) Public service corporations;

(vi) Massachusetts trusts; and

(vii) For profit cooperatives.

(b) All such amounts collected under this subsection (6) must be deposited in the business license account created in RCW 19.02.210.

--- END ---