BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that Washington has one of the strongest economies in the country. The annual unemployment rate in the Seattle-Bellevue-Everett metropolitan area, as defined by the United States bureau of labor statistics, has been an average of one and twenty-one one hundredths lower than the national unemployment rate over the past five years.

(2) However, the local economies in rural counties continue to struggle. Over the past five years, the annual unemployment rate in rural counties, as defined by the office of financial management, has been an average of two and one-tenth higher than the unemployment rate in urban counties.

(3) The legislature concludes that in the spirit of one Washington, the economic prosperity of our state must be shared by all of our communities, both urban and rural. Therefore, it is the intention of the legislature to modify the business and occupation tax structure of manufacturers located in rural areas to encourage economic growth and lower unemployment rates in our rural counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preferences in chapter . . ., Laws of 2018 (this act). This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preferences. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(2) The legislature categorizes these tax preferences as ones intended to increase jobs and lower the unemployment rate in rural counties, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(f).

(3) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to decrease the gap between the unemployment rate in rural counties and urban counties, without compromising the underlying financial structure of the forest and fish support account.

(4) If a review finds that the aggregate unemployment rate in rural counties, as defined in RCW 82.14.370, is no more than one and one-half percent higher than the aggregate unemployment rate in all Washington counties that are not rural counties, then the legislature intends for the legislative auditor to recommend extending the expiration date of these tax preferences.

(5) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in subsection (4) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may refer to any available data source, and the employment security department is directed to cooperate with any requests for data pursuant to facilitating the review authorized in this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.04.240 and 2004 c 24 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Upon every eligible manufacturer engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing in an eligible area, and every eligible manufacturer engaging within this state in the business of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of products manufactured by the eligible manufacturer in an eligible area, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:

(i) Through December 31, 2018, 0.484 percent for manufacturing and wholesale sales and 0.471 percent for retail sales;

(ii) 0.4517 percent from January 1, 2019, through December 31, 2019;

(iii) 0.4195 percent from January 1, 2020, through December 31, 2020;

(iv) 0.3872 percent from January 1, 2021, through December 31, 2021;

(v) 0.3549 percent from January 1, 2022, through December 31, 2022;

(vi) 0.3227 percent from January 1, 2023, through December 31, 2023; and

(vii) 0.2904 percent from January 1, 2024, and thereafter.

(b) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this subsection (1) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(i) "Eligible area" means a county or a statistically equivalent entity, as defined by the United States census bureau, located within or without the state, that:

(A) Has a population density of less than one hundred persons per square mile; or

(B) Is smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles and has a population not exceeding one hundred thousand.

(ii)(A) "Eligible manufacturer" means a manufacturer or processor for hire, engaged in manufacturing within an eligible area.

(B) "Eligible manufacturer" does not include a manufacturer or processor for hire, engaged in petroleum refining.

(iii) "Manufacturing" means the same as "to manufacture" as defined in RCW 82.04.120.

(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a manufacturer, except persons taxable as manufacturers under other provisions of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of the products, including byproducts, manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(3) The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including byproducts, so manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

(4) This section expires on the earlier of:

(a) The date that section 4 of this act takes effect; or

(b) January 1, 2029.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.04.240 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 518 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Upon every eligible manufacturer engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing in an eligible area, and every eligible manufacturer engaging within this state in the business of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of products manufactured by the eligible manufacturer in an eligible area, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:

(i) Through December 31, 2018, 0.484 percent for manufacturing and wholesale sales and 0.471 percent for retail sales;

(ii) 0.4517 percent from January 1, 2019, through December 31, 2019;

(iii) 0.4195 percent from January 1, 2020, through December 31, 2020;

(iv) 0.3872 percent from January 1, 2021, through December 31, 2021;

(v) 0.3549 percent from January 1, 2022, through December 31, 2022;

(vi) 0.3227 percent from January 1, 2023, through December 31, 2023; and

(vii) 0.2904 percent from January 1, 2024, and thereafter.

(b) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this subsection (1) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(i) "Eligible area" means a county or a statistically equivalent entity, as defined by the United States census bureau, located within or without the state, that:

(A) Has a population density of less than one hundred persons per square mile; or

(B) Is smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles and has a population not exceeding one hundred thousand.

(ii)(A) "Eligible manufacturer" means a manufacturer or processor for hire, engaged in manufacturing within an eligible area.

(B) "Eligible manufacturer" does not include a manufacturer or processor for hire, engaged in petroleum refining.

(iii) "Manufacturing" means the same as "to manufacture" as defined in RCW 82.04.120.

(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a manufacturer, except persons taxable as manufacturers under other provisions of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products, including byproducts, manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(((2))) (3)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing semiconductor materials, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured, or, in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. For the purposes of this subsection "semiconductor materials" means silicon crystals, silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor wafers, compound semiconductors, integrated circuits, and microchips.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (((2))) (3) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(((3))) (4) The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including byproducts, so manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

(((4))) (5)(a) This section expires ((January)) July 1, 2024, unless the contingency in RCW 82.32.790(2) occurs.

(b) If the contingency in RCW 82.32.790(2) occurs, this section expires January 1, 2029.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.04.440 and 2011 c 2 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person engaged in activities that are subject to tax under two or more provisions of RCW 82.04.230 through 82.04.298, inclusive, is taxable under each provision applicable to those activities.

(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.240(1), 82.04.2909(2), 82.04.250, 82.04.270, 82.04.294(2), or 82.04.260 (1)(b), (c), or (d), (4), (11), or (12) with respect to selling products in this state, including those persons who are also taxable under RCW 82.04.261, are allowed a credit against those taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of products so sold in this state, and/or (b) extracting taxes paid with respect to the extracting of products so sold in this state or ingredients of products so sold in this state. Extracting taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of this section may also be taken under this subsection, if otherwise allowable under this subsection. The amount of the credit may not exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter with respect to the sale of those products.

(3) Persons taxable as manufacturers under RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260 (1)(b) or (12), including those persons who are also taxable under RCW 82.04.261, are allowed a credit against those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with respect to extracting the ingredients of the products so manufactured in this state. The amount of the credit may not exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing of those products.

(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1), 82.04.294(1), 82.04.2404, or 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (11), or (12), including those persons who are also taxable under RCW 82.04.261, with respect to extracting or manufacturing products in this state are allowed a credit against those taxes for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to another state with respect to the sales of the products so extracted or manufactured in this state, (ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of products using ingredients so extracted in this state, or (iii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing activities completed in another state for products so manufactured in this state. The amount of the credit may not exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter with respect to the extraction or manufacturing of those products.

(5) For the purpose of this section:

(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:

(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the tax an income tax or value added tax; and

(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately stated from the sales price.

(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign country or political subdivision thereof.

(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240, 82.04.2404, 82.04.2909(1), 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (11), and (12), and 82.04.294(1); (ii) the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who are engaged in business as a manufacturer; and (iii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to other states.

(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes (i) the tax imposed on extractors in RCW 82.04.230 and 82.04.260(12); (ii) the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who are engaged in business as an extractor; and (iii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to other states.

(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through ((82.04.212 [82.04.217])) 82.04.217, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of describing taxes imposed by other states.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.04.260 and 2017 c 135 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:

(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;

(b) Beginning July 1, 2025, seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;

(c)(i) Except as provided otherwise in (c)(iii) of this subsection, from July 1, 2025, until January 1, 2036, dairy products; or selling dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products" means:

(A) Products, not including any marijuana-infused product, that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and

(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by weight or volume.

(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy product;

(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2025, fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products;

(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and

(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.

(8)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.

(b) If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.

(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent thereafter.

(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:

(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and

(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.

(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(e)(i) Except as provided in (e)(ii) of this subsection (11), this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.

(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited outside the state of Washington. This subsection (11)(e)(ii) only applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850.

(12)(a) Until ((July 1, 2024)) the date provided in (e) of this subsection, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through ((June 30, 2024)) the date provided in (e) of this subsection.

(b) Until ((July 1, 2024)) the date provided in (e) of this subsection, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i) Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through ((June 30, 2024)) the date provided in (e) of this subsection.

(c) Until ((July 1, 2024)) the date provided in (e) of this subsection, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through ((June 30, 2024)) the date provided in (e) of this subsection.

(d) Until ((July 1, 2024)) the date provided in (e) of this subsection, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after severance.

(e) The rates in this section that reference this subsection (12)(e) are effective until July 1, 2029.

(f) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:

(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.

(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue; kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard, liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of printed materials.

(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(((e))) (f)(iii), "postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.

(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035.

(v) "Timber products" means:

(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;

(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered paper or paper products; and

(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of biocomposite surface products.

(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood windows; and biocomposite surface products.

(((f))) (g) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.35 percent until July 1, 2024, and 0.484 percent thereafter.

(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (14) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 7. RCW 82.04.261 and 2017 c 323 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(12), a surcharge is imposed on those persons who are subject to any of the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(12). Except as otherwise provided in this section, the surcharge is equal to 0.052 percent. The surcharge is added to the rates provided in RCW 82.04.260(12) (a), (b), (c), and (d). ((The surcharge and this section expire July 1, 2024.))

(2) All receipts from the surcharge imposed under this section must be deposited into the forest and fish support account created in RCW 76.09.405.

(3)(a) The surcharge imposed under this section is suspended if((:

(i))) receipts from the surcharge total at least eight million dollars during any fiscal biennium((; or

(ii) The office of financial management certifies to the department that the federal government has appropriated at least two million dollars for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington for any federal fiscal year)).

(b)(((i))) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(((i))) of this subsection (3) takes effect on the first day of the calendar month that is at least thirty days after the end of the month during which the department determines that receipts from the surcharge total at least eight million dollars during the fiscal biennium. The surcharge is imposed again at the beginning of the following fiscal biennium.

(((ii) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(ii) of this subsection (3) takes effect on the later of the first day of October of any federal fiscal year for which the federal government appropriates at least two million dollars for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington, or the first day of a calendar month that is at least thirty days following the date that the office of financial management makes a certification to the department under subsection (5) of this section. The surcharge is imposed again on the first day of the following July.

(4)(a) If, by October 1st of any federal fiscal year, the office of financial management certifies to the department that the federal government has appropriated funds for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington but the amount of the appropriation is less than two million dollars, the department must adjust the surcharge in accordance with this subsection.

(b) The department must adjust the surcharge by an amount that the department estimates will cause the amount of funds deposited into the forest and fish support account for the state fiscal year that begins July 1st and that includes the beginning of the federal fiscal year for which the federal appropriation is made, to be reduced by twice the amount of the federal appropriation for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.

(c) Any adjustment in the surcharge takes effect at the beginning of a calendar month that is at least thirty days after the date that the office of financial management makes the certification under subsection (5) of this section.

(d) The surcharge is imposed again at the rate provided in subsection (1) of this section on the first day of the following state fiscal year unless the surcharge is suspended under subsection (3) of this section or adjusted for that fiscal year under this subsection.

(e) Adjustments of the amount of the surcharge by the department are final and may not be used to challenge the validity of the surcharge imposed under this section.

(f) The department must provide timely notice to affected taxpayers of the suspension of the surcharge or an adjustment of the surcharge.

(5) The office of financial management must make the certification to the department as to the status of federal appropriations for tribal participation in forest and fish report-related activities.)) (c) The department must provide timely notice to affected taxpayers of the suspension of the surcharge.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2029.

Sec. 8. RCW 82.32.790 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 526 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Section 4, chapter . . ., Laws of 2018 (section 4 of this act), sections 510, 512, 514, 516, 518, 520, 522, and 524, chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess., sections 9, 13, 17, 22, 24, 30, 32, and 45, chapter 135, Laws of 2017, sections 104, 110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010, and sections 1, 2, 3, and 5 through 10, chapter 149, Laws of 2003 are contingent upon the siting and commercial operation of a significant semiconductor microchip fabrication facility in the state of Washington by January 1, 2024.

(b) For the purposes of this section:

(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.

(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.

(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.

(2) The sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section take effect the first day of the month in which a contract for the construction of a significant semiconductor fabrication facility is signed, if the contract is signed and received by January 1, 2024, as determined by the director of the department of revenue.

(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide notice of the effective date of the sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.

(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been signed and the sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section are effective, the department discovers that commencement of commercial production did not take place within three years of the date the contract was signed, the department must make a determination that chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is no longer effective, and all taxes that would have been otherwise due are deemed deferred taxes and are immediately assessed and payable from any person reporting tax under RCW 82.04.240(2) or claiming an exemption or credit under RCW 82.04.426, 82.04.448, 82.08.965, 82.12.965, 82.08.970, 82.12.970, or 84.36.645. The department is not authorized to make a second determination regarding the effective date of the sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(4)(a) This section expires January 1, 2024, if the contingency in subsection (2) of this section does not occur by January 1, 2024, as determined by the department.

(b) The department must provide written notice of the expiration date of this section and the sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Except for section 4 of this act, this act takes effect January 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. Except for sections 3 and 4 of this act, this act expires January 1, 2029.

--- END ---