BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.08.350 and 2010 c 129 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A certificate of registration shall be granted by the director to all qualified applicants who are certified by the board as having passed the required examination and as having given satisfactory proof of completion of the required experience.

(2) Applications for examination shall be filed as the board prescribes by rule. The application and examination fees shall be determined by the director under RCW 43.24.086.

(3) An applicant for registration as an architect shall be of a good moral character, at least eighteen years of age, and shall possess one of the following qualifications:

(a) Have an accredited architectural degree and ((at least three years')) practical architectural work experience in a structured intern training program approved by the board; or

(b) Have a high school diploma or equivalent and at least ((nine)) six years of practical architectural work experience((, including the completion of)) and have completed a structured intern training program as determined by the board under the direct supervision of an architect ((as determined by the board)). Prior to applying to enroll in a structured intern training program, the applicant must have at least six years of work experience, of which three years must be under the direct supervision of an architect. This work experience may include designing buildings as a principal activity and postsecondary education as determined by the board. The board may approve up to four years of practical architectural work experience for postsecondary education courses in architecture, architectural technology, or a related field, as determined by the board, including courses completed in a community or technical college if the courses are equivalent to courses in an accredited architectural degree program.

--- END ---