BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Pursuant to chapter
43.155 RCW, the following project loans recommended by the public works board
are authorized to be made with funds previously appropriated from the public
works assistance account:

(1) Admiral's Cove
Water District‑-domestic water project‑- replace/relocate
deteriorated and undersized water mains. Replace fire hydrants. Controls and
other related equipment and materials will be installed................................................ $677,250

(2) City of Airway
Heights‑-domestic water project‑-replace deteriorated water mains,
purchase and develop a new well, and install a transmission main. Install
related equipment and

material............................................... $2,911,846

(3) Annapolis Water
District‑-domestic water project‑-repair and paint two water tanks.......................................... $104,967

(4) Annapolis Water
District‑-domestic water project‑-replace water mains throughout
the Bethel Avenue corridor............ $1,043,970

(5) Annapolis Water
District‑-domestic water project‑-replace chlorination systems..................................... $198,883

(6) City of Auburn‑-domestic
water project‑-install two corrosion control facilities and related
equipment and materials necessary to complete the project................................... $4,299,500

(7) City of Bremerton‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-construct a sanitary sewer facility including odor
controls, disinfection, and related equipment.............................................. $3,000,000

(8) Bryn Mawr‑Lakeridge
Water and Sewer District‑-domestic water project‑-replace water
mains, water services, and pressure reducing equipment. In addition, fire
hydrants and emergency water supply intertie will be installed...................................... $1,051,980

(9) City of Castle Rock‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-upgrade wastewater treatment plant. To include
installation of new aeration basins and clarifiers, upgrade pumps, disinfection
facilities will be improved, and other components will be upgraded as necessary......... $1,241,000

(10) Cedar River Water
and Sewer District‑-domestic water project‑-replace water mains,
abandon a well, and install new lines. Install or replace other related
material and equipment as

needed................................................. $2,686,000

(11) City of Chelan‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-upgrade and expand the wastewater treatment plant. To
include replacement of two lift stations and two sewage siphons. Install or
replace other related material and equipment as needed.................................... $4,969,000

(12) Clark Public
Utility‑-domestic water‑-construct a new well and pumping station
in the Pioneer area...................... $286,855

(13) Coal Creek Utility
District‑-sanitary sewer project‑-upgrade and relocate a lift
station, upsize the sewer mains, and relocate water lines $828,750

(14) Town of Colton‑-domestic
water project‑-drill and develop a new well, install a new pump,
construct a well house, and install necessary piping, equipment, controls, and
electrical

connections.............................................. $293,550

(15) Cowlitz County PUD
No. 1‑-domestic water project‑-replace water mains, install fire hydrants,
and restore

roadways................................................. $430,400

(16) City of Dayton‑-domestic
water project‑-upgrade a well, replace telemetry systems, install
controls equipment, replace water mains, and make other related improvements.......................... $494,000

(17) Town of Eatonville‑-domestic
water project‑-construct a water filtration plant and the building to
house the filtration equipment. Install controls, piping, fixtures, pumps,
corrosion control equipment, disinfection equipment, and related material and

equipment.............................................. $1,134,090

(18) City of Everett‑-domestic
water project‑‑design and construct replacement sections of water
transmission lines. Environmental, geotechnical, and related studies will be
completed and other related equipment or material will be installed................ $4,599,425

(19) Fall City Water
District‑-domestic water project‑-drill and develop a well,
construct a well house, install controls, and make other related improvements..................................... $110,500

(20) Town of Granger‑-domestic
water project‑-replace water lines and install telemetry at various sites
within the system, other related improvements, and repairs................................ $297,000

(21) Highline Water
District‑-domestic water project‑-replace water mains. Fire
hydrants, controls, valves, and other related equipment and material will be
installed............................. $1,751,000

(22) King County Water
District No. 83‑-domestic water project‑-replace water lines, and
install valves, pressure reducing stations, and eliminated dead‑end
sections. Other related improvements and repairs will be made.................................................. $670,766

(23) City of Kirkland‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-replace sewer lift station at Juanita and construct and
install new wetwells, new storage capacity, new connections to existing sewer
mains, and related equipment, materials, and buildings............................... $1,848,000

(24) Klickitat County‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-construct a sanitary sewer system, including sewer lines,
pumps, manholes, and treatment facility.............................................. $10,000,000

(25) Town of Lind‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-design and construct a new effluent disinfection system.
It will also inspect, repair, or replace several segments of the collection
system pipes.......... $384,950

(26) City of Mount
Vernon‑-bridge project‑-design and build a four‑lane bridge
crossing the Skagit River. Signal and related items will be installed or
constructed as part of the

project................................................ $2,300,000

(27) Town of Naches‑-domestic
water project‑-replace water mains and replace or rehabilitate pumps in
two wells. Other related equipment, controls, and material will be installed................. $169,575

(28) City of Nooksack‑-domestic
water project‑‑replace water lines, relocate the master water
valve, install related equipment and materials, repair roadways, and return
construction site to original state $725,555

(29) City of Okanogan‑-domestic
water project‑-install telemetry upgrades throughout the system........................... $165,750

(30) City of Olympia‑-bridge
project‑-upgrade a major community pathway. Replace traffic signals with
roundabouts, streets will be widened, the grades of some streets will be
significantly altered, private driveways will be altered, bike paths will be
constructed, and utilities will be placed underground. The 4th Avenue bridge
will be replaced $3,275,000

(31) Olympic View Water
and Sewer District‑-domestic water project‑-replace water mains,
install controls, equipment, and other related material................................................. $153,170

(32) Pacific County
Flood Control Zone District No. 1‑-storm sewer project‑-construct a
storm water conveyance system and a new ocean outfall. Storm water lines,
catchbasins, and other related equipment, controls, and material will be
installed................. $615,000

(33) City of Prosser‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-modify the system's headworks, clarifier, and effluent
pumping system. Install a polymer feed system and repair or replace anaerobic
digester and other related key components............................................... $322,825

(34) City of Selah‑-domestic
water project‑-interconnect wells and transmission lines, install new
water mains, and upgrade telemetry systems $3,177,900

(35) City of Shoreline‑-storm
sewer project‑-evaluate, design, and construct drainage improvements on
Ronald Bog Drainage

Sub‑Basin.............................................. $4,055,500

(36) Soos Creek Water
and Sewer District‑-sanitary sewer project‑-install sewer lines and
water mains along with manholes and related equipment and materials. Hydrants,
valves, water services, and related items will be assessed and replaced as
necessary....... $1,452,650

(37) City of Sultan‑-domestic
water project‑-replace water mains and make other related improvements,
including, but not limited to, valve replacements, hydrant replacements, and
roadway

restoration.............................................. $920,550

(38) City of Union Gap‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-upgrade its master lift station, replace lift pumps,
replace electrical equipment, replace controls, and install a new generator.
Other related repairs and improvements will be made if necessary................... $684,250

(39) Val Vue Sewer
District‑-sanitary sewer project‑-construct sanitary sewers and
rehabilitate water and storm water components. Sewer mains will be replaced
and a lift station will be constructed. Pump stations will be upgraded and
other related improvements will be made $1,394,170

(40) Valley Water
District‑-domestic water project‑-install filtration units, make
electrical improvements, install valves, install a disinfection system,
rehabilitate a well, provide auxiliary power, drill a new well, and make
reservoir improvements................ $595,000

(41) City of Waitsburg‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-rehabilitate its wastewater collection system and lift
station. Construct a new wastewater treatment facility. Sewer mains will be
replaced and other related improvements will be made................................ $800,000

(42) City of Wapato‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-upgrade the disinfection system at the wastewater
treatment

facility................................................. $388,500

(43) Whitworth Water
District No. 2‑-domestic water project‑-install new water lines,
valves, and related equipment and controls. Construct a reservoir and booster
pump, and other related improvements will be made $3,201,100

(44) Woodinville Water
District‑-domestic water project‑-retrofit all eight reservoirs with
seismic isolation sensors, valves, and flexible expansion joints. Other
related improvements will be

made..................................................... $672,000

(45) Yakima County‑-road
project‑-pave over 12 miles of gravel road. Drainage facilities, traffic
controls, and other related miscellaneous items will be made..................................... $3,000,000

(46) City of Zillah‑-domestic
water project‑-upgrade the telemetry system that operates and controls
the city's water

system................................................... $120,700

(47) Emergency Public
Works Loans‑-as authorized by RCW

43.155.065............................................. $1,000,000

Section 1 total................................... $74,502,877

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. An appropriation of
$93,593,068 for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, is hereby made from the
public works assistance account to the department of community, trade, and
economic development for the purposes of providing funds for the following
project loans recommended by the public works board:

(1) City of Burien‑-road
project‑-reconstruct the road from 1st Avenue South to 10th Avenue SW.
Travel lanes will be reduced from four to two and parking areas will be
developed along both sides of the street. Sidewalks will also be constructed,
turn lanes and traffic lights will be installed at key intersections, and other
related improvements will be made................................................... $2,440,016

(2) City of Centralia‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-install a sanitary sewer system that will replace septic
systems. Each septic tank will be pumped and removed. Related equipment and
materials will be installed as needed $1,376,192

(3) Clark Public
Utilities‑-domestic water project‑‑replace water lines in the
Meadow Glade‑Hazel Dell area. Other related improvements and repairs
will made to the system........................ $2,550,000

(4) Clark Public Utilities‑-domestic
water project‑-construct a new 3‑million‑gallon regional
water reservoir, and other related improvements $1,667,145

(5) Town of Coupville‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-install effluent pumps, a standby generator, a second
clarifier, and pipes, valves, and controls. Construct an oxidation ditch and
convert to an ultraviolet disinfection system. Other related repairs and
improvements will be made $2,370,000

(6) Cowlitz County‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-expand the wastewater treatment facility, install a
wastewater pump station, construct a force main, and make improvements to sewer
lines, and other related repairs and improvements........................................... $3,000,000

(7) City of Elma‑-sanitary
sewer project‑‑construct a wastewater treatment plant, including
but not limited to installation of a new pump and headworks, the construction
of Biolac plant, the construction of buildings to house the equipment, the
installation of a new disinfection system, and the installation of related
equipment and material $2,346,748

(8) City of Everett‑-storm
sewer project‑-upgrade the existing storm sewer system by rerouting storm
sewer lines and upsizing narrow diameter lines. Other related material and
equipment will be

installed.............................................. $2,108,525

(9) City of Kalama‑-domestic
water project‑-construct a water treatment plant, including development
of associated buildings, ponds, and on‑site storm detention facilities.
Other related improvements or upgrades will be made................................................ $4,170,625

(10) City of Kennewick‑-domestic
water project‑‑replace water lines throughout the jurisdiction
along with associated valves, hydrants, and related equipment and material. In
addition, the city will replace sewer lines and access points that are adjacent
to water

lines.................................................. $3,000,000

(11) City of Kent‑-domestic
water project‑-assist in developing a regional water supply system
beginning at the headworks and continuing to Tacoma's pipeline. Install a
diversion dam, intake, and intertie with Seattle, make enhancements for fish,
additional storage capacity, and other related and necessary improvements.............. $10,000,000

(12) King County‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-upgrade the Juanita Bay pump station. The capacity and
condition of force mains will be evaluated during the project and improvements
will be made as necessary. Work on the discharge system may also be completed
as part of this project if necessary............................................. $10,000,000

(13) Kitsap County‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-install a new outfall line from its Kingston treatment
plan. Other related improvements and repairs to the plant's outfall system
will be made............. $2,605,000

(14) Kitsap County‑-bridge
project‑-replace an existing bridge. Utilities will be relocated, fish
habitat will be restored, and the old bridge will be removed. Other related
improvements will be

made..................................................... $897,812

(15) Lakewood Water
District‑-domestic water project‑-construct two water treatment
plants and install other related equipment and materials $1,700,000

(16) City of Mossyrock‑-domestic
water project‑-construct a reservoir and the associated transmission
main. Associated equipment and material will also be installed................................... $286,315

(17) NE Sammamish Sewer
& Water District‑-sanitary sewer project‑‑replace
sanitary sewer lift station and install equipment, controls, and material if
necessary.................... $2,279,000

(18) City of Normandy
Park‑-road project‑-design and construct a segment of First Avenue
South. Associated equipment and material will be constructed or installed as
needed. Bike lanes, curbs, and gutters will also be constructed...................................... $712,139

(19) City of Port
Townsend‑-sanitary sewer project‑-replace the outfall line,
construct an effluent pump station, and install related equipment and materials
as needed................................ $1,214,053

(20) City of Sammamish‑-road
project‑-widen the roadway to provide curb, gutter, sidewalks, bicycle
lanes, and planter strips on both sides of 228th Avenue. A raised median will
be constructed to control left turns. Other related improvements will be made....... $10,000,000

(21) City of Shoreline‑-storm
sewer project‑-evaluate, design, and construct drainage improvements in
Third Avenue drainage

sub‑basin.............................................. $1,959,500

(22) Skagit County PUD
No. 1‑-domestic water project‑-enlarge a reservoir, design and
construct a new raw water intake and pump station, and install controls and
telemetry. Other related improvements and repairs will be made.................................. $10,000,000

(23) City of South Bend‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-replace sewer mains and side sewers to the property
lines. Manholes will be repaired and catch basins will be rehabilitated.
Other related improvements will be made..................................................... $982,748

(24) City of Tacoma‑-domestic
water project‑-modify the Green River headworks, construct 42 miles of
transmission lines, develop additional storage, construct fish restoration facilities,
construct new water treatment facilities, and make other related

improvements.......................................... $10,000,000

(25) City of Toppenish‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-replace sanitary sewer pipes. Manholes will be replaced
and connections to storm drains will be removed. New drywells will be
connected to catch basins. All roadways affected by the project will be
resurfaced. Other related improvements and repairs will be made............................... $1,207,000

(26) Woodinville Water
District‑-domestic water project‑-replace water mains. Related
improvements including but not limited to access development, valve
replacement, and similar items will be made, and the roadways will be restored
to its original condition.... $3,254,000

(27) City of Yakima‑-sanitary
sewer project‑-install sewer pipes and water mains. Repair or install
new manholes, valves, and other equipment or material............................................ $1,466,250

Section 2 total................................... $93,593,068

Total of sections 1 and
2........................ $168,095,945

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---