BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 Sec. 1. RCW 42.17.310
and 2000 c 134 s 3, 2000 c 56 s 1, and 2000

_7 c 6 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

_8 (1) The following are exempt from public inspection and

_9 copying:

10 (a) Personal information in any files maintained for
students

11 in public schools, patients or clients of public
institutions or

12 public health agencies, or welfare recipients.

13 (b) Personal information in files maintained for
employees,

14 appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to
the

15 extent that disclosure would violate their right to
privacy.

16 (c) Information required of any taxpayer in connection
with the

17 assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of
the

18 information to other persons would (i) be prohibited to
such

p. 1 HB
1002

_1 persons by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or
84.40.340 or

_2 (ii) violate the taxpayer's right to privacy or result
in unfair

_3 competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer.

_4 (d) Specific intelligence information and specific

_5 investigative records compiled by investigative, law
enforcement,

_6 and penology agencies, and state agencies vested with
the

_7 responsibility to discipline members of any profession,
the

_8 nondisclosure of which is essential to effective law
enforcement

_9 or for the protection of any person's right to privacy.

10 (e) Information revealing the identity of persons
who are

11 witnesses to or victims of crime or who file complaints
with

12 investigative, law enforcement, or penology agencies,
other than

13 the public disclosure commission, if disclosure would
endanger any

14 person's life, physical safety, or property. If at the
time a

15 complaint is filed the complainant, victim or witness
indicates a

16 desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such desire
shall govern.

17 However, all complaints filed with the public disclosure

18 commission about any elected official or candidate for
public

19 office must be made in writing and signed by the
complainant under

20 oath.

21 (f) Test questions, scoring keys, and other
examination data

22 used to administer a license, employment, or academic
examination.

23 (g) Except as provided by chapter 8.26 RCW, the contents
of

24 real estate appraisals, made for or by any agency
relative to the

25 acquisition or sale of property, until the project or
prospective

26 sale is abandoned or until such time as all of the
property has

27 been acquired or the property to which the sale
appraisal relates

28 is sold, but in no event shall disclosure be denied for
more than

29 three years after the appraisal.

30 (h) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer
source code

31 or object code, and research data obtained by any agency
within

32 five years of the request for disclosure when disclosure
would

33 produce private gain and public loss.

34 (i) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, and
intra-

35 agency memorandums in which opinions are expressed or
policies

36 formulated or recommended except that a specific record
shall not

37 be exempt when publicly cited by an agency in connection
with any

38 agency action.

HB 1002 p. 2

_1 (j) Records which are relevant to a controversy to
which an

_2 agency is a party but which records would not be
available to

_3 another party under the rules of pretrial discovery for
causes

_4 pending in the superior courts.

_5 (k) Records, maps, or other information identifying
the

_6 location of archaeological sites in order to avoid the
looting or

_7 depredation of such sites.

_8 (l) Any library record, the primary purpose of which
is to

_9 maintain control of library materials, or to gain access
to

10 information, which discloses or could be used to
disclose the

11 identity of a library user.

12 (m) Financial information supplied by or on behalf
of a person,

13 firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to
submit a bid

14 or proposal for (i) a ferry system construction or
repair contract

15 as required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (ii)
highway

16 construction or improvement as required by RCW
47.28.070.

17 (n) Railroad company contracts filed prior to July
28, 1991,

18 with the utilities and transportation commission under
RCW

19 81.34.070, except that the summaries of the contracts
are open to

20 public inspection and copying as otherwise provided by
this

21 chapter.

22 (o) Financial and commercial information and records
supplied

23 by private persons pertaining to export services
provided pursuant

24 to chapter 43.163 RCW and chapter 53.31 RCW, and by
persons

25 pertaining to export projects pursuant to RCW 43.23.035.

26 (p) Financial disclosures filed by private
vocational schools

27 under chapters 28B.85 and 28C.10 RCW.

28 (q) Records filed with the utilities and
transportation

29 commission or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that
a court

30 has determined are confidential under RCW 80.04.095.

31 (r) Financial and commercial information and records
supplied

32 by businesses or individuals during application for
loans or

33 program services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160,
43.330, and

34 43.168 RCW, or during application for economic
development loans

35 or program services provided by any local agency.

36 (s) Membership lists or lists of members or owners
of interests

37 of units in timeshare projects, subdivisions, camping
resorts,

p. 3 HB
1002

_1 condominiums, land developments, or common-interest
communities

_2 affiliated with such projects, regulated by the
department of

_3 licensing, in the files or possession of the department.

_4 (t) All applications for public employment,
including the names

_5 of applicants, resumes, and other related materials
submitted with

_6 respect to an applicant.

_7 (u) The residential addresses ((and)) or
residential telephone

_8 numbers of employees or volunteers of a public agency
which are

_9 held by ((the)) any public agency in
personnel records, public

10 employment related records, or volunteer rosters,
or are included

11 in any mailing ((lists)) list of
employees or volunteers of any

12 public agency.

13 (v) The residential addresses and residential
telephone numbers

14 of the customers of a public utility contained in the
records or

15 lists held by the public utility of which they are
customers,

16 except that this information may be released to the
division of

17 child support or the agency or firm providing child
support

18 enforcement for another state under Title IV-D of the
federal

19 social security act, for the establishment, enforcement,
or

20 modification of a support order.

21 (w)(i) The federal social security number of
individuals

22 governed under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the
files of the

23 department of health, except this exemption does not
apply to

24 requests made directly to the department from federal,
state, and

25 local agencies of government, and national and state
licensing,

26 credentialing, investigatory, disciplinary, and
examination

27 organizations; (ii) the current residential address and
current

28 residential telephone number of a health care provider
governed

29 under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the files of the

30 department, if the provider requests that this
information be

31 withheld from public inspection and copying, and
provides to the

32 department an accurate alternate or business address and
business

33 telephone number. On or after January 1, 1995, the
current

34 residential address and residential telephone number of
a health

35 care provider governed under RCW 18.130.040 maintained
in the

36 files of the department shall automatically be withheld
from

37 public inspection and copying unless the provider
specifically

HB 1002 p. 4

_1 requests the information be released, and except as
provided for

_2 under RCW 42.17.260(9).

_3 (x) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as
provided

_4 in RCW 69.45.090.

_5 (y) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or
the

_6 department of health and its representatives as provided
in RCW

_7 69.41.044, 69.41.280, and 18.64.420.

_8 (z) Financial information, business plans,
examination reports,

_9 and any information produced or obtained in evaluating
or

10 examining a business and industrial development
corporation

11 organized or seeking certification under chapter 31.24
RCW.

12 (aa) Financial and commercial information supplied
to the state

13 investment board by any person when the information
relates to the

14 investment of public trust or retirement funds and when
disclosure

15 would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to
the

16 providers of this information.

17 (bb) Financial and valuable trade information under
RCW

18 51.36.120.

19 (cc) Client records maintained by an agency that is
a domestic

20 violence program as defined in RCW 70.123.020 or
70.123.075 or a

21 rape crisis center as defined in RCW 70.125.030.

22 (dd) Information that identifies a person who, while
an agency

23 employee: (i) Seeks advice, under an informal process
established

24 by the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or
her rights

25 in connection with a possible unfair practice under
chapter 49.60

26 RCW against the person; and (ii) requests his or her
identity or

27 any identifying information not be disclosed.

28 (ee) Investigative records compiled by an employing
agency

29 conducting a current investigation of a possible unfair
practice

30 under chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of
other

31 federal, state, or local laws prohibiting discrimination
in

32 employment.

33 (ff) Business related information protected from
public

34 inspection and copying under RCW 15.86.110.

35 (gg) Financial, commercial, operations, and
technical and

36 research information and data submitted to or obtained
by the

37 clean Washington center in applications for, or delivery
of,

38 program services under chapter 70.95H RCW.

p. 5 HB
1002

_1 (hh) Information and documents created specifically
for, and

_2 collected and maintained by a quality improvement
committee

_3 pursuant to RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer
review

_4 committee under RCW 4.24.250, regardless of which agency
is in

_5 possession of the information and documents.

_6 (ii) Personal information in files maintained in a
data base

_7 created under RCW 43.07.360.

_8 (jj) Financial and commercial information requested
by the

_9 public stadium authority from any person or organization
that

10 leases or uses the stadium and exhibition center as
defined in RCW

11 36.102.010.

12 (kk) Names of individuals residing in emergency or
transitional

13 housing that are furnished to the department of revenue
or a

14 county assessor in order to substantiate a claim for
property tax

15 exemption under RCW 84.36.043.

16 (ll) The names, residential addresses, residential
telephone

17 numbers, and other individually identifiable records
held by an

18 agency in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other
ride-sharing

19 program or service. However, these records may be
disclosed to

20 other persons who apply for ride-matching services and
who need

21 that information in order to identify potential riders
or drivers

22 with whom to share rides.

23 (mm) The personally identifying information of
current or

24 former participants or applicants in a paratransit or
other

25 transit service operated for the benefit of persons with

26 disabilities or elderly persons.

27 (nn) The personally identifying information of persons
who

28 acquire and use transit passes and other fare payment
media

29 including, but not limited to, stored value smart cards
and

30 magnetic strip cards, except that an agency may disclose
this

31 information to a person, employer, educational institution,
or

32 other entity that is responsible, in whole or in part,
for payment

33 of the cost of acquiring or using a transit pass or
other fare

34 payment media, or to the news media when reporting on
public

35 transportation or public safety. This information may
also be

36 disclosed at the agency's discretion to governmental
agencies or

37 groups concerned with public transportation or public
safety.

38 (oo) Proprietary financial and commercial
information that the

HB 1002 p. 6

_1 submitting entity, with review by the department of
health,

_2 specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and
that is

_3 provided to or obtained by the department of health in
connection

_4 with an application for, or the supervision of, an
antitrust

_5 exemption sought by the submitting entity under RCW
43.72.310. If

_6 a request for such information is received, the
submitting entity

_7 must be notified of the request. Within ten business
days of

_8 receipt of the notice, the submitting entity shall
provide a

_9 written statement of the continuing need for
confidentiality,

10 which shall be provided to the requester. Upon receipt
of such

11 notice, the department of health shall continue to treat

12 information designated under this section as exempt from

13 disclosure. If the requester initiates an action to
compel

14 disclosure under this chapter, the submitting entity
must be

15 joined as a party to demonstrate the continuing need for

16 confidentiality.

17 (pp) Records maintained by the board of industrial
insurance

18 appeals that are related to appeals of crime victims'
compensation

19 claims filed with the board under RCW 7.68.110.

20 (qq) Financial and commercial information supplied
by or on

21 behalf of a person, firm, corporation, or entity under
chapter

22 28B.95 RCW relating to the purchase or sale of tuition
units and

23 contracts for the purchase of multiple tuition units.

24 (rr) Any records of investigative reports prepared
by any

25 state, county, municipal, or other law enforcement
agency

26 pertaining to sex offenses contained in chapter 9A.44
RCW or

27 sexually violent offenses as defined in RCW 71.09.020,
which have

28 been transferred to the Washington association of
sheriffs and

29 police chiefs for permanent electronic retention and
retrieval

30 pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b).

31 (ss) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers,
electronic check

32 numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other
financial account

33 numbers supplied to an agency for the purpose of
electronic

34 transfer of funds, except when disclosure is expressly
required by

35 law.

36 (tt) Financial information, including but not
limited to

37 account numbers and values, and other identification
numbers

38 supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, corporation,
limited

p. 7 HB
1002

_1 liability company, partnership, or other entity related
to an

_2 application for a liquor license, gambling license, or
lottery

_3 retail license.

_4 (uu) Records maintained by the employment security
department

_5 and subject to chapter 50.13 RCW if provided to another
individual

_6 or organization for operational, research, or evaluation
purposes.

_7 (vv) Individually identifiable information received
by the work

_8 force training and education coordinating board for
research or

_9 evaluation purposes.

10 (2) Except for information described in subsection
(1)(c)(i) of

11 this section and confidential income data exempted from
public

12 inspection pursuant to RCW 84.40.020, the exemptions of
this

13 section are inapplicable to the extent that information,
the

14 disclosure of which would violate personal privacy or
vital

15 governmental interests, can be deleted from the specific
records

16 sought. No exemption may be construed to permit the
nondisclosure

17 of statistical information not descriptive of any
readily

18 identifiable person or persons.

19 (3) Inspection or copying of any specific records exempt
under

20 the provisions of this section may be permitted if the
superior

21 court in the county in which the record is maintained
finds, after

22 a hearing with notice thereof to every person in
interest and the

23 agency, that the exemption of such records is clearly
unnecessary

24 to protect any individual's right of privacy or any
vital

25 governmental function.

26 (4) Agency responses refusing, in whole or in part,
inspection

27 of any public record shall include a statement of the
specific

28 exemption authorizing the withholding of the record (or
part) and

29 a brief explanation of how the exemption applies to the
record

30 withheld.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1002 p. 8