BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.95.060 and 1999 c
116 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall adopt rules establishing minimum functional standards for solid waste
handling, consistent with the standards specified in this section. The
department may classify areas of the state with respect to population density,
climate, geology, and other relevant factors bearing on solid waste disposal
standards.

(2) In addition to the
minimum functional standards adopted by the department under subsection (1) of
this section, each landfill facility whose area at its design capacity will
exceed one hundred acres and whose horizontal height at design capacity will
average one hundred feet or more above existing site elevations shall comply
with the standards of this subsection. This subsection applies ((only))
to wholly new solid waste landfill facilities, no part or unit of which has had
construction commence before April 27, 1999, and to any expansion or
modification of an existing landfill, when that modification or expansion
begins on or after July 1, 2001, and results in a total landfill design
capacity meeting or exceeding the criteria in this section.

(a) No landfill or
modification or expansion of an existing landfill as specified in this
subsection may be located:

(i) So that the active
area is closer than five miles to any national park or a public or private
nonprofit zoological park displaying native animals in their native habitats;
or

(ii) Over a sole source
aquifer designated under the federal safe drinking water act, if such
designation was effective before January 1, 1999.

(b) Each
landfill specified in this subsection (2) shall be constructed with an
impermeable berm around the entire perimeter of the active area of the landfill
of such height, thickness, and design as will be sufficient to contain all
material disposed in the event of a complete failure of the structural
integrity of the landfill.

--- END ---