BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 79.90.470
and 1984 c 221 s 5 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 The use of state-owned aquatic lands for public utility
lines

_7 owned by a governmental entity, a cooperative formed
under chapter

_8 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or association formed
under

_9 chapter 24.06 RCW, or a public service company subject
to

10 regulation by the Washington utilities and
transportation

11 commission shall be granted without charge by an
agreement,

12 permit, or other instrument if the use is consistent with
the

13 purposes of RCW 79.90.450 through 79.90.460 and does not
obstruct

14 navigation or other public uses. Use for public parks or
public

15 recreation purposes shall be granted without charge if the
aquatic

16 lands and improvements are available to the general public
on a

17 first-come, first-served basis and are not managed to
produce a

18 profit for the operator or a concessionaire. The department
may

p. 1 HB
1006

_1 lease state-owned tidelands that are in front of state
parks only

_2 with the approval of the state parks and recreation
commission.

_3 The department may lease bedlands in front of state
parks only

_4 after the department has consulted with the state parks
and

_5 recreation commission.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1006 p. 2