BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.79.015 and 1982 c
116 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receipt
of any petition proposing an initiative to the people or an initiative to the
legislature, and prior to giving a serial number thereto, the secretary of
state shall submit a copy thereof to the office of the code reviser and the
office of financial management and give notice to the petitioner of such
transmittal.

(2)(a) Upon
receipt of the measure, the assistant code reviser to whom it has been assigned
may confer with the petitioner and shall within seven working days from receipt
thereof review the proposal for matters of form and style, and such matters of
substantive import as may be agreeable to the petitioner, and shall recommend
to the petitioner such revision or alteration of the measure as may be deemed
necessary and appropriate. The recommendations of the code reviser's
office shall be advisory only, and the petitioner may accept or reject them in
whole or in part. The code reviser shall issue a certificate of review
certifying that he or she has reviewed the measure for form and style
and that the recommendations thereon, if any, have been communicated to the
petitioner, and such certificate shall issue whether or not the petitioner
accepts such recommendations.

(b)(i) Upon receipt
of the measure, the director of financial management shall determine if the
measure affects a tax or fee as set forth under (b)(ii) of this subsection. If
it does, then an analysis of the fiscal impact and a certificate of review
shall be sent to the petitioner within seven working days from receipt of the
measure. A copy of the fiscal analysis shall be sent to the secretary of
state.

(ii) "Affects a
tax or fee" means the measure amends, repeals, or restricts the collection
of any existing tax or any of the fees used to fund general government
purposes, increases or reduces the percentage rate or amount of such a tax or
fee, or creates, extends, or eliminates an exemption to such a tax or fee.

(3) Within
fifteen working days after notification of submittal of the petition to the code
reviser's office, the petitioner, if he or she desires to proceed with
((his)) sponsorship, shall file the measure together with the
certificates of review with the secretary of state for assignment of
serial number and the secretary of state shall thereupon submit to the
reviser's office a certified copy of the measure filed. Upon submitting the
proposal to the secretary of state for assignment of a serial number the
secretary of state shall refuse to make such assignment unless the proposal is
accompanied by ((a)) the certificates of review.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.81.250 and 1999 c
260 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state
shall determine the format and layout of the voters' pamphlet. The secretary
of state shall print the pamphlet in clear, readable type on a size, quality,
and weight of paper that in the judgment of the secretary of state best serves
the voters. The pamphlet must contain a table of contents. Federal and state
offices must appear in the pamphlet in the same sequence as they appear on the
ballot. Measures and arguments must be printed in the order specified by RCW
29.79.300.

The voters' pamphlet
must provide the following information for each statewide issue on the ballot:

(1) The legal
identification of the measure by serial designation or number;

(2) The official ballot
title of the measure;

(3) A statement
prepared by the attorney general explaining the law as it presently exists;

(4) A statement
prepared by the attorney general explaining the effect of the proposed measure
if it becomes law;

(5) An analysis of
the fiscal impact prepared by the director of financial management, if required
under RCW 29.79.015;

(6) The total
number of votes cast for and against the measure in the senate and house of
representatives, if the measure has been passed by the legislature;

(((6))) (7)
An argument advocating the voters' approval of the measure together with any
statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;

(((7))) (8)
An argument advocating the voters' rejection of the measure together with any
statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;

(((8))) (9)
Each argument or rebuttal statement must be followed by the names of the
committee members who submitted them, and may be followed by a telephone number
that citizens may call to obtain information on the ballot measure;

(((9)))
(10) The full text of each measure.

---
END ---