BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 46.37.530
and 1997 c 328 s 4 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (((1))) It is unlawful:

_7 (((a))) (1) For any person to operate a
motorcycle or motor-

_8 driven cycle not equipped with mirrors on the left and
right sides

_9 of the motorcycle which shall be so located as to give the
driver

10 a complete view of the highway for a distance of at least
two

11 hundred feet to the rear of the motorcycle or motor-driven
cycle:

12 PROVIDED, That mirrors shall not be required on any
motorcycle or

13 motor-driven cycle over twenty-five years old originally

14 manufactured without mirrors and which has been restored to
its

15 original condition ((and which is being ridden to or
from or

16 otherwise in conjunction with an antique or classic
motorcycle

17 contest, show, or other such assemblage: PROVIDED
FURTHER,

p. 1 HB
1010

_1 That)). No mirror is required on any
motorcycle manufactured prior

_2 to January 1, 1931;

_3 (((b))) (2) For any person to operate
a motorcycle or motor-

_4 driven cycle which does not have a windshield unless
wearing

_5 glasses, goggles, or a face shield ((of a type
conforming to rules

_6 adopted by the state patrol));

_7 (((c))) (3) For any person under
the age of twenty-one years to

_8 operate or ride upon a motorcycle, motor- driven cycle,
or moped

_9 on a state highway, county road, or city street unless
wearing

10 upon his or her head a commercially manufactured
protective

11 motorcycle helmet ((of a type conforming to
rules adopted by the

12 state patrol)) except when the vehicle is an
antique motor-driven

13 cycle at least twenty-five years old, or
automobile that is

14 licensed as a motorcycle, or ((when the)) a
vehicle ((is))

15 equipped with seat belts and roll bars ((approved by
the state

16 patrol)). The motorcycle helmet must be
equipped with either a neck

17 or chin strap which shall be fastened securely while the

18 motorcycle or motor-driven cycle is in motion. Persons
operating

19 electric-assisted bicycles shall comply with all laws
and

20 regulations related to the use of bicycle helmets;

21 (((d))) (4) For any person to
transport a child under the age

22 of five on a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle((;

23 (e) For any person to sell or offer for sale a
motorcycle

24 helmet which does not meet the requirements
established by the

25 state patrol.

26 (2) The state patrol is hereby authorized and
empowered to

27 adopt and amend rules, pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure

28 Act, concerning the standards and procedures for
conformance of

29 rules adopted for glasses, goggles, face shields, and
protective

30 helmets)).

31 Sec. 2. RCW 46.37.535
and 1990 c 270 s 8 are each amended to read

32 as follows:

33 It is unlawful for any person to rent out motorcycles,
motor-

34 driven cycles, or mopeds unless the person also has commercially

35 manufactured motorcycle helmets on hand for rent ((helmets
of a

36 type conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol)).

37 It shall be unlawful for any person to rent a
motorcycle, motor-

HB 1010 p. 2

_1 driven cycle, or moped unless the person has in his or
her

_2 possession a commercially manufactured motorcycle
helmet ((of a

_3 type approved by the state patrol, regardless of from
whom the

_4 helmet is obtained)).

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1010