BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.36.379 and 2000 c
103 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the property tax exemption authorized by Article VII, section 10 of the
state Constitution should be made available on the basis of a retired person's
ability to pay property taxes((. The legislature further finds)) and
that the best measure of a retired person's ability to pay taxes is that
person's disposable income as defined in RCW 84.36.383. The legislature
further finds that veterans with one hundred percent service-connected
disabilities have given so much to our country that they deserve property tax
relief.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.36.381 and 1998 c
333 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A person shall be
exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a portion of the amount of
excess and regular real property taxes due and payable in the year following
the year in which a claim is filed, and thereafter, in accordance with the
following:

(1) The property taxes
must have been imposed upon a residence which was occupied by the person
claiming the exemption as a principal place of residence as of the time of
filing: PROVIDED, That any person who sells, transfers, or is displaced from
his or her residence may transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement
residence, but no claimant shall receive an exemption on more than one
residence in any year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That confinement of the person to a
hospital or nursing home shall not disqualify the claim of exemption if:

(a) The residence is
temporarily unoccupied;

(b) The residence is
occupied by a spouse and/or a person financially dependent on the claimant for
support; or

(c) The residence is
rented for the purpose of paying nursing home or hospital costs;

(2) The person claiming
the exemption must have owned, at the time of filing, in fee, as a life estate,
or by contract purchase, the residence on which the property taxes have been
imposed or if the person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, such person must own a share therein representing
the unit or portion of the structure in which he or she resides. For purposes
of this subsection, a residence owned by a marital community or owned by
cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each spouse or cotenant, and any lease
for life shall be deemed a life estate;

(3) The person claiming
the exemption must be sixty-one years of age or older on December 31st of the
year in which the exemption claim is filed, or must have been, at the time of
filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason of physical
disability: PROVIDED, That any surviving spouse of a person who was receiving
an exemption at the time of the person's death shall qualify if the surviving
spouse is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements
of this section;

(4) Except for
veterans of the armed forces of the United States with one hundred percent
service-connected disabilities, the amount that the person shall be exempt
from an obligation to pay shall be calculated on the basis of combined
disposable income, as defined in RCW 84.36.383. If the person claiming the
exemption was retired for two months or more of the assessment year, the
combined disposable income of such person shall be calculated by multiplying
the average monthly combined disposable income of such person during the months
such person was retired by twelve. If the income of the person claiming
exemption is reduced for two or more months of the assessment year by reason of
the death of the person's spouse, or when other substantial changes occur in
disposable income that are likely to continue for an indefinite period of time,
the combined disposable income of such person shall be calculated by
multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of such person after
such occurrences by twelve. If it is necessary to estimate income to comply
with this subsection, the assessor may require confirming documentation of such
income prior to May 31 of the year following application;

(5)(a) A person who
otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income of
thirty thousand dollars or less or who is a veteran of the armed forces of
the United States with a one hundred percent service-connected disability
shall be exempt from all excess property taxes; and

(b)(i) A person who
otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income of
twenty-four thousand dollars or less but greater than eighteen thousand dollars
shall be exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater of forty
thousand dollars or thirty-five percent of the valuation of his or her
residence, but not to exceed sixty thousand dollars of the valuation of his or
her residence; or

(ii) A person who
otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income of
eighteen thousand dollars or less or who is a veteran of the armed forces of
the United States with a one hundred percent service-connected disability
shall be exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater of fifty
thousand dollars or sixty percent of the valuation of his or her residence; and

(6) For a person who
otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income of
thirty thousand dollars or less or who is a veteran of the armed forces of
the United States with a one hundred percent service-connected disability,
the valuation of the residence shall be the assessed value of the residence on
the later of January 1, 1995, or January 1st of the assessment year the person
first qualifies under this section. If the person subsequently fails to
qualify under this section only for one year because of high income, this same
valuation shall be used upon requalification. If the person fails to qualify
for more than one year in succession because of high income or fails to qualify
for any other reason, the valuation upon requalification shall be the assessed
value on January 1st of the assessment year in which the person requalifies.
If the person transfers the exemption under this section to a different
residence, the valuation of the different residence shall be the assessed value
of the different residence on January 1st of the assessment year in which the
person transfers the exemption.

In no event may the
valuation under this subsection be greater than the true and fair value of the
residence on January 1st of the assessment year.

This subsection does
not apply to subsequent improvements to the property in the year in which the
improvements are made. Subsequent improvements to the property shall be added
to the value otherwise determined under this subsection at their true and fair
value in the year in which they are made.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.36.383 and 1999 c
358 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in RCW
84.36.381 through 84.36.389, except where the context clearly indicates a
different meaning:

(1) The term
"residence" means a single family dwelling unit whether such unit be
separate or part of a multiunit dwelling, including the land on which such
dwelling stands not to exceed one acre. The term shall also include a share
ownership in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership if
the person claiming exemption can establish that his or her share represents
the specific unit or portion of such structure in which he or she resides. The
term shall also include a single family dwelling situated upon lands the fee of
which is vested in the United States or any instrumentality thereof including
an Indian tribe or in the state of Washington, and notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a residence shall be deemed
real property.

(2) The term "real
property" shall also include a mobile home which has substantially lost
its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being fixed in location upon
land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile home and placed on a foundation
(posts or blocks) with fixed pipe, connections with sewer, water, or other
utilities. A mobile home located on land leased by the owner of the mobile
home is subject, for tax billing, payment, and collection purposes, only to the
personal property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.

(3)
"Department" means the state department of revenue.

(4) "Combined
disposable income" means the disposable income of the person claiming the
exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her spouse, and the disposable
income of each cotenant occupying the residence for the assessment year, less
amounts paid by the person claiming the exemption or his or her spouse during the
assessment year for:

(a) Drugs supplied by
prescription of a medical practitioner authorized by the laws of this state or
another jurisdiction to issue prescriptions; and

(b) The treatment or
care of either person received in the home or in a nursing home.

(5) "Disposable
income" means adjusted gross income as defined in the federal internal
revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989, or such subsequent date as
the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose of this section, plus
all of the following items to the extent they are not included in or have been
deducted from adjusted gross income:

(a) Capital gains,
other than gain excluded from income under section 121 of the federal internal
revenue code to the extent it is reinvested in a new principal residence;

(b) Amounts deducted
for loss;

(c) Amounts deducted
for depreciation;

(d) Pension and annuity
receipts;

(e) Military pay and
benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(f) Veterans benefits,
other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments and benefits for
disabilities related to the performance of military duties;

(g) Federal social
security act and railroad retirement benefits;

(h) Dividend receipts;
and

(i) Interest received
on state and municipal bonds.

(6)
"Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming the
exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2003 and thereafter.

--- END ---