BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.050
and 2000 c 107 s 266 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 All recreational licenses, permits, tags, and stamps
required

_7 by this title and raffle tickets authorized under chapter
77.12

_8 RCW shall be issued under the authority of the commission.
The

_9 commission shall adopt rules for the issuance of
recreational

10 licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and raffle tickets, and
for the

11 collection, payment, and handling of license fees, terms
and

12 conditions to govern dealers, and dealers' fees. A
transaction fee

13 on recreational licenses may be set by the commission and

14 collected from licensees. The transaction fee shall not
exceed two

15 percent of the value of the license transaction,
excluding any

16 applicable dealer fees. The department may
authorize all or part

17 of such fee to be paid directly to a contractor providing

18 automated licensing system services. Fees retained by
dealers shall

p. 1 HB
1013

_1 be uniform throughout the state. The department shall
authorize

_2 dealers to collect and retain dealer fees of at least
two dollars

_3 for purchase of a standard hunting or fishing
recreational license

_4 document, except that the commission may set a lower
dealer fee

_5 for issuance of tags or when a licensee buys a license
that

_6 involves a stamp or display card format rather than a standard

_7 department licensing document form.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1013 p. 2