BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that rapid and

_8 effective responses to forest fires are critical in
keeping these

_9 fires from spreading into larger fires. Large forest
fires impair

10 air quality, destroy valuable watersheds and riparian
areas, and

11 denigrate salmon habitat. The legislature also finds
that the costs

12 associated with one large forest fire is far greater
than the

13 costs for extinguishing hundreds of small fires. The
legislature

14 recognizes that a report issued in 1997 indicated that
the

15 department of natural resources lacked the funding to
adequately

16 address the threat of forest fires. Forest fire
suppression is paid

17 by annual assessments on landowners. The legislature
further finds

18 that landowner assessments that are paid for the
particular

p. 1 SHB
1014

_1 service of forest fire suppression should not lapse into
the

_2 general fund, particularly when there are not adequate
funds for

_3 the department of natural resources to fight fires. The
legislature

_4 therefore finds that it is in the public interest for
interest

_5 earned on moneys in the landowner contingency forest
fire

_6 suppression account to be credited to that account, and
that

_7 moneys in the account should not lapse if they are not
spent by

_8 the end of the biennium.

_9 Sec. 2. RCW
76.04.630 and 1993 c 36 s 2 are each amended to read

10 as follows:

11 There is created a landowner contingency forest fire

12 suppression account in the state treasury. Moneys in
the account

13 may be spent only as provided in this section.
Disbursements from

14 the account shall be on authorization of the
commissioner of

15 public lands or the commissioner's designee. The
account is subject

16 to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88
RCW, but

17 no appropriation is required for disbursements. Money
in the

18 account that is not expended prior to the end of the
biennium in

19 which it was collected does not lapse, but must
remain in the

20 account. Interest earned from money in the account
must be credited

21 to the account.

22 The department may expend from this account the
amounts as may

23 be available and as it considers appropriate for the
payment of

24 emergency fire costs resulting from a participating
landowner

25 fire. The department may, when moneys are available
from the

26 landowner contingency forest fire suppression account,
expend

27 moneys for summarily abating, isolating, or reducing an
extreme

28 fire hazard under RCW 76.04.660. All moneys recovered
as a result

29 of the department's actions, from the owner or person
responsible,

30 under RCW 76.04.660 shall be deposited in the landowner

31 contingency forest fire suppression account.

32 When a determination is made that the fire was
started by other

33 than a landowner operation, moneys expended from this
account in

34 the suppression of such fire shall be recovered from the
general

35 fund appropriations as may be available for emergency
fire

36 suppression costs. The department shall deposit in the
landowner

SHB 1014 p. 2

_1 contingency forest fire suppression account moneys paid
out of the

_2 account which are later recovered, less reasonable costs
of

_3 recovery.

_4 This account shall be established and renewed by an
annual

_5 special forest fire suppression account assessment paid
by

_6 participating landowners at a rate to be established by
the

_7 department. In establishing assessments, the department
shall seek

_8 to establish and thereafter reestablish a balance in the
account

_9 of three million dollars. The department may establish
a flat fee

10 assessment of no more than seven dollars and fifty cents
for

11 participating landowners owning parcels of fifty acres
or less. For

12 participating landowners owning parcels larger than
fifty acres,

13 the department may charge the flat fee assessment plus a
per acre

14 assessment for every acre over fifty acres. The per
acre assessment

15 established by the department may not exceed fifteen
cents per

16 acre per year. The assessments may differ to equitably
distribute

17 the assessment based on emergency fire suppression cost
experience

18 necessitated by landowner operations. Amounts assessed
for this

19 account shall be a lien upon the forest lands with
respect to

20 which the assessment is made and may be collected as
directed by

21 the department in the same manner as forest protection

22 assessments. Payment of emergency costs from this
account shall in

23 no way restrict the right of the department to recover
costs

24 pursuant to RCW 76.04.495 or other laws.

25 When the department determines that a forest fire
was started

26 in the course of or as a result of a landowner
operation, it shall

27 notify the forest fire advisory board of the
determination. The

28 determination shall be final, unless, within ninety days
of the

29 notification, the forest fire advisory board or an interested

30 party serves a request for a hearing before the
department. The

31 hearing shall constitute an adjudicative proceeding
under chapter

32 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, and an
appeal shall

33 be in accordance with RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.

34 Sec. 3. RCW
43.84.092 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 5 are each amended

35 to read as follows:

36 (1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances
in the

p. 3 SHB
1014

_1 state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income
account,

_2 which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

_3 (2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to
pay or

_4 receive funds associated with federal programs as
required by the

_5 federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The
treasury

_6 income account is subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW,

_7 but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of

_8 interest earnings required by the cash management
improvement

_9 act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury
required under the

10 cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180
and shall

11 not require appropriation. The office of financial
management shall

12 determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government

13 pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The
office of

14 financial management may direct transfers of funds
between

15 accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions
of the

16 cash management improvement act, and this subsection.
Refunds or

17 allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of
earnings set

18 forth in subsection (4) of this section.

19 (3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the
treasury

20 income account may be utilized for the payment of
purchased

21 banking services on behalf of treasury funds including,
but not

22 limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions

23 for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The
treasury

24 income account is subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW,

25 but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial

26 institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of

27 earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

28 (4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute
the earnings

29 credited to the treasury income account. The state
treasurer shall

30 credit the general fund with all the earnings credited
to the

31 treasury income account except:

32 (a) The following accounts and funds shall receive
their

33 proportionate share of earnings based upon each
account's and

34 fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building

35 construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and

36 operation account, the Central Washington University
capital

37 projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and

38 reformatory institutions account, the common school
construction

SHB 1014 p. 4

_1 fund, the county criminal justice assistance account,
the county

_2 sales and use tax equalization account, the data
processing

_3 building construction account, the deferred compensation

_4 administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal

_5 account, the department of retirement systems expense
account, the

_6 drinking water assistance account, the Eastern
Washington

_7 University capital projects account, the education
construction

_8 fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving

_9 account, the health services account, the public health
services

10 account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health

11 services account, the state higher education
construction account,

12 the higher education construction account, the highway

13 infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund

14 account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement

15 administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account,

16 the landowner contingency forest fire suppression
account, the

17 local leasehold excise tax account, the local real
estate excise

18 tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the
medical aid

19 account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the
multimodal

20 transportation account, the municipal criminal justice
assistance

21 account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the

22 natural resources deposit account, the perpetual
surveillance and

23 maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan

24 1 account, the public employees' retirement system plan
2 account,

25 the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management

26 cost account, the site closure account, the special
wildlife

27 account, the state employees' insurance account, the state

28 employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board

29 expense account, the state investment board commingled
trust fund

30 accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
teachers'

31 retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement
system

32 combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and

33 control account, the tobacco settlement account, the

34 transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery trust

35 fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the

36 University of Washington building account, the volunteer
fire

37 fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund,

38 the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative

p. 5 SHB
1014

_1 fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account,
the

_2 Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system

_3 plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement

_4 officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the

_5 Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and

_6 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool
account, the

_7 Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State

_8 University building account, the Washington State
University bond

_9 retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving
fund, and

10 the Western Washington University capital projects
account.

11 Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural

12 permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent

13 common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and
the state

14 university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective

15 beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed
under this

16 subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the

17 state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

18 (b) The following accounts and funds shall receive
eighty

19 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each

20 account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The

21 aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue
account, the

22 county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing

23 services account, the essential rail assistance account,
the ferry

24 bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective
fund, the high

25 capacity transportation account, the highway bond
retirement fund,

26 the highway safety account, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle

27 safety education account, the pilotage account, the
public

28 transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital

29 construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account,

30 the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial
trust

31 account, the safety and education account, the special
category C

32 account, the state patrol highway account, the
transportation

33 equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation

34 improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond

35 retirement account, and the urban arterial trust
account.

36 (5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of
the state

37 Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be
allocated

SHB 1014 p. 6

_1 earnings without the specific affirmative directive of
this

_2 section.

_3

_4 Sec. 4. RCW
43.84.092 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 6 are each amended

_5 to read as follows:

_6 (1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances
in the

_7 state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income
account,

_8 which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

_9 (2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to
pay or

10 receive funds associated with federal programs as
required by the

11 federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The
treasury

12 income account is subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW,

13 but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of

14 interest earnings required by the cash management
improvement

15 act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury
required under the

16 cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180
and shall

17 not require appropriation. The office of financial
management shall

18 determine the amounts due to or from the federal government

19 pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The
office of

20 financial management may direct transfers of funds
between

21 accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions
of the

22 cash management improvement act, and this subsection.
Refunds or

23 allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of
earnings set

24 forth in subsection (4) of this section.

25 (3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the
treasury

26 income account may be utilized for the payment of
purchased

27 banking services on behalf of treasury funds including,
but not

28 limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions

29 for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The
treasury

30 income account is subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW,

31 but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial

32 institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of

33 earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

34 (4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute
the earnings

35 credited to the treasury income account. The state
treasurer shall

36 credit the general fund with all the earnings credited
to the

37 treasury income account except:

38 (a) The following accounts and funds shall receive
their

p. 7 SHB
1014

_1 proportionate share of earnings based upon each
account's and

_2 fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building

_3 construction account, the Cedar River channel construction
and

_4 operation account, the Central Washington University
capital

_5 projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and

_6 reformatory institutions account, the common school
construction

_7 fund, the county criminal justice assistance account,
the county

_8 sales and use tax equalization account, the data
processing

_9 building construction account, the deferred compensation

10 administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal

11 account, the department of retirement systems expense
account, the

12 drinking water assistance account, the Eastern
Washington

13 University capital projects account, the education
construction

14 fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving

15 account, the health services account, the public health
services

16 account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health

17 services account, the state higher education
construction account,

18 the higher education construction account, the highway

19 infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund

20 account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement

21 administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account,

22 the landowner contingency forest fire suppression
account, the

23 local leasehold excise tax account, the local real
estate excise

24 tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the
medical aid

25 account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the
multimodal

26 transportation account, the municipal criminal justice
assistance

27 account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the

28 natural resources deposit account, the perpetual
surveillance and

29 maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan

30 1 account, the public employees' retirement system
combined plan 2

31 and plan 3 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement
account, the

32 resource management cost account, the site closure
account, the

33 special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance
account,

34 the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state

35 investment board expense account, the state investment
board

36 commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account,

37 the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers'

38 retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the tobacco

SHB 1014 p. 8

_1 prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement
account,

_2 the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery

_3 trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement
fund, the

_4 University of Washington building account, the volunteer
fire

_5 fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund,

_6 the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' administrative

_7 fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account,
the

_8 Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system

_9 plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement

10 officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the

11 Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and

12 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool
account, the

13 Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State

14 University building account, the Washington State
University bond

15 retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving
fund, and

16 the Western Washington University capital projects

17 account. Earnings derived from investing balances of
the

18 agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent
fund, the

19 permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and

20 the state university permanent fund shall be allocated
to their

21 respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be
distributed

22 under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by
the

23 allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW

24 43.08.190.

25 (b) The following accounts and funds shall receive
eighty

26 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each

27 account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The

28 aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue
account, the

29 county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing

30 services account, the essential rail assistance account,
the ferry

31 bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective
fund, the high

32 capacity transportation account, the highway bond
retirement fund,

33 the highway safety account, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle

34 safety education account, the pilotage account, the
public

35 transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital

36 construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account,

37 the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial
trust

38 account, the safety and education account, the special
category C

p. 9 SHB
1014

_1 account, the state patrol highway account, the
transportation

_2 equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation

_3 improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond

_4 retirement account, and the urban arterial trust
account.

_5 (5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of
the state

_6 Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be
allocated

_7 earnings without the specific affirmative directive of
this

_8 section.

_9 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is
added to chapter 43.135

10 RCW to read as follows:

11 RCW 43.135.035(4) does not apply to interest earned
from money

12 in the landowner contingency forest fire suppression
account and

13 credited to that account in accordance with RCW
76.04.630.

14 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Section 3 of this act
expires March 1,

15 2002.

16 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Section 4 of this act
takes effect March

17 1, 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1014 p. 10