BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.85

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) Lead entities have assumed a critical role in
statewide

_8 efforts to protect and restore salmon habitat. Lead
entities are

_9 responsible for ensuring that certain core activities take
place

10 within the watersheds they serve in order to be eligible
for funds

11 from the salmon recovery funding board. These core
activities

12 include organizing and staffing the citizens committee and
a

13 technical advisory group; soliciting, reviewing, and
ranking

14 project proposals; ensuring that the projects contained on
a

15 habitat project list address limiting factors to salmon
recovery

16 in the watershed; preparing an application package to the
salmon

17 recovery funding board; and maintaining a habitat work
schedule.

18 In addition, some lead entities oversee projects in more
than one

p. 1 HB
1016

_1 WRIA, some are developing strategic approaches to
habitat

_2 restoration, some are involved in watershed planning and
salmon

_3 recovery planning, and some are actively working with
landowners

_4 and sponsors to develop projects that will address
critical needs

_5 in the area. In recognition of the various levels of
effort by lead

_6 entities, and to help ensure that habitat project funds
are used

_7 efficiently and effectively, the legislature finds that
there is a

_8 need to increase funding available to lead entities,
create a

_9 funding allocation method that accounts for the
different levels

10 of effort among lead entities, and institute a process
for

11 measuring the performance of lead entities.

12 (2) Each lead entity established pursuant to RCW
77.85.050 may

13 apply for funds from the department of fish and
wildlife. Funds

14 shall be provided from and to the extent appropriations
by the

15 legislature to the department expressly for this purpose.

16 (3)(a) Each lead entity that is eligible to receive
funds under

17 this section may apply for an operational grant of up to
one

18 hundred thousand dollars per biennium to conduct core
activities

19 identified in subsection (1) of this section.

20 (b) Each lead entity may apply for a biennial grant
of up to an

21 additional one hundred thousand dollars per WRIA served
for

22 providing enhanced functions. "Enhanced
functions" for purposes of

23 this section means:

24 (i) Actively working with landowners to secure their
support

25 for and participation in habitat projects;

26 (ii) Developing a habitat protection and restoration
strategy

27 that: Establishes goals that address the habitat needs
of fish and

28 that are tailored to meet local conditions and values;
defines

29 priorities and areas for action; and identifies and
sequences

30 actions to ensure that projects provide the maximum
benefit for

31 fish;

32 (iii) Assisting sponsors in identifying high
priority needs and

33 developing sound proposals to address them;

34 (iv) Coordinating public outreach activities to both
inform and

35 invite the public to participate in salmon recovery
activities; or

36 (v) Tracking project implementation and monitoring
the

37 effectiveness of the projects.

38 (c) The department shall develop performance
measures to ensure

HB 1016 p. 2

_1 that core activities are met, and to help ensure that
any funding

_2 for enhanced functions is being directed to high
priority habitat

_3 needs. These performance measures shall be included in
all grant

_4 contracts with lead entities. Funding provided under
this section

_5 shall be considered a contractual obligation against the
moneys

_6 appropriated for this purpose.

_7 (d) If sufficient funds are not available to fund
all lead

_8 entity grant requests, the department shall prioritize
funds based

_9 upon the number of fish species listed as endangered or
threatened

10 under the federal endangered species act, 16 U.S.C. Sec.
1531 et

11 seq., contained in the area served by the lead entity.

12 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary
for the immediate

13 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

14 the state government and its existing public institutions,
and

15 takes effect July 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1016