BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
77.32.380 and 2000 c 107 s 271 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 (1) Persons who enter upon or use clearly identified
department

_7 improved access facilities with a motor vehicle may be
required to

_8 display a current annual fish and wildlife lands vehicle
use

_9 permit on the motor vehicle while within or while using
an

10 improved access facility. An "improved access
facility" is a

11 clearly identified area specifically created for motor
vehicle

12 parking, and includes any boat launch or boat ramp
associated with

13 the parking area, but does not include the department
parking

14 facilities at the Gorge Concert Center near George,
Washington.

15 The vehicle use permit is issued in the form of a
decal. One decal

16 shall be issued at no charge ((with each)) upon
the initial

17 purchase of either an annual saltwater,
freshwater, combination,

18 small game hunting, big game hunting, ((and)) or
trapping license

p. 1 SHB
1017

_1 issued by the department. Subsequent annual licenses
purchased do

_2 not include complimentary decals.

_3 The annual fee for a fish and wildlife lands vehicle
use

_4 permit, if purchased separately, is ten dollars. A
person to whom

_5 the department has issued a decal or who has purchased a
vehicle

_6 use permit separately may purchase a decal from the
department for

_7 each additional vehicle owned by the person at a cost of
five

_8 dollars per decal upon a showing of proof to the
department that

_9 the person owns the additional vehicle or vehicles.
Revenue derived

10 from the sale of fish and wildlife lands vehicle use
permits shall

11 be used solely for the stewardship and maintenance of
department

12 improved access facilities.

13 Youth groups may use department improved access
facilities

14 without possessing a vehicle use permit when accompanied
by a

15 vehicle use permit holder.

16 The department may accept contributions into the
state wildlife

17 fund for the sound stewardship of fish and wildlife.
Contributors

18 shall be known as "conservation patrons" and,
for contributions of

19 twenty dollars or more, shall receive a fish and wildlife
lands

20 vehicle use permit free of charge.

21 (2) The decal must be ((affixed in a permanent
manner to the

22 motor)) present inside the vehicle before
entering upon or using

23 the motor vehicle on a department improved access
facility, and

24 must be displayed on the ((rear window of the motor
vehicle, or,

25 if the motor vehicle does not have a rear window, on
the rear of

26 the motor vehicle)) inside of the vehicle in
such a manner that it

27 can be recognized and is legible.

28 (3) Failure to display the fish and wildlife lands
vehicle use

29 permit if required by this section is an infraction
under chapter

30 7.84 RCW, and department employees are authorized to
issue a

31 notice of infraction to the registered owner of any
motor vehicle

32 entering upon or using a department improved access
facility

33 without such a decal. The penalty for failure to
display or

34 improper display of the decal is sixty-six dollars. This
penalty is

35 reduced to thirty dollars if the registered owner
provides proof

36 to the court that he or she purchased a decal within
fifteen days

37 after the issuance of the notice of violation.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1017 p. 2