BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added to
chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of labor and services rendered in respect
to:

(a) The moving of
houses out of any landslide area that has been declared as a federal disaster
area;

(b) The demolition of
houses located in a landslide area that has been declared as a federal disaster
area; or

(c) The removal of
debris from a landslide area that has been declared as a federal disaster area.

(2) This section
expires July 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act is
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---