BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
77.04.030 and 2000 c 107 s 203 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 The fish and wildlife commission consists of nine
registered

_7 voters of the state appointed by the governor with
the advice and

_8 consent of the senate. In January of each
odd-numbered year, the

_9 governor shall appoint ((with the advice and consent
of the

10 senate)) two registered voters to the commission
to serve for

11 terms of six years from that January or until their
successors are

12 appointed and qualified. If a vacancy occurs on the
commission

13 prior to the expiration of a term, the governor shall
appoint a

14 registered voter within sixty days to complete the
term. ((Three

15 members shall be residents of that portion of the
state lying east

16 of the summit of the Cascade mountains, and three
shall be

17 residents of that portion of the state lying west of
the summit of

18 the Cascade mountains.)) Six members shall be
appointed to

p. 1 SHB
1019

_1 represent the six administrative regions of the
department as they

_2 existed on January 1, 2001, with each of these
members

_3 representing a different administrative region. The
department

_4 shall adopt the six administrative regions by rule.
A member

_5 representing an administrative region of the
department must be a

_6 resident of that region. The governor shall appoint
commissioners

_7 to achieve this balance by administrative region as
the terms of

_8 commissioners expire and vacancies occur. Three
additional members

_9 shall be appointed at-large. All members are to
serve a six-year

10 term. No two members may be residents of the
same county. The

11 legal office of the commission is at the administrative
office of

12 the department in Olympia.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1019 p. 2