BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.380
and 2000 c 107 s 271 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 (1) Persons who enter upon or use clearly identified
department

_7 improved access facilities with a motor vehicle may be
required to

_8 display a current annual fish and wildlife lands vehicle
use

_9 permit on the motor vehicle while within or while using an

10 improved access facility. An "improved access
facility" is a

11 clearly identified area specifically created for motor
vehicle

12 parking, and includes any boat launch or boat ramp
associated with

13 the parking area, but does not include the department
parking

14 facilities at the Gorge Concert Center near George,
Washington.

15 The vehicle use permit is issued in the form of a decal.
((One))

16 Two decals shall be issued at no charge with
each annual

17 saltwater, freshwater, combination, small game hunting, big
game

18 hunting, and trapping license issued by the department.
The annual

p. 1 HB
1020

_1 fee for a fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permit, if
purchased

_2 separately, is ten dollars. A person to whom the
department has

_3 issued a decal or who has purchased a vehicle use permit

_4 separately may purchase a decal from the department for
each

_5 additional vehicle owned by the person at a cost of five
dollars

_6 per decal upon a showing of proof to the department that
the

_7 person owns the additional vehicle or vehicles. Revenue
derived

_8 from the sale of fish and wildlife lands vehicle use
permits shall

_9 be used solely for the stewardship and maintenance of
department

10 improved access facilities.

11 Youth groups may use department improved access
facilities

12 without possessing a vehicle use permit when accompanied
by a

13 vehicle use permit holder.

14 The department may accept contributions into the
state wildlife

15 fund for the sound stewardship of fish and wildlife.
Contributors

16 shall be known as "conservation patrons" and,
for contributions of

17 twenty dollars or more, shall receive a fish and
wildlife lands

18 vehicle use permit free of charge.

19 (2) The decal must be affixed in a permanent manner
to the

20 motor vehicle before entering upon or using the motor
vehicle on a

21 department improved access facility, and must be
displayed on the

22 rear window of the motor vehicle, or, if the motor
vehicle does

23 not have a rear window, on the rear of the motor
vehicle.

24 (3) Failure to display the fish and wildlife lands
vehicle use

25 permit if required by this section is an infraction
under chapter

26 7.84 RCW, and department employees are authorized to
issue a

27 notice of infraction to the registered owner of any
motor vehicle

28 entering upon or using a department improved access
facility

29 without such a decal. The penalty for failure to
display or

30 improper display of the decal is sixty-six dollars. The
department

31 employee issuing the notice of infraction shall also
issue the

32 registered owner a decal valid for the current
calendar year.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1020 p. 2