BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.37.530 and 1997 c
328 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful:

(a) For any person to
operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle not equipped with mirrors on the
left and right sides of the motorcycle which shall be so located as to give the
driver a complete view of the highway for a distance of at least two hundred
feet to the rear of the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle: PROVIDED, That
mirrors shall not be required on any motorcycle or motor-driven cycle over
twenty-five years old originally manufactured without mirrors and which has
been restored to its original condition and which is being ridden to or from or
otherwise in conjunction with an antique or classic motorcycle contest, show,
or other such assemblage: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no mirror is required on any
motorcycle manufactured prior to January 1, 1931;

(b) For any person to
operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle which does not have a windshield
unless wearing glasses, goggles, or a face shield of a type conforming to rules
adopted by the state patrol;

(c) For any person to
operate or ride upon a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped on a state
highway, county road, or city street unless wearing upon his or her head a ((protective))
motorcycle helmet ((of a type conforming to rules adopted by the
state patrol)) except when the vehicle is an antique motor-driven cycle or
automobile that is licensed as a motorcycle or when the vehicle is equipped
with seat belts and roll bars approved by the state patrol. The motorcycle
helmet ((must be equipped with either a)) neck or chin strap ((which
shall)) must be fastened securely while the motorcycle or
motor-driven cycle is in motion. Persons operating electric-assisted bicycles
shall comply with all laws and regulations related to the use of bicycle
helmets;

(d) For any person to
transport a child under the age of five on a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle;

(e) For any person to
sell or offer for sale a motorcycle helmet ((which)) that does
not meet the requirements established by ((the state patrol)) this
section.

(2) The state patrol ((is
hereby authorized and empowered to)) may adopt and amend rules,
pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, concerning ((the))
standards ((and procedures for conformance of rules adopted)) for
glasses, goggles, and face shields((, and protective helmets)).

(3) For
purposes of this section, "motorcycle helmet" means a protective
covering for the head consisting of a hard outer shell, padding adjacent to and
inside the outer shell, and a neck or chin strap type retention system with a
sticker indicating that the motorcycle helmet meets standards established by
the United States Department of Transportation.

--- END ---