BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.660
and 1997 c 190 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) It shall be unlawful for any person to
transport any living

_7 animal on the running board, fenders, hood, or other
outside part

_8 of any vehicle unless suitable harness, cage, or
enclosure be

_9 provided and so attached as to protect such animal from
falling or

10 being thrown therefrom.

11 (2) It is unlawful for a person to transport a
child, seventeen

12 years old or younger, in or upon the uncovered bed of a
pickup

13 truck, unless that pickup truck has seats with seatbelts
in the

14 bed of the truck and the child is securely fastened in
the

15 seatbelt.

16 (3) It shall be unlawful for any person to
transport any

17 persons upon the running board, fenders, hood, or
other outside

18 part of any vehicle, except that this provision shall not
apply to

p. 1 HB
1022

_1 authorized emergency vehicles or to solid waste
collection

_2 vehicles that are engaged in collecting solid waste or
recyclables

_3 on route at speeds of twenty miles per hour or less.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1022 p. 2