BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
84.33.035 and 1995 c 165 s 1 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
definitions

_8 in this section apply throughout this chapter.

_9 (1) "Agricultural methods" means the
cultivation of trees that

10 are grown on land prepared by intensive cultivation and
tilling,

11 such as irrigating, plowing, or turning over the soil,
and on

12 which all unwanted plant growth is controlled
continuously for the

13 exclusive purpose of raising trees such as Christmas
trees and

14 short-rotation hardwoods.

15 (2) "Composite property tax rate" for a
county means the total

16 amount of property taxes levied upon forest lands by all
taxing

17 districts in the county other than the state, divided by
the total

18 assessed value of all forest land in the county.

p. 1 SHB
1024

_1 (3) "Forest land" means forest land which
is classified or

_2 designated forest land under this chapter.

_3 (4) "Harvested" means the time when in the
ordinary course of

_4 business the quantity of timber by species is first
definitely

_5 determined. The amount harvested shall be determined by
the

_6 Scribner Decimal C Scale or other prevalent measuring
practice

_7 adjusted to arrive at substantially equivalent
measurements, as

_8 approved by the department of revenue.

_9 (5) "Harvester" means every person who
from the person's own

10 land or from the land of another under a right or
license granted

11 by lease or contract, either directly or by contracting
with

12 others for the necessary labor or mechanical services,
fells,

13 cuts, or takes timber for sale or for commercial or
industrial

14 use: PROVIDED, That whenever the United States or any

15 instrumentality thereof, the state, including its
departments and

16 institutions and political subdivisions, or any
municipal

17 corporation therein so fells, cuts, or takes timber for
sale or

18 for commercial or industrial use, the harvester is the
first

19 person other than the United States or any
instrumentality

20 thereof, the state, including its departments and
institutions and

21 political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation
therein, who

22 acquires title to or a possessory interest in such
timber. The term

23 "harvester" does not include persons performing
under contract the

24 necessary labor or mechanical services for a harvester.

25 (6) "Short-rotation hardwoods" means
hardwood trees, such as

26 but not limited to hybrid cottonwoods, cultivated by
agricultural

27 methods in growing cycles shorter than ((ten)) fifteen
years.

28 (7) "Stumpage value of timber" means the
appropriate stumpage

29 value shown on tables prepared by the department of
revenue under

30 RCW 84.33.091, provided that for timber harvested from
public land

31 and sold under a competitive bidding process, stumpage
value shall

32 mean that actual amount paid to the seller in cash or
other

33 consideration. Whenever payment for the stumpage
includes

34 considerations other than cash, the value shall be the
fair market

35 value of the other consideration, provided that if the
other

36 consideration is permanent roads, the value of the roads
shall be

37 the appraised value as appraised by the seller.

SHB 1024 p. 2

_1 (8) "Timber" means forest trees, standing
or down, on privately

_2 or publicly owned land, and except as provided in RCW
84.33.170

_3 includes Christmas trees and short-rotation hardwoods.

_4 (9) "Timber assessed value" for a county
means a value,

_5 calculated by the department of revenue before October 1
of each

_6 year, equal to the total stumpage value of timber
harvested from

_7 privately owned land in the county during the most
recent four

_8 calendar quarters for which the information is available

_9 multiplied by a ratio. The numerator of the ratio is
the rate of

10 tax imposed by the county under RCW 84.33.051 for the
year of the

11 calculation. The denominator of the ratio is the
composite property

12 tax rate for the county for taxes due in the year of the

13 calculation, expressed as a percentage of assessed
value.

14 (10) "Timber assessed value" for a taxing
district means the

15 timber assessed value for the county multiplied by a
ratio. The

16 numerator of the ratio is the total assessed value of
forest land

17 in the taxing district. The denominator is the total
assessed value

18 of forest land in the county. As used in this section,
"assessed

19 value of forest land" means the assessed value of
forest land for

20 taxes due in the year the timber assessed value for the
county is

21 calculated.

22 Sec. 2. RCW
76.09.020 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 301 are each amended to

23 read as follows:

24 For purposes of this chapter:

25 (1) "Adaptive management" means reliance
on scientific methods

26 to test the results of actions taken so that the
management and

27 related policy can be changed promptly and
appropriately.

28 (2) "Appeals board" means the forest
practices appeals board

29 created by RCW 76.09.210.

30 (3) "Aquatic resources" includes water
quality, salmon, other

31 species of the vertebrate classes Cephalaspidomorphi and

32 Osteichthyes identified in the forests and fish report,
the

33 Columbia torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton kezeri),
the Cascade

34 torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton cascadae), the
Olympic torrent

35 salamander (Rhyacotriton olympian), the Dunn's
salamander

36 (Plethodon dunni), the Van Dyke's salamander (Plethodon
vandyke),

37 the tailed frog (Ascaphus truei), and their
respective habitats.

p. 3 SHB
1024

_1 (4) "Commissioner" means the commissioner
of public lands.

_2 (5) "Contiguous" means land adjoining or
touching by common

_3 corner or otherwise. Land having common ownership
divided by a road

_4 or other right of way shall be considered contiguous.

_5 (6) "Conversion to a use other than commercial
timber

_6 operation" means a bona fide conversion to an
active use which is

_7 incompatible with timber growing and as may be defined
by forest

_8 practices rules.

_9 (7) "Department" means the department of
natural resources.

10 (8) "Forest land" means all land which is
capable of supporting

11 a merchantable stand of timber and is not being actively
used for

12 a use which is incompatible with timber growing.

13 (9) "Forest landowner" means any person in
actual control of

14 forest land, whether such control is based either on
legal or

15 equitable title, or on any other interest entitling the
holder to

16 sell or otherwise dispose of any or all of the timber on
such land

17 in any manner: PROVIDED, That any lessee or other
person in

18 possession of forest land without legal or equitable
title to such

19 land shall be excluded from the definition of
"forest landowner"

20 unless such lessee or other person has the right to sell
or

21 otherwise dispose of any or all of the timber located on
such

22 forest land.

23 (10) "Forest practice" means any activity
conducted on or

24 directly pertaining to forest land and relating to
growing,

25 harvesting, or processing timber, including but not
limited to:

26 (a) Road and trail construction;

27 (b) Harvesting, final and intermediate;

28 (c) Precommercial thinning;

29 (d) Reforestation;

30 (e) Fertilization;

31 (f) Prevention and suppression of diseases and
insects;

32 (g) Salvage of trees; and

33 (h) Brush control.

34 "Forest practice" shall not include
preparatory work such as tree

35 marking, surveying and road flagging, and removal or
harvesting of

36 incidental vegetation from forest lands such as berries,
ferns,

37 greenery, mistletoe, herbs, mushrooms, and other
products which

SHB 1024 p. 4

_1 cannot normally be expected to result in damage to
forest soils,

_2 timber, or public resources.

_3 (11) "Forest practices rules" means any
rules adopted pursuant

_4 to RCW 76.09.040.

_5 (12) "Forest trees" does not include
hardwood trees cultivated

_6 by agricultural methods in growing cycles shorter
than fifteen

_7 years if the trees were planted on land that was not
in forest use

_8 immediately before the trees were planted and before
the land was

_9 prepared for planting the trees. "Forest
trees" includes Christmas

10 trees.

11 (13) "Forests and fish report"
means the forests and fish

12 report to the board dated April 29, 1999.

13 (((13))) (14) "Application"
means the application required

14 pursuant to RCW 76.09.050.

15 (((14))) (15) "Operator"
means any person engaging in forest

16 practices except an employee with wages as his or her
sole

17 compensation.

18 (((15))) (16) "Person" means
any individual, partnership,

19 private, public, or municipal corporation, county, the
department

20 or other state or local governmental entity, or
association of

21 individuals of whatever nature.

22 (((16))) (17) "Public
resources" means water, fish and

23 wildlife, and in addition shall mean capital
improvements of the

24 state or its political subdivisions.

25 (((17))) (18) "Timber" means
forest trees, standing or down, of

26 a commercial species, including Christmas trees.

27 (((18))) (19) "Timber owner"
means any person having all or any

28 part of the legal interest in timber. Where such timber
is subject

29 to a contract of sale, "timber owner" shall
mean the contract

30 purchaser.

31 (((19))) (20) "Board" means
the forest practices board created

32 in RCW 76.09.030.

33 (((20))) (21) "Unconfined
avulsing channel migration zone"

34 means the area within which the active channel of an
unconfined

35 avulsing stream is prone to move and where the movement
would

36 result in a potential near-term loss of riparian forest
adjacent

37 to the stream. Sizeable islands with productive timber
may exist

38 within the zone.

p. 5 SHB
1024

_1 (((21))) (22) "Unconfined
avulsing stream" means generally

_2 fifth order or larger waters that experience abrupt
shifts in

_3 channel location, creating a complex flood plain
characterized by

_4 extensive gravel bars, disturbance species of vegetation
of

_5 variable age, numerous side channels, wall-based
channels, oxbow

_6 lakes, and wetland complexes. Many of these streams
have dikes and

_7 levees that may temporarily or permanently restrict
channel

_8 movement.

_9 Sec. 3. RCW
82.04.213 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 302 are each amended

10 to read as follows:

11 (1) "Agricultural product" means any
product of plant

12 cultivation or animal husbandry including, but not
limited to: A

13 product of horticulture, grain cultivation, vermiculture,

14 viticulture, or aquaculture as defined in RCW 15.85.020;

15 plantation Christmas trees; short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in

16 RCW 84.33.035; turf; or any animal including but
not limited to an

17 animal that is a private sector cultured aquatic product
as

18 defined in RCW 15.85.020, or a bird, or insect, or the
substances

19 obtained from such an animal. "Agricultural
product" does not

20 include animals intended to be pets.

21 (2) "Farmer" means any person engaged in
the business of

22 growing or producing, upon the person's own lands or
upon the

23 lands in which the person has a present right of
possession, any

24 agricultural product whatsoever for sale.
"Farmer" does not include

25 a person using such products as ingredients in a manufacturing

26 process, or a person growing or producing such products
for the

27 person's own consumption. "Farmer" does not
include a person

28 selling any animal or substance obtained therefrom in
connection

29 with the person's business of operating a stockyard or a
slaughter

30 or packing house. "Farmer" does not include
any person in respect

31 to the business of taking, cultivating, or raising
timber.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1024 p. 6