BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.76.115 and 1998 c
345 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The fair
fund is created in the custody of the state treasury. All moneys received by
the department of agriculture for the purposes of this fund and from RCW
67.16.105(4) shall be deposited into the fund. Expenditures from the fund may
be used only for assisting fairs in the manner provided in this chapter. Only
the director of agriculture or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

(2) On
July 1, 2001, the state treasurer shall transfer three million dollars from the
general fund to the fair fund. On July 1, 2002, and on each July 1st
thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer an amount equal to the amount
transferred on the preceding July 1st increased by the fiscal growth factor,
defined under RCW 43.135.025, from the general fund to the fair fund.

--- END ---