BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 38.40.060
and 1991 c 25 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 Every officer and employee of the state or of any
county, city,

_7 or other political subdivision thereof who is a member of
the

_8 Washington national guard or of the army, navy, air force,
coast

_9 guard, or marine corps reserve of the United States, or of
any

10 organized reserve or armed forces of the United States
shall be

11 entitled to and shall be granted military leave of absence
from

12 such employment for a period not exceeding fifteen days
during

13 each ((calendar)) year beginning October 1st and
ending the

14 following September 30th. Such leave shall be
granted in order that

15 the person may report for active duty, when called, or take
part

16 in active training duty in such manner and at such time as
he or

17 she may be ordered to active duty or active training duty.
Such

18 military leave of absence shall be in addition to any
vacation or

p. 1 HB
1028

_1 sick leave to which the officer or employee might
otherwise be

_2 entitled, and shall not involve any loss of efficiency
rating,

_3 privileges, or pay. During the period of military
leave, the

_4 officer or employee shall receive from the state, or the
county,

_5 city, or other political subdivision, his or her normal
pay.

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
October 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1028 p. 2