BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.545

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) The legislature finds that there is a significant
burden

_8 placed on a high school district and a nonhigh school
district

_9 when the nonhigh school district cannot pay the maintenance
and

10 operating portion of the amount owed to the high school
district

11 as required under this chapter. The inability to pay often
is due

12 to levy failures and other related issues. The legislature
intends

13 to establish a dispute resolution process to help
facilitate the

14 purposes of this chapter.

15 (2) When a dispute arises between a nonhigh school
district and

16 a high school district regarding payments under this
chapter,

17 whether it is the amount due or the payment schedule,
either

18 district may petition the educational service district to
appoint

p. 1 HB
1029

_1 a mediator. If the nonhigh school district and the high
school

_2 district are in different educational service districts,
then the

_3 educational service district in which the petitioning
school

_4 district is located shall receive the petition. If the
mediator is

_5 unable to bring the districts to agreement within
forty-five days

_6 of the appointment of the mediator, the educational
service

_7 district shall hold a hearing within thirty days and
then adopt an

_8 amount due or a payment plan within thirty days of the
hearing.

_9 (3) The cost of mediation under subsection (2) of
this section

10 shall be paid by the petitioning school district.

11 Sec. 2. RCW
28A.545.070 and 1990 c 33 s 491 are each amended to

12 read as follows:

13 (1) The superintendent of public instruction shall
annually

14 determine the estimated amount due by a nonhigh school
district to

15 a high school district for the school year as follows:

16 (a) The total of the high school district's maintenance
and

17 operation excess tax levy that has been authorized and
determined

18 by the superintendent of public instruction to be allowable

19 pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531, as now or hereafter amended,
for

20 collection during the next calendar year, shall first be
divided

21 by the total estimated number of annual average full-time

22 equivalent students which the high school district
superintendent

23 or the superintendent of public instruction has certified
pursuant

24 to RCW 28A.545.060 will be enrolled in the high school
district

25 during the school year;

26 (b) The result of the calculation provided for in
subsection

27 (1)(a) of this section shall then be multiplied by the
estimated

28 number of annual average full-time equivalent students
residing in

29 the nonhigh school district that will be enrolled in the
high

30 school district during the school year which has been
established

31 pursuant to RCW 28A.545.060; and

32 (c) The result of the calculation provided for in
subsection

33 (1)(b) of this section shall be adjusted upward to the
extent the

34 estimated amount due by a nonhigh school district for the
prior

35 school year was less than the actual amount due based upon
actual

36 annual average full-time equivalent student enrollments
during the

37 previous school year and the actual per annual average
full-time

HB 1029 p. 2

_1 equivalent student maintenance and operation excess tax
levy rate

_2 for the current tax collection year, of the high school
district,

_3 or adjusted downward to the extent the estimated amount
due was

_4 greater than such actual amount due or greater than such
lesser

_5 amount as a high school district may have elected to
assess

_6 pursuant to RCW 28A.545.090.

_7 (2) The amount arrived at pursuant to subsection
(1)(c) of this

_8 subsection shall constitute the estimated amount due by
a nonhigh

_9 school district to a high school district for the school
year.

10 (3) The amount due under this section may be
adjusted under

11 section 1 of this act. Any adjustment under section
1 of this act

12 shall be the applicable amount due.

13 Sec. 3. RCW
28A.545.090 and 1990 c 33 s 493 are each amended to

14 read as follows:

15 Notwithstanding any provision of RCW 28A.545.050
through

16 28A.545.080 to the contrary, any high school district board
of

17 directors may elect to assess a nonhigh school district an
amount

18 which is less than that otherwise established by the

19 superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW
28A.545.070

20 to be due or section 1 of this act. In the event a
high school

21 district elects to do so, it shall notify both the
superintendent

22 of public instruction and the nonhigh school district of
its

23 election and the lesser amount no later than September
first

24 following the school year for which the amount is due. In
the

25 absence of such notification, each nonhigh school district
shall

26 pay the amount otherwise established by the superintendent
of

27 public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.545.070 or
section 1 of

28 this act.

29 Sec. 4. RCW
28A.310.300 and 1998 c 244 s 13 are each amended to

30 read as follows:

31 In addition to other powers and duties as provided by
law, each

32 educational service district superintendent shall:

33 (1) Assist the school districts in preparation of their
budgets

34 as provided in chapter 28A.505 RCW((.));

35 (2) Enforce the provisions of the compulsory attendance
law as

36 provided in RCW 28A.225.010 through 28A.225.140,
28A.200.010, and

p. 3 HB
1029

_1 28A.200.020((.));

_2 (3) Perform duties relating to capital fund aid by
nonhigh

_3 districts as provided in chapter 28A.540 RCW((.));

_4 (4) Carry out the duties and issue orders creating
new school

_5 districts and transfers of territory as provided in
chapter

_6 28A.315 RCW((.));

_7 (5) Perform the limited duties as provided in
chapter 28A.193

_8 RCW((.));

_9 (6) Facilitate resolution of disputes between
high school and

10 nonhigh school districts as provided in section 1 of
this act; and

11 (7) Perform all other duties prescribed by
law and the

12 educational service district board.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1029 p. 4