BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.94 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that Washington state faces threats to its economic vitality, public health,
and environment from the ongoing and increasing use of gasoline and diesel
fuels in motor vehicles. Motor vehicle emissions from petroleum fuels account
for more than half of all air pollutants and almost sixty percent of total
carbon dioxide emissions in Washington. The legislature finds it is important
to begin addressing the negative impacts of continued gasoline and diesel fuel
use. Addressing motor vehicle emissions is further needed because of the
expected increases in population and vehicle miles traveled, which threaten to
erode air quality gains made over the last decade. To make net progress in
improving air quality, reducing the threat of climate change, and protecting
public health and the environment, the legislature finds it is necessary to
encourage the use of clean alternative fuel vehicles.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.94.030 and 1993 c
252 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless a different
meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and phrases as
hereinafter used in this chapter shall have the following meanings:

(1) "Air
contaminant" means dust, fumes, mist, smoke, other particulate matter, vapor,
gas, odorous substance, or any combination thereof.

(2) "Air
pollution" is presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or more air
contaminants in sufficient quantities and of such characteristics and duration
as is, or is likely to be, injurious to human health, plant or animal life, or
property, or which unreasonably interfere with enjoyment of life and property.
For the purpose of this chapter, air pollution shall not include air
contaminants emitted in compliance with chapter 17.21 RCW.

(3) "Air quality
standard" means an established concentration, exposure time, and frequency
of occurrence of an air contaminant or multiple contaminants in the ambient air
which shall not be exceeded.

(4) "Ambient
air" means the surrounding outside air.

(5) "Authority"
means any air pollution control agency whose jurisdictional boundaries are
coextensive with the boundaries of one or more counties.

(6) "Best
available control technology" (BACT) means an emission limitation based on
the maximum degree of reduction for each air pollutant subject to regulation
under this chapter emitted from or that results from any new or modified
stationary source, that the permitting authority, on a case-by-case basis,
taking into account energy, environmental, and economic impacts and other
costs, determines is achievable for such a source or modification through
application of production processes and available methods, systems, and
techniques, including fuel cleaning, clean fuels, or treatment or innovative
fuel combustion techniques for control of each such a pollutant. In no event
shall application of "best available control technology" result in
emissions of any pollutants that will exceed the emissions allowed by any
applicable standard under 40 C.F.R. Part 60 and Part 61, as they exist on July
25, 1993, or their later enactments as adopted by reference by the director by
rule. Emissions from any source utilizing clean fuels, or any other means, to
comply with this subsection shall not be allowed to increase above levels that
would have been required under the definition of BACT as it existed prior to
enactment of the (([federal])) federal clean air act amendments
of 1990.

(7) "Best
available retrofit technology" (BART) means an emission limitation based
on the degree of reduction achievable through the application of the best
system of continuous emission reduction for each pollutant that is emitted by
an existing stationary facility. The emission limitation must be established,
on a case-by-case basis, taking into consideration the technology available,
the costs of compliance, the energy and nonair quality environmental impacts of
compliance, any pollution control equipment in use or in existence at the
source, the remaining useful life of the source, and the degree of improvement
in visibility that might reasonably be anticipated to result from the use of
the technology.

(8) "Board"
means the board of directors of an authority.

(9) "Clean
alternative fuel vehicle" means a motor vehicle, as defined in RCW
46.04.320, designed to operate exclusively on alternative fuels; or a hybrid
vehicle powered by a combination of an electric motor and an engine powered by
gasoline, diesel, or an alternative fuel; or a fuel cell vehicle powered by
gasoline or an alternative fuel. Vehicles less than twelve thousand pounds
gross vehicle weight must also meet or exceed the federal emission standards
for ultralow emission vehicles. For purposes of this subsection, alternative
fuels are defined as natural gas, propane, hydrogen, and electricity.

(10)
"Control officer" means the air pollution control officer of any
authority.

(((10))) (11)
"Department" or "ecology" means the department of ecology.

(((11))) (12)
"Emission" means a release of air contaminants into the ambient air.

(((12))) (13)
"Emission standard" and "emission limitation" mean a
requirement established under the federal clean air act or this chapter that
limits the quantity, rate, or concentration of emissions of air contaminants on
a continuous basis, including any requirement relating to the operation or
maintenance of a source to assure continuous emission reduction, and any
design, equipment, work practice, or operational standard adopted under the
federal clean air act or this chapter.

(((13))) (14)
"Lowest achievable emission rate" (LAER) means for any source that
rate of emissions that reflects:

(a) The most stringent
emission limitation that is contained in the implementation plan of any state
for such class or category of source, unless the owner or operator of the proposed
source demonstrates that such limitations are not achievable; or

(b) The most stringent
emission limitation that is achieved in practice by such class or category of
source, whichever is more stringent.

In no event shall the
application of this term permit a proposed new or modified source to emit any
pollutant in excess of the amount allowable under applicable new source
performance standards.

(((14))) (15)
"Modification" means any physical change in, or change in the method
of operation of, a stationary source that increases the amount of any air
contaminant emitted by such source or that results in the emission of any air
contaminant not previously emitted. The term modification shall be construed
consistent with the definition of modification in Section 7411, Title 42,
United States Code, and with rules implementing that section.

(((15))) (16)
"Multicounty authority" means an authority which consists of two or
more counties.

(((16))) (17)
"New source" means (a) the construction or modification of a
stationary source that increases the amount of any air contaminant emitted by
such source or that results in the emission of any air contaminant not
previously emitted, and (b) any other project that constitutes a new source
under the federal clean air act.

(((17))) (18)
"Permit program source" means a source required to apply for or to
maintain an operating permit under RCW 70.94.161.

(((18))) (19)
"Person" means an individual, firm, public or private corporation,
association, partnership, political subdivision of the state, municipality, or
governmental agency.

(((19))) (20)
"Reasonably available control technology" (RACT) means the lowest
emission limit that a particular source or source category is capable of
meeting by the application of control technology that is reasonably available
considering technological and economic feasibility. RACT is determined on a
case-by-case basis for an individual source or source category taking into
account the impact of the source upon air quality, the availability of
additional controls, the emission reduction to be achieved by additional
controls, the impact of additional controls on air quality, and the capital and
operating costs of the additional controls. RACT requirements for a source or
source category shall be adopted only after notice and opportunity for comment
are afforded.

(((20))) (21)
"Silvicultural burning" means burning of wood fiber on forest land
consistent with the provisions of RCW 70.94.660.

(((21))) (22)
"Source" means all of the emissions units including quantifiable
fugitive emissions, that are located on one or more contiguous or adjacent
properties, and are under the control of the same person, or persons under
common control, whose activities are ancillary to the production of a single
product or functionally related group of products.

(((22))) (23)
"Stationary source" means any building, structure, facility, or
installation that emits or may emit any air contaminant.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Employers who are
taxable under this chapter shall be allowed a credit for the purchase or lease
of new clean alternative fuel vehicles as defined in RCW 70.94.030, if the
vehicles are used in connection with business operations. The credit shall be
based upon the following schedule:

VEHICLE TONNAGE CREDIT

Less than 12,000 pounds
gross 25 percent of cost or $5,000,

vehicle weight whichever
is less

Over 12,000 pounds
gross 25 percent of cost or $20,000, vehicle weight
whichever is less

(2) The credit may not
exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be due from the employer under
this chapter. The maximum amount of credit under this section that may be
claimed by an employer for any calendar year shall not exceed one hundred thousand
dollars.

(3) Application for tax
credit under this section may only be made in the form and manner prescribed in
rules adopted by the department.

(4) The credit shall be
taken not more than once quarterly and must be claimed by the due date of the
last tax return for the calendar year in which the purchase is made.

(5) The department
shall keep a running total of all credits granted under this section during
each calendar year, and shall disallow any credits that would cause the
tabulation for any calendar year to exceed two million dollars.

(6) Any person who
knowingly makes a false statement of material fact in the application for a
credit under subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Employers who are
taxable under this chapter and provide financial assistance for the purchase or
lease of new clean alternative fuel vehicles as defined in RCW 70.94.030 to school
districts, transit agencies, and local governments shall be allowed a credit
for amounts paid, if the vehicles are used for public transit. School buses
are considered public transit for purposes of this section.

(2) The credit may not
exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. The
maximum amount of the credit under this section claimed by each employer for
any calendar year shall not exceed two hundred thousand dollars.

(3) Application for tax
credit under this section may only be made in the form and manner prescribed in
rules adopted by the department.

(4) The credit shall be
taken not more than once quarterly and must be claimed by the due date of the
last tax return for the calendar year in which the purchase is made.

(5) The department
shall keep a running total of all credits granted under this section during
each calendar year, and shall disallow any credits that would cause the
tabulation for any calendar year to exceed two million dollars.

(6) Any person who
knowingly makes a false statement of a material fact in the application for a
credit under subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Employers who are
taxable under this chapter shall be allowed a credit for the development of
alternative fuel and electric vehicle recharging infrastructure. For purposes
of this chapter, alternative fuel infrastructure means dispensing equipment for
natural gas, propane, hydrogen, fuel containing a minimum of eighty-five
percent ethanol, fuel containing a minimum of twenty percent biodiesel, and
electric recharging stations. The credit shall be based upon the following
schedule:

(a) Fifty percent of
the costs incurred for systems open to the public not to exceed two hundred
thousand dollars; and

(b) Twenty-five percent
of the costs incurred for systems not open to the public not to exceed one
hundred thousand dollars.

(2) The credit may not
exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be due from the employer under
this chapter. The maximum amount of credit under this section that may be
claimed by an employer for any calendar year shall not exceed one million
dollars.

(3) Application for tax
credit under this section may only be made in the form and manner prescribed in
rules adopted by the department.

(4) The credit shall be
taken not more than once quarterly and must be claimed by the due date of the
last tax return for the calendar year in which the infrastructure is developed.

(5) The department
shall keep a running total of all credits granted under this section during
each calendar year, and shall disallow any credits that would cause the
tabulation for any calendar year to exceed five million dollars.

(6) Any person who
knowingly makes a false statement of a material fact in the application for a
credit under subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax imposed by this
chapter shall not apply to the sale or lease of a new motor vehicle that meets
the definition of a "clean alternative fuel vehicle" as provided in
RCW 70.94.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter do not apply to the use of any new motor vehicle that meets the
definition of a "clean alternative fuel vehicle" as provided in RCW
70.94.030.

Sec. 8. RCW 82.36.010 and 1998 c
176 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Alternative
fuel" means natural gas, propane, hydrogen, electricity, fuels containing
a minimum of eighty-five percent ethanol, and fuels containing a minimum of
twenty percent biodiesel.

(2)
"Blended fuel" means a mixture of motor vehicle fuel and another
liquid, other than a de minimus amount of the liquid, that can be used as a
fuel to propel a motor vehicle.

(((2))) (3)
"Bond" means a bond duly executed with a corporate surety qualified
under chapter 48.28 RCW, which bond is payable to the state of Washington
conditioned upon faithful performance of all requirements of this chapter,
including the payment of all taxes, penalties, and other obligations arising
out of this chapter.

(((3))) (4)
"Bulk transfer" means a transfer of motor vehicle fuel by pipeline or
vessel.

(((4))) (5)
"Bulk transfer-terminal system" means the motor vehicle fuel
distribution system consisting of refineries, pipelines, vessels, and
terminals. Motor vehicle fuel in a refinery, pipeline, vessel, or terminal is
in the bulk transfer-terminal system. Motor vehicle fuel in the fuel tank of
an engine, motor vehicle, or in a railcar, trailer, truck, or other equipment
suitable for ground transportation is not in the bulk transfer-terminal system.

(((5))) (6)
"Dealer" means a person engaged in the retail sale of motor vehicle
fuel.

(((6))) (7)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(((7))) (8)
"Director" means the director of licensing.

(((8))) (9)
"Evasion" or "evade" means to diminish or avoid the
computation, assessment, or payment of authorized taxes or fees through:

(a) A knowing: False
statement; misrepresentation of fact; or other act of deception; or

(b) An intentional:
Omission; failure to file a return or report; or other act of deception.

(((9))) (10)
"Export" means to obtain motor vehicle fuel in this state for sales
or distribution outside the state.

(((10))) (11)
"Highway" means every way or place open to the use of the public, as
a matter of right, for the purpose of vehicular travel.

(((11))) (12)
"Import" means to bring motor vehicle fuel into this state by a means
of conveyance other than the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle.

(((12))) (13)
"Licensee" means a person holding a license issued under this
chapter.

(((13))) (14)
"Marine fuel dealer" means a person engaged in the retail sale of
motor vehicle fuel whose place of business and/or sale outlet is located upon a
navigable waterway.

(((14))) (15)
"Motor vehicle fuel blender" means a person who produces blended
motor fuel outside the bulk transfer-terminal system.

(((15))) (16)
"Motor vehicle fuel distributor" means a person who acquires motor
vehicle fuel from a supplier, distributor, or licensee for subsequent sale and
distribution.

(((16))) (17)
"Motor vehicle fuel exporter" means a person who purchases motor
vehicle fuel in this state and directly exports the fuel by a means other than
the bulk transfer-terminal system to a destination outside of the state. If
the exporter of record is acting as an agent, the person for whom the agent is
acting is the exporter. If there is no exporter of record, the owner of the
motor fuel at the time of exportation is the exporter.

(((17))) (18)
"Motor vehicle fuel importer" means a person who imports motor
vehicle fuel into the state by a means other than the bulk transfer-terminal
system. If the importer of record is acting as an agent, the person for whom
the agent is acting is the importer. If there is no importer of record, the
owner of the motor vehicle fuel at the time of importation is the importer.

(((18))) (19)
"Motor vehicle fuel supplier" means a person who owns and stores
motor vehicle fuel in a terminal facility or who refines and stores motor
vehicle fuel at a refinery.

(((19))) (20)
"Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle designed for operation
upon land utilizing motor vehicle fuel as the means of propulsion.

(((20))) (21)
"Motor vehicle fuel" means gasoline and any other inflammable gas or
liquid, by whatsoever name the gasoline, gas, or liquid may be known or sold,
the chief use of which is as fuel for the propulsion of motor vehicles or
motorboats.

(((21))) (22)
"Person" means a natural person, fiduciary, association, or
corporation. The term "person" as applied to an association means
and includes the partners or members thereof, and as applied to corporations,
the officers thereof.

(((22))) (23)
"Position holder" means a person who holds the inventory position in
motor vehicle fuel, as reflected by the records of the terminal operator. A
person holds the inventory position in motor vehicle fuel if the person has a
contractual agreement with the terminal for the use of storage facilities and
terminating services at a terminal with respect to motor vehicle fuel.
"Position holder" includes a terminal operator that owns motor
vehicle fuel in their terminal.

(((23))) (24)
"Rack" means a mechanism for delivering motor vehicle fuel from a
refinery or terminal into a truck, trailer, railcar, or other means of nonbulk
transfer.

(((24))) (25)
"Refiner" means a person who owns, operates, or otherwise controls a
refinery.

(((25))) (26)
"Removal" means a physical transfer of motor vehicle fuel other than
by evaporation, loss, or destruction.

(((26))) (27)
"Terminal" means a motor vehicle fuel storage and distribution
facility that has been assigned a terminal control number by the internal
revenue service, is supplied by pipeline or vessel, and from which reportable
motor vehicle fuel is removed at a rack.

(((27))) (28)
"Terminal operator" means a person who owns, operates, or otherwise
controls a terminal.

(((28))) (29)
"Two-party exchange" or "buy-sell agreement" means a
transaction in which taxable motor vehicle fuel is transferred from one
licensed supplier to another licensed supplier under an exchange or buy-sell
agreement whereby the supplier that is the position holder agrees to deliver
taxable motor vehicle fuel to the other supplier or the other supplier's
customer at the rack of the terminal at which the delivering supplier is the
position holder.

Sec. 9. RCW 82.36.025 and 1999 c
269 s 16 and 1999 c 94 s 29 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

A motor vehicle fuel
tax rate of twenty-three cents per gallon shall apply to the sale,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, except for alternative fuel. A
tax rate of eleven and one-half cents per gallon shall apply to the sale,
distribution, or use of alternative fuel.

Sec. 10. RCW 82.36.280 and 1998 c
176 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person who uses any
motor vehicle fuel or alternative fuel for the purpose of operating any
internal combustion engine not used on or in conjunction with any motor vehicle
licensed to be operated over and along any of the public highways, and as the
motive power thereof, upon which motor vehicle fuel excise tax has been paid,
shall be entitled to and shall receive a refund of the amount of the motor
vehicle fuel excise tax paid on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel so used,
whether such motor vehicle excise tax has been paid either directly to the
vendor from whom the motor vehicle fuel was purchased or indirectly by adding
the amount of such excise tax to the price of such fuel. No refund shall be
made for motor vehicle fuel consumed by any motor vehicle as herein defined
that is required to be registered and licensed as provided in chapter 46.16
RCW; and is operated over and along any public highway except that a refund
shall be allowed for motor vehicle fuel consumed:

(1) In a motor vehicle
owned by the United States that is operated off the public highways for
official use;

(2) By auxiliary
equipment not used for motive power, provided such consumption is accurately
measured by a metering device that has been specifically approved by the
department or is established by either of the following formulae:

(a) For fuel used in
pumping fuel or heating oils by a power take-off unit on a delivery truck,
refund shall be allowed claimant for tax paid on fuel purchased at the rate of
three-fourths of one gallon for each one thousand gallons of fuel delivered:
PROVIDED, That claimant when presenting his or her claim to the department in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter, shall provide to said claim,
invoices of fuel oil delivered, or such other appropriate information as may be
required by the department to substantiate his or her claim; or

(b) For fuel used in
operating a power take-off unit on a cement mixer truck or load compactor on a
garbage truck, claimant shall be allowed a refund of twenty-five percent of the
tax paid on all fuel used in such a truck; and

(c) The department is
authorized to establish by rule additional formulae for determining fuel usage
when operating other types of equipment by means of power take-off units when
direct measurement of the fuel used is not feasible. The department is also
authorized to adopt rules regarding the usage of on board computers for the
production of records required by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 70.94 RCW to read as follows:

The Washington State
University energy program, in consultation with the departments of ecology,
revenue, and licensing; local governments; vehicle manufacturers and suppliers;
and other interested parties shall collect and review the relevant data
associated with the provisions of chapter . . ., Laws of 2001 (this
act) and evaluate the effectiveness of these incentives in improving air
quality and increasing the use of clean alternative fuel vehicles. The
Washington State University energy program shall present its findings and make
recommendations as appropriate to the legislature biannually on or before
December 15th, beginning in 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.19.637 (Clean-fuel
vehicles--Purchasing requirements) and 1991 c 199 s 213; and

(2) RCW 82.38.075 (Natural gas,
propane--Annual license fee in lieu of special fuel tax for use in motor
vehicles--Schedule--Decal or other identifying device) and 1983 c 212 s 1, 1981
c 129 s 1, 1979 c 48 s 1, & 1977 ex.s. c 335 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. This act expires December
31, 2009.

---
END ---