BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the federal clean air act amendments of 1990 sought to accelerate the
deployment of clean-fuel vehicles through the use of nonmonetary incentives.
The federal regulations adopted to implement the clean air act amendments direct
states to exempt federally certified and labeled clean-fuel vehicles in fleets
from high-occupancy vehicle restrictions for single-occupant vehicles. In
addition, the federal transportation equity act of the twenty-first century
encourages and permits states to extend the high-occupancy vehicle lane access
exemption to nonfleet owners of clean-fuel vehicles.

The legislature finds
that the goals of the state and federal clean air acts will be advanced by
extending the use of the high-occupancy vehicle lanes to federally certified
clean-fuel vehicles as long as the vehicles are not a significant cause of
congestion in the high-occupancy vehicle lanes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By June 30, 2002,
the department shall issue special clean-fuel license plates, bearing the
standard background, for passenger vehicles that are federally certified as:
(a) Inherently low-emission vehicles; (b) ultra low-emission vehicles; or (c)
zero-emission vehicles. The license plates shall denote the vehicle's
certification with the inherently low-emission, ultra low-emission, or
zero-emission designation.

(2) The department
shall issue the special clean-fuel license plates upon payment by the applicant
of all license fees, but the department may not set or charge an additional fee
for the special clean-fuel license plates. The department shall replace, at
cost, license plates issued under this section if they are lost, stolen,
damaged, defaced, or destroyed. The clean-fuel license plates shall remain
with the vehicle for which they were initially issued and may not be used on
another vehicle.

(3) The department
shall revoke the special clean-fuel designation if the vehicle is required to
have a standard emission test, under chapter 70.120 RCW, and it fails the
test. If the vehicle fails the emission test, the vehicle's owner shall return
the special clean-fuel license plates to the department within fifteen days and
apply for regular license plates.

(4) The use of a
special clean-fuel license plate on a vehicle that is not federally certified,
or on a certified vehicle that has failed an emission test more than fifteen
days previous, is a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The state
department of transportation and the local authorities, in consultation with
the department of ecology, may permit a vehicle with one or more occupants to
operate in high-occupancy vehicle lanes if it is certified as an inherently
low-emission vehicle, ultra low-emission vehicle, or zero-emission vehicle
pursuant to Title 40, Chapter 1, Part 88, Code of Federal Regulations, is
labeled in accordance with section 88.312-93(c) of that title, and bears a
special clean-fuel license plate as provided in section 2 of this act.

(2) Inherently
low-emission fleet vehicles that have been certified, labeled, and issued
special clean-fuel license plates shall be allowed in the high-occupancy
vehicle lanes with only one occupant in federally designated nonattainment air
pollution areas. For the purpose of this section "fleet" means a
vehicle owner who is in a nonattainment area and owns a total of at least ten
motor vehicles, including the inherently low-emission vehicle, that operate in
the owner's fleet.

(3) This section
expires June 30, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 70.120 RCW to read as follows:

If a
vehicle with special clean-fuel license plates bearing the designation
inherently low-emission, ultra low-emission, or zero-emission, as provided in
section 2 of this act, fails an emission test required under this chapter, the
department shall immediately send written notice of the failure to the
department of licensing.

---
END ---