BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 70.94.100
and 1991 c 199 s 704 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 (1) The governing body of each authority shall be known
as the

_7 board of directors.

_8 (2) In the case of an authority comprised of one county
the

_9 board shall be comprised of two appointees of the city
selection

10 committee, at least one of whom shall represent the city
having

11 the most population in the county, and two representatives
to be

12 designated by the board of county commissioners. In the
case of an

13 authority comprised of two, three, four, or five counties,
the

14 board shall be comprised of one appointee from each county,
who

15 shall represent the city having the most population in such

16 county, to be designated by the mayor and city council of
such

17 city, and one representative from each county to be
designated by

18 the board of county commissioners of each county making up
the

p. 1 HB
1033

_1 authority. In the case of an authority comprised of six
or more

_2 counties, the board shall be comprised of one
representative from

_3 each county to be designated by the board of county
commissioners

_4 of each county making up the authority, and three
appointees, one

_5 each from the three largest cities within the local
authority's

_6 jurisdiction to be appointed by the mayor and city
council of such

_7 city. Any authority comprised of two counties or
more shall also

_8 include, at the legislator's discretion, a legislator
from the

_9 district in which the counties are located selected
by the

10 legislators from that district. In the event the
counties

11 comprising the authority are located in different
legislative

12 districts, a legislator from the district that includes
the

13 largest city by population shall be appointed by the
group of

14 legislators representing those districts.

15 (3) If the board of an authority otherwise would
consist of an

16 even number, the members selected as above provided
shall agree

17 upon and elect an additional member who shall be either
a member

18 of the governing body of one of the towns, cities or
counties

19 comprising the authority, or a private citizen residing
in the

20 authority.

21 (4) The terms of office of board members shall be
four years.

22 (5) Wherever a member of a board has a potential
conflict of

23 interest in an action before the board, the member shall
declare

24 to the board the nature of the potential conflict prior
to

25 ((participating in the action review. The board
shall, if the

26 potential conflict of interest, in the judgment of a
majority of

27 the board, may prevent the member from a fair and
objective review

28 of the case, remove the member from participation in
the action))

29 the board's review of the action, and shall refrain
from voting on

30 the action before the board.

31 (6) A member of the board of directors may not
work in any

32 capacity for an entity that is regulated by a local
air authority

33 of which the director is a member. If a member of a
board of

34 directors is offered a position of employment with an
entity that

35 is, or in the past two years has been, regulated by
the local air

36 authority of which the director is a member, the
member is

37 required to choose between continued service on the
board or the

38 employment position.

HB 1033 p. 2

_1 Sec. 2. RCW 70.94.130
and 1998 c 342 s 1 are each amended to read

_2 as follows:

_3 The board shall exercise all powers of the authority
except as

_4 otherwise provided. The board shall conduct its first
meeting

_5 within thirty days after all of its members have been
appointed or

_6 designated as provided in RCW 70.94.100. The board shall
meet at

_7 least ten times per year. All meetings shall be publicly
announced

_8 prior to their occurrence. All meetings shall be open to
the

_9 public. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum
for the

10 transaction of business and shall be necessary for any
action

11 taken by the board. The board shall elect from ((its
members)) the

12 elected officials on the board a chair and such
other officers as

13 may be necessary. Any member of the board may designate a
regular

14 alternate to serve on the board in his or her place with
the same

15 authority as the member when he or she is unable to
attend. In no

16 event may a regular alternate serve as the permanent
chair. Each

17 member of the board, or his or her representative, shall
receive

18 from the authority compensation consistent with such
authority's

19 rates (but not to exceed one thousand dollars per year) for
time

20 spent in the performance of duties under this chapter, plus
the

21 actual and necessary expenses incurred by the member in
such

22 performance. The board may appoint a control officer, and
any

23 other personnel, and shall determine their salaries, and
pay same,

24 together with any other proper indebtedness, from authority
funds.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1033