BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.94.743 and 1998 c
68 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Consistent with the
policy of the state to reduce outdoor burning to the greatest extent practical:

(a) Outdoor burning
shall not be allowed in any area of the state where federal or state ambient
air quality standards ((are)) have been exceeded for pollutants
emitted by outdoor burning.

(b) Outdoor burning
shall not be allowed in any ((urban growth area as defined by RCW
36.70A.030, or any)) city of the state having a population greater than ten
thousand people if such cities are threatened to exceed state or federal air
quality standards, and alternative disposal practices consistent with good
solid waste management are reasonably available or practices eliminating
production of organic refuse are reasonably available. In no event shall such
burning be allowed after December 31, 2000((, except that within the urban
growth areas for cities having a population of less than five thousand people,
that are neither within nor contiguous with any nonattainment or maintenance
area designated under the federal clean air act, in no event shall such burning
be allowed after December 31, 2006)).

(c) Outdoor burning
shall not be allowed in any urban growth area as defined by RCW 36.70A.030,
unless:

(i) The urban growth
area is within the jurisdiction of a local air authority and that local air
authority allows outdoor burning in the unincorporated portions of that urban
growth area, subject to the conditions of this section; or

(ii) The urban
growth area is not within the jurisdiction of a local air authority and the
county the urban growth area is within, after consultation with the department,
allows outdoor burning in the unincorporated portions of that urban growth
area, subject to the provisions of this section.

(d) A local air
authority or a county may not allow outdoor burning in an urban growth area
within or contiguous with any nonattainment area or maintenance area
established under the federal clean air act, within the incorporated portions
of an urban growth area, or within any portion of an urban growth area that has
a general population density of one thousand or more persons per square mile
after the effective date of this section if those portions are contiguous with
the incorporated portions of the urban growth area.

(e) Outdoor burning
shall not be allowed in any area of the state where it is expressly prohibited
by the local air authority with jurisdiction over that area. If no local air
authorities have jurisdiction, then the county with jurisdiction over the area
may expressly prohibit outdoor burning after consulting with the department.

(f)
Urban growth areas for cities having a population of five

thousand or fewer, that
are neither within nor contiguous with any nonattainment area or maintenance
area designated under the federal clean air act are not subject to the
provisions of this section until December 31, 2006.

(g)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, outdoor burning may be
allowed for the exclusive purpose of managing storm or flood-related debris.
The decision to allow burning shall be made by the entity with permitting
jurisdiction as determined under RCW 70.94.660 or 70.94.755. If outdoor
burning is allowed in areas subject to (a) or (b) of this subsection, a permit
shall be required, and a fee may be collected to cover the expenses of
administering and enforcing the permit. All conditions and restrictions
pursuant to RCW 70.94.750(1) and 70.94.775 apply to outdoor burning allowed
under this section.

(2) "Outdoor
burning" means the combustion of material of any type in an open fire or
in an outdoor container without providing for the control of combustion or the
control of emissions from the combustion. Local air authorities may adopt
rules regarding the use and kind of containers that may be used for outdoor burning
within their jurisdictions. Upon adoption, local rules adopted under this
subsection shall supersede any rule on the same subject issued by the
department or any fire district and may be less restrictive or more strict than
any rule on the same subject issued by the department or any fire district.

(3) This
section shall not apply to silvicultural burning used to improve or maintain
fire dependent ecosystems for rare plants or animals within state, federal, and
private natural area preserves, natural resource conservation areas, parks, and
other wildlife areas.

--- END ---