BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.44.170 and 1986 c
211 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person moving a
mobile home as defined in RCW 46.04.302 upon public highways of the state must
obtain a special permit from the department of transportation and local authorities
pursuant to RCW 46.44.090 and 46.44.093 and shall pay the proper fee as
prescribed by RCW 46.44.0941 and 46.44.096.

(2) A special permit
issued as provided in subsection (1) of this section for the movement of any
mobile home shall not be valid until the county treasurer of the county in
which the mobile home is located shall endorse or attach ((thereto his))
a certificate that all property taxes which are a lien or which are
delinquent, or both, upon the mobile home being moved have been satisfied. Further,
any mobile home required to have a special movement permit under this section
shall display an easily recognizable decal((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, endorsement or certification by the county treasurer and the
display of ((said)) the decal is not required: (a) When a
mobile home is to enter the state or is being moved from a manufacturer or
distributor to a retail sales outlet or directly to the purchaser's designated
location or between retail and sales outlets; or (b) when a mobile home is being
moved by a landlord as defined in RCW 59.20.030 after (i) the mobile home has
been abandoned as defined in RCW 59.20.030; or (ii) a final judgment for
restitution of the premises under RCW 59.18.410 has been executed in favor of
the landlord with regard to the mobile home. It shall be the
responsibility of the owner of the mobile home or the agent to obtain such
endorsement and decal from the county treasurer ((and said decal)).

(3) Nothing ((herein))
in this section should be construed as prohibiting the issuance of
vehicle license plates for a mobile home, but no such plates shall be issued
unless the mobile home for which such plates are sought has been listed for
property tax purposes in the county in which it is principally located and the
appropriate fee for such license has been paid.

(4) The
department of transportation and local authorities are authorized to adopt
reasonable rules for implementing the provisions of this section. The
department of transportation shall adopt rules specifying the design,
reflective characteristics, annual coloration, and for the uniform
implementation of the decal required by this section.

--- END ---