BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that enabling the

_6 citizens of Washington to have loved ones contacted by
emergency

_7 services personnel in the case of an accident is a matter
of the

_8 highest public good. The legislature therefore enacts
this act to

_9 assist emergency services personnel in contacting the
loved ones

10 of Washington citizens who have been involved in
accidents.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.20

12 RCW to read as follows:

13 The department of licensing shall provide a line on the
back

14 side of each driver's license labeled "emergency
contact

15 information," with sufficient space for a licensee to
fill in a

16 name and telephone number. The department shall notify the

17 recipients of drivers' licenses either orally or in writing
at the

p. 1 HB
1038

_1 time of the issuance of the license of the existence of
the line

_2 and shall notify the recipients that the purpose of the
line is to

_3 allow licensees to fill in the name and telephone number
of a

_4 person that the recipient would like contacted in the
case of an

_5 emergency.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1038 p. 2