BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW 7.68.020
and 1997 c 249 s 1 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 The following words and phrases as used in this chapter
have

_8 the meanings set forth in this section unless the context

_9 otherwise requires.

10 (1) "Department" means the department of
labor and industries.

11 (2) "Criminal act" means an act committed or
attempted in this

12 state which is punishable as a felony or gross misdemeanor
under

13 the laws of this state, or an act committed outside the
state of

14 Washington against a resident of the state of Washington
which

15 would be compensable had it occurred inside this state; and
the

16 crime occurred in a state which does not have a crime
victims

17 compensation program, for which the victim is eligible as
set

18 forth in the Washington compensation law, or an act of
terrorism

p. 1 HB
1040

_1 as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2331, as it exists on May
2, 1997,

_2 committed outside of the United States against a
resident of the

_3 state of Washington, except as follows:

_4 (a) The operation of a motor vehicle, motorcycle,
train, boat,

_5 or aircraft in violation of law does not constitute a
"criminal

_6 act" unless:

_7 (i) The injury or death was intentionally inflicted;

_8 (ii) The operation thereof was part of the
commission of

_9 another non-vehicular criminal act as defined in this section;

10 (iii) The death or injury was the result of the
operation of a

11 motor vehicle after July 24, 1983, and a preponderance
of the

12 evidence establishes that the death was the result of
vehicular

13 homicide under RCW 46.61.520, or a conviction of
vehicular assault

14 under RCW 46.61.522, has been obtained: PROVIDED, That
in cases

15 where a probable criminal defendant has died in
perpetration of

16 vehicular assault or, in cases where the perpetrator
of the

17 vehicular assault is unascertainable because he or
she left the

18 scene of the accident in violation of RCW 46.52.020
or, because of

19 physical or mental infirmity or disability the
perpetrator is

20 incapable of standing trial for vehicular assault, the
department

21 may, by a preponderance of the evidence, establish that
a

22 vehicular assault had been committed and authorize
benefits; or

23 (iv) The injury or death was caused by
a driver in violation of

24 RCW 46.61.502;

25 (b) Neither an acquittal in a criminal prosecution
nor the

26 absence of any such prosecution is admissible in any
claim or

27 proceeding under this chapter as evidence of the
noncriminal

28 character of the acts giving rise to such claim or
proceeding,

29 except as provided for in subsection (2)(a)(iii) of this
section;

30 (c) Evidence of a criminal conviction arising from
acts which

31 are the basis for a claim or proceeding under this
chapter is

32 admissible in such claim or proceeding for the limited purpose
of

33 proving the criminal character of the acts; and

34 (d) Acts which, but for the insanity or mental
irresponsibility

35 of the perpetrator, would constitute criminal conduct
are deemed

36 to be criminal conduct within the meaning of this chapter.

37 (3) "Victim" means a person who suffers
bodily injury or death

38 as a proximate result of a criminal act of another
person, the

HB 1040 p. 2

_1 victim's own good faith and reasonable effort to prevent
a

_2 criminal act, or his good faith effort to apprehend a
person

_3 reasonably suspected of engaging in a criminal act. For
the

_4 purposes of receiving benefits pursuant to this chapter,
"victim"

_5 is interchangeable with "employee" or
"workman" as defined in

_6 chapter 51.08 RCW as now or hereafter amended.

_7 (4) "Child," "accredited
school," "dependent," "beneficiary,"

_8 "average monthly wage," "director,"
"injury," "invalid,"

_9 "permanent partial disability," and
"permanent total disability"

10 have the meanings assigned to them in chapter 51.08 RCW
as now or

11 hereafter amended.

12 (5) "Gainfully employed" means engaging on
a regular and

13 continuous basis in a lawful activity from which a
person derives

14 a livelihood.

15 (6) "Private insurance" means any source
of recompense provided

16 by contract available as a result of the claimed injury
or death

17 at the time of such injury or death, or which becomes
available

18 any time thereafter.

19 (7) "Public insurance" means any source of
recompense provided

20 by statute, state or federal, available as a result of
the claimed

21 injury or death at the time of such injury or death, or
which

22 becomes available any time thereafter.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1040