BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
10.14.020 and 1999 c 27 s 4 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
definitions

_8 in this section apply throughout this chapter.

_9 (1) "Unlawful harassment" means a knowing
and willful course of

10 conduct directed at a specific person which seriously
alarms,

11 annoys, harasses, or is detrimental to such person, and
which

12 serves no legitimate or lawful purpose. The course of
conduct shall

13 be such as would cause a reasonable person to suffer
substantial

14 emotional distress, and shall actually cause substantial
emotional

15 distress to the petitioner, or, when the course of
conduct ((is

16 contact by a person over age eighteen that))
would cause a

17 reasonable parent to fear for the well-being of their
child.

18 (2) "Course of conduct" means a pattern of
conduct composed of

p. 1 2SHB
1041

_1 a series of acts over a period of time, however short,
evidencing

_2 a continuity of purpose. "Course of conduct"
includes, in addition

_3 to any other form of communication, contact, or conduct,
the

_4 sending of an electronic communication.
Constitutionally protected

_5 activity is not included within the meaning of
"course of

_6 conduct."

_7 Sec. 2. RCW
10.14.040 and 1995 c 292 s 2 and 1995 c 127 s 2 are

_8 each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

_9 There shall exist an action known as a petition for
an order

10 for protection in cases of unlawful harassment.

11 (1) A petition for relief shall allege the existence
of

12 harassment and shall be accompanied by an affidavit made
under

13 oath stating the specific facts and circumstances from
which

14 relief is sought.

15 (2) A petition for relief may be made regardless of
whether or

16 not there is a pending lawsuit, complaint, petition, or
other

17 action between the parties.

18 (3) All court clerks' offices shall make available
simplified

19 forms and instructional brochures. Any assistance or
information

20 provided by clerks under this section does not
constitute the

21 practice of law and clerks are not responsible for
incorrect

22 information contained in a petition.

23 (4) Filing fees are set in RCW 36.18.020, but no
filing fee may

24 be charged for a petition filed in an existing action or
under an

25 existing cause number brought under this chapter in the

26 jurisdiction where the relief is sought. Forms and
instructional

27 brochures shall be provided free of charge.

28 (5) A person is not required to post a bond to
obtain relief in

29 any proceeding under this section.

30 (6) The parent or guardian of a child under age
eighteen may

31 petition for an order of protection to restrain a person
((over

32 age eighteen)) from contact with that child upon
a showing that

33 contact with the person to be enjoined is detrimental to
the

34 welfare of the child.

35 Sec. 3. RCW
10.14.120 and 1989 c 373 s 14 are each amended to read

36 as follows:

2SHB 1041 p. 2

_1 Any willful disobedience by ((the respondent))
a respondent age

_2 eighteen years or over of any temporary
antiharassment protection

_3 order or civil antiharassment protection order issued
under this

_4 chapter subjects the respondent to criminal penalties
under this

_5 chapter. Any respondent age eighteen years or over
who willfully

_6 disobeys the terms of any order issued under this
chapter may

_7 also, in the court's discretion, be found in contempt of
court and

_8 subject to penalties under chapter 7.21 RCW. Any respondent
under

_9 the age of eighteen years who willfully disobeys the
terms of an

10 order issued under this chapter may, in the court's
discretion, be

11 found in contempt of court and subject to the
sanction specified

12 in RCW 7.21.030(4).

13 Sec. 4. RCW
10.14.170 and 1987 c 280 s 17 are each amended to read

14 as follows:

15 Any respondent age eighteen years or over who
willfully

16 disobeys any civil antiharassment protection order
issued pursuant

17 to this chapter shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

18 Sec. 5. RCW 7.21.030
and 1998 c 296 s 36 are each amended to read

19 as follows:

20 (1) The court may initiate a proceeding to impose a
remedial

21 sanction on its own motion or on the motion of a person
aggrieved

22 by a contempt of court in the proceeding to which the
contempt is

23 related. Except as provided in RCW 7.21.050, the court,
after

24 notice and hearing, may impose a remedial sanction
authorized by

25 this chapter.

26 (2) If the court finds that the person has failed or
refused to

27 perform an act that is yet within the person's power to
perform,

28 the court may find the person in contempt of court and
impose one

29 or more of the following remedial sanctions:

30 (a) Imprisonment if the contempt of court is of a
type defined

31 in RCW 7.21.010(1) (b) through (d). The imprisonment
may extend

32 only so long as it serves a coercive purpose.

33 (b) A forfeiture not to exceed two thousand dollars
for each

34 day the contempt of court continues.

35 (c) An order designed to ensure compliance with a
prior order

36 of the court.

p. 3 2SHB
1041

_1 (d) Any other remedial sanction other than the
sanctions

_2 specified in (a) through (c) of this subsection if the
court

_3 expressly finds that those sanctions would be
ineffectual to

_4 terminate a continuing contempt of court.

_5 (e) In cases under chapters 13.32A, 13.34, and
28A.225 RCW,

_6 commitment to juvenile detention for a period of time
not to

_7 exceed seven days. This sanction may be imposed in
addition to, or

_8 as an alternative to, any other remedial sanction
authorized by

_9 this chapter. This remedy is specifically determined to
be a

10 remedial sanction.

11 (3) The court may, in addition to the remedial
sanctions set

12 forth in subsection (2) of this section, order a person
found in

13 contempt of court to pay a party for any losses suffered
by the

14 party as a result of the contempt and any costs incurred
in

15 connection with the contempt proceeding, including
reasonable

16 attorney's fees.

17 (4) If the court finds that a person under the
age of eighteen

18 years has willfully disobeyed the terms of an order
issued under

19 chapter 10.14 RCW, the court may find the person in
contempt of

20 court and may, as a sole sanction for such contempt,
commit the

21 person to juvenile detention for a period of time not
to exceed

22 seven days.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. If specific funding
for the purposes of

24 this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter
number, is not

25 provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this

26 act is null and void.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

2SHB 1041 p. 4