BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 70.54

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 The legislature finds and declares that the
practices of

_8 electrology and tattooing involve an invasive procedure
with the

_9 use of needles and instruments which may be dangerous
when

10 improperly sterilized presenting a risk of infecting the
client

11 with bloodborne pathogens such as HIV and Hepatitis B.
It is in the

12 interests of the public health, safety, and welfare to
establish

13 requirements for the sterilization procedures in the
commercial

14 practices of electrology and tattooing in this state.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 70.54

16 RCW to read as follows:

p. 1 SHB
1042

_1 The definitions in this section apply throughout
sections 1, 3,

_2 and 4 of this act unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

_3 (1) "Electrologist" means a person who
practices the business

_4 of electrology for a fee.

_5 (2) "Electrology" means the process by
which hair is

_6 permanently removed through the utilization of solid
needle/probe

_7 electrode epilation, including thermolysis, being of
shortwave,

_8 high frequency type, and including electrolysis, being
of galvanic

_9 type, or a combination of both which is accomplished by
a

10 superimposed or sequential blend.

11 (3) "Tattoo artist" means a person who
practices the business

12 of tattooing for a fee.

13 (4) "Tattooing" means the indelible mark,
figure, or decorative

14 design introduced by insertion of nontoxic dyes or
pigments into

15 or under the subcutaneous portion of the skin upon the
body of a

16 live human being for cosmetic or figurative purposes.

17 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 70.54

18 RCW to read as follows:

19 The secretary of health shall adopt by rule
requirements for

20 the sterilization of needles and instruments by
electrologists and

21 tattoo artists in accordance with nationally recognized

22 professional standards. The secretary shall consider
the universal

23 precautions for infection control, as recommended by the
United

24 States centers for disease control, and guidelines for
infection

25 control, as recommended by the national environmental
health

26 association and the alliance of professional tattooists,
in the

27 adoption of these sterilization requirements.

28

29 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is
added to chapter 70.54

30 RCW to read as follows:

31 (1) Any person who practices electrology or
tattooing shall

32 comply with the rules adopted by the department of
health under

33 section 3 of this act.

34 (2) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1042 p. 2