BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.40 RCW under the subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as
follows:

Members who reach
thirty years of service before or during the period from July 1, 2001, to June
30, 2005, may earn additional service credit towards their retirement benefit
during the period from July 1, 2001, to June 30, 2005, of two percent per year
to a maximum of eight percent in excess of that provided by RCW 41.40.185.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Members who made the
irrevocable election as provided by RCW 41.40.191 before the effective date of
this act have a one-time opportunity to rescind that election by notifying the
department in writing by December 31, 2001.

---
END ---