BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.40.023 and 1999 c
286 s 2 and 1999 c 244 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Membership in the
retirement system shall consist of all regularly compensated employees and
appointive and elective officials of employers, as defined in this chapter,
with the following exceptions:

(1) Persons in ineligible
positions;

(2) Employees of the
legislature except the officers thereof elected by the members of the senate
and the house and legislative committees, unless membership of such employees
be authorized by the said committee;

(3)(a) Persons holding
elective offices or persons appointed directly by the governor: PROVIDED, That
such persons shall have the option of applying for membership during such
periods of employment: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That any persons holding or who have
held elective offices or persons appointed by the governor who are members in
the retirement system and who have, prior to becoming such members, previously
held an elective office, and did not at the start of such initial or successive
terms of office exercise their option to become members, may apply for
membership to be effective during such term or terms of office, and shall be
allowed to establish the service credit applicable to such term or terms of
office upon payment of the employee contributions therefor by the employee with
interest as determined by the director and employer contributions therefor by
the employer or employee with interest as determined by the director: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That all contributions with interest submitted by the
employee under this subsection shall be placed in the employee's individual
account in the employee's savings fund and be treated as any other contribution
made by the employee, with the exception that any contributions submitted by
the employee in payment of the employer's obligation, together with the
interest the director may apply to the employer's contribution, shall not be
considered part of the member's annuity for any purpose except withdrawal of
contributions;

(b) A member holding
elective office who has elected to apply for membership pursuant to (a) of this
subsection and who later wishes to be eligible for a retirement allowance shall
have the option of ending his or her membership in the retirement system. A
member wishing to end his or her membership under this subsection must file, on
a form supplied by the department, a statement indicating that the member
agrees to irrevocably abandon any claim for service for future periods served
as an elected official. A member who receives more than fifteen thousand
dollars per year in compensation for his or her elective service, adjusted
annually for inflation by the director, is not eligible for the option provided
by this subsection (3)(b);

(4) Employees holding
membership in, or receiving pension benefits under, any retirement plan
operated wholly or in part by an agency of the state or political subdivision
thereof, or who are by reason of their current employment contributing to or
otherwise establishing the right to receive benefits from any such retirement
plan except as follows:

(a) In any case where
the retirement system has in existence an agreement with another retirement
system in connection with exchange of service credit or an agreement whereby
members can retain service credit in more than one system, such an employee
shall be allowed membership rights should the agreement so provide;

(b) An employee shall
be allowed membership if otherwise eligible while receiving survivor's
benefits;

(c) An employee shall
not either before or after June 7, 1984, be excluded from membership or denied
service credit pursuant to this subsection solely on account of: (i)
Membership in the plan created under chapter 2.14 RCW; or (ii) enrollment under
the relief and compensation provisions or the pension provisions of the
volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension fund under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(d) Except as provided
in RCW 41.40.109, on or after July 25, 1999, an employee shall not be excluded
from membership or denied service credit pursuant to this subsection solely on
account of participation in a defined contribution pension plan qualified under
section 401 of the internal revenue code;

(e) Employees who have
been reported in the retirement system prior to July 25, 1999, and who
participated during the same period of time in a defined contribution pension
plan qualified under section 401 of the internal revenue code and operated
wholly or in part by the employer, shall not be excluded from previous
retirement system membership and service credit on account of such
participation;

(5) Patient and inmate
help in state charitable, penal, and correctional institutions;

(6) "Members"
of a state veterans' home or state soldiers' home;

(7) Persons employed by
an institution of higher learning or community college, primarily as an
incident to and in furtherance of their education or training, or the education
or training of a spouse;

(8) Employees of an
institution of higher learning or community college during the period of
service necessary to establish eligibility for membership in the retirement
plans operated by such institutions;

(9) Persons rendering
professional services to an employer on a fee, retainer, or contract basis or
when the income from these services is less than fifty percent of the gross
income received from the person's practice of a profession;

(10) Persons appointed
after April 1, 1963, by the liquor control board as agency vendors;

(11) Employees of a
labor guild, association, or organization: PROVIDED, That elective officials
and employees of a labor guild, association, or organization which qualifies as
an employer within this chapter shall have the option of applying for
membership;

(12) Retirement system
retirees: PROVIDED, That following reemployment in an eligible position, a
retiree may elect to prospectively become a member of the retirement system if
otherwise eligible;

(13) Persons employed
by or appointed or elected as an official of a first class city that has its
own retirement system: PROVIDED, That any member elected or appointed to an
elective office on or after April 1, 1971, shall have the option of continuing
as a member of this system in lieu of becoming a member of the city system. A
member who elects to continue as a member of this system shall pay the appropriate
member contributions and the city shall pay the employer contributions at the
rates prescribed by this chapter. The city shall also transfer to this system
all of such member's accumulated contributions together with such further
amounts as necessary to equal all employee and employer contributions which
would have been paid into this system on account of such service with the city
and thereupon the member shall be granted credit for all such service. Any
city that becomes an employer as defined in RCW 41.40.010(4) as the result of
an individual's election under this subsection shall not be required to have
all employees covered for retirement under the provisions of this chapter.
Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a city of the first class with its
own retirement system from: (a) Transferring all of its current employees to
the retirement system established under this chapter, or (b) allowing newly
hired employees the option of continuing coverage under the retirement system
established by this chapter.

Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, persons transferring from employment with a
first class city of over four hundred thousand population that has its own
retirement system to employment with the state department of agriculture may
elect to remain within the retirement system of such city and the state shall
pay the employer contributions for such persons at like rates as prescribed for
employers of other members of such system;

(14) Employees who (a)
are not citizens of the United States, (b) do not reside in the United States,
and (c) perform duties outside of the United States;

(15) Employees who (a)
are not citizens of the United States, (b) are not covered by chapter 41.48
RCW, (c) are not excluded from membership under this chapter or chapter 41.04
RCW, (d) are residents of this state, and (e) make an irrevocable election to
be excluded from membership, in writing, which is submitted to the director
within thirty days after employment in an eligible position;

(16) Employees who are
citizens of the United States and who reside and perform duties for an employer
outside of the United States: PROVIDED, That unless otherwise excluded under
this chapter or chapter 41.04 RCW, the employee may apply for membership (a)
within thirty days after employment in an eligible position and membership
service credit shall be granted from the first day of membership service, and
(b) after this thirty-day period, but membership service credit shall be
granted only if payment is made for the noncredited membership service under
RCW 41.50.165(2), otherwise service shall be from the date of application;

(17) The city manager
or chief administrative officer of a city or town, other than a retiree, who
serves at the pleasure of an appointing authority: PROVIDED, That such persons
shall have the option of applying for membership within thirty days from date
of their appointment to such positions. Persons serving in such positions as
of April 4, 1986, shall continue to be members in the retirement system unless
they notify the director in writing prior to December 31, 1986, of their desire
to withdraw from membership in the retirement system. A member who withdraws
from membership in the system under this section shall receive a refund of the member's
accumulated contributions.

Persons serving in such
positions who have not opted for membership within the specified thirty days,
may do so by paying the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2) for the period
from the date of their appointment to the date of acceptance into membership;

(18) Persons serving
as: (a) The chief administrative officer of a public utility district as
defined in RCW 54.16.100; (b) the chief administrative officer of a port
district formed under chapter 53.04 RCW; or (c) the chief administrative
officer of a county who serves at the pleasure of an appointing authority:
PROVIDED, That such persons shall have the option of applying for membership
within thirty days from the date of their appointment to such positions. Persons
serving in such positions as of July 25, 1999, shall continue to be members in
the retirement system unless they notify the director in writing prior to
December 31, 1999, of their desire to withdraw from membership in the
retirement system. A member who withdraws from membership in the system under
this section shall receive a refund of the member's accumulated contributions
upon termination of employment or as otherwise consistent with the plan's tax
qualification status as defined in internal revenue code section 401.

Persons serving in such
positions who have not opted for membership within the specified thirty days,
may do so at a later date by paying the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2)
for the period from the date of their appointment to the date of acceptance
into membership;

(19) Persons enrolled
in state-approved apprenticeship programs, authorized under chapter 49.04 RCW,
and who are employed by local governments to earn hours to complete such
apprenticeship programs, if the employee is a member of a union-sponsored
retirement plan and is making contributions to such a retirement plan or if the
employee is a member of a Taft-Hartley retirement plan;

(20)
Beginning on the effective date of this section, persons employed exclusively
as trainers or trainees in resident apprentice training programs operated by
housing authorities authorized under chapter 35.82 RCW, if (a) the trainer or
trainee is a member of a union-sponsored retirement plan and is making
contributions to such a retirement plan or (b) if the employee is a member of a
Taft-Hartley retirement plan.

--- END ---