BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.26 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No later than July
1, 2002, the department shall adopt rules to allow a member who meets the criteria
set forth in subsection (2) of this section to choose an actuarially equivalent
benefit that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death,
such portion of the member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by
rule designates shall be continued throughout the life of their postretirement
spouse.

(2) To choose an
actuarially equivalent benefit according to subsection (1) of this section, a
member shall:

(a) Have the retirement
allowance payable to the retiree not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a
property division obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670;

(b) Have no qualified
ex spouse under RCW 41.26.162; and

(c) Choose an
actuarially reduced benefit during a one-year period beginning one year after
the date of the postretirement marriage.

(3) A member who
entered into a postretirement marriage prior to the effective date of the rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection and satisfies the conditions of subsection
(2)(a) and (b) of this section has one year to designate their spouse as a
survivor beneficiary following the adoption of the rules.

(4) No
benefit provided to a child survivor beneficiary under RCW 41.26.160 or
41.26.161 is affected or reduced by the member's selection of the actuarially
reduced spousal survivor benefit provided by this section.

--- END ---