BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to incorporate into the reorganization of chapter 9.94A RCW adopted
by chapter 28, Laws of 2000 amendments adopted to RCW 9.94A.120 during the 2000
legislative session that did not take cognizance of the reorganization. In
addition, it is the intent of the legislature to correct any additional
incorrect cross-references and to simplify the codification of provisions
within chapter 9.94A RCW.

The legislature does
not intend to make, and no provision of this act may be construed as making, a
substantive change in the sentencing reform act.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.120 and 2000 c
226 s 2, 2000 c 43 s 1, and 2000 c 28 s 5 are each reenacted to read as
follows:

(1) When a person is
convicted of a felony, the court shall impose punishment as provided in this
chapter.

(2)(a) The court shall
impose a sentence as provided in the following sections and as applicable in
the case:

(i) Unless another term
of confinement applies, the court shall impose a sentence within the standard
sentence range established in RCW 9.94A.310;

(ii) RCW 9.94A.700 and
9.94A.705, relating to community placement;

(iii) RCW 9.94A.710 and
9.94A.715, relating to community custody;

(iv) RCW 9.94A.383,
relating to community custody for offenders whose term of confinement is one
year or less;

(v) RCW 9.94A.560,
relating to persistent offenders;

(vi) RCW 9.94A.590,
relating to mandatory minimum terms;

(vii) RCW 9.94A.650,
relating to the first-time offender waiver;

(viii) RCW 9.94A.660,
relating to the drug offender sentencing alternative;

(ix) RCW 9.94A.670,
relating to the special sex offender sentencing alternative;

(x) RCW 9.94A.390,
relating to exceptional sentences;

(xi) RCW 9.94A.400,
relating to consecutive and concurrent sentences.

(b) If a standard
sentence range has not been established for the offender's crime, the court
shall impose a determinate sentence which may include not more than one year of
confinement; community service work; until July 1, 2000, a term of community
supervision not to exceed one year and on and after July 1, 2000, a term of
community custody not to exceed one year, subject to conditions and sanctions
as authorized in RCW 9.94A.710 (2) and (3); and/or other legal financial
obligations. The court may impose a sentence which provides more than one year
of confinement if the court finds reasons justifying an exceptional sentence as
provided in RCW 9.94A.390.

(3) If the court
imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty days or less, the court may,
in its discretion, specify that the sentence be served on consecutive or
intermittent days. A sentence requiring more than thirty days of confinement
shall be served on consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule
court-ordered intermittent sentences as space permits.

(4) If a sentence
imposed includes payment of a legal financial obligation, it shall be imposed
as provided in RCW 9.94A.140, 9.94A.142, and 9.94A.145.

(5) Except as provided
under RCW 9.94A.140(4) and 9.94A.142(4), a court may not impose a sentence
providing for a term of confinement or community supervision, community
placement, or community custody which exceeds the statutory maximum for the
crime as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(6) The sentencing
court shall give the offender credit for all confinement time served before the
sentencing if that confinement was solely in regard to the offense for which
the offender is being sentenced.

(7) The court shall
order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.140 and 9.94A.142.

(8) As a part of any
sentence, the court may impose and enforce crime-related prohibitions and
affirmative conditions as provided in this chapter.

(9) The court may order
an offender whose sentence includes community placement or community
supervision to undergo a mental status evaluation and to participate in
available outpatient mental health treatment, if the court finds that
reasonable grounds exist to believe that the offender is a mentally ill person
as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and that this condition is likely to have
influenced the offense. An order requiring mental status evaluation or
treatment must be based on a presentence report and, if applicable, mental
status evaluations that have been filed with the court to determine the
offender's competency or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may
order additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.

(10) In any sentence of
partial confinement, the court may require the offender to serve the partial
confinement in work release, in a program of home detention, on work crew, or
in a combined program of work crew and home detention.

(11) In sentencing an
offender convicted of a crime of domestic violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020,
if the offender has a minor child, or if the victim of the offense for which
the offender was convicted has a minor child, the court may, as part of any
term of community supervision, community placement, or community custody, order
the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator program approved
under RCW 26.50.150.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.145 and 2000 c
226 s 4 and 2000 c 28 s 31 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a person
is convicted of a felony, the court may order the payment of a legal financial
obligation as part of the sentence. The court must on either the judgment and
sentence or on a subsequent order to pay, designate the total amount of a legal
financial obligation and segregate this amount among the separate assessments
made for restitution, costs, fines, and other assessments required by law. On
the same order, the court is also to set a sum that the offender is required to
pay on a monthly basis towards satisfying the legal financial obligation. If
the court fails to set the offender monthly payment amount, the department
shall set the amount. Upon receipt of an offender's monthly payment,
restitution shall be paid prior to any payments of other monetary obligations.
After restitution is satisfied, the county clerk shall distribute the payment
proportionally among all other fines, costs, and assessments imposed, unless
otherwise ordered by the court.

(2) If the court
determines that the offender, at the time of sentencing, has the means to pay
for the cost of incarceration, the court may require the offender to pay for
the cost of incarceration at a rate of fifty dollars per day of incarceration.
Payment of other court-ordered financial obligations, including all legal
financial obligations and costs of supervision shall take precedence over the
payment of the cost of incarceration ordered by the court. All funds recovered
from offenders for the cost of incarceration in the county jail shall be
remitted to the county and the costs of incarceration in a prison shall be
remitted to the department.

(3) The court may add
to the judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay a statement that a
notice of payroll deduction is to be issued immediately. If the court chooses
not to order the immediate issuance of a notice of payroll deduction at
sentencing, the court shall add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent
order to pay a statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued or
other income-withholding action may be taken, without further notice to the
offender if a monthly court-ordered legal financial obligation payment is not
paid when due, and an amount equal to or greater than the amount payable for
one month is owed.

If a judgment and
sentence or subsequent order to pay does not include the statement that a
notice of payroll deduction may be issued or other income-withholding action
may be taken if a monthly legal financial obligation payment is past due, the
department may serve a notice on the offender stating such requirements and
authorizations. Service shall be by personal service or any form of mail
requiring a return receipt.

(4) Independent of the
department, the party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed
shall have the authority to use any other remedies available to the party or
entity to collect the legal financial obligation. These remedies include enforcement
in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action by the party or entity to
whom the legal financial obligation is owed. Restitution collected through
civil enforcement must be paid through the registry of the court and must be
distributed proportionately according to each victim's loss when there is more
than one victim. The judgment and sentence shall identify the party or entity
to whom restitution is owed so that the state, party, or entity may enforce the
judgment. If restitution is ordered pursuant to RCW 9.94A.140(6) or
9.94A.142(6) to a victim of rape of a child or a victim's child born from the
rape, the Washington state child support registry shall be identified as the
party to whom payments must be made. Restitution obligations arising from the
rape of a child in the first, second, or third degree that result in the
pregnancy of the victim may be enforced for the time periods provided under RCW
9.94A.140(6) and 9.94A.142(6). All other legal financial obligations for an
offense committed prior to July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time during the
ten-year period following the offender's release from total confinement or
within ten years of entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period ends
later. Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the superior
court may extend the criminal judgment an additional ten years for payment of
legal financial obligations including crime victims' assessments. All other
legal financial obligations for an offense committed on or after July 1, 2000,
may be enforced at any time the offender remains under the court's
jurisdiction. For an offense committed on or after July 1, 2000, the court
shall retain jurisdiction over the offender, for purposes of the offender's
compliance with payment of the legal financial obligations, until the
obligation is completely satisfied, regardless of the statutory maximum for the
crime. The department of corrections shall supervise the offender's
compliance with payment of the legal financial obligations for ten years
following the entry of the judgment and sentence, or ten years following the
offender's release from total confinement, whichever period ends later. The
department is not responsible for supervision of the offender during any
subsequent period of time the offender remains under the court's jurisdiction.

(5) In order to assist
the court in setting a monthly sum that the offender must pay during the period
of supervision, the offender is required to report to the department for
purposes of preparing a recommendation to the court. When reporting, the
offender is required, under oath, to respond truthfully and honestly to all
questions concerning present, past, and future earning capabilities and the
location and nature of all property or financial assets. The offender is
further required to bring all documents requested by the department.

(6) After completing
the investigation, the department shall make a report to the court on the
amount of the monthly payment that the offender should be required to make
towards a satisfied legal financial obligation.

(7) During the period
of supervision, the department may make a recommendation to the court that the
offender's monthly payment schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in
financial circumstances. If the department sets the monthly payment amount,
the department may modify the monthly payment amount without the matter being
returned to the court. During the period of supervision, the department may
require the offender to report to the department for the purposes of reviewing
the appropriateness of the collection schedule for the legal financial
obligation. During this reporting, the offender is required under oath to
respond truthfully and honestly to all questions concerning earning capabilities
and the location and nature of all property or financial assets. The offender
shall bring all documents requested by the department in order to prepare the
collection schedule.

(8) After the judgment
and sentence or payment order is entered, the department is authorized, for any
period of supervision, to collect the legal financial obligation from the
offender. Any amount collected by the department shall be remitted daily to
the county clerk for the purpose of disbursements. The department is
authorized to accept credit cards as payment for a legal financial obligation,
and any costs incurred related to accepting credit card payments shall be the
responsibility of the offender.

(9) The department or
any obligee of the legal financial obligation may seek a mandatory wage
assignment for the purposes of obtaining satisfaction for the legal financial
obligation pursuant to RCW 9.94A.2001.

(10) The requirement
that the offender pay a monthly sum towards a legal financial obligation
constitutes a condition or requirement of a sentence and the offender is
subject to the penalties for noncompliance as provided in RCW 9.94A.200,
9.94A.205, or 9.94A.207.

(11) The county clerk
shall provide the department with individualized monthly billings for each
offender with an unsatisfied legal financial obligation and shall provide the
department with notice of payments by such offenders no less frequently than
weekly.

(12) The department may
arrange for the collection of unpaid legal financial obligations through the
county clerk, or through another entity if the clerk does not assume
responsibility for collection. The costs for collection services shall be paid
by the offender.

(13) Nothing in this
chapter makes the department, the state, or any of its employees, agents, or
other persons acting on their behalf liable under any circumstances for the
payment of these legal financial obligations.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.660 and 2000 c
28 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An offender is
eligible for the special drug offender sentencing alternative if:

(a) The offender is
convicted of a felony that is not a violent offense or sex offense and the
violation does not involve a sentence enhancement under RCW 9.94A.310 (3) or
(4);

(b) The offender has no
current or prior convictions for a sex offense or violent offense in this
state, another state, or the United States;

(c) For a violation of
the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal
solicitation to commit such a violation under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense
involved only a small quantity of the particular controlled substance as
determined by the judge upon consideration of such factors as the weight,
purity, packaging, sale price, and street value of the controlled substance;
and

(d) The offender has
not been found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a
deportation detainer or order and does not become subject to a deportation
order during the period of the sentence.

(2) If the standard
sentence range is greater than one year and the sentencing court determines
that the offender is eligible for this alternative and that the offender and
the community will benefit from the use of the alternative, the judge may waive
imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range and impose a
sentence that must include a period of total confinement in a state facility
for one-half of the midpoint of the standard sentence range. During
incarceration in the state facility, offenders sentenced under this subsection
shall undergo a comprehensive substance abuse assessment and receive, within
available resources, treatment services appropriate for the offender. The
treatment services shall be designed by the division of alcohol and substance
abuse of the department of social and health services, in cooperation with the
department of corrections.

The court shall also
impose:

(a) The remainder of
the midpoint of the standard range as a term of community custody which must
include appropriate substance abuse treatment in a program that has been
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of
social and health services;

(b) Crime-related
prohibitions including a condition not to use illegal controlled substances; ((and))

(c) A requirement to
submit to urinalysis or other testing to monitor that status; and

(d) A term of
community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.715 to be imposed upon failure to
complete or administrative termination from the special drug offender
sentencing alternative program.

The court may prohibit
the offender from using alcohol or controlled substances and may require that
the monitoring for controlled substances be conducted by the department or by a
treatment alternatives to street crime program or a comparable court or
agency-referred program. The offender may be required to pay thirty dollars
per month while on community custody to offset the cost of monitoring. In
addition, the court shall impose three or more of the following conditions:

(i) Devote time to a
specific employment or training;

(ii) Remain within
prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the community
corrections officer before any change in the offender's address or employment;

(iii) Report as
directed to a community corrections officer;

(iv) Pay all
court-ordered legal financial obligations;

(v) Perform community
service work;

(vi) Stay out of areas
designated by the sentencing court;

(vii) Such other
conditions as the court may require such as affirmative conditions.

(3) If the offender
violates any of the sentence conditions in subsection (2) of this section or
is found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a deportation
order, a violation hearing shall be held by the department unless waived by
the offender.

(a) If the
department finds that conditions have been willfully violated, the offender may
be reclassified to serve the remaining balance of the original sentence.

(b) If the
department finds that the offender is subject to a valid deportation order, the
department may administratively terminate the offender from the program and
reclassify the offender to serve the remaining balance of the original
sentence.

(4) The department
shall determine the rules for calculating the value of a day fine based on the
offender's income and reasonable obligations which the offender has for the
support of the offender and any dependents. These rules shall be developed in
consultation with the administrator for the courts, the office of financial
management, and the commission.

(5) An offender who
fails to complete the special drug offender sentencing alternative program or
who is administratively terminated from the program shall be reclassified to
serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence as ordered by the sentencing
court and shall be subject to all rules relating to earned release time. An
offender who violates any conditions of supervision as defined by the
department shall be sanctioned. Sanctions may include, but are not limited to,
reclassifying the offender to serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence
as ordered by the sentencing court. If an offender is reclassified to serve
the unexpired term of his or her sentence, the offender shall be subject to all
rules relating to earned release time.

Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.715 and 2000 c
28 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a court
sentences a person to the custody of the department for a sex offense, a
violent offense, any crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.440(2), or a felony
offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW ((not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660)),
committed on or after July 1, 2000, the court shall in addition to the other
terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for the
community custody range established under RCW 9.94A.040 or up to the period of
earned release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2), whichever is
longer. The community custody shall begin ((either)): (a) Upon
completion of the term of confinement ((or)); (b) at such time as
the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2); or (c) with regard to offenders
sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660, upon failure to complete or administrative
termination from the special drug offender sentencing alternative program.

(2)(a) Unless a
condition is waived by the court, the conditions of community custody shall
include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4). The conditions may also
include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5). The court may also order the
offender to participate in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform
affirmative conduct reasonably related to the circumstances of the offense, the
offender's risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community, and the
department shall enforce such conditions pursuant to subsection (6) of this
section.

(b) As part of any
sentence that includes a term of community custody imposed under this subsection,
the court shall also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed
by the department under RCW 9.94A.720. The department shall assess the
offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and modify additional conditions
of the offender's community custody based upon the risk to community safety.
In addition, the department may require the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and to obey
all laws.

(c) The department may
not impose conditions that are contrary to those ordered by the court and may
not contravene or decrease court imposed conditions. The department shall
notify the offender in writing of any such conditions or modifications. In
setting, modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the
department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.

(3) If an offender
violates conditions imposed by the court or the department pursuant to this
section during community custody, the department may transfer the offender to a
more restrictive confinement status and impose other available sanctions as
provided in RCW 9.94A.205 and 9.94A.207.

(4) Except for terms of
community custody under RCW 9.94A.670, the department shall discharge the
offender from community custody on a date determined by the department, which
the department may modify, based on risk and performance of the offender,
within the range or at the end of the period of earned release, whichever is
later.

(5) At any time prior
to the completion or termination of a sex offender's term of community custody,
if the court finds that public safety would be enhanced, the court may impose
and enforce an order extending any or all of the conditions imposed pursuant to
this section for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for the crime as
it is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a condition extended
under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the offender's term of
community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of the sentence for the
purposes of RCW 9.94A.195 and may be punishable as contempt of court as
provided for in RCW 7.21.040. If the court extends a condition beyond the
expiration of the term of community custody, the department is not responsible
for supervision of the offender's compliance with the condition.

(6) Within the funds
available for community custody, the department shall determine conditions and
duration of community custody on the basis of risk to community safety, and
shall supervise offenders during community custody on the basis of risk to
community safety and conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall
adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.

(7) By the close of the
next business day after receiving notice of a condition imposed or modified by
the department, an offender may request an administrative review under rules
adopted by the department. The condition shall remain in effect unless the
reviewing officer finds that it is not reasonably related to any of the
following: (a) The crime of conviction; (b) the offender's risk of
reoffending; or (c) the safety of the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The code reviser shall
recodify sections within chapter 9.94A RCW, and correct any cross-references to
any such recodified sections, as necessary to simplify the organization of
chapter 9.94A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---