BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.105

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) A state internet information service may not:

_8 (a) Require a person using the service to accept the
placement

_9 of information or software on a person's computer for the
purpose

10 of gathering information about the person or the person's
internet

11 usage; or

12 (b) Modify information or software on the computer of a
person

13 using the service.

14 (2) This section does not prevent the placement or
modification

15 of information or software on a person's computer with the

16 person's express and knowing consent. A state internet
information

17 service may not terminate access to or use of the
information

p. 1 HB
1053

_1 service by a person who refuses to consent to placement
or

_2 modification of information or software on a person's
computer.

_3 (3) For the purposes of this section, "state
internet

_4 information service" means an internet service
provided to the

_5 public and operated by any agency or institution of
state

_6 government, including purchased services.

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.105

_8 RCW to read as follows:

_9 The department of information systems shall develop
standards

10 to facilitate the implementation of section 1 of this act.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act
takes effect July 1,

12 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1053 p. 2