BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) In Troxel v.
Granville, No. 99-138,

_6 decided June 5, 2000, the United States supreme court
recognized

_7 that the right of parents in the care and custody of their

_8 children is a fundamental liberty interest. The court
also

_9 acknowledged that demographic changes in the past century
have

10 created complex family structures, and third-party
visitation

11 statutes reflect the changing realities of the American
family.

12 (2) Legislatures and courts across the country
recognize that

13 families are composed of individuals who share an
emotional

14 attachment and intimacy developed over time, and that such

15 emotional bonds do not necessarily require biological or
marital

16 relationships. By acting in a caregiver or other
significant

17 emotionally involved role over a period of time, a third
party may

18 develop a substantial relationship with a child. In some
cases,

p. 1 HB
1054

_1 arbitrarily depriving the child of that relationship can
cause

_2 psychological or emotional harm to the child. The
legislature seeks

_3 to prevent the harm to children caused by the disruption
of such

_4 significant bonds.

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added
to chapter 26.10

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) A person who is not a parent of the child may
petition the

_8 court for visitation with the child if the petitioner can

_9 demonstrate that:

10 (a) There is a substantial relationship between the
petitioner

11 and the child;

12 (b) The petitioner has been unreasonably denied
visitation with

13 the child by a parent, custodian, or other person with
primary

14 decision-making authority over the child; and

15 (c) There has been a significant change in circumstances
with

16 either the child, the petitioner, or the parent, custodian,
or

17 other person having primary decision-making authority over
the

18 child that threatens the substantial relationship between
the

19 child and the petitioner. The change in circumstances
could

20 include, but is not limited to, a dissolution, legal
separation,

21 informal physical separation, death of a parent, or other

22 significant change in the family structure.

23 (2)(a) If the court dismisses a petition for visitation
brought

24 under this section because the petitioner failed to
demonstrate

25 the requirements in subsection (1) of this section, the
court must

26 order the petitioner to pay reasonable attorneys= fees
and costs to

27 the party responding to the petition. Nothing in this
subsection

28 precludes a court from ordering attorneys' fees and costs
under

29 RCW 26.10.080.

30 (b) Petitions that are not dismissed by the court must
be

31 submitted to mandatory mediation before proceeding to
trial. Upon

32 petition of any party that mediation is not appropriate,
the court

33 may order or the mediator may determine that the case is
not

34 appropriate for mediation. Mediation shall be pursuant to
mediation

35 procedures established by court rules for third-party
visitation

36 cases.

HB 1054 p. 2

_1 (3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection,
a petition

_2 for visitation brought under this section must be filed
in the

_3 county in which the child resides.

_4 (b) If a dissolution, legal separation, modification
of

_5 parenting plan, or other custody proceeding is pending
involving

_6 the child, the petition for visitation under this
section shall be

_7 filed in the county in which the proceeding is pending.

_8 (4) The court may order visitation between the
petitioner and

_9 the child if the petitioner shows and the court finds
that:

10 (a) Denial of court-ordered visitation would result
in a

11 likelihood of harm to the child=s
physical, psychological, or

12 emotional well-being;

13 (b) The likelihood of harm is beyond the normal
short-term

14 distress a child suffers due to a change in
circumstances;

15 (c) Continuation of the substantial relationship
between the

16 child and the petitioner would likely have long-term
benefits to

17 the child; and

18 (d) Visitation would not substantially interfere
with the

19 relationship between the child and the parent,
custodian, or other

20 person with primary decision-making authority over the
child.

21 (5) In determining the nature and extent of
visitation, the

22 court must consider the wishes of a child who is
sufficiently

23 mature to express reasoned and independent preferences
as to

24 visitation issues.

25 (6) The restrictions of RCW 26.10.160 that apply to
parents

26 shall apply to the petitioner under this section.

27 Sec. 3. RCW 26.09.240
and 1996 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read

28 as follows:

29 (1) Under section 1 of this act, a person other
than a parent

30 may petition the court for visitation with a child ((at
any time))

31 or may intervene in a pending dissolution, legal
separation, or

32 modification of parenting plan proceeding. ((A person
other than a

33 parent may not petition for visitation under this
section unless

34 the child's parent or parents have commenced an action
under this

35 chapter.

36 (2) A petition for visitation with a child by a
person other

p. 3 HB
1054

_1 than a parent must be filed in the county in which
the child

_2 resides.

_3 (3) A petition for visitation or a motion to
intervene pursuant

_4 to this section shall be dismissed unless the
petitioner or

_5 intervenor can demonstrate by clear and convincing
evidence that a

_6 significant relationship exists with the child with
whom

_7 visitation is sought. If the petition or motion is
dismissed for

_8 failure to establish the existence of a significant
relationship,

_9 the petitioner or intervenor shall be ordered to pay
reasonable

10 attorney's fees and costs to the parent, parents,
other custodian,

11 or representative of the child who responds to this
petition or

12 motion.

13 (4) The court may order visitation between the
petitioner or

14 intervenor and the child between whom a significant
relationship

15 exists upon a finding supported by the evidence that
the

16 visitation is in the child's best interests.

17 (5)(a) Visitation with a grandparent shall be
presumed to be in

18 the child's best interests when a significant
relationship has

19 been shown to exist. This presumption may be
rebutted by a

20 preponderance of evidence showing that visitation
would endanger

21 the child's physical, mental, or emotional health.

22 (b) If the court finds that reasonable visitation
by a

23 grandparent would be in the child's best interest
except for

24 hostilities that exist between the grandparent and
one or both of

25 the parents or person with whom the child lives, the
court may set

26 the matter for mediation under RCW 26.09.015.

27 (6) The court may consider the following factors
when making a

28 determination of the child's best interests:

29 (a) The strength of the relationship between the
child and the

30 petitioner;

31 (b) The relationship between each of the child's
parents or the

32 person with whom the child is residing and the
petitioner;

33 (c) The nature and reason for either parent's
objection to

34 granting the petitioner visitation;

35 (d) The effect that granting visitation will have
on the

36 relationship between the child and the child's
parents or the

37 person with whom the child is residing;

HB 1054 p. 4

_1 (e) The residential time sharing arrangements
between the

_2 parents;

_3 (f) The good faith of the petitioner;

_4 (g) Any criminal history or history of physical,
emotional, or

_5 sexual abuse or neglect by the petitioner; and

_6 (h) Any other factor relevant to the child's best
interest.

_7 (7) The restrictions of RCW 26.09.191 that apply
to parents

_8 shall be applied to a petitioner or intervenor who is
not a

_9 parent. The nature and extent of visitation, subject
to these

10 restrictions, is in the discretion of the court.

11 (8) The court may order an investigation and
report concerning

12 the proposed visitation or may appoint a guardian ad
litem as

13 provided in RCW 26.09.220.

14 (9) Visitation granted pursuant to this section
shall be

15 incorporated into the parenting plan for the child.

16 (10) The court may modify or terminate visitation
rights

17 granted pursuant to this section in any subsequent
modification

18 action upon a showing that the visitation is no
longer in the best

19 interest of the child.))

20 Sec. 4. RCW 26.10.160
and 1996 c 303 s 2 are each amended to read

21 as follows:

22 (1) A parent not granted custody of the child is
entitled to

23 reasonable visitation rights except as provided in
subsection (2)

24 of this section.

25 (2)(a) Visitation with the child shall be limited if it
is

26 found that the parent seeking visitation has engaged in any
of the

27 following conduct: (i) Willful abandonment that continues
for an

28 extended period of time or substantial refusal to perform

29 parenting functions; (ii) physical, sexual, or a pattern of

30 emotional abuse of a child; (iii) a history of acts of
domestic

31 violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an assault or
sexual

32 assault which causes grievous bodily harm or the fear of
such

33 harm; or (iv) the parent has been convicted as an adult of
a sex

34 offense under:

35 (A) RCW 9A.44.076 if, because of the difference in age
between

36 the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption
exists

37 under (d) of this subsection;

p. 5 HB
1054

_1 (B) RCW 9A.44.079 if, because of the difference in
age between

_2 the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption
exists

_3 under (d) of this subsection;

_4 (C) RCW 9A.44.086 if, because of the difference in
age between

_5 the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption
exists

_6 under (d) of this subsection;

_7 (D) RCW 9A.44.089;

_8 (E) RCW 9A.44.093;

_9 (F) RCW 9A.44.096;

10 (G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2) if, because of the
difference in

11 age between the offender and the victim, no rebuttable
presumption

12 exists under (d) of this subsection;

13 (H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;

14 (I) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the
offenses

15 listed in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of this subsection;

16 (J) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that
describes an

17 offense analogous to the offenses listed in (a)(iv)(A)
through (H)

18 of this subsection.

19 This subsection (2)(a) shall not apply when (c) or
(d) of this

20 subsection applies.

21 (b) The parent's visitation with the child shall be
limited if

22 it is found that the parent resides with a person who has
engaged

23 in any of the following conduct: (i) Physical, sexual,
or a pattern

24 of emotional abuse of a child; (ii) a history of acts of
domestic

25 violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an assault or
sexual

26 assault that causes grievous bodily harm or the fear of
such harm;

27 or (iii) the person has been convicted as an adult or as
a

28 juvenile has been adjudicated of a sex offense under:

29 (A) RCW 9A.44.076 if, because of the difference in
age between

30 the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption
exists

31 under (e) of this subsection;

32 (B) RCW 9A.44.079 if, because of the difference in
age between

33 the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption
exists

34 under (e) of this subsection;

35 (C) RCW 9A.44.086 if, because of the difference in
age between

36 the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption
exists

37 under (e) of this subsection;

38 (D) RCW 9A.44.089;

HB 1054 p. 6

_1 (E) RCW 9A.44.093;

_2 (F) RCW 9A.44.096;

_3 (G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2) if, because of the
difference in

_4 age between the offender and the victim, no rebuttable
presumption

_5 exists under (e) of this subsection;

_6 (H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;

_7 (I) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the
offenses

_8 listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this subsection;

_9 (J) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that
describes an

10 offense analogous to the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A)
through

11 (H) of this subsection.

12 This subsection (2)(b) shall not apply when (c) or
(e) of this

13 subsection applies.

14 (c) If a parent has been found to be a sexual
predator under

15 chapter 71.09 RCW or under an analogous statute of any
other

16 jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the parent from
contact

17 with a child that would otherwise be allowed under this
chapter.

18 If a parent resides with an adult or a juvenile who has
been found

19 to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or under
an

20 analogous statute of any other jurisdiction, the court
shall

21 restrain the parent from contact with the parent's child
except

22 contact that occurs outside that person's presence.

23 (d) There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent
who has

24 been convicted as an adult of a sex offense listed in
(d)(i)

25 through (ix) of this subsection poses a present danger
to a

26 child. Unless the parent rebuts this presumption, the
court shall

27 restrain the parent from contact with a child that would
otherwise

28 be allowed under this chapter:

29 (i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2), provided that the
person

30 convicted was at least five years older than the other
person;

31 (ii) RCW 9A.44.073;

32 (iii) RCW 9A.44.076, provided that the person
convicted was at

33 least eight years older than the victim;

34 (iv) RCW 9A.44.079, provided that the person
convicted was at

35 least eight years older than the victim;

36 (v) RCW 9A.44.083;

37 (vi) RCW 9A.44.086, provided that the person
convicted was at

38 least eight years older than the victim;

p. 7 HB
1054

_1 (vii) RCW 9A.44.100;

_2 (viii) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the
offenses

_3 listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of this subsection;

_4 (ix) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that
describes an

_5 offense analogous to the offenses listed in (d)(i)
through (vii)

_6 of this subsection.

_7 (e) There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent
who resides

_8 with a person who, as an adult, has been convicted, or
as a

_9 juvenile has been adjudicated, of the sex offenses
listed in

10 (e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection places a child at
risk of

11 abuse or harm when that parent exercises visitation in
the

12 presence of the convicted or adjudicated person. Unless
the parent

13 rebuts the presumption, the court shall restrain the
parent from

14 contact with the parent's child except for contact that
occurs

15 outside of the convicted or adjudicated person's
presence:

16 (i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2), provided that the
person

17 convicted was at least five years older than the other
person;

18 (ii) RCW 9A.44.073;

19 (iii) RCW 9A.44.076, provided that the person
convicted was at

20 least eight years older than the victim;

21 (iv) RCW 9A.44.079, provided that the person
convicted was at

22 least eight years older than the victim;

23 (v) RCW 9A.44.083;

24 (vi) RCW 9A.44.086, provided that the person
convicted was at

25 least eight years older than the victim;

26 (vii) RCW 9A.44.100;

27 (viii) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the
offenses

28 listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of this subsection;

29 (ix) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that
describes an

30 offense analogous to the offenses listed in (e)(i)
through (vii)

31 of this subsection.

32 (f) The presumption established in (d) of this
subsection may

33 be rebutted only after a written finding that:

34 (i) If the child was not the victim of the sex
offense

35 committed by the parent requesting visitation, (A)
contact between

36 the child and the offending parent is appropriate and
poses

37 minimal risk to the child, and (B) the offending parent
has

38 successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or
is engaged

HB 1054 p. 8

_1 in and making progress in such treatment, if any was
ordered by a

_2 court, and the treatment provider believes such contact
is

_3 appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child; or

_4 (ii) If the child was the victim of the sex offense
committed

_5 by the parent requesting visitation, (A) contact between
the child

_6 and the offending parent is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to

_7 the child, (B) if the child is in or has been in therapy
for

_8 victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes
such

_9 contact between the child and the offending parent is in
the

10 child's best interest, and (C) the offending parent has

11 successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or
is engaged

12 in and making progress in such treatment, if any was
ordered by a

13 court, and the treatment provider believes such contact
is

14 appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.

15 (g) The presumption established in (e) of this
subsection may

16 be rebutted only after a written finding that:

17 (i) If the child was not the victim of the sex
offense

18 committed by the person who is residing with the parent
requesting

19 visitation, (A) contact between the child and the parent
residing

20 with the convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate
and that

21 parent is able to protect the child in the presence of
the

22 convicted or adjudicated person, and (B) the convicted
or

23 adjudicated person has successfully engaged in treatment
for sex

24 offenders or is engaged in and making progress in such
treatment,

25 if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment
provider believes

26 such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk to
the child;

27 or

28 (ii) If the child was the victim of the sex offense
committed

29 by the person who is residing with the parent requesting

30 visitation, (A) contact between the child and the parent
in the

31 presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is
appropriate and

32 poses minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is in
or has

33 been in therapy for victims of sexual abuse, the child's
counselor

34 believes such contact between the child and the parent
residing

35 with the convicted or adjudicated person in the presence
of the

36 convicted or adjudicated person is in the child's best
interest,

37 and (C) the convicted or adjudicated person has
successfully

38 engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in
and making

p. 9 HB
1054

_1 progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a
court, and the

_2 treatment provider believes contact between the parent and
child

_3 in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person
is

_4 appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.

_5 (h) If the court finds that the parent has met the
burden of

_6 rebutting the presumption under (f) of this subsection,
the court

_7 may allow a parent who has been convicted as an adult of
a sex

_8 offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of this subsection
to have

_9 visitation with the child supervised by a neutral and
independent

10 adult and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision
of such

11 visitation. The court shall not approve of a supervisor
for contact

12 between the child and the parent unless the court finds,
based on

13 the evidence, that the supervisor is willing and capable
of

14 protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke
court

15 approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the
evidence,

16 that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or
is no

17 longer willing or capable of protecting the child.

18 (i) If the court finds that the parent has met the
burden of

19 rebutting the presumption under (g) of this subsection,
the court

20 may allow a parent residing with a person who has been
adjudicated

21 as a juvenile of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through
(ix) of

22 this subsection to have visitation with the child in the
presence

23 of the person adjudicated as a juvenile, supervised by a
neutral

24 and independent adult and pursuant to an adequate plan
for

25 supervision of such visitation. The court shall not
approve of a

26 supervisor for contact between the child and the parent
unless the

27 court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor
is willing

28 and capable of protecting the child from harm. The
court shall

29 revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding,
based on the

30 evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the
child or

31 is no longer willing or capable of protecting the child.

32 (j) If the court finds that the parent has met the
burden of

33 rebutting the presumption under (g) of this subsection,
the court

34 may allow a parent residing with a person who, as an
adult, has

35 been convicted of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through
(ix) of

36 this subsection to have visitation with the child in the
presence

37 of the convicted person supervised by a neutral and
independent

38 adult and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision
of such

HB 1054 p. 10

_1 visitation. The court shall not approve of a supervisor
for contact

_2 between the child and the parent unless the court finds,
based on

_3 the evidence, that the supervisor is willing and capable
of

_4 protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke
court

_5 approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the
evidence,

_6 that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or
is no

_7 longer willing or capable of protecting the child.

_8 (k) A court shall not order unsupervised contact
between the

_9 offending parent and a child of the offending parent who
was

10 sexually abused by that parent. A court may order
unsupervised

11 contact between the offending parent and a child who was
not

12 sexually abused by the parent after the presumption
under (d) of

13 this subsection has been rebutted and supervised
visitation has

14 occurred for at least two years with no further arrests
or

15 convictions of sex offenses involving children under
chapter 9A.44

16 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW and (i) the sex
offense

17 of the offending parent was not committed against a
child of the

18 offending parent, and (ii) the court finds that
unsupervised

19 contact between the child and the offending parent is
appropriate

20 and poses minimal risk to the child, after consideration
of the

21 testimony of a state-certified therapist, mental health
counselor,

22 or social worker with expertise in treating child sexual
abuse

23 victims who has supervised at least one period of
visitation

24 between the parent and the child, and after
consideration of

25 evidence of the offending parent's compliance with
community

26 supervision requirements, if any. If the offending
parent was not

27 ordered by a court to participate in treatment for sex
offenders,

28 then the parent shall obtain a psychosexual evaluation
conducted

29 by a state-certified sex offender treatment provider
indicating

30 that the offender has the lowest likelihood of risk to
reoffend

31 before the court grants unsupervised contact between the
parent

32 and a child.

33 (l) A court may order unsupervised contact between
the parent

34 and a child which may occur in the presence of a
juvenile

35 adjudicated of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through
(ix) of this

36 subsection who resides with the parent after the
presumption under

37 (e) of this subsection has been rebutted and supervised
visitation

38 has occurred for at least two years during which time
the

p. 11 HB
1054

_1 adjudicated juvenile has had no further arrests,
adjudications, or

_2 convictions of sex offenses involving children under
chapter 9A.44

_3 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW, and (i) the
court finds

_4 that unsupervised contact between the child and the
parent that

_5 may occur in the presence of the adjudicated juvenile is

_6 appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, after

_7 consideration of the testimony of a state-certified
therapist,

_8 mental health counselor, or social worker with expertise
in

_9 treatment of child sexual abuse victims who has
supervised at

10 least one period of visitation between the parent and
the child in

11 the presence of the adjudicated juvenile, and after
consideration

12 of evidence of the adjudicated juvenile's compliance
with

13 community supervision or parole requirements, if any. If
the

14 adjudicated juvenile was not ordered by a court to
participate in

15 treatment for sex offenders, then the adjudicated
juvenile shall

16 obtain a psychosexual evaluation conducted by a
state-certified

17 sex offender treatment provider indicating that the
adjudicated

18 juvenile has the lowest likelihood of risk to reoffend
before the

19 court grants unsupervised contact between the parent and
a child

20 which may occur in the presence of the adjudicated
juvenile who is

21 residing with the parent.

22 (m)(i) The limitations imposed by the court under
(a) or (b) of

23 this subsection shall be reasonably calculated to
protect the

24 child from the physical, sexual, or emotional abuse or
harm that

25 could result if the child has contact with the parent
requesting

26 visitation. If the court expressly finds based on the
evidence that

27 limitations on visitation with the child will not
adequately

28 protect the child from the harm or abuse that could
result if the

29 child has contact with the parent requesting visitation,
the court

30 shall restrain the person seeking visitation from all
contact with

31 the child.

32 (ii) The court shall not enter an order under (a) of
this

33 subsection allowing a parent to have contact with a
child if the

34 parent has been found by clear and convincing evidence
in a civil

35 action or by a preponderance of the evidence in a
dependency

36 action to have sexually abused the child, except upon

37 recommendation by an evaluator or therapist for the
child that the

38 child is ready for contact with the parent and will not
be harmed

HB 1054 p. 12

_1 by the contact. The court shall not enter an order
allowing a

_2 parent to have contact with the child in the offender's
presence

_3 if the parent resides with a person who has been found
by clear

_4 and convincing evidence in a civil action or by a
preponderance of

_5 the evidence in a dependency action to have sexually
abused a

_6 child, unless the court finds that the parent accepts
that the

_7 person engaged in the harmful conduct and the parent is
willing to

_8 and capable of protecting the child from harm from the
person.

_9 (iii) If the court limits visitation under (a) or
(b) of this

10 subsection to require supervised contact between the
child and the

11 parent, the court shall not approve of a supervisor for
contact

12 between a child and a parent who has engaged in
physical, sexual,

13 or a pattern of emotional abuse of the child unless the
court

14 finds based upon the evidence that the supervisor
accepts that the

15 harmful conduct occurred and is willing to and capable
of

16 protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke
court

17 approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the
evidence,

18 that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or
is no

19 longer willing to or capable of protecting the child.

20 (n) If the court expressly finds based on the
evidence that

21 contact between the parent and the child will not cause
physical,

22 sexual, or emotional abuse or harm to the child and that
the

23 probability that the parent's or other person's harmful
or abusive

24 conduct will recur is so remote that it would not be in
the

25 child's best interests to apply the limitations of (a),
(b), and

26 (m)(i) and (iii) of this subsection, or if the court
expressly

27 finds that the parent's conduct did not have an impact
on the

28 child, then the court need not apply the limitations of
(a), (b),

29 and (m)(i) and (iii) of this subsection. The weight
given to the

30 existence of a protection order issued under chapter
26.50 RCW as

31 to domestic violence is within the discretion of the
court. This

32 subsection shall not apply when (c), (d), (e), (f), (g),
(h), (i),

33 (j), (k), (l), and (m)(ii) of this subsection apply.

34 (3) ((Any person may petition the court for
visitation rights

35 at any time including, but not limited to, custody
proceedings.

36 The court may order visitation rights for any person
when

37 visitation may serve the best interest of the child
whether or not

38 there has been any change of circumstances.

p. 13 HB
1054

_1 (4))) The court may modify an order granting
or denying

_2 visitation rights whenever modification would serve the
best

_3 interests of the child. Modification of a parent's
visitation

_4 rights shall be subject to the requirements of
subsection (2) of

_5 this section.

_6 (((5))) (4) For the purposes of this
section, a parent's child

_7 means that parent's natural child, adopted child, or
stepchild.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary
for the immediate

_9 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

10 the state government and its existing public institutions,
and

11 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1054 p. 14