BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that teacher experience and education information is gathered and maintained on
a district-by-district basis. This information is important for many reasons,
particularly for funding and compensation determinations and certification and
recertification. However, gathering and maintaining this information in the
district in which the teacher is currently located results in duplication of
records, additional administrative expenses, and redundancy in audit efforts,
and also results in errors from teachers changing districts or limited staff
resources. The legislature intends to explore the feasibility of a central
repository for teacher education and experience information.

(2) The legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee shall convene a work group to
explore the feasibility of a central repository for teacher education and
experience information and to make recommendations for establishing a central
repository. The feasibility study shall analyze the costs and benefits of a
central repository including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Whether increased
accuracy is likely;

(b) Whether school
districts can save administrative and training costs;

(c) Whether teachers
will benefit;

(d) Whether a central
repository allows for innovative use of the internet and other information
technology;

(e) Whether improved
methods could be used to better ensure data reliability and integrity; and

(f) Whether audits can
be done more efficiently.

(3) The feasibility
study shall also estimate the cost of a central repository and estimate the
savings a central repository would generate compared to the current methods of
gathering and maintaining this information.

(4) As a basis for the
study and before convening the work group, the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee shall identify or design one or more models
for a multiple user data gathering and management system that can be
incorporated into the concept of the central repository.

(5) The work group
shall include the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
office of the state auditor, the department of information services, and a
representative from each of the following: Teachers, a large school district,
a small school district, educational service districts, school administrators,
and others at the discretion of the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.

(6) Staffing for the
work group shall be provided by the legislative accountability and evaluation
program committee with assistance from the state agencies on the work group.

(7) The feasibility
study and recommendations shall be provided to the education and fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 15, 2001.

(8) This section
expires December 31, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---