BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 46.68.065
and 1982 c 77 s 8 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 There is hereby created the motorcycle safety education
account

_7 in the highway safety fund of the state treasury, to the
credit of

_8 which shall be deposited all moneys directed by law to be
credited

_9 thereto. All expenses incurred by the director of the
department of

10 licensing in administering RCW 46.20.505 through 46.20.520
shall

11 be borne by appropriations from this account, and moneys
deposited

12 into this account shall be used only for the purposes
authorized

13 in RCW 46.20.505 through 46.20.520.

14 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12

15 RCW to read as follows:

16 The provisions of this chapter do not apply with
respect to the

p. 1 HB
1057

_1 use of motorcycles loaned or purchased for use in a
motorcycle

_2 operator training and education program created under
RCW

_3 46.20.520.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1057 p. 2