BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.09.510 and 1997 c
59 s 14 and 1997 c 58 s 201 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Medical assistance may
be provided in accordance with eligibility requirements established by the
department, as defined in the social security Title XIX state plan for
mandatory categorically needy persons and: (1) Individuals who would be
eligible for cash assistance except for their institutional status; (2)
individuals who are under twenty-one years of age, who would be eligible for
medicaid, but do not qualify as dependent children and who are in (a) foster
care, (b) subsidized adoption, (c) a nursing facility or an intermediate care
facility for the mentally retarded, or (d) inpatient psychiatric facilities;
(3) the aged, blind, and disabled who: (a) Receive only a state supplement, or
(b) would not be eligible for cash assistance if they were not institutionalized;
(4) categorically eligible individuals who meet the income and resource
requirements of the cash assistance programs; (5) individuals who are enrolled
in managed health care systems, who have otherwise lost eligibility for medical
assistance, but who have not completed a current six-month enrollment in a
managed health care system, and who are eligible for federal financial
participation under Title XIX of the social security act; (6) children and
pregnant women allowed by federal statute for whom funding is appropriated; (7)
other individuals eligible for medical services under RCW 74.09.035 and
74.09.700 for whom federal financial participation is available under Title XIX
of the social security act; ((and)) (8) persons allowed by section 1931
of the social security act for whom funding is appropriated; and (9) women
who are: (a) Under sixty-five years of age; (b) have been screened for breast
and cervical cancer under the national breast and cervical cancer early
detection program administered by the department of health or tribal entity and
have been identified as needing treatment for breast or cervical cancer; and
(c) are not otherwise covered by health insurance. Medical assistance provided
under this subsection is limited to the period during which the woman requires
treatment for breast or cervical cancer, and is subject to any conditions or
limitations specified in the omnibus appropriations act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---