BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.48.080 and 1997 c
3 s 112 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Annually during the
months of September and October, the department of revenue shall examine and
compare the returns of the assessment of the property in the several counties
of the state, and the assessment of the property of railroad and other companies
assessed by the department, and proceed to equalize the same, so that each
county in the state shall pay its due and just proportion of the taxes for
state purposes for such assessment year, according to the ratio the ((assessed))
valuation of the property in each county bears to the ((correct)) total
((assessed)) valuation of all property in the state.

((First.)) (a)
The department shall classify all property, real and personal, and shall raise
and lower the ((assessed)) valuation of any class of property in any
county to a value that shall be equal, so far as possible, to the ((correct
assessed)) true and fair value of such class as of January 1st of
the current year((, after determining the correct appraised value, and any
adjustment applicable under RCW 84.40.0305 for the property,)) for the
purpose of ascertaining the just amount of tax due from each county for state
purposes. ((In equalizing personal property as of January 1st of the
current year, the department shall use the assessment level of the preceding
year.)) In equalizing personal property as of January 1st of the current
year, the department shall use valuation data with respect to personal property
from the three years immediately preceding the current assessment year in a
manner it deems appropriate. Such classification may be on the basis of
types of property, geographical areas, or both. For purposes of this section,
for each county that has not provided the department with an assessment return
by December 1st, the department shall proceed, using facts and information and
in a manner it deems appropriate, to estimate the value of each class of
property in the county.

((Second.)) (b)
The department shall keep a full record of its proceedings and the same shall
be published annually by the department.

(2) The department
shall levy the state taxes authorized by law. The amount levied in any one
year for general state purposes shall not exceed the lawful dollar rate on the
dollar of the assessed value of the property of the entire state ((as
equalized under this section)), which assessed value shall be one
hundred percent of the true and fair value of the property in money. The
department shall apportion the amount of tax for state purposes levied by the
department, among the several counties, in proportion to the ((assessed))
valuation of the taxable property of the county for the year as equalized by
the department: PROVIDED, That for purposes of this apportionment, the
department shall recompute the previous year's levy and the apportionment
thereof to correct for changes and errors in taxable values reported to the
department after October 1 of the preceding year and shall adjust the
apportioned amount of the current year's state levy for each county by the
difference between the apportioned amounts established by the original and
revised levy computations for the previous year. For purposes of this section,
changes in taxable values mean a final adjustment made by a county board of
equalization, the state board of tax appeals, or a court of competent
jurisdiction and shall include additions of omitted property, other additions
or deletions from the assessment or tax rolls, any assessment return provided
by a county to the department subsequent to December 1st, or a change in the indicated
ratio of a county. Errors in taxable values mean errors corrected by a final
reviewing body.

In addition to
computing a levy under this subsection that is reduced under RCW 84.55.012, the
department shall compute a hypothetical levy without regard to the reduction
under RCW 84.55.012. This hypothetical levy shall also be apportioned among
the several counties in proportion to the valuation of the taxable property of
the county for the year, as equalized by the department, in the same manner as
the actual levy and shall be used by the county assessors for the purpose of
recomputing and establishing a consolidated levy under RCW 84.52.010.

(3) The department
shall have authority to adopt rules and regulations to enforce obedience to its
orders in all matters in relation to the returns of county assessments, the
equalization of values, and the apportionment of the state levy by the
department.

(4) After the
completion of the duties prescribed in this section, the director of the
department shall certify the record of the proceedings of the department under
this section, the tax levies made for state purposes and the apportionment
thereof among the counties, and the certification shall be available for public
inspection.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.40.190 and 1993 c
33 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
person required by this title to list property shall make out and deliver to
the assessor, or to the department as required by RCW 84.40.065, either in
person ((or)), by mail, or electronic transmittal, a
statement, verified under penalty of perjury, of all the personal property in
his or her possession or under his or her control, and which, by the provisions
of this title, he or she is required to list for taxation, either as owner or
holder thereof. Each list, schedule or statement required by this chapter
shall be signed by the individual if the person required to make the same is an
individual; by the president, vice-president, treasurer, assistant treasurer,
chief accounting officer or any other officer duly authorized to so act if the
person required to make the same is a corporation; by a responsible and duly
authorized member or officer having knowledge of its affairs, if the person
required to make the same is a partnership or other unincorporated
organization; or by the fiduciary, if the person required to make the same is a
trust or estate. The list, schedule, or statement may be made and signed for
the person required to make the same by an agent who is duly authorized to do
so by a power of attorney filed with and approved by the assessor. When any
list, schedule, or statement is made and signed by such agent, the principal
required to make out and deliver the same shall be responsible for the contents
and the filing thereof and shall be liable for the penalties imposed pursuant
to RCW 84.40.130. No person shall be required to list for taxation in his
statement to the assessor any share or portion of the capital stock, or of any
of the property of any company, association or corporation, which such person
may hold in whole or in part, where such company, being required so to do, has
listed for assessment and taxation its capital stock and property with the
department of revenue, or as otherwise required by law.

---
END ---