BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that as the population of the state continues to grow, there are increasing
demands for state forest lands to provide open space, wildlife habitat,
recreational opportunities, and the protection of watersheds and other public
resources. In some parts of the state, it is becoming increasingly difficult
for the department of natural resources to harvest timber on lands that are
within or abut municipal watersheds. The legislature further finds that while
it is the policy of the state to maintain and promote reforestation and
development of forest resources, the harvesting of timber within or near a
municipal watershed can result in significant costs to the municipal drinking
water purveyor to adequately protect the drinking water. The legislature
therefore finds that it is in the public interest to allow certain forest board
transfer lands to be reconveyed to a county if the county can demonstrate that
such a reconveyance will result in enhanced protection of the source of
municipal drinking water within their county.

Sec. 2. RCW 76.12.072 and 1983 c
3 s 195 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever the ((board
of)) county ((commissioners)) legislative authority of any
county ((shall)) determines that forest lands, that were acquired
from such county by the state pursuant to RCW 76.12.030 and that are under the
administration of the department of natural resources, are needed by the county
for public park use in accordance with the county and the state outdoor
recreation plans or for the protection of the source of drinking water
within municipal watershed boundaries, the ((board of)) county ((commissioners))
legislative authority may file an application with the board of natural
resources for the transfer of such forest lands.

Upon the filing of an
application by the ((board of)) county ((commissioners)) legislative
authority, the department of natural resources shall ((cause)) provide
notice of the impending transfer ((to be given)) in the manner ((provided))
specified by RCW 42.30.060. If the department of natural resources
determines that the proposed use is in accordance with the state outdoor
recreation plan or that through reconveyance the lands taken out of timber
production will result in significantly greater protection of the source of
municipal drinking water, it shall reconvey ((said)) the
forest lands to the requesting county ((to have and to hold)) for so
long as the forest lands are developed, maintained, and used for the proposed
public park purpose or for protection of the source of municipal drinking
water. This reconveyance may contain conditions to allow the department of
natural resources to coordinate the management of any adjacent state owned
lands with the proposed park activity or management within the municipal
watershed boundaries to encourage maximum multiple use management and may
reserve rights of way needed to manage other state owned lands in the area.
The application shall be denied if the department of natural resources finds
that the proposed use is not in accord with the state outdoor recreation plan or
if reconveyance will not significantly contribute to the protection of the
source of municipal drinking water. The applying county must pay the
department's reasonable administrative costs associated with the reconveyance.

If the land is not, or
ceases to be, used for public park purposes or the protection of the source
of municipal drinking water, the land shall be conveyed back to the
department of natural resources upon request of the department.

Sec. 3. RCW 76.12.073 and 1969
ex.s. c 47 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The timber resources on
any such state forest land transferred to the counties under RCW 76.12.072
shall be managed by the department of natural resources to the extent that this
is consistent with ((park)) the purposes of the reconveyance
and meets with the approval of the ((board of)) county ((commissioners))
legislative authority. Whenever the department of natural resources
does manage the timber resources of such lands, it will do so in accordance
with the adopted and approved watershed management plan and the general
statutes relative to the management of all other state forest lands. Timber
resources on any such state forest land transferred to the counties under RCW
76.12.072 will not be included for purposes of calculating the sustainable
harvest.

Sec. 4. RCW 76.12.074 and 1969
ex.s. c 47 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Under provisions
mutually agreeable to the ((board of)) county ((commissioners)) legislative
authority and the board of natural resources, lands approved for transfer
to a county for public park purposes or protection of the source of
municipal drinking water under the provisions of RCW 76.12.072 shall be
transferred to the county by deed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 76.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All lands
reconveyed under RCW 76.12.072 for the protection of the municipal drinking
water source shall be managed under watershed-specific forest management plans
that are adopted by affected municipalities and approved by the department of
health under chapter 246-290 WAC. These plans shall be developed by a
committee made up of representatives from the department of health, the
department of natural resources, all municipalities acquiring drinking water
from the reconveyed lands, the requesting county, and local citizen
representatives. The requesting county shall coordinate the development of the
plan.

(2) An advisory
committee is established to develop standards for the development of
watershed-specific forest management plans that are designed to protect sources
of municipal drinking water. The committee shall be composed of the following
members or their designees: The secretary of the department of health; the
director of the department of fish and wildlife; the director of the department
of ecology; the commissioner of public lands; a representative of an Indian
tribe potentially affected by a reconveyance, selected by the governor; and
three members of the public interested in these issues, selected by the
governor.

(3) The
committee shall report its recommendations to the appropriate legislative
committees by January 1, 2002.

---
END ---