BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.101.010 and 1981
c 132 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

When used in this
chapter:

(1) The term
"commission" means the Washington state criminal justice training
commission.

(2) The term
"boards" means the education and training standards boards, the
establishment of which are authorized by this chapter.

(3) The term
"criminal justice personnel" means any person who serves in a county,
city, state, or port commission agency engaged in crime prevention, crime
reduction, or enforcement of the criminal law.

(4) The term "law
enforcement personnel" means any public employee or volunteer having as a
primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in general or any employee or
volunteer of, or any individual commissioned by, any municipal, county, state,
or combination thereof, agency having as its primary function the enforcement
of criminal laws in general as distinguished from an agency possessing peace officer
powers, the primary function of which is the implementation of specialized
subject matter areas. For the purposes of this subsection "primary
function" means that function to which the greater allocation of resources
is made.

(5) The term
"correctional personnel" means any employee or volunteer who by
state, county, municipal, or combination thereof, statute has the
responsibility for the confinement, care, management, training, treatment,
education, supervision, or counseling of those individuals whose civil rights
have been limited in some way by legal sanction.

(6) A peace officer
is "convicted" at the time a plea of guilty has been accepted, or a
verdict of guilty or finding of guilt has been filed, notwithstanding the
pendency of any future proceedings, including but not limited to sentencing,
posttrial or postfact-finding motions and appeals. "Conviction"
includes a deferral of sentence and also includes the equivalent disposition by
a court in a jurisdiction other than the state of Washington.

(7) "Discharged
for disqualifying misconduct" means terminated from employment for: (a)
Conviction of (i) any crime committed under color of authority as a peace
officer, (ii) any crime involving dishonesty or false statement within the
meaning of Evidence Rule 609(a), (iii) the unlawful use or possession of a
controlled substance, or (iv) any other crime the conviction of which
disqualifies a Washington citizen from the legal right to possess a firearm under
state or federal law; (b) conduct that would constitute any of the crimes
addressed in (a) of this subsection; or (c) knowingly making materially false
statements during disciplinary investigations, where the false statements are
the sole basis for the termination.

(8) A peace officer
is "discharged for disqualifying misconduct" within the meaning of
subsection (7) of this section under the ordinary meaning of the term and when
the totality of the circumstances support a finding that the officer resigned in
anticipation of discipline, whether or not the misconduct was discovered at the
time of resignation, and when such discipline, if carried forward, would more
likely than not have led to discharge for disqualifying misconduct within the
meaning of subsection (7) of this section.

(9) When used in
context of proceedings referred to in this chapter, "final" means
that the peace officer has exhausted all available civil service appeals,
collective bargaining remedies, and all other such direct administrative
appeals, and the officer has not been reinstated as the result of the action.
Finality is not affected by the pendency or availability of state or federal
administrative or court actions for discrimination, or by the pendency or
availability of any remedies other than direct civil service and collective
bargaining remedies.

(10) "Peace
officer" means any law enforcement personnel subject to the basic law
enforcement training requirement of RCW 43.101.200 and any other requirements
of that section, notwithstanding any waiver or exemption granted by the
commission, and notwithstanding the statutory exemption based on date of
initial hire under RCW 43.101.200. Commissioned officers of the Washington
state patrol, whether they have been or may be exempted by rule of the
commission from the basic training requirement of RCW 43.101.200, are included
as peace officers for purposes of this chapter. Fish and wildlife officers
with enforcement powers for all criminal laws under RCW 77.12.055 are peace
officers for purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) As a condition of
continuing employment as peace officers, all Washington peace officers: (a)
Shall timely obtain certification as peace officers, or timely obtain certification
for exemption therefrom, by meeting all requirements of RCW 43.101.200, as that
section is administered under the rules of the commission, as well by meeting
any additional requirements under this chapter; and (b) shall maintain the
basic certification as peace officers under this chapter. The commission shall
certify peace officers who have satisfied, or have been exempted by statute or
by rule from, the basic training requirements of RCW 43.101.200 on or before
the effective date of this section. Thereafter, the commission may revoke
certification pursuant to this chapter.

(2) The commission
shall allow a peace officer to retain status as a certified peace officer as
long as the officer: (a) Timely meets the basic law enforcement training
requirements, or is exempted therefrom, in whole or in part, under RCW
43.101.200 or under rule of the commission; (b) meets or is exempted from any
other requirements under this chapter as administered under the rules adopted
by the commission; (c) is not denied certification by the commission under this
chapter; and (d) has not had certification revoked by the commission.

(3) As a prerequisite
to certification, as well as a prerequisite to pursuit of a hearing under
section 9 of this act, a peace officer must, on a form devised or adopted by
the commission, authorize the release to the commission of his or her personnel
files, termination papers, criminal investigation files, or other files,
papers, or information that are directly related to a certification matter or
decertification matter before the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Upon request by a peace
officer's employer or on its own initiative, the commission may deny or revoke
certification of any peace officer, after written notice and hearing, if a
hearing is timely requested by the peace officer under section 9 of this act,
based upon a finding of one or more of the following conditions:

(1) The peace officer
has failed to timely meet all requirements for obtaining a certificate of basic
law enforcement training, a certificate of basic law enforcement training
equivalency, or a certificate of exemption from the training;

(2) The peace officer
has knowingly falsified or omitted material information on an application for
training or certification to the commission;

(3) The peace officer
has been convicted at any time of a felony offense under the laws of this state
or has been convicted of a federal or out-of-state offense comparable to a
felony under the laws of this state;

(4) The peace officer
has been discharged for disqualifying misconduct, the discharge is final, and
some or all of the acts or omissions forming the basis for the discharge
proceedings occurred on or after the effective date of this section;

(5) The peace officer's
certificate was previously issued by administrative error on the part of the
commission; or

(6) The peace officer
has interfered with an investigation or action for denial or revocation of
certificate by: (a) Knowingly making a materially false statement to the
commission; or (b) in any matter under investigation by or otherwise before the
commission, tampering with evidence or tampering with or intimidating any
witness.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) A person denied a
certification based upon dismissal or withdrawal from a basic law enforcement
academy for any reason not also involving discharge for disqualifying
misconduct is eligible for readmission and certification upon meeting standards
established in rules of the commission, which rules may provide for
probationary terms on readmission.

(2) A person whose
certification is denied or revoked based upon prior administrative error of
issuance, failure to cooperate, or interference with an investigation is
eligible for certification upon meeting standards established in rules of the
commission, rules which may provide for a probationary period of certification
in the event of reinstatement of eligibility.

(3) A person whose
certification is denied or revoked based upon a felony criminal conviction is
not eligible for certification at any time.

(4) A peace officer
whose certification is denied or revoked based upon discharge for disqualifying
misconduct, but not also based upon a felony criminal conviction, may, five
years after the revocation or denial, petition the commission for reinstatement
of the certificate or for eligibility for reinstatement. The commission shall
hold a hearing on the petition to consider reinstatement, and the commission
may allow reinstatement based upon standards established in rules of the
commission. If the certificate is reinstated or eligibility for certification
is determined, the commission may establish a probationary period of
certification.

(5) A peace officer
whose certification is revoked based solely upon a criminal conviction may
petition the commission for reinstatement immediately upon a final judicial
reversal of the conviction. The commission shall hold a hearing on request to
consider reinstatement, and the commission may allow reinstatement based on
standards established in rules of the commission. If the certificate is
reinstated or if eligibility for certification is determined, the commission
may establish a probationary period of certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A peace officer's
certification lapses automatically when there is a break of more than
twenty-four consecutive months in the officer's service as a full-time law
enforcement officer. A break in full-time law enforcement service which is due
solely to the pendency of direct review or appeal from a disciplinary
discharge, or to the pendency of a work-related injury, does not cause a lapse
in certification. The officer may petition the commission for reinstatement of
certification. Upon receipt of a petition for reinstatement of a lapsed
certificate, the commission shall determine under this chapter and any
applicable rules of the commission if the peace officer's certification status
is to be reinstated, and the commission shall also determine any requirements
which the officer must meet for reinstatement. The commission may adopt rules
establishing requirements for reinstatement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Upon termination of a
peace officer for any reason, including resignation, the agency of termination
shall, within fifteen days of the termination, notify the commission on a
personnel action report form provided by the commission. The agency of termination
shall, upon request of the commission, provide such additional documentation or
information as the commission deems necessary to determine whether the
termination provides grounds for revocation under section 3 of this act. The
commission shall maintain these notices in a permanent file, subject to section
12 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. In addition to its other
powers granted under this chapter, the commission has authority and power to:

(1) Adopt, amend, or
repeal rules as necessary to carry out this chapter;

(2) Issue subpoenas and
administer oaths in connection with investigations, hearings, or other
proceedings held under this chapter;

(3) Take or cause to be
taken depositions and other discovery procedures as needed in investigations,
hearings, and other proceedings held under this chapter;

(4) Appoint members of
a hearings board as provided under section 10 of this act;

(5) Enter into
contracts for professional services determined by the commission to be necessary
for adequate enforcement of this chapter;

(6) Grant, deny, or
revoke certification of peace officers under the provisions of this chapter;

(7) Designate
individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and statements of charges under the
provisions of this chapter; and

(8) Employ such
investigative, administrative, and clerical staff as necessary for the
enforcement of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A law enforcement officer
or duly authorized representative of a law enforcement agency may submit a
written complaint to the commission charging that a peace officer's certificate
should be denied or revoked, and specifying the grounds for the charge. Filing
a complaint does not make a complainant a party to the commission's action.
The commission has sole discretion whether to investigate a complaint, and the
commission has sole discretion whether to investigate matters relating to
certification, denial of certification, or revocation of certification on any
other basis, without restriction as to the source or the existence of a
complaint. A person who files a complaint in good faith under this section is
immune from suit or any civil action related to the filing or the contents of
the complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) If the commission
determines, upon investigation, that there is probable cause to believe that a
peace officer's certification should be denied or revoked under section 3 of
this act, the commission must prepare and serve upon the officer a statement of
charges. Service on the officer must be by mail or by personal service on the
officer. Notice of the charges must also be mailed to or otherwise served upon
the officer's agency of termination and any current law enforcement agency
employer. The statement of charges must be accompanied by a notice that to
receive a hearing on the denial or revocation, the officer must, within sixty
days of communication of the statement of charges, request a hearing before the
hearings board appointed under section 10 of this act. Failure of the officer
to request a hearing within the sixty-day period constitutes a default,
whereupon the commission may enter an order under RCW 34.05.440.

(2) If a hearing is
requested, the date of the hearing must be scheduled not earlier than ninety
days nor later than one hundred eighty days after communication of the
statement of charges to the officer; the one hundred eighty day period may be
extended on mutual agreement of the parties or for good cause. The commission
shall give written notice of hearing at least twenty days prior to the hearing,
specifying the time, date, and place of hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) The procedures
governing adjudicative proceedings before agencies under chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act, govern hearings before the commission and govern
all other actions before the commission unless otherwise provided in this
chapter. The standard of proof in actions before the commission is clear,
cogent, and convincing evidence.

(2) On all appeals
brought under section 9 of this act, a five-member hearings panel shall both
hear the case and make the commission's final administrative decision. Members
of the commission or the board on law enforcement training standards and
education may but need not be appointed to the hearings panels. The commission
shall appoint as follows two or more panels to hear appeals from
decertification actions:

(a) When an appeal is
filed in relation to decertification of a Washington peace officer who is not a
peace officer of the Washington state patrol, the commission shall appoint to
the panel: (i) One police chief; (ii) one sheriff; (iii) two peace officers
who are at or below the level of first line supervisor, who are from city or
county law enforcement agencies, and who have at least ten years' experience as
peace officers; and (iv) one person who is not currently a peace officer and
who represents a community college or four-year college or university.

(b) When an appeal is
filed in relation to decertification of a peace officer of the Washington state
patrol, the commission shall appoint to the panel: (i) Either one police chief
or one sheriff; (ii) one administrator of the state patrol; (iii) one peace
officer who is at or below the level of first line supervisor, who is from a
city or county law enforcement agency, and who has at least ten years'
experience as a peace officer; (iv) one state patrol officer who is at or below
the level of first line supervisor, and who has at least ten years' experience
as a peace officer; and (v) one person who is not currently a peace officer and
who represents a community college or four-year college or university.

(c) Persons appointed
to hearings panels by the commission shall, in relation to any decertification
matter on which they sit, have the powers, duties, and immunities, and are
entitled to the emoluments, including travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060, of regular commission members.

(3) Where the charge
upon which revocation or denial is based is that a peace officer was
"discharged for disqualifying misconduct," and the discharge is
"final," within the meaning of section 3(4) of this act, and the
officer received a civil service hearing or arbitration hearing culminating in
an affirming decision following separation from service by the employer, the
hearings panel may revoke or deny certification if the hearings panel
determines that the discharge occurred and was based on disqualifying
misconduct; the hearings panel need not redetermine the underlying facts but
may make this determination based solely on review of the records and decision
relating to the employment separation proceeding. However, the hearings panel
may, in its discretion, consider additional evidence to determine whether such
a discharge occurred and was based on such disqualifying misconduct. The
hearings panel shall, upon written request by the subject peace officer, allow
the peace officer to present additional evidence of extenuating circumstances.

Where the charge upon
which revocation or denial of certification is based is that a peace officer
"has been convicted at any time of a felony offense" within the
meaning of section 3(3) of this act, the hearings panel shall revoke or deny
certification if it determines that the peace officer was convicted of a
felony. The hearings panel need not redetermine the underlying facts but may
make this determination based solely on review of the records and decision relating
to the criminal proceeding. However, the hearings panel shall, upon the
panel's determination of relevancy, consider additional evidence to determine
whether the peace officer was convicted of a felony.

Where the charge upon
which revocation or denial is based is under section 3(1), (2), (5), or (6) of
this act, the hearings panel shall determine the underlying facts relating to
the charge upon which revocation or denial of certification is based.

(4) The commission's
final administrative decision is subject to judicial review under RCW 34.05.510
through 34.05.598.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The commission, its
boards, and individuals acting on behalf of the commission and its boards are
immune from suit in any civil or criminal action contesting or based upon
proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their duties in
the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. (1) Except as provided
under subsection (2) of this section, the following records of the commission
are confidential and exempt from public disclosure: (a) The contents of
personnel action reports filed under section 6 of this act; (b) all files,
papers, and other information obtained by the commission pursuant to section
2(3) of this act; and (c) all investigative files of the commission compiled in
carrying out the responsibilities of the commission under this chapter. Such
records are not subject to public disclosure, subpoena, or discovery
proceedings in any civil action, except as provided in subsection (5) of this
section.

(2) Records which are
otherwise confidential and exempt under subsection (1) of this section may be
reviewed and copied: (a) By the officer involved or the officer's counsel or
authorized representative, who may review the officer's file and may submit any
additional exculpatory or explanatory evidence, statements, or other
information, any of which must be included in the file; (b) by a duly
authorized representative of (i) the agency of termination, or (ii) a current
employing law enforcement agency, which may review and copy its
employee-officer's file; or (c) by a representative of or investigator for the
commission.

(3) Records which are
otherwise confidential and exempt under subsection (1) of this section may also
be inspected at the offices of the commission by a duly authorized
representative of a law enforcement agency considering an application for employment
by a person who is the subject of a record. A copy of records which are
otherwise confidential and exempt under subsection (1) of this section may
later be obtained by an agency after it hires the applicant. In all other
cases under this subsection, the agency may not obtain a copy of the record.

(4) Upon a
determination that a complaint is without merit, that a personnel action report
filed under section 6 of this act does not merit action by the commission, or
that a matter otherwise investigated by the commission does not merit action,
the commission shall purge records addressed in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) The hearings, but
not the deliberations, of the hearings board are open to the public. The
transcripts, admitted evidence, and written decisions of the hearings board on
behalf of the commission are not confidential or exempt from public disclosure,
and are subject to subpoena and discovery proceedings in civil actions.

(6) Every individual,
legal entity, and agency of federal, state, or local government is immune from
civil liability, whether direct or derivative, for providing information to the
commission in good faith.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. Sections 2 through 12 and
14 of this act are each added to chapter 43.101 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002.

---
END ---