BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 36.28A

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) The Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs

_8 shall integrate a victim notification system into its
electronic

_9 statewide city and county jail booking and reporting system

10 described in RCW 36.28A.040.

11 (2) At a minimum, the victim notification system shall
provide

12 to victims of crime who have made a notification request,

13 notification of the release or transfer of an incarcerated
person

14 from a local jail, juvenile detention facility, or release
from a

15 partial confinement program operated by a city or county.

16 Sec. 2. RCW 36.28A.040
and 2000 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read

17 as follows:

p. 1 HB
1063

_1 (1) No later than December 31, 2001, the Washington
association

_2 of sheriffs and police chiefs shall implement and
operate an

_3 electronic statewide city and county jail booking and
reporting

_4 system. The system shall serve as a central repository
and instant

_5 information source for offender information and jail
statistical

_6 data. The system shall be placed on the Washington
state justice

_7 information network and be capable of communicating
electronically

_8 with every Washington state city and county jail and
with all

_9 other Washington state criminal justice agencies as
defined in RCW

10 10.97.030.

11 (2) After the Washington association of sheriffs and
police

12 chiefs has implemented an electronic jail booking system
as

13 described in subsection (1) of this section, if a city
or county

14 jail or law enforcement agency receives state or federal
funding

15 to cover the entire cost of implementing or
reconfiguring an

16 electronic jail booking system, the city or county jail
or law

17 enforcement agency shall implement or reconfigure an
electronic

18 jail booking system that is in compliance with the jail
booking

19 system standards developed pursuant to subsection (4) of
this

20 section.

21 (3) After the Washington association of sheriffs and
police

22 chiefs has implemented an electronic jail booking system
as

23 described in subsection (1) of this section, city or
county jails,

24 or law enforcement agencies that operate electronic jail
booking

25 systems, but choose not to accept state or federal money
to

26 implement or reconfigure electronic jail booking
systems, shall

27 electronically forward jail booking information to the
Washington

28 association of sheriffs and police chiefs. At a minimum
the

29 information forwarded shall include the name of the
offender,

30 vital statistics, the date the offender was arrested,
the offenses

31 arrested for, the date and time an offender is
released or

32 transferred from a city or county jail, a city or
county juvenile

33 detention facility, or a partial confinement program
that is

34 operated by a city or county, and if available,
the mug shot. The

35 electronic format in which the information is sent shall
be at the

36 discretion of the city or county jail, or law
enforcement agency

37 forwarding the information. City and county jails or
law

HB 1063 p. 2

_1 enforcement agencies that forward jail booking
information under

_2 this subsection are not required to comply with the
standards

_3 developed under subsection (4)(b) of this section.

_4 (4) The Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs

_5 shall appoint, convene, and manage a statewide jail
booking and

_6 reporting system standards committee. The committee
shall include

_7 representatives from the Washington association of
sheriffs and

_8 police chiefs correction committee, the information
service

_9 board's justice information committee, the judicial
information

10 system, at least two individuals who serve as jailers in
a city or

11 county jail, and other individuals that the Washington
association

12 of sheriffs and police chiefs places on the committee.
The

13 committee shall have the authority to:

14 (a) Develop and amend as needed standards for the
statewide

15 jail booking and reporting system and for the
information that

16 must be contained within the system. At a minimum, the
system shall

17 contain:

18 (i) The offenses the individual has been charged
with;

19 (ii) Descriptive and personal information about each
offender

20 booked into a city or county jail. At a minimum, this
information

21 shall contain the offender's name, vital statistics,
address, and

22 mugshot;

23 (iii) Information about the offender while in jail,
which could

24 be used to protect criminal justice officials that have
future

25 contact with the offender, such as medical conditions,
acts of

26 violence, and other behavior problems;

27 (iv) Statistical data indicating the current
capacity of each

28 jail and the quantity and category of offenses charged;
((and))

29 (v) The ability to communicate directly and
immediately with

30 the city and county jails and other criminal justice
entities; and

31 (vi) The date and time that an offender was
released or

32 transferred from a local jail, juvenile detention
facility, or

33 released from a partial confinement program operated
by a city or

34 county;

35 (b) Develop and amend as needed operational
standards for city

36 and county jail booking systems, which at a minimum
shall include

37 the type of information collected and transmitted, and
the

p. 3 HB
1063

_1 technical requirements needed for the city and county
jail booking

_2 system to communicate with the statewide jail booking
and

_3 reporting system;

_4 (c) Develop and amend as needed standards for
allocating grants

_5 to city and county jails or law enforcement agencies
that will be

_6 implementing or reconfiguring electronic jail booking
systems.

_7 (5) By January 1, 2001, the standards committee
shall complete

_8 the initial standards described in subsection (4) of
this section,

_9 and the standards shall be placed into a report and
provided to

10 all Washington state city and county jails, all other
criminal

11 justice agencies as defined in RCW 10.97.030, the chair
of the

12 Washington state senate human services and corrections
committee,

13 and the chair of the Washington state house of
representatives

14 criminal justice and corrections committee.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1063 p. 4