BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.18.010 and 1990 c
59 s 78 are each amended to read as follows:

Candidates for the
following offices shall be nominated at partisan primaries held pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter:

(1) Congressional
offices;

(2) All state offices except
(a) judicial offices and (b) the office of superintendent of public
instruction;

(3) All county offices
except (a) judicial offices, (b) sheriff, except in a county for which the
position is declared to be a partisan office by the county's home rule charter,
and (((b))) (c) those offices where a county home rule charter
provides otherwise.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.21.010 and 1990 c
59 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

All city and town
primaries shall be nonpartisan. Primaries for special purpose districts,
except those districts that require ownership of property within the district
as a prerequisite to voting, shall be nonpartisan. Primaries for the office
of county sheriff shall be nonpartisan except in a county for which the
position is declared to be a partisan office by the county's home rule charter.
City, town, county sheriff, and district primaries shall be held as
provided in RCW 29.13.070.

The purpose of this
section is to establish the holding of a primary, subject to the exemptions in
RCW 29.21.015, as a uniform procedural requirement to the holding of city,
town, county sheriff, and district elections. These provisions
supersede any and all other statutes, whether general or special in nature,
having different election requirements.

Sec. 3. RCW 29.21.015 and 1998 c
19 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No primary may be
held for any single position in any city, town, district, ((or))
district court, or for the nonpartisan position of county sheriff, as
required by RCW 29.21.010, if, after the last day allowed for candidates to
withdraw, there are no more than two candidates filed for the position. The
county auditor shall, as soon as possible, notify all the candidates so
affected that the office for which they filed will not appear on the primary
ballot.

(2) No primary may be
held for the office of commissioner of a park and recreation district or for
the office of cemetery district commissioner.

(3) Names of candidates
for offices that do not appear on the primary ballot shall be printed upon the
general election ballot in the manner specified by RCW 29.30.025.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.21.070 and 1990 c
59 s 91 are each amended to read as follows:

The offices of
superintendent of public instruction, justice of the supreme court, judge of
the court of appeals, judge of the superior court, and judge of the district
court shall be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be nominated and
elected as such. Except in a county for which the position of sheriff is
declared to be a partisan office by the county's home rule charter, the office
of county sheriff shall be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be
nominated and elected as such.

All city, town, and
special purpose district elective offices shall be nonpartisan and the
candidates therefor shall be nominated and elected as such.

Sec. 5. RCW 29.30.025 and 1990 c
59 s 80 are each amended to read as follows:

After the close of
business on the last day for candidates to file for office, the filing officer
shall, from among those filings made in person and by mail, determine by lot
the order in which the names of those candidates will appear on all sample and
absentee ballots. In the case of candidates for city, town, and district
office, and for nonpartisan sheriff, this procedure shall also determine
the order for candidate names on the official primary ballot used at the
polling place. The determination shall be done publicly and may be witnessed
by the media and by any candidate. If no primary is required for any
nonpartisan office under RCW 29.15.150 or 29.21.015, the names shall appear on
the general election ballot in the order determined by lot.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 36.28 RCW to read as follows:

A vacancy
in the office of sheriff shall be filled by appointment of the board of county
commissioners.

---
END ---