BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Because of the
possibility of a natural

_5 disaster, an act of domestic terrorism, or civil unrest
that

_6 requires law enforcement response for the protection of
persons or

_7 property and preservation of the peace, the need exists to
ensure

_8 that the state is adequately prepared to respond to such
an

_9 incident. There is a need to establish a mechanism and a

10 procedure to provide for reimbursement to law enforcement
agencies

11 that respond to help others in time of need, and to host
law

12 enforcement agencies that experience expenses beyond the
resources

13 of the agencies, and generally to protect the public
safety,

14 peace, health, lives, and property of the people of
Washington.

15 It is hereby declared necessary to:

16 (1) Provide the policy and organizational structure
for large-

17 scale mobilization of law enforcement resources in the
state

p. 1 HB
1065

_1 through creation of the Washington state law enforcement

_2 mobilization plan;

_3 (2) Confer upon the adjutant general the powers
provided in

_4 this chapter;

_5 (3) Provide a means for reimbursement to law
enforcement

_6 jurisdictions that incur expenses when mobilized by the
adjutant

_7 general under the Washington state law enforcement
mobilization

_8 plan; and

_9 (4) Provide for reimbursement of the host law
enforcement

10 agency when it has:

11 (a) Exhausted all of its resources; and

12 (b) Invoked its local mutual aid network and
exhausted those

13 resources. Upon implementation of state law enforcement

14 mobilization, the host resources shall become state law

15 enforcement mobilization resources consistent with the
law

16 enforcement mobilization plan. It is the intent of the

17 legislature that mutual aid and other interlocal
agreements

18 providing for enhanced emergency response be encouraged
as

19 essential to the public peace, safety, health, and
welfare, and

20 for the protection of the lives and property of the
people of the

21 state of Washington. If possible, mutual aid agreements
should be

22 without stated limitations as to resources available,
time, or

23 area. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed or
interpreted

24 to limit the eligibility of any nonhost fire protection
authority

25 for reimbursement of expenses incurred in providing law

26 enforcement resources for mobilization.

27 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Unless the context
clearly requires

28 otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this

29 chapter.

30 (1) "Agency" means any general purpose law
enforcement agency

31 as defined by law.

32 (2) "Adjutant general" means the adjutant
general of the

33 military department.

34 (3) "Department" means the military
department.

35 (4) "State law enforcement coordinator"
means a designated

36 individual or agency selected by the Washington
association of

HB 1065 p. 2

_1 sheriffs and police chiefs executive board to perform
the

_2 responsibilities of that position.

_3 (5) "Chief law enforcement officer" means
the chief of police

_4 or sheriff responsible for law enforcement services in
the

_5 jurisdiction in which the emergency is occurring.

_6 (6) "Jurisdiction" means a general
authority Washington law

_7 enforcement agency as defined in RCW 10.93.020.

_8 (7) "General authority Washington peace
officer" means a

_9 general authority Washington peace officer as defined in
RCW

10 10.93.020.

11 (8) "Mobilization" means that law
enforcement resources beyond

12 those available through existing agreements will be
requested and

13 when available, sent in response to an emergency or
disaster

14 situation that has exceeded the capabilities of
available local

15 resources. During a large-scale emergency, mobilization
may

16 include the redistribution of regional or statewide law

17 enforcement resources to either direct emergency
incident

18 assignments or to assignments in communities where law
enforcement

19 resources are needed. When mobilization is declared and

20 authorized as provided in this chapter, all law
enforcement

21 resources including those of the host law enforcement
jurisdiction

22 shall be mobilized under this chapter, including those
that

23 responded earlier under an existing mutual aid or other

24 agreement. All nonhost law enforcement authorities
providing

25 resources in response to a mobilization declaration
shall be

26 eligible for expense reimbursement as provided by this
chapter

27 from the time of the mobilization declaration.

28 (9) "Mutual aid" means emergency
interagency assistance

29 provided without compensation under an agreement between

30 jurisdictions under chapter 39.34 RCW.

31 (10) "Resource coordination" means the
effort to locate and

32 arrange for the delivery of resources needed by chief
law

33 enforcement officers and incident commanders. Resource

34 coordination involving the mobilization of law
enforcement and

35 other support resources within a region is the
responsibility of

36 the regional law enforcement coordinator. In the case
of

37 incidents involving more than one region or when
resources from

38 more than one region must be mobilized, the state law
enforcement

p. 3 HB
1065

_1 coordinator has the primary responsibility for resource

_2 coordination in conjunction with the regional fire
resource

_3 coordinators.

_4

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The state law
enforcement mobilization

_6 policy board shall be established by the Washington
association of

_7 sheriffs and police chiefs and shall be representative of
the

_8 established regions. The board shall review and make

_9 recommendations to the adjutant general on the refinement
and

10 maintenance of the Washington state law enforcement
mobilization

11 plan; which shall include the procedures to be used during
an

12 emergency or disaster response requiring coordination of local,

13 regional, and state law enforcement jurisdiction
resources. In

14 carrying out this duty, the law enforcement mobilization
policy

15 board shall consult with and solicit recommendations from

16 representatives of the state and local law enforcement and

17 emergency management organizations, and regional law
enforcement

18 mobilization committees. The Washington state law
enforcement

19 mobilization plan shall be consistent with, and made a
part of the

20 Washington state comprehensive emergency management plan.
The

21 adjutant general shall review the law enforcement
mobilization

22 plan as submitted by the law enforcement mobilization
policy

23 board, recommend changes that may be necessary, and
approve the

24 law enforcement mobilization plan for inclusion within the
state

25 comprehensive emergency management plan. It is the
responsibility

26 of the adjutant general to mobilize jurisdictions under
the

27 Washington state law enforcement mobilization plan. The

28 Washington state association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall

29 appoint a state law enforcement resources coordinator and
an

30 alternate who shall serve in that capacity when the law

31 enforcement mobilization plan is activated.

32 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Regions within the
state are initially

33 established as follows but may be adjusted as necessary by
the

34 state law enforcement policy board, but should remain
consistent

35 with the Washington state fire defense regions:

36 (1) Central region - Grays Harbor, Thurston,
Pacific, and Lewis

37 counties;

HB 1065 p. 4

_1 (2) Lower Columbia region - Kittitas, Yakima,
and Klickitat

_2 counties;

_3 (3) Mid-Columbia region - Chelan, Douglas,
and Grant counties;

_4 (4) Northeast region - Okanogan, Ferry,
Stevens, Pend Oreille,

_5 Spokane, and Lincoln counties;

_6 (5) Northwest region - Whatcom, Skagit,
Snohomish, San Juan,

_7 and Island counties;

_8 (6) Olympic region - Clallam and Jefferson
counties;

_9 (7) South Puget Sound region - Kitsap, Mason,
King, and Pierce

10 counties;

11 (8) Southeast region - Benton, Franklin,
Walla Walla, Columbia,

12 Whitman, Garfield, and Asotin counties;

13 (9) Southwest region - Wahkiakum, Cowlitz,
Clark, and Skamania

14 counties.

15 Within each of these regions there is created a
regional law

16 enforcement coordinating committee. The committee shall
consist

17 of the sheriff of each county in the region, the
district

18 commander of the Washington state patrol and a number of
police

19 chiefs within the region equivalent to the number of
counties

20 within the region plus one, and the director of the
counties'

21 emergency management office. Members of each regional
board shall

22 select a chair and a secretary as officers. Members serving
on

23 the regional boards shall do so on a voluntary capacity
and are

24 not eligible for reimbursement for meeting-related
expenses from

25 the state. Regional committees shall develop regional
law

26 enforcement service plans that include provisions for
organized

27 law enforcement agencies to respond across municipal,
county, or

28 regional boundaries. Each regional plan shall be
consistent with

29 the incident command system, the Washington state law
enforcement

30 mobilization plan, and regional response plans already
adopted and

31 in use in the state. The regional boards shall work
with the

32 relevant local government entities to facilitate
development of

33 intergovernmental agreements if any such agreements are
required

34 to implement a regional law enforcement response plan.
Each

35 regional plan shall be approved by the state law
enforcement

36 mobilization policy board before implementation.

37 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The department in
consultation with the

p. 5 HB
1065

_1 office of financial management shall develop procedures
to

_2 facilitate reimbursement to jurisdictions from
appropriate federal

_3 and state funds when jurisdictions are mobilized by the
adjutant

_4 general under the Washington state law enforcement
mobilization

_5 plan. The department shall ensure that these procedures
provide

_6 reimbursement to the host agency in as timely a manner
as

_7 possible.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 5 of
this act

_9 constitute a new chapter in Title 38 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1065 p. 6