BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.101.080 and 1982
c 124 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall
have all of the following powers:

(1) To meet at such
times and places as it may deem proper;

(2) To adopt any rules
and regulations as it may deem necessary;

(3) To contract for
services as it deems necessary in order to carry out its duties and
responsibilities;

(4) To cooperate with
and secure the cooperation of any department, agency, or instrumentality in
state, county, and city government, and other commissions affected by or
concerned with the business of the commission;

(5) To do any and all
things necessary or convenient to enable it fully and adequately to perform its
duties and to exercise the power granted to it;

(6) To select and
employ an executive director, and to empower him to perform such duties and
responsibilities as it may deem necessary;

(7) To assume legal,
fiscal, and program responsibility for all training conducted by the
commission;

(8) To establish, by
rule and regulation, standards for the training of criminal justice personnel
where such standards are not prescribed by statute;

(9) To own,
establish, and operate, or to contract with other qualified institutions
or organizations for the operation of, training and education programs for
criminal justice personnel and to purchase, lease, or otherwise
acquire, subject to the approval of the department of general
administration, a training facility or facilities necessary to the conducting
of such programs((: PROVIDED, That the commission shall not have the power
to invest any moneys received by it from any source for the purchase of a
training facility without prior approval of the legislature));

(10) To establish, by
rule and regulation, minimum curriculum standards for all training programs
conducted for employed criminal justice personnel;

(11) To review and approve
or reject standards for instructors of training programs for criminal justice
personnel, and to employ personnel on a temporary basis as instructors without
any loss of employee benefits to those instructors;

(12) To direct the
development of alternative, innovate, and interdisciplinary training
techniques;

(13) To review and
approve or reject training programs conducted for criminal justice personnel
and rules establishing and prescribing minimum training and education standards
recommended by the training standards and education boards;

(14) To allocate
financial resources among training and education programs conducted by the
commission;

(15) To allocate
training facility space among training and education programs conducted by the
commission;

(16) To issue diplomas
certifying satisfactory completion of any training or education program
conducted or approved by the commission to any person so completing such a
program;

(17) To provide for the
employment of such personnel as may be practical to serve as temporary
replacements for any person engaged in a basic training program as defined by
the commission;

(18) To establish rules
and regulations recommended by the training standards and education boards
prescribing minimum standards relating to physical, mental and moral fitness
which shall govern the recruitment of criminal justice personnel where such
standards are not prescribed by statute or constitutional provision.

All rules and
regulations adopted by the commission shall be adopted and administered
pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and the open
public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The legislature
authorizes the department of general administration to transfer the Washington
state training and conference center located at 19010 First Avenue, Burien,
Washington, 98148, to the criminal justice training commission.

---
END ---