BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 2.08.064
and 1997 c 347 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 There shall be in the counties of Benton and
Franklin jointly,

_7 ((five)) six judges of the superior court;
in the county of

_8 Clallam, two judges of the superior court; in the county
of

_9 Jefferson, one judge of the superior court; in the
county of

10 Snohomish, fifteen judges of the superior court; in the
counties

11 of Asotin, Columbia and Garfield jointly, one judge of
the

12 superior court; in the county of Cowlitz, four judges of
the

13 superior court; in the counties of Klickitat and
Skamania jointly,

14 one judge of the superior court.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The additional
judicial position for the

16 counties of Benton and Franklin jointly, created by
section 1 of

17 this act, is effective only if, prior to May 1, 2006,
Benton and

p. 1 SHB
1068

_1 Franklin county each through its duly constituted
legislative

_2 authority documents its approval of the additional
position and

_3 its agreement that it will pay out of county funds,
without

_4 reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the
additional

_5 judicial position as provided by state law or the state

_6 Constitution. As between the counties, the amount of
the judge's

_7 salary to be paid by each county shall be in accordance
with RCW

_8 2.08.110 unless otherwise agreed upon by the counties
involved.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1068 p. 2