BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.85.140 and 2000 c
107 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Habitat project
lists shall be submitted to the salmon recovery funding board for funding ((by
January 1st and July 1st of each year beginning in 2000)) at least once
a year on a schedule established by the board. The board shall provide the
legislature with a list of the proposed projects and a list of the projects
funded by October 1st of each year ((beginning in 2000)) for
informational purposes.

(2) The interagency
committee for outdoor recreation shall track all funds allocated for salmon
habitat projects and salmon recovery activities on behalf of the board,
including both funds allocated by the board and funds allocated by other state
or federal agencies for salmon recovery or water quality improvement.

(3)
Beginning in December 2000, the board shall provide a biennial report to the
governor and the legislature on salmon recovery expenditures. This report
shall be coordinated with the state of the salmon report required under RCW
77.85.020.

--- END ---