BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.160.170 and 1990
c 33 s 143 are each amended to read as follows:

Each district shall
submit to the superintendent of public instruction ((during October)) not
later than November 15th of each year a report containing the following:

(1)(a) The number of
eligible students transported to and from school as provided for in RCW
28A.160.150 for the current school year and the number of miles estimated to be
driven for pupil transportation services, along with a map describing student
route stop locations and school locations, and (b) the number of miles driven
for pupil transportation services as authorized in RCW 28A.160.150 the previous
school year; and

(2) Other operational
data and descriptions as required by the superintendent to determine allocation
requirements for each district.

Each
district shall submit the information required in this section on a timely
basis as a condition of the continuing receipt of school transportation moneys.

--- END ---