BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.71.095 and 1996 c
191 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission may,
without examination, issue a limited license to persons who possess the
qualifications set forth herein:

(1) The commission may,
upon the written request of the secretary of the department of social and
health services or the secretary of corrections, issue a limited license to
practice medicine in this state to persons who have been accepted for
employment by the department of social and health services or the department of
corrections as physicians; who are licensed to practice medicine in another
state of the United States or in the country of Canada or any province or
territory thereof; and who meet all of the qualifications for licensure set
forth in RCW 18.71.050.

Such license shall
permit the holder thereof to practice medicine only in connection with
patients, residents, or inmates of the state institutions under the control and
supervision of the secretary of the department of social and health services or
the department of corrections.

(2) The commission may
issue a limited license to practice medicine in this state to persons who have
been accepted for employment by a county or city health department as
physicians; who are licensed to practice medicine in another state of the
United States or in the country of Canada or any province or territory thereof;
and who meet all of the qualifications for licensure set forth in RCW
18.71.050.

Such license shall
permit the holder thereof to practice medicine only in connection with his or
her duties in employment with the city or county health department.

(3) Upon receipt of a
completed application showing that the applicant meets all of the requirements
for licensure set forth in RCW 18.71.050 except for completion of two years of
postgraduate medical training, and that the applicant has been appointed as a
resident physician in a program of postgraduate clinical training in this state
approved by the commission, the commission may issue a limited license to a
resident physician. Such license shall permit the resident physician to practice
medicine only in connection with his or her duties as a resident physician and
shall not authorize the physician to engage in any other form of practice.
Each resident physician shall practice medicine only under the supervision and
control of a physician licensed in this state, but such supervision and control
shall not be construed to necessarily require the personal presence of the
supervising physician at the place where services are rendered.

(4)(a) Upon nomination
by the dean of the school of medicine at the University of Washington or the
chief executive officer of a hospital or other appropriate health care facility
licensed in the state of Washington, the commission may issue a limited license
to a physician applicant invited to serve as a teaching-research member of the
institution's instructional staff if the sponsoring institution and the
applicant give evidence that he or she has graduated from a recognized medical
school and has been licensed or otherwise privileged to practice medicine at
his or her location of origin. Such license shall permit the recipient to
practice medicine only within the confines of the instructional program
specified in the application and shall terminate whenever the holder ceases to
be involved in that program, or at the end of one year, whichever is earlier.
Upon request of the applicant and the institutional authority, the license may
be renewed ((for no more than a total of two years)).

(b) Upon nomination by
the dean of the school of medicine of the University of Washington or the chief
executive officer of any hospital or appropriate health care facility licensed
in the state of Washington, the commission may issue a limited license to an
applicant selected by the sponsoring institution to be enrolled in one of its
designated departmental or divisional fellowship programs provided that the
applicant shall have graduated from a recognized medical school and has been
granted a license or other appropriate certificate to practice medicine in the
location of the applicant's origin. Such license shall permit the holder only
to practice medicine within the confines of the fellowship program to which he
or she has been appointed and, upon the request of the applicant and the
sponsoring institution, the license may be renewed by the commission for no
more than a total of two years.

All persons licensed
under this section shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the commission to
the same extent as other members of the medical profession, in accordance with
this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW.

Persons applying for
licensure and renewing licenses pursuant to this section shall comply with
administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined as
provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. Any person who obtains a limited
license pursuant to this section may apply for licensure under this chapter,
but shall submit a new application form and comply with all other licensing
requirements of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---