BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 80.36

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) The transport portion of any publicly offered
service that

_8 includes transport of information to and from the internet,
but

_9 not any information portion of such service, is considered
a

10 telecommunications service under the laws of this state, if
it is

11 accomplished over a cable system. The entity providing
such

12 transport is a telecommunications carrier under the laws of
this

13 state, and with respect to such transport is subject to
section

14 251 of the telecommunications act of 1996 (47 U.S.C. Sec.
251)

15 including its provisions for state commission enforcement
of the

16 telecommunications act. There is no exception, exclusion,

17 exemption, or waiver of this section based on a claim that
the

p. 1 HB
1077

_1 system used is a cable system, that the provider is a
cable

_2 operator, or that the service is a cable service under
applicable

_3 federal law.

_4 (2) Without limiting subsection (1) of this section,
no entity

_5 providing such telecommunications services shall, as to
its

_6 pricing and provision of such services, make or grant
any

_7 preference or advantage to any person requiring such
services nor

_8 subject any such person to any prejudice or competitive

_9 disadvantage with respect to such services. The price
the

10 telecommunications carrier charges for such
telecommunications

11 services shall be nondiscriminatory and shall not exceed
the price

12 it charges entities affiliated by common ownership or
control, or

13 imputes to itself, whichever is lesser.

14 (3) To the extent any such telecommunications
services subject

15 to this section are interstate in nature, the provisions
of this

16 section shall apply only with respect to the
telecommunications

17 carrier's obligations arising under section 251 of the

18 telecommunications act of 1996 (47 U.S.C. Sec. 251) to
the extent

19 the state has jurisdiction to enforce section 251 by
delegation of

20 authority or otherwise, and such other matters with
respect to

21 which the state may have jurisdiction pursuant to law or
rule.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1077 p. 2