BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 71.09

_9 RCW to read as follows:

10 The department of social and health services shall
establish

11 procedures for locating state operated facilities, or
facilities

12 of contract agents of the department, that are used to
house

13 and/or provide inpatient treatment for sexually violent
predators

14 who have been determined to be eligible for release to a
less

15 restrictive alternative than being confined in a secure
facility

16 under RCW 71.09.060. These procedures must include
criteria for the

17 department to determine the appropriateness of the
location of

18 these inpatient facilities. These procedures must
include a

p. 1 HB
1078

_1 public announcement of the proposed location of such a
facility at

_2 least ninety days prior to the actual use of a facility
or

_3 location for these purposes.

_4 Location of such a facility may be authorized by a
conditional

_5 or special use permit process included in an ordinance
adopted

_6 prior to, or up to sixty days after, the announcement of
the

_7 intent by the department to locate such a facility in an
area.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 43.63A

_9 RCW to read as follows:

10 The department of community, trade, and economic
development

11 shall develop model local ordinances for a conditional
or special

12 use permit process to authorize the location of
facilities used to

13 house and/or provide inpatient treatment for sexually
violent

14 predators who have been determined to be eligible for
release to a

15 less restrictive alternative than being confined in a
secure

16 facility under RCW 71.09.060.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1078 p. 2