BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
shall approve names for new or existing buildings on the state capitol grounds
based upon recommendations from the state capitol committee and the director of
the department of general administration, with the advice of the capitol campus
design advisory committee, subject to the following limitations:

(a) An existing
building may be renamed only after a substantial renovation or a change in the
predominant tenant agency headquartered in the building.

(b) A new or existing
building may be named or renamed after:

(i) An individual who
has played a significant role in Washington history;

(ii) The purpose of the
building;

(iii) The single or predominant
tenant agency headquartered in the building;

(iv) A significant
place name or natural place in Washington;

(v) A Native American
tribe located in Washington;

(vi) A group of people
or type of person;

(vii) Any other
appropriate person consistent with this section as recommended by the director
of the department of general administration.

(c) The names on the
facades of the state capitol group shall not be removed.

(2) The legislature
shall approve names for new or existing public rooms or spaces on state capitol
grounds based upon recommendations from the state capitol committee and the
director of the department of general administration, with the advice of the
capitol campus design advisory committee, subject to the following limitations:

(a) An existing room or
space may be renamed only after a substantial renovation;

(b) A new or existing
room or space may be named or renamed only after:

(i) An individual who
has played a significant role in Washington history;

(ii) The purpose of the
room or space;

(iii) A significant
place name or natural place in Washington;

(iv) A Native American
tribe located in Washington;

(v) A group of people
or type of person;

(vi) Any other
appropriate person consistent with this section as recommended by the director
of the department of general administration.

(3) When naming or
renaming buildings, rooms, and spaces under this section, consideration must be
given to: (a) Any disparity that exists with respect to the gender of persons
after whom buildings, rooms, and spaces are named on the state capitol grounds;
(b) the diversity of human achievement; and (c) the diversity of the state's
citizenry and history. When naming or renaming a building, room, or space
after a person or a group significant in Washington history, it shall be after
the tenth anniversary of the person's death or death of the last surviving
member of the group.

(4) For
purposes of this section, "state capitol grounds" means buildings and
land owned by the state and otherwise designated as state capitol grounds,
including the west capitol campus, the east capitol campus, the north capitol
campus, the Tumwater campus, the Lacey campus, Sylvester Park, Centennial Park,
the Old Capitol Building, and Capitol Lake.

--- END ---