BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Children are our future.
We spend millions of dollars educating Washington state children to ensure that
their future is as bright as possible. But, in order for our children to
learn, they must be healthy. They need strong minds as well as strong bodies.
According to Washington state data, one or two children in every Washington
classroom is suffering from serious emotional and behavioral problems. Suicide
is the second leading cause of death among adolescents.

The legislature finds
that without comparable mental health benefits for children, families are often
unable to pay for needed services. As a result, many children do without the
treatment they need, which significantly impacts their ability to learn, and
their opportunities for a productive future.

For adults national
data suggest that in any given year one in ten Americans experiences a mental
disorder, and one in five Americans will have a mental disorder during his or
her lifetime that requires treatment.

The current disparity
between coverage of mental health services and coverage for medical/surgical
services places Washington state citizens at unreasonable financial risk. Most
insurance policies have no stop loss for mental health costs. Not only does
this create a significant barrier to appropriate treatment, it can also lead to
severe financial loss.

The legislature finds
that the costs for leaving mental disorders untreated or undertreated are
enormous, and often include: Decreased job productivity, increased job
turnover, loss of employment, increased disability costs, deteriorating school
performance, increased use of other health care services, treatment delays
leading to more costly treatments, suicide, family breakdown and
impoverishment, and institutionalization, whether in hospitals, juvenile
detention, jails, or prisons.

Therefore, the
legislature intends to require comparable mental health coverage for children
and catastrophic mental health coverage for adults under the terms of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of
this section, "mental health services" means: (a) Outpatient and
inpatient services provided to treat any of the mental disorders covered by the
diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the diagnostic and
statistical manual of mental disorders on the effective date of this section,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the authority by rule, consistent
with the purposes of chapter . . ., Laws of 2001 (this act), except V
codes and those codes defining substance abuse disorders, 291.0 through 292.9
and 303.0 through 305.9 as of the effective date of this section; and (b)
prescription drugs, if the plan contract otherwise includes coverage for
prescription drugs.

(2) Each health plan
offered to public employees and their covered dependents under this chapter
that is not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW and is established or
renewed after July 1, 2002, and that provides coverage for hospital or medical
care, shall provide coverage for mental health services as follows:

(a) For children, as
that term is defined in the policy, the health plan shall only impose treatment
limitations or financial requirements on coverage for mental health services,
if the same limitations or requirements are imposed on coverage for medical and
surgical services. This includes but is not limited to copays, cost sharing,
annual or lifetime dollar limits, outpatient visit limits, outpatient day
limits, and inpatient limits. Wellness and preventive services that are
reimbursed at one hundred percent without deductible, coinsurance, or other
cost sharing are excluded from this comparison.

(i) If a plan requires
annual deductibles, a separate deductible for mental health services is
allowed. The annual deductible for mental health services may not be greater
than the annual deductible for medical and surgical services. This does not
preclude a plan with pharmacy benefits from establishing a separate deductible
for those benefits if it applies to all prescription drugs.

(ii) If a plan has
maximum out-of-pocket limits, one single annual maximum out-of-pocket limit for
medical and surgical and mental health services is required. This subsection
(2)(a)(ii) does not preclude a plan with pharmacy benefits from excluding
prescription drugs from the out-of-pocket limit as long as all prescription
drugs are treated equivalently.

(b) For adults, the
provisions of subsection (1)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section apply, except that
plans are allowed to have differential copays or coinsurance requirements,
which means that plans may have a greater copay or coinsurance for mental
health services than for medical and surgical services. However, the copay or
coinsurance for mental health services may be no greater than as of January 1,
2001.

(3) Each health plan is
required to use those managed care tools necessary for the cost-effective
management of this act to include but not be limited to the use of preauthorization
screening prior to authorizing the delivery of mental health services or the
requirement that mental health services must be medically necessary as
determined by its medical director or his or her designee. Managed care
requirements for mental health services may be different from those for medical
and surgical services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 48.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of
this section, "mental health services" means: (a) Outpatient and
inpatient services provided to treat any of the mental disorders covered by the
diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the diagnostic and
statistical manual of mental disorders on the effective date of this section or
such subsequent date as may be provided by the insurance commissioner by rule,
consistent with the purposes of chapter . . ., Laws of 2001 (this
act), except V codes and those codes defining substance abuse disorders, 291.0
through 292.9 and 303.0 through 305.9 as of the effective date of this section;
and (b) prescription drugs, if the insurance contract otherwise includes
coverage for prescription drugs.

(2) All group
disability insurance contracts and blanket disability insurance contracts providing
health care services to groups with fifty or more persons, issued or renewed
after July 1, 2002, and for groups with at least twenty-five persons but fewer
than fifty persons, issued or renewed after July 1, 2003, that provide coverage
for hospital or medical care shall provide coverage for mental health services
as follows:

(a) For children as
that term is defined in the policy, the contracts shall only impose treatment
limitations or financial requirements on coverage for mental health services,
if the same limitations or requirements are imposed on coverage for medical and
surgical services. This includes but is not limited to copays, cost sharing,
annual or lifetime dollar limits, outpatient visit limits, outpatient day
limits, and inpatient limits. Wellness and preventive services that are
reimbursed at one hundred percent without deductible, coinsurance, or other
cost sharing are excluded from this comparison.

(i) If a contract
requires annual deductibles, a separate annual deductible for mental health
services is allowed. The annual deductible for mental health services may not
be greater than the annual deductible for medical and surgical services. This
does not preclude a plan with pharmacy benefits from establishing a separate
deductible for those benefits if it applies to all prescription drugs.

(ii) If a plan has
maximum out-of-pocket limits, one single annual maximum out-of-pocket limit for
medical and surgical and mental health services is required. This subsection
(2)(a)(ii) does not preclude a plan with pharmacy benefits from excluding
prescription drugs from the out-of-pocket limit as long as all prescription
drugs are treated equivalently.

(b) For adults,
subsection (1)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section apply, except that insurance
contracts are allowed to have differential copays or coinsurance requirements,
which means that contracts may have a greater copay or coinsurance for mental
health services than for medical and surgical services. However, the copay or
coinsurance for mental health services may be no greater than as of January 1,
2001.

(3) This section does
not prohibit an insurer from requiring the use of preauthorization screening
prior to authorizing the delivery of mental health services or the requirement
that mental health services must be medically necessary as determined by its
medical director or his or her designee or other managed care tools. Managed
care requirements for mental health services may be different from those for
medical and surgical services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 48.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of
this section, "mental health services" means: (a) Outpatient and
inpatient services provided to treat any of the mental disorders covered by the
diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the diagnostic and
statistical manual of mental disorders on the effective date of this section,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the insurance commissioner by
rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter . . ., Laws of 2001
(this act), except V codes and those codes defining substance abuse disorders,
291.0 through 292.9 and 303.0 through 305.9 as of the effective date of this
section; and (b) prescription drugs, if the contract otherwise includes
coverage for prescription drugs.

(2) All health care
service contracts for groups with fifty or more persons, issued or renewed after
July 1, 2002, and for groups with at least twenty-five persons but fewer than
fifty persons, issued or renewed after July 1, 2003, that provide coverage for
hospital or medical care shall provide coverage for mental health services as
follows:

(a) For children as
that term is defined in the contract, the contract shall only impose treatment
limitations or financial requirements on coverage for mental health services,
if the same limitations or requirements are imposed on coverage for medical and
surgical services. This includes but is not limited to copays, cost sharing,
annual or lifetime dollar limits, outpatient visit limits, outpatient day
limits, and inpatient limits. Wellness and preventive services that are
reimbursed at one hundred percent without deductible, coinsurance, or other
cost sharing are excluded from this comparison.

(i) If a contract
requires annual deductibles, a separate deductible for mental health services
is allowed. The annual deductible for mental health services may not be
greater than the annual deductible for medical and surgical services. This
does not preclude a plan with pharmacy benefits from establishing a separate
deductible for those benefits if it applies to all prescription drugs.

(ii) If a plan has
maximum out-of-pocket limits, one single annual maximum out-of-pocket limit for
medical and surgical and mental health services is required. This subsection
(2)(a)(ii) does not preclude a plan with pharmacy benefits from excluding
prescription drugs from the out-of-pocket limit as long as all prescription
drugs are treated equivalently.

(b) For adults, the
provisions of subsection (1)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section apply, except that
contracts are allowed to have differential copays or coinsurance requirements,
which means that contracts may have a greater copay or coinsurance for mental
health services than for medical and surgical services. However, the copay or
coinsurance for mental health services may be no greater than as of January 1,
2001.

(3) This section does
not prohibit a health care service contractor from requiring the use of
preauthorization screening prior to authorizing the delivery of mental health
services or the requirement that mental health services must be medically
necessary as determined by its medical director or his or her designee or other
managed care tools. Managed care requirements for mental health services may
be different from those for medical and surgical services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 48.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of
this section, "mental health services" means: (a) Outpatient and
inpatient services provided to treat any of the mental disorders covered by the
diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the diagnostic and
statistical manual of mental disorders on the effective date of this section,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the insurance commissioner by
rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter . . ., Laws of 2001
(this act), except V codes and those codes defining substance abuse disorders,
291.0 through 292.9 and 303.0 through 305.9 as of the effective date of this
section; and (b) prescription drugs, if the plan contract otherwise includes
coverage for prescription drugs.

(2) All health benefit
plans offered by health maintenance organizations to groups with fifty or more
persons, issued or renewed after July 1, 2002, and for groups with at least
twenty-five persons but fewer than fifty persons, issued or renewed after July
1, 2003, that provide coverage for hospital or medical care shall provide
coverage for mental health services as follows:

(a) For children as
that term is defined in the plan, the plan shall only impose treatment
limitations or financial requirements on coverage for mental health services,
if the same limitations or requirements are imposed on coverage for medical and
surgical services. This includes but is not limited to copays, cost sharing,
annual or lifetime dollar limits, outpatient visit limits, outpatient day
limits, and inpatient limits. Wellness and preventive services that are
reimbursed at one hundred percent without deductible, coinsurance, or other
cost sharing are excluded from this comparison.

(i) If a contract
requires annual deductibles, a separate deductible for mental health services
is allowed. The annual deductible for mental health services may not be
greater than the annual deductible for medical and surgical services. This
does not preclude a plan with pharmacy benefits from establishing a separate
deductible for those benefits if it applies to all prescription drugs.

(ii) If a plan has
maximum out-of-pocket limits, one single annual maximum out-of-pocket limit for
medical and surgical and mental health services is required. This subsection
(2)(a)(ii) does not preclude a plan with pharmacy benefits from excluding
prescription drugs from the out-of-pocket limit as long as all prescription
drugs are treated equivalently.

(b) For adults,
subsection (1)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section apply, except that health
maintenance organizations are allowed to have differential copays or
coinsurance requirements, which means that they may have a greater copay or
coinsurance for mental health services than for medical/surgical services.
However, the copay or coinsurance for mental health services may be no greater
than what was in existence on January 1, 2001.

(3) This section does
not prohibit a health maintenance organization from requiring the use of
preauthorization screening prior to authorizing the delivery of mental health
services or the requirement that mental health services must be medically
necessary as determined by its medical director or his or her designee or other
managed care tools. Managed care requirements for mental health services may
be different from those for medical/surgical services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 70.47 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 70.47.060, this section governs the provision of mental
health services to subsidized enrollees in the basic health plan.

(1) For the purpose of
this section, "mental health services" means: (a) Outpatient and
inpatient services provided to treat any of the mental disorders covered by the
diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the diagnostic and
statistical manual of mental disorders on the effective date of this section,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the Washington state health care
authority by rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter . . .,
Laws of 2001 (this act), except V codes and those codes defining substance
abuse disorders, 291.0 through 292.9 and 303.0 through 305.9 as of the
effective date of this section; and (b) prescription drugs, if the plan
contract otherwise includes coverage for prescription drugs.

(2) After July 1, 2003,
the basic health plan shall provide coverage for mental health services to
subsidized children and adults as follows:

(a) For children as
that term is defined by the basic health plan, the plan shall only impose
treatment limitations or financial requirements on coverage for mental health
services, if the same limitations or requirements are imposed on coverage for
medical and surgical services. This includes but is not limited to copays,
cost sharing, annual or lifetime dollar limits, outpatient visit limits,
outpatient day limits, and inpatient limits. Wellness and preventive services
that are reimbursed at one hundred percent without deductible, coinsurance, or
other cost sharing are excluded from this comparison.

(i) If a contract
requires annual deductibles, a separate deductible for mental health services
is allowed. The annual deductible for mental health services may not be
greater than the annual deductible for medical and surgical services. This
does not preclude a plan with pharmacy benefits from establishing a separate
deductible for those benefits if it applies to all prescription drugs.

(ii) If a plan has
maximum out-of-pocket limits, one single annual maximum out-of-pocket limit for
medical and surgical and mental health services is required. This subsection
(2)(a)(ii) does not preclude a plan with pharmacy benefits from excluding
prescription drugs from the out-of-pocket limit as long as all prescription
drugs are treated equivalently.

(b) For adults,
subsection (1)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section apply, except the plan is allowed
to have differential copays or coinsurance requirements, which means that
contracts may have a greater copay or coinsurance for mental health services
than for medical and surgical services. However, the copay or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no greater than as of January 1, 2001.

(3) The plan is
required to use those managed care tools necessary for the cost-effective
management of this act to include but not be limited to the use of
preauthorization screening prior to authorizing the delivery of mental health
services and the requirement that mental health services must be medically
necessary as determined by its medical director or his or her designee.
Managed care requirements for mental health services may be different from
those for medical and surgical services.

Sec. 7. RCW 48.21.240 and 1987 c
283 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each group insurer
providing disability insurance coverage in this state for hospital or medical
care under contracts which are issued, delivered, or renewed in this state on
or after July 1, 1986, shall offer optional supplemental coverage for mental
health treatment for the insured and the insured's covered dependents.

(2) Benefits shall be
provided under the optional supplemental coverage for mental health treatment
whether treatment is rendered by: (a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71
or 18.57 RCW; (b) a psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; (c) a
community mental health agency licensed by the department of social and health
services pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW; or (d) a state hospital as defined in
RCW 72.23.010. The treatment shall be covered at the usual and customary rates
for such treatment. The insurer, health care service contractor, or health
maintenance organization providing optional coverage under the provisions of
this section for mental health services may establish separate usual and
customary rates for services rendered by physicians licensed under chapter
18.71 or 18.57 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, and
community mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW and state
hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010. However, the treatment may be subject
to contract provisions with respect to reasonable deductible amounts or
copayments. In order to qualify for coverage under this section, a licensed
community mental health agency shall have in effect a plan for quality
assurance and peer review, and the treatment shall be supervised by a physician
licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW or by a psychologist licensed under chapter
18.83 RCW.

(3) The group
disability insurance contract may provide that all the coverage for mental
health treatment is waived for all covered members if the contract holder so
states in advance in writing to the insurer.

(4) This section shall
not apply to a group disability insurance contract that has been entered into
in accordance with a collective bargaining agreement between management and
labor representatives prior to March 1, 1987.

(5) This section
does not apply to groups with fifty or more persons beginning July 1, 2002.

Sec. 8. RCW 48.44.340 and 1987 c
283 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each health care
service contractor providing hospital or medical services or benefits in this
state under group contracts for health care services under this chapter which
are issued, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 1986, shall
offer optional supplemental coverage for mental health treatment for the
insured and the insured's covered dependents.

(2) Benefits shall be
provided under the optional supplemental coverage for mental health treatment
whether treatment is rendered by: (a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71
or 18.57 RCW; (b) a psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; (c) a
community mental health agency licensed by the department of social and health
services pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW; or (d) a state hospital as defined in
RCW 72.23.010. The treatment shall be covered at the usual and customary rates
for such treatment. The insurer, health care service contractor, or health
maintenance organization providing optional coverage under the provisions of
this section for mental health services may establish separate usual and
customary rates for services rendered by physicians licensed under chapter
18.71 or 18.57 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, and
community mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW and state
hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010. However, the treatment may be subject to
contract provisions with respect to reasonable deductible amounts or
copayments. In order to qualify for coverage under this section, a licensed
community mental health agency shall have in effect a plan for quality
assurance and peer review, and the treatment shall be supervised by a physician
licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW or by a psychologist licensed under
chapter 18.83 RCW.

(3) The group contract
for health care services may provide that all the coverage for mental health
treatment is waived for all covered members if the contract holder so states in
advance in writing to the health care service contractor.

(4) This section shall
not apply to a group health care service contract that has been entered into in
accordance with a collective bargaining agreement between management and labor
representatives prior to March 1, 1987.

(5) This section
does not apply to groups with fifty or more persons beginning July 1, 2002.

Sec. 9. RCW 48.46.290 and 1987 c
283 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each health
maintenance organization providing services or benefits for hospital or medical
care coverage in this state under group health maintenance agreements which are
issued, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 1986, shall
offer optional supplemental coverage for mental health treatment to the
enrolled participant and the enrolled participant's covered dependents.

(2) Benefits shall be
provided under the optional supplemental coverage for mental health treatment
whether treatment is rendered by the health maintenance organization or the
health maintenance organization refers the enrolled participant or the enrolled
participant's covered dependents for treatment to: (a) A physician licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW; (b) a psychologist licensed under chapter
18.83 RCW; (c) a community mental health agency licensed by the department of
social and health services pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW; or (d) a state
hospital as defined in RCW 72.23.010. The treatment shall be covered at the
usual and customary rates for such treatment. The insurer, health care service
contractor, or health maintenance organization providing optional coverage
under the provisions of this section for mental health services may establish
separate usual and customary rates for services rendered by physicians licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83
RCW, and community mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW and
state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010. However, the treatment may be
subject to contract provisions with respect to reasonable deductible amounts or
copayments. In order to qualify for coverage under this section, a licensed
community mental health agency shall have in effect a plan for quality
assurance and peer review, and the treatment shall be supervised by a physician
licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW or by a psychologist licensed under
chapter 18.83 RCW.

(3) The group health
maintenance agreement may provide that all the coverage for mental health
treatment is waived for all covered members if the contract holder so states in
advance in writing to the health maintenance organization.

(4) This section shall
not apply to a group health maintenance agreement that has been entered into in
accordance with a collective bargaining agreement between management and labor
representatives prior to March 1, 1987.

(5) This section
does not apply to groups with fifty or more persons beginning July 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed, effective July 1, 2003:

(1) RCW 48.21.240 (Mental health treatment,
optional supplemental coverage--Waiver) and 1987 c 283 s 3, 1986 c 184 s 2,
& 1983 c 35 s 1;

(2) RCW 48.44.340 (Mental health treatment,
optional supplemental coverage--Waiver) and 1987 c 283 s 4, 1986 c 184 s 3,
& 1983 c 35 s 2; and

(3) RCW 48.46.290 (Mental health treatment,
optional supplemental coverage--Waiver) and 1987 c 283 s 5, 1986 c 184 s 4,
& 1983 c 35 s 3.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---