BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that there is a diminishing supply of school nurses serving the health needs of
students in the state's school districts. The supply of nurses has not
increased in proportion to school enrollment. In addition, the increasingly
complex health needs of students can no longer be adequately met by the
delegation of nursing tasks to unlicensed and untrained school personnel, such
as teachers, teacher's assistants, and secretarial staff, without compromising
the health of students and exposing school districts to legal liability. The
delegation practices in public schools of complex nursing tasks are of
questionable legality and the opportunity for error has life-threatening
consequences. Removing health barriers to learning is essential to the
successful education of students, and should be addressed in the state's school
districts by recognizing established nursing practice standards and the state's
uniform professional accountability processes. The legislature declares that
the training of registered school health aides is in the interest of public
health and safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Commission" means the nursing care quality assurance commission
created in RCW 18.79.070.

(2)
"Department" means the department of health.

(3) "School health
aide" means a person registered under this chapter who performs health
care tasks under training and supervision of a registered nurse licensed under
RCW 18.79.040. Typical health care tasks would include oral and topical
medications, clean intermittent catheterization, and clean dressing changes.

(4)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) No certificated or
noncertificated school district employee may practice or represent himself or
herself as a school health aide by use of any title or description of services
without being registered to practice by the department, unless otherwise
exempted by this chapter.

(2) Nursing tasks
delegated to a school health aide include those nursing procedures applicable
to school districts provided by law, including those tasks determined by the
commission by rule in consultation with the superintendent of public
instruction.

(3) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to affect the scope of nursing procedures applicable
to school districts as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1) The practice by an
individual licensed, certified, or registered under the laws of this state and
performing services within the authorized scope of practice;

(2) The practice by an
individual employed by the government of the United States while engaged in the
performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United States; or

(3) The practice by a
person who is a regular student in an educational program approved by the
secretary, and whose performance of services is pursuant to a regular course of
instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the general supervision
of the instructor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. In addition to any other
authority provided by law, the secretary has the authority to:

(1) Adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter;

(2) Establish all
registration, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;

(3) Establish forms and
procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4) Register any
applicants, and to deny registration to applicants who do not meet the minimum
qualifications, except that proceedings concerning the denial of registration
based upon unprofessional conduct or impairment shall be governed by the
uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(5) Hire clerical,
administrative, investigative, and other staff as needed to implement this
chapter, and hire individuals registered under this chapter to serve as
examiners for any practical examinations;

(6) Determine minimum
education or training requirements;

(7) Determine whether
alternative methods of training are equivalent to formal education, and
establish forms, procedures, and criteria for evaluation of an applicant's
alternative training to determine the applicant's eligibility for registration;

(8) Implement and
administer a program for consumer education;

(9) Adopt rules
implementing a continuing competency program; and

(10) Maintain the
official department record of all applicants and persons registered under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The secretary shall keep
an official record of all proceedings. A part of the record shall consist of a
register of all applicants for registration under this chapter and the results
of each application.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The secretary shall issue
a registration to any applicant who completes an application that identifies
the name and address of the applicant, the registration being requested, and
information required by the secretary necessary to establish whether there are
grounds for denial of a registration or issuance of a conditional registration
under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The commission, in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction, shall establish by
rule the standards and procedures for approval of educational and alternative
training programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Applications for
registration shall be submitted on forms provided by the secretary. The
secretary may require any information and documentation that reasonably relates
to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for
registration provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant
shall pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The fee shall
accompany the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The secretary shall
establish by rule the procedural requirements and fees for renewal of a
registration. Failure to renew shall invalidate the registration and all
privileges granted by the registration. If a registration has lapsed for a
period longer than three years, the person shall demonstrate competence to the
satisfaction of the secretary by taking continuing education courses, or
meeting other standards determined by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The uniform disciplinary
act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of registrations, unauthorized
practice, and the discipline of persons registered under this chapter. The
secretary is the disciplining authority under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. This chapter only applies
to a business or profession regulated under the laws of this state if this
chapter is specifically referenced in the laws regulating that business or
profession.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. Sections 1 through 13 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

---
END ---