BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
9.96A.020 and 1999 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) Subject to the exceptions in subsections (3) and
(4) of

_8 this section, and unless there is another provision of
law to the

_9 contrary, a person is not disqualified from employment
by the

10 state of Washington or any of its counties, cities,
towns,

11 municipal corporations, or quasi-municipal corporations,
nor is a

12 person disqualified to practice, pursue or engage in any

13 occupation, trade, vocation, or business for which a
license,

14 permit, certificate or registration is required to be
issued by

15 the state of Washington or any of its counties, cities,
towns,

16 municipal corporations, or quasi-municipal corporations
solely

17 because of a prior conviction of a felony. However,
this section

p. 1 HB
1086

_1 does not preclude the fact of any prior conviction of a
crime from

_2 being considered.

_3 (2) A person may be denied employment by the state
of

_4 Washington or any of its counties, cities, towns,
municipal

_5 corporations, or quasi-municipal corporations, or a
person may be

_6 denied a license, permit, certificate or registration to
pursue,

_7 practice or engage in an occupation, trade, vocation, or
business

_8 by reason of the prior conviction of a felony if the
felony for

_9 which he or she was convicted directly relates to the
position of

10 employment sought or to the specific occupation, trade,
vocation,

11 or business for which the license, permit, certificate
or

12 registration is sought, and the time elapsed since the
conviction

13 is less than ten years. However, for positions in the
county

14 treasurer's office, a person may be disqualified from
employment

15 because of a prior guilty plea or conviction of a felony
involving

16 embezzlement or theft, even if the time elapsed since
the guilty

17 plea or conviction is ten years or more.

18 (3) A person is disqualified for any certificate
required or

19 authorized under chapters 28A.405 or 28A.410 RCW,
because of a

20 prior guilty plea or the conviction of a felony
involving sexual

21 exploitation of a child under chapter 9.68A RCW, sexual
offenses

22 under chapter 9A.44 RCW where a minor is the victim,
promoting

23 prostitution of a minor under chapter 9A.88 RCW, or a
violation of

24 similar laws of another jurisdiction, even if the time
elapsed

25 since the guilty plea or conviction is ten years or
more.

26 (4) A person is disqualified from employment by
school

27 districts, educational service districts, and the
department of

28 social and health services and any of
their contractors hiring

29 employees who will have regularly scheduled unsupervised
access to

30 children, because of a prior guilty plea or conviction
of a felony

31 involving sexual exploitation of a child under chapter
9.68A RCW,

32 sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW where a minor is
the

33 victim, promoting prostitution of a minor under chapter
9A.88 RCW,

34 or a violation of similar laws of another jurisdiction,
even if

35 the time elapsed since the guilty plea or conviction is
ten years

36 or more.

37 (5) Subsections (3) and (4) of this section only
apply to a

HB 1086 p. 2

_1 person applying for a certificate or for employment on
or after

_2 July 25, 1993.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1086