BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.46 RCW to read as follows:

Health
districts have the power to levy fines upon violators of environmental health
statutes, rules, and regulations. Any person who violates a public health
statute, or rules or regulations adopted under a public health statute, is
subject to a civil penalty, assessed by the local board of health in whose
jurisdiction the violation occurs. Penalties collected are to be placed into
the pooling funds available for public health purposes as provided in RCW
70.08.080 and 70.12.030.

--- END ---