BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.36.020 and 1994 c
124 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The following real and
personal property shall be exempt from taxation:

All lands, buildings,
and personal property required for necessary administration and maintenance,
used, or to the extent used, exclusively for public burying grounds or
cemeteries without discrimination as to race, color, national origin or
ancestry;

All churches, cathedrals,
synagogues, temples, mosques, and other places of assembly for religious
exercise purposes, personal property, and the ground, not exceeding ((five))
twenty acres in area, upon which a church ((of any nonprofit
recognized religious denomination)), cathedral, synagogue, temple,
mosque, or other place of assembly for religious exercise purposes is or
shall be built, together with a parsonage, or other clergy residence,
convent, or other religious community residence, and buildings and
improvements required for the maintenance and safeguarding of such property.
The area exempted shall in any case include all ground covered by the church, cathedrals,
synagogues, temples, mosques, and other place of assembly for religious
exercise purposes, parsonage, or other clergy residence, convent, or
other religious community residence, and buildings and improvements
required for the maintenance and safeguarding of such property and the
structures and ground necessary for street access, parking, light, and ventilation,
but the area of unoccupied ground exempted in such cases, in connection with the
church, cathedral, synagogue, temple, mosque, or other place of assembly for
religious exercise purposes, parsonage, or other clergy residence,
convent, or other religious community residence, and buildings and
improvements required for the maintenance and safeguarding of such property,
shall not exceed the equivalent of one ((hundred twenty by one hundred
twenty feet)) and one-third acres except where additional unoccupied
land may be required to conform with state or local codes, zoning, or licensing
requirements. The parsonage, or other clergy residence, and convent,
or other religious community residence, need not be on land contiguous to
the church ((property)), cathedral, synagogue, temple, mosque, or
other place of assembly for religious exercise purposes. To be exempt the
property must be wholly used for ((church)) religious exercise
purposes: PROVIDED, That the loan or rental of property otherwise exempt under
this paragraph to a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation, or
school for use for an eleemosynary activity shall not nullify the exemption
provided in this paragraph if the rental income, if any, is reasonable and is
devoted solely to the operation and maintenance of the property.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.36.030 and 1993 c
327 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following real and
personal property shall be exempt from taxation:

(1) Property owned by
nonprofit organizations or associations, organized and conducted for
nonsectarian purposes, which shall be used for character-building, benevolent,
protective or rehabilitative social services directed at persons of all ages.
The sale of donated merchandise shall not be considered a commercial use of the
property under this section if the proceeds are devoted to the furtherance of
the purposes of the selling organization or association as specified in this
paragraph.

(2) Property owned by
any nonprofit ((church)) religious organization, denomination, or
group of ((churches)) religious organizations, or ((an)) any
organization or association, the membership of which is comprised solely of ((churches))
nonprofit religious organizations or their qualified representatives,
which is utilized as a camp facility if used for organized and supervised
recreational activities and ((church)) religious exercise
purposes as related to such camp facilities. The exemption provided by this
paragraph shall apply to a maximum of ((two)) four hundred acres
of any such camp as selected by the ((church)) religious organization,
including buildings and other improvements thereon.

(3) Property, including
buildings and improvements required for the maintenance and safeguarding of
such property, owned by nonprofit organizations or associations engaged in
character building of boys and girls under eighteen years of age, and used for
such purposes and uses, provided such purposes and uses are for the general public
good: PROVIDED, That if existing charters provide that organizations or
associations, which would otherwise qualify under the provisions of this
paragraph, serve boys and girls up to the age of twenty-one years, then such
organizations or associations shall be deemed qualified pursuant to this
section.

(4) Property owned by
all organizations and societies of veterans of any war of the United States,
recognized as such by the department of defense, which shall have national
charters, and which shall have for their general purposes and objects the
preservation of the memories and associations incident to their war service and
the consecration of the efforts of their members to mutual helpfulness and to
patriotic and community service to state and nation. To be exempt such
property must be used in such manner as may be reasonably necessary to carry
out the purposes and objects of such societies.

The use of the property
for pecuniary gain or to promote business activities, except as provided in
this subsection (4), nullifies the exemption otherwise available for the
property for the assessment year. The exemption is not nullified by:

(a) The collection of
rent or donations if the amount is reasonable and does not exceed maintenance
and operation expenses.

(b) Fund-raising
activities conducted by a nonprofit organization.

(c) The use of the
property for pecuniary gain for periods of not more than three days in a year.

(d) An inadvertent use
of the property in a manner inconsistent with the purpose for which exemption
is granted, if the inadvertent use is not part of a pattern of use. A pattern
of use is presumed when an inadvertent use is repeated in the same assessment
year or in two or more successive assessment years.

(5) Property owned by
all corporations, incorporated under any act of congress, whose principal
purposes are to furnish volunteer aid to members of the armed forces of the
United States and also to carry on a system of national and international
relief and to apply the same in mitigating the sufferings caused by pestilence,
famine, fire, floods, and other national calamities and to devise and carry on
measures for preventing the same.

(6) Property owned by
nonprofit organizations exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3)
of the internal revenue code of 1954, as amended, that are guarantee agencies
under the federal guaranteed student loan program or that issue debt to provide
or acquire student loans.

(7) To be exempt under
this section, the property must be used exclusively for the purposes for which
exemption is granted, except as provided in RCW 84.36.805.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.36.800 and 1998 c
311 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "((Church))
Religious exercise purposes" means the use of real and personal
property owned by a nonprofit religious organization for religious worship or
related administrative, educational, eleemosynary, and social activities. This
definition is to be broadly construed;

(2) "Convent or
other religious community residence" means a house or set of buildings
occupied by a community of clergy or nuns devoted to religious life under a
superior;

(3)
"Hospital" means any portion of a hospital building, or other
buildings in connection therewith, used as a residence for persons engaged or
employed in the operation of a hospital, or operated as a portion of the
hospital unit;

(4)
"Nonprofit" means an organization, association or corporation no part
of the income of which is paid directly or indirectly to its members,
stockholders, officers, directors or trustees except in the form of services
rendered by the organization, association, or corporation in accordance with
its purposes and bylaws and the salary or compensation paid to officers of such
organization, association or corporation is for actual services rendered and
compares to the salary or compensation of like positions within the public
services of the state;

(5) "Parsonage or
other clergy residence" means a residence occupied by a member of the
clergy who has been designated for a particular congregation and who holds
regular services ((therefor));

(6) "Place of
assembly for religious exercise purposes" means real and personal property
owned by a nonprofit religious organization and used for religious exercise
purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2002 and thereafter.

---
END ---