BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.130.160 and 1993
c 367 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon a finding, after
hearing, that a license holder or applicant has committed unprofessional
conduct or is unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety due to a
physical or mental condition, the disciplining authority may issue an order
providing for one or any combination of the following:

(1) Revocation of the
license;

(2) Suspension of the
license for a fixed or indefinite term;

(3) Restriction or
limitation of the practice;

(4) Requiring the
satisfactory completion of a specific program of remedial education or
treatment;

(5) The monitoring of
the practice by a supervisor approved by the disciplining authority;

(6) Censure or
reprimand;

(7) Compliance with
conditions of probation for a designated period of time;

(8) Payment of a fine
for each violation of this chapter, not to exceed five thousand dollars per
violation. Funds received shall be placed in the health professions account;

(9) Denial of the
license request;

(10) Corrective action;

(11) Refund of fees
billed to and collected from the consumer;

(12) A surrender of
the practitioner's license in lieu of other sanctions.

Any of the actions
under this section may be totally or partly stayed by the disciplining
authority. In determining what action is appropriate, the disciplining
authority must first consider what sanctions are necessary to protect or
compensate the public. Only after such provisions have been made may the
disciplining authority consider and include in the order requirements designed
to rehabilitate the license holder or applicant. All costs associated with
compliance with orders issued under this section are the obligation of the
license holder or applicant.

The
licensee or applicant may enter into a stipulated disposition of charges that
includes one or more of the sanctions of this section, but only after a
statement of charges has been issued and the licensee has been afforded the
opportunity for a hearing and has elected on the record to forego such a
hearing. The stipulation shall either contain one or more specific findings of
unprofessional conduct or inability to practice, or a statement by the licensee
acknowledging that evidence is sufficient to justify one or more specified
findings of unprofessional conduct or inability to practice. The stipulation
entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be considered formal
disciplinary action for all purposes.

--- END ---