BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 81.104.115 and 1999
c 202 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
collect and review the system safety and security program plan prepared by each
owner or operator of a rail fixed guideway system. In carrying out this
function, the department may adopt rules specifying the elements and standard
to be contained in a system safety and security program plan, and the content
of any investigation report, corrective action plan, and accompanying
implementation schedule resulting from a reportable accident, unacceptable
hazardous condition, or security breach. These rules may include due dates for
the department's timely receipt of and response to required documents.

(2) The security
section of the system safety and security plan as described in subsection
(1)(d) of RCW 35.21.228, 35A.21.300, 36.01.210, 36.57.120, 36.57A.170, and
81.112.180 are exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW by the
department when collected from the owners and operators of fixed railway systems.
However, the activities and plans as described in subsection (1)(a), (b), and
(c) of RCW 35.21.228, 35A.21.300, 36.01.210, 36.57.120, 36.57A.170, and
81.112.180 are not exempt from public disclosure.

(3) The department
shall audit each system safety and security program plan at least once every
three years. The department may contract with other persons or entities for
the performance of duties required by this subsection. The department shall
provide at least thirty days' advance notice to the owner or operator of a rail
fixed guideway system before commencing the audit. The owner or operator of
each rail fixed guideway system shall reimburse the reasonable expenses of the
department in carrying out its responsibilities of this subsection within ninety
days after receipt of an invoice. The department shall notify the owner or
operator of the estimated expenses at least six months in advance of when the
department audits the system.

(4) In the event of a
reportable accident, unacceptable hazardous condition, or security breach, the
department shall review the investigation report, corrective action plan, and
accompanying implementation schedule, submitted by the owner or operator of the
rail fixed guideway system to ensure that it meets the goal of preventing and
mitigating a recurrence of the reportable accident, unacceptable hazardous
condition, or security breach.

(a) The department may,
at its option, perform a separate, independent investigation of a reportable
accident, unacceptable hazardous condition, or security breach. The department
may contract with other persons or entities for the performance of duties
required by this subsection.

(b) If the department
does not concur with the investigation report, corrective action plan, and
accompanying implementation schedule, submitted by the owner or operator, the
department shall notify that owner or operator in writing within forty-five
days of its receipt of the complete investigation report, corrective action
plan, and accompanying implementation schedule.

(5) The secretary may
adopt rules to implement this section and RCW 35.21.228, 35A.21.300, 36.01.210,
36.57.120, 36.57A.170, and 81.112.180, including rules establishing procedures
and timelines for owners and operators of rail fixed guideway systems to comply
with RCW 35.21.228, 35A.21.300, 36.01.210, 36.57.120, 36.57A.170, and
81.112.180 and the rules adopted under this section. If noncompliance by an
owner or operator of a rail fixed guideway system results in the loss of
federal funds to the state of Washington or a political subdivision of the
state, the owner or operator is liable to the affected entity or entities for
the amount of the lost funds.

(6) The department may
impose sanctions upon owners and operators of rail fixed guideway systems, but
only for failure to meet reasonable deadlines for submission of required
reports and audits. The department is expressly prohibited from imposing
sanctions for any other purposes, including, but not limited to, differences in
format or content of required reports and audits.

(7) The
department and its employees have no liability arising from the adoption of
rules; the review of or concurrence in a system safety and security program
plan; the separate, independent investigation of a reportable accident,
unacceptable hazardous condition, or security breach; and the review of or
concurrence in a corrective action plan for a reportable accident, unacceptable
hazardous condition, or security breach.

--- END ---