BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that:

_7 (1) The legislature has adopted numerous criminal
laws related

_8 to DUI and domestic violence and that implementation of
these laws

_9 has created substantial cumulative fiscal impacts on
county and

10 city criminal justice agencies; and

11 (2) In 1999, Initiative 695 repealed the motor
vehicle excise

12 tax, from which local governments derived a significant
amount of

13 criminal justice funding. That funding has been only
partially

14 replaced.

15 It is the intent of the legislature to provide a source
of

16 funds for county and city law enforcement, prosecutors,
and courts

17 to help implement the criminal laws it has enacted. It
is the

p. 1 SHB
1101

_1 intent of the legislature to increase fines in order to
increase

_2 revenue to local governments.

_3 Sec. 2. RCW 3.62.090
and 1997 c 331 s 4 are each amended to read

_4 as follows:

_5 (1) There shall be assessed and collected in
addition to any

_6 fines, forfeitures, or penalties assessed, other than
for parking

_7 infractions, by all courts organized under Title 3 or 35
RCW a

_8 public safety and education assessment equal to sixty
percent of

_9 such fines, forfeitures, or penalties, which shall be
remitted as

10 provided in chapters 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, and 35.20 RCW.
The

11 assessment required by this section shall not be
suspended or

12 waived by the court.

13 (2) There shall be assessed and collected in
addition to any

14 fines, forfeitures, or penalties assessed, other than
for parking

15 infractions and for fines levied under RCW 46.61.5055,
and in

16 addition to the public safety and education assessment
required

17 under subsection (1) of this section, by all courts
organized

18 under Title 3 or 35 RCW, an additional public safety and
education

19 assessment equal to fifty percent of the public safety
and

20 education assessment required under subsection (1) of
this

21 section, which shall be remitted to the state treasurer
and

22 deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The additional
assessment

23 required by this subsection shall not be suspended or
waived by

24 the court.

25 (3) This section does not apply to the fee imposed
under RCW

26 ((43.63.110(6))) 46.63.110(6) or the penalty
imposed under RCW

27 46.63.110(7).

28 Sec. 3. RCW
46.63.110 and 1997 c 331 s 3 are each amended to read

29 as follows:

30 (1) A person found to have committed a traffic
infraction shall

31 be assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed
two hundred

32 and fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by
this

33 chapter or title.

34 (2) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a
schedule of

35 monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions.
This rule

36 shall also specify the conditions under which local
courts may

SHB 1101 p. 2

_1 exercise discretion in assessing fines and penalties for
traffic

_2 infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the
supreme

_3 court to adjust this schedule every two years for
inflation.

_4 (3) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars
for failure

_5 to respond to a notice of traffic infraction except
where the

_6 infraction relates to parking as defined by local law,
ordinance,

_7 regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a monetary
penalty

_8 imposed pursuant to this chapter. A local legislative
body may set

_9 a monetary penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars for
failure

10 to respond to a notice of traffic infraction relating to
parking

11 as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution. The

12 local court, whether a municipal, police, or district
court, shall

13 impose the monetary penalty set by the local legislative
body.

14 (4) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70
RCW which

15 are civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed
for

16 violations of chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size,
weight, and load

17 of motor vehicles are not subject to the limitation on
the amount

18 of monetary penalties which may be imposed pursuant to
this

19 chapter.

20 (5) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a
court under

21 this chapter it is immediately payable. If the person
is unable to

22 pay at that time the court may, in its discretion, grant
an

23 extension of the period in which the penalty may be
paid. If the

24 penalty is not paid on or before the time established
for payment

25 the court shall notify the department of the failure to
pay the

26 penalty, and the department shall suspend the person's
driver's

27 license or driving privilege until the penalty has been
paid and

28 the penalty provided in subsection (3) of this section
has been

29 paid.

30 (6) In addition to any other penalties imposed under
this

31 section and not subject to the limitation of subsection
(1) of

32 this section, a person found to have committed a traffic

33 infraction shall be assessed a fee of five dollars per

34 infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be
reduced or

35 waived. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the
state

36 treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical services
and trauma

37 care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040.

38 (7)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed
under this

p. 3 SHB
1101

_1 section and not subject to the limitation of
subsection (1) of

_2 this section, a person found to have committed a
traffic

_3 infraction other than of RCW 46.61.527 shall be
assessed an

_4 additional penalty of ten dollars. The court may not
reduce, waive,

_5 or suspend the additional penalty unless the court
finds the

_6 offender to be indigent. If a community service
program for

_7 offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court
shall allow

_8 offenders to offset all or a part of the penalty due
under this

_9 subsection (7) by participation in the community
service program.

10 (b) Revenue from the additional penalty must be
remitted under

11 chapters 10.82, 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, and 35.20 RCW.
Money

12 remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
must be

13 deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance
of the revenue

14 received by the county or city treasurer under this
subsection

15 must be deposited into the county or city current
expense fund.

16 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is
added to chapter 46.64

17 RCW to read as follows:

18 (1) In addition to any other penalties imposed for
conviction

19 of a violation of this title that is a misdemeanor,
gross

20 misdemeanor, or felony, the court shall impose an
additional

21 penalty of fifty dollars. The court may not reduce,
waive, or

22 suspend the additional penalty unless the court finds
the offender

23 to be indigent. If a community service program for
offenders is

24 available in the jurisdiction, the court shall allow
offenders to

25 offset all or a part of the penalty due under this
section by

26 participation in the community service program.

27 (2) Revenue from the additional penalty must be
remitted under

28 chapters 10.82, 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, and 35.20 RCW.
Money

29 remitted under this section to the state treasurer must
be

30 deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance of
the revenue

31 received by the county or city treasurer under this
section must

32 be deposited into the county or city current expense
fund.

33 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect
September 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1101 p. 4