BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

Foster parents have the
right to be free of coercion, discrimination, and reprisal in serving foster
children, including the right to voice grievances about treatment furnished or
not furnished to the foster child.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

No department employee
may retaliate against a foster parent or in any other manner discriminate
against any foster parent because:

(1) The foster parent
made a complaint with the office of family and children's ombudsman, the
attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the department, provided
information, or otherwise cooperated with the investigation of such a
complaint;

(2) The foster parent
has caused to be instituted any proceedings under or related to Title 13 RCW;

(3) The foster parent
has testified or is about to testify in any such proceedings;

(4) The foster parent
has advocated for services on behalf of the foster child;

(5) The foster parent
has sought to adopt a foster child in the foster parent's care; or

(6) The foster parent
has discussed or consulted with anyone concerning the foster parent's rights
under this chapter or chapter 74.15 or 13.34 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.13.280 and 1997 c
272 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in RCW 70.24.105, whenever a child is placed in out-of-home care by the
department or a child-placing agency, the department or agency shall((,
within available resources,)) share information about the child and the
child's family with the care provider and shall((, within available
resources,)) consult with the care provider regarding the child's case
plan. If the child is dependent pursuant to a proceeding under chapter 13.34
RCW, the department or agency shall keep the care provider informed regarding
the dates and location of dependency review and permanency planning hearings
pertaining to the child.

(2) Any person who
receives information about a child or a child's family pursuant to this section
shall keep the information confidential and shall not further disclose or
disseminate the information except as authorized by law.

(3) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to limit the authority of the department or
child-placing agencies to disclose client information or to maintain client
confidentiality as provided by law.

Sec. 4. RCW 74.13.330 and 1990 c
284 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

Foster
parents are responsible for the protection, care, supervision, and nurturing of
the child in placement. As an integral part of the foster care team, foster
parents shall((,)): Assist in family visitation, including
monitoring; model effective parenting behavior for the natural family; and
if appropriate and they desire to((:)), participate in the
development of the service plan for the child and the child's family((;
assist in family visitation, including monitoring; and model effective
parenting behavior for the natural family)).

---
END ---