BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The listing of salmon,
steelhead, and bull trout stocks in the state as threatened or endangered
species under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.)
has impacted many residents and communities in the state. The legislature recognizes
that salmon recovery has direct links to shoreline development and protection,
but many communities lack the resources necessary to effectively develop,
enforce, and monitor salmon recovery efforts, or to update their shoreline
master programs to comply with new guidelines. The national marine fisheries
service has indicated that it will consider the adequacy of long-term funding
and monitoring mechanisms when it reviews salmon recovery plans. The
legislature therefore finds that it is in the public interest to provide
funding options for counties to assist them in salmon recovery efforts,
updating shoreline master programs, and assisting private landowners in
complying with these laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 84.34 RCW to read as follows:

Payments of additional
tax, applicable interest, and penalty collected pursuant to RCW 84.34.108, or
by enforcement procedures referred to therein, after the payment of the
expenses of their collection, may be deposited by the county into a fund
created pursuant to section 7 of this act for protecting and restoring salmon
habitat and shorelines.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 84.33 RCW to read as follows:

Any
compensating tax payable under this chapter, together with any interest
thereon, may be deposited by the county into a fund created pursuant to section
7 of this act for protecting and restoring salmon habitat and shorelines, after
first deducting the expenses for collecting the tax and interest.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.46.070 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 5 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to
subsection (2) of this section, the legislative authority of any county may
impose an additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the county at
a rate not to exceed one percent of the selling price. The proceeds of the tax
shall be used exclusively for: (a) The acquisition and maintenance of
conservation areas; or (b) protecting and restoring salmon habitat and
shorelines. Proceeds collected from the tax imposed pursuant to this
subsection (1)(b) must be deposited into the fund created pursuant to section 7
of this act.

The taxes imposed under
this subsection shall be imposed in the same manner and on the same
occurrences, and are subject to the same conditions, as the taxes under chapter
82.45 RCW, except:

(((a))) (i)
The tax shall be the obligation of the purchaser; and

(((b))) (ii)
The tax does not apply to the acquisition of conservation areas by the county.

The county may enforce
the obligation through an action of debt against the purchaser or may foreclose
the lien on the property in the same manner prescribed for the foreclosure of
mortgages.

The tax shall take
effect thirty days after the election at which the taxes are authorized.

(2) No tax may be
imposed under subsection (1) of this section unless approved by a majority of
the voters of the county voting thereon for a specified period and maximum rate
after:

(a) The adoption of a
resolution by the county legislative authority of the county proposing this
action; or

(b) The filing of a
petition proposing this action with the county auditor, which petition is
signed by county voters at least equal in number to ten percent of the total
number of voters in the county who voted at the last preceding general
election.

The ballot proposition
shall be submitted to the voters of the county at the next general election
occurring at least sixty days after a petition is filed, or at any special
election prior to this general election that has been called for such purpose
by the county legislative authority.

(3) A plan for the
expenditure of the excise tax proceeds shall be prepared by the county legislative
authority at least sixty days before the election if the proposal is initiated
by resolution of the county legislative authority, or within six months after
the tax has been authorized by the voters if the proposal is initiated by
petition. Prior to the adoption of this plan, the elected officials of cities
located within the county shall be consulted and a public hearing shall be held
to obtain public input. The proceeds of this excise tax must be expended in
conformance with this plan.

(4) As used
in this section, "conservation area" has the meaning given under RCW
36.32.570.

Sec. 5. RCW 84.34.230 and 1995 c
318 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of
acquiring conservation futures as well as other rights and interests in real
property pursuant to RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220, or for protecting and
restoring salmon habitat and shorelines, a county may levy an amount not to
exceed six and one-quarter cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation
against the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the county. The
limitations in RCW 84.52.043 shall not apply to the tax levy authorized in this
section. Moneys collected from a levy imposed pursuant to this section for
protecting and restoring salmon habitat and shorelines shall be deposited into
the fund created pursuant to section 7 of this act.

Sec. 6. RCW 84.34.240 and 1971
ex.s. c 243 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Any ((board of))
county ((commissioners)) legislative authority may establish by
resolution a special fund which may be termed a conservation futures fund to
which it may credit all taxes levied pursuant to RCW 84.34.230 for acquiring
conservation futures as well as other rights and interests in real property
pursuant to RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220. Amounts placed in this fund may
be used solely for the purpose of acquiring rights and interests in real
property pursuant to the terms of RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220. Nothing in this
section shall be construed as limiting in any manner methods and funds
otherwise available to a county for financing the acquisition of such rights
and interests in real property.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added to
chapter 36.33 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any county
legislative authority may establish a special fund for salmon recovery or for
updating its shoreline master program under chapter 90.58 RCW, to which it may
credit all moneys collected for this purpose pursuant to RCW 82.46.070 and
84.34.230 and sections 2 and 3 of this act.

(2) Moneys deposited
into this fund for salmon recovery or for shoreline master program updates may
be used for salmon habitat projects, including planning, implementing, and
monitoring results from these projects; updating shoreline master programs
under chapter 90.58 RCW; assisting private landowners to comply with laws
pertaining to shorelines management or to endangered or threatened species;
enforcement of existing laws that protect salmon or shorelines; necessary data
collection and analysis to determine adequacy of stream buffers, adequacy of
streamflows for fish, and the general health of the streams, rivers, and lakes
within the watershed; and upgrades in computers and systems to improve
compliance with laws pertaining to salmon or shorelines.

(3) For purposes of
this section, "salmon habitat projects" include but are not limited
to habitat restoration projects, habitat protection projects, habitat projects
which improve water quality, habitat projects that protect water quality,
habitat-related mitigation projects, restoration and protection of coastal
marine habitat, and habitat project maintenance activities.

(4) For purposes of
this section, "salmon" includes salmon, steelhead, and bull trout.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

In
computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax by those engaged in
banking, loan, security, or other financial businesses, an amount equal to one
percent of the outstanding balance of a mortgage in property which is
subordinated under this section. The tax deduction authorized in this section
only applies when a financial business subordinates its right as a mortgagee in
property donated to a nonprofit nature conservancy organization as defined in
RCW 64.04.130, to the right of such organization to enforce the conservation
purposes of the gift in perpetuity. For the purposes of this section,
"conservation purposes" means the protection of the relatively
natural habitat of salmon, steelhead, or bull trout, or the protection of
shorelines.

---
END ---