BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

_6 Sec. 1. RCW
82.08.02567 and 1999 c 358 s 4 are each amended to

_7 read as follows:

_8 (1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply
to sales of

_9 machinery and equipment used directly in generating
electricity

10 using wind, sun, or landfill gas as the principal source
of power,

11 or to sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in

12 respect to installing such machinery and equipment, but
only if

13 the purchaser develops with such machinery, equipment,
and labor a

14 facility capable of generating not less than two hundred

15 ((kilowatts)) watts of electricity and
provides the seller with an

16 exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the

17 department by rule. The seller shall retain a copy of
the

18 certificate for the seller's files.

p. 1 HB
1105

_1 (2) For purposes of this section and RCW
82.12.02567:

_2 (a) "Landfill gas" means biomass fuel of
the type qualified for

_3 federal tax credits under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 29 collected
from a

_4 landfill. "Landfill" means a landfill as
defined under RCW

_5 70.95.030;

_6 (b) "Machinery and equipment" means
industrial fixtures,

_7 devices, and support facilities that are integral and necessary
to

_8 the generation of electricity using wind, sun, or
landfill gas as

_9 the principal source of power;

10 (c) "Machinery and equipment" does not
include: (i) Hand-

11 powered tools; (ii) property with a useful life of less
than one

12 year; (iii) repair parts required to restore machinery
and

13 equipment to normal working order; (iv) replacement
parts that do

14 not increase productivity, improve efficiency, or extend
the

15 useful life of machinery and equipment; (v) buildings;
or (vi)

16 building fixtures that are not integral and necessary to
the

17 generation of electricity that are permanently affixed
to and

18 become a physical part of a building;

19 (d) Machinery and equipment is "used
directly" in generating

20 electricity by wind energy, solar energy, or
landfill gas power if

21 it provides any part of the process that captures the
energy of

22 the wind, sun, or landfill gas, converts that energy to

23 electricity, and transforms or transmits that
electricity for

24 entry into or operation in parallel with electric
transmission and

25 distribution systems.

26 (3) This section expires June 30, ((2005)) 2009.

27 Sec. 2. RCW
82.12.02567 and 1999 c 358 s 10 are each amended to

28 read as follows:

29 (1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply
with respect

30 to machinery and equipment used directly in generating
not less

31 than two hundred ((kilowatts)) watts of
electricity using wind,

32 sun, or landfill gas as the principal source of power.

33 (2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.02567 apply to this
section.

34 (3) This section expires June 30, ((2005)) 2009.

35 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary
for the immediate

HB 1105 p. 2

_1 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

_2 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

_3 takes effect July 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1105