BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 79.08 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning
with the 2003-05 biennial budget, the department of natural resources shall
include in its capital budget request to the governor a proposal to transfer
ownership of trust property that cannot be managed effectively for revenue
production to recreation or conservation status. Each biennium the department
of natural resources shall establish one list of properties that are eligible
for transfer using criteria adopted by the board of natural resources. The
criteria shall include (1) land where the revenue generating capacity does not
justify the cost of management; (2) land on which revenue generating capacity
is constrained by state or federal law; and (3) land that is difficult to
manage for revenue production because of significant value, such as recreation,
scenic considerations, conservation, or fish or wildlife habitat. In
identifying land in subsections (1) through (3) of this section, the department
of natural resources shall give highest priority to land on islands with a sole
source aquifer for the purpose of enhancing aquifer recharge. The list of
properties should identify the appropriate public entity for receiving
ownership of the transferred property.

--- END ---