BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.04 RCW to read as follows:

The
secretary of state, or any staff of the elections division of the office of
secretary of state, may make unannounced on-site visits to county election
offices and facilities to observe the handling, processing, counting, or
tabulation of ballots.

--- END ---