BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.36.010 and 1991 c
81 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

Any registered voter of
the state or any out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter may vote
by absentee ballot in any general election, special election, or primary in the
manner provided in this chapter. Out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and
service voters are authorized to cast the same ballots, including those for
special elections, as a registered voter of the state would receive under this
chapter.

(1) Except as provided
in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, in RCW 29.36.013, and in RCW
29.36.170, a registered voter or elector desiring to cast an absentee ballot must
request the absentee ballot from his or her county auditor no earlier than
forty-five days nor later than ((the)) fifteen days before
any election or primary. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section
and in RCW 29.36.170, the request may be made orally in person, by telephone,
or in writing. An application or request for an absentee ballot made under the
authority of any federal statute or regulation shall be considered and given
the same effect as a request for an absentee ballot under this chapter.

(2) For any registered
voter, a request for an absentee ballot for a primary shall be honored as a
request for an absentee ballot for the following general election if the voter
so indicates in his or her request. For any out-of-state voter, overseas
voter, or service voter, a request for an absentee ballot for a primary
election shall also be honored as a request for an absentee ballot for the
following general election.

(3) A voter admitted to
a hospital no earlier than five days before a primary or election and confined
to the hospital on election day may apply by messenger for an absentee ballot
on the day of the primary or election if a signed statement from the hospital
administrator, or designee, verifying the voter's date of admission and status
as a patient in the hospital on the day of the primary or election is attached
to the voter's written application for an absentee ballot.

(4) In a voter's
request for an absentee ballot, the voter shall state the address to which the
absentee ballot should be sent. A request for an absentee ballot from an
out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter shall state the address of
that elector's last residence for voting purposes in the state of Washington
and either a written application or the oath on the return envelope shall
include a declaration of the other qualifications of the applicant as an
elector of this state. A request for an absentee ballot from any other voter
shall state the address at which that voter is currently registered to vote in
the state of Washington or the county auditor shall verify such information
from the voter registration records of the county.

(5) A request for an
absentee ballot from a registered voter who is within this state shall be made
directly to the auditor of the county in which the voter is registered. An
absentee ballot request from a registered voter who is temporarily outside this
state or from an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter may be
made either to the appropriate county auditor or to the secretary of state, who
shall promptly forward the request to the appropriate county auditor. No
person, organization, or association may distribute absentee ballot
applications within this state that contain any return address other than that
of the appropriate county auditor.

(6) A
person may request an absentee ballot for use by the person as a registered
voter and may request an absentee ballot on behalf of any member of that
person's immediate family who is a registered voter for use by the family
member. As a means of ensuring that a person who requests an absentee ballot
is requesting the ballot for only that person or a member of the person's
immediate family, the secretary of state shall adopt rules prescribing the
circumstances under which an auditor: May require a person who requests an
absentee ballot to identify the date of birth of the voter for whom the ballot
is requested; and may deny a request which is not accompanied by this
information.

--- END ---