BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
42.17.130 and 1979 ex.s. c 265 s 2 are each amended to

_6 read as follows:

_7 No elective official nor any employee of his office
nor any

_8 person appointed to or employed by any public office or
agency may

_9 use or authorize the use of any of the facilities of a
public

10 office or agency, directly or indirectly, for the
purpose of

11 assisting a campaign for election of any person to any
office or

12 for the promotion of or opposition to any ballot
proposition.

13 Facilities of public office or agency include, but are
not limited

14 to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment,
use of

15 employees of the office or agency during working hours,
vehicles,

16 office space, publications of the office or agency, and
clientele

17 lists of persons served by the office or agency:
PROVIDED, That the

p. 1 HB
1113

_1 foregoing provisions of this section shall not apply to
the

_2 following activities:

_3 (1) Action taken at an open public meeting by
members of an

_4 elected legislative body to express a collective
decision, or to

_5 actually vote upon a motion, proposal, resolution,
order, or

_6 ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot proposition
so long as

_7 (a) any required notice of the meeting includes the
title and

_8 number of the ballot proposition, and (b) members of the

_9 legislative body or members of the public are afforded
an

10 approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing

11 view;

12 (2) A statement by an elected official in support of
or in

13 opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press
conference

14 or in response to a specific inquiry;

15 (3) Publications of a school district providing
factual

16 information related to school levy elections;

17 (4) Activities which are part of the normal
and regular conduct

18 of the office or agency.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1113 p. 2