BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 82.08

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to
sales of

_7 thoroughbred race horses purchased through claim at
racing meets

_8 held in the state of Washington. The claim purchase must
comply

_9 with the claiming provisions adopted by the horse racing

10 commission.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SHB
1114