BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that in order to enhance income and employment opportunities for all residents,
the state's economic development programs must:

(a) Make strategic
targeted investment of limited resources in order to have meaningful impact;

(b) Invest public
resources in those efforts that offer the greatest return to the region or
local community; and

(c) Promote strong
public and private partnerships that enhance the capacity for successful
regional or local economic development.

(2) It is the goal of
this chapter to provide financial resources for a limited time to assist local
governments in the financing of public infrastructure improvements that are
needed to:

(a) Encourage private
development of selected areas;

(b) Prevent or arrest
the decay of selected areas due to the inability of existing financing methods
to provide needed public infrastructure improvements; and

(c) Encourage private
investment designed to promote and facilitate the orderly redevelopment of
selected areas.

PART I‑-COMMUNITY
REVITALIZATION FINANCING

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Apportionment
district" means the geographic area from which taxes are to be
appropriated to finance a community revitalization project.

(2) "Taxes"
means either excise taxes or property taxes.

(3) "Excise
taxes" means:

(a) Retail sales tax
levied under chapter 82.08 RCW;

(b) Use tax levied
under chapter 82.12 RCW; or

(c) Local retail sales
and use taxes levied under RCW 82.14.030.

"Excise
taxes" do not include sales and use taxes levied under RCW 82.14.340 and
82.14.350.

(4) "Property
taxes" means regular property taxes as defined in RCW 84.04.140, including
property taxes imposed by a port district or public utility district.

(5) "Local
government" means any city or town located in a county with population
densities greater than one hundred and one persons per square mile as
determined by the office financial management and published each year by the
department of revenue for the period July 1st to June 30th.

(6)
"Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative action
by a local government.

(7) "Project
agreement" means an agreement between an owner and a municipality
authorized under this chapter.

(8) "Sponsor"
means a local government initiating and undertaking a community revitalization
project.

(9) "Tax
allocation revenues" means those tax revenues allocated to a sponsor under
this chapter.

(10) "Taxing
district" means a governmental entity that levies a tax that is collected
within a proposed or approved apportionment district.

(11) "Community
revitalization project" means:

(a) Infrastructure
improvements within the apportionment district that include, but are not
limited to:

(i) Street and road
construction and maintenance;

(ii) Water and sewer
system construction and improvements;

(iii) Sidewalks and
streetlights;

(iv) Parking, terminal,
and dock facilities;

(v) Public
transportation facilities; and

(vi) Park facilities
and recreational areas;

(b) Health and safety
improvements authorized to be publicly financed under chapter 35.80 or 35.81
RCW;

(c) Publicly owned or
leased facilities within the jurisdiction of a local government which the
sponsor has authority to provide; and

(d) Expenditure for any
of the following purposes:

(i) Providing
environmental analysis, professional management, planning, and promotion within
the apportionment district, including the management and promotion of retail
trade activities in the apportionment district;

(ii) Providing
maintenance and security for common or public areas in the apportionment
district; or

(iii) Historic
preservation activities authorized under RCW 35.21.395.

(12) "Community
revitalization project costs" means: The costs of land use planning and
associated environmental analysis, project design and planning, acquisition,
site preparation, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement,
operation, and installation of the community revitalization project; the costs
of relocation, maintenance, and operation of property pending construction of
the community revitalization project; the costs of financing, including
interest during construction, legal and other professional services, taxes, and
insurance; the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with this chapter
and other applicable law; and the administrative costs reasonably necessary and
related to these costs.

(13) "Community
revitalization project ordinance" means the ordinance passed under section
5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The use of tax revenues
to finance community revitalization projects is subject to the following
limitations:

(1) Regardless of the
total number of community revitalization projects approved by a local
government, the aggregate total of revenue available from the state for
apportionment as the state's contribution to an individual local government
must not exceed five million dollars annually. All revenue in excess of five
million dollars in any given year must be distributed to the appropriate taxing
district as though an apportionment district had not been created;

(2) Regardless of the
number of community revitalization projects approved by local governments, the
aggregate total of revenue available from the state for apportionment as the
state's contribution is annually limited to two-tenths of one percent of the
state general fund annual budget;

(3) An apportionment
district may not be established that includes a geographic area included within
a previously established apportionment district that has outstanding bonds
payable in whole or in part from tax revenues under this chapter, or section 12
of this act, or chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 13 through 22 of this act); and

(4) Only one of the
following taxes may be appropriated under this chapter:

(a) The local retail
sales and use tax offset imposed under section 12 of this act; or

(b) The incremental
increase in excise taxes in an apportionment district approved under this
chapter; or

(c) The incremental
increase in property taxes in an apportionment district approved under chapter
39.-- RCW (sections 13 through 22 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1)(a) A community
revitalization project may be undertaken and coordinated with other programs or
efforts undertaken by the sponsor or others and may be funded in whole or in
part from sources other than those provided by this chapter.

(b) The sponsor shall
assume all risk if sources authorized by this chapter are not adequate to fund
the community revitalization project.

(2) A sponsor may
contract with a nonprofit business association operating within the boundaries
of the apportionment district or a parking and business improvement area,
created under chapter 35.87A RCW, to administer the community revitalization
project. The administration of the community revitalization project must
comply with all applicable provisions of federal, state, or local law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. In order to establish an
apportionment district and secure an allocation of excise taxes to finance a
community revitalization project:

(1) A sponsor shall
propose by ordinance a plan for the community revitalization project that
includes a description of the contemplated community revitalization project,
the estimated cost of the community revitalization project, the boundaries of
the apportionment district, the estimated period during which tax revenue
apportionment is contemplated, and ways in which the sponsor plans to use tax
allocation revenues to finance the community revitalization project.

(2)(a) At least sixty
days in advance of a public hearing at which the ordinance creating the
apportionment district is first considered, the local government shall deliver
notice of the hearing and the information required in subsection (1) of this
section to the department of community, trade, and economic development and the
department of revenue. The department of revenue shall review the information
and determine whether there is sufficient revenue under the revenue
apportionment cap in section 3 of this act to accommodate the proposed
community revitalization project.

(b) No tax revenue
generated from an apportionment district created under this chapter, section 12
of this act, or chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 13 through 22 of this act) may be
used to finance a community revitalization project until the department of
community, trade, and economic development, or a successor department, has
reviewed and approved a feasibility study paid for and submitted to the
department by the sponsor. The department's review process shall include the
following criteria:

(i) The community
revitalization project meets the requirements of this chapter or chapter 39.--
RCW (sections 13 through 22 of this act); and

(ii) The feasibility
study demonstrates that:

(A) There is a
reasonable likelihood that the present value return to the various taxing
districts is in excess of forgone tax revenue as a result of the community
revitalization project, using a discounted rate equal to the then current state
borrowing rate;

(B) The community
revitalization project is not feasible without the tax revenue generated from
the apportionment district;

(C) The expected tax
revenue generated from the apportionment district is likely to be sufficient to
finance that portion of the public sources necessary to finance the community
revitalization project;

(D) The community
revitalization project will reasonably be expected to cause private investment
within the apportionment district that probably would not have occurred without
financing of the community revitalization project;

(E) The community
revitalization project will result in a net increase in employment within the
apportionment district; and

(F) There is sufficient
management capacity and expertise of the organization responsible for the
management of the community revitalization project; and

(iii) Other factors the
department deems necessary to safeguard the state's contribution of tax revenue
into the community revitalization project.

(3) The department of
revenue and the department of community, trade, and economic development shall
notify the sponsoring local government, and either the county legislative
authority or, in a charter county, the county executive, of the results of the
evaluation of the project at least fifteen days in advance of the public
hearing required in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) If there are more
projects proposed than apportioned revenue is available in a given year under
the limit in section 3 of this act, the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall establish rules to determine how the available
revenue will be allocated among qualified projects.

(5) At the time and
place fixed for the hearing under subsection (2) of this section, and at such
times the hearing may be adjourned, a sponsor shall receive and consider all
statements and materials as might be submitted, and objections and letters
filed before and within ten days after the hearing. Any time during the
process leading to the establishment of the apportionment district, the county
legislative authority may notify the sponsor that it does not wish to
participate in the district, and upon such notification all taxes due the
county from the apportionment district shall remain the county's and may not be
used for the community revitalization project without separate county approval.

(6) Within one hundred
twenty days after completion of the public hearing, a sponsor shall pass an
ordinance establishing the apportionment district and authorizing the proposed
community revitalization project, including any modifications that in the
sponsor's opinion the hearing indicated should be made, that includes the
boundaries of the apportionment district, a description of the community
revitalization project, the estimated cost of the community revitalization
project, the method used to finance the state's portion of the community
revitalization project under section 3 of this act, the portion of the
estimated cost of the community revitalization project to be paid from tax
allocation revenues, the estimated time during which the taxes are to be
apportioned, the date when the apportionment of taxes is to commence, and a
finding that the community revitalization project meets the conditions in
section 3 of this act and this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (5) of this section, upon the date established in the community
revitalization project ordinance, but not sooner than the first day of the
calendar year following the passage of the ordinance, the department shall
allocate and pay to the sponsor, or the sponsor's designated agent, until all
community revitalization project costs to be paid from the tax allocation
revenues have been paid, the following amounts:

(a) That portion of the
tax levied in each year under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW upon any retail sale
or any use of an article of tangible personal property within an apportionment
district that is in excess of the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW
on sales or uses within the apportionment district in the year preceding the
formation of the apportionment district;

(b) That portion of the
tax levied in each year under RCW 82.14.030 upon any retail sale or any use of
an article of tangible personal property within an apportionment district that
is in excess of the tax imposed under RCW 82.14.030 on sales or uses within the
apportionment district in the year preceding the formation of the apportionment
district, less any amounts that the department is entitled to retain as
provided in RCW 82.14.050 for administration and collection expenses incurred
by the department.

(2) The date upon which
the apportionment district was established is considered the date that the
community revitalization project ordinance was enacted by the sponsor.

(3) The apportionment
of taxes under this section must cease when the tax allocation revenues are no
longer necessary or obligated to pay community revitalization project costs or
to pay principal and interest on bonds issued to finance community
revitalization project costs to which tax allocation revenues are pledged. At
the time of termination of the apportionment, any excess money and any earnings
held by the sponsor must be distributed to the taxing districts that were
subject to the allocation in proportion to their tax receipts due for the year
in which the funds are returned.

(4) The amount of taxes
determined to be collected in the year preceding the formation of the
apportionment district shall be adjusted upward or downward to reflect
increases or decreases in the rate of taxation to determine the amount of
excess taxes to be apportioned in accordance with subsection (1)(b) of this
section.

(5) The sponsor may
agree to receive less than the full amount provided in subsection (1) of this
section, in which case the department shall distribute the balance to the
respective taxing districts in accordance with law in the same manner as if
this section did not exist.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) Tax allocation
revenues may be applied as follows:

(a) To pay community
revitalization costs;

(b) To pay into bond
redemption funds established to pay the principal and interest on general
obligation bonds issued to finance a community revitalization project that is
specified in the community revitalization project ordinance and constructed
following the establishment of the apportionment district; or

(c) To pay any
combination of (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(2) Tax allocation
revenues may be pledged to the payment of bonds issued to finance a community
revitalization project.

(3) No city may lower
their tax rates after the creation of an apportionment district and using tax
allocation revenues to finance a community revitalization project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The department of
community, trade, and economic development, in consultation with the department
of revenue, shall submit an annual report to appropriate legislative committees
on the amount of tax revenue allocated to local governments under the community
revitalization financing program created in this act. The report shall also
contain information on: (1) The number, description, and location of requests
for community revitalization projects, (2) the number of community
revitalization projects approved by the department, and (3) an evaluation of
how the community revitalization project is meeting criteria of the feasibility
study required in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. This chapter supplements
and neither restricts nor limits any powers that the state or any municipal
corporation might otherwise have under laws of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The authority to
establish an apportionment district under this chapter expires July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. This chapter may be known
and cited as the community revitalization financing act.

PART II‑-SALES
AND USE TAX DEDUCTION FOR

COMMUNITY REVITALIZATION
PROJECTS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The legislative
authority of a city located in a county with population densities between one
hundred and one and three hundred and ninety-nine may impose a sales and use
tax in accordance with terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the city. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.033
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article
used in the case of a use tax.

(b) The legislative
authority of a city located in a county with population densities between four
hundred and six hundred and ninety-nine may impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the city. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.025
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article
used in the case of a use tax.

(c) The legislative
authority of a city located in a county with population densities greater than
seven hundred may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this
chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the city. The
rate of tax shall not exceed 0.017 percent of the selling price in the case of
a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the amount of tax
otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the
collection of the taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.

(3) Moneys collected
under this section shall only be used as the state's contribution toward the
financing of a community revitalization project under chapter 82.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 11 of this act). Only those community revitalization
projects approved under section 5 of this act may be financed with moneys
collected under this section.

(4) No tax may be
collected under this section before July 1, 2002. No tax may be collected
under this section by a city more than twenty-five years after the date that a
tax is first imposed under this section.

(5) For purposes of
this section, "population density" means the number of persons per
square mile as determined by the office of financial management and published
each year by the department of community, trade, and economic development for
the period July 1st to June 30th.

PART III‑-PROPERTY
TAX INCREMENT FINANCING

SUBPART A-PROPERTY TAX INCREMENT FINANCING
AUTHORIZED

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Assessed
value of real property" means the valuation of real property as placed on
the last completed assessment roll.

(2) "Local
government" has the same meaning as in section 2 of this act.

(3)
"Ordinance" has the same meaning as in section 2 of this act.

(4) "Public
improvements" has the same meaning as "community revitalization
project" in section 2 of this act.

(5) "Public
improvement costs" means the costs of: (a) Design, planning, acquisition,
site preparation, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement,
and installation of the public improvements; (b) relocating, maintaining, and
operating property pending construction of the public improvements; (c)
relocating utilities as a result of the public improvements; (d) financing the
public improvements, including interest during construction, legal and other
professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs on
general indebtedness issued to finance the public improvements, and any
necessary reserves for such general indebtedness; (e) the assessor that are
incurred in revaluing real property for the purpose of determining the tax
allocation base value that are in excess of costs incurred by the assessor in
accordance with the revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW, and the costs of
apportioning the taxes and complying with this chapter and other applicable
law; and (f) administrative costs and feasibility studies reasonably necessary and
related to these costs, including such related costs that may have been
incurred before adoption of the ordinance authorizing the public improvements
and the use of tax increment financing to fund the costs of the public
improvements.

(6) "Regular property
taxes" means regular property taxes as defined in RCW 84.04.140, except:
(a) Regular property taxes levied by port districts or public utility districts
specifically for the purpose of making required payments of principal and
interest on general indebtedness; and (b) regular property taxes levied by the
state for the support of the common schools under RCW 84.52.065.

(7) "Tax
allocation base value" means the true and fair value of real property
located within a tax increment area for taxes imposed in the year in which the
tax increment area is created, plus fifty percent of any increase in the true
and fair value of real property located within a tax increment area that is
placed on the assessment rolls after the tax increment area is created.

(8) "Tax
allocation revenues" means those tax revenues derived from the imposition
of regular property taxes on the tax increment value and distributed to finance
public improvements.

(9) "Tax increment
area" has the same meaning as "apportionment district" in section
2 of this act.

(10) "Tax
increment value" means fifty percent of any increase in the true and fair
value of real property in a tax increment area that is placed on the tax rolls
after the tax increment area is created.

(11) "Taxing
districts" means a governmental entity that levies or has levied for it
regular property taxes upon real property located within a proposed or approved
tax increment area.

(12) "Value of
taxable property" means value of the taxable property as defined in RCW
39.36.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A local government may
finance public improvements using tax increment financing subject to the
following conditions:

(1) The local
government adopts an ordinance designating a tax increment area within its
boundaries and specifying the public improvements proposed to be financed in
whole or in part with the use of tax increment financing;

(2) The public
improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using tax increment
financing are expected to encourage private development within the tax
increment area and increasing the fair market value of real property within the
tax increment area;

(3) Private development
that is anticipated to occur within the tax increment area, as a result of the
public improvements, will be consistent with the countywide planning policy
adopted by the county under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's
comprehensive plan and development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A
RCW;

(4) Every taxing
district within which the tax increment area is located approves the tax
increment financing of the project under section 16(1) of this act; and

(5) The combined amount
of tax increment value in this tax increment area, and all other tax increment
areas located in the same local government, constitute less than two percent of
the assessed value of any taxing district within which the tax increment area
is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. Public improvements that
are financed with tax increment financing may be undertaken and coordinated
with other programs or efforts undertaken by the local government and other
taxing districts and may be funded in part from revenue sources other than tax
increment financing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. Before adopting an
ordinance creating the tax increment area, a local government must:

(1) Obtain written
agreement for the use of tax increment financing to finance all or a portion of
the costs of the designated public improvements from each taxing district
within which the tax increment area is located. Signing a written agreement
constitutes concurrence in the public improvement and participation in the
public improvement to the extent of providing limited funding under tax
increment financing authorized under this chapter. The agreement must be
authorized by the governing body of each taxing district and by the director of
the office of financial management for the state;

(2) Hold a public
hearing on the proposed financing of the public improvement in whole or in part
with tax increment financing. Notice of the public hearing must be published
in the official local government newspaper at least ten days before the public
hearing and posted in at least six conspicuous public places located in the
proposed tax increment area. Notices must describe the contemplated public
improvements, estimate the costs of the public improvements, describe the
portion of the costs of the public improvements to be borne by tax increment
financing, describe any other sources of revenue to finance the public
improvements, describe the boundaries of the proposed tax increment area, and
estimate the period during which tax increment financing is contemplated to be
used. The public hearing may be held by either the governing body of the local
government, or a committee of the governing body that includes at least a
majority of the whole governing body; and

(3) Adopt an ordinance
establishing the tax increment area that describes the public improvements,
describes the boundaries of the tax increment area, estimates the cost of the
public improvements and the portion of these costs to be financed by tax
increment financing, estimates the time during which regular property taxes are
to be apportioned, provides the date when the apportionment of the regular
property taxes will commence, and finds that the conditions of section 14 of
this act are met.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. Within fifteen days after
a local government adopts an ordinance creating the tax increment area and
authorizing tax increment financing, the local government shall:

(1) Publish notice in a
legal newspaper circulated within the tax increment area that describes the
public improvement, describes the boundaries of the tax increment area, and
identifies the location and times where the ordinance and other public information
concerning the public improvement may be inspected; and

(2) Deliver a certified
copy of the ordinance to the county treasurer, the county assessor, and the
governing body of each taxing district within which the tax increment area is
located.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. (1) Commencing on the
later of either the date established in the ordinance creating the tax
increment area, or the first day of the calendar year following the passage of
the ordinance, the county treasurer shall distribute receipts from regular
taxes imposed on real property located in the tax increment area as follows:

(a) Each taxing
district shall receive that portion of its regular property taxes produced by
the rate of tax levied by or for the taxing district on the tax allocation base
value for that tax increment financing project in the taxing district, or upon
the total assessed value of real property in the taxing district, whichever is
smaller; and

(b) The local
government that created the tax increment area shall receive an additional
portion of the regular property taxes levied by or for each taxing district
upon the tax increment value within the tax increment area. However, the local
government that created the tax increment area may agree to receive less than
the full amount of this portion as long as bond debt service, reserve, and
other bond covenant requirements are satisfied, in which case the balance of
these tax receipts shall be allocated to the taxing districts that imposed
regular property taxes, or have regular property taxes imposed for them, in the
tax increment area for collection that year in proportion to their regular tax
levy rates for collection that year. The local government may request that the
treasurer transfer this additional portion of the property taxes to its
designated agent. The portion of the tax receipts distributed to the local
government or its agent under this subsection (1)(b) may only be expended to
finance public improvement costs associated with the public improvements
financed in whole or in part by tax increment financing.

(2) The county assessor
shall allocate fifty percent of any increased real property value occurring in
the tax increment area to the tax allocation base value and the other fifty
percent to the tax increment value. This section does not authorize
revaluations of real property by the assessor for property taxation that are
not made in accordance with the assessor's revaluation plan under chapter 84.41
RCW or under other authorized revaluation procedures.

(3) The apportionment
of increases in assessed valuation in a tax increment area, and the associated
distribution to the local government of receipts from regular property taxes
that are imposed on the tax increment value, must cease when tax allocation
revenues are no longer necessary or obligated to pay the costs of the public
improvements. Any excess tax allocation revenues and earnings on the tax
allocation revenues remaining at the time the apportionment of tax receipts
terminates must be returned to the county treasurer and distributed to the taxing
districts that imposed regular property taxes, or had regular property taxes
imposed for it, in the tax increment area for collection that year, in
proportion to the rates of their regular property tax levies for collection
that year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. (1) A local government
designating a tax increment area and authorizing the use of tax increment
financing may incur general indebtedness, and issue general obligation bonds,
to finance the public improvements and retire the indebtedness in whole or in
part from tax allocation revenues it receives, subject to the following
requirements:

(a) The ordinance
adopted by the local government creating the tax increment area and authorizing
the use of tax increment financing indicates an intent to incur this
indebtedness and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated;
and

(b) The local
government includes this statement of the intent in all notices required by
section 16 of this act.

(2) The general
indebtedness incurred under subsection (1) of this section may be payable from
other tax revenues, the full faith and credit of the local government, and
nontax income, revenues, fees, and rents from the public improvements, as well
as contributions, grants, and nontax money available to the local government
for payment of costs of the public improvements or associated debt service on
the general indebtedness.

(3) The ordinance
creating the tax increment area and authorizing the use of tax increment
financing is subject to potential referendum action by the voters of the local
government if the ordinance authorizes the local government to incur
non-voter-approved general indebtedness payable from tax increment receipts.
If the voters of the local government otherwise possess the general power of
referendum on local government matters, the ordinance is subject to that
procedure. If the voters of the local government do not otherwise possess the
general power of referendum on local government matters, the referendum shall
conform to the requirements and procedures for referendum petitions provided
for code cities in RCW 35A.11.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. A direct or collateral
attack on a public improvement, public improvement ordinance, or tax increment
area purported to be authorized or created in conformance with applicable legal
requirements, including this chapter, may not be commenced more than thirty
days after publication of notice as required by section 17 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. This chapter supplements
and neither restricts nor limits any powers which the state or any local
government might otherwise have under any laws of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. This chapter expires July
1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. Sections 13 through 22 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

SUBPART B-REFERENCES IN TAXING
DISTRICTS' LAWS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. A new section is added
to chapter 27.12 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a rural county library district or intercounty rural library
district possesses, a rural county library district or an intercounty rural
library district may provide any public improvement as defined under section 13
of this act, but this additional authority is limited to participating in the
financing of the public improvements by agreeing to the tax increment financing
as provided under section 16 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a rural county library district or intercounty rural
library district to otherwise participate in the public improvements if that
authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. A new section is added
to chapter 35.61 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a metropolitan park district possesses, a metropolitan park
district may provide any public improvement as defined under section 13 of this
act, but this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing
of the public improvements by agreeing to the tax increment financing as
provided under section 16 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a metropolitan park district to otherwise participate in
the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
26. A new section is added
to chapter 36.32 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other authority
that a county possesses, a county may provide any public improvement as defined
under section 13 of this act, but this additional authority is limited to
participating in the financing of the public improvements by agreeing to the
tax increment financing as provided under section 16 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a county to otherwise participate in the public
improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
27. A new section is added
to chapter 36.68 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a park and recreation service area possesses, a park and
recreation service area may provide any public improvement as defined under
section 13 of this act, but this additional authority is limited to
participating in the financing of the public improvements by agreeing to the
tax increment financing as provided under section 16 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a park and recreation service area to otherwise
participate in the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
28. A new section is added
to chapter 36.69 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a park and recreation district possesses, a park and recreation
district may provide any public improvement as defined under section 13 of this
act, but this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing
of the public improvements by agreeing to the tax increment financing as
provided under section 16 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a park and recreation district to otherwise participate
in the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
29. A new section is added
to chapter 36.75 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a road district possesses, a road district may provide any
public improvement as defined under section 13 of this act, but this additional
authority is limited to participating in the financing of the public
improvements by agreeing to the tax increment financing as provided under
section 16 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a road district to otherwise participate in the public
improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
30. A new section is added
to chapter 52.12 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a fire protection district possesses, a fire protection district
may provide any public improvement as defined under section 13 of this act, but
this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the
public improvements by agreeing to the tax increment financing as provided
under section 16 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a fire protection district to otherwise participate in
the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
31. A new section is added
to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a port district possesses, a port district may provide any
public improvement as defined under section 13 of this act, but this additional
authority is limited to participating in the financing of the public
improvements by agreeing to the tax increment financing as provided under
section 16 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a port district to otherwise participate in the public
improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
32. A new section is added
to chapter 54.16 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a public utility district possesses, a public utility district
may provide any public improvement as defined under section 13 of this act, but
this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the
public improvements by agreeing to the tax increment financing as provided
under section 16 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a public utility district to otherwise participate in
the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
33. A new section is added
to chapter 67.38 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a cultural arts, stadium, and convention center district
possesses, a cultural arts, stadium, and convention center district may provide
any public improvement as defined under section 13 of this act, but this
additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the public
improvements by agreeing to the tax increment financing as provided under
section 16 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a cultural arts, stadium, and convention center district
to otherwise participate in the public improvements if that authority exists
elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
34. A new section is added
to chapter 68.52 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a cemetery district possesses, a cemetery district may provide
any public improvement as defined under section 13 of this act, but this
additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the public
improvements by agreeing to the tax increment financing as provided under
section 16 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a cemetery district to otherwise participate in the
public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
35. A new section is added
to chapter 70.44 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a public hospital district possesses, a public hospital district
may provide any public improvement as defined under section 13 of this act, but
this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the
public improvements by agreeing to the tax increment financing as provided
under section 16 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a public hospital district to otherwise participate in
the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
36. A new section is added
to chapter 86.15 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a flood control zone district possesses, a flood control zone
district may provide any public improvement as defined under section 13 of this
act, but this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing
of the public improvements by agreeing to the tax increment financing as
provided under section 16 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a flood control zone district to otherwise participate
in the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

SUBPART C-PROPERTY TAX INCREMENT FINANCING
TECHNICAL PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
37. A new section is added
to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

Limitations on regular
property taxes that are provided in this chapter shall continue in a taxing
district whether or not a tax increment area exists within the taxing district
as provided under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 13 through 22 of this act).

Sec. 38. RCW 84.52.043 and 1995 c
99 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Within and subject to
the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular ad valorem tax
levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts hereafter named
shall be as follows:

(1) Levies of the
senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a) The levy by the state shall
not exceed three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value
adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio
fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support
of the common schools, except that a portion of this levy may be used as
provided in chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 13 through 22 of this act); (b) the
levy by any county shall not exceed one dollar and eighty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value; (c) the levy by any road district shall not exceed
two dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; and
(d) the levy by any city or town shall not exceed three dollars and
thirty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value.
However any county is hereby authorized to increase its levy from one dollar
and eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and
one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for general county
purposes if the total levies for both the county and any road district within
the county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as a result
of the increased county levy.

(2) The aggregate
levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts, other than the
state, shall not exceed five dollars and ninety cents per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing districts" includes all
taxing districts other than the state, counties, road districts, cities, towns,
port districts, and public utility districts. The limitations provided in this
subsection shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing
law by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution; (c)
levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW 84.34.230;
(d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical services imposed
under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable housing for very
low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; and (f) the portions of levies
by metropolitan park districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.120.

Sec. 39. RCW 84.52.065 and 1991
sp.s. c 31 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the
limitations in RCW 84.55.010, in each year the state shall levy for collection
in the following year for the support of common schools of the state a tax of
three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value upon the
assessed valuation of all taxable property within the state adjusted to the
state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state
department of revenue, except that a portion of this levy may be used as
provided in chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 13 through 22 of this act).

As used in this
section, "the support of common schools" includes the payment of the
principal and interest on bonds issued for capital construction projects for
the common schools.

Sec. 40. RCW 84.52.067 and 2001 c
3 s 7 (Initiative Measure No. 728) are each amended to read as follows:

All property taxes
levied by the state for the support of common schools, that are not diverted
under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 13 through 22 of this act), shall be paid
into the general fund of the state treasury as provided in RCW 84.56.280,
except for the amounts collected under RCW 84.52.068 which shall be directly
deposited into the student achievement fund and distributed to school districts
as provided in RCW 84.52.068.

Sec. 41. RCW 36.33.220 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 195 s 142 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative
authority of any county may budget, in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 36.40 RCW, and expend any portion of the county road property tax
revenues for any service to be provided in the unincorporated area of the
county notwithstanding any other provision of law, including chapter 36.82 RCW
and RCW 84.52.050 and 84.52.043. County road property tax revenues that are
diverted under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 13 through 22 of this act) may be
expended as provided under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 13 through 22 of this
act).

Sec. 42. RCW 36.79.140 and 1997 c
81 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

At the time the board
reviews the six-year program of each county each even-numbered year, it shall
consider and shall approve for inclusion in its recommended budget, as required
by RCW 36.79.130, the portion of the rural arterial construction program
scheduled to be performed during the biennial period beginning the following
July 1st. Subject to the appropriations actually approved by the legislature,
the board shall as soon as feasible approve rural arterial trust account funds
to be spent during the ensuing biennium for preliminary proposals in priority sequence
as established pursuant to RCW 36.79.090. Only those counties that during the
preceding twelve months have spent all revenues collected for road purposes
only for such purposes, including traffic law enforcement, as are allowed to
the state by Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution are eligible to
receive funds from the rural arterial trust account((: PROVIDED HOWEVER)),
except that: (1) Counties with a population of less than eight
thousand are exempt from this eligibility restriction((: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That)); (2) counties expending revenues collected for road
purposes only on other governmental services after authorization from the
voters of that county under RCW 84.55.050 are also exempt from this eligibility
restriction; and (3) this restriction shall not apply to any moneys diverted
from the road district levy under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 13 through 22 of
this act). The board shall authorize rural arterial trust account funds
for the construction project portion of a project previously authorized for a
preliminary proposal in the sequence in which the preliminary proposal has been
completed and the construction project is to be placed under contract. At such
time the board may reserve rural arterial trust account funds for expenditure
in future years as may be necessary for completion of preliminary proposals and
construction projects to be commenced in the ensuing biennium.

The board may, within
the constraints of available rural arterial trust funds, consider additional
projects for authorization upon a clear and conclusive showing by the
submitting county that the proposed project is of an emergent nature and that
its need was unable to be anticipated at the time the six-year program of the
county was developed. The proposed projects shall be evaluated on the basis of
the priority rating factors specified in RCW 36.79.080.

Sec. 43. RCW 36.82.040 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 195 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of
raising revenue for establishing, laying out, constructing, altering,
repairing, improving, and maintaining county roads, bridges, and wharves
necessary for vehicle ferriage and for other proper county purposes, the board
shall annually at the time of making the levy for general purposes make a
uniform tax levy throughout the county, or any road district thereof, of not to
exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value
of the last assessed valuation of the taxable property in the county, or road
district thereof, unless other law of the state requires a lower maximum levy,
in which event such lower maximum levy shall control. All funds accruing from
such levy shall be credited to and deposited in the county road fund except
that revenue diverted under RCW 36.33.220 shall be placed in a separate and
identifiable account within the county current expense fund and except that
revenue diverted under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 13 through 22 of this act)
shall be expended as provided under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 13 through 22
of this act).

Sec. 44. RCW 46.68.124 and 1990 c
33 s 586 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The equivalent
population for each county shall be computed as the sum of the population
residing in the county's unincorporated area plus twenty-five percent of the
population residing in the county's incorporated area. Population figures
required for the computations in this subsection shall be certified by the
director of the office of financial management on or before July 1st of each
odd-numbered year.

(2) The total annual
road cost for each county shall be computed as the sum of one twenty-fifth of
the total estimated county road replacement cost, plus the total estimated
annual maintenance cost. Appropriate costs for bridges and ferries shall be
included. The county road administration board shall be responsible for
establishing a uniform system of roadway categories for both maintenance and
construction and also for establishing a single statewide cost per mile rate
for each roadway category. The total annual cost for each county will be based
on the established statewide cost per mile and associated mileage for each
category. The mileage to be used for these computations shall be as shown in
the county road log as maintained by the county road administration board as of
July 1, 1985, and each two years thereafter. Each county shall be responsible
for submitting changes, corrections, and deletions as regards the county road log
to the county road administration board. Such changes, corrections, and
deletions shall be subject to verification and approval by the county road
administration board prior to inclusion in the county road log.

(3) The money need
factor for each county shall be the county's total annual road cost less the
following four amounts:

(a) One-half the sum of
the actual county road tax levied upon the valuation of all taxable property
within the county road districts pursuant to RCW 36.82.040, including any
amount of such tax diverted under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 13 through 22 of
this act), for the two calendar years next preceding the year of
computation of the allocation amounts as certified by the department of
revenue;

(b) One-half the sum of
all funds received by the county road fund from the federal forest reserve fund
pursuant to RCW 28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020 during the two calendar years next
preceding the year of computation of the allocation amounts as certified by the
state treasurer;

(c) One-half the sum of
timber excise taxes received by the county road fund pursuant to chapter 84.33
RCW in the two calendar years next preceding the year of computation of the
allocation amounts as certified by the state treasurer;

(d) One-half the sum of
motor vehicle license fees and motor vehicle and special fuel taxes refunded to
the county, pursuant to RCW 46.68.080 during the two calendar years next
preceding the year of computation of the allocation amounts as certified by the
state treasurer.

(4) The state treasurer
and the department of revenue shall furnish to the county road administration
board the information required by subsection (3) of this section on or before
July 1st of each odd-numbered year.

(5) The county road
administration board, shall compute and provide to the counties the allocation
factors of the several counties on or before September 1st of each year based
solely upon the sources of information herein before required: PROVIDED, That
the allocation factor shall be held to a level not more than five percent above
or five percent below the allocation factor in use during the previous calendar
year. Upon computation of the actual allocation factors of the several
counties, the county road administration board shall provide such factors to
the state treasurer to be used in the computation of the counties' fuel tax
allocation for the succeeding calendar year. The state treasurer shall adjust
the fuel tax allocation of each county on January 1st of every year based
solely upon the information provided by the county road administration board.

Sec. 45. RCW 82.03.130 and 1998 c
54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
have jurisdiction to decide the following types of appeals:

(a) Appeals taken
pursuant to RCW 82.03.190.

(b) Appeals from a
county board of equalization pursuant to RCW 84.08.130.

(c) Appeals by an
assessor or landowner from an order of the director of revenue made pursuant to
RCW 84.08.010 and 84.08.060, if filed with the board of tax appeals within
thirty days after the mailing of the order, the right to such an appeal being
hereby established.

(d) Appeals by an
assessor or owner of an intercounty public utility or private car company from
determinations by the director of revenue of equalized assessed valuation of
property and the apportionment thereof to a county made pursuant to chapter
84.12 and 84.16 RCW, if filed with the board of tax appeals within thirty days
after mailing of the determination, the right to such appeal being hereby
established.

(e) Appeals by an
assessor, landowner, or owner of an intercounty public utility or private car
company from a determination of any county indicated ratio for such county
compiled by the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.48.075: PROVIDED,
That

(i) Said appeal be
filed after review of the ratio under RCW 84.48.075(3) and not later than
fifteen days after the mailing of the certification; and

(ii) The hearing before
the board shall be expeditiously held in accordance with rules prescribed by
the board and shall take precedence over all matters of the same character.

(f) Appeals from the
decisions of sale price of second class shorelands on navigable lakes by the
department of natural resources pursuant to RCW 79.94.210.

(g) ((Appeals from
urban redevelopment property tax apportionment district proposals established
by governmental ordinances pursuant to RCW 39.88.060.

(h))) Appeals from interest rates as determined by
the department of revenue for use in valuing farmland under current use
assessment pursuant to RCW 84.34.065.

(((i))) (h)
Appeals from revisions to stumpage value tables used to determine value by the
department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.33.091.

(((j))) (i)
Appeals from denial of tax exemption application by the department of revenue
pursuant to RCW 84.36.850.

(((k))) (j)
Appeals pursuant to RCW 84.40.038(3).

(2) Except as otherwise
specifically provided by law hereafter, the provisions of RCW 1.12.070 shall
apply to all notices of appeal filed with the board of tax appeals.

PART IV‑-MISCELLANEOUS

Sec. 46. RCW 35.87A.010 and 2000
c 201 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

To aid general economic
development and neighborhood revitalization, and to facilitate the cooperation
of merchants, businesses, and residential property owners which assists trade,
economic viability, and liveability, the legislature hereby authorizes all
counties and all incorporated cities and towns, including unclassified cities
and towns operating under special charters:

(1) To establish, after
a petition submitted by the operators responsible for sixty percent of the
assessments by businesses and multifamily residential or mixed-use projects
within the area, parking and business improvement areas, hereafter referred to
as area or areas, for the following purposes:

(a) The acquisition,
construction or maintenance of parking facilities for the benefit of the area;

(b) Decoration of any
public place in the area;

(c) Sponsorship or
promotion of public events which are to take place on or in public places in
the area;

(d) Furnishing of music
in any public place in the area;

(e) Providing
professional management, planning, and promotion for the area, including the
management and promotion of retail trade activities in the area; or

(f) Providing
maintenance and security for common, public areas.

(2) To levy special
assessments on all businesses and multifamily residential or mixed-use projects
within the area and specially benefited by a parking and business improvement
area to pay in whole or in part the damages or costs incurred therein as provided
in this chapter.

(3) To enter into
agreements with a legislative authority to administer community revitalization
projects within an apportionment district established under sections 1 through
11 of this act.

Sec. 47. RCW 82.14.050 and 1999 c
165 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The counties, cities,
and transportation authorities under RCW 82.14.045 and public facilities
districts under chapter 36.100 and 35.57 RCW shall contract, prior to the
effective date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use tax, the
administration and collection to the state department of revenue, which shall
deduct a percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent
of the taxes collected for administration and collection expenses incurred by
the department. Except as provided in section 6 of this act, the
remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter which is
collected by the department of revenue shall be deposited by the state department
of revenue in the local sales and use tax account hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the local sales and use tax account may be spent only for
distribution to counties, cities, transportation authorities, and public
facilities districts imposing a sales and use tax. All administrative
provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW, as they now exist or
may hereafter be amended, shall, insofar as they are applicable to state sales
and use taxes, be applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter. Except
as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of investments of balances in the
local sales and use tax account shall be credited to the local sales and use
tax account and distributed to the counties, cities, transportation authorities,
and public facilities districts monthly.

Sec. 48. RCW 35.80.030 and 1989 c
133 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the local
governing body of a municipality finds that one or more conditions of the
character described in RCW 35.80.010 exist within its territorial limits, said
governing body may adopt ordinances relating to such dwellings, buildings,
structures, or premises. Such ordinances may provide for the following:

(a) That an
"improvement board" or officer be designated or appointed to exercise
the powers assigned to such board or officer by the ordinance as specified
herein. Said board or officer may be an existing municipal board or officer in
the municipality, or may be a separate board or officer appointed solely for
the purpose of exercising the powers assigned by said ordinance.

If a board is created,
the ordinance shall specify the terms, method of appointment, and type of
membership of said board, which may be limited, if the local governing body
chooses, to public officers as herein defined.

(b) If a board is
created, a public officer, other than a member of the improvement board, may be
designated to work with the board and carry out the duties and exercise the
powers assigned to said public officer by the ordinance.

(c) That if, after a
preliminary investigation of any dwelling, building, structure, or premises,
the board or officer finds that it is unfit for human habitation or other use,
he shall cause to be served either personally or by certified mail, with return
receipt requested, upon all persons having any interest therein, as shown upon
the records of the auditor's office of the county in which such property is
located, and shall post in a conspicuous place on such property, a complaint
stating in what respects such dwelling, building, structure, or premises is
unfit for human habitation or other use. If the whereabouts of any of such
persons is unknown and the same cannot be ascertained by the board or officer
in the exercise of reasonable diligence, and the board or officer makes an
affidavit to that effect, then the serving of such complaint or order upon such
persons may be made either by personal service or by mailing a copy of the
complaint and order by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt
requested, to each such person at the address of the building involved in the
proceedings, and mailing a copy of the complaint and order by first class mail
to any address of each such person in the records of the county assessor or the
county auditor for the county where the property is located. Such complaint
shall contain a notice that a hearing will be held before the board or officer,
at a place therein fixed, not less than ten days nor more than thirty days
after the serving of said complaint; and that all parties in interest shall be
given the right to file an answer to the complaint, to appear in person, or
otherwise, and to give testimony at the time and place in the complaint. The
rules of evidence prevailing in courts of law or equity shall not be
controlling in hearings before the board or officer. A copy of such complaint
shall also be filed with the auditor of the county in which the dwelling,
building, structure, or ((premise [premises])) premises is located,
and such filing of the complaint or order shall have the same force and effect
as other lis pendens notices provided by law.

(d) That the board or
officer may determine that a dwelling, building, structure, or premises is
unfit for human habitation or other use if it finds that conditions exist in
such dwelling, building, structure, or premises which are dangerous or
injurious to the health or safety of the occupants of such dwelling, building,
structure, or premises, the occupants of neighboring dwellings, or other
residents of such municipality. Such conditions may include the following,
without limitations: Defects therein increasing the hazards of fire or
accident; inadequate ventilation, light, or sanitary facilities, dilapidation,
disrepair, structural defects, uncleanliness, overcrowding, or inadequate
drainage. The ordinance shall state reasonable and minimum standards covering
such conditions, including those contained in ordinances adopted in accordance
with ((subdivision)) subsection (7)(a) ((herein)) of
this section, to guide the board or the public officer and the agents and
employees of either, in determining the fitness of a dwelling for human
habitation, or building, structure, or premises for other use.

(e) That the
determination of whether a dwelling, building, structure, or premises should be
repaired or demolished, shall be based on specific stated standards on (i) the
degree of structural deterioration of the dwelling, building, structure, or
premises, or (ii) the relationship that the estimated cost of repair bears to
the value of the dwelling, building, structure, or premises, with the method of
determining this value to be specified in the ordinance.

(f) That if, after the
required hearing, the board or officer determines that the dwelling is unfit
for human habitation, or building or structure or premises is unfit for other
use, it shall state in writing its findings of fact in support of such
determination, and shall issue and cause to be served upon the owner or party
in interest thereof, as is provided in ((subdivision (1)))(c) of this
subsection, and shall post in a conspicuous place on said property, an
order which (i) requires the owner or party in interest, within the time
specified in the order, to repair, alter, or improve such dwelling, building,
structure, or premises to render it fit for human habitation, or for other use,
or to vacate and close the dwelling, building, structure, or premises, if such
course of action is deemed proper on the basis of the standards set forth as
required in ((subdivision (1)))(e) of this subsection; or (ii)
requires the owner or party in interest, within the time specified in the
order, to remove or demolish such dwelling, building, structure, or premises,
if this course of action is deemed proper on the basis of said standards. If
no appeal is filed, a copy of such order shall be filed with the auditor of the
county in which the dwelling, building, structure, or premises is located.

(g) The owner or any
party in interest, within thirty days from the date of service upon the owner
and posting of an order issued by the board under the provisions of ((subdivision))
(c) of this subsection, may file an appeal with the appeals commission.

The local governing
body of the municipality shall designate or establish a municipal agency to
serve as the appeals commission. The local governing body shall also establish
rules of procedure adequate to assure a prompt and thorough review of matters
submitted to the appeals commission, and such rules of procedure shall include
the following, without being limited thereto: (i) All matters submitted to the
appeals commission must be resolved by the commission within sixty days from
the date of filing therewith and (ii) a transcript of the findings of fact of the
appeals commission shall be made available to the owner or other party in
interest upon demand.

The findings and orders
of the appeals commission shall be reported in the same manner and shall bear
the same legal consequences as if issued by the board, and shall be subject to
review only in the manner and to the extent provided in ((subdivision)) subsection
(2) of this section.

If the owner or party
in interest, following exhaustion of his rights to appeal, fails to comply with
the final order to repair, alter, improve, vacate, close, remove, or demolish
the dwelling, building, structure, or premises, the board or officer may direct
or cause such dwelling, building, structure, or premises to be repaired,
altered, improved, vacated, and closed, removed, or demolished.

(h) That the amount of
the cost of such repairs, alterations or improvements; or vacating and closing;
or removal or demolition by the board or officer, shall be assessed against the
real property upon which such cost was incurred unless such amount is
previously paid. Upon certification to him by the treasurer of the
municipality in cases arising out of the city or town or by the county
improvement board or officer, in cases arising out of the county, of the
assessment amount being due and owing, the county treasurer shall enter the
amount of such assessment upon the tax rolls against the property for the
current year and the same shall become a part of the general taxes for that
year to be collected at the same time and with interest at such rates and in
such manner as provided for in RCW 84.56.020, as now or hereafter amended, for
delinquent taxes, and when collected to be deposited to the credit of the
general fund of the municipality. If the dwelling, building, structure, or
premises is removed or demolished by the board or officer, the board or officer
shall, if possible, sell the materials of such dwelling, building, structure,
(([or])) or premises in accordance with procedures set forth in
said ordinance, and shall credit the proceeds of such sale against the cost of
the removal or demolition and if there be any balance remaining, it shall be
paid to the parties entitled thereto, as determined by the board or officer,
after deducting the costs incident thereto.

The assessment shall constitute
a lien against the property which shall be of equal rank with state, county,
and municipal taxes and shall have a first priority and shall be paid before
the payment of other state, county, and municipal taxes from any tax payments
collected or the proceeds of any sale of the property through foreclosure or
sale by the county including, but not limited to, the proceeds of sales of any
property acquired by the county by tax deed.

(2) Any person affected
by an order issued by the appeals commission pursuant to ((subdivision))
subsection (1)(f) ((hereof)) of this section may, within
thirty days after the posting and service of the order, petition to the
superior court for an injunction restraining the public officer or members of
the board from carrying out the provisions of the order. In all such
proceedings the court is authorized to affirm, reverse, or modify the order and
such trial shall be heard de novo.

(3) An ordinance
adopted by the local governing body of the municipality may authorize the board
or officer to exercise such powers as may be necessary or convenient to carry
out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this section. These powers
shall include the following in addition to others herein granted: (a)(i) To
determine which dwellings within the municipality are unfit for human
habitation; (ii) to determine which buildings, structures, or premises are
unfit for other use; (b) to administer oaths and affirmations, examine
witnesses and receive evidence; and (c) to investigate the dwelling and other
property conditions in the municipality or county and to enter upon premises
for the purpose of making examinations when the board or officer has reasonable
ground for believing they are unfit for human habitation, or for other use: PROVIDED,
That such entries shall be made in such manner as to cause the least possible
inconvenience to the persons in possession, and to obtain an order for this
purpose after submitting evidence in support of an application which is
adequate to justify such an order from a court of competent jurisdiction in the
event entry is denied or resisted.

(4) The local governing
body of any municipality adopting an ordinance pursuant to this chapter may
appropriate the necessary funds to administer such ordinance.

(5) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to abrogate or impair the powers of the courts or of
any department of any municipality to enforce any provisions of its charter or
its ordinances or regulations, nor to prevent or punish violations thereof; and
the powers conferred by this section shall be in addition and supplemental to
the powers conferred by any other law.

(6) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to impair or limit in any way the power of the
municipality to define and declare nuisances and to cause their removal or
abatement, by summary proceedings or otherwise.

(7) Any municipality
may (by ordinance adopted by its governing body) (a) prescribe minimum
standards for the use and occupancy of dwellings throughout the municipality,
or county, (b) prescribe minimum standards for the use or occupancy of any
building, structure, or premises used for any other purpose, (c) prevent the
use or occupancy of any dwelling, building, structure, or premises, which is
injurious to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare, and (d) prescribe
punishment for the violation of any provision of such ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
49. A new section is added
to chapter 35.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The municipality,
as an alternative or additional remedy, may acquire by negotiation the
substandard building, structure, or premises and the land on which it is
located, and after the acquisition may utilize public or other available funds
to improve the property acquired and the property may be used or transferred,
as authorized under chapter 35.80A RCW, as if the property were acquired under
RCW 35.80A.010, if the owner or the owner's representative notifies the
municipality in writing that the owner refuses or is unable to proceed or fails
to: (a) Repair, alter, or improve a substandard building, structure, or
premises; or (b) remove or demolish a substandard building, structure, or
premises as required by the order of the board or officer under RCW 35.80.030.

(2) If the substandard
building to be acquired is part of a community revitalization project, the
municipality may acquire property adjacent to the substandard building, as
necessary to provide for the implementation of the approved community revitalization
project, upon a finding by resolution of the local governing body that the
acquisition is necessary in order to cure the problems associated with the
substandard building or buildings, and that redevelopment of the site is not
feasible unless the adjacent property is acquired. This subsection provides
supplemental and alternative authority for acquisition of property by a
municipality.

(3)(a) If the owner of
a substandard building presents evidence satisfactory to the municipality that
the owner does not have available sufficient funds or is unable to obtain
financing on reasonable terms to repair, alter, or improve a substandard
building as required by the order of the board or officer, under RCW 35.80.030,
and in a manner that will place the substandard building in a condition that
will cure the functional obsolescence of the building for its intended use,
then the municipality may, through its local governing body, approve a project
agreement with the owner that may provide for:

(i) Repair,
alterations, and improvement of the substandard building so as to comply with
the order of the board or officer, under RCW 35.80.030, and with the terms and
conditions of the project agreement;

(ii) The manner in
which work under the project agreement will be accomplished and how payment
will be made, that may include, but is not limited to, work let by the
municipality and payment by the municipality for work completed on the
substandard building in accordance with the project agreement; and

(iii) Repayment by the
owner of the costs incurred by the municipality under the project agreement
which repayment may be made in installments with interest on the unpaid portion
as fixed by the local legislative body or paid in such other manner as may be
provided in the project agreement.

(b) If not otherwise
provided in the project agreement, the amount of costs incurred by the
municipality in accordance with the project agreement must be treated as if it
were an assessment on an approved final assessment roll for improvements
constructed within a local improvement district, under chapter 35.44 RCW, and
the costs shall be a lien on the property improved, in the same manner and to
the same extent as a local improvement district assessment lien, and shall be
collected in the same manner as assessments, installment payments, interest,
and penalties are collected under chapter 35.49 RCW.

(c) The project
agreement may provide that the lien for the repayment of all or a portion of
the costs incurred by the municipality under the project agreement may be
subordinated to a deed of trust securing the loan of private funds to the owner
for payment of project costs incurred by the owner under the project agreement.

(4) The municipality or
a public corporation created by a municipality under RCW 35.21.660 or 35.21.730
may provide for the payment of the costs and expenses incurred by the
municipality under a project agreement by revenue or general obligation bonds
or notes payable in whole or in part from the repayment of project costs by
owners and through enforcement of the assessments against the property
benefited or from any other federal, public, or private funds that may be made
available for such purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
50. Sections 1 through 11 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
51. Part headings as used in
this act do not constitute any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 52. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---