BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
82.08.0283 and 1998 c 168 s 2 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to
sales of

_8 insulin; prosthetic devices and the components thereof;
dental

_9 appliances, devices, restorations, and substitutes, and
the

10 components thereof, including but not limited to full
and partial

11 dentures, crowns, inlays, fillings, braces, and
retainers;

12 orthotic devices prescribed for an individual by a
person licensed

13 under chapters 18.22, 18.25, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW;
hearing

14 instruments dispensed or fitted by a person licensed or
certified

15 under chapter 18.35 RCW, and the components thereof;
medicines of

16 mineral, animal, and botanical origin prescribed,
administered,

17 dispensed, or used in the treatment of an individual by
a person

18 licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW; ostomic items; and
medically

p. 1 HB
1116

_1 prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to, oxygen

_2 concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid
oxygen

_3 systems, and gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed
for an

_4 individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW

_5 for use in the medical treatment of that individual. In
addition,

_6 the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to
charges made

_7 for labor and services rendered in respect to the repairing,

_8 cleaning, altering, or improving of any of the items
exempted

_9 under this section.

10 Sec. 2. RCW
82.12.0277 and 1998 c 168 s 3 are each amended to read

11 as follows:

12 The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in
respect to

13 the use of insulin; prosthetic devices and the
components thereof;

14 dental appliances, devices, restorations, and
substitutes, and the

15 components thereof, including but not limited to full
and partial

16 dentures, crowns, inlays, fillings, braces, and
retainers;

17 orthotic devices prescribed for an individual by a
person licensed

18 under chapters 18.22, 18.25, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW;
hearing

19 instruments dispensed or fitted by a person licensed or
certified

20 under chapter 18.35 RCW, and the components thereof;
medicines of

21 mineral, animal, and botanical origin prescribed,
administered,

22 dispensed, or used in the treatment of an individual by
a person

23 licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW; ostomic items; and
medically

24 prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to, oxygen

25 concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid
oxygen

26 systems, and gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed
for an

27 individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW

28 for use in the medical treatment of that individual.

29 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary
for the immediate

30 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

31 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

32 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1116 p. 2