BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The use of traffic
safety cameras is subject to the following regulations:

(a) The appropriate
local legislative authority must first enact an ordinance, or the department of
transportation must first establish traffic safety camera zones, allowing for
their use to detect one or more of the following: Speeding, stoplight, or
railroad crossing violations. At a minimum, the local ordinance must contain
the restrictions described in this section. Cities and counties using traffic
safety cameras before the effective date of this act are subject to the
restrictions described in this section, but are not required to enact an
authorizing ordinance.

(b) Traffic safety
cameras may take pictures of the vehicle and vehicle license plate only and
only while an infraction is occurring.

(c) Under their
respective jurisdictions, the law enforcement agency or the department of
transportation shall plainly mark the locations where the automated traffic
enforcement system is used by placing signs on street locations that clearly
indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone where traffic laws are
enforced by an automated traffic enforcement system.

(d) Notices of
infractions must be mailed to the registered owner of the vehicle within
fourteen days of the infraction occurring.

(e) A person receiving
a notice of an infraction based on evidence detected by a traffic safety camera
may respond to the notice by mail.

(2) Infractions
detected through the use of traffic safety cameras will be recorded as are
stopping, standing, or parking violations under RCW 46.61.560, but are not part
of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120.

(3) If a notice of
traffic infraction is sent to the registered owner under RCW 46.63.030(2) and
the registered owner is a rental car business, the infraction will be dismissed
against the business if it mails to the issuing agency, within fourteen days of
receiving the notice, the name and known mailing address of the individual
driving or renting the vehicle when the infraction occurred. If the business
is unable to determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the
infraction occurred, the business must sign an affidavit making this
declaration. The affidavit must be mailed to the issuing agency within
fourteen days of receiving the notice of traffic infraction. Timely mailing of
this affidavit to the issuing agency relieves a rental car business of any
liability under this chapter for the notice of infraction. An affidavit form
suitable for this purpose must be included with each infraction issued, along
with instructions for its completion and use.

(4) The traffic safety
commission may adopt rules regarding:

(a) Mechanical and
operational standards for traffic safety camera equipment;

(b) The placement of
signs to notify drivers that they are entering a jurisdiction or area that uses
traffic safety cameras;

(c) Recommendations on
how cities and counties will educate the public about traffic safety cameras.

(5) Jurisdictions using
traffic safety cameras must comply with any standards adopted under subsection
(4) of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.63.030 and 1995
c 219 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A law enforcement
officer has the authority to issue a notice of traffic infraction:

(a) When the infraction
is committed in the officer's presence;

(b) When the officer is
acting upon the request of a law enforcement officer in whose presence the
traffic infraction was committed; ((or))

(c) If an officer
investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle accident has reasonable cause to
believe that the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the accident has
committed a traffic infraction; or

(d) When the
infraction is mailed to the registered owner or the person renting a vehicle as
authorized under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) When a traffic
safety camera is used in compliance with section 1 of this act, a law
enforcement officer, whether present or not during the commission of the
infraction, or other issuing agency may issue a notice of traffic infraction by
mail to the registered owner of the vehicle, or to the person renting the
vehicle. The registered owner of the vehicle or the person renting the vehicle
is responsible for the infraction.

(3) The owner of a
vehicle is responsible for a violation unless within fifteen days after
notification of the violation, furnishes the officials or agents of the
municipality that issued the citation with:

(a) An affidavit
made under oath, stating that the vehicle involved was, at the time, stolen,
sold, or in the care, custody, or control of some person other than the
registered owner; or

(b) Testimony in
open court under oath that the person was not the operator of the vehicle at
the time of the alleged violation.

(4) A court may
issue a notice of traffic infraction upon receipt of a written statement of the
officer that there is reasonable cause to believe that an infraction was
committed.

(((3))) (5)
If any motor vehicle without a driver is found parked, standing, or stopped in
violation of this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or local
law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution, the officer finding the vehicle
shall take its registration number and may take any other information displayed
on the vehicle which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to
the vehicle a notice of traffic infraction.

(((4))) (6)
In the case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle under RCW 46.55.120, upon
receiving a complaint by a registered tow truck operator that has incurred
costs in removing, storing, and disposing of an abandoned vehicle, an officer
of the law enforcement agency responsible for directing the removal of the
vehicle shall send a notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known
address of the registered owner of the vehicle. The officer shall append to
the notice of infraction, on a form prescribed by the department of licensing,
a notice indicating the amount of costs incurred as a result of removing,
storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at
auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction will not be
considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty payable under this
chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied that the person has made
restitution in the amount of the deficiency remaining after disposal of the
vehicle.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.63.140 and 1980
c 128 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In any traffic
infraction case involving a violation of this title or equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution
relating to the stopping, standing, or parking of a vehicle, proof that the
particular vehicle described in the notice of traffic infraction was stopping,
standing, or parking in violation of any such provision of this title or an
equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution, together with proof that the person named in the notice of traffic infraction
was at the time of the violation the registered owner of the vehicle, ((shall))
constitutes in evidence a prima facie presumption that the registered
owner of the vehicle was the person who parked or placed the vehicle at the
point where, and for the time during which, the violation occurred.

(2) The foregoing
stated presumption ((shall apply)) applies only when the
procedure prescribed in RCW 46.63.030(((3))) (5) has been
followed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. By January 1, 2003, and
for four years thereafter, the Washington traffic safety commission shall
provide the chairs of the senate and house transportation committees a report
regarding the use, outcomes, and other relevant issues of traffic safety
cameras in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The legislature
respectfully request the Washington state supreme court to amend the Infraction
Rules for Courts of Limited Jurisdiction to conform to this act. Furthermore,
the legislature respectfully asks the court to create a notice of infraction
that is consistent with this act.

---
END ---