BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
28A.410.010 and 1992 c 159 s 3 and 1992 c 60 s 2 are

_6 each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

_7 (1) The state board of education shall
establish, publish, and

_8 enforce rules ((and regulations)) determining
eligibility for and

_9 certification of personnel employed in the common
schools of this

10 state, including certification for emergency or
temporary,

11 substitute or provisional duty and under such
certificates or

12 permits as the board shall deem proper or as otherwise
prescribed

13 by law((.)) subject to the following
conditions:

14 (a) The rules shall require that the initial
application for

15 certification shall require a record check of the
applicant

16 through the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system

17 and through the federal bureau of investigation at the
applicant's

18 expense. The record check shall include a fingerprint
check using a

p. 1 SHB
1120

_1 complete Washington state criminal identification
fingerprint

_2 card. The superintendent of public instruction may
waive the record

_3 check for any applicant who has had a record check
within the two

_4 years before application.

_5 (b) The rules shall permit a holder of a lapsed
certificate who

_6 has separated from service with a school district or
approved

_7 private school located in the state of Washington to
be employed

_8 on a conditional basis for a maximum of two years by
a school

_9 district or approved private school under the
following

10 conditions:

11 (i) The holder's certificate has not been
suspended or revoked;

12 (ii) The holder has successfully completed
state-mandated

13 background checks;

14 (iii) The holder has a letter of recommendation
from the school

15 district or approved private school of last
employment;

16 (iv) The holder must complete any certificate
renewal

17 requirements established by the state board of
education within

18 two years of initial reemployment, and must develop
and file with

19 the employer a mutually agreed upon written plan for
achieving the

20 requirements within the allotted time; and

21 (v) If hired by a school district, the holder
shall be employed

22 under a one-year provisional contract that may be
renewed no more

23 than once. The holder must make satisfactory
progress toward the

24 achievement of the certificate renewal requirements
before the

25 provisional contract may be renewed.

26 (2) In establishing rules pertaining to the
qualifications of

27 instructors of American sign language the state board
shall

28 consult with the national association of the deaf,
"sign

29 instructors guidance network" (s.i.g.n.), and the
Washington state

30 association of the deaf for evaluation and certification
of sign

31 language instructors.

32 (3) The superintendent of public instruction
shall act as the

33 administrator of any such rules ((and regulations))
and have the

34 power to issue any certificates or permits and revoke
the same in

35 accordance with board rules ((and regulations)).

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1120 p. 2