BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. With more than 45,000
reported traffic

_7 accidents each year, average daily traffic counts as
high as

_8 264,000 vehicles per day in the downtown Seattle area,
and average

_9 daily traffic counts growing by 2.61 percent annually,
the need

10 for mitigating the frustration and rage experienced by
drivers is

11 immediate. Further, since drivers are generally
required to pass a

12 written driver's exam and driving skills test only once
in their

13 lifetime, a significant amount of driving information
may be

14 forgotten. Therefore, it is necessary to initiate a
driver

15 education campaign in order to help create safer driving

16 conditions on our state highways. This commercial
campaign will

17 review useful driving knowledge and skills that will
stimulate

18 defensive driving, resulting in a reduction of traffic
accidents

p. 1 HB
1122

_1 and a decrease in aggressive driving. The campaign will
respond to

_2 support for license renewal testing by addressing
traffic

_3 education, without the expense of mandatory tests.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The drivers education
task force,

_5 consisting of representatives from the department of

_6 transportation, the department of licensing, the traffic
safety

_7 commission, and the state patrol is created. The
drivers education

_8 task force will develop a detailed work plan, budget,
marketing

_9 strategy, and performance measures by September 1,
2001. As soon

10 thereafter as possible, the task force shall develop and
deploy a

11 series of advertisements using radio, television,
billboards, and

12 other media as practicable that target those drivers who
are most

13 at risk of causing accidents or engaging in acts of road
rage. The

14 ad campaign shall run for at least twelve months. In
addition, the

15 task force shall develop a web site to coincide with the
ad

16 campaign to monitor the targets' response. This web
site will be a

17 forum for the public to voice its opinions about the
campaign. This

18 site will be a tool for the state to monitor general comments,

19 concerns, and questions regarding traffic safety.

20 At the conclusion of the twelve-month ad campaign,
the task

21 force shall collate the web site responses and conduct a
random

22 survey of targeted drivers to determine whether or not
the drivers

23 believed the ads made any difference in their driving

24 behaviors. These results, along with traffic accident
data, will

25 help the task force to determine whether or not their
efforts were

26 successful. The task force shall summarize these
results and

27 present them to the legislature no later than December
31,

28 2002. This section expires July 1, 2003.

29 The legislature may extend the campaign for a longer
period of

30 time if the web site shows that the commercials are
helpful in

31 reducing dangerous driving.

32 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 46.20

33 RCW to read as follows:

34 A surcharge of fifty cents is imposed on each initial
driver's

35 license fee and on each driver's license renewal fee for
the

HB 1122 p. 2

_1 support of the drivers education task force. This
section expires

_2 July 1, 2003.

_3 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The sum of one
million dollars, or as much

_4 thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
biennium

_5 ending June 30, 2003, from the motor vehicle fund to the

_6 department of transportation for the purpose of
supporting the

_7 activities of the drivers education task force.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary
for the immediate

_9 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

10 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

11 takes effect July 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1122