BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 84.36

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) A person who provides volunteer services to a
school

_8 district is entitled to an exemption for taxes levied by
the state

_9 on the person's residence if all of the following
conditions are

10 met:

11 (a) The person must meet the conditions specified in
RCW

12 84.36.381 (1) through (3) for a property tax exemption.
The income

13 criteria of RCW 84.36.381 do not apply to exemptions
under this

14 section.

15 (b) The person must provide more than ninety hours
of volunteer

16 services to the district during a calendar year.

17 (c) The person must submit an affidavit to the
county treasurer

18 as provided in this section.

p. 1 HB
1123

_1 (d) The residence must meet the definition in RCW
84.36.383.

_2 (2) Exemptions under this section are administered
as a

_3 discharge of taxes due with a corresponding reduction in
tax

_4 revenue. Upon request, a school district must provide a
person with

_5 an affidavit certifying the number of hours of volunteer
work the

_6 person performed for the school district during a
calendar

_7 year. The person must submit the affidavit to the
county treasurer

_8 on or before April 30th of the year after the year in
which the

_9 volunteer services were performed. If the treasurer
finds that the

10 conditions of this section are met, the treasurer shall
treat the

11 affidavit as full payment of property taxes levied by
the state on

12 the residence of the person for that year.

13 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act
applies to taxes

14 levied for collection in 2002 and thereafter.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1123 p. 2