BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
71.36.005 and 1991 c 326 s 11 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 The legislature intends to encourage the development
of

_8 community-based interagency collaborative efforts to
plan for and

_9 provide mental health services to children in a manner
that

10 coordinates existing categorical children's mental
health programs

11 and funding, is sensitive to the unique cultural
circumstances of

12 children of color, eliminates duplicative case
management, and to

13 the greatest extent possible, blends categorical funding
to offer

14 more service options to each child.

15 The legislature finds that reduction of risk,
prevention of

16 onset, and early intervention in childhood are
important

17 strategies to promote healthy development since many
adult mental

18 disorders begin in childhood. Mental health is
linked to general

p. 1 SHB
1124

_1 health and classroom performance, and to avoiding
involvement with

_2 the juvenile justice system. Untreated mental
illness results in

_3 more severe symptoms for the individual and more
costs to

_4 society's human services and law enforcement systems.

_5 The legislature intends that the children's
mental health

_6 service delivery system in Washington state be
operated in an

_7 effective and efficient manner with measurable
outcomes and that

_8 to the degree possible all children in need of mental
health

_9 services will have access to quality, professional
services in a

10 timely manner.

11 Sec. 2. RCW
71.36.030 and 1991 c 326 s 14 are each amended to read

12 as follows:

13 (1) On or before January 1, 1992, each regional
support

14 network, or county authority in counties that have not
established

15 a regional support network, shall initiate a local
planning effort

16 to develop a children's mental health services delivery
system.

17 (2) Representatives of the following agencies or
organizations

18 and the following individuals shall participate in the
local

19 planning effort:

20 (a) Representatives of the department of social and
health

21 services in the following program areas: Children and
family

22 services, medical care, mental health, juvenile
rehabilitation,

23 alcohol and substance abuse, and developmental
disabilities;

24 (b) The juvenile courts;

25 (c) The public health department or health district;

26 (d) The school districts;

27 (e) The educational service district serving schools
in the

28 county;

29 (f) Head start or early childhood education and
assistance

30 programs;

31 (g) Community action agencies; and

32 (h) Children's services providers, including
minority mental

33 health providers.

34 (3) Parents of children in need of mental health
services and

35 parents of children of color shall be invited to
participate in

36 the local planning effort.

SHB 1124 p. 2

_1 (4) The following information shall be developed
through the

_2 local planning effort and submitted to the secretary:

_3 (a) A supplement to the county's January 1, 1991,
children's

_4 mental health services report prepared pursuant to RCW
71.24.049

_5 to include the following data:

_6 (i) The number of children in need of mental health
services in

_7 the county or counties covered by the local planning
effort,

_8 including children in school and children receiving
services

_9 through the department of social and health services
division of

10 children and family services, division of developmental

11 disabilities, division of alcohol and substance abuse,
and

12 division of juvenile rehabilitation, grouped by severity
of their

13 mental illness;

14 (ii) The number of such children that are
underserved or

15 unserved and the types of services needed by such
children; and

16 (iii) The supply of children's mental health
specialists in the

17 county or counties covered by the local planning effort.

18 (b) A children's mental health services delivery
plan that

19 includes a description of the following:

20 (i) Children that will be served, giving
consideration to

21 children who are at significant risk of experiencing
mental

22 illness, as well as those already experiencing mental
illness;

23 (ii) How appropriate services needed by children
served through

24 the plan will be identified and provided, including
prevention and

25 identification services;

26 (iii) How a lead case manager for each child will be

27 identified;

28 (iv) How funding for existing services will be
coordinated to

29 create more flexibility in meeting children's needs.
Such funding

30 shall include the services and programs inventoried
pursuant to

31 RCW 71.36.020(1);

32 (v) How the children's mental health delivery system
will

33 incorporate the elements of the early periodic
screening,

34 diagnosis, and treatment services plan developed
pursuant to RCW

35 71.36.020(2); and

36 (vi) How the children's mental health delivery
system will

37 coordinate with the regional support network information
system

38 developed pursuant to RCW 71.24.035(5)(g).

p. 3 SHB
1124

_1 (5) In developing the children's mental health
services

_2 delivery plan, every effort shall be made to reduce
duplication in

_3 service delivery and promote complementary services
among all

_4 entities that provide children's services related to
mental

_5 health.

_6 (6) The children's mental health services delivery
plan shall

_7 address the needs of children of color through at least
the

_8 following mechanisms:

_9 (a) Outreach initiatives, services, and modes of
service

10 delivery that meet the unique needs of children of
color; and

11 (b) Services to children of color that are culturally
relevant

12 and acceptable, as well as linguistically accessible.

13 (7) The regional support networks shall
biennially update the

14 information in the children's mental health services
delivery plan

15 described in subsection (4) of this section. The
updates shall

16 include a progress assessment based on the goals of
the previous

17 plan. The revised plans shall be submitted to the
secretary, who

18 shall compile the information in the individual plans
into a

19 statewide report to be submitted to the relevant
committees of the

20 legislature by July 1, 2002, and biennially
thereafter.

21 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 71.36

22 RCW to read as follows:

23 The joint legislative audit and review committee
shall conduct

24 a comprehensive review of the provisions of this
chapter. The

25 review shall be submitted to the appropriate committees
of the

26 legislature by July 1, 2002. The review shall include:

27 (1) An evaluation of both the inventory of services
and early

28 periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment plan
described in RCW

29 71.36.020. The evaluation of the inventory of services
shall

30 include an assessment of the completeness of the inventory;

31 recommendations for the need to establish performance
measures for

32 the children's mental health services delivery system;

33 recommendations for modifying the current statutory
requirements

34 related to the inventory; and recommendations for the

35 dissemination and uses of the inventory. The evaluation
of the

36 early periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment plan
shall

SHB 1124 p. 4

_1 include an assessment of the completeness of the plan;
an

_2 evaluation of the implementation of the plan; and an
assessment of

_3 modifications needed to assure that federal funding is
maximized;

_4 and

_5 (2) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the
implementation of

_6 the children's mental health services delivery plan
described in

_7 RCW 71.36.030. The evaluation shall include an
assessment of the

_8 overall needs of children with mental illness and the
continuum of

_9 resources available to them. The evaluation also shall
include

10 recommendations for modifications to the children's
mental health

11 services delivery system and the funding necessary to
meet the

12 needs of these children by the year 2006.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SHB
1124