BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Retired or disabled
school district and educational service district employees, or retired state
employees, who are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or
41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993, and their dependents may purchase health
care insurance coverage from the authority under terms and conditions
established by this chapter and by the board.

(2) Retired or disabled
school district and educational service district employees, or retired state
employees, who began receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32,
41.35, or 41.40 RCW on or after October 1, 1993, may enroll in benefit plans
under the authority during annual enrollment periods established by the board,
with demonstrated continuous employer group medical coverage from the time they
became retired or disabled.

(3) Retired or disabled
school district and educational service district employees, or retired state employees,
and their dependents shall pay the cost of premiums for the insurance offered
by the authority. The authority shall charge as premiums, the cost to the
authority of providing insurance coverage for retired or disabled school
district and educational service district employees, or retired state
employees, and their dependents, including any amounts necessary for reserves
and administration. However, the amount of the premium charged to retired or
disabled school district and educational service district employees, or retired
state employees, on the date of enrollment shall be reduced by the amount of
any existing subsidy.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---