BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.04.010 and 2000 c
142 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In this title, unless
the context otherwise requires:

(1) "Alcohol"
is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated oxide of ethyl, or spirit of
wine, which is commonly produced by the fermentation or distillation of grain,
starch, molasses, or sugar, or other substances including all dilutions and
mixtures of this substance. The term "alcohol" does not include
alcohol in the possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as
described in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a
fuel for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements of
husbandry.

(2) "Beer"
means any malt beverage or malt liquor as these terms are defined in this
chapter.

(3) "Beer
distributor" means a person who buys beer from a brewer or brewery located
either within or beyond the boundaries of the state, beer importers, or foreign
produced beer from a source outside the state of Washington, for the purpose of
selling the same pursuant to this title, or who represents such brewer or
brewery as agent.

(4) "Beer
importer" means a person or business within Washington who purchases beer
from a United States brewery holding a certificate of approval (B5) or foreign
produced beer from a source outside the state of Washington for the purpose of
selling the same pursuant to this title.

(5) "Brewer"
means any person engaged in the business of manufacturing beer and malt
liquor. Brewer includes a brand owner of malt beverages who holds a brewer's
notice with the federal bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location
outside the state and whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed
in-state brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a domestic
brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to licensed beer
distributors, and exporting beer from the state.

(6) "Board"
means the liquor control board, constituted under this title.

(7) "Club"
means an organization of persons, incorporated or unincorporated, operated
solely for fraternal, benevolent, educational, athletic or social purposes, and
not for pecuniary gain.

(8) "Consume"
includes the putting of liquor to any use, whether by drinking or otherwise.

(9) "Dentist"
means a practitioner of dentistry duly and regularly licensed and engaged in
the practice of his profession within the state pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.

(10)
"Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of distilling
spirits.

(11) "Domestic
brewery" means a place where beer and malt liquor are manufactured or
produced by a brewer within the state.

(12) "Domestic
winery" means a place where wines are manufactured or produced within the
state of Washington.

(13)
"Druggist" means any person who holds a valid certificate and is a
registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly engaged in carrying on the
business of pharmaceutical chemistry pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW.

(14) "Drug
store" means a place whose principal business is, the sale of drugs,
medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and maintains a regular prescription
department and employs a registered pharmacist during all hours the drug store
is open.

(15)
"Employee" means any person employed by the board((, including a
vendor, as hereinafter in this section defined)).

(16) "Fund"
means 'liquor revolving fund.'

(17) "Hotel"
means every building or other structure kept, used, maintained, advertised or
held out to the public to be a place where food is served and sleeping
accommodations are offered for pay to transient guests, in which twenty or more
rooms are used for the sleeping accommodation of such transient guests and
having one or more dining rooms where meals are served to such transient
guests, such sleeping accommodations and dining rooms being conducted in the
same building and buildings, in connection therewith, and such structure or
structures being provided, in the judgment of the board, with adequate and
sanitary kitchen and dining room equipment and capacity, for preparing, cooking
and serving suitable food for its guests: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in cities and
towns of less than five thousand population, the board shall have authority to
waive the provisions requiring twenty or more rooms.

(18)
"Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits from a
distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such spirituous liquor
into the state for sale to ((the board)) a retail licensee or for
export.

(19)
"Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.

(20) "Liquor"
includes the four varieties of liquor herein defined (alcohol, spirits, wine
and beer), and all fermented, spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor, or
combinations thereof, and mixed liquor, a part of which is fermented,
spirituous, vinous or malt liquor, or otherwise intoxicating; and every liquid
or solid or semisolid or other substance, patented or not, containing alcohol,
spirits, wine or beer, and all drinks or drinkable liquids and all preparations
or mixtures capable of human consumption, and any liquid, semisolid, solid, or
other substance, which contains more than one percent of alcohol by weight
shall be conclusively deemed to be intoxicating. Liquor does not include
confections or food products that contain one percent or less of alcohol by
weight.

(21)
"Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the preparation of liquor
for sale, in any form whatsoever.

(22) "Malt
beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage such as beer, ale,
lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the alcoholic fermentation of an
infusion or decoction of pure hops, or pure extract of hops and pure barley
malt or other wholesome grain or cereal in pure water containing not more than
eight percent of alcohol by weight, and not less than one-half of one percent
of alcohol by volume. For the purposes of this title, any such beverage containing
more than eight percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as
"strong beer."

(23)
"Package" means any container or receptacle used for holding liquor.

(24) "Permit"
means a permit for the purchase of liquor under this title.

(25) "Person"
means an individual, copartnership, association, or corporation.

(26)
"Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and regularly licensed
and engaged in the practice of his profession within the state pursuant to
chapter 18.71 RCW.

(27)
"Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a physician and given by
him to a patient for the obtaining of liquor pursuant to this title for
medicinal purposes.

(28) "Public
place" includes streets and alleys of incorporated cities and towns; state
or county or township highways or roads; buildings and grounds used for school
purposes; public dance halls and grounds adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments
where beer may be sold under this title, soft drink establishments, public
buildings, public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and dining rooms of hotels,
restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling stations which are open to
and are generally used by the public and to which the public is permitted to
have unrestricted access; railroad trains, stages, and other public conveyances
of all kinds and character, and the depots and waiting rooms used in
conjunction therewith which are open to unrestricted use and access by the
public; publicly owned bathing beaches, parks, and/or playgrounds; and all
other places of like or similar nature to which the general public has
unrestricted right of access, and which are generally used by the public.

(29) "Regulations"
means regulations made by the board under the powers conferred by this title.

(30)
"Restaurant" means any establishment provided with special space and
accommodations where, in consideration of payment, food, without lodgings, is
habitually furnished to the public, not including drug stores and soda
fountains.

(31) "Sale"
and "sell" include exchange, barter, and traffic; and also include
the selling or supplying or distributing, by any means whatsoever, of liquor,
or of any liquid known or described as beer or by any name whatever commonly
used to describe malt or brewed liquor or of wine, by any person to any person;
and also include a sale or selling within the state to a foreign consignee or
his agent in the state. "Sale" and "sell" shall not
include the giving, at no charge, of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person
not licensed by the board to a person not licensed by the board, for personal
use only. "Sale" and "sell" also does not include a raffle
authorized under RCW 9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That the nonprofit organization
conducting the raffle has obtained the appropriate permit from the board.

(32) "Soda
fountain" means a place especially equipped with apparatus for the purpose
of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed or otherwise.

(33) "Spirits"
means any beverage which contains alcohol obtained by distillation, including
wines exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume.

(34) (("Store"
means a state liquor store established under this title.

(35))) "Tavern" means any establishment with
special space and accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on
the premises, of beer, as herein defined.

(((36)
"Vendor" means a person employed by the board as a store manager
under this title.

(37))) (35) "Winery" means a
business conducted by any person for the manufacture of wine for sale, other
than a domestic winery.

(((38))) (36)
"Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by fermentation of
fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other agricultural product
containing sugar, to which any saccharine substances may have been added
before, during or after fermentation, and containing not more than twenty-four
percent of alcohol by volume, including sweet wines fortified with wine
spirits, such as port, sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four
percent of alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of
alcohol by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more
than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by the
manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage
containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume when
bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as "fortified
wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (a) Wines
that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years or more; and
(b) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol by volume solely as a
result of the natural fermentation process and that have not been produced with
the addition of wine spirits, brandy, or alcohol.

This subsection shall
not be interpreted to require that any wine be labeled with the designation
"table wine" or "fortified wine."

(((39))) (37)
"Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from a vintner or
winery located either within or beyond the boundaries of the state for the
purpose of selling the same not in violation of this title, or who represents
such vintner or winery as agent.

(((40))) (38)
"Wine importer" means a person or business within Washington who
purchases wine from a United States winery holding a certificate of approval
(W7) or foreign produced wine from a source outside the state of Washington for
the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.08.020 and 1933
ex.s. c 62 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The administration of
this title((, including the general control, management and supervision of
all liquor stores,)) shall be vested in the liquor control board,
constituted under this title.

Sec. 3. RCW 66.08.026 and 1998 c
265 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

All administrative
expenses of the board incurred on and after April 1, 1963 shall be appropriated
and paid from the liquor revolving fund. These administrative expenses shall
include, but not be limited to: The salaries and expenses of the board and its
employees, ((the cost of establishing, leasing, maintaining, and operating
state liquor stores and warehouses,)) legal services, pilot projects,
annual or other audits, and other general costs of conducting the business of
the board((, and the costs of supplying, installing, and maintaining
equipment used in state liquor stores and agency liquor vendor stores for the
purchase of liquor by nonlicensees using debit or credit cards)). The
administrative expenses shall not, however, be deemed to include ((costs of
liquor and lottery tickets purchased, the cost of transportation and delivery
to the point of distribution, other costs pertaining to the acquisition and
receipt of liquor and lottery tickets, packaging and repackaging of liquor,
transaction fees associated with credit or debit card purchases for liquor in
state liquor stores and in the stores of agency liquor vendors pursuant to RCW
66.16.040 and 66.16.041,)) sales tax, and those amounts distributed
pursuant to RCW 66.08.180, 66.08.190, 66.08.200, 66.08.210 and 66.08.220.

Sec. 4. RCW 66.08.030 and 1977
ex.s. c 115 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of
carrying into effect the provisions of this title according to their true
intent or of supplying any deficiency therein, the board may make such
regulations not inconsistent with the spirit of this title as are deemed
necessary or advisable. All regulations so made shall be a public record and
shall be filed in the office of the code reviser, and thereupon shall have the
same force and effect as if incorporated in this title. Such regulations,
together with a copy of this title, shall be published in pamphlets and shall
be distributed as directed by the board.

(2) Without thereby
limiting the generality of the provisions contained in subsection (1), it is
declared that the power of the board to make regulations in the manner set out
in that subsection shall extend to:

(a) ((regulating the
equipment and management of stores and warehouses in which state liquor is sold
or kept, and prescribing the books and records to be kept therein and the
reports to be made thereon to the board;

(b))) Prescribing the duties of the employees
of the board, and regulating their conduct in the discharge of their duties;

(((c) governing the
purchase of liquor by the state and the furnishing of liquor to stores
established under this title;

(d) determining the
classes, varieties, and brands of liquor to be kept for sale at any store;

(e))) (b) Prescribing((, subject to RCW 66.16.080,))
the hours during which ((the state liquor stores shall be kept open for the
sale of)) retail licensees may sell liquor;

(((f) providing for
the issuing and distributing of price lists showing the price to be paid by
purchasers for each variety of liquor kept for sale under this title;

(g) prescribing an
official seal and official labels and stamps and determining the manner in
which they shall be attached to every package of liquor sold or sealed under
this title, including the prescribing of different official seals or different
official labels for different classes of liquor;

(h) providing for
the payment by the board in whole or in part of the carrying charges on liquor
shipped by freight or express;

(i))) (c) Prescribing forms to be used for
purposes of this title or the regulations, and the terms and conditions to be
contained in permits and licenses issued under this title;

(((j))) (d) Prescribing
the fees payable in respect of permits and licenses issued under this title for
which no fees are prescribed in this title, and prescribing the fees for
anything done or permitted to be done under the regulations;

(((k))) (e) Prescribing
the kinds and quantities of liquor which may be kept on hand by the holder of a
special permit for the purposes named in the permit, regulating the manner in
which the same shall be kept and disposed of, and providing for the inspection
of the same at any time at the instance of the board;

(((l))) (f) Regulating
the sale of liquor kept by the holders of licenses which entitle the holder to
purchase and keep liquor for sale;

(((m))) (g) Prescribing
the records of purchases or sales of liquor kept by the holders of licenses,
and the reports to be made thereon to the board, and providing for inspection
of the records so kept;

(((n))) (h) Prescribing
the kinds and quantities of liquor for which a prescription may be given, and
the number of prescriptions which may be given to the same patient within a
stated period;

(((o))) (i) Prescribing
the manner of giving and serving notices required by this title or the
regulations, where not otherwise provided for in this title;

(((p))) (j) Regulating
premises in which liquor is kept for export from the state, or from which
liquor is exported, prescribing the books and records to be kept therein and
the reports to be made thereon to the board, and providing for the inspection
of the premises and the books, records and the liquor so kept;

(((q))) (k) Prescribing
the conditions and qualifications requisite for the obtaining of club licenses
and the books and records to be kept and the returns to be made by clubs,
prescribing the manner of licensing clubs in any municipality or other
locality, and providing for the inspection of clubs;

(((r))) (l) Prescribing
the conditions, accommodations and qualifications requisite for the obtaining
of licenses to sell beer ((and)), wines, and spirits, and
regulating the sale of beer ((and)), wines ((thereunder)),
and spirits;

(((s))) (m) Specifying
and regulating the time and periods when, and the manner, methods and means by
which manufacturers shall deliver liquor within the state; and the time and
periods when, and the manner, methods and means by which liquor may lawfully be
conveyed or carried within the state;

(((t))) (n) Providing
for the making of returns by brewers of their sales of beer shipped within the
state, or from the state, showing the gross amount of such sales and providing
for the inspection of brewers' books and records, and for the checking of the
accuracy of any such returns;

(((u))) (o) Providing
for the making of returns by the ((wholesalers)) distributors of
beer whose breweries are located beyond the boundaries of the state;

(((v))) (p) Providing
for the making of returns by any other liquor manufacturers, showing the gross
amount of liquor produced or purchased, the amount sold within and exported
from the state, and to whom so sold or exported, and providing for the
inspection of the premises of any such liquor manufacturers, their books and
records, and for the checking of any such return;

(((w))) (q) Providing
for the giving of fidelity bonds by any or all of the employees of the board:
PROVIDED, That the premiums therefor shall be paid by the board;

(((x))) (r) Providing
for the shipment by mail or common carrier of liquor to any person holding a
permit and residing in any unit which has, by election pursuant to this title,
prohibited the sale of liquor therein;

(((y))) (s) Prescribing
methods of manufacture, conditions of sanitation, standards of ingredients,
quality and identity of alcoholic beverages manufactured, sold, bottled, or
handled by licensees ((and the board)); and conducting from time to
time, in the interest of the public health and general welfare, scientific
studies and research relating to alcoholic beverages and the use and effect
thereof;

(((z))) (t) Seizing,
confiscating and destroying all alcoholic beverages manufactured, sold or
offered for sale within this state which do not conform in all respects to the
standards prescribed by this title or the regulations of the board: PROVIDED,
Nothing herein contained shall be construed as authorizing the liquor board to
prescribe, alter, limit or in any way change the present law as to the quantity
or percentage of alcohol used in the manufacturing of wine or other alcoholic
beverages.

Sec. 5. RCW 66.08.050 and 1997 c
228 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The board, subject to
the provisions of this title and the rules, shall:

(1) ((Determine the
localities within which state liquor stores shall be established throughout the
state, and the number and situation of the stores within each locality;

(2) Appoint in
cities and towns and other communities, in which no state liquor store is
located, liquor vendors. In addition, the board may appoint, in its
discretion, a manufacturer that also manufactures liquor products other than
wine under a license under this title, as a vendor for the purpose of sale of
liquor products of its own manufacture on the licensed premises only. Such
liquor vendors shall be agents of the board and be authorized to sell liquor to
such persons, firms or corporations as provided for the sale of liquor from a
state liquor store, and such vendors shall be subject to such additional rules
and regulations consistent with this title as the board may require;

(3) Establish all
necessary warehouses for the storing and bottling, diluting and rectifying of
stocks of liquors for the purposes of this title;

(4) Provide for the
leasing for periods not to exceed ten years of all premises required for the
conduct of the business; and for remodeling the same, and the procuring of
their furnishings, fixtures, and supplies; and for obtaining options of renewal
of such leases by the lessee. The terms of such leases in all other respects
shall be subject to the direction of the board;

(5) Determine the
nature, form and capacity of all packages to be used for containing liquor kept
for sale under this title;

(6))) Execute or cause to be executed, all
contracts, papers, and documents in the name of the board, under such
regulations as the board may fix;

(((7))) (2)
Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations whatsoever relating
to the business of the board;

(((8))) (3)
Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the board, and to
determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such employee;

(((9) Perform
services for the state lottery commission to such extent, and for such
compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon between the board and the
commission;

(10))) (4) Accept and deposit into the general
fund-local account and disburse, subject to appropriation, federal grants or other
funds or donations from any source for the purpose of improving public
awareness of the health risks associated with alcohol consumption by youth and
the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington state. The board's alcohol
awareness program shall cooperate with federal and state agencies, interested
organizations, and individuals to effect an active public beverage alcohol
awareness program;

(((11))) (5)
Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the foregoing or not,
to carry out the provisions of this title, and shall have full power to do each
and every act necessary to the conduct of its business, including all buying,
selling, preparation and approval of forms, and every other function of the
business whatsoever, subject only to audit by the state auditor: PROVIDED,
That the board shall have no authority to regulate the content of spoken
language on licensed premises where wine and other liquors are served and where
there is not a clear and present danger of disorderly conduct being provoked by
such language.

Sec. 6. RCW 66.08.090 and 1933
ex.s. c 62 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

No employee shall sell
liquor in any ((other)) place, nor at any other time, nor otherwise than
as authorized by the board under this title and the regulations.

Sec. 7. RCW 66.08.095 and 1993 c
26 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The liquor control
board may provide ((liquor)) at no charge((, including)) liquor
forfeited under chapter 66.32 RCW((,)) to recognized law enforcement
agencies within the state when the law enforcement agency will be using the
liquor for bona fide law enforcement training or investigation purposes.

Sec. 8. RCW 66.12.110 and 1999 c
281 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A person twenty-one
years of age or over may bring into the state from without the United States,
free of tax ((and markup)), for his or her personal or household
use such alcoholic beverages as have been declared and permitted to enter the
United States duty free under federal law.

Such entry of alcoholic
beverages in excess of that herein provided may be authorized by the board upon
payment of an equivalent ((markup and)) tax as would be applicable to the
purchase of the same or similar liquor at retail from a ((Washington state))
retail liquor ((store)) licensee. The board shall adopt
appropriate regulations pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of this section. The board may issue a spirits,
beer, and wine private club license to a charitable or nonprofit corporation of
the state of Washington, the majority of the officers and directors of which
are United States citizens and the minority of the officers and directors of
which are citizens of the Dominion of Canada, and where the location of the
premises for such spirits, beer, and wine private club license is not more than
ten miles south of the border between the United States and the province of
British Columbia.

Sec. 9. RCW 66.12.120 and 1995 c
100 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any
other provision of Title 66 RCW, a person twenty-one years of age or over may,
free of tax ((and markup)), for personal or household use, bring into
the state of Washington from another state no more than once per calendar month
up to two liters of spirits or wine or two hundred eighty-eight ounces of
beer. Additionally, such person may be authorized by the board to bring into
the state of Washington from another state a reasonable amount of alcoholic
beverages in excess of that provided in this section for personal or household
use only upon payment of an equivalent ((markup and)) tax as would be
applicable to the purchase of the same or similar liquor at retail from a ((state))
retail liquor ((store)) licensee. The board shall adopt
appropriate regulations pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose of
carrying into effect the provisions of this section.

Sec. 10. RCW 66.12.140 and 1982 c
85 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this
title shall prevent the use of beer, wine, and/or spirituous liquor, for
cooking purposes only, in conjunction with a culinary or restaurant course
offered by a college, university, community college, area vocational technical
institute, or private vocational school. Further, nothing in this title shall
prohibit the making of beer or wine in food fermentation courses offered by a
college, university, community college, area vocational technical institute, or
private vocational school.

(2) "Culinary or
restaurant course" as used in this section means a course of instruction
which includes practical experience in food preparation under the supervision
of an instructor who is twenty-one years of age or older.

(3) Persons under
twenty-one years of age participating in culinary or restaurant courses may
handle beer, wine, or spirituous liquor for purposes of participating in the
courses, but nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize
consumption of liquor by persons under twenty-one years of age or to authorize
possession of liquor by persons under twenty-one years of age at any time or
place other than while preparing food under the supervision of the course
instructor.

(4) Beer, wine, and/or
spirituous liquor to be used in culinary or restaurant courses shall be
purchased at retail from ((the board or)) a retailer licensed under this
title. All such liquor shall be securely stored in the food preparation area
and shall not be displayed in an area open to the general public.

(5) Colleges,
universities, community colleges, area vocational technical institutes, and
private vocational schools shall obtain the prior written approval of the board
for use of beer, wine, and/or spirituous liquor for cooking purposes in their
culinary or restaurant courses.

Sec. 11. RCW 66.16.040 and 1996 c
291 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as otherwise
provided by law, an employee ((in)) of a ((state)) retail
liquor ((store or agency)) licensee may sell liquor to any person
of legal age to purchase alcoholic beverages and may also sell to holders of
permits such liquor as may be purchased under such permits.

Where there may be a
question of a person's right to purchase liquor by reason of age, such person
shall be required to present any one of the following officially issued cards
of identification which shows his/her correct age and bears his/her signature
and photograph:

(1) Liquor control
authority card of identification of any state or province of Canada.

(2) Driver's license,
instruction permit or identification card of any state or province of Canada,
or "identicard" issued by the Washington state department of
licensing pursuant to RCW 46.20.117.

(3) United States armed
forces identification card issued to active duty, reserve, and retired
personnel and the personnel's dependents.

(4) Passport.

(5) Merchant Marine
identification card issued by the United States Coast Guard.

The board may adopt
such regulations as it deems proper covering the acceptance of such cards of
identification.

((No liquor sold
under this section shall be delivered until the purchaser has paid for the
liquor in cash, except as allowed under RCW 66.16.041. The use of a personal
credit card does not rely upon the credit of the state as prohibited by Article
VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution.))

Sec. 12. RCW 66.16.100 and 1997 c
321 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

No ((state))
retail liquor ((store)) licensee in a county with a
population over three hundred thousand may sell fortified wine if the board
finds that the sale would be against the public interest based on the factors
in RCW 66.24.360. The burden of establishing that the sale would be against
the public interest is on those persons objecting.

Sec. 13. RCW 66.16.110 and 1993 c
422 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall cause
to be posted in conspicuous places, in a number determined by the board, within
each ((state)) licensed retail liquor ((store)) establishment,
notices in print not less than one inch high warning persons that consumption
of alcohol shortly before conception or during pregnancy may cause birth
defects, including fetal alcohol syndrome and fetal alcohol effects.

Sec. 14. RCW 66.20.170 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 209 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

A card of
identification may for the purpose of this title and for the purpose of
procuring liquor, be accepted as an identification card by any licensee ((or
store employee)) and as evidence of legal age of the person presenting such
card, provided the licensee ((or store employee)) complies with the
conditions and procedures prescribed herein and such regulations as may be made
by the board.

Sec. 15. RCW 66.20.180 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 209 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A card of
identification shall be presented by the holder thereof upon request of any
licensee, ((store employee,)) peace officer, or enforcement officer of
the board for the purpose of aiding the licensee, ((store employee,))
peace officer, or enforcement officer of the board to determine whether or not
such person is of legal age to purchase liquor when such person desires to
procure liquor from a licensed establishment ((or state liquor store or
agency)).

Sec. 16. RCW 66.20.190 and 1981
1st ex.s. c 5 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
presentation by the holder and verification by the licensee ((or store
employee)) of such card of identification, the licensee ((or store
employee)) who is still in doubt about the true age of the holder shall
require the person whose age may be in question to sign a certification card
and record an accurate description and serial number of his or her card
of identification thereon. Such statement shall be upon a five-inch by
eight-inch file card, which card shall be filed alphabetically by the licensee
((or store employee)) at or before the close of business on the day on
which the statement is executed, in the file box containing a suitable
alphabetical index and the card shall be subject to examination by any peace
officer or agent or employee of the board at all times. The certification card
shall also contain in bold-face type a statement stating that the signer
understands that conviction for unlawful purchase of alcoholic beverages or
misuse of the certification card may result in criminal penalties including
imprisonment or fine or both.

Sec. 17. RCW 66.20.200 and 1994 c
201 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be unlawful
for the owner of a card of identification to transfer the card to any other
person for the purpose of aiding such person to procure alcoholic beverages
from any licensee ((or store employee)). Any person who shall permit
his or her card of identification to be used by another or transfer such card
to another for the purpose of aiding such transferee to obtain alcoholic
beverages from a licensee ((or store employee)) or gain admission to a
premises or portion of a premises classified by the board as off-limits to
persons under twenty-one years of age, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of two
hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any sentence requiring community
service shall require not fewer than twenty-five hours of such service. Any
person not entitled thereto who unlawfully procures or has issued or
transferred to him or her a card of identification, and any person who
possesses a card of identification not issued to him or her, and any person who
makes any false statement on any certification card required by RCW 66.20.190,
as now or hereafter amended, to be signed by him or her, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine
of two hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any sentence requiring
community service shall require not fewer than twenty-five hours of such
service.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

There shall be a
license for spirits distributors to sell spirituous liquor, purchased from
licensed Washington manufacturers, spirituous liquor certificate of approval
holders, licensed liquor importers, or suppliers of foreign liquor located
outside the state of Washington, to retailers licensed for off-premises
consumption and other spirits distributors and to export spirits from the state
of Washington; fee fifteen thousand dollars per year for each distributing
unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. A new section is added
to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

A manufacturer of
spirits located outside the state of Washington must hold a certificate of
approval to allow sales and shipment of the certificate of approval holder's
spirituous liquor to licensed Washington spirits distributors or liquor
importers. The certificate of approval shall not be granted unless the
manufacturer of spirituous liquor has made a written agreement with the board
to furnish to the board, on or before the twentieth day of each month, a report
under oath, on a form to be prescribed by the board, showing the quantity of
spirits sold or delivered to each licensed spirits distributor or liquor
importer during the preceding month, and has further agreed with the board that
the manufacturers, all general sales corporations or agencies maintained by
them, and all of their trade representatives, will faithfully comply with all
laws of the state of Washington pertaining to the sale of intoxicating liquors
and with all rules and regulations of the Washington state liquor control
board. A violation of the terms of this agreement will authorize the board to
take action to suspend or revoke such certificate.

The fee for the
certificate of approval, issued under the provisions of this title shall be one
hundred dollars per year, which sum must accompany the application for the
certificate.

Sec. 20. RCW 66.24.160 and 1981
1st ex.s. c 5 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

A liquor importer's
license may be issued to any qualified person, firm or corporation, entitling
the holder thereof to import into the state any liquor other than beer or wine;
to store the same within the state, and to sell and export the same from the
state; fee six hundred dollars per annum. Such liquor importer's license shall
be subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by the
rules and regulations of the board, and shall be issued only upon such terms
and conditions as may be imposed by the board. ((No liquor importer's
license shall be required in sales to the Washington state liquor control
board.))

Sec. 21. RCW 66.24.210 and 1997 c
321 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
imposed upon all wines except cider sold to wine distributors ((and the
Washington state liquor control board,)) within the state a tax at the rate
of twenty and one-fourth cents per liter. There is hereby imposed on all cider
sold to wine distributors ((and the Washington state liquor control board))
within the state a tax at the rate of three and fifty-nine one-hundredths cents
per liter: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That wine sold or shipped in bulk from one
winery to another winery shall not be subject to such tax. The tax provided
for in this section shall be collected by direct payments based on wine
purchased by wine distributors. Every person purchasing wine under the
provisions of this section shall on or before the twentieth day of each month
report to the board all purchases during the preceding calendar month in such
manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board, and with such
report shall pay the tax due from the purchases covered by such report unless
the same has previously been paid. Any such purchaser of wine whose applicable
tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of
purchase will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent a month or
fraction thereof. The board may require that every such person shall execute
to and file with the board a bond to be approved by the board, in such amount
as the board may fix, securing the payment of the tax. If any such person
fails to pay the tax when due, the board may forthwith suspend or cancel the
license until all taxes are paid.

(2) An additional tax
is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030 multiplied by the tax
payable under subsection (1) of this section. All revenues collected during
any month from this additional tax shall be transferred to the state general
fund by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.

(3) An additional tax
is imposed on wines subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section, at the
rate of one-fourth of one cent per liter for wine sold after June 30, 1987.
After June 30, 1996, such additional tax does not apply to cider. An
additional tax of five one-hundredths of one cent per liter is imposed on cider
sold after June 30, 1996. The additional taxes imposed by this subsection (3)
shall cease to be imposed on July 1, 2001. All revenues collected under this
subsection (3) shall be disbursed quarterly to the Washington wine commission
for use in carrying out the purposes of chapter 15.88 RCW.

(4) An additional tax
is imposed on all wine subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section.
The additional tax is equal to twenty-three and forty-four one-hundredths cents
per liter on fortified wine as defined in RCW 66.04.010(((37))) (36)
when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer, one cent per liter on all other
wine except cider, and eighteen one-hundredths of one cent per liter on cider.
All revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under RCW
69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.

(5)(a) An additional
tax is imposed on all cider subject to tax under subsection (1) of this
section. The additional tax is equal to two and four one-hundredths cents per
liter of cider sold after June 30, 1996, and before July 1, 1997, and is equal
to four and seven one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1997.

(b) All revenues
collected from the additional tax imposed under this subsection (5) shall be
deposited in the health services account under RCW 43.72.900.

(6) For the purposes of
this section, "cider" means table wine that contains not less than
one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and not more than seven percent of
alcohol by volume and is made from the normal alcoholic fermentation of the
juice of sound, ripe apples or pears. "Cider" includes, but is not
limited to, flavored, sparkling, or carbonated cider and cider made from
condensed apple or pear must.

Sec. 22. RCW 66.24.290 and 1999 c
281 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any microbrewer or
domestic brewery or beer distributor licensed under this title may sell and
deliver beer to holders of authorized licenses direct, but to no other person,
((other than the board;)) and every such brewery or beer distributor
shall report all sales to the board monthly, pursuant to the regulations, and
shall pay to the board as an added tax for the privilege of manufacturing and
selling the beer within the state a tax of one dollar and thirty cents per
barrel of thirty-one gallons on sales to licensees within the state and on
sales to licensees within the state of bottled and canned beer shall pay a tax
computed in gallons at the rate of one dollar and thirty cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons. Any brewery or beer distributor whose applicable tax
payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of sale will
be assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent per month or fraction
thereof. Beer shall be sold by breweries and distributors in sealed barrels or
packages. The moneys collected under this subsection shall be distributed as
follows: (a) Three-tenths of a percent shall be distributed to border areas
under RCW 66.08.195; and (b) of the remaining moneys: (i) Twenty percent shall
be distributed to counties in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.200; and (ii)
eighty percent shall be distributed to incorporated cities and towns in the
same manner as under RCW 66.08.210.

(2) An additional tax
is imposed on all beer subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section.
The additional tax is equal to two dollars per barrel of thirty-one gallons.
All revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under RCW
69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.

(3)(a) An additional
tax is imposed on all beer subject to tax under subsection (1) of this
section. The additional tax is equal to ninety-six cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons through June 30, 1995, two dollars and thirty-nine cents per
barrel of thirty-one gallons for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30,
1997, and four dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons
thereafter.

(b) The additional tax
imposed under this subsection does not apply to the sale of the first sixty
thousand barrels of beer each year by breweries that are entitled to a reduced
rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such
subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule consistent with the
purposes of this exemption.

(c) All revenues
collected from the additional tax imposed under this subsection (3) shall be
deposited in the health services account under RCW 43.72.900.

(4) An additional tax
is imposed on all beer that is subject to tax under subsection (1) of this
section that is in the first sixty thousand barrels of beer by breweries that
are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as existing on
July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule
consistent with the purposes of the exemption under subsection (3)(b) of this
section. The additional tax is equal to one dollar and forty-eight and
two-tenths cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons. By the twenty-fifth day of
the following month, three percent of the revenues collected from this
additional tax shall be distributed to border areas under RCW 66.08.195 and the
remaining moneys shall be transferred to the state general fund.

(5) The board may make
refunds for all taxes paid on beer exported from the state for use outside the
state.

(6) The board may
require filing with the board of a bond to be approved by it, in such amount as
the board may fix, securing the payment of the tax. If any licensee fails to
pay the tax when due, the board may forthwith suspend or cancel his or her
license until all taxes are paid.

(7) The tax imposed
under this section shall not apply to "strong beer" as defined in
this title.

Sec. 23. RCW 66.24.310 and 1997 c
321 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person shall
canvass for, solicit, receive, or take orders for the purchase or sale of
liquor, nor contact any licensees of the board in goodwill activities, unless
such person shall be the accredited representative of a person, firm, or
corporation holding a certificate of approval issued pursuant to RCW 66.24.270
or 66.24.206, a beer distributor's license, a microbrewer's license, a domestic
brewer's license, a beer importer's license, a domestic winery license, a wine
importer's license, ((or)) a wine distributor's license, or a spirits
distributor's license within the state of Washington, or the accredited
representative of a distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of
spirituous liquor, or foreign produced beer or wine, and shall have applied for
and received a representative's license: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
provisions of this section shall not apply to drivers who deliver beer or wine;

(2) Every
representative's license issued under this title shall be subject to all
conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by the rules and
regulations of the board; the board, for the purpose of maintaining an orderly
market, may limit the number of representative's licenses issued for
representation of specific classes of eligible employers;

(3) Every application
for a representative's license must be approved by a holder of a certificate of
approval issued pursuant to RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a licensed beer
distributor, a licensed domestic brewer, a licensed beer importer, a licensed
microbrewer, a licensed domestic winery, a licensed wine importer, a licensed
wine distributor, or by a distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of
spirituous liquor, or foreign produced beer or wine, as the rules and
regulations of the board shall require;

(4) The fee for a
representative's license shall be twenty-five dollars per year;

(5) An accredited
representative of a distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of
spirituous liquor may, after he or she has applied for and received a
representative's license, contact retail licensees of the board only in
goodwill activities pertaining to spirituous liquor products.

Sec. 24. RCW 66.24.360 and 1997 c
321 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a spirits,
beer, and/or wine retailer's license to be designated as a grocery store
license to sell spirits, beer, and/or wine at retail in bottles,
cans, and original containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold,
at any store ((other than the state liquor stores)).

(1) Licensees obtaining
a written endorsement from the board may also sell malt liquor in kegs or other
containers capable of holding less than five and one-half gallons of liquid.

(2)(a) The
annual fee for the grocery store license is one hundred fifty dollars for each
store selling beer or wine but not spirits.

(b) The annual fee
for the grocery store license is three thousand dollars for each store selling
spirits.

(3) The board shall
issue a restricted grocery store license authorizing the licensee to sell beer
and only table wine, if the board finds upon issuance or renewal of the license
that the sale of fortified wine would be against the public interest. In
determining the public interest, the board shall consider at least the
following factors:

(a) The likelihood that
the applicant will sell fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;

(b) Law enforcement
problems in the vicinity of the applicant's establishment that may arise from
persons purchasing fortified wine at the establishment; and

(c) Whether the sale of
fortified wine would be detrimental to or inconsistent with a
government-operated or funded alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the
area.

If the board receives
no evidence or objection that the sale of fortified wine would be against the
public interest, it shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as
applicable. The burden of establishing that the sale of fortified wine by the
licensee would be against the public interest is on those persons objecting.

(4) Licensees holding a
grocery store license must maintain a minimum three thousand dollar inventory
of food products for human consumption, not including pop, spirits,
beer, or wine.

(5) Only grocery
store licensees whose contiguous business premises measure five thousand or
more square feet of floor space and who meet the requirements of subsection (4)
of this section may sell at retail, spirituous liquor in its original
container. The board shall determine, by rule, criteria for establishing
qualifying floor space.

(6) Until July 1,
2004, the board may issue a retailer's license under this section to agency
liquor vendors appointed by the board on or before January 1, 2001.
Subsections (4) and (5) of this section do not apply to liquor vendors who
qualify under this subsection (6), but such vendors are subject to the
remainder of this section.

(7) Upon
approval by the board, the grocery store licensee may also receive an
endorsement to permit the international export of beer and wine.

(a) Any beer or wine
sold under this endorsement must have been purchased from a licensed beer or
wine distributor licensed to do business within the state of Washington.

(b) Any beer and wine
sold under this endorsement must be intended for consumption outside the state
of Washington and the United States and appropriate records must be maintained
by the licensee.

(c) A holder of this
special endorsement to the grocery store license shall be considered not in
violation of RCW 66.28.010.

(d) Any beer or wine
sold under this license must be sold at a price no less than the acquisition
price paid by the holder of the license.

(e) The annual cost of
this endorsement is five hundred dollars and is in addition to the license fees
paid by the licensee for a grocery store license.

Sec. 25. RCW 66.24.371 and 1997 c
321 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a
beer and/or wine retailer's license to be designated as a beer and/or wine
specialty shop license to sell beer and/or wine at retail in bottles, cans, and
original containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold, at any
store ((other than the state liquor stores)). Licensees obtaining a
written endorsement from the board may also sell malt liquor in kegs or other
containers capable of holding less than five and one-half gallons of liquid.
The annual fee for the beer and/or wine specialty shop license is one hundred
dollars for each store.

(2) Licensees under
this section may provide, free or for a charge, single-serving samples of two
ounces or less to customers for the purpose of sales promotion. Sampling
activities of licensees under this section are subject to RCW 66.28.010 and
66.28.040 and the cost of sampling under this section may not be borne,
directly or indirectly, by any manufacturer, importer, or distributor of
liquor.

(3) The board shall issue
a restricted beer and/or wine specialty shop license, authorizing the licensee
to sell beer and only table wine, if the board finds upon issuance or renewal
of the license that the sale of fortified wine would be against the public
interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider at
least the following factors:

(a) The likelihood that
the applicant will sell fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;

(b) Law enforcement
problems in the vicinity of the applicant's establishment that may arise from
persons purchasing fortified wine at the establishment; and

(c) Whether the sale of
fortified wine would be detrimental to or inconsistent with a
government-operated or funded alcohol treatment or detoxification program in
the area.

If the board receives
no evidence or objection that the sale of fortified wine would be against the
public interest, it shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as
applicable. The burden of establishing that the sale of fortified wine by the
licensee would be against the public interest is on those persons objecting.

(4)
Licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license must maintain a
minimum three thousand dollar wholesale inventory of beer and/or wine.

Sec. 26. RCW 66.24.380 and 1997 c
321 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a
retailer's license to be designated as a special occasion license to be issued
to a not-for-profit society or organization to sell spirits, beer, and wine by
the individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified event, such
as at picnics or other special occasions, at a specified date and place; fee
sixty dollars per day.

(1) The not-for-profit
society or organization is limited to sales of no more than twelve calendar
days per year.

(2) The licensee may
sell beer and/or wine in original, unopened containers for off-premises
consumption if permission is obtained from the board prior to the event.

(3) Sale, service, and
consumption of spirits, beer, and wine is to be confined to specified premises
or designated areas only.

(4) Spirituous liquor
sold under this special occasion license must be purchased ((at a state
liquor store or agency without discount at retail prices, including all taxes))
from a licensed spirits distributor.

(5) Any violation of
this section is a class 1 civil infraction having a maximum penalty of two
hundred fifty dollars as provided for in chapter 7.80 RCW.

Sec. 27. RCW 66.24.540 and 1999 c
129 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a
retailer's license to be designated as a motel license. The motel license may
be issued to a motel regardless of whether it holds any other class of license
under this title. No license may be issued to a motel offering rooms to its
guests on an hourly basis. The license authorizes the licensee to:

(1) Sell, at retail, in
locked honor bars, spirits in individual bottles not to exceed fifty
milliliters, beer in individual cans or bottles not to exceed twelve ounces,
and wine in individual bottles not to exceed one hundred eighty-seven
milliliters, to registered guests of the motel for consumption in guest rooms.

(a) Each honor bar must
also contain snack foods. No more than one-half of the guest rooms may have
honor bars.

(b) All spirits to be
sold under the license must be purchased from ((the board)) a licensed
spirits distributor.

(c) The licensee shall
require proof of age from the guest renting a guest room and requesting the use
of an honor bar. The guest shall also execute an affidavit verifying that no
one under twenty-one years of age shall have access to the spirits, beer, and
wine in the honor bar.

(2) Provide without
additional charge, to overnight guests of the motel, beer and wine by the
individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified regular date, time,
and place as may be fixed by the board. Self-service by attendees is
prohibited. All beer and wine service must be done by an alcohol server as
defined in RCW 66.20.300 and comply with RCW 66.20.310.

The annual fee for a
motel license is five hundred dollars.

"Motel" as
used in this section means a transient accommodation licensed under chapter
70.62 RCW.

As used in this
section, "spirits," "beer," and "wine" have the
meanings defined in RCW 66.04.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
28. A new section is added
to chapter 66.28 RCW to read as follows:

A retail
spirits licensee may sell spirits only during the hours of twelve o'clock noon
and eight o'clock p.m. each day, except Sundays.

Sec. 29. RCW 66.28.030 and 1997 c
321 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

Every licensed brewer,
domestic brewer and microbrewer, domestic winery, manufacturer holding a
certificate of approval, licensed wine importer, and licensed beer importer
shall be responsible for the conduct of any licensed spirits, beer,
or wine distributor in selling, or contracting to sell, to retail licensees, spirits,
beer, or wine manufactured by such brewer, domestic brewer and
microbrewer, domestic winery, manufacturer holding a certificate of approval,
or imported by such liquor, beer, or wine importer. Where the
board finds that any licensed spirits, beer, or wine distributor
has violated any of the provisions of this title or of the regulations of the
board in selling or contracting to sell spirits, beer, or wine to
retail licensees, the board may, in addition to any punishment inflicted or
imposed upon such distributor, prohibit the sale of the brand or brands of spirits,
beer, or wine involved in such violation to any or all retail licensees
within the trade territory usually served by such distributor for such period
of time as the board may fix, irrespective of whether the brewer manufacturing
such beer or the beer importer importing such beer or the domestic winery manufacturing
such wine or the wine importer importing such wine or the certificate of
approval holder manufacturing such spirits, beer, or wine
actually participated in such violation.

Sec. 30. RCW 66.28.040 and 2000 c
179 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as permitted by
the board under RCW 66.20.010, no brewery, distributor, distiller, winery,
importer, rectifier, or other manufacturer of liquor shall, within the state,
give to any person any liquor; but nothing in this section nor in RCW 66.28.010
shall prevent a brewery, distributor, winery, distiller, or importer from
furnishing samples of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to authorized licensees
for the purpose of negotiating a sale, in accordance with regulations adopted
by the liquor control board, provided that the samples are subject to taxes
imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210, and in the case of spirituous liquor,
any product used for samples must be purchased at retail from ((the board;
nothing in this section shall prevent the furnishing of samples of liquor to
the board for the purpose of negotiating the sale of liquor to the state liquor
control board)) a retail liquor licensee; nothing in this section
shall prevent a brewery, winery, distillery, or distributor from furnishing
beer, wine, or spirituous liquor for instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150
and 66.28.155; nothing in this section shall prevent a winery or distributor
from furnishing wine without charge, subject to the taxes imposed by RCW
66.24.210, to a not-for-profit group organized and operated solely for the
purpose of enology or the study of viticulture which has been in existence for
at least six months and that uses wine so furnished solely for such educational
purposes or a domestic winery, or an out-of-state certificate of approval
holder, from furnishing wine without charge or a domestic brewery, or an
out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing beer without
charge, subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, to a
nonprofit charitable corporation or association exempt from taxation under
section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3)) for use consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling it to such
exemption; nothing in this section shall prevent a brewer from serving beer
without charge, on the brewery premises; nothing in this section shall prevent
donations of wine for the purposes of RCW 66.12.180; and nothing in this
section shall prevent a domestic winery from serving wine without charge, on
the winery premises.

Sec. 31. RCW 66.28.060 and 1933
ex.s. c 62 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

Every distillery
licensed under this title shall make monthly reports to the board pursuant to
the regulations. No such distillery shall make any sale of spirits within the
state of Washington except to ((the board)) a licensed spirits
distributor.

Sec. 32. RCW 66.28.070 and 1994 c
201 s 5 and 1994 c 63 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, it shall be unlawful for any retail spirits,
beer, or wine licensee to purchase spirits, beer, or wine,
except from a duly licensed ((wholesaler or the board)) distributor,
and it shall be unlawful for any brewer, winery, or spirits, beer,
or wine ((wholesaler)) distributor to purchase spirits,
beer, or wine, except from a duly licensed spirits, beer,
or wine ((wholesaler)) distributor or importer.

(2) A spirits,
beer, or wine retailer licensee may purchase spirits, beer,
or wine from a government agency which has lawfully seized spirits, beer,
or wine from a licensed spirits, beer, or wine retailer, or from
a board-authorized retailer, or from a licensed retailer which has discontinued
business if the ((wholesaler)) distributor has refused to accept spirits,
beer, or wine from that retailer for return and refund. Spirits, beer,
and wine purchased under this subsection shall meet the quality standards set
by its manufacturer.

(3) Special occasion
licensees holding ((either a class G or J)) a special occasion
license may only purchase beer or wine from a beer or wine retailer duly
licensed to sell beer or wine for off-premises consumption((, the board,))
or from a duly licensed beer or wine ((wholesaler)) distributor.

Sec. 33. RCW 66.28.180 and 1997 c
321 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

It is unlawful for a
person, firm, or corporation holding a certificate of approval issued under RCW
66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a spirits distributor's license, a beer
distributor's license, a domestic brewer's license, a microbrewer's license, a
beer importer's license, a beer distributor's license, a domestic winery
license, a wine importer's license, or a wine distributor's license within the
state of Washington to modify any prices without prior notification to and
approval of the board.

(1) Intent. This
section is enacted, pursuant to the authority of this state under the
twenty-first amendment to the United States Constitution, to promote the
public's interest in fostering the orderly and responsible distribution of ((malt))
alcoholic beverages ((and wine)) towards effective control of
consumption; to promote the fair and efficient three-tier system of
distribution of such beverages; and to confirm existing board rules as the
clear expression of state policy to regulate the manner of selling and pricing of
((wine and malt)) alcoholic beverages by licensed suppliers and
distributors.

(2) Spirits, beer,
and wine distributor price posting.

(a) Every spirits,
beer, or wine distributor shall file with the board at its office in
Olympia a price posting showing the wholesale prices at which any and all
brands of spirits, beer, and wine sold by such ((beer and/or
wine)) distributor shall be sold to retailers within the state.

(b) Each price posting
shall be made on a form prepared and furnished by the board, or a reasonable
facsimile thereof, and shall set forth:

(i) All brands, types,
packages, and containers of beer offered for sale by such beer and/or wine
distributor;

(ii) The wholesale
prices thereof to retail licensees, including allowances, if any, for returned
empty containers.

(c) No spirits,
beer, and/or wine distributor may sell or offer to sell any package or
container of spirits, beer, or wine to any retail licensee at a
price differing from the price for such package or container as shown in the price
posting filed by the ((beer and/or wine)) distributor and then in
effect, according to rules adopted by the board.

(d) Quantity discounts
are prohibited. No price may be posted that is below acquisition cost plus ten
percent of acquisition cost. However, the board is empowered to review
periodically, as it may deem appropriate, the amount of the percentage of
acquisition cost as a minimum mark-up over cost and to modify such percentage
by rule of the board, except such percentage shall be not less than ten
percent.

(e) Distributor prices
on a "close-out" item shall be accepted by the board if the item to
be discontinued has been listed on the state market for a period of at least
six months, and upon the further condition that the distributor who posts such
a close-out price shall not restock the item for a period of one year following
the first effective date of such close-out price.

(f) The board may
reject any price posting that it deems to be in violation of this section or
any rule, or portion thereof, or that would tend to disrupt the orderly sale
and distribution of beer, spirits, and wine. Whenever the board rejects
any posting, the licensee submitting the posting may be heard by the board and
shall have the burden of showing that the posting is not in violation of this
section or a rule or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution
of spirits, beer, and wine. If the posting is accepted, it shall
become effective at the time fixed by the board. If the posting is rejected, the
last effective posting shall remain in effect until such time as an amended
posting is filed and approved, in accordance with the provisions of this
section.

(g) All price postings
filed as required by this section shall at all times be open to inspection to
all trade buyers within the state of Washington and shall not in any sense be
considered confidential.

(h) Any spirits,
beer, and/or wine distributor or employee authorized by the
distributor-employer may sell spirits, beer, and/or wine at the
distributor's posted prices to any annual or special occasion retail licensee
upon presentation to the distributor or employee at the time of purchase of a
special permit issued by the board to such licensee.

(i) Every annual or
special occasion retail licensee, upon purchasing any beer and/or wine from a
distributor, shall immediately cause such beer or wine to be delivered to the
licensed premises, and the licensee shall not thereafter permit such beer to be
disposed of in any manner except as authorized by the license.

(ii) Spirits, beer,
and wine sold as provided in this section shall be delivered by the distributor
or an authorized employee either to the retailer's licensed premises or
directly to the retailer at the distributor's licensed premises. A distributor's
prices to retail licensees shall be the same at both such places of delivery.

(3) Beer and wine
suppliers' price filings, contracts, and memoranda.

(a) Every brewery and
winery offering beer and/or wine for sale within the state shall file with the
board at its office in Olympia a copy of every written contract and a
memorandum of every oral agreement which such brewery or winery may have with
any beer or wine distributor, which contracts or memoranda shall contain a
schedule of prices charged to distributors for all items and all terms of sale,
including all regular and special discounts; all advertising, sales and trade
allowances, and incentive programs; and all commissions, bonuses or gifts, and
any and all other discounts or allowances. Whenever changed or modified, such
revised contracts or memoranda shall forthwith be filed with the board as
provided for by rule. The provisions of this section also apply to certificate
of approval holders, beer and/or wine importers, and beer and/or wine
distributors who sell to other beer and/or wine distributors.

Each price schedule
shall be made on a form prepared and furnished by the board, or a reasonable
facsimile thereof, and shall set forth all brands, types, packages, and
containers of beer or wine offered for sale by such licensed brewery or winery;
all additional information required may be filed as a supplement to the price
schedule forms.

(b) Prices filed by a
brewery or winery shall be uniform prices to all distributors on a statewide
basis less bona fide allowances for freight differentials. Quantity discounts
are prohibited. No price shall be filed that is below acquisition/production
cost plus ten percent of that cost, except that acquisition cost plus ten
percent of acquisition cost does not apply to sales of beer or wine between a
beer or wine importer who sells beer or wine to another beer or wine importer
or to a beer or wine distributor, or to a beer or wine distributor who sells
beer or wine to another beer or wine distributor. However, the board is
empowered to review periodically, as it may deem appropriate, the amount of the
percentage of acquisition/production cost as a minimum mark-up over cost and to
modify such percentage by rule of the board, except such percentage shall be
not less than ten percent.

(c) No brewery, winery,
certificate of approval holder, beer or wine importer, or beer or wine
distributor may sell or offer to sell any beer or wine to any persons
whatsoever in this state until copies of such written contracts or memoranda of
such oral agreements are on file with the board.

(d) No brewery or
winery may sell or offer to sell any package or container of beer or wine to
any distributor at a price differing from the price for such package or
container as shown in the schedule of prices filed by the brewery or winery and
then in effect, according to rules adopted by the board.

(e) The board may
reject any supplier's price filing, contract, or memorandum of oral agreement,
or portion thereof that it deems to be in violation of this section or any rule
or that would tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer or
wine. Whenever the board rejects any such price filing, contract, or
memorandum, the licensee submitting the price filing, contract, or memorandum
may be heard by the board and shall have the burden of showing that the price
filing, contract, or memorandum is not in violation of this section or a rule
or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer or wine.
If the price filing, contract, or memorandum is accepted, it shall become
effective at a time fixed by the board. If the price filing, contract, or
memorandum, or portion thereof, is rejected, the last effective price filing,
contract, or memorandum shall remain in effect until such time as an amended
price filing, contract, or memorandum is filed and approved, in accordance with
the provisions of this section.

(f) All
prices, contracts, and memoranda filed as required by this section shall at all
times be open to inspection to all trade buyers within the state of Washington
and shall not in any sense be considered confidential.

Sec. 34. RCW 66.28.190 and 1997 c
321 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW 66.28.010
notwithstanding, persons licensed under RCW 66.24.200 as wine distributors ((and)),
persons licensed under RCW 66.24.250 as beer distributors, and persons
licensed under section 18 of this act may sell at wholesale nonliquor food
products on thirty-day credit terms to persons licensed as retailers under this
title, but complete and separate accounting records shall be maintained on all
sales of nonliquor food products to ensure that such persons are in compliance
with RCW 66.28.010.

For the purpose of this
section, "nonliquor food products" includes all food products for
human consumption as defined in RCW 82.08.0293 as it exists on July 1, 1987,
except that for the purposes of this section bottled water and carbonated
beverages, whether liquid or frozen, shall be considered food products.

Sec. 35. RCW 66.40.140 and 1933
ex.s. c 62 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever a majority of
qualified voters voting upon said question in any such unit shall have voted
"Against sale of liquor", the county auditor shall file with the
liquor control board a certificate showing the result of the canvass at such
election; and thereafter, except as hereinafter provided, it shall not be
lawful for ((a liquor store to be operated therein nor for)) licensees
to maintain and operate licensed premises therein except as hereinafter
provided:

(1) ((As to any
stores maintained by the board within any such unit at the time of such
licensing, the board shall have a period of thirty days from and after the date
of the canvass of the vote upon such election to continue operation of its
store or stores therein.

(2))) As to any premises licensed hereunder within
any such unit at the time of such election, such licensee shall have a period
of sixty days from and after the date of the canvass of the vote upon such
election in which to discontinue operation of its store or stores therein.

(((3))) (2)
Nothing herein contained shall prevent any distillery, brewery, rectifying
plant or winery or the licensed operators thereof from selling its manufactured
product, manufactured within such unit, outside the boundaries thereof.

(((4))) (3)
Nothing herein contained shall prevent any person residing in any unit in which
the sale of liquor shall have been forbidden by popular vote as herein
provided, who is otherwise qualified to receive and hold a permit under this
title, from lawfully purchasing without the unit and transporting into or
receiving within the unit, liquor lawfully purchased by him outside the
boundaries of such unit.

Sec. 36. RCW 66.44.150 and 1955 c
289 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

((If)) Any
person in this state who buys alcoholic beverages from any person other
than ((the board,)) a ((state liquor store,)) licensee or
some person authorized by the board to sell ((them, he shall be)) it
is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 37. RCW 66.44.160 and 1955 c
289 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as otherwise
provided in this title, any person who has or keeps or transports alcoholic
beverages other than those purchased from ((the board,)) a ((state
liquor store,)) licensee or some person authorized by the board to
sell ((them, shall be)) it is guilty of a violation of this
title.

Sec. 38. RCW 66.44.318 and 1995 c
100 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Licensees
holding nonretail class liquor licenses are permitted to allow their employees
between (([the])) the ages of eighteen and twenty-one to stock,
merchandise, and handle spirits, beer, or wine on or about the
nonretail premises if there is an adult twenty-one years of age or older on
duty supervising such activities on the premises.

Sec. 39. RCW 66.44.340 and 1999 c
281 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Employers holding ((grocery
store or beer and/or wine specialty shop)) retail liquor licenses
exclusively for off-premises consumption are permitted to allow their
employees, between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one years, to sell, stock,
and handle spirits, beer, or wine in, on, or about any
establishment holding ((a grocery store or beer and/or wine specialty shop))
such license exclusively: PROVIDED, That there is an adult twenty-one
years of age or older on duty supervising the sale of liquor at the licensed
premises: PROVIDED, That minor employees may make deliveries of spirits,
beer, and/or wine purchased from licensees holding ((grocery store or
beer and/or wine specialty shop)) retail liquor licenses exclusively
for off-premises consumption, when delivery is made to cars of customers
adjacent to such licensed premises but only, however, when the minor employee
is accompanied by the purchaser.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
40. A new section is added
to chapter 66.44 RCW to read as follows:

It shall be unlawful
for any person, firm, or corporation to advertise any spirituous liquor
beverage product through outdoor advertising or print media within the state of
Washington. However, one sign at the retail outlet for such products using the
words retail, alcohol, liquor, store, or any combination of such words may be
allowed. For purposes of this section, "outdoor advertising" means
all signs, visible to the general public, whether permanent or temporary,
advertising spirituous liquor, except for the one sign allowed for each retail
outlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
41. A new section is added
to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

There is hereby imposed
upon all spirits sold by spirits distributors licensed under this title, a tax
at the rate of one dollar and sixty-two cents per liter. The tax provided for
in this section shall be collected by direct payments based on spirits sold by
spirits distributors. Every person selling spirits under the provisions of
this section shall on or before the twentieth day of each month report to the board
all sales during the preceding calendar month in such manner and upon such
forms as may be prescribed by the board, and with such report shall pay the tax
due from the sales covered by such report unless the same has previously been
paid. Any such seller of spirits whose applicable tax payment is not
postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of purchase will be
assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent a month or fraction thereof. The
board may require that every such person execute and file with the board a bond
to be approved by the board, in such amount as the board may fix, securing the
payment of the tax. If any such person fails to pay the tax when due, the
board may forthwith suspend or cancel the license until all taxes are paid.
All revenues collected under this section shall be deposited in the liquor
revolving fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
42. A new section is added
to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A consumption
surcharge is established to be paid by spirits distributors on the sale or
transfer of spirits from the distributor to the retailer.

(2) The board shall
establish the annual base consumption rate determined by the total liter volume
per capita of spirits sold through state liquor stores and vendor agencies and
to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees during calendar year 2000.

(3) Beginning on
January 1, 2003, and each year thereafter, the board shall monitor sales and
transfers of spirits by spirits distributors. If during calendar year 2003 the
total liter volume per capita of spirits sold or transferred reaches the 2000
annual liter volume per capita, the board shall collect from each spirits
distributor, beginning April 1, 2004, a surcharge of two dollars per liter of
spirits sold or transferred between April 1, 2004, and March 31, 2005.

(4) If the total liter
volume per capita of spirits sold or transferred during calendar year 2004
falls below the base consumption rate established in 2000, imposition of the
consumption surcharge shall be terminated beginning April 1, 2005.

(5) Beginning with
calendar year 2006, and each year thereafter, if the total liter volume per
capita of spirits exceeds the total liter volume per capita of spirits sold or
transferred in the base consumption year of 2000, the board shall impose a
surcharge, beginning on April 1st of the following year, on the sale or
transfer of spirits by spirit distributors to spirit retailers for a period of
three hundred fifty-two days.

(6) Revenue generated
by the consumption surcharge shall be deposited in the liquor revolving fund
and the surcharge, when imposed, shall be collected by the board annually from
distributors.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
43. A new section is added
to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:

The liquor control
board must determined annually per capita consumption levels and total volume
by liter of spirits sold or transferred during the calendar year by a spirits
distributor to a retail licensee authorized to sell spirits. The board may
recommend consumption surcharge adjustments to respond to any increase in
consumption above the base level established for 2000. It is the intent of the
legislature that as consumption increases over the level established by the
board for calendar year 2000, a surcharge be imposed that increases the cost of
the product as a means of controlling consumption.

Sec. 44. RCW 66.08.170 and 1961
ex.s. c 6 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a fund,
known as the "liquor revolving fund", which shall consist of all
license fees, permit fees, penalties, forfeitures, consumption surcharge
revenues, and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the board.
The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys received by the
board or any employee thereof, except for change funds and an amount of petty
cash as fixed by the board within the authority of law shall be deposited each
day in a depository approved by the state treasurer and transferred to the
state treasurer to be credited to the liquor revolving fund. Disbursements
from the revolving fund shall be on authorization of the board or a duly
authorized representative thereof. In order to maintain an effective
expenditure and revenue control the liquor revolving fund shall be subject in
all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation shall be required to permit
expenditures and payment of obligations from such fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
45. A new section is added
to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any licensee that
employs a former state liquor store employee during calendar year 2003 may
deduct from his or her annual license fee for the subsequent year one dollar
for each hour the employee is employed by the licensee up to the license fee
amount.

(2) For purposes of
this section, "former state liquor store employee" means an
individual employed full time by the liquor control board at a state liquor
store for at least six months prior to the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
46. (1) The liquor control
board shall begin the process of terminating its operations involving the
retail sale and wholesale distribution of liquor. The board and the office of
financial management shall determine those actions necessary to terminate the
board's direct involvement in the retail sale and wholesale distribution of
liquor by July 1, 2003, and make recommendations to the legislature by December
1, 2001, on the following:

(a) Disposition of
equipment and inventory under the control of the liquor control board used in
the operation of state liquor stores and agency vendor stores;

(b) Disposition of all
warehousing facilities and other equipment and vehicles used in the wholesale
distribution of liquor;

(c) The status of
contracts and other obligations;

(d) Determine the
impact on sales and availability of spirits to the public during the period of
decreasing state liquor store operation and the implementation of private
retail and wholesaling of spirits;

(e) Identification of
issues and a plan for treatment of personnel; and

(f) Any other actions
determined necessary by the reporting agencies.

(2) The board is
authorized to take actions necessary to implement the spirits distributor's
license and the spirits retail license for grocery stores by July 1, 2003.

(3) The board shall
exercise due diligence to reduce any liabilities associated with discontinuing
board retailing and wholesaling operations including contract commitments for
the acquisition of alcoholic beverages or interests in real estate used for the
retailing and wholesaling of alcoholic beverages past July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
47. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 66.08.070 (Purchase of liquor by
board--Consignment not prohibited--Warranty or affirmation not required for
wine or malt purchases) and 1985 c 226 s 2, 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 1, &
1933 ex.s. c 62 s 67;

(2) RCW 66.08.160 (Acquisition of warehouse
authorized) and 1947 c 134 s 1;

(3) RCW 66.08.235 (Liquor control board
construction and maintenance account) and 1997 c 75 s 1;

(4) RCW 66.12.020 (Sales of liquor to board)
and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 48;

(5) RCW 66.16.010 (Board may
establish--Price standards--Prices in special instances) and 1939 c 172 s 10,
1937 c 62 s 1, & 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 4;

(6) RCW 66.16.030 (Vendor to be in charge)
and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 6;

(7) RCW 66.16.041 (Credit and debit card
purchases--Rules--Provision, installation, maintenance of equipment by
board--Consideration of offsetting liquor revolving fund balance
reduction--Report to legislature) and 1998 c 265 s 3, 1997 c 148 s 2, &
1996 c 291 s 2;

(8) RCW 66.16.050 (Sale of beer and wine to
person licensed to sell) and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 8;

(9) RCW 66.16.060 (Sealed packages may be
required, exception) and 1943 c 216 s 1 & 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 9;

(10) RCW 66.16.070 (Liquor cannot be opened
or consumed on store premises) and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 10;

(11) RCW 66.16.080 (Sunday closing) and 1988
c 101 s 1 & 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 11;

(12) RCW 66.16.090 (Record of individual
purchases confidential--Penalty for disclosure) and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 89;

(13) RCW 66.20.160 ("Card of
identification", "licensee", "store employee" defined
for certain purposes) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 4, 1971 ex.s. c 15 s 2, 1959 c
111 s 4, & 1949 c 67 s 1;

(14) RCW 66.24.440 (Liquor by the drink,
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant, spirits, beer, and wine private club, and
sports entertainment facility license--Purchase of liquor by
licensees--Discount) and 1998 c 126 s 8, 1997 c 321 s 29, & 1949 c 5 s 5;

(15) RCW 66.32.010 (Possession of contraband
liquor) and 1955 c 39 s 3; and

(16) RCW 66.44.120 (Unlawful use of seal) and
1992 c 7 s 42 & 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 47.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
48. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 49. Sections 1 through 45 and
47 of this act take effect July 1, 2003.

---
END ---