BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
70.44.060 and 1997 c 3 s 206 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 All public hospital districts organized under the
provisions of

_7 this chapter shall have power:

_8 (1) To make a survey of existing hospital and other
health care

_9 facilities within and without such district.

10 (2) To construct, condemn and purchase, purchase,
acquire,

11 lease, add to, maintain, operate, develop and regulate,
sell and

12 convey all lands, property, property rights, equipment,
hospital

13 and other health care facilities and systems for the
maintenance

14 of hospitals, buildings, structures, and any and all
other

15 facilities, and to exercise the right of eminent domain
to

16 effectuate the foregoing purposes or for the acquisition
and

17 damaging of the same or property of any kind appurtenant
thereto,

18 and such right of eminent domain shall be exercised and
instituted

p. 1 HB
1131

_1 pursuant to a resolution of the commission and conducted
in the

_2 same manner and by the same procedure as in or may be
provided by

_3 law for the exercise of the power of eminent domain by

_4 incorporated cities and towns of the state of Washington
in the

_5 acquisition of property rights: PROVIDED, That no
public hospital

_6 district shall have the right of eminent domain and the
power of

_7 condemnation against any health care facility.

_8 (3) To lease existing hospital and other health care
facilities

_9 and equipment and/or other property used in connection
therewith,

10 including ambulances, and to pay such rental therefor as
the

11 commissioners shall deem proper; to provide hospital and
other

12 health care services for residents of said district by
facilities

13 located outside the boundaries of said district, by
contract or in

14 any other manner said commissioners may deem expedient
or

15 necessary under the existing conditions; and said
hospital

16 district shall have the power to contract with other
communities,

17 corporations, or individuals for the services provided
by said

18 hospital district; and they may further receive in said
hospitals

19 and other health care facilities and furnish proper and
adequate

20 services to all persons not residents of said district
at such

21 reasonable and fair compensation as may be considered
proper:

22 PROVIDED, That it must at all times make adequate
provision for

23 the needs of the district and residents of said district
shall

24 have prior rights to the available hospital and other
health care

25 facilities of said district, at rates set by the
district

26 commissioners.

27 (4) For the purpose aforesaid, it shall be lawful
for any

28 district so organized to take, condemn and purchase,
lease, or

29 acquire, any and all property, and property rights,
including

30 state and county lands, for any of the purposes
aforesaid, and any

31 and all other facilities necessary or convenient, and in

32 connection with the construction, maintenance, and
operation of

33 any such hospitals and other health care facilities,
subject,

34 however, to the applicable limitations provided in
subsection (2)

35 of this section.

36 (5) To contract indebtedness or borrow money for
corporate

37 purposes on the credit of the corporation or the
revenues of the

38 hospitals thereof, and the revenues of any other
facilities or

HB 1131 p. 2

_1 services that the district is or hereafter may be
authorized by

_2 law to provide, and to issue and sell: (a) Revenue
bonds, revenue

_3 warrants, or other revenue obligations therefor payable
solely out

_4 of a special fund or funds into which the district may
pledge such

_5 amount of the revenues of the hospitals thereof, and the
revenues

_6 of any other facilities or services that the district is
or

_7 hereafter may be authorized by law to provide, to pay
the same as

_8 the commissioners of the district may determine, such
revenue

_9 bonds, warrants, or other obligations to be issued and
sold in the

10 same manner and subject to the same provisions as
provided for the

11 issuance of revenue bonds, warrants, or other
obligations by

12 cities or towns under the Municipal Revenue Bond Act,
chapter

13 35.41 RCW, as may hereafter be amended; (b) general
obligation

14 bonds therefor in the manner and form as provided in RCW
70.44.110

15 and 70.44.130, as may hereafter be amended; or (c)
interest-

16 bearing warrants to be drawn on a fund pending deposit
in such

17 fund of money sufficient to redeem such warrants and to
be issued

18 and paid in such manner and upon such terms and
conditions as the

19 board of commissioners may deem to be in the best
interest of the

20 district; and to assign or sell hospital accounts
receivable, and

21 accounts receivable for the use of other facilities or
services

22 that the district is or hereafter may be authorized by
law to

23 provide, for collection with or without recourse.
General

24 obligation bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance
with

25 chapter 39.46 RCW. Revenue bonds, revenue warrants, or
other

26 revenue obligations may be issued and sold in accordance
with

27 chapter 39.46 RCW.

28 (6) To raise revenue by the levy of an annual tax on
all

29 taxable property within such public hospital district
not to

30 exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value, and an

31 additional annual tax on all taxable property within
such public

32 hospital district not to exceed twenty-five cents per
thousand

33 dollars of assessed value, or such further amount as has
been or

34 shall be authorized by a vote of the people. Although
public

35 hospital districts are authorized to impose two separate
regular

36 property tax levies, the levies shall be considered to
be a single

37 levy for purposes of the limitation provided for in
chapter 84.55

38 RCW. Public hospital districts are authorized to levy
such a

p. 3 HB
1131

_1 general tax in excess of their regular property taxes
when

_2 authorized so to do at a special election conducted in
accordance

_3 with and subject to all of the requirements of the
Constitution

_4 and the laws of the state of Washington now in force or
hereafter

_5 enacted governing the limitation of tax levies. The
said board of

_6 district commissioners is authorized and empowered to
call a

_7 special election for the purpose of submitting to the
qualified

_8 voters of the hospital district a proposition or
propositions to

_9 levy taxes in excess of its regular property taxes. The

10 superintendent shall prepare a proposed budget of the
contemplated

11 financial transactions for the ensuing year and file the
same in

12 the records of the commission on or before the first ((Monday
in

13 September)) day of November. Notice of
the filing of said proposed

14 budget and the date and place of hearing on the same
shall be

15 published for at least two consecutive weeks, at
least one time

16 each week, in a newspaper printed and of general
circulation in

17 said county. On or before the ((first Monday
in October)) fifteenth

18 day of November the commission shall hold a
public hearing on said

19 proposed budget at which any taxpayer may appear and be
heard

20 against the whole or any part of the proposed budget.
Upon the

21 conclusion of said hearing, the commission shall, by
resolution,

22 adopt the budget as finally determined and fix the final
amount of

23 expenditures for the ensuing year. Taxes levied by the
commission

24 shall be certified to and collected by the proper county
officer

25 of the county in which such public hospital district is
located in

26 the same manner as is or may be provided by law for the

27 certification and collection of port district taxes.
The commission

28 is authorized, prior to the receipt of taxes raised by
levy, to

29 borrow money or issue warrants of the district in
anticipation of

30 the revenue to be derived by such district from the levy
of taxes

31 for the purpose of such district, and such warrants
shall be

32 redeemed from the first money available from such taxes
when

33 collected, and such warrants shall not exceed the
anticipated

34 revenues of one year, and shall bear interest at a rate
or rates

35 as authorized by the commission.

36 (7) To enter into any contract with the United
States

37 government or any state, municipality, or other hospital
district,

HB 1131 p. 4

_1 or any department of those governing bodies, for
carrying out any

_2 of the powers authorized by this chapter.

_3 (8) To sue and be sued in any court of competent
jurisdiction:

_4 PROVIDED, That all suits against the public hospital
district

_5 shall be brought in the county in which the public
hospital

_6 district is located.

_7 (9) To pay actual necessary travel expenses and
living expenses

_8 incurred while in travel status for (a) qualified
physicians who

_9 are candidates for medical staff positions, and (b)
other

10 qualified persons who are candidates for superintendent
or other

11 managerial and technical positions, when the district
finds that

12 hospitals or other health care facilities owned and
operated by it

13 are not adequately staffed and determines that personal
interviews

14 with said candidates to be held in the district are
necessary or

15 desirable for the adequate staffing of said facilities.

16 (10) To make contracts, employ superintendents,
attorneys, and

17 other technical or professional assistants and all other

18 employees; to make contracts with private or public
institutions

19 for employee retirement programs; to print and publish
information

20 or literature; and to do all other things necessary to
carry out

21 the provisions of this chapter.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 HB
1131