BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
43.19A.020 and 1996 c 198 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) The ((USEPA)) federal product
standards, ((as now or

_7 hereafter amended)) adopted under 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 6962(e) as it

_8 exists on the effective date of this act, are
adopted as the

_9 minimum standards for the state of Washington. These
standards

10 shall be implemented for at least the products listed in
(((a) and

11 (b) of)) this subsection ((by the dates
indicated)), unless the

12 director finds that a different standard would
significantly

13 increase recycled product availability or competition.

14 (a) ((By July 1, 1997:

15 (i))) Paper and paper products;

16 (((ii))) (b) Organic recovered
materials; ((and

17 (iii))) (c) Latex paint products;

18 (((b) By July 1, 1997:

p. 1 SHB
1136

_1 (i))) (d) Products for lower value
uses containing recycled

_2 plastics;

_3 (((ii))) (e) Retread and
remanufactured tires;

_4 (((iii))) (f) Lubricating oils;

_5 (((iv))) (g) Automotive batteries;

_6 (((v))) (h) Building ((insulation))
products and materials;

_7 (((vi))) (i) Panelboard; and

_8 (((vii))) (j) Compost products.

_9 (2) By July 1, 2001, the director shall adopt
product standards

10 for strawboard manufactured using as an ingredient
straw that is

11 produced as a by-product in the production of cereal
grain or turf

12 or grass seed and product standards for products made
from

13 strawboard.

14 (3) The standards required by this section
shall be applied to

15 recycled product purchasing by the department ((and)),
other state

16 agencies, and state postsecondary educational
institutions. The

17 standards may be adopted or applied by any other local
government

18 in product procurement. The standards shall provide for
exceptions

19 under appropriate circumstances to allow purchases of
recycled

20 products that do not meet the minimum content
requirements of the

21 standards.

22 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary
for the immediate

23 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

24 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

25 takes effect July 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1136 p. 2