BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
39.12.065 and 1994 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) Upon complaint by an interested party, the
director of

_7 labor and industries shall cause an investigation to be
made to

_8 determine whether there has been compliance with this
chapter and

_9 the rules adopted hereunder, and if the investigation
indicates

10 that a violation may have occurred, a hearing shall be
held in

11 accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The director shall
issue a

12 written determination including his or her findings
after the

13 hearing. A judicial appeal from the director's
determination may

14 be taken in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, with the
prevailing

15 party entitled to recover reasonable costs and attorneys
fees.

16 A complaint concerning nonpayment of the prevailing
rate of

17 wage shall be filed with the department of labor and
industries no

18 later than thirty days from the acceptance date of the
public

p. 1 HB
1137

_1 works project. The failure to timely file such a
complaint shall

_2 not prohibit a claimant from pursuing a private right of
action

_3 against a contractor or subcontractor for unpaid
prevailing

_4 wages. The remedy provided by this section is not
exclusive and

_5 is concurrent with any other remedy provided by law.

_6 (2) To the extent that a contractor or subcontractor
has not

_7 paid the prevailing rate of wage under a determination
issued as

_8 provided in subsection (1) of this section, the director
shall

_9 notify the agency awarding the public works contract of
the amount

10 of the violation found, and the awarding agency shall
withhold, or

11 in the case of a bond, the director shall proceed
against the bond

12 in accordance with the applicable statute to recover,
such amount

13 from the following sources in the following order of
priority

14 until the total of such amount is withheld:

15 (a) The retainage or bond in lieu of retainage as
provided in

16 RCW 60.28.010;

17 (b) If the claimant was employed by the contractor
or

18 subcontractor on the public works project, the bond
filed by the

19 contractor or subcontractor with the department of labor
and

20 industries as provided in RCW 18.27.040 and ((19.28.120))

21 19.28.041;

22 (c) A surety bond, or at the contractor's or subcontractor's

23 option an escrow account, running to the director in the
amount of

24 the violation found; and

25 (d) That portion of the progress payments which is
properly

26 allocable to the contractor or subcontractor who is
found to be in

27 violation of this chapter. Under no circumstances shall
any

28 portion of the progress payments be withheld that are
properly

29 allocable to a contractor, subcontractor, or supplier,
that is not

30 found to be in violation of this chapter.

31 The amount withheld shall be released to the
director to

32 distribute in accordance with the director's
determination.

33 (3) A contractor or subcontractor that is found, in
accordance

34 with subsection (1) of this section, to have violated
the

35 requirement to pay the prevailing rate of wage or
settles a wage

36 claim with the department of labor and industries for
failure to

37 pay the prevailing rate of wage shall be subject
to a civil

38 penalty of not less than one thousand dollars or an
amount equal

HB 1137 p. 2

_1 to twenty percent of the total prevailing wage violation
found on

_2 the contract, whichever is greater, and shall not be
permitted to

_3 bid, or have a bid considered, on any public works
contract until

_4 such civil penalty has been paid in full to the
director. If a

_5 contractor or subcontractor is found to have
participated in a

_6 violation of the requirement to pay the prevailing rate
of wage

_7 for a second time within a five-year period, the contractor
or

_8 subcontractor shall be subject to the sanctions
prescribed in this

_9 subsection and as an additional sanction shall not be
allowed to

10 bid on any public works contract for two years. If a
previous or

11 subsequent violation of a requirement to pay a
prevailing rate of

12 wage under federal or other state law is found against
the

13 contractor or subcontractor within five years from a
violation

14 under this section, the contractor or subcontractor
shall not be

15 allowed to bid on any public works contract for two
years. A

16 contractor or subcontractor shall not be barred from
bidding on

17 any public works contract if the contractor or
subcontractor

18 relied upon written information from the department to
pay a

19 prevailing rate of wage that is later determined to be
in

20 violation of this chapter. The civil penalty and
sanctions under

21 this subsection shall not apply to a violation
determined by the

22 director to be an inadvertent filing or reporting
error. To the

23 extent that a contractor or subcontractor has not paid
the

24 prevailing wage rate under a determination issued as
provided in

25 subsection (1) of this section, the unpaid wages shall
constitute

26 a lien against the bonds and retainage as provided
herein and in

27 RCW 18.27.040, ((19.28.120)) 19.28.041,
39.08.010, and 60.28.010.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1137