BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.090 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 278 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

"Value proceeding
or accruing" means the consideration, whether money, credits, rights, or
other property expressed in terms of money, actually received or accrued. The
term shall be applied, in each case, on a cash receipts or accrual basis
according to which method of accounting is regularly employed in keeping the
books of the taxpayer. However, persons operating grain warehouses licensed
under chapter 22.09 RCW may elect to report the value proceeding or accruing
from grain warehouse operations on either a cash receipts or accrual basis.
The department of revenue may provide by regulation that the value proceeding
or accruing from sales on the installment plan under conditional contracts of
sale may be reported as of the dates when the payments become due.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---