BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
29.71.020 and 1990 c 59 s 69 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) In the year in which a presidential
election is held, each

_7 major political party and each minor political party or

_8 independent candidate convention held under chapter
29.24 RCW that

_9 nominates candidates for president and vice-president of
the

10 United States shall nominate one congressional
district elector

11 representing each congressional district of this
state and two

12 state presidential electors ((for this)) representing
the entire

13 state. The party or convention shall file with the
secretary of

14 state a certificate signed by the presiding officer of
the

15 convention at which the presidential electors were
chosen, listing

16 the names and addresses of the state presidential
electors and the

17 congressional district electors. Each
presidential elector shall

18 execute and file with the secretary of state a pledge
that, as an

p. 1 HB
1143

_1 elector, he or she will vote for the candidates
nominated by that

_2 party. The names of presidential electors shall not
appear on the

_3 ballots.

_4 (2) The votes cast statewide for
candidates for president and

_5 vice-president of each political party shall be counted
for the

_6 candidates for state presidential electors of
that political

_7 party. The candidates for state presidential
electors representing

_8 the party of the candidates for president and
vice-president

_9 receiving the most votes statewide will be the state
presidential

10 electors for the state.

11 (3) The votes cast in a congressional district
for candidates

12 for president and vice-president of each political
party must be

13 counted for the candidate for congressional district
presidential

14 elector of that party. The candidate for
congressional district

15 elector representing the party of the candidates for
president and

16 vice-president receiving the most votes in the
congressional

17 district will be the congressional district elector
for that

18 district.

19 Sec. 2. RCW
29.71.040 and 1977 ex.s. c 238 s 2 are each amended to

20 read as follows:

21 The congressional district and state electors
of the president

22 and vice-president selected under RCW
29.71.020 shall convene at

23 the seat of government on the day fixed by federal
statute, at the

24 hour of twelve o'clock noon of that day. If there is
any vacancy in

25 the office of an elector occasioned by death, refusal to
act,

26 neglect to attend, or otherwise, the electors present
shall

27 immediately proceed to fill it by viva voce, and
plurality of

28 votes. When all of the electors have appeared and the
vacancies

29 have been filled they shall constitute the college of
electors of

30 the state of Washington, and shall proceed to perform
the duties

31 required of them by the Constitution and laws of the
United

32 States. Each congressional district elector shall
vote for the

33 presidential and vice-presidential candidates who
received the

34 highest number of votes in the district the elector

35 represents. Each state elector shall vote for the
presidential and

36 vice-presidential candidates who received the highest
number of

37 votes in this state. Any elector who votes for a
person or

HB 1143 p. 2

_1 persons not nominated by the party of which he or she is
an

_2 elector, or in a manner otherwise inconsistent with
this section,

_3 shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to a fine of
one

_4 thousand dollars.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1143