BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1)(a) The legislature
finds that the common schools of Washington began to implement comprehensive
performance-based education reforms in 1993 as provided in House Bill No. 1209
and subsequent legislation. The principal features of the present system for
funding the operation of the common schools were enacted in 1977. The more
fully schools and school districts implement performance-based educational
programs, the less well aligned Washington's school funding and school program
delivery systems become. The governor's council on education reform and
funding, created by executive order in 1991, did not adopt recommendations on
how to redesign the funding system to align with the performance-based
instructional program model.

(b) The legislature
further finds that many schools and school districts in Washington have
developed creative approaches to helping students achieve the essential
academic learning requirements and the goals of the basic education act as
codified in RCW 28A.150.210. The successes already achieved by schools and
school districts on the Washington assessment of student learning constitute
evidence that the experiences of schools and school districts in Washington may
suggest viable strategies for designing performance-based funding programs.

(c) The legislature
recognizes that as statewide accountability systems are developed and
implemented to hold students, schools, and school districts accountable for
improving student performance, it is appropriate and necessary to concurrently
conduct a fundamental reexamination of the educational funding system and
explore possible education finance system reform.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "commission" means the commission on school funding
review.

(3) The commission on
school funding review is created.

(4)(a) The commission
shall consist of thirteen citizen members, appointed by the governor, each of
whom shall apply for membership and demonstrate his or her concern and interest
in education financing, one member appointed by each co-speaker of the house of
representatives, and one member from each major political party appointed by
the president of the senate. In appointing members of the commission, the
governor shall consider the expertise in educational finance of applicants, and
attempt to include parents, business and community leaders, and individuals
with experience as principals, superintendents, school business managers,
school auditors, teachers, and school directors, and with experience in
postsecondary education.

(b) The governor shall
appoint a representative of the office of the governor or the office of
financial management. The commission membership shall include members with
expertise in special education and expertise in programs designed to meet the
need of students with limited English proficiency. The co-speakers of the
house of representatives shall each appoint one member of their respective
caucuses. The president of the senate shall appoint one member of the senate from
each major political party. The governor shall appoint the chair of the
commission.

(5)(a) The commission
shall identify at least fifteen but not more than twenty-five successful
comprehensive school or school district program models from within the school
districts of Washington. In identifying successful comprehensive program
models, the commission shall place special emphasis on results on the
Washington assessment of student learning.

(b) After reviewing the
structure and operation of the successful comprehensive school or school
district program models, the commission shall approve pilot performance-based
funding programs that could be used in these schools and school districts. The
pilot performance-based funding programs shall be designed to implement either
school-based or districtwide performance-based education funding systems.

(c) Pilot
performance-based funding programs may include, but are not limited to,
weighted student formulas and systems allowing for more flexible expenditure of
funding formula allocations, and categorical program appropriations from state
and federal sources.

(d) In designing pilot
performance-based funding programs, the commission shall consider the actual
cost of providing for both the immediate and future needs of students to be
served by the school or school district.

(6) The commission
shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the
legislature by January 1, 2003. In its final report, the commission shall
recommend steps for implementing statewide a system of performance-based common
school financing.

(7) Schools and school
districts choosing to participate with the commission in developing pilot
performance-based funding program designs shall receive compensation for
expenses incurred through such participation. The amount of compensation shall
be determined by the commission, subject to available funding.

(8) The commission
shall employ such staff as may be necessary to fulfill its duties under this
section. The commission is authorized to enter into contracts for services
which may be necessary to fulfill its duties under this section. The
commission shall create technical advisory committees as needed in order to
fulfill its duties under this section.

(9) The
commission expires January 1, 2003.

---
END ---