BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.41.040 and 1997 c
338 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person,
whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the crime of unlawful possession of
a firearm in the first degree, if the person owns, has in his or her
possession, or has in his or her control any firearm after having previously
been convicted in this state or elsewhere of any serious offense as defined in
this chapter.

(b) A person, whether
an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the crime of unlawful possession of a
firearm in the second degree, if the person does not qualify under (a) of this
subsection for the crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first
degree and the person owns, has in his or her possession, or has in his or her
control any firearm:

(i) After having
previously been convicted in this state or elsewhere of any felony not
specifically listed as prohibiting firearm possession under (a) of this
subsection, or any of the following crimes when committed by one family or
household member against another, committed on or after July 1, 1993: Assault
in the fourth degree, coercion, stalking, reckless endangerment, criminal
trespass in the first degree, or violation of the provisions of a protection
order or no-contact order restraining the person or excluding the person from a
residence (RCW 26.50.060, 26.50.070, 26.50.130, or 10.99.040);

(ii) After having
previously been involuntarily committed for mental health treatment under RCW
71.05.320, 71.34.090, chapter 10.77 RCW, or equivalent statutes of another
jurisdiction, unless his or her right to possess a firearm has been restored as
provided in RCW 9.41.047;

(iii) If the person is
under eighteen years of age, except as provided in RCW 9.41.042; and/or

(iv) If the person is
free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing for
a serious offense as defined in RCW 9.41.010.

(2)(a) Unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first degree is a class B felony, punishable
under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(b) Unlawful possession
of a firearm in the second degree is a class C felony, punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW.

(3) Knowledge is not
an element of the crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or
second degree. Unwitting possession is an affirmative defense to a charge of
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second degree. The defendant
must establish the defense of unwitting possession by a preponderance of the
evidence.

(4)
Notwithstanding RCW 9.41.047 or any other provisions of law, as used in this
chapter, a person has been "convicted", whether in an adult court or
adjudicated in a juvenile court, at such time as a plea of guilty has been
accepted, or a verdict of guilty has been filed, notwithstanding the pendency
of any future proceedings including but not limited to sentencing or
disposition, post-trial or post-factfinding motions, and appeals. Conviction
includes a dismissal entered after a period of probation, suspension or
deferral of sentence, and also includes equivalent dispositions by courts in
jurisdictions other than Washington state. A person shall not be precluded
from possession of a firearm if the conviction has been the subject of a
pardon, annulment, certificate of rehabilitation, or other equivalent procedure
based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the person convicted or the
conviction or disposition has been the subject of a pardon, annulment, or other
equivalent procedure based on a finding of innocence. Where no record of the
court's disposition of the charges can be found, there shall be a rebuttable
presumption that the person was not convicted of the charge.

(((4))) (5)
Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a person convicted of an
offense prohibiting the possession of a firearm under this section other than
murder, manslaughter, robbery, rape, indecent liberties, arson, assault,
kidnapping, extortion, burglary, or violations with respect to controlled
substances under RCW 69.50.401(a) and 69.50.410, who received a probationary
sentence under RCW 9.95.200, and who received a dismissal of the charge under
RCW 9.95.240, shall not be precluded from possession of a firearm as a result
of the conviction. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, if a
person is prohibited from possession of a firearm under subsection (1) of this
section and has not previously been convicted of a sex offense prohibiting
firearm ownership under subsection (1) of this section and/or any felony
defined under any law as a class A felony or with a maximum sentence of at
least twenty years, or both, the individual may petition a court of record to
have his or her right to possess a firearm restored:

(a) Under RCW 9.41.047;
and/or

(b)(i) If the
conviction was for a felony offense, after five or more consecutive years in
the community without being convicted or currently charged with any felony,
gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor crimes, if the individual has no prior felony
convictions that prohibit the possession of a firearm counted as part of the
offender score under RCW 9.94A.360; or

(ii) If the conviction
was for a nonfelony offense, after three or more consecutive years in the
community without being convicted or currently charged with any felony, gross
misdemeanor, or misdemeanor crimes, if the individual has no prior felony
convictions that prohibit the possession of a firearm counted as part of the
offender score under RCW 9.94A.360 and the individual has completed all
conditions of the sentence.

(((5))) (6)
In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, if a person under the age
of eighteen years is found by a court to have possessed a firearm in a vehicle
in violation of subsection (1) of this section or to have committed an offense
while armed with a firearm during which offense a motor vehicle served an
integral function, the court shall notify the department of licensing within
twenty-four hours and the person's privilege to drive shall be revoked under
RCW 46.20.265.

(((6))) (7)
Nothing in chapter 129, Laws of 1995 shall ever be construed or interpreted as
preventing an offender from being charged and subsequently convicted for the
separate felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of a stolen firearm,
or both, in addition to being charged and subsequently convicted under this
section for unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second degree.
Notwithstanding any other law, if the offender is convicted under this section
for unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second degree and for the
felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of a stolen firearm, or both,
then the offender shall serve consecutive sentences for each of the felony
crimes of conviction listed in this subsection.

(((7))) (8)
Each firearm unlawfully possessed under this section shall be a separate
offense.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.41.070 and 1999 c
222 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The chief of police
of a municipality or the sheriff of a county shall within thirty days after the
filing of an application of any person, issue a license to such person to carry
a pistol concealed on his or her person within this state for five years from
date of issue, for the purposes of protection or while engaged in business,
sport, or while traveling. However, if the applicant does not have a valid
permanent Washington driver's license or Washington state identification card
or has not been a resident of the state for the previous consecutive ninety
days, the issuing authority shall have up to sixty days after the filing of the
application to issue a license. The issuing authority shall not refuse to
accept completed applications for concealed pistol licenses during regular
business hours.

The applicant's constitutional
right to bear arms shall not be denied, unless:

(a) He or she is
ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions of RCW 9.41.040 or
9.41.045;

(b) The applicant's
concealed pistol license is in a revoked status;

(c) He or she is under
twenty‑one years of age;

(d) He or she is
subject to a court order or injunction regarding firearms pursuant to RCW
9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040,
26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.26.137, 26.50.060, or 26.50.070;

(e) He or she is free
on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing for a
felony offense;

(f) He or she has an
outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any court of competent
jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor; or

(g) He or she has been
ordered to forfeit a firearm under RCW 9.41.098(1)(e) within one year before
filing an application to carry a pistol concealed on his or her person.

No person convicted of
a felony may have his or her right to possess firearms restored or his or her
privilege to carry a concealed pistol restored, unless the person has been
granted relief from disabilities by the secretary of the treasury under 18
U.S.C. Sec. 925(c), or RCW 9.41.040 (((3) or)) (4) or (5)
applies.

(2) The issuing
authority shall check with the national crime information center, the
Washington state patrol electronic data base, the department of social and
health services electronic data base, and with other agencies or resources as
appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW
9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess a firearm and therefore ineligible for a
concealed pistol license. This subsection applies whether the applicant is
applying for a new concealed pistol license or to renew a concealed pistol license.

(3) Any person whose
firearms rights have been restricted and who has been granted relief from
disabilities by the secretary of the treasury under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c) or
who is exempt under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(20)(A) shall have his or her right to
acquire, receive, transfer, ship, transport, carry, and possess firearms in
accordance with Washington state law restored except as otherwise prohibited by
this chapter.

(4) The license
application shall bear the full name, residential address, telephone number at
the option of the applicant, date and place of birth, race, gender,
description, not more than two complete sets of fingerprints, and signature of
the licensee, and the licensee's driver's license number or state
identification card number if used for identification in applying for the
license. A signed application for a concealed pistol license shall constitute
a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the department of social
and health services, mental health institutions, and other health care
facilities release information relevant to the applicant's eligibility for a
concealed pistol license to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.

The application for an
original license shall include two complete sets of fingerprints to be
forwarded to the Washington state patrol.

The license and
application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:

CAUTION:
Although state and local laws do not differ, federal law and state law on the
possession of firearms differ. If you are prohibited by federal law from
possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license
is not a defense to a federal prosecution.

The license shall
contain a description of the major differences between state and federal law and
an explanation of the fact that local laws and ordinances on firearms are
preempted by state law and must be consistent with state law. The application
shall contain questions about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 to
possess a pistol, the applicant's place of birth, and whether the applicant is
a United States citizen. The applicant shall not be required to produce a
birth certificate or other evidence of citizenship. A person who is not a
citizen of the United States shall meet the additional requirements of RCW
9.41.170 and produce proof of compliance with RCW 9.41.170 upon application.
The license shall be in triplicate and in a form to be prescribed by the
department of licensing.

The original thereof
shall be delivered to the licensee, the duplicate shall within seven days be
sent to the director of licensing and the triplicate shall be preserved for six
years, by the authority issuing the license.

The department of
licensing shall make available to law enforcement and corrections agencies, in
an on-line format, all information received under this subsection.

(5) The nonrefundable
fee, paid upon application, for the original five-year license shall be
thirty-six dollars plus additional charges imposed by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation that are passed on to the applicant. No other state or local
branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant
for the issuance of the license.

The fee shall be distributed
as follows:

(a) Fifteen dollars
shall be paid to the state general fund;

(b) Four dollars shall
be paid to the agency taking the fingerprints of the person licensed;

(c) Fourteen dollars
shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this
chapter; and

(d) Three dollars to
the firearms range account in the general fund.

(6) The nonrefundable
fee for the renewal of such license shall be thirty-two dollars. No other
branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant
for the renewal of the license.

The renewal fee shall
be distributed as follows:

(a) Fifteen dollars
shall be paid to the state general fund;

(b) Fourteen dollars
shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this
chapter; and

(c) Three dollars to
the firearms range account in the general fund.

(7) The nonrefundable
fee for replacement of lost or damaged licenses is ten dollars to be paid to
the issuing authority.

(8) Payment shall be by
cash, check, or money order at the option of the applicant. Additional methods
of payment may be allowed at the option of the issuing authority.

(9) A licensee may
renew a license if the licensee applies for renewal within ninety days before
or after the expiration date of the license. A license so renewed shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee renewing after
the expiration date of the license must pay a late renewal penalty of ten
dollars in addition to the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this
section. The fee shall be distributed as follows:

(a) Three dollars shall
be deposited in the state wildlife fund and used exclusively first for the
printing and distribution of a pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of
firearms, firearms safety, and the preemptive nature of state law, and
subsequently the support of volunteer instructors in the basic firearms safety
training program conducted by the department of fish and wildlife. The
pamphlet shall be given to each applicant for a license; and

(b) Seven dollars shall
be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter.

(10) Notwithstanding
the requirements of subsections (1) through (9) of this section, the chief of
police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county of the applicant's
residence may issue a temporary emergency license for good cause pending review
under subsection (1) of this section. However, a temporary emergency license
issued under this subsection shall not exempt the holder of the license from
any records check requirement. Temporary emergency licenses shall be easily
distinguishable from regular licenses.

(11) A political
subdivision of the state shall not modify the requirements of this section or
chapter, nor may a political subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily
submit any information not required by this section.

(12) A person who
knowingly makes a false statement regarding citizenship or identity on an
application for a concealed pistol license is guilty of false swearing under
RCW 9A.72.040. In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, the
concealed pistol license of a person who knowingly makes a false statement
shall be revoked, and the person shall be permanently ineligible for a
concealed pistol license.

(13) A person may apply
for a concealed pistol license:

(a) To the municipality
or to the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant resides in a
municipality;

(b) To the county in
which the applicant resides if the applicant resides in an unincorporated area;
or

(c) Anywhere in the
state if the applicant is a nonresident.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.20.265 and 1998 c
41 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any
other authority to revoke driving privileges under this chapter, the department
shall revoke all driving privileges of a juvenile when the department receives
notice from a court pursuant to RCW 9.41.040(((5))) (6),
13.40.265, 66.44.365, 69.41.065, 69.50.420, 69.52.070, or a substantially
similar municipal ordinance adopted by a local legislative authority, or from a
diversion unit pursuant to RCW 13.40.265. The revocation shall be imposed
without hearing.

(2) The driving
privileges of the juvenile revoked under subsection (1) of this section shall
be revoked in the following manner:

(a) Upon receipt of the
first notice, the department shall impose a revocation for one year, or until
the juvenile reaches seventeen years of age, whichever is longer.

(b) Upon receipt of a
second or subsequent notice, the department shall impose a revocation for two
years or until the juvenile reaches eighteen years of age, whichever is longer.

(c) Each offense for
which the department receives notice shall result in a separate period of
revocation. All periods of revocation imposed under this section that could
otherwise overlap shall run consecutively and no period of revocation imposed
under this section shall begin before the expiration of all other periods of
revocation imposed under this section or other law.

(3) If the department
receives notice from a court that the juvenile's privilege to drive should be
reinstated, the department shall immediately reinstate any driving privileges
that have been revoked under this section if the minimum term of revocation as
specified in RCW 13.40.265(1)(c), 66.44.365(3), 69.41.065(3), 69.50.420(3),
69.52.070(3), or similar ordinance has expired, and subject to subsection
(2)(c) of this section.

(4)(a) If the
department receives notice pursuant to RCW 13.40.265(2)(b) from a diversion
unit that a juvenile has completed a diversion agreement for which the
juvenile's driving privileges were revoked, the department shall reinstate any
driving privileges revoked under this section as provided in (b) of this
subsection, subject to subsection (2)(c) of this section.

(b) If the
diversion agreement was for the juvenile's first violation of chapter 66.44,
69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW, the department shall not reinstate the juvenile's
privilege to drive until the later of ninety days after the date the juvenile
turns sixteen or ninety days after the juvenile entered into a diversion
agreement for the offense. If the diversion agreement was for the juvenile's
second or subsequent violation of chapter 66.44, 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW,
the department shall not reinstate the juvenile's privilege to drive until the
later of the date the juvenile turns seventeen or one year after the juvenile
entered into the second or subsequent diversion agreement.

---
END ---