BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
66.44.100 and 1999 c 189 s 3 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 Except as permitted by this title, no person shall
open the

_7 package containing liquor or consume liquor in a public
place.

_8 Every person who violates any provision of this section
shall be

_9 guilty of a class 3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80
RCW. The

10 legislative body of a county or city is authorized to
enact an

11 ordinance providing for a misdemeanor penalty for
this offense.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 HB
1149