BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 39.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Public bodies may
use a job order contract for public works projects when:

(a) A public body has
made a determination that the use of job order contracts will benefit the
public by providing an effective means of reducing the total lead-time and cost
for public works projects or repair required at public facilities through the use
of unit price books and work orders by eliminating time-consuming, costly
aspects of the traditional public works process, which require separate
contracting actions for each small project;

(b) The work order to
be issued for a particular project does not exceed two hundred thousand
dollars;

(c) Less than twenty
percent of the dollar value of the work order consists of items of work not
contained in the unit price book; and

(d) At least eighty
percent of the job order contract must be subcontracted to entities other than
the job order contractor.

(2) Public bodies shall
award job order contracts through a competitive process utilizing public
requests for proposals. Public bodies shall make an effort to solicit
proposals from a certified minority or certified woman-owned contractor to the
extent permitted by the Washington state civil rights act, RCW 49.60.400. The
public body shall publish, at least once in a legal newspaper of general
circulation published in or as near as possible to that part of the county in
which the public works will be done, a request for proposals for job order
contracts and the availability and location of the request for proposal
documents. The public body shall ensure that the request for proposal
documents at a minimum includes:

(a) A detailed
description of the scope of the job order contract including performance,
technical requirements and specifications, functional and operational elements,
minimum and maximum work order amounts, duration of the contract, and options to
extend the job order contract;

(b) The reasons for
using job order contracts;

(c) A description of
the qualifications required of the proposer;

(d) The identity of the
specific unit price book to be used;

(e) The minimum
contracted amount committed to the selected job order contractor;

(f) A description of
the process the public body will use to evaluate qualifications and proposals,
including evaluation factors and the relative weight of factors. The public
body shall ensure that evaluation factors include, but are not limited to,
proposal price and the ability of the proposer to perform the job order
contract. In evaluating the ability of the proposer to perform the job order
contract, the public body may consider: The ability of the professional
personnel who will work on the job order contract; past performance on similar
contracts; ability to meet time and budget requirements; ability to provide a
performance and payment bond for the job order contract; recent, current, and
projected work loads of the proposer; location; and the concept of the
proposal;

(g) The form of the
contract to be awarded;

(h) The method for
pricing renewals of or extensions to the job order contract;

(i) A notice that the
proposals are subject to the provisions of RCW 39.10.100; and

(j) Other information
relevant to the project.

(3) A public body shall
establish a committee to evaluate the proposals. After the committee has
selected the most qualified finalists, the finalists shall submit final
proposals, including sealed bids based upon the identified unit price book.
Such bids may be in the form of coefficient markups from listed price book
costs. The public body shall award the contract to the firm submitting the
highest scored final proposal using the evaluation factors and the relative
weight of factors published in the public request for proposals.

(4) The public body
shall provide a protest period of at least ten business days following the day
of the announcement of the apparent successful proposal to allow a protester to
file a detailed statement of the grounds of the protest. The public body shall
promptly make a determination on the merits of the protest and provide to all
proposers a written decision of denial or acceptance of the protest. The
public body shall not execute the contract until two business days following
the public body's decision on the protest.

(5) The public body
shall issue no work orders until it has approved, in consultation with the
office of minority and women's business enterprises or the equivalent local
agency, a plan prepared by the job order contractor that equitably spreads
certified women and minority business enterprise subcontracting opportunities,
to the extent permitted by the Washington state civil rights act, RCW 49.60.400,
among the various subcontract disciplines.

(6) Job order contracts
may be executed for an initial contract term of not to exceed two years, with
the option of extending or renewing the job order contract for one year. All
extensions or renewals must be priced as provided in the request for
proposals. The extension or renewal must be mutually agreed to by the public
body and the job order contractor.

(7) The maximum total
dollar amount that may be awarded under a job order contract shall not exceed
three million dollars in the first year of the job order contract, five million
dollars over the first two years of the job order contract, and, if extended or
renewed, eight million dollars over the three years of the job order contract.

(8) For each job order
contract, public bodies shall not issue more than two work orders equal to or
greater than one hundred fifty thousand dollars in a twelve-month contract
performance period.

(9) All work orders
issued for the same project shall be treated as a single work order for
purposes of the one hundred fifty thousand dollar limit on work orders in
subsection (8) of this section and the two hundred thousand dollar limit on
work orders in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

(10) Any new permanent,
enclosed building space constructed under a work order shall not exceed two
thousand gross square feet.

(11) Each public body
may have no more than two job order contracts in effect at any one time.

(12) For purposes of
chapters 39.08, 39.76, and 60.28 RCW, each work order issued shall be treated
as a separate contract.

(13) The requirements
of RCW 39.30.060 do not apply to requests for proposals for job order
contracts.

(14) Job order
contractors shall pay prevailing wages for all work that would otherwise be
subject to the requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW. Prevailing wages for a job
order contract most be determined as of the time of the execution of the job
order contract and any extension or renewal.

(15) If, in the initial
contract term, the public body, at no fault of the job order contractor, fails
to issue the minimum amount of work orders stated in the public request for
proposals, the public body shall pay the contractor an amount equal to the
difference between the minimum work order amount and the actual total of the
work orders issued multiplied by an appropriate percentage for overhead and
profit contained in the general conditions for Washington state facility
construction. This will be the contractor's sole remedy.

(16) All job order
contracts awarded under this section must be executed before July 1, 2007,
however the job order contract may be extended or renewed as provided for in
this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.10.020 and 2000 c
209 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Alternative
public works contracting procedure" means the design-build and the general
contractor/construction manager contracting procedures authorized in RCW
39.10.050 and 39.10.060, respectively.

(2) "Public
body" means the state department of general administration; the University
of Washington; Washington State University; every city with a population
greater than one hundred fifty thousand; every city authorized to use the
design-build procedure for a water system demonstration project under RCW
39.10.065(3); every county with a population greater than four hundred fifty
thousand; every port district with a population greater than five hundred
thousand; and those school districts proposing projects that are considered and
approved by the school district project review board under RCW 39.10.115.

(3) "Public works
project" means any work for a public body within the definition of the
term public work in RCW 39.04.010.

(4) "Job order
contract" means a contract between a public body and a registered or
licensed contractor in which the contractor agrees to a fixed period,
indefinite quantity delivery order contract which provides for the use of
negotiated, definitive work orders for public works as defined in RCW
39.04.010.

(5) "Job order
contractor" means a registered or licensed contractor awarded a job order
contract.

(6) "Unit price
book" means a book containing specific prices, based on generally accepted
industry standards and information, where available, for various items of work
to be performed by the job order contractor. The prices may include: All the
costs of materials; labor; equipment; overhead, including bonding costs; and
profit for performing the items of work.

(7) "Work
order" means an order issued for a definite scope of work to be performed
pursuant to a job order contract.

Sec. 3. RCW 39.08.030 and 1989 c
58 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The bond mentioned in
RCW 39.08.010 shall be in an amount equal to the full contract price agreed to
be paid for such work or improvement, except for job order contracts authorized
in section 1 of this act, and shall be to the state of Washington, except
as otherwise provided in RCW 39.08.100, and except in cases of cities and
towns, in which cases such municipalities may by general ordinance fix and
determine the amount of such bond and to whom such bond shall run: PROVIDED,
The same shall not be for a less amount than twenty-five percent of the
contract price of any such improvement, and may designate that the same shall
be payable to such city, and not to the state of Washington, and all such
persons mentioned in RCW 39.08.010 shall have a right of action in his, her, or
their own name or names on such bond for work done by such laborers or
mechanics, and for materials furnished or provisions and goods supplied and
furnished in the prosecution of such work, or the making of such improvements:
PROVIDED, That such persons shall not have any right of action on such bond for
any sum whatever, unless within thirty days from and after the completion of
the contract with an acceptance of the work by the affirmative action of the
board, council, commission, trustees, officer, or body acting for the state,
county or municipality, or other public body, city, town or district, the
laborer, mechanic or subcontractor, or materialman, or person claiming to have
supplied materials, provisions or goods for the prosecution of such work, or
the making of such improvement, shall present to and file with such board,
council, commission, trustees or body acting for the state, county or municipality,
or other public body, city, town or district, a notice in writing in substance
as follows:

To (here insert the
name of the state, county or municipality or other public body, city, town or
district):

Notice is hereby given
that the undersigned (here insert the name of the laborer, mechanic or
subcontractor, or materialman, or person claiming to have furnished labor,
materials or provisions for or upon such contract or work) has a claim in the
sum of . . . . . . dollars (here insert the amount)
against the bond taken from . . . . . . (here insert
the name of the principal and surety or sureties upon such bond) for the work
of . . . . . . (here insert a brief mention or
description of the work concerning which said bond was taken).

(here
to be signed) .........................

Such notice shall be
signed by the person or corporation making the claim or giving the notice, and
said notice, after being presented and filed, shall be a public record open to
inspection by any person, and in any suit or action brought against such surety
or sureties by any such person or corporation to recover for any of the items
hereinbefore specified, the claimant shall be entitled to recover in addition
to all other costs, attorney's fees in such sum as the court shall adjudge
reasonable: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no attorney's fees shall be allowed in any
suit or action brought or instituted before the expiration of thirty days
following the date of filing of the notice hereinbefore mentioned: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That any city may avail itself of the provisions of RCW 39.08.010
through 39.08.030, notwithstanding any charter provisions in conflict
herewith: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That any city or town may impose any other or
further conditions and obligations in such bond as may be deemed necessary for
its proper protection in the fulfillment of the terms of the contract secured
thereby, and not in conflict herewith. However, the bond for job order
contracts authorized in section 1 of this act must be in an amount not less
than the dollar value of all open work orders.

Sec. 4. RCW 39.30.060 and 1999 c
109 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every invitation to bid
on a contract that is expected to cost one million dollars or more for the
construction, alteration, or repair of any public building or public work of
the state or a state agency or municipality as defined under RCW 39.04.010 or
an institution of higher education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016 shall require
each bidder to submit as part of the bid, or within one hour after the
published bid submittal time, the names of the subcontractors with whom the
bidder, if awarded the contract, will subcontract for performance of the work
of heating, ventilation and air conditioning, plumbing as described in chapter
18.106 RCW, and electrical as described in chapter 19.28 RCW, or to name itself
for the work. The bidder shall not list more than one subcontractor for each
category of work identified, unless subcontractors vary with bid alternates, in
which case the bidder must indicate which subcontractor will be used for which
alternate. Failure of the bidder to submit as part of the bid the names of
such subcontractors or to name itself to perform such work or the naming of two
or more subcontractors to perform the same work shall render the bidder's bid
nonresponsive and, therefore, void. The requirement of this section to name
the bidder's proposed heating, ventilation and air conditioning, plumbing, and
electrical subcontractors applies only to proposed heating, ventilation and air
conditioning, plumbing, and electrical subcontractors who will contract
directly with the general contractor submitting the bid to the public entity.

This section does
not apply to job order contract requests for proposals under section 1 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 39.12 RCW to read as follows:

Job order contracts
under section 1 of this act must pay prevailing wages for all work that would
otherwise be subject to the requirements of this chapter. Prevailing wages for
a job order contract must be determined as of the time the job order contract
and any extension or renewal is executed.

Sec. 6. RCW 60.28.011 and 2000 c
185 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Public improvement
contracts shall provide, and public bodies shall reserve, a contract retainage
not to exceed five percent of the moneys earned by the contractor as a trust
fund for the protection and payment of: (a) The claims of any person arising
under the contract; and (b) the state with respect to taxes imposed pursuant to
Title 82 RCW which may be due from such contractor.

(2) Every person
performing labor or furnishing supplies toward the completion of a public
improvement contract shall have a lien upon moneys reserved by a public body
under the provisions of a public improvement contract. However, the notice of
the lien of the claimant shall be given within forty-five days of completion of
the contract work, and in the manner provided in RCW 39.08.030.

(3) The contractor at
any time may request the contract retainage be reduced to one hundred percent
of the value of the work remaining on the project.

(a) After completion of
all contract work other than landscaping, the contractor may request that the
public body release and pay in full the amounts retained during the performance
of the contract, and sixty days thereafter the public body must release and pay
in full the amounts retained (other than continuing retention of five percent
of the moneys earned for landscaping) subject to the provisions of chapters
39.12 and 60.28 RCW.

(b) Sixty days after
completion of all contract work the public body must release and pay in full
the amounts retained during the performance of the contract subject to the
provisions of chapters 39.12 and 60.28 RCW.

(4) The moneys reserved
by a public body under the provisions of a public improvement contract, at the
option of the contractor, shall be:

(a) Retained in a fund
by the public body;

(b) Deposited by the
public body in an interest bearing account in a bank, mutual savings bank, or
savings and loan association. Interest on moneys reserved by a public body
under the provision of a public improvement contract shall be paid to the
contractor;

(c) Placed in escrow
with a bank or trust company by the public body. When the moneys reserved are
placed in escrow, the public body shall issue a check representing the sum of
the moneys reserved payable to the bank or trust company and the contractor
jointly. This check shall be converted into bonds and securities chosen by the
contractor and approved by the public body and the bonds and securities shall
be held in escrow. Interest on the bonds and securities shall be paid to the
contractor as the interest accrues.

(5) The contractor or
subcontractor may withhold payment of not more than five percent from the
moneys earned by any subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier contracted
with by the contractor to provide labor, materials, or equipment to the public
project. Whenever the contractor or subcontractor reserves funds earned by a
subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier, the contractor or subcontractor
shall pay interest to the subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier at a
rate equal to that received by the contractor or subcontractor from reserved
funds.

(6) A contractor may
submit a bond for all or any portion of the contract retainage in a form
acceptable to the public body and from a bonding company meeting standards
established by the public body. The public body shall accept a bond meeting
these requirements unless the public body can demonstrate good cause for refusing
to accept it. This bond and any proceeds therefrom are subject to all claims
and liens and in the same manner and priority as set forth for retained
percentages in this chapter. The public body shall release the bonded portion
of the retained funds to the contractor within thirty days of accepting the
bond from the contractor. Whenever a public body accepts a bond in lieu of
retained funds from a contractor, the contractor shall accept like bonds from
any subcontractors or suppliers from which the contractor has retained funds.
The contractor shall then release the funds retained from the subcontractor or
supplier to the subcontractor or supplier within thirty days of accepting the
bond from the subcontractor or supplier.

(7) If the public body
administering a contract, after a substantial portion of the work has been
completed, finds that an unreasonable delay will occur in the completion of the
remaining portion of the contract for any reason not the result of a breach
thereof, it may, if the contractor agrees, delete from the contract the
remaining work and accept as final the improvement at the stage of completion
then attained and make payment in proportion to the amount of the work
accomplished and in this case any amounts retained and accumulated under this
section shall be held for a period of sixty days following the completion. In
the event that the work is terminated before final completion as provided in
this section, the public body may thereafter enter into a new contract with the
same contractor to perform the remaining work or improvement for an amount
equal to or less than the cost of the remaining work as was provided for in the
original contract without advertisement or bid. The provisions of this chapter
are exclusive and shall supersede all provisions and regulations in conflict
herewith.

(8) Whenever the
department of transportation has contracted for the construction of two or more
ferry vessels, sixty days after completion of all contract work on each ferry
vessel, the department must release and pay in full the amounts retained in
connection with the construction of the vessel subject to the provisions of RCW
60.28.020 and chapter 39.12 RCW. However, the department of transportation may
at its discretion condition the release of funds retained in connection with
the completed ferry upon the contractor delivering a good and sufficient bond
with two or more sureties, or with a surety company, in the amount of the
retained funds to be released to the contractor, conditioned that no taxes
shall be certified or claims filed for work on the ferry after a period of
sixty days following completion of the ferry; and if taxes are certified or
claims filed, recovery may be had on the bond by the department of revenue and
the materialmen and laborers filing claims.

(9) Except as provided
in subsection (1) of this section, reservation by a public body for any purpose
from the moneys earned by a contractor by fulfilling its responsibilities under
public improvement contracts is prohibited.

(10) Contracts on
projects funded in whole or in part by farmers home administration and subject
to farmers home administration regulations are not subject to subsections (1)
through (9) of this section.

(11) This subsection
applies only to a public body that has contracted for the construction of a
facility using the general contractor/construction manager procedure, as
defined under RCW 39.10.060. If the work performed by a subcontractor on the
project has been completed within the first half of the time provided in the
general contractor/construction manager contract for completing the work, the
public body may accept the completion of the subcontract. The public body must
give public notice of this acceptance. After a forty-five day period for giving
notice of liens, and compliance with the retainage release procedures in RCW
60.28.021, the public body may release that portion of the retained funds
associated with the subcontract. Claims against the retained funds after the
forty-five day period are not valid.

(12) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this section.

(a) "Contract
retainage" means an amount reserved by a public body from the moneys
earned by a person under a public improvement contract.

(b) "Person"
means a person or persons, mechanic, subcontractor, or materialperson who
performs labor or provides materials for a public improvement contract, and any
other person who supplies the person with provisions or supplies for the carrying
on of a public improvement contract.

(c) "Public
body" means the state, or a county, city, town, district, board, or other
public body.

(d) "Public
improvement contract" means a contract for public improvements or work,
other than for professional services, or a work order as defined in RCW
39.10.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 39.10 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective July 1, 2007:

RCW 39.10.-- and 2001 c . . . s 1
(section 1 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 39.12 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective July 1, 2007:

RCW 39.12.-- and 2001 c . . . s 5
(section 5 of this act).

---
END ---