BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
39.04.155 and 2000 c 138 s 101 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 (1) This section provides uniform small works roster
provisions

_7 to award contracts for construction, building,
renovation,

_8 remodeling, alteration, repair, or improvement of real
property

_9 that may be used by state agencies and by any local
government

10 that is expressly authorized to use these provisions.
These

11 provisions may be used in lieu of other procedures to
award

12 contracts for such work with an estimated cost of two
hundred

13 thousand dollars or less. The small works roster
process includes

14 the limited public works process authorized under
subsection (3)

15 of this section and any local government authorized to
award

16 contracts using the small works roster process under
this section

17 may award contracts using the limited public works
process under

18 subsection (3) of this section.

p. 1 HB
1154

_1 (2)(a) A state agency or authorized local
government may create

_2 a single general small works roster, or may create a
small works

_3 roster for different specialties or categories of
anticipated

_4 work. Where applicable, small works rosters may make
distinctions

_5 between contractors based upon different geographic
areas served

_6 by the contractor. The small works roster or rosters
shall consist

_7 of all responsible contractors who have requested to be
on the

_8 list, and where required by law are properly licensed or

_9 registered to perform such work in this state. A state
agency or

10 local government establishing a small works roster or
rosters may

11 require eligible contractors desiring to be placed on a
roster or

12 rosters to keep current records of any applicable
licenses,

13 certifications, registrations, bonding, insurance, or
other

14 appropriate matters on file with the state agency or
local

15 government as a condition of being placed on a roster or
rosters.

16 At least once a year, the state agency or local
government shall

17 publish in a newspaper of general circulation within the

18 jurisdiction a notice of the existence of the roster or
rosters

19 and solicit the names of contractors for such roster or
rosters.

20 In addition, responsible contractors shall be added to an

21 appropriate roster or rosters at any time they submit a
written

22 request and necessary records. Master contracts may be
required to

23 be signed that become effective when a specific award is
made

24 using a small works roster.

25 (((3))) (b) A state agency
establishing a small works roster or

26 rosters shall adopt rules implementing this ((section))

27 subsection. A local government establishing a
small works roster or

28 rosters shall adopt an ordinance or resolution
implementing this

29 ((section)) subsection. Procedures
included in rules adopted by the

30 department of general administration in implementing
this

31 ((section)) subsection must be included in
any rules providing for

32 a small works roster or rosters that is adopted by
another state

33 agency, if the authority for that state agency to engage
in these

34 activities has been delegated to it by the department of
general

35 administration under chapter 43.19 RCW. An interlocal
contract or

36 agreement between two or more state agencies or local
governments

37 establishing a small works roster or rosters to be used
by the

HB 1154 p. 2

_1 parties to the agreement or contract must clearly
identify the

_2 lead entity that is responsible for implementing the
provisions of

_3 this ((section)) subsection.

_4 (((4))) (c) Procedures shall be
established for securing

_5 telephone, written, or electronic quotations from
contractors on

_6 the appropriate small works roster to assure that a
competitive

_7 price is established and to award contracts to the
lowest

_8 responsible bidder, as defined in RCW 43.19.1911.
Invitations for

_9 quotations shall include an estimate of the scope and
nature of

10 the work to be performed as well as materials and
equipment to be

11 furnished. However, detailed plans and specifications
need not be

12 included in the invitation. This ((section)) subsection
does not

13 eliminate other requirements for architectural or
engineering

14 approvals as to quality and compliance with building

15 codes. Quotations may be invited from all appropriate
contractors

16 on the appropriate small works roster. As an
alternative,

17 quotations may be invited from at least five contractors
on the

18 appropriate small works roster who have indicated the
capability

19 of performing the kind of work being contracted, in a
manner that

20 will equitably distribute the opportunity among the
contractors on

21 the appropriate roster. However, if the estimated cost
of the work

22 is from one hundred thousand dollars to two hundred
thousand

23 dollars, a state agency or local government, other than
a port

24 district, that chooses to solicit bids from less than
all the

25 appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works
roster must

26 also notify the remaining contractors on the appropriate
small

27 works roster that quotations on the work are being
sought. The

28 government has the sole option of determining whether
this notice

29 to the remaining contractors is made by: (((a)))
(i) Publishing

30 notice in a legal newspaper in general circulation in
the area

31 where the work is to be done; (((b))) (ii)
mailing a notice to

32 these contractors; or (((c))) (iii) sending
a notice to these

33 contractors by facsimile or other electronic means. For
purposes of

34 this subsection (2)(c), "equitably
distribute" means that a state

35 agency or local government soliciting bids may not favor
certain

36 contractors on the appropriate small works roster over
other

37 contractors on the appropriate small works roster who
perform

38 similar services.

p. 3 HB
1154

_1 (((5))) (d) A contract awarded from a
small works roster under

_2 this section need not be advertised.

_3 (((6))) (e) Immediately after an award
is made, the bid

_4 quotations obtained shall be recorded, open to public
inspection,

_5 and available by telephone inquiry.

_6 (((7))) (3) In lieu of awarding contracts
under subsection (2)

_7 of this section, a state agency or authorized local
government may

_8 award a contract for work, construction, alteration,
repair, or

_9 improvement project estimated to cost less than
thirty-five

10 thousand dollars using the limited public works
process provided

11 under this subsection. Public works projects awarded
under this

12 subsection are exempt from the other requirements of
the small

13 works roster process provided under subsection (2) of
this section

14 and are exempt from the requirement that contracts be
awarded

15 after advertisement as provided under RCW 39.04.010.

16 For limited public works projects, a state agency
or authorized

17 local government shall solicit electronic or written
quotations

18 from a minimum of three contractors including a certified
minority

19 or certified woman-owned contractor, when practicable
and to the

20 extent permitted by the Washington state civil rights
act, RCW

21 49.60.400, and shall award the contract to the lowest
responsible

22 bidder as defined under RCW 43.19.1911, even if only
one quotation

23 is received, or reject all quotations. After an
award is made, the

24 quotations shall be open to public inspection and
available by

25 electronic request. A state agency or authorized
local government

26 shall attempt to distribute opportunities for limited
public works

27 projects equitably among contractors willing to
perform in the

28 geographic area of the work. A state agency or
authorized local

29 government shall maintain a list each biennium of the
contracts

30 awarded under the limited public works process,
including the name

31 of the contractor, the amount of the contract, a
brief description

32 of the type of work performed, and the date the
contract was

33 awarded. For limited public works projects, a state
agency or

34 authorized local government may waive the payment and
performance

35 bond requirements of chapter 39.08 RCW and the
retainage

36 requirements of chapter 60.28 RCW, thereby assuming
the liability

37 for the contractor's nonpayment of laborers,
mechanics,

38 subcontractors, materialmen, suppliers, and taxes
imposed under

HB 1154 p. 4

_1 Title 82 RCW that may be due from the contractor for
the limited

_2 public works project, however the state agency or
authorized local

_3 government shall have the right of recovery against
the contractor

_4 for any payments made on the contractor's behalf.

_5 (4) The breaking of any project into units or
accomplishing any

_6 projects by phases is prohibited if it is done for the
purpose of

_7 avoiding the maximum dollar amount of a contract that
may be let

_8 using the small works roster process or limited
public works

_9 process.

10 (((8))) (5) As used in this section,
"state agency" means the

11 department of general administration, the state parks
and

12 recreation commission, the department of natural
resources, the

13 department of fish and wildlife, the department of
transportation,

14 any institution of higher education as defined under RCW

15 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated
authority by the

16 department of general administration to engage in
construction,

17 building, renovation, remodeling, alteration,
improvement, or

18 repair activities.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 HB
1154