BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
36.57A.110 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 270 s 21 are each

_5 amended to read as follows:

_6 (1) The public transportation benefit area
shall have and

_7 exercise all rights with respect to the construction,
acquisition,

_8 maintenance, operation, extension, alteration, repair,
control and

_9 management of passenger transportation which any
component city

10 shall have been previously empowered to exercise and
such powers

11 shall not thereafter be exercised by such component
cities without

12 the consent of the public transportation benefit area((:
PROVIDED,

13 That)), except as provided in subsection (2)
of this section and

14 RCW 36.57A.130. Any city owning and operating a
public

15 transportation system on July 1, 1975, may
continue to operate

16 such system within such city until such system shall
have been

17 acquired by the public transportation benefit area and a
public

p. 1 HB
1156

_1 transportation benefit area may not acquire such system
without

_2 the consent of the city council of such city.

_3 (2) In any county where a public transportation
benefit area

_4 and a city both operate a public transportation
system, beginning

_5 January 1, 2002, the city shall pay the public
transportation

_6 benefit area for the service rendered to its citizens
in an amount

_7 as provided for in RCW 36.57A.130, or, in the
alternative, shall

_8 elect to request the county to submit a ballot
proposition to the

_9 voters of the public transportation benefit area and
the city on

10 the question of whether the public transportation
benefit area

11 shall acquire the public transportation system owned
by the

12 city. The ballot proposition shall state that
approval also

13 constitutes an agreement that the city is subject to
all taxes and

14 other liabilities and obligations of the public
transportation

15 benefit area. This vote shall take place before
September 1,

16 2002. If by February 1, 2002, the city has elected
not to pay the

17 public transportation benefit area for the services
rendered to

18 its citizens and has failed to request the county to
submit a

19 ballot proposition under this subsection, the county
shall place

20 the ballot proposition on the ballot no later than
September 1,

21 2002. A simple majority authorizes acquisition.
Upon a favorable

22 vote, the city is included within the boundaries of
the

23 transportation benefit area and is subject to all
taxes and other

24 liabilities and obligations of the public
transportation benefit

25 area. Public transportation facilities and
properties that are

26 owned by the city become the property of the public
transportation

27 benefit area. If the vote to acquire the public
transportation

28 system owned by the city fails, RCW 36.57A.130
governs the

29 obligation of the city to pay the public
transportation benefit

30 area for the services rendered its citizens. This
obligation

31 commences January 1, 2003, and continues until the
public

32 transportation benefit area acquires the city's
public

33 transportation system following an election under
this subsection.

34 Sec. 2. RCW
36.57A.130 and 1983 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read

35 as follows:

36 The treasurer of the county in which a public
transportation

37 benefit area authority is located shall be ex officio
treasurer of

HB 1156 p. 2

_1 the authority. In the case of a multicounty public
transportation

_2 benefit area the county treasurer of the largest
component county,

_3 by population, shall be the treasurer of the authority.
However,

_4 the authority, by resolution, and upon the approval of
the county

_5 treasurer, may designate some other person having
experience in

_6 financial or fiscal matters as treasurer of the
authority. Such a

_7 treasurer shall possess all of the powers, responsibilities,
and

_8 duties the county treasurer possesses for a public
transportation

_9 benefit area authority related to investing surplus
authority

10 funds. The authority may (and if the treasurer is not a
county

11 treasurer, it shall) require a bond with a surety
company

12 authorized to do business in the state of Washington in
an amount

13 and under the terms and conditions the authority, by
resolution,

14 from time to time finds will protect the authority
against loss.

15 The premium on any such bond shall be paid by the
authority.

16 All authority funds shall be paid to the treasurer
and shall be

17 disbursed by the treasurer only on warrants issued by
the county

18 auditor, upon orders or vouchers approved by the
authority.

19 However, the authority may, by resolution, designate
some person

20 having experience in financial or fiscal matters, other
than the

21 county auditor, as the auditor of the authority. Such
an auditor

22 shall possess all of the powers, responsibilities, and
duties that

23 the county auditor possesses for a public transportation
benefit

24 area authority related to creating and maintaining
funds, issuing

25 warrants, and maintaining a record of receipts and
disbursements.

26 The treasurer shall establish a "transportation
fund," into

27 which shall be paid all authority funds, and the
treasurer shall

28 maintain such special accounts as may be created by the
authority

29 into which shall be placed all money as the authority
may, by

30 resolution, direct.

31 If the treasurer of the authority is a treasurer of
the county,

32 all authority funds shall be deposited with the county
depositary

33 under the same restrictions, contracts, and security as
provided

34 for county depositaries. If the treasurer of the authority
is some

35 other person, all funds shall be deposited in such bank
or banks

36 authorized to do business in this state that have
qualified for

37 insured deposits under any federal deposit insurance act
as the

38 authority, by resolution, shall designate.

p. 3 HB
1156

_1 An authority may provide and require a reasonable
bond of any

_2 other person handling moneys or securities of the
authority, but

_3 the authority shall pay the premium on the bond.

_4 The county or counties and each city or town which
is included

_5 in the authority shall contribute such sums towards the
expense

_6 for maintaining and operating the public transportation
system as

_7 shall be agreed upon between them. Commencing with
the dates set

_8 forth in RCW 36.57A.110(2), any city operating a
public

_9 transportation system within a county where a public

10 transportation benefit area operates a public
transportation

11 system shall annually pay the public transportation
benefit area:

12 (1) The average subsidy per passenger of the
public

13 transportation area as determined by the most recent
national

14 transportation data base figures, for which purpose
subsidy means

15 the total operating expenses for all modes minus fare
revenue for

16 all modes divided by total unlinked trips for all
modes,

17 multiplied by the number of unlinked passenger trips
made by that

18 city's residents on the public transportation benefit
area system

19 as determined by the most recent on-board rider
surveys performed

20 biennially by an independent consultant, the cost of
that survey

21 to be borne equally by the public transportation
benefit area and

22 the city; and

23 (2) The depreciation expenses of the public
transit benefit

24 area, divided by the combined population of the
public

25 transportation benefit area and the city, multiplied
by the

26 population of the city.

27 The county legislative authority shall arbitrate
disputes under

28 subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1156 p. 4