BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that absent changes

_7 to the nursing home case mix reimbursement system for
direct care

_8 costs, unintended consequences of the system scheduled
to be

_9 implemented in the 2001-2003 biennium could negatively
impact the

10 quality of care required by nursing home residents. In
order to

11 assure that unanticipated rate reductions resulting in lowered

12 staffing levels do not occur, the legislature finds that
a delay

13 in further implementation is warranted while the
legislature

14 examines these issues and makes necessary corrections to
the

15 system.

16 Sec. 2. RCW
74.46.431 and 1999 c 353 s 4 are each amended to read

17 as follows:

p. 1 HB
1159

_1 (1) Effective July 1, 1999, nursing facility
medicaid payment

_2 rate allocations shall be facility-specific and shall
have seven

_3 components: Direct care, therapy care, support
services,

_4 operations, property, financing allowance, and variable
return.

_5 The department shall establish and adjust each of these

_6 components, as provided in this section and elsewhere in
this

_7 chapter, for each medicaid nursing facility in this
state.

_8 (2) All component rate allocations shall be based
upon a

_9 minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of
licensed

10 beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use.

11 (3) Information and data sources used in determining
medicaid

12 payment rate allocations, including formulas,
procedures, cost

13 report periods, resident assessment instrument formats,
resident

14 assessment methodologies, and resident classification
and case mix

15 weighting methodologies, may be substituted or altered
from time

16 to time as determined by the department.

17 (4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall
be

18 established using adjusted cost report data covering at
least six

19 months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 will be
used for

20 October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, direct care
component rate

21 allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 will be
used for

22 July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2004, direct care component
rate

23 allocations.

24 (b) Direct care component rate allocations based on
1996 cost

25 report data shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and

26 conditions by a factor or factors defined in the
biennial

27 appropriations act. A different economic trends and
conditions

28 adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the
biennial

29 appropriations act for facilities whose direct care
component rate

30 is set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as
provided in

31 RCW 74.46.506(5)(k).

32 (c) Direct care component rate allocations based on
1999 cost

33 report data shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and

34 conditions by a factor or factors defined in the
biennial

35 appropriations act. A different economic trends and
conditions

36 adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the
biennial

37 appropriations act for facilities whose direct care
component rate

HB 1159 p. 2

_1 is set equal to their adjusted June 30, ((1998)) 2000,
rate, as

_2 provided in RCW 74.46.506(5)(k).

_3 (5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall
be

_4 established using adjusted cost report data covering at
least six

_5 months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 will be
used for

_6 October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, therapy care
component

_7 rate allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999
will be used

_8 for July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2004, therapy care
component

_9 rate allocations.

10 (b) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be
adjusted

11 annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor
or factors

12 defined in the biennial appropriations act.

13 (6)(a) Support services component rate allocations
shall be

14 established using adjusted cost report data covering at
least six

15 months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be
used for

16 October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services
component

17 rate allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999
shall be

18 used for July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2004, support
services

19 component rate allocations.

20 (b) Support services component rate allocations
shall be

21 adjusted annually for economic trends and conditions by
a factor

22 or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

23 (7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall
be

24 established using adjusted cost report data covering at
least six

25 months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be
used for

26 October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, operations
component rate

27 allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall
be used for

28 July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2004, operations
component rate

29 allocations.

30 (b) Operations component rate allocations shall be
adjusted

31 annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor
or factors

32 defined in the biennial appropriations act.

33 (8) For July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, a
facility's

34 property and return on investment component rates shall
be the

35 facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on
investment

36 component rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998,
through

37 June 30, 1999, a facility's property and return on
investment

p. 3 HB
1159

_1 component rates shall be rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted
cost

_2 report data covering at least six months of data.

_3 (9) Total payment rates under the nursing facility
medicaid

_4 payment system shall not exceed facility rates charged
to the

_5 general public for comparable services.

_6 (10) Medicaid contractors shall pay to all facility
staff a

_7 minimum wage of the greater of five dollars and fifteen
cents per

_8 hour or the federal minimum wage.

_9 (11) The department shall establish in rule
procedures,

10 principles, and conditions for determining component
rate

11 allocations for facilities in circumstances not directly
addressed

12 by this chapter, including but not limited to: The need
to prorate

13 inflation for partial-period cost report data, newly
constructed

14 facilities, existing facilities entering the medicaid
program for

15 the first time or after a period of absence from the
program,

16 existing facilities with expanded new bed capacity,
existing

17 medicaid facilities following a change of ownership of
the nursing

18 facility business, facilities banking beds or converting
beds back

19 into service, facilities having less than six months of
either

20 resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current

21 contractor prior to rate setting, and other
circumstances.

22 (12) The department shall establish in rule
procedures,

23 principles, and conditions, including necessary
threshold costs,

24 for adjusting rates to reflect capital improvements or
new

25 requirements imposed by the department or the federal
government.

26 Any such rate adjustments are subject to the provisions
of RCW

27 74.46.421.

28 Sec. 3. RCW
74.46.506 and 1999 c 353 s 5 and 1999 c 181 s 1 are

29 each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

30 (1) The direct care component rate allocation corresponds
to

31 the provision of nursing care for one resident of a
nursing

32 facility for one day, including direct care supplies.
Therapy

33 services and supplies, which correspond to the therapy
care

34 component rate, shall be excluded. The direct care
component rate

35 includes elements of case mix determined consistent with
the

36 principles of this section and other applicable
provisions of this

37 chapter.

HB 1159 p. 4

_1 (2) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall
determine

_2 and update quarterly for each nursing facility serving
medicaid

_3 residents a facility-specific per-resident day direct
care

_4 component rate allocation, to be effective on the first
day of

_5 each calendar quarter. In determining direct care
component rates

_6 the department shall utilize, as specified in this
section,

_7 minimum data set resident assessment data for each
resident of the

_8 facility, as transmitted to, and if necessary corrected
by, the

_9 department in the resident assessment instrument format
approved

10 by federal authorities for use in this state.

11 (3) The department may question the accuracy of
assessment data

12 for any resident and utilize corrected or substitute
information,

13 however derived, in determining direct care component
rates. The

14 department is authorized to impose civil fines and to
take adverse

15 rate actions against a contractor, as specified by the
department

16 in rule, in order to obtain compliance with resident
assessment

17 and data transmission requirements and to ensure
accuracy.

18 (4) Cost report data used in setting direct care
component rate

19 allocations shall be 1996 and 1999, for rate periods as
specified

20 in RCW 74.46.431(4)(a).

21 (5) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall
rebase each

22 nursing facility's direct care component rate allocation
as

23 described in RCW 74.46.431, adjust its direct care
component rate

24 allocation for economic trends and conditions as
described in RCW

25 74.46.431, and update its medicaid average case mix
index,

26 consistent with the following:

27 (a) Reduce total direct care costs reported by each
nursing

28 facility for the applicable cost report period specified
in RCW

29 74.46.431(4)(a) to reflect any department adjustments,
and to

30 eliminate reported resident therapy costs and
adjustments, in

31 order to derive the facility's total allowable direct
care cost;

32 (b) Divide each facility's total allowable direct
care cost by

33 its adjusted resident days for the same report period,
increased

34 if necessary to a minimum occupancy of eighty-five
percent; that

35 is, the greater of actual or imputed occupancy at
eighty-five

36 percent of licensed beds, to derive the facility's
allowable

37 direct care cost per resident day;

p. 5 HB
1159

_1 (c) Adjust the facility's per resident day direct
care cost by

_2 the applicable factor specified in RCW 74.46.431(4) (b)
and (c) to

_3 derive its adjusted allowable direct care cost per
resident day;

_4 (d) Divide each facility's adjusted allowable direct
care cost

_5 per resident day by the facility average case mix index
for the

_6 applicable quarters specified by RCW 74.46.501(7)(b) to
derive the

_7 facility's allowable direct care cost per case mix unit;

_8 (e) Divide nursing facilities into two peer groups:
Those

_9 located in metropolitan statistical areas as determined
and

10 defined by the United States office of management and budget
or

11 other appropriate agency or office of the federal
government, and

12 those not located in a metropolitan statistical area;

13 (f) Array separately the allowable direct care cost
per case

14 mix unit for all metropolitan statistical area and for
all

15 nonmetropolitan statistical area facilities, and
determine the

16 median allowable direct care cost per case mix unit for
each peer

17 group;

18 (g) Except as provided in (k) of this subsection,
from October

19 1, 1998, through June 30, 2000, determine each
facility's

20 quarterly direct care component rate as follows:

21 (i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix
unit is less

22 than eighty-five percent of the facility's peer group
median

23 established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost

24 per case mix unit equal to eighty-five percent of the
facility's

25 peer group median, and shall have a direct care
component rate

26 allocation equal to the facility's assigned cost per
case mix unit

27 multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from

28 the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

29 (ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix
unit is

30 greater than one hundred fifteen percent of the peer
group median

31 established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost

32 per case mix unit equal to one hundred fifteen percent
of the peer

33 group median, and shall have a direct care component
rate

34 allocation equal to the facility's assigned cost per case
mix unit

35 multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from

36 the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

37 (iii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix
unit is

38 between eighty-five and one hundred fifteen percent of
the peer

HB 1159 p. 6

_1 group median established under (f) of this subsection
shall have a

_2 direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's

_3 allowable cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's

_4 medicaid average case mix index from the applicable
quarter

_5 specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

_6 (h) Except as provided in (k) of this subsection,
from July 1,

_7 2000, through June 30, ((2002)) 2003,
determine each facility's

_8 quarterly direct care component rate as follows:

_9 (i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix
unit is less

10 than ninety percent of the facility's peer group median

11 established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost

12 per case mix unit equal to ninety percent of the
facility's peer

13 group median, and shall have a direct care component
rate

14 allocation equal to the facility's assigned cost per
case mix unit

15 multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from

16 the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

17 (ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix
unit is

18 greater than one hundred ten percent of the peer group
median

19 established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost

20 per case mix unit equal to one hundred ten percent of
the peer

21 group median, and shall have a direct care component
rate

22 allocation equal to the facility's assigned cost per
case mix unit

23 multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from

24 the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

25 (iii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix
unit is

26 between ninety and one hundred ten percent of the peer
group

27 median established under (f) of this subsection shall have
a

28 direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's

29 allowable cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's

30 medicaid average case mix index from the applicable
quarter

31 specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

32 (i) From July 1, ((2002)) 2003,
through June 30, 2004,

33 determine each facility's quarterly direct care
component rate as

34 follows:

35 (i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix
unit is less

36 than ninety-five percent of the facility's peer group
median

37 established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost

38 per case mix unit equal to ninety-five percent of the
facility's

p. 7 HB
1159

_1 peer group median, and shall have a direct care
component rate

_2 allocation equal to the facility's assigned cost per
case mix unit

_3 multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from

_4 the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

_5 (ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix
unit is

_6 greater than one hundred five percent of the peer group
median

_7 established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost

_8 per case mix unit equal to one hundred five percent of
the peer

_9 group median, and shall have a direct care component
rate

10 allocation equal to the facility's assigned cost per
case mix unit

11 multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from

12 the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

13 (iii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix
unit is

14 between ninety-five and one hundred five percent of the
peer group

15 median established under (f) of this subsection shall
have a

16 direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's

17 allowable cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's

18 medicaid average case mix index from the applicable
quarter

19 specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

20 (j) Beginning July 1, 2004, determine each
facility's quarterly

21 direct care component rate by multiplying the facility's
peer

22 group median allowable direct care cost per case mix
unit by that

23 facility's medicaid average case mix index from the
applicable

24 quarter as specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c).

25 (k)(i) Between October 1, 1998, and June 30, 2000,
the

26 department shall compare each facility's direct care
component

27 rate allocation calculated under (g) of this subsection
with the

28 facility's nursing services component rate in effect on
September

29 30, 1998, less therapy costs, plus any exceptional care
offsets as

30 reported on the cost report, adjusted for economic
trends and

31 conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431. A facility
shall receive

32 the higher of the two rates;

33 (ii) Between July 1, 2000, and June 30, ((2002))
2003, the

34 department shall compare each facility's direct care
component

35 rate allocation calculated under (h) of this subsection
with the

36 facility's direct care component rate in effect on June
30, 2000,

37 adjusted for economic trends and conditions as provided
in RCW

38 74.46.431. A facility shall receive the higher
of the two rates.

HB 1159 p. 8

_1 (6) The direct care component rate allocations
calculated in

_2 accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the
extent

_3 necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

_4 (7) Payments resulting from increases in direct care
component

_5 rates, granted under authority of RCW 74.46.508(1) for a

_6 facility's exceptional care residents, shall be offset
against the

_7 facility's examined, allowable direct care costs, for
each report

_8 year or partial period such increases are paid. Such
reductions in

_9 allowable direct care costs shall be for rate setting,
settlement,

10 and other purposes deemed appropriate by the department.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is
added to chapter 74.46

12 RCW to read as follows:

13 (1) The joint legislative task force on the direct
care

14 component of the nursing home reimbursement system is
hereby

15 created. Membership of the task force must consist of
eight

16 legislators. Four members of the senate including two
members from

17 the majority party and two members from the minority
party will be

18 appointed by the president of the senate. Four
legislative members

19 from the house of representatives including two members
from each

20 party will be appointed by the co-speakers of the house
of

21 representatives. Each body shall select representatives
from the

22 committees with jurisdiction over health and long-term
care and

23 fiscal matters. The task force may invite the
participation of

24 stakeholder groups.

25 (2) The task force is charged with reviewing the
extent to

26 which the direct care reimbursement rates relate to the
level of

27 acuity and needs of the patients served, encourage
nursing home

28 providers to staff appropriately to those demonstrated
needs, and

29 allow providers to both recruit and retain staff
necessary to

30 providing high quality patient care in a cost-effective
manner.

31 (3) The task force shall complete its review and
submit its

32 recommendations in the form of a report to the
legislature by

33 December 1, 2001.

34 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary
for the immediate

35 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

p. 9 HB
1159

_1 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

_2 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1159 p. 10