BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that promoting a

_7 financially viable health care system in all parts of
the state is

_8 a paramount interest. The health care financing
administration has

_9 recognized the crucial role that hospitals play in
providing care

10 in rural areas by creating the critical access hospital
program to

11 allow small, rural hospitals that qualify to receive
reasonable

12 cost-based reimbursement for medicare services. The
legislature

13 further finds that creating a similar reimbursement
system for the

14 state's medical assistance programs in small, rural
hospitals that

15 qualify will help assure the long-term financial
viability of the

16 rural health system in those communities.

17

p. 1 HB
1162

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 74.09

_2 RCW to read as follows:

_3 Payments for recipients eligible for medical
assistance

_4 programs under this chapter for services provided by
hospitals,

_5 regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment
status,

_6 shall be made based on allowable costs incurred during
the year,

_7 when services are provided by a rural hospital certified
by the

_8 health care financing administration as a critical
access

_9 hospital. Any additional payments made by the medical
assistance

10 administration for the healthy options program shall be
no more

11 than the additional amounts per service paid under this
section

12 for other medical assistance programs.

13 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 74.09

14 RCW to read as follows:

15 The department shall implement the program created
in section 2

16 of this act within sixty days of the effective date of
this act

17 regardless of the beneficiary's managed care status.

18 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If specific funding
for the purposes of

19 this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter
number, is not

20 provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this

21 act is null and void.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1162 p. 2