BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
70.93.060 and 2000 c 154 s 2 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) It is a violation of this section to abandon a
junk vehicle

_7 upon any property ((located in an unincorporated area
of a

_8 county)). In addition, no person shall throw,
drop, deposit,

_9 discard, or otherwise dispose of litter upon any public
property

10 in the state or upon private property in this state not
owned by

11 him or her or in the waters of this state whether from a
vehicle

12 or otherwise including but not limited to any public
highway,

13 public park, beach, campground, forest land,
recreational area,

14 trailer park, highway, road, street, or alley except:

15 (a) When the property is designated by the state or
its

16 agencies or political subdivisions for the disposal of
garbage and

17 refuse, and the person is authorized to use such
property for that

18 purpose;

p. 1 SHB
1163

_1 (b) Into a litter receptacle in a manner that will
prevent

_2 litter from being carried away or deposited by the
elements upon

_3 any part of ((said)) the private or public
property or waters.

_4 (2)(a) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, it

_5 is a class 3 civil infraction as provided in RCW
7.80.120 for a

_6 person to litter in an amount less than or equal to one
cubic

_7 foot.

_8 (b) ((It is a class 1 civil infraction as provided
in RCW

_9 7.80.120 for a person to litter in an amount greater
than one

10 cubic foot in an incorporated area of a county.
Unless suspended or

11 modified by a court, the person shall also pay a
litter cleanup

12 fee of twenty-five dollars per cubic foot of litter.
The court may,

13 in addition to or in lieu of part or all of the
cleanup fee, order

14 the person to pick up and remove litter from the
property, with

15 prior permission of the legal owner or, in the case
of public

16 property, of the agency managing the property.

17 (c))) It is a misdemeanor for a person to
litter in an amount

18 greater than one cubic foot but less than one cubic yard
((in an

19 unincorporated area of a county)). The person
shall also pay a

20 litter cleanup restitution payment equal to twice the
actual cost

21 of cleanup, or fifty dollars per cubic foot of litter,
whichever

22 is greater. The court shall distribute one-half of the
restitution

23 payment to the landowner and one-half of the restitution
payment

24 to the law enforcement agency investigating the
incident. The court

25 may, in addition to or in lieu of part or all of the
cleanup

26 restitution payment, order the person to pick up and
remove litter

27 from the property, with prior permission of the legal
owner or, in

28 the case of public property, of the agency managing the

29 property. The court may suspend or modify the litter
cleanup

30 restitution payment for a first-time offender under this
section,

31 if the person cleans up and properly disposes of the
litter.

32 (((d))) (c) It is a gross misdemeanor
for a person to litter in

33 an amount of one cubic yard or more ((in an
unincorporated area of

34 a county)). The person shall also pay a litter
cleanup restitution

35 payment equal to twice the actual cost of cleanup, or
one hundred

36 dollars per cubic foot of litter, whichever is greater.
The court

37 shall distribute one-half of the restitution payment to
the

38 landowner and one-half of the restitution payment to the
law

SHB 1163 p. 2

_1 enforcement agency investigating the incident. The
court may, in

_2 addition to or in lieu of part or all of the cleanup
restitution

_3 payment, order the person to pick up and remove litter
from the

_4 property, with prior permission of the legal owner or,
in the case

_5 of public property, of the agency managing the
property. The court

_6 may suspend or modify the litter cleanup restitution
payment for a

_7 first-time offender under this section, if the person
cleans up

_8 and properly disposes of the litter.

_9 (((e))) (d) If a junk vehicle is
abandoned in violation of this

10 section, RCW 46.55.230 governs the vehicle's removal,
disposal,

11 and sale, and the penalties that may be imposed against
the person

12 who abandoned the vehicle.

13 (3) If the violation occurs in a state park, the
court shall,

14 in addition to any other penalties assessed, order the
person to

15 perform twenty-four hours of community service in the
state park

16 where the violation occurred if the state park has
stated an

17 intent to participate as provided in RCW 79A.05.050.

18 (4) It is a class 1 civil infraction as provided in
RCW

19 7.80.120 for a person to discard, in violation of this
section, a

20 cigarette, cigar, or other tobacco product that is
capable of

21 starting a fire.

22 Sec. 2. RCW
70.95.240 and 2000 c 154 s 3 are each amended to read

23 as follows:

24 (1) After the adoption of regulations or ordinances
by any

25 county, city, or jurisdictional board of health
providing for the

26 issuance of permits as provided in RCW 70.95.160, it
shall be

27 unlawful for any person to dump or deposit or permit the
dumping

28 or depositing of any solid waste onto or under the
surface of the

29 ground or into the waters of this state except at a
solid waste

30 disposal site for which there is a valid permit. This
section does

31 not:

32 (a) Prohibit a person from dumping or depositing
solid waste

33 resulting from his or her own activities onto or under
the surface

34 of ground owned or leased by him or her when such action
does not

35 violate statutes or ordinances, or create a nuisance;

36 (b) Apply to a person using a waste-derived soil
amendment that

37 has been approved by the department under RCW 70.95.205;
or

p. 3 SHB
1163

_1 (c) Apply to the application of commercial
fertilizer that has

_2 been registered with the department of agriculture as
provided in

_3 RCW 15.54.325, and that is applied in accordance with the

_4 standards established in RCW 15.54.800(3).

_5 (2)(a) It is a class 3 civil infraction as defined
in RCW

_6 7.80.120 for a person to litter in an amount less than
or equal to

_7 one cubic foot.

_8 (b) ((It is a class 1 civil infraction as defined
in RCW

_9 7.80.120 for a person to litter in an amount greater
than one

10 cubic foot in an unincorporated area of a county.
Unless suspended

11 or modified by a court, the person shall also pay a
litter cleanup

12 fee of twenty-five dollars per cubic foot of litter.
The court may,

13 in addition to or in lieu of part or all of the
cleanup fee, order

14 the person to pick up and remove litter from the
property, with

15 prior permission of the legal owner or, in the case
of public

16 property, of the agency managing the property.

17 (c))) It is a misdemeanor for a person to
litter in an amount

18 greater than one cubic foot but less than one cubic yard
((in an

19 unincorporated area of a county)). The person
shall also pay a

20 litter cleanup restitution payment equal to twice the
actual cost

21 of cleanup, or fifty dollars per cubic foot of litter,
whichever

22 is greater. The court shall distribute one-half of the
restitution

23 payment to the landowner and one-half of the restitution
payment

24 to the jurisdictional health department investigating
the

25 incident. The court may, in addition to or in lieu of
part or all

26 of the cleanup restitution payment, order the person to
pick up

27 and remove litter from the property, with prior
permission of the

28 legal owner or, in the case of public property, of the
agency

29 managing the property. The court may suspend or modify
the litter

30 cleanup restitution payment for a first-time offender
under this

31 section, if the person cleans up and properly disposes
of the

32 litter.

33 (((d))) (c) It is a gross misdemeanor
for a person to litter in

34 an amount of one cubic yard or more ((in an
unincorporated area of

35 a county)). The person shall also pay a litter
cleanup restitution

36 payment equal to twice the actual cost of cleanup, or
one hundred

37 dollars per cubic foot of litter, whichever is greater.
The court

38 shall distribute one-half of the restitution payment to
the

SHB 1163 p. 4

_1 landowner and one-half of the restitution payment to the

_2 jurisdictional health department investigating the
incident. The

_3 court may, in addition to or in lieu of part or all of
the cleanup

_4 restitution payment, order the person to pick up and
remove litter

_5 from the property, with prior permission of the legal
owner or, in

_6 the case of public property, of the agency managing the
property.

_7 The court may suspend or modify the litter cleanup
restitution

_8 payment for a first-time offender under this section, if
the

_9 person cleans up and properly disposes of the litter.

10 (((e))) (d) If a junk vehicle is
abandoned in violation of this

11 chapter, RCW 46.55.230 governs the vehicle's removal,
disposal,

12 and sale, and the penalties that may be imposed against
the person

13 who abandoned the vehicle.

14 Sec. 3. RCW
46.55.230 and 2000 c 154 s 4 are each amended to read

15 as follows:

16 (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
law

17 enforcement officer having jurisdiction, or any employee
or

18 officer of a jurisdictional health department acting
pursuant to

19 RCW 70.95.240, or any person authorized by the director
shall

20 inspect and may authorize the disposal of an abandoned
junk

21 vehicle. The person making the inspection shall record
the make and

22 vehicle identification number or license number of the
vehicle if

23 available, and shall also verify that the approximate
value of the

24 junk vehicle is equivalent only to the approximate value
of the

25 scrap in it.

26 (2) The law enforcement officer or department
representative

27 shall provide information on the vehicle's registered
and legal

28 owner to the landowner.

29 (3) Upon receiving information on the vehicle's
registered and

30 legal owner, the landowner shall mail a notice to the
registered

31 and legal owners shown on the records of the
department. The

32 notification shall describe the redemption procedure and
the right

33 to arrange for the removal of the vehicle.

34 (4) If the vehicle remains unclaimed more than
fifteen days

35 after the landowner has mailed notification to the
registered and

36 legal owner, the landowner may dispose of the vehicle or
sign an

37 affidavit of sale to be used as a title document.

p. 5 SHB
1163

_1 (5) If no information on the vehicle's registered
and legal

_2 owner is found in the records of the department, the
landowner may

_3 immediately dispose of the vehicle or sign an affidavit
of sale to

_4 be used as a title document.

_5 (6)(((a) It is a class 1 civil infraction as
defined in RCW

_6 7.80.120 for a person to abandon a junk vehicle on
property

_7 located in an incorporated area. If a junk vehicle
is abandoned in

_8 an incorporated area, the landowner of the property
upon which the

_9 junk vehicle is located is entitled to recover from
the vehicle's

10 registered owner any costs incurred in the removal of
the junk

11 vehicle.

12 (b))) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person
to abandon a junk

13 vehicle on property ((located in an unincorporated
area)). If a

14 junk vehicle is abandoned ((in an unincorporated area)),
the

15 vehicle's registered owner shall also pay a cleanup
restitution

16 payment equal to twice the costs incurred in the removal
of the

17 junk vehicle. The court shall distribute one-half of
the

18 restitution payment to the landowner of the property
upon which

19 the junk vehicle is located, and one-half of the
restitution

20 payment to the law enforcement agency or jurisdictional
health

21 department investigating the incident.

22 (7) For the purposes of this section, the term
"landowner"

23 includes a legal owner of private property, a person
with

24 possession or control of private property, or a public
official

25 having jurisdiction over public property.

26 (8) A person complying in good faith with the
requirements of

27 this section is immune from any liability arising out of
an action

28 taken or omission made in the compliance.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1163 p. 6