BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
43.168.020 and 1999 c 164 s 502 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
definitions

_7 in this section apply throughout this chapter.

_8 (1) "Department" means the department of
community, trade, and

_9 economic development.

10 (2) "Director" means the director of
community, trade, and

11 economic development.

12 (3) "Distressed area" means: (a) A rural
county; (b) a county

13 that has experienced a loss of more than three
thousand jobs

14 during the previous five-year period due to military
base

15 restructuring and military employment in the county
exceeds

16 fifteen percent of the total employment in the
county; (c) a

17 county which has an unemployment rate which is twenty
percent

18 above the state average for the immediately previous
three years;

p. 1 HB
1164

_1 (((c))) (d) a county that has a median
household income that is

_2 less than seventy-five percent of the state median
household

_3 income for the previous three years; (((d))) (e)
a metropolitan

_4 statistical area, as defined by the office of federal
statistical

_5 policy and standards, United States department of
commerce, in

_6 which the average level of unemployment for the calendar
year

_7 immediately preceding the year in which an application
is filed

_8 under this chapter exceeds the average state
unemployment for such

_9 calendar year by twenty percent; (((e))) (f)
an area within a

10 county, which area: (i) Is composed of contiguous
census tracts;

11 (ii) has a minimum population of five thousand persons;
(iii) has

12 at least seventy percent of its families and unrelated
individuals

13 with incomes below eighty percent of the county's median
income

14 for families and unrelated individuals; and (iv) has an

15 unemployment rate which is at least forty percent higher
than the

16 county's unemployment rate; or (((f))) (g)
a county designated as

17 a rural natural resources impact area under RCW
43.31.601 if an

18 application is filed by July 1, 1997. For purposes of
this

19 definition, "families and unrelated
individuals" has the same

20 meaning that is ascribed to that term by the federal
department of

21 housing and urban development in its regulations
authorizing

22 action grants for economic development and neighborhood

23 revitalization projects.

24 (4) "Fund" means the rural Washington loan
fund.

25 (5) "Local development organization" means
a nonprofit

26 organization which is organized to operate within an
area,

27 demonstrates a commitment to a long-standing effort for
an

28 economic development program, and makes a demonstrable
effort to

29 assist in the employment of unemployed or underemployed
residents

30 in an area.

31 (6) "Project" means the establishment of a
new or expanded

32 business in an area which when completed will provide
employment

33 opportunities. "Project" also means the
retention of an existing

34 business in an area which when completed will provide
employment

35 opportunities.

36 (7) "Rural county" means a county with a
population density of

37 fewer that one hundred persons per square mile as
determined by

38 the office of financial management.

HB 1164 p. 2

_1

_2 Sec. 2. RCW
82.60.020 and 1999 sp.s. c 9 s 2 are each amended to

_3 read as follows:

_4 Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
definitions

_5 in this section apply throughout this chapter.

_6 (1) "Applicant" means a person applying
for a tax deferral

_7 under this chapter.

_8 (2) "Department" means the department of
revenue.

_9 (3) "Eligible area" means: (a) A rural
county ((with fewer than

10 one hundred persons per square mile as determined
annually by the

11 office of financial management and published by the
department of

12 revenue effective for the period July 1st through
June 30th)); or

13 (b) a county that has experienced a loss of more than
three

14 thousand jobs during the previous five-year period
due to military

15 base restructuring and military employment in the
county exceeds

16 fifteen percent of the total employment in the county.

17 (4)(a) "Eligible investment project" means
an investment

18 project in an eligible area as defined in subsection (3)
of this

19 section.

20 (b) The lessor/owner of a qualified building is not
eligible

21 for a deferral unless the underlying ownership of the
buildings,

22 machinery, and equipment vests exclusively in the same
person, or

23 unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the
economic

24 benefit of the deferral to the lessee in the form of
reduced rent

25 payments.

26 (c) "Eligible investment project" does not
include any portion

27 of an investment project undertaken by a light and power
business

28 as defined in RCW 82.16.010(5), other than that portion
of a

29 cogeneration project that is used to generate power for

30 consumption within the manufacturing site of which the

31 cogeneration project is an integral part, or investment
projects

32 which have already received deferrals under this
chapter.

33 (5) "Investment project" means an
investment in qualified

34 buildings or qualified machinery and equipment,
including labor

35 and services rendered in the planning, installation, and

36 construction of the project.

37 (6) "Manufacturing" means the same as
defined in RCW

38 82.04.120. "Manufacturing" also includes
computer programming, the

p. 3 HB
1164

_1 production of computer software, and other
computer-related

_2 services, and the activities performed by research and
development

_3 laboratories and commercial testing laboratories.

_4 (7) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW
82.04.030.

_5 (8) "Qualified buildings" means
construction of new structures,

_6 and expansion or renovation of existing structures for
the purpose

_7 of increasing floor space or production capacity used
for

_8 manufacturing and research and development activities,
including

_9 plant offices and warehouses or other facilities for the
storage

10 of raw material or finished goods if such facilities are
an

11 essential or an integral part of a factory, mill, plant,
or

12 laboratory used for manufacturing or research and
development. If a

13 building is used partly for manufacturing or research
and

14 development and partly for other purposes, the
applicable tax

15 deferral shall be determined by apportionment of the
costs of

16 construction under rules adopted by the department.

17 (9) "Qualified machinery and equipment"
means all new

18 industrial and research fixtures, equipment, and support

19 facilities that are an integral and necessary part of a

20 manufacturing or research and development operation.
"Qualified

21 machinery and equipment" includes: Computers;
software; data

22 processing equipment; laboratory equipment;
manufacturing

23 components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving
parts;

24 molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all
equipment

25 used to control or operate the machinery.

26 (10) "Recipient" means a person receiving
a tax deferral under

27 this chapter.

28 (11) "Research and development" means the
development,

29 refinement, testing, marketing, and commercialization of
a

30 product, service, or process before commercial sales
have begun.

31 As used in this subsection, "commercial sales"
excludes sales of

32 prototypes or sales for market testing if the total
gross receipts

33 from such sales of the product, service, or process do not
exceed

34 one million dollars.

35 (12) "Rural county" means a county with
a population density of

36 fewer than one hundred persons per square mile as
determined by

HB 1164 p. 4

_1 the office of financial management.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 HB
1164