BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 26.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A grandparent of a
child may petition the court for visitation with the child if:

(a) There exists a
substantial relationship between the grandparent and the grandchild;

(b) The parent or person
with whom the child resides had in the past encouraged or approved of contact
between the grandparent and the child;

(c) The grandparent has
in the past been entrusted with the care of the child for a substantial time;
or

(d) The parent or
person with whom the child resides has accepted substantial financial support
from the grandparent for the child.

(2)(a) The grandparent
must file with the petition for visitation an affidavit alleging specific facts
in support of the petition. The party responding to the petition for
visitation may file an affidavit in response to the petition and accompanying
affidavit.

(b) If, on the basis of
the petition and affidavits, the court determines that it is more likely than
not that the grandparent satisfies the requirement in subsection (1) of this
section, the court shall hold a hearing on the matter.

(3)(a) If after a
hearing the court finds that the petitioner satisfies the requirement in
subsection (1) of this section, the court shall presume that denying visitation
between the child and grandparent will likely cause harm to the child.

(b) The party
responding to the petition for visitation may rebut the presumption by a
preponderance of the evidence showing that the likelihood of harm to the child
caused by denying visitation is outweighed by the likelihood of harm to the
child caused by granting visitation. In determining whether the likelihood of
harm caused by granting visitation outweighs the likelihood of harm caused by
denying visitation, the court may consider the following factors:

(i) The strength of the
relationship between the child and the grandparent;

(ii) The nature and
reason for the parent's objection to granting visitation;

(iii) The relationship
between the grandparent and the child's parent or person with whom the child
resides, whether there has been a history of cooperation or hostility, and
whether such relationship is likely to change;

(iv) The effect
granting visitation will have on the relationship between the child and the
child's parents or the person with whom the child is residing;

(v) The residential
time-sharing arrangements, if any, between the parents;

(vi) The good faith of
the parties;

(vii) Any criminal
history or history of physical, emotional, or sexual abuse or neglect by the
parties; and

(viii) Any other
relevant factor.

(4) If the court finds
that a party has filed or responded to a petition for visitation in bad faith,
or has acted in bad faith during the proceedings, the court may award
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the opposing party.

(5) For purposes of
this section, "grandparent" means a biological or adoptive parent of
a child's biological or adoptive parent.

Sec. 2. RCW 26.09.240 and 1996 c
177 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((A person other
than a parent)) Pursuant to section 1 of this act, a grandparent of the
child may petition the court for visitation with a child ((at any time
or may intervene in)) during a pending dissolution, legal
separation, or modification of parenting plan proceeding. ((A person other
than a parent may not petition for visitation under this section unless the
child's parent or parents have commenced an action under this chapter.

(2) A petition for
visitation with a child by a person other than a parent must be filed in the
county in which the child resides.

(3) A petition for
visitation or a motion to intervene pursuant to this section shall be dismissed
unless the petitioner or intervenor can demonstrate by clear and convincing
evidence that a significant relationship exists with the child with whom
visitation is sought. If the petition or motion is dismissed for failure to
establish the existence of a significant relationship, the petitioner or
intervenor shall be ordered to pay reasonable attorney's fees and costs to the
parent, parents, other custodian, or representative of the child who responds
to this petition or motion.

(4) The court may
order visitation between the petitioner or intervenor and the child between
whom a significant relationship exists upon a finding supported by the evidence
that the visitation is in the child's best interests.

(5)(a) Visitation
with a grandparent shall be presumed to be in the child's best interests when a
significant relationship has been shown to exist. This presumption may be
rebutted by a preponderance of evidence showing that visitation would endanger
the child's physical, mental, or emotional health.

(b) If the court
finds that reasonable visitation by a grandparent would be in the child's best
interest except for hostilities that exist between the grandparent and one or
both of the parents or person with whom the child lives, the court may set the
matter for mediation under RCW 26.09.015.

(6) The court may
consider the following factors when making a determination of the child's best
interests:

(a) The strength of
the relationship between the child and the petitioner;

(b) The relationship
between each of the child's parents or the person with whom the child is
residing and the petitioner;

(c) The nature and
reason for either parent's objection to granting the petitioner visitation;

(d) The effect that
granting visitation will have on the relationship between the child and the
child's parents or the person with whom the child is residing;

(e) The residential
time sharing arrangements between the parents;

(f) The good faith
of the petitioner;

(g) Any criminal
history or history of physical, emotional, or sexual abuse or neglect by the
petitioner; and

(h) Any other factor
relevant to the child's best interest.

(7))) (2) The restrictions of RCW 26.09.191
that apply to parents shall be applied to a petitioner or intervenor who is not
a parent. The nature and extent of visitation, subject to these restrictions,
is in the discretion of the court.

(((8))) (3)
The court may order an investigation and report concerning the proposed
visitation or may appoint a guardian ad litem as provided in RCW 26.09.220.

(((9))) (4)
Visitation granted pursuant to this section shall be incorporated into the
parenting plan for the child.

(((10))) (5)
The court may modify or terminate visitation rights granted pursuant to this
section in any subsequent modification action upon a showing that the
visitation is no longer in the best interest of the child.

Sec. 3. RCW 26.10.160 and 1996 c
303 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A parent not
granted custody of the child is entitled to reasonable visitation rights except
as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a) Visitation with
the child shall be limited if it is found that the parent seeking visitation
has engaged in any of the following conduct: (i) Willful abandonment that
continues for an extended period of time or substantial refusal to perform
parenting functions; (ii) physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of
a child; (iii) a history of acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW
26.50.010(1) or an assault or sexual assault which causes grievous bodily harm
or the fear of such harm; or (iv) the parent has been convicted as an adult of
a sex offense under:

(A) RCW 9A.44.076 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(B) RCW 9A.44.079 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(C) RCW 9A.44.086 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(D) RCW 9A.44.089;

(E) RCW 9A.44.093;

(F) RCW 9A.44.096;

(G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1)
or (2) if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;

(I) Any predecessor or
antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of this
subsection;

(J) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of this subsection.

This subsection (2)(a)
shall not apply when (c) or (d) of this subsection applies.

(b) The parent's
visitation with the child shall be limited if it is found that the parent
resides with a person who has engaged in any of the following conduct: (i)
Physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of a child; (ii) a history of
acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an assault or
sexual assault that causes grievous bodily harm or the fear of such harm; or
(iii) the person has been convicted as an adult or as a juvenile has been
adjudicated of a sex offense under:

(A) RCW 9A.44.076 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(B) RCW 9A.44.079 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(C) RCW 9A.44.086 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(D) RCW 9A.44.089;

(E) RCW 9A.44.093;

(F) RCW 9A.44.096;

(G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1)
or (2) if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;

(I) Any predecessor or
antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this
subsection;

(J) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this subsection.

This subsection (2)(b)
shall not apply when (c) or (e) of this subsection applies.

(c) If a parent has
been found to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or under an
analogous statute of any other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the
parent from contact with a child that would otherwise be allowed under this
chapter. If a parent resides with an adult or a juvenile who has been found
to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or under an analogous statute
of any other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the parent from contact
with the parent's child except contact that occurs outside that person's
presence.

(d) There is a
rebuttable presumption that a parent who has been convicted as an adult of a
sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of this subsection poses a present
danger to a child. Unless the parent rebuts this presumption, the court shall
restrain the parent from contact with a child that would otherwise be allowed
under this chapter:

(i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1)
or (2), provided that the person convicted was at least five years older than
the other person;

(ii) RCW 9A.44.073;

(iii) RCW 9A.44.076,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(iv) RCW 9A.44.079,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(v) RCW 9A.44.083;

(vi) RCW 9A.44.086,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(vii) RCW 9A.44.100;

(viii) Any predecessor
or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of this
subsection;

(ix) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of this subsection.

(e) There is a
rebuttable presumption that a parent who resides with a person who, as an
adult, has been convicted, or as a juvenile has been adjudicated, of the sex
offenses listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection places a child at
risk of abuse or harm when that parent exercises visitation in the presence of
the convicted or adjudicated person. Unless the parent rebuts the presumption,
the court shall restrain the parent from contact with the parent's child except
for contact that occurs outside of the convicted or adjudicated person's presence:

(i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1)
or (2), provided that the person convicted was at least five years older than
the other person;

(ii) RCW 9A.44.073;

(iii) RCW 9A.44.076,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(iv) RCW 9A.44.079,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(v) RCW 9A.44.083;

(vi) RCW 9A.44.086,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(vii) RCW 9A.44.100;

(viii) Any predecessor
or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of this
subsection;

(ix) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of this subsection.

(f) The presumption
established in (d) of this subsection may be rebutted only after a written
finding that:

(i) If the child was
not the victim of the sex offense committed by the parent requesting
visitation, (A) contact between the child and the offending parent is
appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, and (B) the offending parent
has successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and
making progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the
treatment provider believes such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk
to the child; or

(ii) If the child was
the victim of the sex offense committed by the parent requesting visitation,
(A) contact between the child and the offending parent is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is in or has been in therapy for
victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes such contact between
the child and the offending parent is in the child's best interest, and (C) the
offending parent has successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is
engaged in and making progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a
court, and the treatment provider believes such contact is appropriate and
poses minimal risk to the child.

(g) The presumption
established in (e) of this subsection may be rebutted only after a written
finding that:

(i) If the child was
not the victim of the sex offense committed by the person who is residing with
the parent requesting visitation, (A) contact between the child and the parent
residing with the convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate and that
parent is able to protect the child in the presence of the convicted or
adjudicated person, and (B) the convicted or adjudicated person has successfully
engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and making progress in
such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment provider
believes such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child; or

(ii) If the child was
the victim of the sex offense committed by the person who is residing with the
parent requesting visitation, (A) contact between the child and the parent in
the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is in or has been in therapy for
victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes such contact between
the child and the parent residing with the convicted or adjudicated person in
the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is in the child's best
interest, and (C) the convicted or adjudicated person has successfully engaged
in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and making progress in such
treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment provider believes
contact between the parent and child in the presence of the convicted or
adjudicated person is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.

(h) If the court finds
that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the presumption under (f) of
this subsection, the court may allow a parent who has been convicted as an
adult of a sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of this subsection to have
visitation with the child supervised by a neutral and independent adult and
pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such visitation. The court
shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between the child and the parent
unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor is willing
and capable of protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke court
approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence, that the
supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or capable
of protecting the child.

(i) If the court finds
that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the presumption under (g) of
this subsection, the court may allow a parent residing with a person who has
been adjudicated as a juvenile of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through (ix)
of this subsection to have visitation with the child in the presence of the
person adjudicated as a juvenile, supervised by a neutral and independent adult
and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such visitation. The court
shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between the child and the parent
unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor is willing
and capable of protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke court
approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence, that the
supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or capable
of protecting the child.

(j) If the court finds
that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the presumption under (g) of
this subsection, the court may allow a parent residing with a person who, as an
adult, has been convicted of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of
this subsection to have visitation with the child in the presence of the
convicted person supervised by a neutral and independent adult and pursuant to
an adequate plan for supervision of such visitation. The court shall not
approve of a supervisor for contact between the child and the parent unless the
court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor is willing and capable
of protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke court approval of
the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence, that the supervisor has
failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or capable of protecting
the child.

(k) A court shall not
order unsupervised contact between the offending parent and a child of the
offending parent who was sexually abused by that parent. A court may order
unsupervised contact between the offending parent and a child who was not
sexually abused by the parent after the presumption under (d) of this subsection
has been rebutted and supervised visitation has occurred for at least two years
with no further arrests or convictions of sex offenses involving children under
chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW and (i) the sex offense
of the offending parent was not committed against a child of the offending
parent, and (ii) the court finds that unsupervised contact between the child
and the offending parent is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child,
after consideration of the testimony of a state-certified therapist, mental
health counselor, or social worker with expertise in treating child sexual
abuse victims who has supervised at least one period of visitation between the
parent and the child, and after consideration of evidence of the offending
parent's compliance with community supervision requirements, if any. If the
offending parent was not ordered by a court to participate in treatment for sex
offenders, then the parent shall obtain a psychosexual evaluation conducted by
a state-certified sex offender treatment provider indicating that the offender
has the lowest likelihood of risk to reoffend before the court grants
unsupervised contact between the parent and a child.

(l) A court may order
unsupervised contact between the parent and a child which may occur in the
presence of a juvenile adjudicated of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through
(ix) of this subsection who resides with the parent after the presumption under
(e) of this subsection has been rebutted and supervised visitation has occurred
for at least two years during which time the adjudicated juvenile has had no
further arrests, adjudications, or convictions of sex offenses involving
children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW, and (i)
the court finds that unsupervised contact between the child and the parent that
may occur in the presence of the adjudicated juvenile is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child, after consideration of the testimony of a
state-certified therapist, mental health counselor, or social worker with
expertise in treatment of child sexual abuse victims who has supervised at
least one period of visitation between the parent and the child in the presence
of the adjudicated juvenile, and after consideration of evidence of the
adjudicated juvenile's compliance with community supervision or parole
requirements, if any. If the adjudicated juvenile was not ordered by a court
to participate in treatment for sex offenders, then the adjudicated juvenile
shall obtain a psychosexual evaluation conducted by a state-certified sex
offender treatment provider indicating that the adjudicated juvenile has the
lowest likelihood of risk to reoffend before the court grants unsupervised
contact between the parent and a child which may occur in the presence of the
adjudicated juvenile who is residing with the parent.

(m)(i) The limitations
imposed by the court under (a) or (b) of this subsection shall be reasonably
calculated to protect the child from the physical, sexual, or emotional abuse
or harm that could result if the child has contact with the parent requesting
visitation. If the court expressly finds based on the evidence that
limitations on visitation with the child will not adequately protect the child
from the harm or abuse that could result if the child has contact with the
parent requesting visitation, the court shall restrain the person seeking
visitation from all contact with the child.

(ii) The court shall
not enter an order under (a) of this subsection allowing a parent to have
contact with a child if the parent has been found by clear and convincing
evidence in a civil action or by a preponderance of the evidence in a
dependency action to have sexually abused the child, except upon recommendation
by an evaluator or therapist for the child that the child is ready for contact
with the parent and will not be harmed by the contact. The court shall not
enter an order allowing a parent to have contact with the child in the
offender's presence if the parent resides with a person who has been found by
clear and convincing evidence in a civil action or by a preponderance of the
evidence in a dependency action to have sexually abused a child, unless the
court finds that the parent accepts that the person engaged in the harmful conduct
and the parent is willing to and capable of protecting the child from harm from
the person.

(iii) If the court
limits visitation under (a) or (b) of this subsection to require supervised
contact between the child and the parent, the court shall not approve of a
supervisor for contact between a child and a parent who has engaged in
physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of the child unless the court
finds based upon the evidence that the supervisor accepts that the harmful
conduct occurred and is willing to and capable of protecting the child from
harm. The court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding,
based on the evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or
is no longer willing to or capable of protecting the child.

(n) If the court
expressly finds based on the evidence that contact between the parent and the
child will not cause physical, sexual, or emotional abuse or harm to the child
and that the probability that the parent's or other person's harmful or abusive
conduct will recur is so remote that it would not be in the child's best
interests to apply the limitations of (a), (b), and (m)(i) and (iii) of this
subsection, or if the court expressly finds that the parent's conduct did not
have an impact on the child, then the court need not apply the limitations of
(a), (b), and (m)(i) and (iii) of this subsection. The weight given to the
existence of a protection order issued under chapter 26.50 RCW as to domestic
violence is within the discretion of the court. This subsection shall not
apply when (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), (l), and (m)(ii) of
this subsection apply.

(3) ((Any person may
petition the court for visitation rights at any time including, but not limited
to, custody proceedings. The court may order visitation rights for any person
when visitation may serve the best interest of the child whether or not there
has been any change of circumstances.

(4))) The court may modify an order granting or
denying visitation rights whenever modification would serve the best interests
of the child. Modification of a parent's visitation rights shall be subject to
the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

(((5)))
(4) For the purposes of this section, a parent's child means that
parent's natural child, adopted child, or stepchild.

---
END ---