BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this section.

(a) "Disabled
employee" means an individual eligible to receive a disability retirement
allowance from the public employees' retirement system.

(b) "Health
plan" means a contract, policy, fund, trust, or other program established
by a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state that
provides for all or a part of hospitalization or medical aid for its employees
and their dependents under RCW 41.04.180.

(c) "Retired
employee" means an individual who is a public employee covered under the
public employees' retirement system with not less than five years of service at
the date of retirement.

(d) "Supplemental
plan" means an individual or group health plan designed primarily as a
supplement to reimbursements under federal medicare for the hospital, medical,
or surgical expenses of persons eligible for medicare by reason of age.

(2) A county,
municipality, or other political subdivision that provides a health plan for
its employees shall permit retired and disabled employees and their dependents
to continue participation in the plan subject to the exceptions, limitations,
and conditions set forth in this section. However, this section does not apply
to a county, municipality, or other political subdivision participating in an
insurance program administered under chapter 41.05 RCW if retired and disabled
employees and their dependents of the participating county, municipality, or
other political subdivision are covered under an insurance program administered
under chapter 41.05 RCW.

(3) A person who
requests continued participation in their employer's health plan may be
required to pay for such participation. However, the payment may not exceed
the rate, cost, or premium that is calculated for an active employee under the
same plan. If the utilization of health plan benefits by those continuing
participation in the health plan is attributable to a greater than ten percent
increase in the active employee rate or cost for the plan, then the rate or
cost for those continuing participation in the health plan shall be adjusted to
cover the additional cost in excess of the ten percent increase. However, this
subsection does not require an employer who is currently paying for all or part
of a health plan for their retired and disabled employees and their dependents
from discontinuing those payments.

(4) If a person
continuing participation under a health plan becomes eligible for federal
medicare, then health plan participation is terminated and the person has the
option of participating in a supplemental plan provided by the employer.
Payment required of the person shall be modified to reflect cost differences
between the health plan and the supplemental plan.

(5) Payments for
continued participation in a former employer's health plan may be assigned to
the underwriter of the health plan from public pension benefits or may be paid
to the former employer, as determined by the former employer, so that an
underwriter of the health plan that is an insurance company, health care
service contractor, or health maintenance organization is not required to
accept individual payments from persons continuing participation in the
employer's health plan.

(6) After an initial
open enrollment period of not less than ninety days after the effective date of
this section, an employer may not be required to permit a person to continue
participation in the health plan if the person is responsible for a lapse in
coverage under the plan. In addition, an employer may not be required to
permit a person to continue participation in the employer's health plan if the
employer offered continued participation in a health plan with substantially
similar benefits and at substantially the same price as that plan provided for
active employees and the person failed to enroll in that plan at the time the
person was retired or disabled.

(7) If a person
continuing participation in the former employer's health plan has medical
coverage through another employer, the medical coverage of the other employer
is the primary coverage for purposes of coordination of benefits as provided
for in the former employer's health plan.

(8) If a person's
continued participation in a health plan was permitted because of the person's
relationship to a retired or disabled employee of the employer providing the
health plan and the retired or disabled employee dies, then that person is
permitted to continue participation in the health plan for a period of not more
than six months after the death of the retired or disabled employee. However,
the employer providing the health plan may permit continued participation
beyond that time period.

(9) An employer may
offer one or more health plans different from that provided for active
employees and designed to meet the needs of persons requesting continued
participation in the employer's health plan. These health plans for continued
participation shall be provided at a rate, cost, or premium that does not
exceed that provided for active employee health plans. An employer, in
designing or offering continued participation in a health plan, may utilize
terms or conditions necessary to administer the plan to the extent the terms
and conditions do not conflict with this section.

(10) If an employer
changes the underwriter of a health plan, the replaced underwriter has no
further responsibility or obligation to persons who continued participation in
a health plan of the replaced underwriter. However, the employer shall permit
those persons to participate in any new health plan.

(11) The benefits
granted under this section are not considered a matter of contractual right.
Should the legislature, a county, municipality, or other political subdivision
of the state revoke or change any benefits granted under this section, an
affected person is not entitled to receive the benefits as a matter of
contractual right.

(12) This
section does not affect any health plan contained in a collective bargaining
agreement in existence as of the effective date of this section. However, any
plan contained in future collective bargaining agreements shall conform to this
section. In addition, this section does not affect any health plan contract or
policy in existence as of the effective date of this section. However, any
renewal of the contract or policy shall conform to this section.

--- END ---