BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to increase the likelihood that pregnant women will obtain adequate prenatal
care and will provide their newborns with adequate health care during the first
few days of his or her life. The legislature recognizes that prenatal and
postdelivery health care for newborns is especially critical to their survival
and well-being. The legislature intends that reasonable steps should be taken
to remove any barriers to such care, particularly for those parents who may
otherwise encounter emotional and/or psychological barriers to obtaining such
care by reducing impediments to obtaining prenatal and postdelivery care to
newborns while encouraging pregnant women to act responsibly regarding the
health of their newborns. The legislature does not intend to encourage the
abandonment of newborn children nor to change existing law relating to
notification to parents under chapter 13.34 RCW, but rather to assure that
abandonment does not occur and that all newborns have an opportunity for adequate
health care and a stable home life.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.42.060 and 1996 c
302 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person is guilty of the crime
of abandonment of a dependent person in the first degree if:

(a) The person is the
parent of a child, a person entrusted with the physical custody of a child or
other dependent person, or a person employed to provide to the child or other
dependent person any of the basic necessities of life;

(b) The person
recklessly abandons the child or other dependent person; and

(c) As a result of
being abandoned, the child or other dependent person suffers great bodily harm.

(2)(a)(i) A parent
of a newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate
location is not subject to criminal liability under this section.

(ii) The qualified
person and the hospital may not require the parent transferring the newborn to
provide any identifying information in order to transfer the newborn.

(b) For the purposes
of this subsection:

(i)
"Appropriate location" means a location designated by a hospital
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW during the hours the hospital is in
operation. Every hospital must designate an appropriate location within the
hospital where a qualified person is located who is reasonably likely to
protect the anonymity of the parent who transfers the newborn, while providing
an opportunity for the parent who transfers the newborn to anonymously give the
hospital such information as the parent knows about the family medical history
of the parents and the newborn.

(ii)
"Newborn" means a live human being who is less than seventy-two hours
old.

(iii)
"Qualified person" means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71
RCW, osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, nurse
or nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, midwife licensed under
chapter 18.50 RCW, emergency medical technician authorized under chapter 18.73
RCW, or physician's trained emergency medical service intermediate life support
technician and paramedic certified under chapter 18.71 RCW.

(3)
Abandonment of a dependent person in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 3. RCW 9A.42.070 and 1996 c
302 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person is guilty of the crime
of abandonment of a dependent person in the second degree if:

(a) The person is the
parent of a child, a person entrusted with the physical custody of a child or
other dependent person, or a person employed to provide to the child or other
dependent person any of the basic necessities of life; and

(b) The person recklessly
abandons the child or other dependent person; and:

(i) As a result of
being abandoned, the child or other dependent person suffers substantial bodily
harm; or

(ii) Abandoning the
child or other dependent person creates an imminent and substantial risk that
the child or other dependent person will die or suffer great bodily harm.

(2)(a)(i) A parent
of a newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate
location is not subject to criminal liability under this section.

(ii) The qualified
person and the hospital may not require the parent transferring the newborn to
provide any identifying information in order to transfer the newborn.

(b) For the purposes
of this subsection:

(i)
"Appropriate location" means a location designated by a hospital
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW during the hours the hospital is in
operation. Every hospital must designate an appropriate location within the
hospital where a qualified person is located who is reasonably likely to
protect the anonymity of the parent who transfers the newborn, while providing
an opportunity for the parent who transfers the newborn to anonymously give the
hospital such information as the parent knows about the family medical history
of the parents and the newborn.

(ii)
"Newborn" means a live human being who is less than seventy-two hours
old.

(iii)
"Qualified person" means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71
RCW, osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, nurse
or nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, midwife licensed under
chapter 18.50 RCW, emergency medical technician authorized under chapter 18.73
RCW, or physician's trained emergency medical service intermediate life support
technician and paramedic certified under chapter 18.71 RCW.

(3)
Abandonment of a dependent person in the second degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 4. RCW 9A.42.080 and 1996 c
302 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person is guilty of the crime
of abandonment of a dependent person in the third degree if:

(a) The person is the
parent of a child, a person entrusted with the physical custody of a child or
other dependent person, or a person employed to provide to the child or
dependent person any of the basic necessities of life; and

(b) The person
recklessly abandons the child or other dependent person; and:

(i) As a result of
being abandoned, the child or other dependent person suffers bodily harm; or

(ii) Abandoning the
child or other dependent person creates an imminent and substantial risk that
the child or other person will suffer substantial bodily harm.

(2)(a)(i) A parent
of a newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate
location is not subject to criminal liability under this section.

(ii) The qualified
person and the hospital may not require the parent transferring the newborn to
provide any identifying information in order to transfer the newborn.

(b) For the purposes
of this subsection:

(i)
"Appropriate location" means a location designated by a hospital
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW during the hours the hospital is in
operation. Every hospital must designate an appropriate location within the
hospital where a qualified person is located who is reasonably likely to
protect the anonymity of the parent who transfers the newborn, while providing
an opportunity for the parent who transfers the newborn to anonymously give the
hospital such information as the parent knows about the family medical history
of the parents and the newborn.

(ii)
"Newborn" means a live human being who is less than seventy-two hours
old.

(iii)
"Qualified person" means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71
RCW, osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, nurse
or nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, midwife licensed under
chapter 18.50 RCW, emergency medical technician authorized under chapter 18.73
RCW, or physician's trained emergency medical service intermediate life support
technician and paramedic certified under chapter 18.71 RCW.

(3)
Abandonment of a dependent person in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 5. RCW 26.20.030 and 1984 c
260 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who has a child
dependent upon him or her for care, education or support and deserts such child
in any manner whatever with intent to abandon it is guilty of the crime of
family abandonment.

(2)(a)(i) A parent
of a newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate
location is not subject to criminal liability under this section.

(ii) The qualified
person and the hospital may not require the parent transferring the newborn to
provide any identifying information in order to transfer the newborn.

(b) For the purposes
of this subsection:

(i)
"Appropriate location" means a location designated by a hospital
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW during the hours the hospital is in
operation. Every hospital must designate an appropriate location within the
hospital where a qualified person is located who is reasonably likely to
protect the anonymity of the parent who transfers the newborn, while providing
an opportunity for the parent who transfers the newborn to anonymously give the
hospital such information as the parent knows about the family medical history
of the parents and the newborn.

(ii)
"Newborn" means a live human being who is less than seventy-two hours
old.

(iii)
"Qualified person" means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71
RCW, osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, nurse
or nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, midwife licensed under
chapter 18.50 RCW, emergency medical technician authorized under chapter 18.73
RCW, or physician's trained emergency medical service intermediate life support
technician and paramedic certified under chapter 18.71 RCW.

(3) The crime of
family abandonment is a class C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 6. RCW 26.20.035 and 1984 c
260 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who is able to
provide support, or has the ability to earn the means to provide support, and
who:

(a) Willfully
omits to provide necessary food, clothing, shelter, or medical attendance to a
child dependent upon him or her; or

(b) Willfully
omits to provide necessary food, clothing, shelter, or medical attendance to
his or her spouse,

is guilty of the crime of
family nonsupport.

(2)(a)(i) A parent
of a newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate
location is not subject to criminal liability under this section.

(ii) The qualified
person and the hospital may not require the parent transferring the newborn to
provide any identifying information in order to transfer the newborn.

(b) For the purposes
of this subsection:

(i)
"Appropriate location" means a location designated by a hospital
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW during the hours the hospital is in
operation. Every hospital must designate an appropriate location within the
hospital where a qualified person is located who is reasonably likely to
protect the anonymity of the parent who transfers the newborn, while providing
an opportunity for the parent who transfers the newborn to anonymously give the
hospital such information as the parent knows about the family medical history
of the parents and the newborn.

(ii)
"Newborn" means a live human being who is less than seventy-two hours
old.

(iii)
"Qualified person" means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71
RCW, osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, nurse
or nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, midwife licensed under
chapter 18.50 RCW, emergency medical technician authorized under chapter 18.73
RCW, or physician's trained emergency medical service intermediate life support
technician and paramedic certified under chapter 18.71 RCW.

(3) The crime of
family nonsupport is a gross misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The secretary of the
department of social and health services shall convene a fifteen-member task
force to recommend methods of implementing this act, including a program of
public education regarding the provisions of this act. The task force shall
consider all reasonable methods of educating Washington residents about the
need for prenatal and postdelivery health care for a newborn whose parents may
otherwise not seek such care and place their newborn at risk as a result. The
task force shall also consider, and make recommendations regarding, ways to
improve the promotion of adoption as an alternative to placing a newborn in
situations that create a serious risk to his or her health and methods of
providing access to the medical history of the parents of a newborn who is
transferred to a hospital pursuant to RCW 9A.42.060(2), 9A.42.070(2),
9A.42.080(2), 26.20.030(2), and 26.20.035(2), as well as to the medical history
of the newborn, consistent with the protection of the anonymity of the parents of
the newborn.

(2) In addition to the
secretary, or the secretary's designee, the task force shall include
representation from the following: (a) Licensed physicians; (b) public and
private agencies which provide adoption services; (c) the licensed nursing
community; (d) hospitals; (e) prosecuting attorneys; (f) foster parents; (g)
the department of health; (h) the attorney general; (i) advocacy groups
concerned with the availability of adoption records; and (j) the public. At
least three members of the task force shall be public members.

(3) Members of the task
force shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses
pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) The task force
shall submit its report and recommendations to the governor and legislature not
later than December 1, 2001.

(5) This section
expires January 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act take effect July 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The sum of two hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2003, to the department of social and health
services for the purposes of this act. No expenditures may be made to implement
the recommendations of the task force prior to March 1, 2002.

---
END ---