BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
52.16.160 and 1985 c 112 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 Notwithstanding the limitation of dollar rates
contained in RCW

_7 52.16.130, and in addition to any levy for the payment
of the

_8 principal and interest of any outstanding general
obligation bonds

_9 and in addition to any levy authorized by RCW 52.16.130,
52.16.140

10 or any other statute, ((if in any county where a
township has

11 never been formed or where there are one or more
townships in

12 existence making annual tax levies and such township
or townships

13 are disorganized as a result of a county-wide
disorganization

14 procedure prescribed by statute and is no longer
making any tax

15 levy, or any township or townships for any other
reason no longer

16 makes any tax levy,)) the board of fire
commissioners of any fire

17 protection district within such county, which fire
protection

18 district has at least one full time, paid employee, or
contracts

p. 1 HB
1172

_1 with another municipal corporation for the services
of at least

_2 one full time, paid employee, is hereby
authorized to levy each

_3 year an ad valorem tax on all taxable property within
such

_4 district of not to exceed fifty cents per thousand
dollars of

_5 assessed value, which levy may be made only if it will
not affect

_6 dollar rates which other taxing districts may lawfully
claim nor

_7 cause the combined levies to exceed the constitutional
and/or

_8 statutory limitations. The additional levy, or any
portion of the

_9 levy, may also be made when dollar rates of other
taxing units are

10 released by agreement with the other taxing units
from their

11 authorized levies.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1172 p. 2