BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 52.14.110 and 2000 c
138 s 209 are each amended to read as follows:

Insofar as practicable,
purchases and any public works by the district shall be based on competitive
bids. A formal sealed bid procedure shall be used as standard procedure for
purchases and contracts for purchases executed by the board of commissioners.
Formal sealed bidding shall not be required for:

(1) The purchase of any
materials, supplies, or equipment if the cost will not exceed the sum of ((four
thousand five hundred)) ten thousand dollars. However, whenever the
estimated cost does not exceed ((ten)) fifty thousand dollars,
the commissioners may by resolution use the process provided in RCW 39.04.190
to award contracts;

(2) Contracting for
work to be done involving the construction or improvement of a fire station or
other buildings where the estimated cost will not exceed the sum of two
thousand five hundred dollars, which includes the costs of labor, material, and
equipment;

(3) Contracts using the
small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155; and

(4) Any
contract for purchases or public work pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption
contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.

--- END ---