BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature
recognizes that large

_6 woody debris was frequently removed from rivers and
streams

_7 decades ago because of concerns that it may cause
flooding

_8 downstream. The legislature finds that the placement of
large

_9 woody debris into rivers and streams serves an important
function

10 in salmon recovery because the large woody debris can
create pools

11 for salmon to rest and feed, and can provide salmon
protection

12 from predators. The legislature also finds that
landowners are

13 sometimes required to place large woody debris into
rivers or

14 streams as a condition of a hydraulic permit approval,
or because

15 of rules adopted by the forest practices board. Because

16 landowners, project sponsors, and volunteers who place
large woody

17 debris into rivers and streams pursuant to a hydraulic
permit

18 serve an important state purpose by helping to restore
salmon

19 habitat, it is the legislature=s
intent to provide immunity from

p. 1 HB
1178

_1 liability that may occur as a result of this activity.
It is also

_2 the intent of the legislature to increase participation
of

_3 downstream property owners in decisions pertaining to
placement of

_4 large woody debris.

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 77.55

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) Any landowner, or any project sponsor or
volunteer working

_8 on a project from a habitat project list, who is
involved in the

_9 design or placement of large woody debris into a
watercourse to

10 enhance salmon or other fish recovery shall not be held
liable for

11 any injury or damages resulting from ordinary negligence

12 associated with these actions, if the placement of the
large woody

13 debris is in accordance with the terms of a hydraulic
permit and

14 is consistent with generally accepted design
guidelines. The

15 immunity provided in this section applies, but is not
limited to,

16 personal injury, property damage, flooding, erosion,
damage to

17 public improvements, and other injuries or damages of any
kind or

18 character resulting from the placement of the large
woody debris.

19 (2) The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this

20 section:

21 (a) "Watercourse" has the same meaning as
defined in WAC 220‑

22 110-020, as that regulation existed on January 1, 2001.

23 (b) "Large woody debris" means trees or
tree parts larger than

24 four inches in diameter and longer than six feet and
rootwads,

25 wholly or partially waterward of the ordinary high water
line.

26 Sec. 3. RCW
77.55.120 and 2000 c 107 s 17 are each amended to read

27 as follows:

28 Whenever the placement of large woody debris
((is required as a

29 condition of)), as defined in section 2 of
this act, requires a

30 hydraulic permit approval issued pursuant to RCW
77.55.100 or

31 77.55.110, the department, upon request, shall invite
comment

32 regarding that placement from the local governmental
authority,

33 affected tribes, affected federal and state agencies, ((and))
the

34 project applicant, and downstream property owners who
own property

35 within one mile of where the large woody debris is to
be

36 installed.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1178 p. 2