BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that developing, creating, and maintaining partnerships between the public and
private sectors can enhance and augment current public health services. The
legislature further finds that the department of health should have the ability
to establish such partnerships, and seek out and accept gifts, grants, and
other funding to advance worthy public health goals and programs.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature that gifts and other funds received by the department of health
under the authority granted by RCW 43.70.040 may be used to expand or enhance
program operations so long as program standards established by the department
are maintained, but may not supplant or replace funds for federal, state,
county, or city-supported programs.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.70.040 and 1995 c
403 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other powers granted the secretary, the secretary may:

(1) Adopt, in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, rules necessary to carry out the provisions
of chapter 9, Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess.: PROVIDED, That for rules adopted
after July 23, 1995, the secretary may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose, on the enabling provisions of the
statute establishing the agency, or on any combination of such provisions, for
statutory authority to adopt any rule;

(2) Appoint such
advisory committees as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of chapter
9, Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess. Members of such advisory committees are
authorized to receive travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. The secretary and the board of health shall review each advisory
committee within their jurisdiction and each statutory advisory committee on a
biennial basis to determine if such advisory committee is needed((. The
criteria specified in RCW 43.131.070 shall be used to determine whether or not
each advisory committee shall be continued));

(3) Undertake studies,
research, and analysis necessary to carry out the provisions of chapter 9, Laws
of 1989 1st ex. sess. in accordance with RCW 43.70.050;

(4) Delegate powers,
duties, and functions of the department to employees of the department as the
secretary deems necessary to carry out the provisions of chapter 9, Laws of
1989 1st ex. sess.;

(5) Enter into
contracts on behalf of the department to carry out the purposes of chapter 9,
Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess.;

(6) Act for the state
in the initiation of, or the participation in, any intergovernmental program to
the purposes of chapter 9, Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess.; or

(7) Solicit and accept
gifts, grants, bequests, devises, or other funds from public and private
sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The public health
supplemental account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from
gifts, bequests, devises, or funds, whose use is determined to further the
purpose of maintaining and improving the health of Washington residents through
the public health system must be deposited into the account. Money in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for maintaining and improving the health of Washington
residents through the public health system. Expenditures from the account
shall not be used to pay for or add permanent full-time equivalent staff
positions.

(2) The department
shall file an annual statement of the financial condition, transactions, and
affairs of any program funded under this section in a form and manner
prescribed by the office of financial management. A copy of the annual
statement shall be filed with the speaker of the house of representatives and
the president of the senate.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings
required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under
RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial
management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government
pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial
management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary
to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this
subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal
justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account,
the public employees' retirement system plan 2 account, the public health
supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal
fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University
building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University
capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent
common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent
fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings
to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal
justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account,
the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
public health supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account,
the resource management cost account, the site closure account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal
fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University
building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University
capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent
common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university
permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
All earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Section 4 of this act
expires March 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Section 5 of this act
takes effect March 1, 2002.

---
END ---