BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that the statewide

_8 emergency communications network of enhanced 911
telephone

_9 service, which allows an immediate display of a caller's

10 identification and location, has served to further the
safety,

11 health, and welfare of the state's citizens, and has
saved lives.

12 The legislature further finds that statewide
operation and

13 management of the enhanced 911 system will create
efficiencies of

14 operation and permit greater local control of county 911

15 operations, and further that some counties will continue
to need

16 assistance from the state to maintain minimum enhanced
911 service

17 levels.

18

p. 1 HB
1181

_1 Sec. 2. RCW
38.52.540 and 1998 c 304 s 14 are each amended to read

_2 as follows:

_3 The enhanced 911 account is created in the state
treasury. All

_4 receipts from the state enhanced 911 excise tax imposed
by RCW

_5 82.14B.030 shall be deposited into the account. Moneys
in the

_6 account shall be used only to help ((implement and))
operate

_7 enhanced 911 statewide. ((Moneys in the account may
be used to

_8 provide salary assistance on a temporary basis not to
exceed three

_9 years to counties with a population of less than
seventy-five

10 thousand that need additional resources to cover
unfunded costs

11 that can be shown to result from handling 911 calls.
Moneys in the

12 account may be used to assist multicounty regions,
including

13 ongoing salary assistance for multicounty regions
consisting of

14 counties with populations of less than seventy-five

15 thousand. However,)) Funds shall not be
distributed to any county

16 that has not imposed the maximum county enhanced 911
taxes allowed

17 under RCW 82.14B.030 (1) and (2). The state enhanced
911

18 coordinator, with the advice and assistance of the enhanced
911

19 advisory committee, shall specify by rule the purposes
for which

20 moneys may be expended from this account.

21 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 38.52

22 RCW to read as follows:

23 In specifying rules defining the purposes for which
moneys may

24 be expended, the state enhanced 911 coordinator, with
the advice

25 and assistance of the enhanced 911 advisory committee,
is

26 authorized to enter into statewide agreements to improve
the

27 efficiency of 911 services for all counties and shall
consider

28 base needs of individual counties for specific

29 assistance. Priorities for enhanced 911 funding are:
First, to

30 assure that 911 dialing is operational statewide;
second, to

31 assist as necessary to assure that counties can achieve
a basic

32 service level for 911 operations; and third, to assist
counties as

33 practicable to acquire items of a capital nature
appropriate to

34 increasing 911 effectiveness.

35 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary
for the immediate

HB 1181 p. 2

_1 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

_2 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

_3 takes effect July 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1181