BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that, although family leave laws have assisted individuals to balance the
demands of the workplace with their family responsibilities, more needs to be
done to achieve the goals of work force stability and economic security. In particular,
the legislature finds that many individuals do not have access to family leave
laws, and those who do may not be in a financial position to take family leave
that is unpaid, and that employer-paid benefits, including family leave and
disability benefits, meet only a relatively small part of this need. The
legislature declares it to be in the public interest to establish a program
that: (1) Provides additional options for individuals to use in balancing work
and family responsibilities; (2) is in addition to those programs offered by
employers; (3) provides limited income support for a reasonable period while an
individual is away from work on family leave; and (4) reduces the impact on
state income-support programs by increasing an individual's ability to provide
care-giving services for family members while maintaining an employment
relationship.

---
END ---