BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The Washington national
guard's counterdrug task force has been assisting local, state, and federal
agencies in state-wide counternarcotic efforts for the last ten years. The
counterdrug task force supplies trained personnel and specialized equipment to
support these antidrug efforts.

The federal government
is authorized to seize property used in connection with the illegal manufacture
or distribution of controlled substances under the federal asset forfeiture
program. The departments of justice and treasury are authorized by federal
statute to transfer this seized property to any state or local law enforcement
agency that participated in the seizure of the property. However, in order to
be eligible to receive the property, the state or local agency that
participated in the seizure must be deemed a law enforcement agency.

The purpose of this act
is to recognize the Washington national guard's counterdrug task force as a law
enforcement agency strictly for the purposes of allowing the counterdrug task force
to receive an equitable share of proceeds under the federal asset forfeiture
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 38.08 RCW to read as follows:

For the limited and
specific purpose of receiving an equitable share of proceeds under the federal
asset forfeiture program (21 U.S.C. Sec. 881 et seq.), the Washington national
guard's counterdrug task force is considered a law enforcement agency. All
proceeds received by the Washington national guard counterdrug task force under
the federal asset forfeiture program must be spent in accordance with federal
laws and regulations.

Nothing in
this section creates any new law enforcement powers, duties, or obligations for
the Washington national guard or the counterdrug task force. Nothing in this
section creates any new rights, obligations, or benefits for pensions, funding,
or liabilities afforded existing law enforcement agencies.

---
END ---