BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The state military
department is hereby authorized to sell or exchange the state armory land and
buildings in the city of Seattle at the address 1601 W. Armory Way, Seattle,
Washington 98119-2786, commonly known as the Pier 91 property, legally described
as follows:

All those lands lying
and being situate in Seattle, King County, Washington and being that portion of
Seattle tide lands and streets and alleys of the City of Seattle, King County,
State of Washington, lying south of Lawton Way viaduct more particularly
described as follows:

Beginning at a city
monument located at the intersection of the centerlines of 15th Avenue West and
West Garfield Street, thence S. 89E 51' 38" W. along the centerline of said
Garfield Street, 381.69 feet, thence N. 0E 08' 22" W. 50.00 feet to the north line of
Garfield Street, the true point of beginning of parcel, thence N. 0E 08' 22" W. along the westerly edge of the
existing rope walk structure a distance of 65.00 feet, thence N. 89E 51' 38" E. along said structure a distance
of 9.62 feet to a point which is 21 feet west of the cast line of lot 8, Block
131, Seattle Tide Lands, thence N. 0E 08' 22" W. parallel to and 21 feet westerly
from the east line of lots 8 to 1, inclusive, of block 131, extended across
West Howe Street, now vacated, and 21 feet westerly from the east line of lots
9 to 3, inclusive, of block 128, Seattle Tide Lands to a point which is 21 feet
westerly from the east line of said lot 3 and 30 feet southerly from the north
line of said Lot 3, thence S. 89E 51' 38" W. parallel to the north line of
said Lot 3 a distance of 34.68 feet, thence N. 0E 08' 22" W. parallel to and 55.68 feet
westerly from the east line of lots 2 and 3 of said block 128 a distance of
130.00 feet to the southeast corner of lot 1 of said block 128, thence N. 33E 43' 50" W. a distance of 142.38 feet to a
point 20 feet southwesterly from (when measured at right angles to) the
centerline of the most southwesterly line of tracks of the Northern Pacific
Railway Company along Lawton Way, thence N. 39E 52' 00" W. parallel to and 20 feet
southwesterly from said track centerline, a distance of 754.03 feet to an
intersection with a line which is the northerly extension of a line parallel to
and 20 feet easterly from (when measured at right angles to) the centerline of
the most easterly line of tracks of said Railroad Company as said tracks are
tangent through lots 6 and 7 of block 126 and lots 1 to 9 inclusive of block
129 of said addition, thence S. 0E 06' 52" E. along the above described line parallel
to and 20 feet easterly from said railroad centerline a distance of 1479.39
feet, thence parallel to and 20 feet easterly from said railroad centerline of
a 1030.84 foot radius curve to the left (the long chord of which curve bears S.
16E 23'
52" E. 578.07 feet) an arc distance of 585.92 feet, thence S. 32E 40' 52" E. parallel to and 20 feet easterly
from said railroad centerline and the southerly extension thereof tangent
through lots 5 and 6 of block 130 of said addition a distance of 423.46 feet to
the north line of Garfield Street, thence N. 89E 51' 38" E. along the north line of Garfield
Street, a distance of 196.79 feet to the true point of beginning; containing
24.7485 acres, more or less.

(2) Before any sale or
exchange is made under the provisions of this section the property must be
independently appraised by a certified commercial real estate appraiser. Any
such sale or exchange shall be made to the highest competent bidder for a price
not less than the independently appraised value of the property and pursuant to
a call for bids published in at least one issue of a legal newspaper of general
circulation in King county at least fifteen days prior to the date fixed for
the bid closing.

(3) The sale or
exchange shall be under the direction of the adjutant general in accordance
with procedures provided by law. The adjutant general shall proceed with the
sale or exchange only if, in the opinion of the adjutant general, the proceeds
from the sale or exchange of the land and buildings described in this section,
together with other funds available to the state military department, are
sufficient to purchase or otherwise acquire other real property for the state
military department and for the acquisition, purchase, construction,
furnishing, and equipping of buildings and other improvements on said real
property and the appurtenances thereto.

(4) The proceeds of the
sale or exchange of the property legally described in this section shall be
transmitted by the adjutant general to the state treasurer to be set aside and
used exclusively by the military department for the purposes set forth in this
section.

(5) Upon
the sale or exchange of the property described in this section, the state
military department may select a site or sites for a new armory or readiness
center and purchase or otherwise acquire real property for the state of
Washington for the purposes set forth in this section and to acquire, purchase,
construct, furnish, and equip buildings and other improvements on such real
property and the appurtenances thereto.

---
END ---