BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.09.200 and 1979
ex.s. c 152 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
and declares it to be in the public interest and for the protection of the
health and welfare of the residents of the state of Washington that a proper
regulatory and inspection program be instituted in connection with the
providing of medical, dental, and other health services to recipients of public
assistance and medically indigent persons. In order to effectively accomplish
such purpose and to assure that the recipient of such services receives such
services as are paid for by the state of Washington, the acceptance by the
recipient of such services, and by practitioners of reimbursement for
performing such services, shall authorize the secretary of the department of
social and health services or his designee, to inspect and audit all records in
connection with the providing of such services.

However, the
legislature does not intend providers' billing practices to be evaluated under
rules not clearly in place and publicized to providers at the time the bill was
prepared. The legislature finds that the public-private partnership necessary
to provide services to recipients of public assistance and medically indigent
persons will be jeopardized if there is not scrupulous fair play on the part of
both parties. That fair play includes having easy to understand billing rules
applied prospectively only.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to authorize the state of Washington to deny payment for a
good or service, impose any liability for excess payments made in the past
under RCW 74.09.220, nor otherwise attempt to recoup payments to health care
providers through assessment, deduction from future payments or otherwise, or
in any way penalize providers for billing practices in the absence of clear and
convincing evidence of intentional and knowing misconduct or clear disregard
for understandable and specific billing rules issued by the department in
writing to providers before the services were provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

In the absence of clear
and convincing evidence of provider negligence, if the department denies
payment for a bill or attempts, in any way, to recoup a prior payment for a good
or service, the department shall permit a health care provider to rebill the
charge to the department if there is a way to do so that would make the bill
appropriately payable under this chapter, even if in so doing it must waive
billing deadlines.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

Unless specifically
exempted from this section, this chapter preempts all other law applicable to
this subject matter to the greatest extent permitted by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

This act applies to all
causes of action commenced on or after July 1, 2000. All recoupments collected
in violation of this act after July 1, 2000, shall be promptly refunded to the
health care providers. To this extent, this act applies retroactively, but in
all other respects it applies prospectively.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---