BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 82.08

_7 RCW to read as follows:

_8 (1) The definitions in this subsection apply for the
purposes

_9 of this section.

10 (a) "Acquisition of equipment" means the
equipment is under the

11 dominion and control of the recipient.

12 (b) "Eligible generating equipment" means
equipment necessary

13 and integral to the operation of an eligible generating
facility.

14 (c) "Eligible generating facility" means
an electrical

15 generating facility that has a generating capacity of at
least two

16 hundred kilowatts.

17 (d) "Facility" means structures that
house, support, contain,

p. 1 HB
1191

_1 or steady equipment essential to the generation of
electricity,

_2 and includes structures used by personnel to provide
exclusive

_3 support to the facility.

_4 (2) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply
to:

_5 (a) Site preparation or construction of an eligible
generating

_6 facility;

_7 (b) Expansion or renovation of an existing facility
if the

_8 expansion or renovation results in an eligible
generating

_9 facility; or

10 (c) Acquisition and installation of eligible
generating

11 equipment.

12 (3) The following are not exempt under this section:

13 (a) Maintenance or operation of a facility;

14 (b) Property with a useful life of less than one
year, such as

15 consumables, supplies, and single-use items;

16 (c) Equipment used for administrative or sales
functions, such

17 as furniture, filing cabinets, or computers; and

18 (d) Structures, or parts of structures, used for
administrative

19 or sales functions.

20 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 82.12

21 RCW to read as follows:

22 (1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with
respect to

23 the use of eligible generating equipment or property
used as

24 components of eligible generating facilities, as each
are defined

25 in section 1 of this act.

26 (2) The following are not exempt under this section:

27 (a) Property used for maintenance or operation of a
facility;

28 (b) Property with a useful life of less than one
year, such as

29 consumables, supplies, and single-use items;

30 (c) Equipment used for administrative or sales
functions, such

31 as furniture, filing cabinets, or computers; and

32 (d) Structures, or parts of structures, used for
administrative

33 or sales functions.

34 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
October 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1191 p. 2