BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. PURPOSE. The purpose of this act
is to establish a system of licensing interpreters for the deaf that will
enhance the opportunities of persons who are deaf or hearing impaired to enjoy
the fruits of our society, increase their educational opportunities, enhance
their public safety and security, and allow them to more fully enjoy their
constitutional rights.

PART I - LICENSING INTERPRETERS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Board"
means the Washington board of interpreters for the deaf.

(2)
"Consumer" means a person who is hearing impaired or who requires
special communication techniques in order to communicate.

(3)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(4) "Director"
means the director of the department of licensing.

(5)
"Interpreter" means a person who engages in the act or practice of
interpreting for gain in the state of Washington, but does not include an
intermediary interpreter, as defined under RCW 2.42.110.

(6)
"Interpreting" means the act of translating or transliterating
English concepts to any or all necessary specialized language used by a
consumer or the act of translating a consumer's specialized vocabulary to
English concepts.

(7) "Specialized
vocabulary" means manual signs and gestures operating as visual or tactile
ways of communicating thoughts, ideas, and feelings, including but not limited
to American sign language, English-based sign language, cued speech, oral
interpreting, manually coded English, and contact sign language.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. LICENSE REQUIREMENT.
Effective December 1, 2003, a person may not represent himself or herself as an
interpreter, or engage in the practice of interpreting, for the deaf or hearing
impaired, without applying for a license, meeting the required qualifications,
and being licensed as an interpreter, except as exempted and provided by this
chapter. Effective December 1, 2003, a person or a public or private entity may
not knowingly employ a person for interpreting for the deaf or hearing impaired
unless the person is licensed by the department as an interpreter to engage in
the act of interpreting for the deaf or hearing impaired, except as exempted
and provided by this chapter.

Interpreters in
judicial or administrative proceedings are governed by chapter 2.42 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. REQUIREMENTS FOR BEING
LICENSED AS AN INTERPRETER. In addition to any other requirements that may be established
by departmental rule, a person may be licensed as an interpreter for the deaf
or hearing impaired only if he or she possesses current certification by the
national association of the deaf or the registry of interpreters for the deaf.

A licensed interpreter
must pass a criminal background check through the Washington state patrol
criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.834,
10.97.030, and 10.97.050, but the criminal background check need not include a
fingerprint check.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. EXCLUSIONS FROM CHAPTER.
This chapter does not apply to:

(1) Persons
interpreting for religious activities;

(2) Persons
volunteering to interpret without compensation, but not including persons volunteering
to interpret for state agency offices and state agency programs;

(3) Persons
interpreting during emergency situations. For purposes of this section,
"emergency situation" means a situation where an adult who receives
the interpretation services decides that the delay necessary to obtain a
licensed interpreter is likely to cause him or her injury or loss and signs a
waiver holding all persons harmless. The waiver must clearly state that the
adult who receives the interpretation services knows he or she has a right to
interpretation by a licensed interpreter and willingly waives this right;

(4) Persons who
interpret for family members and do not receive compensation for this
interpretation;

(5) Persons with
current certification from a recognized national association who interpret for
two hundred or fewer hours in any year;

(6) Persons who
interpret in public schools, except as provided under section 109 of this act;

(7) Persons who are
interns or students in training who are:

(a) Enrolled in a program
of study in interpreting at a recognized program of interpreter training or who
have graduated from a recognized program of interpreter training within the
previous two years;

(b) Interpreting under
the supervision of a licensed interpreter as part of a supervised program of
study;

(c) Otherwise
identified as interpreter interns or students in training; or

(d) Interpreting in
nonmental health, nonlegal, and nonlife-threatening situations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
105. BOARD OF INTERPRETERS FOR
THE DEAF. (1) The Washington board of interpreters for the deaf is created,
consisting of ten members as follows:

(a) The president of
the Washington state association of the deaf or the president's designee;

(b) The director of the
office of deaf and hard of hearing of the department of social and health
services or the director's designee;

(c) A representative
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction;

(d) A consumer of
interpreting services appointed by the secretary of the department of social
and health services; and

(e) One representative
appointed by each of the following groups:

(i) The Washington
state association of the deaf, interpreters chapter;

(ii) The Washington
state registry of interpreters for the deaf;

(iii) The American sign
language teachers association;

(iv) The Washington
school for the deaf;

(v) The Washington deaf
and blind citizens; and

(vi) Self-help for the
hard of hearing.

(2) If one of these
groups fails to appoint a person, the board shall select a person from that
group to represent the group. Board members shall serve staggered three-year
terms of office, except that the director shall determine the staggering of
terms by determining three initial members who have a one-year term of office
and three initial members who have two-year terms of office, with the remaining
three initial members having three-year terms of office. If a vacancy arises,
a person must be appointed by the appropriate appointing authority to fill the
remainder of the unexpired term of office.

(3) The members of the
board shall not receive compensation for their services on the board. Members
shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties by, and the board shall receive administrative
services and staff support from, the office of deaf and hard of hearing of the
department of social and health services. Members of the board are immune,
collectively and individually, from suit in any action, criminal or civil,
based upon any official acts performed in the course of their duties under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
106. AUTHORITY OF THE
DIRECTOR. The director shall:

(1) In consultation
with the board, adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to carry out the provisions
of this chapter, including qualifications required for a person to be licensed
as an interpreter;

(2) Determine what
education programs are equivalent to a deaf interpretation program from a
community or technical college in this state;

(3) Establish a
professional code of ethics for interpreters that is consistent with the code
of professional ethics for both the national association of the deaf and the
registry of interpreters for the deaf;

(4) Issue licenses for
interpreters, including the authority to issue licenses to persons who hold
licenses from other states with substantially equivalent licensing standards as
this state, with the normal authority that the director possesses to regulate
other licensed professions, including authorities authorized under chapters
18.118 and 43.24 RCW;

(5) Establish forms and
procedures necessary to administer this chapter; and

(6) Provide necessary
clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff as needed to implement
this chapter apart from the staffing and administrative support for the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
107. RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE
BOARD. The board shall make recommendations to the director and provide the
director with ongoing reviews of interpreter services and support systems for
interpreters, including a review of:

(1) Existing public and
private education programs and training resources for interpretation that are
provided in this state;

(2) The current number
of licensed interpreters;

(3) Areas of
interpreter shortage based upon geographic areas and types of interpreting,
such as mental health, education, and ethnic diversity; and

(4) The findings of the
regional centers for the deaf and hard of hearing, state affiliations of
nationally recognized organizations, and any other institution's lists of
interpreter problems and complaints.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
108. REVOKING OR SUSPENDING
LICENSES. The director, in consultation with the board, shall establish a
system to suspend or revoke licenses issued under this chapter and take other
disciplinary action in the form of imposing a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars
for each offense, if a licensee is found to be guilty of: (1) Obtaining a
license by means of fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment; or (2) violating
any of the provisions of this chapter, including any rules adopted by the
director to implement this chapter. A proceeding to suspend or revoke a
license, or take disciplinary action, must be initiated on the motion of the
director or a deputy appointed by the director. The director or a deputy may
preliminarily investigate a licensee on his or her own motion or may
investigate a licensee in response to a written complaint requesting suspension
or revocation, or the taking of disciplinary action, that is signed and
verified by a person or persons familiar with the facts. After the preliminary
investigation, the director or a deputy may initiate a formal proceeding for
the suspension or revocation of a license, or taking of disciplinary action,
before an administrative law judge of the office of administrative hearings.
The license must be suspended or revoked, or the disciplinary action taken, if,
by a preponderance of evidence, the administrative law judge determines that
the licensee does not meet the requirements necessary to be licensed as an
interpreter under this chapter or has violated the provisions of this chapter,
including any rules adopted by the director to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
109. EDUCATIONAL
INTERPRETERS. Educational interpreters employed in, by, or for a public school
must have successfully completed a thirty-hour training course offered through
the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Commencing in the year
2003, any person newly employed by or for a public school as an educational
interpreter must be a licensed interpreter and must have completed the
educational training offered by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. If an educational interpreter for a public school has been
employed in that capacity for four or more years prior to January 1, 2003, with
satisfactory evaluations and without a period of more than six months between
employment in the public school, the employee may be retained by the public
school as an educational interpreter without meeting these standards. If a
public school is unable to find a licensed interpreter, the public school may
request a nonrenewable one-year waiver from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction and must demonstrate that efforts have been made to seek an
appropriately qualified person. The department shall annually provide a list
of licensed interpreters to the superintendent of public instruction and shall
make that list available upon request. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall send a list of all licensed interpreters who have
successfully completed the training to each school district every year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
110. VIOLATIONS. Violation of
or aiding in violation of any part of section 102 of this act constitutes a
class 1 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW.

PART II - INTERPRETERS IN JUDICIAL OR
ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDINGS

Sec. 201. RCW 2.42.010 and 1989 c
358 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

It is hereby declared
to be the policy of this state to secure the constitutional rights of deaf
persons and of other persons who, because of impairment of hearing or speech,
are unable to readily understand or communicate the spoken English language, and
who consequently cannot be fully protected in legal proceedings unless ((qualified))
licensed interpreters are available to assist them.

It is the
intent of the legislature in the passage of this chapter to provide for the
appointment of ((such)) licensed interpreters.

Sec. 202. RCW 2.42.050 and 1989 c
358 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Every ((qualified))
licensed interpreter, or other person, appointed under this
chapter in a judicial or administrative proceeding shall, before beginning to
interpret, take an oath that a true interpretation will be made to the person
being examined of all the proceedings in a manner which the person understands,
and that the interpreter will repeat the statements of the person being
examined to the court or other agency conducting the proceedings, to the best
of the interpreter's skill and judgment.

Sec. 203. RCW 2.42.110 and 1991 c
171 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) (("Impaired
person" means a person who, because of a hearing or speech impairment,
cannot readily understand or communicate in spoken language; and includes
persons who are deaf, deaf and blind, speech impaired, or hard of hearing.

(2) "Qualified
interpreter" means a visual language interpreter who is certified by the
state or is certified by the registry of interpreters for the deaf to hold the
comprehensive skills certificate or both certificates of interpretation and
transliteration, or an interpreter who can readily translate statements of
speech impaired persons into spoken language.

(3))) "Intermediary interpreter" means a
hearing impaired interpreter who holds a ((reverse skills certificate by the
state or is certified by the registry of interpreters for the deaf with a
reverse skills)) certificate from a nationally recognized organization,
who meets the requirements of RCW 2.42.130, and who is able to assist in
providing an accurate interpretation between spoken and sign language or
between variants of sign language by acting as an intermediary between a
hearing impaired person and a ((qualified)) licensed hearing
interpreter.

(((4))) (2)
"Appointing authority" means the presiding officer or similar
official of any court, department, board, commission, agency, licensing
authority, or legislative body of the state or of any political subdivision.

Sec. 204. RCW 2.42.120 and 1985 c
389 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a hearing
impaired person is a party or witness at any stage of a judicial or
quasi-judicial proceeding in the state or in a political subdivision, including
but not limited to civil and criminal court proceedings, grand jury
proceedings, proceedings before a magistrate, juvenile proceedings, adoption
proceedings, mental health commitment proceedings, and any proceeding in which
a hearing impaired person may be subject to confinement or criminal sanction,
the appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a ((qualified)) licensed
interpreter to interpret the proceedings.

(2) If the parent,
guardian, or custodian of a juvenile brought before a court is hearing
impaired, the appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a ((qualified))
licensed interpreter to interpret the proceedings.

(3) If a hearing
impaired person participates in a program or activity ordered by a court as
part of the sentence or order of disposition, required as part of a diversion
agreement or deferred prosecution program, or required as a condition of
probation or parole, the appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a ((qualified))
licensed interpreter to interpret exchange of information during the
program or activity.

(4) If a law
enforcement agency conducts a criminal investigation involving the interviewing
of a hearing impaired person, whether as a victim, witness, or suspect, the
appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a ((qualified)) licensed
interpreter throughout the investigation. Whenever a law enforcement agency
conducts a criminal investigation involving the interviewing of a minor child
whose parent, guardian, or custodian is hearing impaired, whether as a victim,
witness, or suspect, the appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a ((qualified))
licensed interpreter throughout the investigation. ((No)) An
employee of the law enforcement agency who has responsibilities other than
interpreting may not be appointed as the ((qualified)) licensed
interpreter.

(5) If a hearing
impaired person is arrested for an alleged violation of a criminal law the
arresting officer or the officer's supervisor shall, at the earliest possible
time, procure and arrange payment for a ((qualified)) licensed
interpreter for any notification of rights, warning, interrogation, or taking
of a statement. ((No)) An employee of the law enforcement agency
who has responsibilities other than interpreting may not be appointed as
the ((qualified)) licensed interpreter.

(6) Where it is the
policy and practice of a court of this state or of a political subdivision to
appoint and pay counsel for persons who are indigent, the appointing authority
shall appoint and pay for a ((qualified)) licensed interpreter
for hearing impaired persons to facilitate communication with counsel in all
phases of the preparation and presentation of the case.

Sec. 205. RCW 2.42.130 and 1991 c
171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a ((qualified))
licensed interpreter for a hearing impaired person is required, the
appointing authority shall request a ((qualified interpreter and/or an
intermediary)) licensed interpreter through the department of social
and health services, office of deaf services, or through any community center
for hearing impaired persons which operates an interpreter referral service.
The office of deaf services and these community centers shall maintain an
up-to-date list or lists of licensed interpreters ((that are
certified by the state and/or by the registry of interpreters for the deaf)).

(2) The appointing
authority shall make a preliminary determination, on the basis of testimony or
stated needs of the hearing impaired person, that the licensed
interpreter is able in that particular proceeding, program, or activity to
interpret accurately all communication to and from the hearing impaired
person. If at any time during the proceeding, program, or activity, in the
opinion of the hearing impaired person or a qualified observer, the licensed
interpreter does not provide accurate, impartial, and effective communication
with the hearing impaired person the appointing authority shall appoint another
((qualified)) licensed interpreter. ((No otherwise qualified))
A licensed interpreter who is a relative of any participant in the
proceeding may not be appointed.

Sec. 206. RCW 2.42.140 and 1985 c
389 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

If the communication
mode or language of the hearing impaired person is not readily interpretable,
the interpreter or hearing impaired person shall notify the appointing
authority who shall appoint and pay an intermediary interpreter to assist the
((qualified)) licensed interpreter.

Sec. 207. RCW 2.42.150 and 1985 c
389 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to a ((qualified))
licensed interpreter may not be waived except when:

(a) A hearing impaired
person requests a waiver through the use of a ((qualified)) licensed
interpreter;

(b) The counsel, if
any, of the hearing impaired person consents; and

(c) The appointing
authority determines that the waiver has been made knowingly, voluntarily, and
intelligently.

(2) Waiver of a ((qualified))
licensed interpreter shall not preclude the hearing impaired person from
claiming his or her right to a ((qualified)) licensed interpreter
at a later time during the proceeding, program, or activity.

Sec. 208. RCW 2.42.160 and 1991 c 171
s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A ((qualified))
licensed and/or intermediary interpreter shall not, without the written
consent of the parties to the communication, be examined as to any
communication the interpreter interprets under circumstances where the
communication is privileged by law.

(2) A ((qualified))
licensed and/or intermediary interpreter shall not, without the written
consent of the parties to the communication, be examined as to any information
the interpreter obtains while interpreting pertaining to any proceeding then
pending.

Sec. 209. RCW 2.42.170 and 1991 c
171 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A ((qualified)) licensed
and/or intermediary interpreter appointed under this chapter is entitled to a
reasonable fee for services, including waiting time and reimbursement for
actual necessary travel expenses. The fee for services for interpreters for
hearing impaired persons shall be in accordance with standards established by
the department of social and health services, office of deaf services.

Sec. 210. RCW 2.42.180 and 1985 c
389 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

At the request of any
party to the proceeding or on the appointing authority's initiative, the
appointing authority may order that the testimony of the hearing impaired
person and the interpretation of the proceeding by the ((qualified)) licensed
interpreter be visually recorded for use in verification of the official
transcript of the proceeding.

In any judicial
proceeding involving a capital offense, the appointing authority shall order
that the testimony of the hearing impaired person and the interpretation of the
proceeding by the ((qualified)) licensed interpreter be visually
recorded for use in verification of the official transcript of the proceeding.

PART III - MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. This act takes effect
December 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. Sections 101 through 110
of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. Section captions and part
headings used in this act are not part of the law.

---
END ---