BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.372 and 1992 c
39 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The driver of a
school bus who observes a violation of RCW 46.61.370 ((may)) shall
prepare a written report on a form provided by the state patrol or another law
enforcement agency indicating that a violation has occurred. The driver of the
school bus or a school official ((may)) shall deliver the report
to a law enforcement officer of the state, county, or municipality in which the
violation occurred but not more than seventy-two hours after the violation
occurred. The driver shall include in the report the time and location at
which the violation occurred, the vehicle license plate number, and a
description of the vehicle involved in the violation.

(2) The
law enforcement officer shall ((initiate an investigation of the reported
violation)) within ten working days after receiving the report described in
subsection (1) of this section ((by contacting the owner of the motor
vehicle involved in the reported violation and requesting the owner to supply
information identifying the driver. Failure to investigate within the ten
working day period does not prohibit further investigation or prosecution. If,
after an investigation, the law enforcement officer is able to identify the
driver and has reasonable cause to believe a violation of RCW 46.61.370 has occurred,
the law enforcement officer shall prepare a notice of traffic infraction and
have it served upon the driver of the vehicle)) mail a written notice of
traffic infraction to the registered owner of the vehicle involved in the
violation. It is a complete defense to this infraction that the registered
owner of the vehicle has filed a police report that the vehicle has been stolen
or that the vehicle has been sold and is no longer in his or her possession.

--- END ---