BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.57.010 and 1999 c
165 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of any town or city located in a county with a population of less
than one million may create a public facilities district. The legislative
authorities of any contiguous group of towns or cities located in a county or
counties each with a population of less than one million may enter an agreement
under chapter 39.34 RCW for the creation and joint operation of a public facilities
district.

(2) A public facilities
district shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the city or town or
contiguous group of cities or towns that created the district.

(3)(a) A public
facilities district created by a single city or town shall be governed by a
board of directors consisting of five members selected as follows: (i) Two
members appointed by the legislative authority of the city or town; and (ii)
three members appointed by legislative authority based on recommendations from
local organizations. The members appointed under (a)(i) of this subsection,
shall not be members of the legislative authority of the city or town. The
members appointed under (a)(ii) of this subsection, shall be based on
recommendations received from local organizations that may include, but are not
limited to the local chamber of commerce, local economic development council,
and local labor council. The members shall serve four-year terms. Of the
initial members, one must be appointed for a one-year term, one must be
appointed for a two-year term, one must be appointed for a three-year term, and
the remainder must be appointed for four-year terms.

(b) A public facilities
district created by (([a])) a contiguous group of cities and
towns shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of seven members
selected as follows: (i) Three members appointed by the legislative
authorities of the cities and towns; and (ii) four members appointed by the
legislative authority based on recommendations from local organizations. The
members appointed under (b)(i) of this subsection shall not be members of the
legislative authorities of the cities and towns. The members appointed under
(b)(ii) of this subsection, shall be based on recommendations received from
local organizations that include, but are not limited to the local chamber of
commerce, local economic development council, local labor council, and a
neighborhood organization that is directly affected by the location of the ((regional
center)) public facility in their area. The members of the board of
directors shall be appointed in accordance with the terms of the agreement
under chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint operation of the district and shall serve
four-year terms. Of the initial members, one must be appointed for a one-year
term, one must be appointed for a two-year term, one must be appointed for a
three-year term, and the remainder must be appointed for four-year terms.

(4) A public facilities
district is a municipal corporation, an independent taxing "authority"
within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a
"taxing district" within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution.

(5) A public facilities
district shall constitute a body corporate and shall possess all the usual
powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as all other powers that
may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by statute, including, but not
limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into
contracts, and to sue and be sued.

(6) A public facilities
district may acquire and transfer real and personal property by lease,
sublease, purchase, or sale. No direct or collateral attack on any
metropolitan facilities district purported to be authorized or created in
conformance with this chapter may be commenced more than thirty days after
creation by the city legislative authority.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.57.020 and 1999 c
165 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A public facilities
district is authorized to acquire, construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip,
reequip, repair, finance, and operate one or more ((regional centers)) public
facilities. For purposes of this chapter, (("regional center"))
"public facility" means a convention, conference, cultural,
community, technology, or special events center, or any combination of
facilities, and related parking facilities((, serving a regional population))
constructed, improved, or rehabilitated after July 25, 1999, at a cost of at
least ten million dollars, including debt service. (("Regional
center")) "Public facility" also includes an existing
convention, conference, cultural, community, technology, or special
events center, and related parking facilities((, serving a regional population,))
that is improved or rehabilitated after July 25, 1999, where the costs of
improvement or rehabilitation are at least ten million dollars, including debt
service. ((A regional center is conclusively presumed to serve a regional
population if state and local government investment in the construction,
improvement, or rehabilitation of the regional center is equal to or greater
than ten million dollars.))

(2) A public facilities
district may impose charges and fees for the use of its facilities, and may
accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of a ((regional
center)) public facility.

(3) A public facilities
district may impose charges, fees, and taxes authorized in RCW 35.57.040, and
use revenues derived therefrom for the purpose of paying principal and interest
payments on bonds issued by the public facilities district to construct a ((regional
center)) public facility.

(4) Notwithstanding the
establishment of a career, civil, or merit service system, a public facilities
district may contract with a public or private entity for the operation or
management of its public facilities.

(5) A public facilities
district is authorized to use the supplemental alternative public works
contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the
design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any ((regional
center)) public facility.

Sec. 3. RCW 35.57.040 and 1999 c
165 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board of
directors of the public facilities district may impose the following for the
purpose of funding a ((regional center)) public facility:

(a) Charges and fees
for the use of any of its facilities;

(b) Admission charges
under RCW 35.57.100;

(c) Vehicle parking
charges under RCW 35.57.110; and

(d) Sales and use taxes
authorized under RCW 82.14.048 and 82.14.390.

(2) The board may
accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of a ((regional
center)) public facility. The revenue from the charges, fees, and
taxes imposed under this section shall be used only for the purposes authorized
by this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 35.57.060 and 1999 c
165 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The board of directors
of the public facilities district shall have authority to authorize the
expenditure of funds for the public purposes of preparing and distributing
information to the general public and promoting, advertising, improving,
developing, operating, and maintaining a ((regional center)) public
facility. Nothing contained in this section may be construed to authorize
preparation and distribution of information to the general public for the
purpose of influencing the outcome of a district election.

Sec. 5. RCW 35.57.100 and 1999 c
165 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

A public facility
district may levy and fix a tax of not more than one cent on twenty cents or
fraction thereof to be paid by the person who pays an admission charge to a ((regional
center)) public facility. This includes a tax on persons who are
admitted free of charge or at reduced rates if other persons pay a charge or a
regular higher charge for the same privileges or accommodations.

The term
"admission charge" includes:

(1) A charge made for
season tickets or subscriptions;

(2) A cover charge, or
a charge made for use of seats and tables reserved or otherwise, and other
similar accommodations;

(3) A charge made for
food and refreshment if free entertainment, recreation, or amusement is
provided;

(4) A charge made for
rental or use of equipment or facilities for purposes of recreation or
amusement; if the rental of the equipment or facilities is necessary to the
enjoyment of a privilege for which a general admission is charged, the combined
charges shall be considered as the admission charge;

(5) Automobile parking
charges if the amount of the charge is determined according to the number of
passengers in the automobile.

Sec. 6. RCW 35.57.110 and 1999 c
165 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

A public facility district
may levy and fix a tax on any vehicle parking charges imposed at any parking
facility that is owned or leased by the public facility district as part of a
((regional center)) public facility. No county or city or town
within which the ((regional center)) public facility is located
may impose a tax of the same or similar kind on any vehicle parking charges at
the facility. For the purposes of this section, "vehicle parking
charges" means only the actual parking charges exclusive of taxes and
service charges and the value of any other benefit conferred. The tax
authorized under this section shall be at the rate of not more than ten
percent.

Sec. 7. RCW 36.100.030 and 1999
c 165 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A public facilities
district is authorized to acquire, construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip,
reequip, repair, and operate sports facilities, entertainment facilities,
convention facilities, or ((regional centers)) public facilities
as defined in RCW 35.57.020, together with contiguous parking facilities. The
taxes that are provided for in this chapter may only be imposed for these
purposes.

(2) A public facilities
district may enter into agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint
provision and operation of such facilities and may enter into contracts under
chapter 39.34 RCW where any party to the contract provides and operates such
facilities for the other party or parties to the contract.

(3) Notwithstanding the
establishment of a career, civil, or merit service system, a public ((facility
[facilities])) facilities district may contract with a public or
private entity for the operation or management of its public facilities.

(4) A public facilities
district is authorized to use the supplemental alternative public works
contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the
design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any of its
public facilities.

(5) A public facilities
district may impose charges and fees for the use of its facilities, and may
accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations.

Sec. 8. RCW 36.100.060 and 1999
c 165 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To carry out the
purpose of this chapter, a public facilities district may issue general
obligation bonds, not to exceed an amount, together with any outstanding
nonvoter approved general obligation indebtedness, equal to one-half of one
percent of the value of taxable property within the district, as the term
"value of taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. A
facilities district additionally may issue general obligation bonds for capital
purposes only, together with any outstanding general obligation indebtedness,
not to exceed an amount equal to one and one-fourth percent of the value of the
taxable property within the district, as the term "value of taxable
property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when authorized by the voters of
the public facilities district pursuant to Article VIII, section 6 of the state
Constitution, and to provide for the retirement thereof by excess property tax
levies as provided in this chapter.

(2) General obligation
bonds may be issued with a maturity of up to thirty years, and shall be issued
and sold in accordance with the provisions of chapter 39.46 RCW.

(3) The general
obligation bonds may be payable from the operating revenues of the public
facilities district in addition to the tax receipts of the district.

(4) The excise tax
imposed pursuant to RCW 36.100.040 shall terminate upon final payment of all
bonded indebtedness for its public facilities, except that the excise tax may
be reauthorized by a public vote, in the same manner as originally authorized,
for funding of additional public facilities or a ((regional center)) public
facility, as defined in RCW 35.57.020.

Sec. 9. RCW 36.100.210 and 1999
c 165 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

A public facility
district may levy and fix a tax of not more than one cent on twenty cents or
fraction thereof to be paid by the person who pays an admission charge to a ((regional
center)) public facility, as defined in RCW 35.57.020. This
includes a tax on persons who are admitted free of charge or at reduced rates
if other persons pay a charge or a regular higher charge for the same
privileges or accommodations.

The term
"admission charge" includes:

(1) A charge made for
season tickets or subscriptions;

(2) A cover charge, or
a charge made for use of seats and tables reserved or otherwise, and other
similar accommodations;

(3) A charge made for
food and refreshment if free entertainment, recreation, or amusement is
provided;

(4) A charge made for
rental or use of equipment or facilities for purposes of recreation or
amusement; if the rental of the equipment or facilities is necessary to the
enjoyment of a privilege for which a general admission is charged, the combined
charges shall be considered as the admission charge;

(5)
Automobile parking charges if the amount of the charge is determined according
to the number of passengers in the automobile.

Sec. 10. RCW 36.100.220 and 1999
c 165 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

A public
facility district may levy and fix a tax on any vehicle parking charges imposed
at any parking facility that is owned or leased by the public facility district
as part of a ((regional center)) public facility, as defined in
RCW 35.57.020. No county or city or town within which the ((regional center))
public facility, as defined in RCW 35.57.020, is located may impose a
tax of the same or similar kind on any vehicle parking charges at the
facility. For the purposes of this section, "vehicle parking
charges" means only the actual parking charges exclusive of taxes and
service charges and the value of any other benefit conferred. The tax
authorized under this section shall be at the rate of not more than ten
percent.

Sec. 11. RCW 82.14.390 and 1999 c
165 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (6) of this section, the governing body of a public facilities
district created under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences construction
of a new ((regional center)) public facility, or improvement or
rehabilitation of an existing new ((regional center)) public facility,
before January 1, ((2003)) 2005, may impose a sales and use tax
in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the public facilities district. The rate of tax shall
not exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the amount of tax
otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the
collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public
facilities district.

(3) No tax may be
collected under this section before August 1, 2000. The tax imposed in this
section shall expire when the bonds issued for the construction of the ((regional
center)) public facility and related parking facilities are retired,
but not more than twenty-five years after the tax is first collected.

(4) Moneys collected
under this section shall only be used for the purposes set forth in RCW
35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount from other public or private
sources equal to thirty-three percent of the amount collected under this
section, provided that amounts generated from nonvoter approved taxes
authorized under chapter 35.57 RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under
chapter 36.100 RCW shall not constitute a public or private source. For the
purpose of this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited
to cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or
improvement of the ((regional center)) public facility, land that
is donated and used for the siting of the ((regional center)) public
facility, cash or in-kind contributions from public or private foundations,
or amounts attributed to private sector partners as part of a public and
private partnership agreement negotiated by the public facilities district.

(5) The combined total
tax levied under this section shall not be greater than 0.033 percent. If both
a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public
facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this
section, the tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter
35.57 RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by a public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.

(6) A public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW is not eligible to impose the tax
under this section if the legislative authority of the county where the public
facilities district is located has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

(7) As
used in this section, "public facility" has the same meaning as in
RCW 35.57.020.

---
END ---