BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 35.87A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority may modify the boundaries of a parking and business improvement area
by ordinance, adopted after a hearing before the legislative authority. The
legislative authority may modify an area either by expanding or reducing the
existing boundaries. If the modification to the boundaries is to expand
existing boundaries, the expansion area must be adjacent to an existing
boundary. A modification to an existing boundary may occur no more than once
per year and may not affect an area with a projected assessment fee greater
than ten percent of the current assessment role for the existing area. If the
modification of an area results in the boundary being expanded, the assessments
for the new area shall be established pursuant to RCW 35.87A.080 and 35.87A.090
and any other applicable provision of this chapter.

(2) The
legislative authority shall adopt a resolution of intention to modify the
boundaries of an area at least fifteen days prior to the hearing required in
subsection (1) of this section. The resolution shall specify the proposed
modification and shall give the time and place of the hearing. Notice of the
hearing shall be made in accordance with RCW 35.87A.050.

--- END ---