BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.401 and 1998 c
290 s 1 and 1998 c 82 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(a) Except as
authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled
substance.

(1) Any person who
violates this subsection with respect to:

(i) a controlled
substance classified in Schedule I or II which is a narcotic drug or
flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, is guilty of a crime and upon
conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, or (A) fined not more
than twenty-five thousand dollars if the crime involved less than two kilograms
of the drug, or both such imprisonment and fine; or (B) if the crime involved
two or more kilograms of the drug, then fined not more than one hundred
thousand dollars for the first two kilograms and not more than fifty dollars
for each gram in excess of two kilograms, or both such imprisonment and fine;

(ii) amphetamine or delivery
or possession with intent to deliver methamphetamine, is guilty of a crime
and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, or (A) fined
not more than twenty-five thousand dollars if the crime involved less than two
kilograms of the drug, or both such imprisonment and fine; or (B) if the crime
involved two or more kilograms of the drug, then fined not more than one
hundred thousand dollars for the first two kilograms and not more than fifty
dollars for each gram in excess of two kilograms, or both such imprisonment and
fine. Three thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended. As collected,
the first three thousand dollars of the fine must be deposited with the law
enforcement agency having responsibility for cleanup of laboratories, sites, or
substances used in the manufacture of the methamphetamine. The fine moneys
deposited with that law enforcement agency must be used for such clean-up cost;

(iii) manufacture of
methamphetamine, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for
not more than twenty years, or (A) fined not more than twenty-five thousand
dollars if the crime involved less than two kilograms of the drug, or both such
imprisonment and fine; or (B) if the crime involved two or more kilograms of
the drug, then fined not more than one hundred thousand dollars for the first
two kilograms and not more than fifty dollars for each gram in excess of two
kilograms, or both such imprisonment and fine. Five thousand dollars of the
fine may not be suspended. As collected, the first five thousand dollars of
the fine must be deposited with the law enforcement agency having
responsibility for cleanup of laboratories, sites, or substances used in the
manufacture of the methamphetamine. The fine moneys deposited with that law
enforcement agency must be used for such clean-up cost;

(iv) any other
controlled substance classified in Schedule I, II, or III, is guilty of a crime
and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five years, fined not
more than ten thousand dollars, or both;

(((iv))) (v)
a substance classified in Schedule IV, except flunitrazepam, is guilty of a
crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five years, fined
not more than ten thousand dollars, or both;

(((v))) (vi)
a substance classified in Schedule V, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction
may be imprisoned for not more than five years, fined not more than ten
thousand dollars, or both.

(b) Except as
authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to create, deliver,
or possess a counterfeit substance.

(1) Any person who
violates this subsection with respect to:

(i) a counterfeit
substance classified in Schedule I or II which is a narcotic drug, or
flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, is guilty of a crime and upon
conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, fined not more than
twenty-five thousand dollars, or both;

(ii) a counterfeit
substance which is methamphetamine, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction
may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, fined not more than twenty-five
thousand dollars, or both;

(iii) any other
counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I, II, or III, is guilty of a
crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five years, fined
not more than ten thousand dollars, or both;

(iv) a counterfeit
substance classified in Schedule IV, except flunitrazepam, is guilty of a crime
and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five years, fined not
more than ten thousand dollars, or both;

(v) a counterfeit
substance classified in Schedule V, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction
may be imprisoned for not more than five years, fined not more than ten
thousand dollars, or both.

(c) It is unlawful,
except as authorized in this chapter and chapter 69.41 RCW, for any person to
offer, arrange, or negotiate for the sale, gift, delivery, dispensing,
distribution, or administration of a controlled substance to any person and
then sell, give, deliver, dispense, distribute, or administer to that person
any other liquid, substance, or material in lieu of such controlled substance.
Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a crime and upon
conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five years, fined not more than
ten thousand dollars, or both.

(d) It is unlawful for any
person to possess a controlled substance unless the substance was obtained
directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner
while acting in the course of his or her professional practice, or except as
otherwise authorized by this chapter. Any person who violates this subsection
is guilty of a crime, and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than
five years, fined not more than ten thousand dollars, or both, except as
provided for in subsection (e) of this section.

(e) Except as provided
for in subsection (a)(1)(((iii))) (iv) of this section any person
found guilty of possession of forty grams or less of marihuana shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor.

(f) It is unlawful to
compensate, threaten, solicit, or in any other manner involve a person under
the age of eighteen years in a transaction unlawfully to manufacture, sell, or
deliver a controlled substance. A violation of this subsection shall be
punished as a class C felony punishable in accordance with RCW 9A.20.021.

This section shall not
apply to offenses defined and punishable under the provisions of RCW 69.50.410.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.406 and 1998 c
290 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(a) Any person eighteen
years of age or over who violates RCW 69.50.401(a) by distributing a controlled
substance listed in Schedules I or II which is a narcotic drug or
methamphetamine, or flunitrazepam listed in Schedule IV, to a person under
eighteen years of age is punishable by the fine authorized by RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii), by a term of imprisonment of up to twice that
authorized by RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii), or by both.

(b) Any person eighteen
years of age or over who violates RCW 69.50.401(a) by distributing any other
controlled substance listed in Schedules I, II, III, IV, and V to a person
under eighteen years of age who is at least three years his junior is
punishable by the fine authorized by RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (((iii))) (iv),
(((iv))) (v), or (((v))) (vi), by a term of
imprisonment up to twice that authorized by RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (((iii)))
(iv), (((iv))) (v), or (((v))) (vi), or
both.

Sec. 3. RCW 69.50.415 and 1996 c
205 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(a) A person who unlawfully
delivers a controlled substance in violation of RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (i), (ii),
or (((iii))) (iv) which controlled substance is subsequently used
by the person to whom it was delivered, resulting in the death of the user, is
guilty of controlled substances homicide.

(b)
Controlled substances homicide is a class B felony punishable according to RCW
9A.20.021.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.154 and 1996 c
205 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the earliest
possible date, and in no event later than ten days before release except in the
event of escape or emergency furloughs as defined in RCW 72.66.010, the
department of corrections shall send written notice of parole, community
placement, work release placement, furlough, or escape about a specific inmate
convicted of a serious drug offense to the following if such notice has been
requested in writing about a specific inmate convicted of a serious drug
offense:

(a) Any witnesses who
testified against the inmate in any court proceedings involving the serious
drug offense; and

(b) Any person
specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.

Information regarding
witnesses requesting the notice, information regarding any other person
specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the
notice are confidential and shall not be available to the inmate.

(2) If an inmate
convicted of a serious drug offense escapes from a correctional facility, the
department of corrections shall immediately notify, by the most reasonable and
expedient means available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of
the county in which the inmate resided immediately before the inmate's arrest
and conviction. If previously requested, the department shall also notify the
witnesses who are entitled to notice under this section. If the inmate is
recaptured, the department shall send notice to the persons designated in this
subsection as soon as possible but in no event later than two working days
after the department learns of such recapture.

(3) If any witness is
under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be sent to
the parents or legal guardian of the child.

(4) The department of
corrections shall send the notices required by this section to the last address
provided to the department by the requesting party. The requesting party shall
furnish the department with a current address.

(5) For purposes of
this section, "serious drug offense" means an offense under RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (i) ((or)), (ii), or (iii) or (b)(1) (i)
or (ii).

Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.310 and 2000 c
132 s 2 and 2000 c 28 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) TABLE
1

Sentencing
Grid

SERIOUSNESS

LEVEL OFFENDER
SCORE

9
or

0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 more

XVI Life Sentence
without Parole/Death Penalty

XV 23y4m 24y4m 25y4m 26y4m 27y4m 28y4m 30y4m 32y10m 36y 40y

240- 250- 261- 271- 281- 291- 312- 338- 370- 411-

320 333 347 361
374 388 416 450 493 548

XIV 14y4m 15y4m 16y2m 17y 17y11m 18y9m 20y5m 22y2m 25y7m 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

220 234 244 254 265 275 295 316 357 397

XIII 12y 13y 14y 15y 16y 17y 19y 21y 25y 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

164 178 192 205 219 233 260 288 342 397

XII 9y 9y11m 10y9m 11y8m 12y6m 13y5m 15y9m 17y3m 20y3m 23y3m

93- 102- 111- 120- 129- 138- 162- 178- 209- 240-

123 136 147 160
171 184 216 236 277 318

XI 7y6m 8y4m 9y2m 9y11m 10y9m 11y7m 14y2m 15y5m 17y11m 20y5m

78- 86-
95- 102- 111- 120- 146- 159- 185- 210-

102 114 125 136
147 158 194 211 245 280

X 5y 5y6m 6y 6y6m 7y 7y6m 9y6m 10y6m 12y6m 14y6m

51- 57- 62- 67- 72- 77- 98- 108- 129- 149-

68 75 82 89 96 102 130 144 171 198

IX 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 5y 5y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m 12y6m

31- 36- 41- 46- 51- 57- 77- 87- 108- 129-

41 48 54 61 68 75 102 116 144 171

VIII 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m

21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 46- 67- 77- 87- 108-

27 34 41 48 54 61 89 102 116 144

VII 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m

15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 57- 67- 77- 87-

20 27 34 41 48 54 75 89 102 116

VI 13m 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y6m 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m

12+- 15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 46- 57- 67- 77-

14 20 27 34 41 48 61 75 89 102

V 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y 5y 6y 7y

6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 41- 51- 62- 72-

12 14 17 20 29 43 54 68 82 96

IV 6m 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y2m 6y2m

3- 6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 43- 53- 63-

9 12 14 17 20 29 43 57 70 84

III 2m 5m 8m 11m 14m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y

1- 3- 4- 9- 12+- 17- 22- 33- 43- 51-

3 8 12 12 16 22 29 43 57 68

II 4m 6m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m

0-90 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22- 33- 43-

Days 6 9 12 14 18 22 29 43 57

I 3m 4m 5m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m

0-60 0-90 2- 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22-

Days Days 5
6 8 12 14 18 22 29

Numbers in the first
horizontal row of each seriousness category represent sentencing midpoints in
years(y) and months(m). Numbers in the second and third rows represent
standard sentence ranges in months, or in days if so designated. 12+ equals
one year and one day.

(2) For persons
convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the standard sentence range is determined
by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate
offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying
the range by 75 percent.

(3) The following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony
crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being
sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony
crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the
firearm enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject
to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an
anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed
in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements, the following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under
subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as
classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a) Five years for any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(b) Three years for any
felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection.

(c) Eighteen months for
any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory
maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(d) If the offender is
being sentenced for any firearm enhancements under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this
subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon
enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection
or subsection (4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm enhancements
under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed.

(e) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, all firearm enhancements under this section are
mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to
all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon
enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether
or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement when
authorized under RCW 9.94A.150(4).

(f) The firearm
enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the
following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by
shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and
second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g) If the standard
sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for
the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence
unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm
enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory
maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.

(4) The following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony
crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and
the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection
as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of
the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than
one offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to the
total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying
offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the offender or an
accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in
RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense
under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection
as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements, the following additional times
shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2)
of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:

(a) Two years for any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(b) One year for any
felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection.

(c) Six months for any
felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection.

(d) If the offender is
being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection for any deadly
weapon enhancements and the offender has previously been sentenced for any
deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of
this subsection or subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both,
all deadly weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount
of the enhancement listed.

(e) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, all deadly weapon enhancements under this section are
mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to
all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon
enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether
or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement when
authorized under RCW 9.94A.150(4).

(f) The deadly weapon
enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the
following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by
shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and
second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g) If the standard
sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for
the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence
unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly
weapon enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory
maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.

(5) The following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range if the offender
or an accomplice committed the offense while in a county jail or state
correctional facility and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection. If the offender or an accomplice committed one of
the crimes listed in this subsection while in a county jail or state
correctional facility, and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section:

(a) Eighteen months for
offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (i) ((or)), (ii),
or (iii) or 69.50.410;

(b) Fifteen months for
offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (((iii))) (iv), (((iv)))
(v), and (((v))) (vi);

(c) Twelve months for
offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(d).

For the purposes of
this subsection, all of the real property of a state correctional facility or
county jail shall be deemed to be part of that facility or county jail.

(6) An additional
twenty-four months shall be added to the standard sentence range for any ranked
offense involving a violation of chapter 69.50 RCW if the offense was also a
violation of RCW 69.50.435 or 9.94A.128.

(7) An additional two
years shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as
defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.

Sec. 6. RCW 9.94A.320 and 2000 c
225 s 5, 2000 c 119 s 17, and 2000 c 66 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(((ii))) (iii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (((iii))) (iv)
through (((v))) (vi))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(((iii)))
(iv))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 7. RCW 13.40.0357 and 2000
c 66 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION
AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

juvenile juvenile
disposition

disposition category
for attempt,

offense bailjump,
conspiracy,

category description (rcw citation) or
solicitation

........................................

Arson
and Malicious Mischief

A Arson
1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson
2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless
Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless
Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious
Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious
Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3 (<$50 is

E
class) (9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm

Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

A Possession of Incendiary Device

(9.40.120) B+

Assault and Other Crimes

Involving Physical Harm

A Assault
1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault
2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault
3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault
4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting

(9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment

(9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt

(9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion
(9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial
Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary
and Trespass

B+ Burglary
1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary

(9A.52.025) C

B Burglary
2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession of)

(9A.52.060) E

D Criminal
Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle
Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of Alcohol

(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug

(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession of
Legend

Drug with Intent to Sell

(69.41.030) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug

(69.41.030) E

B+ Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam

Sale (69.50.401(a)(1) (i) ((or)),

(ii),
or (iii)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale

(69.50.401(a)(1)(((iii)))
(iv)) C

E Possession of Marihuana <40
grams

(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled

Substance
(69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance

for
Profit (69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful
Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine,
or Flunitrazepam

Counterfeit Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1)
(i) or (ii)) B

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic

Counterfeit Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1)
(iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Possession of a

Controlled Substance

(69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Possession of a

Controlled Substance

(69.50.401(c)) C

Firearms
and Weapons

B Theft
of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm

(9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol Without

Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by Minor
(<18)

(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous Weapon

(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person by use

of
Weapon (9.41.270) E

Homicide

A+ Murder
1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder
2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter
1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter
2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular
Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap
1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap
2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment

(9A.40.040) D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a Law Enforcement

Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting
Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1

(9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2

(9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3

(9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public Servant

(9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness

(9A.72.110) C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot
with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon

(9A.84.010) E

E Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly
Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape
1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape
2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape
3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape
of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape
of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest
1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest
2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure

(Victim
<14) (9A.88.010) E

E Indecent
Exposure

(Victim
14 or over) (9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting
Prostitution 1

(9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2

(9A.88.080) D+

E O
& A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent
Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child
Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child
Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and
Forgery

B Theft
1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft
2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft
3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft
of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery
(9A.60.020) D

A Robbery
1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery
2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion
1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion
2 (9A.56.130) D+

B Possession of Stolen Property 1

(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen Property 2

(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen Property 3

(9A.56.170) E

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without

Owner's
Permission (9A.56.070) D

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License

(46.20.005) E

B+ Hit
and Run - Death

(46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury

(46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended

(46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended

(46.52.010) E

C Vehicular
Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing

Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless
Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the Influence

(46.61.502
and 46.61.504) E

Other

B Bomb
Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape
11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape
21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape
3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene,
Harassing, Etc.,

Phone
Calls (9.61.230) E

A Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class A Felony B+

B Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class B Felony C

C Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class C Felony D

D Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation
of Order of Restitution,

Community
Supervision, or

Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C
offenses and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted
escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks confinement

2nd escape or attempted
escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement

3rd and subsequent
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks confinement

2If
the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose
a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE
SENTENCING STANDARDS

This
schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may select sentencing
option A, B, or C.

OPTION
A

JUVENILE
OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID

STANDARD
RANGE

A+ 180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS|WEEKS

EXCEPT | | |

30-40 | | |

WEEKS FOR | | |

15-17 | | |

YEAR OLDS | | |

Current B+ 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

Offense WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL | |52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) |15-36 WEEKS |WEEKS

C+ LS |

|15-36 WEEKS

C LS |15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions: |

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Service

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4 or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the
grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement.

(1) The vertical axis
of the grid is the current offense category. The current offense category is
determined by the offense of adjudication.

(2) The horizontal axis
of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included in the juvenile's
criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count as one point.
Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count
as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.

(3) The standard range
disposition for each offense is determined by the intersection of the column
defined by the prior adjudications and the row defined by the current offense
category.

(4) RCW 13.40.180
applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense.

(5) A current offense
that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of E. However, a
disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.

OR

OPTION
B

CHEMICAL
DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile
offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to
36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+ offense, the court
may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION
C

MANIFEST
INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under option A or B
would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition
outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

---
END ---