BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This act is needed to
comply with federal law, which is the source of funds in the drinking water
assistance account, used to fund the Washington state drinking water loan
program as part of the federal safe drinking water act.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the
federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the public
health services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction account, the
higher education construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account,
the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real
estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid
account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system plan
2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost
account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan
2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the
University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington
state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund,
and the Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal
school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to
their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under
this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the
federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the public
health services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction account, the
higher education construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account,
the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real
estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid
account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
resource management cost account, the site closure account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the
state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer
fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account,
the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington
state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water
pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.119A.170 and 1997
c 218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A drinking water
assistance account is created in the state treasury. Such subaccounts as are
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter are permitted to be
established within the account. Therefore, the drinking water assistance administrative
account and the drinking water assistance repayment account are created in the
state treasury. The purpose of the account is to allow the state to use
any federal funds that become available to states from congress to fund a state
revolving loan fund program as part of the reauthorization of the federal safe
drinking water act. Expenditures from the account may only be made by the
secretary, the public works board, or the department of community, trade, and
economic development, after appropriation. Moneys in the account may only be
used, consistent with federal law, to assist water systems to provide safe
drinking water through a program administered through the department of health,
the public works board, and the department of community, trade, and economic
development and for other activities authorized under federal law. Money may
be placed in the account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the
legislature, transfers from other state funds or accounts, federal
capitalization grants or other financial assistance, all repayments of moneys
borrowed from the account, all interest payments made by borrowers from the
account or otherwise earned on the account, or any other lawful source. All
interest earned on moneys deposited in the account, including repayments, shall
remain in the account and may be used for any eligible purpose. Moneys in the
account may only be used to assist local governments and water systems to
provide safe and reliable drinking water, for other services and assistance
authorized by federal law to be funded from these federal funds, and to
administer the program.

(2) The department and
the public works board shall establish and maintain a program to use the moneys
in the drinking water assistance account as provided by the federal government
under the safe drinking water act. The department and the public works board,
in consultation with purveyors, local governments, local health jurisdictions,
financial institutions, commercial construction interests, other state
agencies, and other affected and interested parties, shall by January 1, 1999,
adopt final joint rules and requirements for the provision of financial
assistance to public water systems as authorized under federal law. Prior to
the effective date of the final rules, the department and the public works
board may establish and utilize guidelines for the sole purpose of ensuring the
timely procurement of financial assistance from the federal government under
the safe drinking water act, but such guidelines shall be converted to rules by
January 1, 1999. The department and the public works board shall make every
reasonable effort to ensure the state's receipt and disbursement of federal
funds to eligible public water systems as quickly as possible after the federal
government has made them available. By December 15, 1997, the department and
the public works board shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature reflecting the input from the affected interests and parties on
the status of the program. The report shall include significant issues and
concerns, the status of rule making and guidelines, and a plan for the adoption
of final rules.

(3) If the department,
public works board, or any other department, agency, board, or commission of
state government participates in providing service under this section, the
administering entity shall endeavor to provide cost-effective and timely
services. Mechanisms to provide cost-effective and timely services include:
(a) Adopting federal guidelines by reference into administrative rules; (b)
using existing management mechanisms rather than creating new administrative
structures; (c) investigating the use of service contracts, either with other
governmental entities or with nongovernmental service providers; (d) the use of
joint or combined financial assistance applications; and (e) any other method
or practice designed to streamline and expedite the delivery of services and
financial assistance.

(4) The department
shall have the authority to establish assistance priorities and carry out
oversight and related activities, other than financial administration, with
respect to assistance provided with federal funds. The department, the public
works board, and the department of community, trade, and economic development
shall jointly develop, with the assistance of water purveyors and other
affected and interested parties, a memorandum of understanding setting forth
responsibilities and duties for each of the parties. The memorandum of understanding
at a minimum, shall include:

(a) Responsibility for
developing guidelines for providing assistance to public water systems and
related oversight prioritization and oversight responsibilities including
requirements for prioritization of loans or other financial assistance to
public water systems;

(b) Department
submittal of preapplication information to the public works board for review
and comment;

(c) Department
submittal of a prioritized list of projects to the public works board for
determination of:

(i) Financial
capability of the applicant; and

(ii) Readiness to
proceed, or the ability of the applicant to promptly commence the project;

(d) A process for
determining consistency with existing water resource planning and management,
including coordinated water supply plans, regional water resource plans, and
comprehensive plans under the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW;

(e) A determination of:

(i) Least-cost
solutions, including consolidation and restructuring of small systems, where
appropriate, into more economical units;

(ii) The provision of
regional facilities;

(iii) Projects and
activities that facilitate compliance with the federal safe drinking water act;
and

(iv) Projects and
activities that are intended to achieve the public health objectives of federal
and state drinking water laws;

(f) Implementation of
water conservation and other demand management measures consistent with state
guidelines for water utilities;

(g) Assistance for the
necessary planning and engineering to assure that consistency, coordination,
and proper professional review are incorporated into projects or activities
proposed for funding;

(h) Minimum standards
for water system capacity, financial viability, and water system planning;

(i) Testing and
evaluation of the water quality of the state's public water system to assure
that priority for financial assistance is provided to systems and areas with
threats to public health from contaminated supplies and reduce in appropriate
cases the substantial increases in costs and rates that customers of small
systems would otherwise incur under the monitoring and testing requirements of
the federal safe drinking water act;

(j) Coordination, to the
maximum extent possible, with other state programs that provide financial
assistance to public water systems and state programs that address existing or
potential water quality or drinking contamination problems;

(k) Definitions of
"affordability" and "disadvantaged community" that are
consistent with these and similar terms in use by other state or federal
assistance programs;

(l) Criteria for the
financial assistance program for public water systems, which shall include, but
are not limited to:

(i) Determining
projects addressing the most serious risk to human health;

(ii) Determining the
capacity of the system to effectively manage its resources, including meeting
state financial viability criteria; and

(iii) Determining the
relative benefit to the community served; and

(m) Ensure that each
agency fulfills the audit, accounting, and reporting requirements under federal
law for its portion of the administration of this program.

(5) The department and
the public works board shall begin the process to disburse funds no later than
October 1, 1997, and shall adopt such rules as are necessary under chapter
34.05 RCW to administer the program by January 1, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Section 2 of this act
expires March 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Section 3 of this act
takes effect March 1, 2002.

---
END ---