BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
77.32.380 and 2000 c 107 s 271 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 (1) Persons who enter upon or use clearly identified
department

_7 improved access facilities with a motor vehicle may be
required to

_8 display a current annual fish and wildlife lands vehicle
use

_9 permit on the motor vehicle while within or while using
an

10 improved access facility. An "improved access
facility" is a

11 clearly identified area specifically created for motor
vehicle

12 parking, and includes any boat launch or boat ramp
associated with

13 the parking area, but does not include the department
parking

14 facilities at the Gorge Concert Center near George,
Washington.

15 The vehicle use permit ((is issued in the form of a
decal)) shall

16 be issued in a form that allows for it to be
temporarily displayed

17 from the interior of a motor vehicle. One ((decal))
vehicle use

18 permit shall be issued at no charge with each
annual saltwater,

p. 1 HB
1199

_1 freshwater, combination, small game hunting, big game
hunting, and

_2 trapping license issued by the department. The annual
fee for a

_3 fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permit, if purchased

_4 separately, is ten dollars. A person to whom the
department has

_5 issued a ((decal)) vehicle use permit or
who has purchased a

_6 vehicle use permit separately may purchase ((a decal))
an

_7 additional vehicle use permit from the department
for each

_8 additional vehicle owned by the person at a cost of five
dollars

_9 per ((decal)) vehicle use permit upon a
showing of proof to the

10 department that the person owns the additional vehicle
or

11 vehicles. Revenue derived from the sale of fish and
wildlife lands

12 vehicle use permits shall be used solely for the
stewardship and

13 maintenance of department improved access facilities.

14 Youth groups may use department improved access
facilities

15 without possessing a vehicle use permit when accompanied
by a

16 vehicle use permit holder.

17 The department may accept contributions into the
state wildlife

18 fund for the sound stewardship of fish and wildlife.
Contributors

19 shall be known as "conservation patrons" and,
for contributions of

20 twenty dollars or more, shall receive a fish and
wildlife lands

21 vehicle use permit free of charge.

22 (2) The ((decal)) vehicle use permit
must be ((affixed in a

23 permanent manner to)) displayed from the
interior of the motor

24 vehicle so that it is clearly visible from outside of
the motor

25 vehicle before entering upon or using the motor
vehicle on a

26 department improved access facility((, and must be
displayed on

27 the rear window of the motor vehicle, or, if the
motor vehicle

28 does not have a rear window, on the rear of the motor
vehicle)).

29 (3) Failure to display the fish and wildlife lands
vehicle use

30 permit if required by this section is an infraction
under chapter

31 7.84 RCW, and department employees are authorized to
issue a

32 notice of infraction to the registered owner of any
motor vehicle

33 entering upon or using a department improved access facility

34 without such a ((decal)) vehicle use permit.
The penalty for

35 failure to clearly display ((or improper
display of)) the

36 ((decal)) vehicle use permit is sixty-six
dollars.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1199 p. 2