BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART I--LEGISLATIVE INTENT

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. (1) The legislature
finds:

(a) The continued
economic vitality of downtown and neighborhood commercial districts in our
state's cities is essential to community preservation, social cohesion, and
economic growth;

(b) In recent years
there has been a deterioration of downtown and neighborhood commercial
districts in both rural and urban communities due to a shifting population
base, changes in the marketplace, and greater competition from suburban
shopping malls, discount centers, and through the internet;

(c) This decline has
eroded the ability of businesses and property owners to renovate and enhance
their commercial and residential properties; and

(d) Business owners in
these districts need to maintain their local economies in order to provide
goods and services to adjacent residents, to provide employment opportunities,
to avoid disinvestment and economic dislocations, and to develop downtown and
neighborhood commercial district revitalization programs to address these
problems.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature to establish a program to:

(a) Work in partnership
with these organizations;

(b) Provide technical
assistance and training to local governments, business organizations, downtown
and neighborhood commercial district organizations, and business and property
owners to accomplish community and economic revitalization and development of
business districts; and

(c) Certify a downtown
or neighborhood commercial district organization's use of available tax
incentives.

PART II--DOWNTOWN
AND NEIGHBORHOOD COMMERCIAL DISTRICT

REVITALIZATION INCENTIVES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There may be credit
against the tax imposed by this chapter for the value of private contributions
that are designed to assist in the development and operation of a downtown and
neighborhood commercial district revitalization program.

(2) The credit allowed
under this section is limited to an amount equal to:

(a) Seventy-five
percent of the value of the contribution that is made directly, by the
business, to a downtown and neighborhood commercial district revitalization
program; or

(b) Fifty percent of
the value of the contribution that is made directly, by the business, to the
department of community, trade, and economic development for distribution as
financial or technical assistance under section 302 of this act.

(3) The total credits
allowed under this section for an individual downtown and neighborhood commercial
district cannot exceed one hundred thousand dollars in a calendar year. The
total credits allowed under this section for a business cannot exceed two
hundred fifty thousand dollars in a calendar year. The total credits allowed
on a statewide basis cannot exceed two million dollars in a calendar year.

(4) Prior to making a
contribution under this section, the business must obtain approval from the
department of community, trade, and economic development. The business'
request for approval must include the amount of the contribution.

(5) This section
applies only to contributions for which an application is approved on or after
the effective date of this act.

(6) As used in this
section:

(a)
"Contribution" means cash contributions.

(b) "Downtown or
neighborhood commercial district revitalization program" means a program
designated by the department of community, trade, and economic development
under sections 101 and 301 through 306 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A physical
improvement to a commercial building upon real property, that is located within
a downtown or neighborhood commercial district revitalization program's
boundaries identified and approved by the department of community, trade, and
economic development under section 303 of this act, is exempt from taxation for
the ten assessment years subsequent to the completion of the improvement, if
the improvement meets the guidelines established by the local downtown and
neighborhood commercial district revitalization program. In addition, for
buildings that meet the definition of historic property as defined in RCW
84.26.020, the improvements must be consistent with the definition of rehabilitation
as defined in RCW 84.26.020, and adhere to the historic preservation process
and guidelines adopted by the community. A taxpayer desiring to obtain the
exemption granted by this section must file notice of their intent to construct
the improvement prior to the improvement being made on forms prescribed by the
department of revenue and furnished to the taxpayer by the county assessor.
This exemption cannot be claimed more than once in a fifteen-year period. As
used in this section, "downtown or neighborhood commercial district
revitalization program" has the same meaning as in section 201 of this
act.

(2) The department of
revenue shall adopt rules necessary to properly administer the provisions of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of an eligible local government may impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the boundaries of the eligible local government. The
rate of tax shall not exceed: (a) .035 of one percent of the selling price in
the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax
in those cities under one hundred thousand in population that include an
official main street program designated under section 303 of this act; and (b)
.0095 of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value
of the article used in the case of a use tax in cities of over one hundred
thousand in population.

The total tax collected
under this section for an eligible local government shall not exceed four
hundred thousand dollars in a calendar year.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the amount of tax
otherwise required to be collected or paid to the department of revenue under
chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the
collection of taxes on behalf of the local government at no cost to the local
government.

(3) Moneys collected
under this section shall only be used for the purpose of paying the costs for a
downtown or neighborhood commercial district revitalization project that is
located within the boundaries identified and approved by the department of
community, trade, and economic development under section 303 of this act.

(4) No tax may be
collected under this section before January 1, 2002.

(5) Moneys collected
under this section shall not be used until two dollars of moneys collected are
matched with one dollar of local government or private funds.

(6) As used in this section:

(a) "Downtown or
neighborhood commercial district revitalization project" means: Public
infrastructure improvements, including street and utility improvements;
professional management, planning, and promotion within the eligible area,
including the management and promotion of retail trade activities in the
eligible area; maintenance and security for common or public areas in the
eligible area; and historic preservation activities authorized under RCW
35.21.395.

(b) "Eligible
local government" means: (i) A local government working in conjunction
with a downtown or neighborhood commercial district revitalization program
designated by the department of community, trade, and economic development at
the partner-level or associate-level under section 303 of this act; or (ii) a
city of over one hundred thousand in population working in conjunction with a
neighborhood commercial district that has been designated as eligible by the
legislative authority of the city.

(c) "Local
government" means a city, code city, or town.

PART III--DOWNTOWN
AND NEIGHBORHOOD COMMERCIAL DISTRICT

REVITALIZATION PROGRAM

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Area"
means a geographic area within a local government that is described by a closed
perimeter boundary.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of community, trade,
and economic development.

(4) "Local
government" means a city, code city, or town.

(5) "Qualified
levels of participation" means a local downtown or neighborhood commercial
district revitalization effort that has been designated by the department, as
being at the participant-level, associate-level, or partner-level.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. The Washington main
street program is created within the department. In order to implement the
Washington main street program, the department shall:

(1) Provide technical
assistance to businesses, property owners, organizations, and local governments
undertaking a comprehensive downtown and neighborhood commercial district
revitalization and management strategy within a specified area. Technical
assistance includes, but is not limited to, initial site evaluations and
assessments, training for local programs, training for local program staff,
site visits and assessments by technical specialists, local program design
assistance and evaluation, and continued local program on-site assistance;

(2) To the extent funds
are made available, provide financial assistance to local governments or local
organizations to assist in initial program start-up costs, specific project
feasibility studies, market studies, and design assistance;

(3) Develop objective
criteria for selecting recipients of financial assistance under subsection (1)
of this section and providing designation of local programs under section 303
of this act;

(4) Operate the
Washington main street program in accordance with the plan developed by the
department, in consultation with the Washington main street advisory committee
created under section 304 of this act; and

(5) Consider other
factors the department deems necessary for the implementation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. (1) The department shall,
by rule, adopt criteria for the designation of local downtown or neighborhood
commercial district revitalization programs and official local main street
programs. In establishing the criteria, the department shall consider:

(a) The degree of
interest and commitment to downtown or neighborhood commercial district
revitalization and, where applicable, historic preservation by both the public
and private sectors;

(b) The evidence of
potential private sector investment in the downtown or neighborhood commercial
district;

(c) Where applicable, a
downtown or neighborhood commercial district with sufficient historic fabric to
become a foundation for an enhanced community image;

(d) The capacity of the
organization to undertake a comprehensive program and the financial commitment
to implement a long-term downtown or neighborhood commercial district
revitalization program that includes a commitment to employ a professional
program manager and maintain a sufficient operating budget;

(e) The department's
existing downtown revitalization program's tier system;

(f) The national main
street center's criteria for designating official main street cities; and

(g) Other factors the
department deems necessary for the designation of a local program.

(2) The department
shall designate local downtown or neighborhood commercial district
revitalization programs and official local main street programs. The programs
shall be limited to the following three categories: Partner-level,
associate-level, and participant-level.

(3) Sections 201, 202,
and 203 of this act do not apply to any local downtown or neighborhood
commercial district revitalization program unless the boundaries of the program
have been identified and approved by the department. The boundaries of a local
downtown or neighborhood commercial district revitalization program are
typically limited to the pedestrian core area or the central commercial
district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
304. (1) The Washington main
street advisory committee is created within the department. The members of the
advisory committee are appointed by the director and consist of:

(a) The director, or
the director's designee, who shall serve as chair;

(b) Two representatives
of local governments;

(c) The chair of the
governor's small business improvement council;

(d) Five
representatives from existing main street programs or downtown and neighborhood
commercial district programs; and

(e) One representative
of the Washington state office of archaeology and historic preservation.

(2) The department
shall develop a plan for the Washington main street program, in consultation
with the Washington main street advisory committee. The plan must describe:

(a) The objectives and
strategies of the Washington main street program;

(b) How the Washington
main street program will be coordinated with existing federal, state, local,
and private sector business development and historic preservation efforts;

(c) The means by which
private investment will be solicited and employed;

(d) The methods of
selecting and providing assistance to participating local programs; and

(e) A means to solicit
private contributions for state and local operations of the Washington main
street program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
305. The Washington main
street trust fund account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from
private contributions, federal funds, legislative appropriations, and fees for
services, if levied, must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be
used only for the operation of the Washington main street program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
306. Sections 101 and 301
through 306 of this act may be known and cited as the Washington main street
act.

PART IV--TECHNICAL PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. Sections 101 and 301
through 306 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 403. Part headings used in
this act constitute no part of the law.

---
END ---