BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.34.030 and 2000 c
122 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this
chapter:

(1)
"Abandoned" means when the child's parent, guardian, or other
custodian has expressed, either by statement or conduct, an intent to forego,
for an extended period, parental rights or responsibilities despite an ability
to exercise such rights and responsibilities. If the court finds that the
petitioner has exercised due diligence in attempting to locate the parent, no
contact between the child and the child's parent, guardian, or other custodian
for a period of three months creates a rebuttable presumption of abandonment,
even if there is no expressed intent to abandon.

(2) "Chemical
dependency treatment" means a service certified by the department as
qualified in helping individuals successfully recover from the nonprescription
use of controlled substances.

(3)
"Child" and "juvenile" means any individual under the age
of eighteen years.

(((3))) (4)
"Current placement episode" means the period of time that begins with
the most recent date that the child was removed from the home of the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian for purposes of placement in out-of-home care and
continues until: (a) The child returns home; (b) an adoption decree, a permanent
custody order, or guardianship order is entered; or (c) the dependency is
dismissed, whichever occurs first.

(((4))) (5)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(6) "Dependency
finding" means a determination by the court that a child is a dependent
child.

(7)
"Dependency guardian" means the person, nonprofit corporation, or
Indian tribe appointed by the court pursuant to this chapter for the limited
purpose of assisting the court in the supervision of the dependency.

(((5))) (8)
"Dependency petition" means a petition filed under this chapter.

(9)
"Dependent child" means any child who:

(a) Has been abandoned;

(b) Is abused or
neglected as defined in chapter 26.44 RCW by a person legally responsible for
the care of the child; or

(c) Has no parent,
guardian, or custodian capable of adequately caring for the child, such that
the child is in circumstances which constitute a danger of substantial damage
to the child's psychological or physical development.

(((6))) (10)
"Developmental disability" means a disability attributable to mental
retardation, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism, or another neurological or other
condition of an individual found by the secretary to be closely related to
mental retardation or to require treatment similar to that required for
individuals with mental retardation, which disability originates before the
individual attains age eighteen, which has continued or can be expected to
continue indefinitely, and which constitutes a substantial handicap to the individual.

(((7))) (11)
"Drug-affected infant" has the definition created by the department
of health in conjunction with the department of social and health services
under RCW 13.34.801 and the infant requires treatment for withdrawal from
controlled substances the infant was exposed to from the mother's use of
nonprescription controlled substances or the infant requires treatment and
services related to conditions that extend beyond the point of withdrawal.

(12) "Family
planning" means the process of limiting or spacing the birth of children,
education, counseling, information, and services. "Family planning"
does not include pregnancy termination.

(13)
"Guardian" means the person or agency that: (a) Has been appointed
as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding other than a proceeding under
this chapter; and (b) has the legal right to custody of the child pursuant to
such appointment. The term "guardian" shall not include a
"dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding under this
chapter.

(((8))) (14)
"Guardian ad litem" means a person, appointed by the court to
represent the best interests of a child in a proceeding under this chapter, or
in any matter which may be consolidated with a proceeding under this chapter.
A "court-appointed special advocate" appointed by the court to be the
guardian ad litem for the child, or to perform substantially the same duties
and functions as a guardian ad litem, shall be deemed to be guardian ad litem
for all purposes and uses of this chapter.

(((9))) (15)
"Guardian ad litem program" means a court-authorized volunteer
program, which is or may be established by the superior court of the county in
which such proceeding is filed, to manage all aspects of volunteer guardian ad
litem representation for children alleged or found to be dependent. Such
management shall include but is not limited to: Recruitment, screening,
training, supervision, assignment, and discharge of volunteers.

(((10))) (16)
"Indigent" means a person who, at any stage of a court proceeding,
is:

(a) Receiving one of
the following types of public assistance: Temporary assistance for needy
families, general assistance, poverty-related veterans' benefits, food stamps
or food stamp benefits transferred electronically, refugee resettlement
benefits, medicaid, or supplemental security income; or

(b) Involuntarily
committed to a public mental health facility; or

(c) Receiving an annual
income, after taxes, of one hundred twenty-five percent or less of the
federally established poverty level; or

(d) Unable to pay the
anticipated cost of counsel for the matter before the court because his or her
available funds are insufficient to pay any amount for the retention of
counsel.

(((11))) (17)
"Newborn infant" means an infant within seven days after birth.

(18)
"Out-of-home care" means placement in a foster family home or group
care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or placement in a home,
other than that of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, not
required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.

(((12))) (19)
"Preventive services" means preservation services, as defined in
chapter 74.14C RCW, and other reasonably available services, including housing
services, capable of preventing the need for out-of-home placement while protecting
the child. Housing services may include, but are not limited to, referrals to
federal, state, local, or private agencies or organizations, assistance with
forms and applications, or financial subsidies for housing.

(((13))) (20)
"Shelter care" means temporary physical care in a facility licensed
pursuant to RCW 74.15.030 or in a home not required to be licensed pursuant to
RCW 74.15.030.

(((14))) (21)
"Social study" means a written evaluation of matters relevant to the
disposition of the case and shall contain the following information:

(a) A statement of the
specific harm or harms to the child that intervention is designed to alleviate;

(b) A description of
the specific services and activities, for both the parents and child, that are
needed in order to prevent serious harm to the child; the reasons why such
services and activities are likely to be useful; the availability of any
proposed services; and the agency's overall plan for ensuring that the services
will be delivered. The description shall identify the services chosen and
approved by the parent;

(c) If removal is
recommended, a full description of the reasons why the child cannot be
protected adequately in the home, including a description of any previous
efforts to work with the parents and the child in the home; the in-home
treatment programs that have been considered and rejected; the preventive
services that have been offered or provided and have failed to prevent the need
for out-of-home placement, unless the health, safety, and welfare of the child
cannot be protected adequately in the home; and the parents' attitude toward
placement of the child;

(d) A statement of the
likely harms the child will suffer as a result of removal;

(e) A description of
the steps that will be taken to minimize the harm to the child that may result
if separation occurs; and

(f) Behavior that will
be expected before determination that supervision of the family or placement is
no longer necessary.

(22)
"Test" means use of a medically accepted standard of care for
determining whether a newborn infant is a drug-affected infant.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

In an effort to reduce
the harmful effects of drug-affected infants:

(1)(a) A woman's
primary health care provider shall:

(i) Screen pregnant and
lactating women for nonprescription use of controlled substances while
pregnant. Screening criteria may include, but is not limited to, the criteria
developed by the department of health pursuant to chapter 70.83E RCW;

(ii) Convey to the
infant's primary health care provider screening findings that would suggest the
need for testing of the infant, or conduct the testing; and

(iii) Inform each woman
identified by screening for testing of her infant that if her infant is born
drug-affected she can have a tubal ligation at no cost to her within six months
following the birth if she is eligible for support under RCW 74.09.310, and how
to access appropriate chemical dependency treatment.

(b) The provider shall
not be liable for a decision regarding testing or reporting unless the decision
amounts to gross negligence or intentional misconduct.

(2)(a) The health care
provider of a newborn infant shall:

(i) Test any infant the
provider reasonably believes is drug-affected; and

(ii) Notify the
department of the name and address of the parent or parents of a drug-affected
infant.

(b) The provider shall
not be liable for a decision regarding testing or reporting unless the decision
amounts to gross negligence or intentional misconduct.

(3) The department
shall investigate all reports received under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

When an infant is
determined to be a first drug-affected infant, the department shall file a
dependency petition in appropriate cases. The drug-affected status of an
infant is not by itself sufficient to establish a finding that the
drug-affected infant is dependent.

(1) The department and
the mother may enter an agreement in which the mother agrees to chemical
dependency treatment on an inpatient or outpatient basis. The mother must be
offered education regarding family planning and medically appropriate
pharmaceutical pregnancy prevention during the course of chemical dependency
treatment with a preference for those methods administered not less than once
every thirty days. In addition, the agreement shall:

(a) Specify completion
dates for each of the conditions of treatment;

(b) Expire within
twelve months of the date of execution; and

(c) Not be renegotiated
or extended beyond twelve months of the date of execution unless the
conditions, which were negotiated, cannot be fulfilled in twelve months and the
reason the conditions cannot be fulfilled are completely beyond the control of
the mother.

(2) If the department
has filed a dependency petition and the department and the mother enter an
agreement under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall request
the court defer entry of a dependency finding for as long as the mother abides
by the terms of the agreement subject to the department's monitoring
compliance.

(3) As a condition of
deferral of the dependency finding, the parties shall stipulate to facts
sufficient to constitute a dependency. In the event a party unreasonably
refuses to stipulate to facts sufficient to constitute a dependency, the court
may proceed with hearings on the petition.

(4) If the court orders
deferral of the dependency finding, the court shall order performance of the
agreement and shall prohibit nonprescription use of controlled substances.

(5) The department or
any party to the petition may request the court dismiss a deferred finding at
any time if the mother demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that she
has not used controlled substances for at least twelve consecutive months
unless the court finds compelling reasons to shorten the time after consulting
with the substance abuse provider, but under no circumstances less than six
months, and she can safely provide for the child's welfare without continuing
supervision by the department or court.

(6) In the event the
department does not file a petition or enter an agreement, the department shall
refer the mother to available chemical dependency treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

When an infant is
determined to be a second drug-affected infant, the department shall file a
dependency petition for the second drug-affected infant unless compelling
reasons exist to the contrary. The department may proceed immediately with a
dependency petition on the first drug-affected infant. The drug-affected
status of an infant is not by itself sufficient to establish a finding that the
drug-affected infant is dependent.

(1) The department and
the mother may enter an agreement in which the mother agrees to inpatient
chemical dependency treatment unless the department determines outpatient
treatment is in the best interest of the child and participation in a model
project developed under RCW 13.34.800 for aftercare services if the model
project is available. The mother must be offered education regarding family
planning and medically appropriate pharmaceutical pregnancy prevention during
the course of chemical dependency treatment with a preference for those methods
administered not less than once every thirty days. In addition, the agreement
shall:

(a) Specify completion
dates for each of the conditions of treatment;

(b) Expire within
twelve months of the date of execution; and

(c) Not be renegotiated
or extended beyond twelve months of the date of execution unless the
conditions, which were negotiated, cannot be fulfilled in twelve months and the
reason the conditions cannot be fulfilled are completely outside the control of
the mother.

(2) If the department
has filed a dependency petition and the department and the mother enter an
agreement under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall request
the court defer entry of a dependency finding for as long as the mother abides
by the terms of the agreement subject to the department's monitoring
compliance.

(3) As a condition of
deferral of the dependency finding, the parties shall stipulate to facts
sufficient to constitute a dependency. In the event a party unreasonably
refuses to stipulate to facts sufficient to constitute a dependency, the court
may proceed with hearings on the petition.

(4) If the court orders
deferral of the dependency finding, the court shall order performance of the
agreement and shall prohibit nonprescription use of controlled substances.

(5) The department or
the mother may request the court dismiss a deferred finding at any time if the
mother demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that she has not used
controlled substances for at least twelve consecutive months unless the court
finds compelling reasons to shorten the time after consulting with the
substance abuse provider, but under no circumstances less than six months, and
she can safely provide for the child's welfare without continuing supervision
by the department or court.

(6) In the event the
department does not file a petition or enter an agreement, the department shall
refer the mother to available chemical dependency treatment programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

Unless compelling
reasons exist to the contrary, the department shall file a dependency petition
when an infant is determined to be a third or subsequent drug-affected infant.
Unless compelling reasons exist to the contrary, the department shall proceed
with dependency petitions on all drug-affected children born before the third
or subsequent birth. The drug-affected status of an infant is not by itself
sufficient to establish a finding that the drug-affected infant is dependent.

(1) The court shall
order evaluation by a designated chemical dependency specialist, as defined in
RCW 70.96A.020, who shall undertake the processes described in RCW 70.96A.140.
If the mother enters chemical dependency treatment, the mother must be offered
education regarding family planning and medically appropriate pharmaceutical
pregnancy prevention during the course of chemical dependency treatment with a
preference for those methods administered not less than once every thirty days.

(2) If the court has
ordered removal of a child or children, the out-of-home placement order shall
remain in effect until the petition is dismissed or the mother has successfully
completed inpatient chemical dependency treatment and an aftercare chemical
dependency treatment program unless compelling reasons exist to the contrary.
The mother must establish to the court that she can safely provide for the
welfare of her child or children.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in sections 2
through 5 of this act may be interpreted to prohibit or compel action in the
best interests of the child by the department independent from the
drug-affected status of an infant.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
sections 2 through 5 of this act, no provider of chemical dependency treatment
services may be required by law or contract in any circumstance to participate
in the provision of family planning services if the provider objects to so
doing for reasons of conscience or religion. Each provider of chemical
dependency treatment that invokes the exemption provided under this section
shall promptly provide written notice to persons admitted to treatment listing
the family planning services the provider refuses to provide for the reason of
conscience or religion and how a person admitted to treatment may access family
planning in an expeditious manner. When negotiating contracts for chemical
dependency treatment services, the department shall prioritize contracted
services under sections 3 through 5 of this act for the purpose of maximizing
the number of providers who can show effective measurable outcomes in reducing
chemical dependency and the birth of drug-affected infants through effective
treatment regardless of whether or not they provide family planning services.

Sec. 8. RCW 13.34.070 and 2000 c
122 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon the filing of
the petition, the clerk of the court shall issue a summons, one directed to the
child, if the child is twelve or more years of age, and another to the parents,
guardian, or custodian, and such other persons as appear to the court to be
proper or necessary parties to the proceedings, requiring them to appear
personally before the court at the time fixed to hear the petition. If the
child is developmentally disabled and not living at home, the notice shall be
given to the child's custodian as well as to the child's parent. The
developmentally disabled child shall not be required to appear unless requested
by the court. When the custodian is summoned, the parent or guardian or both
shall also be served with a summons. The fact-finding hearing on the petition
shall be held no later than seventy-five days after the filing of the petition,
unless exceptional reasons for a continuance are found. In cases of a
drug-affected infant, exceptional reasons for a continuance exist if the mother
and the department have executed an agreement that will take more than
seventy-five days to fulfill. The party requesting the continuance shall
have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that exceptional
circumstances exist. To ensure that the hearing on the petition occurs within
the seventy-five day time limit, the court shall schedule and hear the matter
on an expedited basis.

(2) A copy of the
petition shall be attached to each summons.

(3) The summons shall
advise the parties of the right to counsel. The summons shall also inform the
child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian of his or her right to appointed
counsel, if indigent, and of the procedure to use to secure appointed counsel.

(4) The summons shall
advise the parents that they may be held responsible for the support of the
child if the child is placed in out-of-home care.

(5) The judge may endorse
upon the summons an order directing any parent, guardian, or custodian having
the custody or control of the child to bring the child to the hearing.

(6) If it appears from
affidavit or sworn statement presented to the judge that there is probable cause
for the issuance of a warrant of arrest or that the child needs to be taken
into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050, the judge may endorse upon the summons
an order that an officer serving the summons shall at once take the child into
custody and take him or her to the place of shelter designated by the court.

(7) If the person
summoned as provided in this section is subject to an order of the court
pursuant to subsection (5) or (6) of this section, and if the person fails to
abide by the order, he or she may be proceeded against as for contempt of
court. The order endorsed upon the summons shall conspicuously display the
following legend:

NOTICE:

VIOLATION
OF THIS ORDER

IS
SUBJECT TO PROCEEDING

FOR
CONTEMPT OF COURT

PURSUANT
TO RCW 13.34.070.

(8) If a party to be
served with a summons can be found within the state, the summons shall be
served upon the party personally as soon as possible following the filing of
the petition, but in no case later than fifteen court days before the
fact-finding hearing, or such time as set by the court. If the party is within
the state and cannot be personally served, but the party's address is known or
can with reasonable diligence be ascertained, the summons may be served upon
the party by mailing a copy by certified mail as soon as possible following the
filing of the petition, but in no case later than fifteen court days before the
hearing, or such time as set by the court. If a party other than the child is
without the state but can be found or the address is known, or can with
reasonable diligence be ascertained, service of the summons may be made either
by delivering a copy to the party personally or by mailing a copy thereof to
the party by certified mail at least ten court days before the fact-finding hearing,
or such time as set by the court.

(9) Service of summons
may be made under the direction of the court by any person eighteen years of
age or older who is not a party to the proceedings or by any law enforcement
officer, probation counselor, or department employee.

(10) In any proceeding
brought under this chapter where the court knows or has reason to know that the
child involved is a member or is eligible to be a member of an Indian tribe,
notice of the pendency of the proceeding shall also be sent by registered mail,
return receipt requested, to the child's tribe. If the identity or location of
the tribe cannot be determined, such notice shall be transmitted to the
secretary of the interior of the United States.

Sec. 9. RCW 13.34.132 and 2000 c
122 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

A court may order that
a petition seeking termination of the parent and child relationship be filed if
the following requirements are met:

(1) The court has
removed the child from his or her home pursuant to RCW 13.34.130;

(2) Termination is
recommended by the supervising agency;

(3) Termination is in
the best interests of the child; and

(4) Because of the
existence of aggravated circumstances, reasonable efforts to unify the family
are not required. Notwithstanding the existence of aggravated circumstances,
reasonable efforts may be required if the court or department determines it is
in the best interests of the child. In determining whether aggravated
circumstances exist by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, the court shall
consider one or more of the following:

(a) Conviction of the
parent of rape of the child in the first, second, or third degree as defined in
RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, and 9A.44.079;

(b) Conviction of the
parent of criminal mistreatment of the child in the first or second degree as
defined in RCW 9A.42.020 and 9A.42.030;

(c) Conviction of the
parent of one of the following assault crimes, when the child is the victim:
Assault in the first or second degree as defined in RCW 9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021
or assault of a child in the first or second degree as defined in RCW 9A.36.120
or 9A.36.130;

(d) Conviction of the
parent of murder, manslaughter, or homicide by abuse of the child's other
parent, sibling, or another child;

(e) Conviction of the
parent of attempting, soliciting, or conspiring to commit a crime listed in
(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection;

(f) A finding by a
court that a parent is a sexually violent predator as defined in RCW 71.09.020;

(g) Failure of the
parent to complete available treatment ordered under this chapter or the
equivalent laws of another state, where such failure has resulted in a prior
termination of parental rights to another child and the parent has failed to
effect significant change in the interim. In the case of a parent of an Indian
child, as defined in the Indian Child Welfare Act, P.L. 95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec.
1903), the court shall also consider tribal efforts to assist the parent in
completing treatment and make it possible for the child to return home;

(h) An infant under
three years of age has been abandoned;

(i) The mother has
given birth to three or more drug-affected infants, resulting in the department
filing a petition under section 5 of this act;

(j) Conviction
of the parent, when a child has been born of the offense, of: (A) A sex
offense under chapter 9A.44 RCW; or (B) incest under RCW 9A.64.020.

Sec. 10. RCW 74.09.310 and 1998 c
314 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may make
available, or cause to be made available, pharmaceutical birth control
services, information, and counseling to any person who enters chemical
dependency treatment under ((section 20 or 21 of this act)) sections
3 through 5 of this act. Within available funds, the department may pay
for any tubal ligations requested under ((section 19 of this act)) section
2 of this act if the mother's income is less than two hundred percent of
the federal poverty level. The department shall report by December 1st of each
year to the governor and legislature: (1) The number of tubal ligations
performed as a result of ((chapter 314, Laws of 1998)) this act;
(2) the number of women who decline to undergo the surgery; (3) the number of
women who obtain pharmaceutical birth control, by type of birth control; and
(4) the number of women who are reported to the department.

Sec. 11. RCW 18.71.950 and 1998 c
314 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) Nothing
in ((section 19 of this act)) sections 2 through 5 of this act
imposes any additional duties or responsibilities on, or removes any duties or
responsibilities from, a physician licensed under this chapter, except as
specifically included in chapter 13.34 RCW ((and RCW 70.96A.330)) and RCW
74.09.310.

(((2)
This section expires June 30, 2002.))

Sec. 12. RCW 18.57.920 and 1998 c
314 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) Nothing
in ((section 19 of this act)) sections 2 through 5 of this act
imposes any additional duties or responsibilities on, or removes any duties or
responsibilities from, an osteopath licensed under this chapter, except as
specifically included in chapter 13.34 RCW ((and RCW 70.96A.330)) and RCW
74.09.310.

(((2)
This section expires June 30, 2002.))

Sec. 13. RCW 18.79.903 and 1998 c
314 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) Nothing
in ((section 19 of this act)) sections 2 through 5 of this act
imposes any additional duties or responsibilities on, or removes any duties or
responsibilities from, an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under
this chapter, except as specifically included in chapter 13.34 RCW ((and RCW
70.96A.330)) and RCW 74.09.310.

(((2) This section
expires June 30, 2002.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 18.57.930 (Application--1998 c 314)
and 1998 c 314 s 43;

(2) RCW 18.71.960 (Application--1998 c 314)
and 1998 c 314 s 42;

(3) RCW 18.79.904 (Application--1998 c 314)
and 1998 c 314 s 44;

(4) RCW 70.96A.330 (Treatment programs and model
projects--Provision of family planning) and 1998 c 314 s 33; and

(5) RCW 70.96A.340 (Treatment programs and
model projects--Provision of family planning) and 1998 c 314 s 41.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. This act applies only to
drug-affected infants born on or after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder
of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. The Washington institute
for public policy shall evaluate the outcomes of this act and report its
findings to the legislature and governor not later than December 1, 2003. The
evaluation shall include:

(1) The number of women
who use nonprescription controlled substances during pregnancy and give birth
to drug-affected infants;

(2) The number of women
who use nonprescription controlled substances during pregnancy and give birth
to subsequent drug-affected infants;

(3) The number of women
who accept pharmaceutical pregnancy prevention while in chemical dependency
treatment;

(4) The number of women
who continue to engage in pharmaceutical pregnancy prevention or other reliable
pregnancy prevention methods after concluding chemical dependency treatment;

(5) The number of women
who accept the offer of free tubal ligation;

(6) The rate of
successful completion of chemical dependency treatment among women who enter
treatment under this act;

(7) The number of
dependencies filed and deferred under this act and outcomes of the deferrals;
and

(8) A description of
the mother's chemical dependency including identification of the drugs and/or
alcohol abused.

---
END ---