BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.16.020 and 1996 c
150 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and
there shall be collected from every person a tax for the act or privilege of
engaging within this state in any one or more of the businesses herein
mentioned.

(a) For the
following businesses, the tax shall be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate set out after the business, as follows:

(((a))) (i)
Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three and six-tenths
percent;

(((b) Light and
power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths percent;

(c) Gas distribution
business: Three and six-tenths percent;

(d))) (ii) Urban transportation business:
Six-tenths of one percent;

(((e))) (iii)
Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats, operating upon the
waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;

(((f))) (iv)
Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat businesses, and all
public service businesses other than ones mentioned above: One and
eight-tenths of one percent;

(((g))) (v)
Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent.

(b)(i) For a light
and power business, the tax is equal to the rate of . . . cents per
kilowatt hour multiplied by the number of kilowatt hours of electricity that
are generated, produced, transported, or distributed for hire or sale and/or
wheeled for others.

(ii) For a gas
distribution business, the tax is equal to the rate of . . . cents
multiplied by the number of thousand cubic feet of natural or manufactured gas
that are produced, transported, or distributed for hire or sale.

(2) An additional tax
is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030 multiplied by the tax
payable under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Twenty percent of
the moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on water distribution
businesses and sixty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on sewerage collection businesses shall be deposited in the public
works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.16.050 and 2000 c
245 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except for a light
and power business or a gas distribution business, in computing tax there
may be deducted from the gross income the following items:

(1) Amounts derived by
municipally owned or operated public service businesses, directly from taxes
levied for the support or maintenance thereof: PROVIDED, That this section
shall not be construed to exempt service charges which are spread on the
property tax rolls and collected as taxes;

(2) Amounts derived
from the sale of commodities to persons in the same public service business as
the seller, for resale as such within this state. This deduction is allowed
only with respect to water distribution((, gas distribution)) or other
public service businesses which furnish water, gas or any other commodity in
the performance of public service businesses;

(3) Amounts actually
paid by a taxpayer to another person taxable under this chapter as the latter's
portion of the consideration due for services furnished jointly by both, if the
total amount has been credited to and appears in the gross income reported for
tax by the former;

(4) The amount of cash
discount actually taken by the purchaser or customer;

(5) The amount of
credit losses actually sustained by taxpayers whose regular books of accounts
are kept upon an accrual basis;

(6) Amounts derived
from business which the state is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution
of this state or the Constitution or laws of the United States;

(7) Amounts derived
from the distribution of water through an irrigation system, for irrigation
purposes;

(8) Amounts derived
from the transportation of commodities from points of origin in this state to
final destination outside this state, or from points of origin outside this
state to final destination in this state, with respect to which the carrier
grants to the shipper the privilege of stopping the shipment in transit at some
point in this state for the purpose of storing, manufacturing, milling, or
other processing, and thereafter forwards the same commodity, or its
equivalent, in the same or converted form, under a through freight rate from
point of origin to final destination; and amounts derived from the
transportation of commodities from points of origin in the state to an export
elevator, wharf, dock or ship side on tidewater or navigable tributaries
thereto from which such commodities are forwarded, without intervening
transportation, by vessel, in their original form, to interstate or foreign
destinations: PROVIDED, That no deduction will be allowed when the point of
origin and the point of delivery to such an export elevator, wharf, dock, or
ship side are located within the corporate limits of the same city or town;

(9) ((Amounts
derived from the production, sale, or transfer of electrical energy for resale
within or outside the state or for consumption outside the state;

(10))) Amounts derived from the distribution of water
by a nonprofit water association and used for capital improvements by that
nonprofit water association;

(((11))) (10)
Amounts paid by a sewerage collection business taxable under RCW
82.16.020(1)(a)(i) to a person taxable under chapter 82.04 RCW for the
treatment or disposal of sewage.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

The taxes imposed in
RCW 82.16.020(1)(b) do not apply to electricity, natural gas, or manufactured
gas delivered to a person who acquires the electricity, natural gas, or
manufactured gas for the purpose of resale in the regular course of business.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.16.053 and 1996 c
145 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((In computing
tax under this chapter,)) A light and power business ((may deduct
from gross income)) is allowed a credit against taxes due under this
chapter in an amount equal to the lesser of the amounts determined under
subsections (2) through (4) of this section.

(2)(a) An amount
equal to fifty percent of ((wholesale power cost paid)) the
amount of kilowatt hours of wholesale electricity purchased during the
reporting period, multiplied by the rate in RCW 82.16.020(1)(b)(i), if
the light and power business has fewer than five and one-half customers per mile
of line.

(b) An amount equal
to forty percent of ((wholesale power cost paid)) the amount of
kilowatt hours of wholesale electricity purchased during the reporting
period, multiplied by the rate in RCW 82.16.020(1)(b)(i), if the light
and power business has more than five and one-half but less than eleven
customers per mile.

(c) An amount equal
to thirty percent of the ((wholesale power cost paid)) amount of
kilowatt hours of wholesale electricity purchased during the reporting
period, multiplied by the rate in RCW 82.16.020(1)(b)(i), if the light
and power business has more than eleven but less than seventeen customers per
mile of line.

(d) Zero if the light
and power business has more than seventeen customers per mile of line.

(3) ((Wholesale
power cost)) An amount equal to the amount of kilowatt hours of
wholesale electricity purchased, multiplied by the rate in RCW
82.16.020(1)(b)(i), and multiplied by the percentage by which the average
retail electric power rates for the light and power business exceed the state
average electric power rate. If more than fifty percent of the kilowatt hours
sold by a light and power business are sold to irrigators, then only sales to
nonirrigators shall be used to calculate the average electric power rate for
that light and power business. For purposes of this subsection, the department
shall determine state average electric power rate each year based on the most
recent available data and shall inform taxpayers of its determination.

(4) ((Four hundred
thousand)) Fifteen thousand five hundred dollars per month.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.16.055 and 1980 c
149 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((In computing
tax under this chapter there shall be deducted from the gross income)) A
business is allowed a credit against taxes due under this chapter in an amount
equal to:

(a) ((An amount
equal to the cost of production at the plant for consumption within the state
of Washington of:

(i))) The amount of kilowatt hours of electrical
energy produced or generated from cogeneration as defined in RCW 82.35.020,
multiplied by the rate in RCW 82.16.020(1)(b)(i); and

(((ii))) (b)
The amount of kilowatt hours of electrical energy or the amount of
thousand cubic feet of gas produced or generated from renewable energy
resources ((such as)), multiplied by the applicable rate in RCW
82.16.020(1)(b). Renewable energy resources include, but are not limited to,
solar energy, wind energy, hydroelectric energy, geothermal energy, wood, wood
wastes, municipal wastes, agricultural products and wastes, and end-use waste
heat; and

(((b))) (c)
Those amounts expended to improve consumers' efficiency of energy end use or to
otherwise reduce the use of electrical energy or gas by the consumer,
multiplied by 0.03873 percent.

(2) This section
applies only to new facilities for the production or generation of energy from
cogeneration or renewable energy resources or measures to improve the
efficiency of energy end use on which construction or installation is begun
after June 12, 1980, and before January 1, 1990.

(3) ((Deductions))
Credits under subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be allowed for a
period not to exceed thirty years after the project is placed in operation.

(4) Measures or
projects encouraged under this section shall at the time they are placed in
service be reasonably expected to save, produce, or generate energy at a total
incremental system cost per unit of energy delivered to end use which is less
than or equal to the incremental system cost per unit of energy delivered to
end use from similarly available conventional energy resources which utilize
nuclear energy or fossil fuels and which the gas or electric utility could
acquire to meet energy demand in the same time period.

(5) The department of
revenue, after consultation with the utilities and transportation commission in
the case of investor-owned utilities and the governing bodies of locally
regulated utilities, shall determine the eligibility of individual projects and
measures for ((deductions)) credits under this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 35.21.870 and 1984 c
225 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, no city or town may impose a tax on the
privilege of conducting an electrical energy, natural gas, steam energy, or
telephone business at a rate which exceeds six percent of gross receipts
unless the rate is first approved by a majority of the voters of the city or
town voting on such a proposition.

(b)(i) For the
privilege of conducting an electrical energy business, a city or town may
impose a volumetric tax in lieu of a gross receipts tax under (a) of this
subsection. A city or town that chooses to impose a tax under this subsection
may not impose the tax at a rate which exceeds . . . cents per
kilowatt hour unless the rate is first approved by a majority of the voters of
the city or town voting on the proposition.

(ii) For the
privilege of conducting a natural gas business, a city or town may impose a
volumetric tax in lieu of a gross receipts tax under (a) of this subsection. A
city or town that chooses to impose a tax under this subsection may not impose
the tax at a rate which exceeds . . . cents per thousand cubic feet
unless the rate is first approved by a majority of the voters of the city or
town voting on the proposition.

(2) If a city or town
is imposing a rate of tax under subsection (1)(a) of this section in
excess of six percent on April 20, 1982, the city or town shall decrease the
rate to a rate of six percent or less by reducing the rate each year on or
before November 1st by ordinances to be effective on January 1st of the
succeeding year, by an amount equal to one-tenth the difference between the tax
rate on April 20, 1982, and six percent.

Nothing in this
subsection prohibits a city or town from reducing its rates by amounts greater
than the amounts required in this subsection.

Voter approved rate
increases under subsection (1) of this section shall not be included in the
computations under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 82.12.022 (Natural or manufactured
gas--Use tax imposed--Exemption) and 1994 c 124 s 9 & 1989 c 384 s 3; and

(2) RCW 82.14.230 (Natural or manufactured
gas--Cities may impose use tax) and 1989 c 384 s 2.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---