BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In computing tax,
there may be deducted from the measure of tax amounts derived as compensation
for goods or services involved in space exploration or satellite deployment,
launch, control, or telecommunication.

(2) As used in this
section:

(a) "Space
exploration" means exploring the region beyond the earth's atmosphere.

(b)
"Satellite" means a man-made object or vehicle intended to orbit the
earth, the moon, or another celestial body.

(c) "Satellite
communication" means the use of geostationary orbiting satellites to relay
transmissions from one sending earth station to another earth station or to
multiple other earth stations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Real and personal
property owned or used by a person in the production or provision of goods and
services used in space exploration or satellite deployment, launch, control, or
telecommunication is exempt from taxation.

(2) As used in this
section:

(a) "Space
exploration" means exploring the region beyond the earth's atmosphere.

(b)
"Satellite" means a man-made object or vehicle intended to orbit the
earth, the moon, or another celestial body.

(c) "Satellite
communication" means the use of geostationary orbiting satellites to relay
transmissions from one sending earth station to another earth station or to
multiple other earth stations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---