BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
13.50.050 and 1999 c 198 s 4 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) This section governs records relating to the
commission of

_8 juvenile offenses, including records relating to
diversions.

_9 (2) The official juvenile court file of any alleged
or proven

10 juvenile offender shall be open to public inspection,
unless

11 sealed pursuant to subsection (12) of this section.

12 (3) All records other than the official juvenile
court file are

13 confidential and may be released only as provided in
this section,

14 RCW 13.50.010, 13.40.215, and 4.24.550.

15 (4) Except as otherwise provided in this section and
RCW

16 13.50.010, records retained or produced by any juvenile
justice or

17 care agency may be released to other participants in the
juvenile

18 justice or care system only when an investigation or
case

p. 1 SHB
1212

_1 involving the juvenile in question is being pursued by
the other

_2 participant or when that other participant is assigned
the

_3 responsibility for supervising the juvenile.

_4 (5) Except as provided in RCW 4.24.550, information
not in an

_5 official juvenile court file concerning a juvenile or a
juvenile's

_6 family may be released to the public only when that
information

_7 could not reasonably be expected to identify the
juvenile or the

_8 juvenile's family.

_9 (6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter, the

10 release, to the juvenile or his or her attorney, of law

11 enforcement and prosecuting attorneys' records
pertaining to

12 investigation, diversion, and prosecution of juvenile
offenses

13 shall be governed by the rules of discovery and other
rules of law

14 applicable in adult criminal investigations and
prosecutions.

15 (7) Upon the decision to arrest or the arrest, law
enforcement

16 and prosecuting attorneys may cooperate with schools in
releasing

17 information to a school pertaining to the investigation,

18 diversion, and prosecution of a juvenile attending the
school.

19 Upon the decision to arrest or the arrest, incident
reports may be

20 released unless releasing the records would jeopardize
the

21 investigation or prosecution or endanger witnesses. If
release of

22 incident reports would jeopardize the investigation or
prosecution

23 or endanger witnesses, law enforcement and prosecuting
attorneys

24 may release information to the maximum extent possible
to assist

25 schools in protecting other students, staff, and school
property.

26 (8) The juvenile court and the prosecutor may set up
and

27 maintain a central record-keeping system which may
receive

28 information on all alleged juvenile offenders against
whom a

29 complaint has been filed pursuant to RCW 13.40.070
whether or not

30 their cases are currently pending before the court. The
central

31 record-keeping system may be computerized. If a
complaint has been

32 referred to a diversion unit, the diversion unit shall
promptly

33 report to the juvenile court or the prosecuting attorney
when the

34 juvenile has agreed to diversion. An offense shall not
be reported

35 as criminal history in any central record-keeping system
without

36 notification by the diversion unit of the date on which
the

37 offender agreed to diversion.

38 (9) Upon request of the victim of a crime or the
victim's

SHB 1212 p. 2

_1 immediate family, the identity of an alleged or proven
juvenile

_2 offender alleged or found to have committed a crime
against the

_3 victim and the identity of the alleged or proven
juvenile

_4 offender's parent, guardian, or custodian and the
circumstance of

_5 the alleged or proven crime shall be released to the
victim of the

_6 crime or the victim's immediate family.

_7 (10) Subject to the rules of discovery applicable in
adult

_8 criminal prosecutions, the juvenile offense records of
an adult

_9 criminal defendant or witness in an adult criminal
proceeding

10 shall be released upon request to prosecution and
defense counsel

11 after a charge has actually been filed. The juvenile
offense

12 records of any adult convicted of a crime and placed
under the

13 supervision of the adult corrections system shall be
released upon

14 request to the adult corrections system.

15 (11) In any case in which an information has been
filed

16 pursuant to RCW 13.40.100 or a complaint has been filed
with the

17 prosecutor and referred for diversion pursuant to RCW
13.40.070,

18 the person the subject of the information or complaint
may file a

19 motion with the court to have the court vacate its order
and

20 findings, if any, and, subject to subsection (23) of
this section,

21 order the sealing of the official juvenile court file,
the social

22 file, and records of the court and of any other agency
in the

23 case.

24 (12) The court shall grant the motion to seal
records made

25 pursuant to subsection (11) of this section if it finds
that:

26 (a) For class B offenses other than sex offenses,
since the

27 last date of release from confinement, including
full-time

28 residential treatment, if any, or entry of disposition,
the person

29 has spent ten consecutive years in the community without

30 committing any offense or crime that subsequently
results in

31 conviction. For class C offenses other than sex
offenses, since the

32 last date of release from confinement, including
full-time

33 residential treatment, if any, or entry of disposition,
the person

34 has spent five consecutive years in the community
without

35 committing any offense or crime that subsequently
results in

36 conviction. For misdemeanors and diversions, since
the last date of

37 release from confinement, including full-time
residential

38 treatment, if any, or entry of disposition, or
completion of the

p. 3 SHB
1212

_1 diversion agreement, the person has spent two
consecutive years in

_2 the community without committing any offense or crime
that

_3 subsequently results in conviction or diversion and
the person is

_4 at least eighteen years old. For gross misdemeanors,
since the last

_5 date of release from confinement, including full-time
residential

_6 treatment, if any, or entry of disposition, the
person has spent

_7 three consecutive years in the community without
committing any

_8 offense or crime that subsequently results in
conviction and the

_9 person is at least eighteen years old;

10 (b) No proceeding is pending against the moving
party seeking

11 the conviction of a juvenile offense or a criminal
offense;

12 (c) No proceeding is pending seeking the formation
of a

13 diversion agreement with that person;

14 (d) The person has not been convicted of a class A
or sex

15 offense; and

16 (e) Full restitution has been paid.

17 (13) The person making a motion pursuant to
subsection (11) of

18 this section shall give reasonable notice of the motion
to the

19 prosecution and to any person or agency whose files are
sought to

20 be sealed.

21 (14) If the court grants the motion to seal made
pursuant to

22 subsection (11) of this section, it shall, subject to
subsection

23 (23) of this section, order sealed the official juvenile
court

24 file, the social file, and other records relating to the
case as

25 are named in the order. Thereafter, the proceedings in
the case

26 shall be treated as if they never occurred, and the
subject of the

27 records may reply accordingly to any inquiry about the
events,

28 records of which are sealed. Any agency shall reply to
any inquiry

29 concerning confidential or sealed records that records
are

30 confidential, and no information can be given about the
existence

31 or nonexistence of records concerning an individual.

32 (15) Inspection of the files and records included in
the order

33 to seal may thereafter be permitted only by order of the
court

34 upon motion made by the person who is the subject of the

35 information or complaint, except as otherwise provided
in RCW

36 13.50.010(8) and subsection (23) of this section.

37 (16) Any adjudication of a juvenile offense or a
crime

38 subsequent to sealing has the effect of nullifying the
sealing

SHB 1212 p. 4

_1 order. Any charging of an adult felony subsequent to
the sealing

_2 has the effect of nullifying the sealing order for the
purposes of

_3 chapter 9.94A RCW.

_4 (17) A person eighteen years of age or older whose
criminal

_5 history consists of only one referral for diversion may
request

_6 that the court order the records in that case
destroyed. The

_7 request shall be granted, subject to subsection (23) of
this

_8 section, if the court finds that two years have elapsed
since

_9 completion of the diversion agreement.

10 (18) If the court grants the motion to destroy
records made

11 pursuant to subsection (17) of this section, it shall,
subject to

12 subsection (23) of this section, order the official
juvenile court

13 file, the social file, and any other records named in
the order to

14 be destroyed.

15 (19) The person making the motion pursuant to
subsection (17)

16 of this section shall give reasonable notice of the
motion to the

17 prosecuting attorney and to any agency whose records are
sought to

18 be destroyed.

19 (20) Any juvenile to whom the provisions of this
section may

20 apply shall be given written notice of his or her rights
under

21 this section at the time of his or her disposition
hearing or

22 during the diversion process.

23 (21) Nothing in this section may be construed to
prevent a

24 crime victim or a member of the victim's family from
divulging the

25 identity of the alleged or proven juvenile offender or
his or her

26 family when necessary in a civil proceeding.

27 (22) Any juvenile justice or care agency may,
subject to the

28 limitations in subsection (23) of this section and (a)
and (b) of

29 this subsection, develop procedures for the routine
destruction of

30 records relating to juvenile offenses and diversions.

31 (a) Records may be routinely destroyed only when the
person the

32 subject of the information or complaint has attained
twenty-three

33 years of age or older, or is eighteen years of age or
older and

34 his or her criminal history consists entirely of one
diversion

35 agreement and two years have passed since completion of
the

36 agreement.

37 (b) The court may not routinely destroy the official
juvenile

38 court file or recordings or transcripts of any
proceedings.

p. 5 SHB
1212

_1 (23) No identifying information held by the
Washington state

_2 patrol in accordance with chapter 43.43 RCW is subject
to

_3 destruction or sealing under this section. For the
purposes of this

_4 subsection, identifying information includes
photographs,

_5 fingerprints, palmprints, soleprints, toeprints and any
other data

_6 that identifies a person by physical characteristics,
name,

_7 birthdate or address, but does not include information
regarding

_8 criminal activity, arrest, charging, diversion,
conviction or

_9 other information about a person's treatment by the
criminal

10 justice system or about the person's behavior.

11 (24) Information identifying child victims under age
eighteen

12 who are victims of sexual assaults by juvenile offenders
is

13 confidential and not subject to release to the press or
public

14 without the permission of the child victim or the
child's legal

15 guardian. Identifying information includes the child
victim's name,

16 addresses, location, photographs, and in cases in which
the child

17 victim is a relative of the alleged perpetrator,
identification of

18 the relationship between the child and the alleged

19 perpetrator. Information identifying a child victim of
sexual

20 assault may be released to law enforcement, prosecutors,
judges,

21 defense attorneys, or private or governmental agencies
that

22 provide services to the child victim of sexual assault.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1212 p. 6