BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All property owned
and used by a community public radio station is exempt from taxation.

(2) As used in this
section "community public radio station" means a nonprofit
organization, other than a government entity or an educational institution,
that holds a noncommercial FM broadcast license under 47 C.F.R. Sec. 73.503.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.36.805 and 1999 c
203 s 2 and 1999 c 139 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to qualify
for an exemption under this chapter ((and RCW 84.36.560)), the nonprofit
organizations, associations, or corporations must satisfy the conditions in
this section.

(2) The property must
be used exclusively for the actual operation of the activity for which
exemption is granted, unless otherwise provided, and does not exceed an amount
reasonably necessary for that purpose, except:

(a) The loan or rental
of the property does not subject the property to tax if:

(i) The rents and
donations received for the use of the portion of the property are reasonable
and do not exceed the maintenance and operation expenses attributable to the
portion of the property loaned or rented; and

(ii) Except for the
exemptions under RCW 84.36.030(4) and 84.36.037, the property would be exempt
from tax if owned by the organization to which it is loaned or rented;

(b) The use of the
property for fund-raising activities does not subject the property to tax if
the fund-raising activities are consistent with the purposes for which the
exemption is granted.

(3) The property must
be irrevocably dedicated to the purpose for which exemption has been granted,
and on the liquidation, dissolution, or abandonment by said organization,
association, or corporation, said property will not inure directly or
indirectly to the benefit of any shareholder or individual, except a nonprofit
organization, association, or corporation which too would be entitled to
property tax exemption. This property need not be irrevocably dedicated if it
is leased or rented to those qualified for exemption under this chapter or RCW
84.36.560 for leased property, but only if under the terms of the lease or
rental agreement the nonprofit organization, association, or corporation
receives the benefit of the exemption.

(4) The facilities and
services must be available to all regardless of race, color, national origin or
ancestry.

(5) The organization,
association, or corporation must be duly licensed or certified where such
licensing or certification is required by law or regulation.

(6) Property sold to
organizations, associations, or corporations with an option to be repurchased
by the seller shall not qualify for exempt status.

(7) The department
shall have access to its books in order to determine whether the nonprofit
organization, association, or corporation is exempt from taxes under this
chapter and RCW 84.36.560.

(8) This section does
not apply to exemptions granted under RCW 84.36.020, 84.36.032, 84.36.250, ((and))
84.36.260, and section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.36.810 and 1999 c
203 s 3 and 1999 c 139 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon cessation of a
use under which an exemption has been granted pursuant to RCW 84.36.030,
84.36.037, 84.36.040, 84.36.041, 84.36.042, 84.36.043, 84.36.046, 84.36.050,
84.36.060, 84.36.550, 84.36.560, ((and)) 84.36.570, and section 1 of
this act, the county treasurer shall collect all taxes which would have
been paid had the property not been exempt during the three years preceding, or
the life of such exemption, if such be less, together with the interest at the
same rate and computed in the same way as that upon delinquent property taxes.
If the property has been granted an exemption for more than ten consecutive
years, taxes and interest shall not be assessed under this section.

(2) Subsection (1) of
this section applies only when ownership of the property is transferred or when
fifty-one percent or more of the area of the property loses its exempt status.
The additional tax under subsection (1) of this section shall not be imposed if
the cessation of use resulted solely from:

(a) Transfer to a
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation for a use which also
qualifies and is granted exemption under this chapter;

(b) A taking through the
exercise of the power of eminent domain, or sale or transfer to an entity
having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such
power;

(c) Official action by
an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or city within which the
property is located which disallows the present use of such property;

(d) A natural disaster
such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other such calamity rather than by
virtue of the act of the organization, association, or corporation changing the
use of such property;

(e) Relocation of the
activity and use of another location or site except for undeveloped properties
of camp facilities exempted under RCW 84.36.030;

(f) Cancellation of a
lease on leased property that had been exempt under this chapter or RCW
84.36.560; or

(g) A change in the
exempt portion of a home for the aging under RCW 84.36.041(3), as long as some
portion of the home remains exempt.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 1 of this act is
effective for taxes levied for collection in 2001 and thereafter.

---
END ---