BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 80.52.030 and 1995 c
69 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions set
forth in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(1) "Public
agency" means a public utility district, joint operating agency, city,
county, or any other state governmental agency, entity, or political
subdivision.

(2) "Major public
energy project" means a nuclear power plant ((or installation
capable, or intended to be capable, of generating electricity in an amount
greater than two hundred fifty megawatts, measured using maximum continuous
electric generating capacity, less minimum auxiliary load, at average ambient
temperature and pressure. Where two or more such plants are located within the
same geographic site, each plant shall be considered a major public energy
project. An addition to an existing facility is not deemed to be a major
energy project unless the addition itself is capable, or intended to be
capable, of generating electricity in an amount greater than two hundred fifty
megawatts)) or other plant or installation that would cause the
applicant's total projected energy production capacity, including the proposed
plant or installation, to exceed one hundred ten percent of the projected
demand of the consumers within the applicant's service area boundaries over a
ten-year period following completion of the project. A project which is
under construction on July 1, 1982, shall not be considered a major public
energy project unless the official agency budget or estimate for total
construction costs for the project as of July 1, 1982, is more than two hundred
percent of the first official estimate of total construction costs as specified
in the senate energy and utilities committee WPPSS inquiry report, volume one,
January 12, 1981, and unless, as of July 1, 1982, the projected remaining cost
of construction for that project exceeds two hundred million dollars.

(3) "Cost of
construction" means the total cost of planning and building a major public
energy project and placing it into operation, including, but not limited to,
planning cost, direct construction cost, licensing cost, cost of fuel inventory
for the first year's operation, interest, and all other costs incurred prior to
the first day of full operation, whether or not incurred prior to July 1, 1982.

(4) "Cost of
acquisition" means the total cost of acquiring a major public energy
project from another party, including, but not limited to, principal and
interest costs.

(5) "Bond"
means a revenue bond, a general obligation bond, or any other indebtedness
issued by a public agency or its assignee.

(6)
"Applicant" means a public agency, or the assignee of a public
agency, requesting the secretary of state to conduct an election pursuant to
this chapter.

(7)
"Cost-effective" means that a project or resource is forecast:

(a) To be reliable and
available within the time it is needed; and

(b) To meet or reduce
the electric power demand of the intended consumers at an estimated incremental
system cost no greater than that of the least-cost similarly reliable and
available alternative project or resource, or any combination thereof.

(8)
"System cost" means an estimate of all direct costs of a project or
resource over its effective life, including, if applicable, the costs of
distribution to the consumer, and, among other factors, waste disposal costs,
end-of-cycle costs, and fuel costs (including projected increases), and such
quantifiable environmental costs and benefits as are directly attributable to
the project or resource.

---
END ---