BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.26.030 and 1996 c
178 s 11 and 1996 c 38 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1) "Retirement
system" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system" provided herein.

(2)(a)
"Employer" for plan 1 members, means the legislative authority of any
city, town, county, or district or the elected officials of any municipal
corporation that employs any law enforcement officer and/or fire fighter, any
authorized association of such municipalities, and, except for the purposes of
RCW 41.26.150, any labor guild, association, or organization, which represents
the fire fighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of over
20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or division of which
is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement officers or fire fighters
as defined in this chapter.

(b)
"Employer" for plan 2 members, means the following entities to the
extent that the entity employs any law enforcement officer and/or fire fighter:

(i) The legislative
authority of any city, town, county, or district;

(ii) The elected
officials of any municipal corporation;

(iii) The governing
body of any other general authority law enforcement agency; or

(iv) A four-year
institution of higher education having a fully operational fire department as
of January 1, 1996.

(3) "Law
enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any person who is
commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time, fully compensated
basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally, with
the following qualifications:

(a) No person who is
serving in a position that is basically clerical or secretarial in nature, and
who is not commissioned shall be considered a law enforcement officer;

(b) Only those deputy
sheriffs, including those serving under a different title pursuant to county
charter, who have successfully completed a civil service examination for deputy
sheriff or the equivalent position, where a different title is used, and those
persons serving in unclassified positions authorized by RCW 41.14.070 except a
private secretary will be considered law enforcement officers;

(c) Only such full time
commissioned law enforcement personnel as have been appointed to offices,
positions, or ranks in the police department which have been specifically
created or otherwise expressly provided for and designated by city charter
provision or by ordinance enacted by the legislative body of the city shall be
considered city police officers;

(d) The term "law
enforcement officer" also includes the executive secretary of a labor
guild, association or organization (which is an employer under RCW
41.26.030(2)) if that individual has five years previous membership in the
retirement system established in chapter 41.20 RCW. The provisions of this
subsection (3)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members; and

(e) The term "law
enforcement officer" also includes a person employed on or after January
1, 1993, as a public safety officer or director of public safety, so long as
the job duties substantially involve only either police or fire duties, or
both, and no other duties in a city or town with a population of less than ten
thousand. The provisions of this subsection (3)(e) shall not apply to any
public safety officer or director of public safety who is receiving a retirement
allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993.

(4) "Fire
fighter" means:

(a) Any person who is
serving on a full time, fully compensated basis as a member of a fire
department of an employer and who is serving in a position which requires passing
a civil service examination for fire fighter, and who is actively employed as
such;

(b) Anyone who is
actively employed as a full time fire fighter where the fire department does
not have a civil service examination;

(c) Supervisory fire
fighter personnel;

(d) Any full time
executive secretary of an association of fire protection districts authorized
under RCW 52.12.031. The provisions of this subsection (4)(d) shall not apply
to plan 2 members;

(e) The executive
secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer
under RCW 41.26.030(2) as now or hereafter amended), if such individual has
five years previous membership in a retirement system established in chapter
41.16 or 41.18 RCW. The provisions of this subsection (4)(e) shall not apply
to plan 2 members;

(f) Any person who is
serving on a full time, fully compensated basis for an employer, as a fire
dispatcher, in a department in which, on March 1, 1970, a dispatcher was
required to have passed a civil service examination for fire fighter; and

(g) Any person who on
March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time, fully compensated basis by an
employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was making retirement contributions under
the provisions of chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW.

(5)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(6) "Surviving
spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a member. "Surviving
spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a member except as
provided in RCW 41.26.162.

(7)(a)
"Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is
under the age of eighteen or mentally or physically handicapped as determined
by the department, except a handicapped person in the full time care of a state
institution, who is:

(i) A natural born
child;

(ii) A stepchild where
that relationship was in existence prior to the date benefits are payable under
this chapter;

(iii) A posthumous
child;

(iv) A child legally
adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior to the date benefits are payable
under this chapter; or

(v) An illegitimate
child legitimized prior to the date any benefits are payable under this
chapter.

(b) A person shall also
be deemed to be a child up to and including the age of twenty years and eleven
months while attending any high school, college, or vocational or other
educational institution accredited, licensed, or approved by the state, in
which it is located, including the summer vacation months and all other normal
and regular vacation periods at the particular educational institution after
which the child returns to school.

(8) "Member"
means any fire fighter, law enforcement officer, or other person as would apply
under subsections (3) or (4) of this section whose membership is transferred to
the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
on or after March 1, 1970, and every law enforcement officer and fire fighter
who is employed in that capacity on or after such date.

(9) "Retirement
fund" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system fund" as provided for herein.

(10)
"Employee" means any law enforcement officer or fire fighter as
defined in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

(11)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit, or any other benefit
described herein.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer by another person.

(12)(a) "Final
average salary" for plan 1 members, means (i) for a member holding the
same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months preceding the date of
retirement, the basic salary attached to such same position or rank at time of
retirement; (ii) for any other member, including a civil service member who has
not served a minimum of twelve months in the same position or rank preceding
the date of retirement, the average of the greatest basic salaries payable to
such member during any consecutive twenty-four month period within such
member's last ten years of service for which service credit is allowed,
computed by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such member during the
selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in the case of
disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member at the time
of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who hereafter vests
pursuant to RCW 41.26.090, the basic salary payable to such member at the time
of vesting.

(b) "Final average
salary" for plan 2 members, means the monthly average of the member's
basic salary for the highest consecutive sixty service credit months of service
prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting
authorized unpaid leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of final
average salary.

(13)(a) "Basic
salary" for plan 1 members, means the basic monthly rate of salary or
wages, including longevity pay but not including overtime earnings or special
salary or wages, upon which pension or retirement benefits will be computed and
upon which employer contributions and salary deductions will be based.

(b) "Basic
salary" for plan 2 members, means salaries or wages earned by a member
during a payroll period for personal services, including overtime payments, and
shall include wages and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant
to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code.
Basic salary shall also include all employer contributions pursuant to section
457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code regardless of whether such
contributions are based solely on rendering service, but shall exclude lump
sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation,
unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay. In any year in
which a member serves in the legislature the member shall have the option of
having such member's basic salary be the greater of:

(i) The basic salary
the member would have received had such member not served in the legislature;
or

(ii) Such member's
actual basic salary received for nonlegislative public employment and
legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement
system required because basic salary under (b)(i) of this subsection is greater
than basic salary under (b)(ii) of this subsection shall be paid by the member
for both member and employer contributions.

(14)(a) "Service"
for plan 1 members, means all periods of employment for an employer as a fire
fighter or law enforcement officer, for which compensation is paid, together
with periods of suspension not exceeding thirty days in duration. For the
purposes of this chapter service shall also include service in the armed forces
of the United States as provided in RCW 41.26.190. Credit shall be allowed for
all service credit months of service rendered by a member from and after the
member's initial commencement of employment as a fire fighter or law
enforcement officer, during which the member worked for seventy or more hours,
or was on disability leave or disability retirement. Only service credit
months of service shall be counted in the computation of any retirement allowance
or other benefit provided for in this chapter.

(i) For members
retiring after May 21, 1971 who were employed under the coverage of a prior
pension act before March 1, 1970, "service" shall also include (A)
such military service not exceeding five years as was creditable to the member
as of March 1, 1970, under the member's particular prior pension act, and (B)
such other periods of service as were then creditable to a particular member
under the provisions of RCW 41.18.165, 41.20.160 or 41.20.170. However, in no
event shall credit be allowed for any service rendered prior to March 1, 1970,
where the member at the time of rendition of such service was employed in a
position covered by a prior pension act, unless such service, at the time
credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under the provisions of such
prior act.

(ii) A member who is
employed by two employers at the same time shall only be credited with service
to one such employer for any month during which the member rendered such dual
service.

(b) "Service"
for plan 2 members, means periods of employment by a member for one or more
employers for which basic salary is earned for ninety or more hours per
calendar month which shall constitute a service credit month. Periods of
employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is
earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours per calendar month
shall constitute one-half service credit month. Periods of employment by a
member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for less than
seventy hours shall constitute a one-quarter service credit month.

Members of the
retirement system who are elected or appointed to a state elective position may
elect to continue to be members of this retirement system.

Service credit years of
service shall be determined by dividing the total number of service credit
months of service by twelve. Any fraction of a service credit year of service
as so determined shall be taken into account in the computation of such retirement
allowance or benefits.

If a member receives
basic salary from two or more employers during any calendar month, the
individual shall receive one service credit month's service credit during any
calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is rendered;
or one-half service credit month's service credit during any calendar month in
which multiple service for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours is
rendered; or one-quarter service credit month during any calendar month in which
multiple service for less than seventy hours is rendered.

(15) "Accumulated
contributions" means the employee's contributions made by a member,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), plus accrued interest
credited thereon.

(16) "Actuarial
reserve" means a method of financing a pension or retirement plan wherein
reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for benefit payments are incurred
in order that sufficient funds will be available on the date of retirement of
each member to pay the member's future benefits during the period of
retirement.

(17) "Actuarial
valuation" means a mathematical determination of the financial condition
of a retirement plan. It includes the computation of the present monetary
value of benefits payable to present members, and the present monetary value of
future employer and employee contributions, giving effect to mortality among
active and retired members and also to the rates of disability, retirement,
withdrawal from service, salary and interest earned on investments.

(18) "Disability
board" for plan 1 members means either the county disability board or the
city disability board established in RCW 41.26.110.

(19) "Disability
leave" means the period of six months or any portion thereof during which
a member is on leave at an allowance equal to the member's full salary prior to
the commencement of disability retirement. The definition contained in this
subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(20) "Disability
retirement" for plan 1 members, means the period following termination of
a member's disability leave, during which the member is in receipt of a
disability retirement allowance.

(21)
"Position" means the employment held at any particular time, which
may or may not be the same as civil service rank.

(22) "Medical
services" for plan 1 members, shall include the following as minimum
services to be provided. Reasonable charges for these services shall be paid
in accordance with RCW 41.26.150.

(a) Hospital expenses:
These are the charges made by a hospital, in its own behalf, for

(i) Board and room not
to exceed semiprivate room rate unless private room is required by the
attending physician due to the condition of the patient.

(ii) Necessary hospital
services, other than board and room, furnished by the hospital.

(b) Other medical
expenses: The following charges are considered "other medical
expenses", provided that they have not been considered as "hospital
expenses".

(i) The fees of the
following:

(A) A physician or
surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.71 RCW;

(B) An osteopathic
physician and surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.57 RCW;

(C) A chiropractor
licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25 RCW.

(ii) The charges of a
registered graduate nurse other than a nurse who ordinarily resides in the
member's home, or is a member of the family of either the member or the
member's spouse.

(iii) The charges for
the following medical services and supplies:

(A) Drugs and medicines
upon a physician's prescription;

(B) Diagnostic x-ray
and laboratory examinations;

(C) X-ray, radium, and
radioactive isotopes therapy;

(D) Anesthesia and
oxygen;

(E) Rental of iron lung
and other durable medical and surgical equipment;

(F) Artificial limbs
and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;

(G) Professional
ambulance service when used to transport the member to or from a hospital when
injured by an accident or stricken by a disease;

(H) Dental charges
incurred by a member who sustains an accidental injury to his or her teeth and
who commences treatment by a legally licensed dentist within ninety days after
the accident;

(I) Nursing home
confinement or hospital extended care facility;

(J) Physical therapy by
a registered physical therapist;

(K) Blood transfusions,
including the cost of blood and blood plasma not replaced by voluntary donors;

(L) An optometrist
licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53 RCW.

(23) "Regular
interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(24)
"Retiree" for persons who establish membership in the retirement
system on or after October 1, 1977, means any member in receipt of a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer by such member.

(25)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(26) "State
actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW
44.44.010(2).

(27) "State
elective position" means any position held by any person elected or
appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the
legislature.

(28) "Plan 1"
means the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system, plan
1 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first
became members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.

(29) "Plan 2"
means the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system, plan
2 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first
became members of the system on and after October 1, 1977.

(30) "Service
credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is
equal to one when divided by twelve.

(31) "Service
credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of
partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(32)
"General authority law enforcement agency" means any agency,
department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or
other unit of local government of this state, and any agency, department, or
division of state government, having as its primary function the detection and
apprehension of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or
criminal laws in general, but not including the Washington state patrol. Such
an agency, department, or division is distinguished from a limited authority
law enforcement agency having as one of its functions the apprehension or
detection of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or
criminal laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to,
the state departments of natural resources, fish and wildlife, and social and
health services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission,
the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and
transportation commission, the state liquor control board, and the state
department of corrections.

--- END ---