BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 44.05

_8 RCW to read as follows:

_9 (1) The redistricting commission shall establish two
United

10 States senatorial districts within the state of
Washington. The

11 districts must be submitted as part of the redistricting
plan

12 established under this chapter, and for purposes of
adoption,

13 modification, or challenge are subject to the procedural

14 requirements of this chapter.

15 (2) The two senatorial districts must have
populations as

16 nearly equal as is practicable, excluding nonresident
military

17 personnel, based on the population reported in the
decennial

18 census.

p. 1 HB
1225

_1 (3) To the extent consistent with subsection (1) of
this

_2 section, the commission should, insofar as practical,
ensure:

_3 (a) District lines are drawn so as to coincide with
the

_4 boundaries of local political subdivisions and areas
recognized as

_5 communities of interest;

_6 (b) Districts are composed of convenient,
contiguous, and

_7 compact territory;

_8 (c) Districts, to the extent possible, share a
common land

_9 border or geographical boundary running north and south;
and

10 (d) Whenever practicable, a precinct must be wholly
within a

11 single senatorial district.

12 (4) The redistricting commission shall assign one
senatorial

13 district to each of the United States senate positions
in this

14 state.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 29.15

16 RCW to read as follows:

17 (1) A person may not declare his or her candidacy
for United

18 States senator in a senatorial district other than the
one in

19 which he or she is properly registered to vote.

20 (2) A candidate for United States senator must be
elected on a

21 statewide basis, regardless of the senatorial district
he or she

22 represents.

23 Sec. 3. RCW
44.05.020 and 1983 c 16 s 2 are each amended to read

24 as follows:

25 The definitions set forth in this section apply
throughout this

26 chapter, unless the context requires otherwise.

27 (1) "Chief election officer" means the
secretary of state.

28 (2) "Federal census" means the decennial
census required by

29 federal law to be prepared by the United States bureau
of the

30 census in each year ending in zero.

31 (3) "Lobbyist" means an individual
required to register with

32 the Washington public disclosure commission pursuant to
RCW

33 42.17.150.

34 (4) "Plan" means a plan for legislative
and congressional

35 redistricting mandated by Article II, section 43 of the
state

HB 1225 p. 2

_1 Constitution, and senatorial redistricting mandated
by section 1

_2 of this act.

_3 Sec. 4. RCW
44.05.100 and 1995 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read

_4 as follows:

_5 (1) Upon approval of a redistricting plan by three
of the

_6 voting members of the commission, but not later than
December 15th

_7 of the year ending in one, the commission shall submit
the plan to

_8 the legislature.

_9 (2) After submission of the plan by the commission,
the

10 legislature shall have the next thirty days during any
regular or

11 special session to amend the commission's plan. If the
legislature

12 amends the commission's plan the legislature's amendment
must be

13 approved by an affirmative vote in each house of
two-thirds of the

14 members elected or appointed thereto, and may not
include more

15 than two percent of the population of any legislative,
senatorial,

16 or congressional district.

17 (3) The plan approved by the commission, with any
amendment

18 approved by the legislature, shall be final upon
approval of such

19 amendment or after expiration of the time provided for
legislative

20 amendment by subsection (2) of this section whichever
occurs

21 first, and shall constitute the districting law
applicable to this

22 state for legislative, senatorial, and
congressional elections,

23 beginning with the next elections held in the year
ending in

24 two. This plan shall be in force until the effective
date of the

25 plan based upon the next succeeding federal decennial
census or

26 until a modified plan takes effect as provided in RCW

27 44.05.120(6).

28 (4) If three of the voting members of the commission
fail to

29 approve and submit a plan within the time limitations
provided in

30 subsection (1) of this section, the supreme court shall
adopt a

31 plan by March 1st of the year ending in two. Any such
plan approved

32 by the court is final and constitutes the districting
law

33 applicable to this state for legislative, senatorial,
and

34 congressional elections, beginning with the next
election held in

35 the year ending in two. This plan shall be in force
until the

36 effective date of the plan based on the next succeeding
federal

p. 3 HB 1225

_1 decennial census or until a modified plan takes effect
as provided

_2 in RCW 44.05.120(6).

_3 Sec. 5. RCW
44.05.120 and 1983 c 16 s 12 are each amended to read

_4 as follows:

_5 (1) If a commission has ceased to exist, the
legislature may,

_6 upon an affirmative vote in each house of two-thirds of
the

_7 members elected or appointed thereto, adopt legislation

_8 reconvening the commission for the purpose of modifying
the

_9 redistricting plan.

10 (2) RCW 44.05.050 governs the eligibility of persons
to serve

11 on the reconvened commission. A vacancy involving a
voting member

12 of the reconvened commission shall be filled by the
person who

13 made the initial appointment, or their successor, within
fifteen

14 days after the effective date of the legislation
reconvening the

15 commission. A vacancy involving the nonvoting member of
the

16 commission shall be filled by an affirmative vote of at
((lease

17 [least])) least three of four voting
members, within fifteen days

18 after all other vacancies are filled or, if no other
vacancies

19 exist, within fifteen days after the effective date of
the

20 legislation reconvening the commission. A subsequent
vacancy on a

21 reconvened commission shall be filled by the person or
persons who

22 made the initial appointment, or their successor, within
fifteen

23 days after the vacancy occurs. If any appointing
authority fails to

24 make a required appointment within the time limitations

25 established by this subsection, within five days after
that date

26 the supreme court shall make the required appointment.

27 (3) The provisions of RCW 44.05.070 and 44.05.080
are

28 applicable if a commission is reconvened under this
section.

29 (4) The commission shall complete the modification
to the

30 redistricting plan as soon as possible, but no later
than sixty

31 days after the effective date of the legislation
reconvening the

32 commission. At least three of the voting members shall
approve the

33 modification to the redistricting plan.

34 (5) Following approval of a modification to the
redistricting

35 plan by the commission, the legislature has the next
thirty days

36 during any regular or special session to amend the
commission's

37 modification. Any amendment by the legislature must be
approved by

HB 1225 p. 4

_1 an affirmative vote in each house of two-thirds of the
members

_2 elected or appointed thereto. No amendment by the
legislature may

_3 include more than two percent of the population of any

_4 legislative, senatorial, or congressional
district contained in

_5 the commission's modification.

_6 (6) The commission's modification to the
redistricting plan,

_7 with any amendments approved by the legislature, shall
be final

_8 upon approval of the amendments or after expiration of
the time

_9 provided for legislative amendment by subsection (5) of
this

10 section, whichever occurs first.

11 (7) Following the period provided by subsection (4)
of this

12 section for the commission's approval of a modification
to the

13 redistricting plan, the commission shall take all
necessary steps

14 to conclude its business and cease operations in
accordance with

15 RCW 44.05.110(1). A reconvened commission shall cease
to exist

16 ninety days after the effective date of the legislation

17 reconvening the commission, unless the supreme court
extends the

18 commission's term.

19 Sec. 6. RCW
29.15.025 and 1999 c 298 s 9 are each amended to read

20 as follows:

21 (1) A person filing a declaration and affidavit of
candidacy

22 for an office shall, at the time of filing, be a
registered voter

23 and possess the qualifications specified by law for
persons who

24 may be elected to the office.

25 (2) The name of a candidate for an office shall not
appear on a

26 ballot for that office unless, except as provided in RCW
3.46.067

27 and 3.50.057, the candidate is, at the time the
candidate's

28 declaration and affidavit of candidacy is filed, properly

29 registered to vote in the geographic area represented by
the

30 office. For the purposes of this section, each
geographic area in

31 which registered voters may cast ballots for an office
is

32 represented by that office. If a person elected to an office
must

33 be nominated from a district or similar division of the
geographic

34 area represented by the office, the name of a candidate
for the

35 office shall not appear on a primary ballot for that
office unless

36 the candidate is, at the time the candidate's
declaration and

37 affidavit of candidacy is filed, properly registered to
vote in

p. 5 HB
1225

_1 that district or division. The officer with whom
declarations and

_2 affidavits of candidacy must be filed under this title
shall

_3 review each such declaration filed regarding compliance
with this

_4 subsection.

_5 (3) This section does not apply to the office of a
member of

_6 the United States congress, except as provided in
section 2 of

_7 this act.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. The secretary of state shall submit this

_9 act to the people for their adoption and ratification,
or

10 rejection, at the next general election to be held in
this state,

11 in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state
Constitution

12 and the laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1225 p. 6