BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW 9.41.280
and 1999 c 167 s 1 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) It is unlawful for a person to carry onto, or to
possess

_8 on, public or private elementary or secondary school
premises,

_9 school-provided transportation, ((or)) areas of
facilities while

10 being used exclusively by public or private schools,
or the

11 premises of public or private preschools or day-care
facilities:

12 (a) Any firearm;

13 (b) Any other dangerous weapon as defined in RCW
9.41.250;

14 (c) Any device commonly known as "nun-chu-ka
sticks",

15 consisting of two or more lengths of wood, metal,
plastic, or

16 similar substance connected with wire, rope, or other
means;

17 (d) Any device, commonly known as "throwing
stars", which are

18 multi-pointed, metal objects designed to embed upon
impact from

p. 1 HB
1226

_1 any aspect; or

_2 (e) Any air gun, including any air pistol or air
rifle,

_3 designed to propel a BB, pellet, or other projectile by
the

_4 discharge of compressed air, carbon dioxide, or other
gas.

_5 (2) Any such person violating subsection (1) of this
section is

_6 guilty of a gross misdemeanor. If any person is
convicted of a

_7 violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, the
person shall

_8 have his or her concealed pistol license, if any revoked
for a

_9 period of three years. Anyone convicted under this
subsection is

10 prohibited from applying for a concealed pistol license
for a

11 period of three years. The court shall send notice of
the

12 revocation to the department of licensing, and the city,
town, or

13 county which issued the license.

14 Any violation of subsection (1) of this section by
elementary

15 or secondary school students constitutes grounds for
expulsion

16 from the state's public schools in accordance with RCW

17 28A.600.010. An appropriate school authority shall
promptly notify

18 law enforcement and the student's parent or guardian
regarding any

19 allegation or indication of such violation.

20 Upon the arrest of a person at least twelve years of
age and

21 not more than twenty-one years of age for violating
subsection

22 (1)(a) of this section, the person shall be detained or
confined

23 in a juvenile or adult facility for up to seventy-two
hours. The

24 person shall not be released within the seventy-two
hours until

25 after the person has been examined and evaluated by the
county-

26 designated mental health professional unless the court
in its

27 discretion releases the person sooner after a determination

28 regarding probable cause or on probation bond or bail.

29 Within twenty-four hours of the arrest, the
arresting law

30 enforcement agency shall refer the person to the
county-designated

31 mental health professional for examination and
evaluation under

32 chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW and inform a parent or
guardian of the

33 person of the arrest, detention, and examination. The
county-

34 designated mental health professional shall examine and
evaluate

35 the person subject to the provisions of chapter 71.05 or
71.34

36 RCW. The examination shall occur at the facility in
which the

37 person is detained or confined. If the person has been
released on

HB 1226 p. 2

_1 probation, bond, or bail, the examination shall occur
wherever is

_2 appropriate.

_3 The county-designated mental health professional may
determine

_4 whether to refer the person to the county-designated
chemical

_5 dependency specialist for examination and evaluation in
accordance

_6 with chapter 70.96A RCW. The county-designated chemical
dependency

_7 specialist shall examine the person subject to the
provisions of

_8 chapter 70.96A RCW. The examination shall occur at the
facility in

_9 which the person is detained or confined. If the person
has been

10 released on probation, bond, or bail, the examination
shall occur

11 wherever is appropriate.

12 Upon completion of any examination by the
county-designated

13 mental health professional or the county-designated
chemical

14 dependency specialist, the results of the examination
shall be

15 sent to the court, and the court shall consider those
results in

16 making any determination about the person.

17 The county-designated mental health professional and
county-

18 designated chemical dependency specialist shall, to the
extent

19 permitted by law, notify a parent or guardian of the
person that

20 an examination and evaluation has taken place and the
results of

21 the examination. Nothing in this subsection prohibits
the delivery

22 of additional, appropriate mental health examinations to
the

23 person while the person is detained or confined.

24 If the county-designated mental health professional
determines

25 it is appropriate, the county-designated mental health

26 professional may refer the person to the local regional
support

27 network for follow-up services or the department of
social and

28 health services or other community providers for other
services to

29 the family and individual.

30 (3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply
to:

31 (a) Any student or employee of a private military
academy when

32 on the property of the academy;

33 (b) Any person engaged in military, law enforcement,
or school

34 district security activities;

35 (c) Any person who is involved in a convention,
showing,

36 demonstration, lecture, or firearms safety course
authorized by

37 school authorities in which the firearms of collectors
or

38 instructors are handled or displayed;

p. 3 HB
1226

_1 (d) Any person while the person is participating in
a firearms

_2 or air gun competition approved by the school or school
district;

_3 (e) Any person in possession of a pistol who has
been issued a

_4 license under RCW 9.41.070, or is exempt from the
licensing

_5 requirement by RCW 9.41.060, while picking up or
dropping off a

_6 student;

_7 (f) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age
legally in

_8 possession of a firearm or dangerous weapon that is
secured within

_9 an attended vehicle or concealed from view within a
locked

10 unattended vehicle while conducting legitimate business
at the

11 school;

12 (g) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age
who is in

13 lawful possession of an unloaded firearm, secured in a
vehicle

14 while conducting legitimate business at the school; or

15 (h) Any law enforcement officer of the federal,
state, or local

16 government agency.

17 (4) Subsections (1)(c) and (d) of this section do
not apply to

18 any person who possesses nun-chu-ka sticks, throwing
stars, or

19 other dangerous weapons to be used in martial arts
classes

20 authorized to be conducted on the school premises.

21 (5) Except as provided in subsection (3)(b), (c),
(f), and (h)

22 of this section, firearms are not permitted in a public
or private

23 school building.

24 (6) "GUN-FREE ZONE" signs shall be posted
around school

25 facilities giving warning of the prohibition of the
possession of

26 firearms on school grounds.

27 (7) For the purposes of this section, "day-care
facility" means

28 a child day-care center or a family day-care provider
licensed

29 under chapter 74.15 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1226 p. 4