BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.76.110 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 47 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of escape in the first degree if((,)) he or she knowingly escapes
from custody or a detention facility while being detained pursuant to a
conviction of a felony or an equivalent juvenile offense((, he escapes from
custody or a detention facility)).

(2) It is an
affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section that uncontrollable
circumstances prevented the person from remaining in custody or in the
detention facility or from returning to custody or to the detention facility,
and that the person did not contribute to the creation of such circumstances in
reckless disregard of the requirement to remain or return, and that the person
returned to custody or the detention facility as soon as such circumstances
ceased to exist.

(3) Escape in
the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.76.120 and 1995 c
216 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of escape in the second degree if:

(a) He or she knowingly
escapes from a detention facility;

(b) Having been charged
with a felony or an equivalent juvenile offense, he or she knowingly
escapes from custody; or

(c) Having been found
to be a sexually violent predator and being under an order of conditional
release, he or she knowingly leaves or remains absent from the
state of Washington without prior court authorization.

(2) It is an
affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section that uncontrollable
circumstances prevented the person from remaining in custody or in the
detention facility or from returning to custody or to the detention facility,
and that the person did not contribute to the creation of such circumstances in
reckless disregard of the requirement to remain or return, and that the person
returned to custody or the detention facility as soon as such circumstances
ceased to exist.

(3) Escape in
the second degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 3. RCW 9A.76.170 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 4 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person having
been released by court order or admitted to bail with knowledge of the
requirement of a subsequent personal appearance before any court of this state,
or of the requirement to report to a correctional facility for service of
sentence, and who ((knowingly)) fails to appear or who fails to
surrender for service of sentence as required is guilty of bail jumping.

(2) It is an
affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section that uncontrollable
circumstances prevented the person from appearing or surrendering, and that the
person did not contribute to the creation of such circumstances in reckless
disregard of the requirement to appear or surrender, and that the person
appeared or surrendered as soon as such circumstances ceased to exist.

(3) Bail jumping
is:

(a) A class A felony if
the person was held for, charged with, or convicted of murder in the first
degree;

(b) A class B felony if
the person was held for, charged with, or convicted of a class A felony other
than murder in the first degree;

(c) A class C felony if
the person was held for, charged with, or convicted of a class B or class C
felony;

(d) A misdemeanor if
the person was held for, charged with, or convicted of a gross misdemeanor or
misdemeanor.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.360 and 2000 c
28 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The offender score is
measured on the horizontal axis of the sentencing grid. The offender score
rules are as follows:

The offender score is
the sum of points accrued under this section rounded down to the nearest whole
number.

(1) A prior conviction
is a conviction which exists before the date of sentencing for the offense for
which the offender score is being computed. Convictions entered or sentenced
on the same date as the conviction for which the offender score is being
computed shall be deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning
of RCW 9.94A.400.

(2) Class A and sex
prior felony convictions shall always be included in the offender score. Class
B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the
offender score, if since the last date of release from confinement (including
full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or
entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive years in
the community without committing any crime that subsequently results in a
conviction. Class C prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not
be included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent
five consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction. Serious traffic convictions shall not be
included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender spent five
years in the community without committing any crime that subsequently results
in a conviction. This subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior
convictions.

(3) Out-of-state
convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable
offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. Federal
convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable
offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no clearly
comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is usually
considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the offense shall be
scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a felony under the relevant
federal statute.

(4) Score prior
convictions for felony anticipatory offenses (attempts, criminal solicitations,
and criminal conspiracies) the same as if they were convictions for completed
offenses.

(5)(a) In the case of
multiple prior convictions, for the purpose of computing the offender score,
count all convictions separately, except:

(i) Prior offenses
which were found, under RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a), to encompass the same criminal
conduct, shall be counted as one offense, the offense that yields the highest
offender score. The current sentencing court shall determine with respect to
other prior adult offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or
prior juvenile offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether
those offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using
the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a),
and if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the
offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The current sentencing
court may presume that such other prior offenses were not the same criminal
conduct from sentences imposed on separate dates, or in separate counties or
jurisdictions, or in separate complaints, indictments, or informations;

(ii) In the case of
multiple prior convictions for offenses committed before July 1, 1986, for the
purpose of computing the offender score, count all adult convictions served
concurrently as one offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the
same date as one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.

(b) As used in this
subsection (5), "served concurrently" means that: (i) The latter
sentence was imposed with specific reference to the former; (ii) the concurrent
relationship of the sentences was judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent
timing of the sentences was not the result of a probation or parole revocation
on the former offense.

(6) If the present
conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior conviction as if the present
conviction were for a completed offense. When these convictions are used as
criminal history, score them the same as a completed crime.

(7) If the present
conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not covered by subsection (11) or
(12) of this section, count one point for each adult prior felony conviction
and one point for each juvenile prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point
for each juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.

(8) If the present
conviction is for a violent offense and not covered in subsection (9), (10),
(11), or (12) of this section, count two points for each prior adult and
juvenile violent felony conviction, one point for each prior adult nonviolent
felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony
conviction.

(9) If the present
conviction is for a serious violent offense, count three points for prior adult
and juvenile convictions for crimes in this category, two points for each prior
adult and juvenile violent conviction (not already counted), one point for each
prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.

(10) If the present
conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior convictions as in subsection (8) of
this section; however count two points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary
2 or residential burglary conviction.

(11) If the present
conviction is for a felony traffic offense count two points for each adult or
juvenile prior conviction for Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular Assault; for each
felony offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile
prior conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for
an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each adult and
1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction.

(12) If the present
conviction is for a drug offense count three points for each adult prior felony
drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile drug offense. All
other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in subsection (8) of this
section if the current drug offense is violent, or as in subsection (7) of this
section if the current drug offense is nonviolent.

(13) If the present
conviction is for ((Willful Failure to Return from Furlough, RCW 72.66.060,
Willful Failure to Return from Work Release, RCW 72.65.070, or)) Escape
from Community Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape convictions in
the offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one point and
juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.

(14) If the present
conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count
adult prior convictions as one point and juvenile prior convictions as 1/2
point.

(15) If the present
conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential burglary, count priors as in
subsection (7) of this section; however, count two points for each adult and
juvenile prior Burglary 1 conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary
2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(16) If the present
conviction is for a sex offense, count priors as in subsections (7) through
(15) of this section; however count three points for each adult and juvenile
prior sex offense conviction.

(17) If the present
conviction is for an offense committed while the offender was under community
placement, add one point.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 10.88 RCW to read as follows:

A law enforcement
agency shall deliver a person in custody to the accredited agent or agents of a
demanding state without the governor's warrant provided that:

(1) Such person is
alleged to have broken the terms of his or her probation, parole, bail, or any
other release of the demanding state; and

(2) The law enforcement
agency has received from the demanding state an authenticated copy of a prior
waiver of extradition signed by such person as a term of his or her probation,
parole, bail, or any other release of the demanding state and photographs or
fingerprints or other evidence properly identifying the person as the person
who signed the waiver.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 72.65.070 (Wilfully failing to
return--Deemed escapee and fugitive--Penalty) and 1967 c 17 s 7; and

(2) RCW 72.66.060 (Wilfully failing to
return--Deemed escapee and fugitive--Penalty) and 1971 ex.s. c 58 s 7.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The laws repealed by this
act are repealed except with respect to rights and duties which matured,
penalties which were incurred, proceedings which were begun prior to the
effective date of this act, or proceedings which are initiated after this act
for violations committed prior to the effective date of this act.

---
END ---