BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.13.047 and 1985 c
45 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever state
officers or measures are voted upon at a state primary or general election held
in an odd-numbered year under RCW 29.13.010, the state of Washington shall
assume a prorated share of the costs of that state primary or general election.

(2) Whenever state
officers or measures are voted upon at a state primary or general election held
in an even-numbered year under RCW 29.13.010, the state of Washington shall
assume a prorated share of the costs of the primary or election according to
the following schedule:

(a) 2002,
twenty-five percent;

(b) 2004, fifty
percent;

(c) 2006,
seventy-five percent; and

(d) 2008 and
thereafter, one hundred percent.

(3) Whenever a
primary or vacancy election is held to fill a vacancy in the position of United
States senator or United States representative under chapter 29.68 RCW, the
state of Washington shall assume a prorated share of the costs of that primary
or vacancy election.

(((3))) (4)
The county auditor shall apportion the state's share of these expenses when
prorating election costs under RCW 29.13.045 and shall file such expense claims
with the secretary of state.

(((4)))
(5) The secretary of state shall include in his or her biennial budget
requests sufficient funds to carry out this section. Reimbursements for
election costs shall be from appropriations specifically provided by law for
that purpose.

--- END ---