BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 29.79

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 The office of financial management, in consultation
with the

_7 secretary of state, shall prepare a fiscal impact
statement for

_8 each of the following state ballot measures: (1) An
initiative to

_9 the people that is certified to the ballot; (2) an initiative
to

10 the legislature that will appear on the ballot; (3) an
alternative

11 measure appearing on the ballot that the legislature
proposes to

12 an initiative to the legislature; (4) a referendum bill
referred

13 to voters by the legislature; and (5) a referendum
measure

14 appearing on the ballot. Fiscal impact statements must
be written

15 in clear and concise language and avoid legal and
technical terms

16 when possible, and may include easily understood
graphics.

17 A fiscal impact statement must describe any
projected increase

18 or decrease in revenues, costs, expenditures, or
indebtedness that

19 the state or local governments will experience if the
ballot

p. 1 HB
1229

_1 measure were approved by state voters. Where appropriate,
a

_2 fiscal impact statement may include both estimated
dollar amounts

_3 and a description placing the estimated dollar amounts
into

_4 context. A fiscal impact statement must include both a
summary of

_5 not to exceed one hundred words and a more detailed
statement that

_6 includes the assumptions that were made to develop the
fiscal

_7 impacts.

_8 Fiscal impact statements must be available online
from the

_9 secretary of state's web site and included in the state
voters'

10 pamphlet.

11 Sec. 2. RCW
29.81.250 and 1999 c 260 s 5 are each amended to read

12 as follows:

13 The secretary of state shall determine the format
and layout of

14 the voters' pamphlet. The secretary of state shall
print the

15 pamphlet in clear, readable type on a size, quality, and
weight of

16 paper that in the judgment of the secretary of state
best serves

17 the voters. The pamphlet must contain a table of
contents.

18 Federal and state offices must appear in the pamphlet in
the same

19 sequence as they appear on the ballot. Measures and
arguments

20 must be printed in the order specified by RCW 29.79.300.

21 The voters' pamphlet must provide the following
information for

22 each statewide issue on the ballot:

23 (1) The legal identification of the measure by
serial

24 designation or number;

25 (2) The official ballot title of the measure;

26 (3) A statement prepared by the attorney general
explaining the

27 law as it presently exists;

28 (4) A statement prepared by the attorney general
explaining the

29 effect of the proposed measure if it becomes law;

30 (5) The fiscal impact statement prepared under
section 1 of

31 this act;

32 (6) The total number of votes cast for and
against the measure

33 in the senate and house of representatives, if the
measure has

34 been passed by the legislature;

35 (((6))) (7) An argument advocating the
voters' approval of the

36 measure together with any statement in rebuttal of the
opposing

37 argument;

HB 1229 p. 2

_1 (((7))) (8) An argument advocating the
voters' rejection of the

_2 measure together with any statement in rebuttal of the
opposing

_3 argument;

_4 (((8))) (9) Each argument or rebuttal
statement must be

_5 followed by the names of the committee members who
submitted them,

_6 and may be followed by a telephone number that citizens
may call

_7 to obtain information on the ballot measure;

_8 (((9))) (10) The full text of each
measure.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1229