BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.13.070 and 1977
ex.s. c 361 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

Nominating primaries
for general elections to be held in November shall be held at the regular
polling places in each precinct on the ((third)) second Tuesday
of the preceding ((September or on the seventh Tuesday immediately preceding
such general election, whichever occurs first)) June.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.13.010 and 1994 c
142 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All state, county,
city, town, and district general elections for the election of federal, state,
legislative, judicial, county, city, town, district, and precinct officers, and
for the submission to the voters of the state, county, city, town, or district
of any measure for their adoption and approval or rejection, shall be held on
the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November, in the year in which they
may be called. A statewide general election shall be held on the first Tuesday
after the first Monday of November of each year: PROVIDED, That the statewide
general election held in odd-numbered years shall be limited to (a) city, town,
and district general elections as provided for in RCW 29.13.020, or as
otherwise provided by law; (b) the election of federal officers for the
remainder of any unexpired terms in the membership of either branch of the congress
of the United States; (c) the election of state and county officers for the
remainder of any unexpired terms of offices created by or whose duties are
described in Article II, section 15, Article III, sections 16, 17, 19, 20, 21,
22, and 23, and Article IV, sections 3 and 5 of the state Constitution and RCW
2.06.080; (d) the election of county officers in any county governed by a
charter containing provisions calling for general county elections at this
time; and (e) the approval or rejection of state measures, including proposed
constitutional amendments, matters pertaining to any proposed constitutional
convention, initiative measures and referendum measures proposed by the
electorate, referendum bills, and any other matter provided by the legislature for
submission to the electorate.

(2) A county
legislative authority may, if it deems an emergency to exist, call a special
county election by presenting a resolution to the county auditor at least ((forty-five))
fifty-two days prior to the proposed election date. Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, a special election called by the county
legislative authority shall be held on one of the following dates as decided by
such governing body:

(a) The first Tuesday
after the first Monday in February;

(b) The second Tuesday
in March;

(c) The fourth Tuesday
in April;

(d) ((The third
Tuesday in May;

(e))) The day of the primary as specified by RCW
29.13.070; or

(((f))) (e)
The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.

(3) In addition to the
dates set forth in subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this section, a special
election to validate an excess levy or bond issue may be called at any time to
meet the needs resulting from fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of God.
Such county special election shall be noticed and conducted in the manner
provided by law.

(4) In a presidential
election year, if a presidential preference primary is conducted in February,
March, or April((, or May)) under chapter 29.19 RCW, the date on
which a special election may be called by the county legislative authority
under subsection (2) of this section during the month of that primary is the
date of the presidential primary.

(5) This section shall
supersede the provisions of any and all other statutes, whether general or
special in nature, having different dates for such city, town, and district
elections, the purpose of this section being to establish mandatory dates for
holding elections except for those elections held pursuant to a home-rule
charter adopted under Article XI, section 4 of the state Constitution. This
section shall not be construed as fixing the time for holding primary
elections, or elections for the recall of any elective public officer.

Sec. 3. RCW 29.13.020 and 1994 c
142 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All city, town, and
district general elections shall be held throughout the state of Washington on
the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November in the odd-numbered
years.

This section shall not
apply to:

(a) Elections for the
recall of any elective public officer;

(b) Public utility
districts or district elections at which the ownership of property within those
districts is a prerequisite to voting, all of which elections shall be held at
the times prescribed in the laws specifically applicable thereto;

(c) Consolidation
proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.315 RCW ((28A.315.280))
and nonhigh capital fund aid proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.540 RCW.

(2) The county auditor,
as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon request in the form of a resolution
of the governing body of a city, town, or district, presented to the auditor at
least ((forty-five)) fifty-two days prior to the proposed
election date, may, if the county auditor deems an emergency to exist, call a
special election in such city, town, or district, and for the purpose of such
special election he or she may combine, unite, or divide precincts. Except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, such a special election shall be
held on one of the following dates as decided by the governing body:

(a) The first Tuesday
after the first Monday in February;

(b) The second Tuesday
in March;

(c) The fourth Tuesday
in April;

(d) ((The third Tuesday
in May;

(e))) The day of the primary election as specified
by RCW 29.13.070; or

(((f))) (e)
The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.

(3) In a presidential
election year, if a presidential preference primary is conducted in February, March,
or April((, or May)) under chapter 29.19 RCW, the date on which a
special election may be called under subsection (2) of this section during the
month of that primary is the date of the presidential primary.

(4) In addition to
subsection (2)(a) through (((f))) (e) of this section, a special
election to validate an excess levy or bond issue may be called at any time to
meet the needs resulting from fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of God,
except that no special election may be held between the first day for
candidates to file for public office and the last day to certify the returns of
the general election other than as provided in subsection (2) (d) and
(e) ((and (f))) of this section. Such special election shall be
conducted and notice thereof given in the manner provided by law.

(5) This section shall
supersede the provisions of any and all other statutes, whether general or
special in nature, having different dates for such city, town, and district
elections, the purpose of this section being to establish mandatory dates for
holding elections.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.15.020 and 1990 c
59 s 81 are each amended to read as follows:

Except where otherwise
provided by this title, declarations of candidacy for the following offices
shall be filed during regular business hours with the filing officer no earlier
than ((the fourth Monday in July)) sixty-four days before the date of
the primary established by RCW 29.13.070 and no later than the following
Friday in the year in which the office is scheduled to be voted upon:

(1) Offices that are
scheduled to be voted upon for full terms or both full terms and short terms
at, or in conjunction with, a state general election; and

(2) Offices where a
vacancy, other than a short term, exists that has not been filled by election
and for which an election to fill the vacancy is required in conjunction with
the next state general election.

This section supersedes
all other statutes that provide for a different filing period for these offices.

Sec. 5. RCW 29.15.150 and 1973 c
4 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever it shall be
necessary to hold a special election in an odd-numbered year to fill an
unexpired term of any office which is scheduled to be voted upon for a full
term in an even-numbered year, no ((September)) primary election shall
be held in the odd-numbered year if, after the last day allowed for candidates
to withdraw, either of the following circumstances exist:

(1) No more than one
candidate of each qualified political party has filed a declaration of
candidacy for the same partisan office to be filled; or

(2) No more than two
candidates have filed a declaration of candidacy for a single nonpartisan
office to be filled.

In either event, the
officer with whom the declarations of candidacy were filed shall immediately
notify all candidates concerned and the names of the candidates that would have
been printed upon the ((September)) primary ballot, but for the provisions
of this section, shall be printed as nominees for the positions sought upon the
November general election ballot.

Sec. 6. RCW 29.15.170 and 2001 c
46 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Filings for a
nonpartisan office shall be reopened for a period of three normal business
days, such three day period to be fixed by the election officer with whom such
declarations of candidacy are filed and notice thereof given by notifying
press, radio, and television in the county and by such other means as may now
or hereafter be provided by law whenever before the ((sixth)) seventh
Tuesday prior to a primary:

(1) A void in candidacy
occurs;

(2) A vacancy occurs in
any nonpartisan office leaving an unexpired term to be filled by an election
for which filings have not been held; or

(3) A nominee for judge
of the superior court entitled to a certificate of election pursuant to Article
4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified.

Candidacies validly
filed within said three-day period shall appear on the ballot as if made during
the earlier filing period.

Sec. 7. RCW 29.15.180 and 2001 c
46 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Filings for a
nonpartisan office (other than judge of the supreme court or superintendent of
public instruction) shall be reopened for a period of three normal business
days, such three day period to be fixed by the election officer with whom such
declarations of candidacy are filed and notice thereof given by notifying
press, radio, and television in the county and by such other means as may now
or hereafter be provided by law, when:

(1) A void in candidacy
for such nonpartisan office occurs on or after the ((sixth)) seventh
Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the ((sixth)) seventh
Tuesday before an election; or

(2) A nominee for judge
of the superior court eligible after a contested primary for a certificate of
election by Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies
or is disqualified within the ten day period immediately following the last day
allotted for a candidate to withdraw; or

(3) A vacancy occurs in
any nonpartisan office on or after the ((sixth)) seventh Tuesday
prior to a primary but prior to the ((sixth)) seventh Tuesday
before an election leaving an unexpired term to be filled by an election for
which filings have not been held.

The candidate receiving
a plurality of the votes cast for that office in the general election shall be
deemed elected.

Sec. 8. RCW 29.15.190 and
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

A scheduled election
shall be lapsed, the office deemed stricken from the ballot, no purported
write-in votes counted, and no candidate certified as elected, when:

(1) In an election for
judge of the supreme court or superintendent of public instruction, a void in
candidacy occurs on or after the ((fourth)) seventh Tuesday prior
to a primary, public filings and the primary being an indispensable phase of
the election process for such offices;

(2) Except as otherwise
specified in RCW 29.15.180, ((as now or hereafter amended,)) a nominee
for judge of the superior court entitled to a certificate of election pursuant
to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution dies or is
disqualified on or after the ((fourth)) seventh Tuesday prior to
a primary;

(3) In other elections
for nonpartisan office a void in candidacy occurs or a vacancy occurs involving
an unexpired term to be filled on or after the ((fourth)) seventh
Tuesday prior to an election.

Sec. 9. RCW 29.15.230 and 2001 c
46 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Filings for a partisan
elective office shall be opened for a period of three normal business days
whenever, on or after the first day of the regular filing period and before the
((sixth)) seventh Tuesday prior to a primary, a vacancy occurs in
that office, leaving an unexpired term to be filled by an election for which
filings have not been held.

Any such special
three-day filing period shall be fixed by the election officer with whom
declarations of candidacy for that office are filed. The election officer
shall give notice of the special three-day filing period by notifying the
press, radio, and television in the county or counties involved, and by such
other means as may be required by law.

Candidacies validly
filed within the special three-day filing period shall appear on the primary
ballot as if filed during the regular filing period.

Sec. 10. RCW 29.18.160 and 2001 c
46 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A vacancy caused by the
death or disqualification of any candidate or nominee of a major or minor
political party may be filled at any time up to and including the day prior to
the election for that position. For state partisan offices in any political
subdivision voted on solely by electors of a single county, an individual shall
be appointed to fill such vacancy by the county central committee in the case
of a major political party or by the state central committee or comparable
governing body in the case of a minor political party. For other partisan
offices, including federal or statewide offices, an individual shall be
appointed to fill such vacancy by the state central committee or comparable
governing body of the appropriate political party.

Should such vacancy
occur no later than the ((sixth)) seventh Tuesday prior to the
state primary or general election concerned and the ballots have been printed,
it shall be mandatory that they be corrected by the appropriate election
officers. In making such correction, it shall not be necessary to reprint complete
ballots if any other less expensive technique can be used and the resulting
correction is reasonably clear.

Should such vacancy
occur after the ((sixth)) seventh Tuesday prior to said state
primary or general election and time does not exist in which to correct ballots
(including absentee ballots), either in total or in part, then the votes cast
or recorded for the person who has died or become disqualified shall be counted
for the person who has been named to fill such vacancy.

When the secretary of
state is the person with whom the appointment by the major or minor political
party is filed, he shall, in certifying candidates or nominations to the
various county officers insert the name of the person appointed to fill a
vacancy.

In the event that the
secretary of state has already sent forth his certificate when the appointment
to fill a vacancy is filed with him, he shall forthwith certify to the county
auditors of the proper counties the name and place of residence of the person
appointed to fill a vacancy, the office for which he is a candidate or nominee,
the party he represents and all other pertinent facts pertaining to the
vacancy.

Sec. 11. RCW 29.19.030 and 1989 c
4 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The name of any
candidate for a major political party nomination for president of the United
States shall be printed on the presidential preference primary ballot of a
major political party only:

(1) By direction of the
secretary of state, who in the secretary's sole discretion has determined that
the candidate's candidacy is generally advocated or is recognized in national
news media; or

(2) If members of the
political party of the candidate have presented a petition for nomination of
the candidate that has attached to the petition a sheet or sheets containing
the signatures of at least one thousand registered voters who declare
themselves in the petition as being affiliated with the same political party as
the presidential candidate. The petition shall be filed with the secretary of
state not later than the ((thirty-ninth)) fifty-second day before
the presidential preference primary. The signature sheets shall also contain
the residence address and name or number of the precinct of each registered
voter whose signature appears thereon and shall be certified in the manner
prescribed in RCW 29.79.200 and 29.79.210.

The secretary of state
shall place the name of the candidate on the ballot unless the candidate, at
least ((thirty-five)) forty-five days before the presidential
preference primary, executes and files with the secretary of state an affidavit
stating without qualification that he or she is not now and will not become a
candidate for the office of president of the United States at the forthcoming presidential
election. The secretary of state shall certify the names of all candidates who
will appear on the presidential preference primary ballot to the respective
county auditors on or before the fourth Tuesday in April of each presidential
election year.

Sec. 12. RCW 29.24.020 and 2001 c
30 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any nomination of a
candidate for partisan public office by other than a major political party may
be made only: (a) In a convention held not earlier than the ((last Saturday
in June and not later than the first Saturday in July or during any of the
seven days immediately preceding)) forty-fourth day nor later than the
sixteenth day before the first day for filing declarations of candidacy as
fixed in accordance with RCW 29.68.080; (b) as provided by RCW 29.62.180; or
(c) as otherwise provided in this section.

(2) Nominations of
candidates for president and vice president of the United States other than by
a major political party may be made either at a convention conducted under
subsection (1) of this section, or at a similar convention taking place not
earlier than the first Sunday in July and not later than seventy days before
the general election. Conventions held during this time period may not
nominate candidates for any public office other than president and vice
president of the United States, except as provided in subsection (3) of this
section.

(3) If a special filing
period for a partisan office is opened under RCW 29.15.230, candidates of minor
political parties and independent candidates may file for office during that
special filing period. The names of those candidates may not appear on the
ballot unless they are nominated by convention held no later than five days
after the close of the special filing period and a certificate of nomination is
filed with the filing officer no later than three days after the convention.
The requirements of RCW 29.24.025 do not apply to such a convention. If
primary ballots or a voters' pamphlet are ordered to be printed before the
deadline for submitting the certificate of nomination and the certificate has
not been filed, then the candidate's name will be included but may not appear
on the general election ballot unless the certificate is timely filed and the
candidate otherwise qualifies to appear on that ballot.

(4) A minor political
party may hold more than one convention but in no case shall any such party
nominate more than one candidate for any one partisan public office or
position. For the purpose of nominating candidates for the offices of
president and vice president, United States senator, or a statewide office, a
minor party or independent candidate holding multiple conventions may add
together the number of signatures of different individuals from each convention
obtained in support of the candidate or candidates in order to obtain the
number required by RCW 29.24.030. For all other offices for which nominations
are made, signatures of the requisite number of registered voters must be
obtained at a single convention.

Sec. 13. RCW 29.36.270 and 1987 c
54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except where a recount
or litigation under RCW 29.04.030 is pending, the county auditor shall have
sufficient absentee ballots ready to mail to absentee voters of that county,
other than overseas voters or service voters, at least twenty days before
any primary, general election, or special election. At least thirty days
before a primary, general election, or special election, the county auditor
shall mail absentee ballots to all overseas and service voters who have
submitted valid requests for absentee ballots. A request for an absentee
ballot made by an overseas voter or service voter after that day must be processed
immediately.

Sec. 14. RCW 29.38.020 and 2001 c
241 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

At any nonpartisan
special election not being held in conjunction with a state primary or general
election, the county, city, town, or district requesting the election pursuant
to RCW 29.13.010 or 29.13.020 may also request that the special election be
conducted by mail ballot. The county auditor may honor the request or may
determine that the election is not to be conducted by mail ballot. The
decision of the county auditor in this regard is final.

((For all special
elections not being held in conjunction with a state primary or state general
election where voting is conducted by mail ballot, the county auditor shall,
not less than twenty days before the date of such election, make available to
each registered voter a mail ballot.)) The auditor shall handle inactive
voters in the same manner as inactive voters in mail ballot precincts.

Sec. 15. RCW 29.38.030 and 2001 c
241 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

((In an odd-numbered
year,)) The county auditor may conduct a primary or a special
election held in conjunction with a primary by mail ballot ((concurrently
with the primary:

(1) For an office or
ballot measure of a special purpose district that is entirely within the
county;

(2) For an office or
ballot measure of a special purpose district that lies in the county and one or
more other counties if the auditor first secures the concurrence of the county
auditors of those other counties to conduct the primary in this manner
district-wide; and

(3) For a ballot
measure or nonpartisan office of a county, city, or town if the auditor first
secures the concurrence of the legislative authority of the county, city, or
town involved)).

For a primary held
in an odd-numbered year, the county auditor shall notify ((an)) each
election jurisdiction for which a primary is to be held that the primary will
be conducted by mail ballot. For a primary held in an even-numbered year,
the county auditor shall notify the secretary of state that the primary will be
conducted by mail ballot. The county auditor shall include in the notice
required by RCW 29.27.030, information pertaining to a primary conducted by
mail ballot according to this section.

((A primary in an
odd-numbered year may not be conducted by mail ballot in a precinct with two
hundred or more active registered voters if a partisan office or state office
or state ballot measure is to be voted upon at that primary in the precinct.))

To the extent they are
not inconsistent with other provisions of law, the laws governing the conduct
of mail ballot special elections apply to nonpartisan primaries conducted by
mail ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 29.38 RCW to read as follows:

Except where a recount
or litigation under RCW 29.04.030 is pending, the county auditor shall have
sufficient mail ballots ready to mail to voters of that county, other than
overseas voters or service voters, at least twenty days before a primary,
general election, or special election. At least thirty days before a primary,
general election, or special election, the county auditor shall mail ballots to
all overseas and service voters. A request for a ballot made by an overseas
voter or service voter after that day must be processed immediately.

Sec. 17. RCW 29.62.020 and 1999 c
259 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At least every
third day after a special election, primary, or general election and before
certification of the election results, except Sundays and legal holidays, the
county auditor shall convene the county canvassing board or their designees to
process absentee ballots and canvass the votes cast at that special election,
primary, or general election, if the county auditor is in possession of more
than twenty-five ballots that have yet to be canvassed. The county auditor may
use his or her discretion in determining when to convene the canvassing board
or their designees during the final four days before the certification of
election results in order to protect the secrecy of any ballot.

Each absentee ballot
previously not canvassed that was received by the county auditor two days or
more before the convening of the canvassing board or their designees and that
either was received by the county auditor before the closing of the polls on
the day of the special election, primary, or general election for which it was
issued, or that bears a date of mailing on or before the special election,
primary, or general election for which it was issued, must be processed at that
time. The tabulation of votes that results from that day's canvass must be
made available to the general public immediately upon completion of the
canvass.

(2) On the ((tenth))
fifteenth day after a special election ((or a)), primary
((and on the fifteenth day after a)), or general election, the
canvassing board shall complete the canvass and certify the results. Each
absentee ballot that was returned before the closing of the polls on the date
of the primary or election for which it was issued, and each absentee ballot
with a date of mailing on or before the date of the primary or election for
which it was issued and received on or before the date on which the primary or
election is certified, shall be included in the canvass report.

(3) At the request of
any caucus of the state legislature, the county auditor shall transmit copies
of all unofficial returns of state and legislative primaries or elections
prepared by or for the county canvassing board to either the secretary of the
senate or the chief clerk of the house.

Sec. 18. RCW 42.12.040 and 1981 c
180 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If a vacancy occurs in
any partisan elective office in the executive or legislative branches of state
government or in any partisan county elective office before the ((fourth))
seventh Tuesday prior to the primary for the next general election
following the occurrence of the vacancy, a successor shall be elected to that office
at that general election. Except during the last year of the term of office,
if such a vacancy occurs on or after the ((fourth)) seventh
Tuesday prior to the primary for that general election, the election of the
successor shall occur at the next succeeding general election. The elected
successor shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term. This
section shall not apply to any vacancy occurring in a charter county which has
charter provisions inconsistent with this section.

Sec. 19. RCW 42.17.080 and 2000 c
237 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On the day the
treasurer is designated, each candidate or political committee shall file with
the commission and the county auditor or elections officer of the county in
which the candidate resides, or in the case of a political committee, the
county in which the treasurer resides, in addition to any statement of
organization required under RCW 42.17.040 or 42.17.050, a report of all
contributions received and expenditures made prior to that date, if any.

(2) At the following
intervals each treasurer shall file with the commission and the county auditor
or elections officer of the county in which the candidate resides, or in the
case of a political committee, the county in which the committee maintains its
office or headquarters, and if there is no office or headquarters then in the
county in which the treasurer resides, a report containing the information
required by RCW 42.17.090:

(a) On the twenty-first
day and the seventh day immediately preceding the date on which the election is
held; and

(b) On the tenth day of
the first month after the election((: PROVIDED, That this report shall not
be required following a primary election from:

(i) A candidate
whose name will appear on the subsequent general election ballot; or

(ii) Any continuing
political committee)); and

(c) On the tenth day of
each month in which no other reports are required to be filed under this
section: PROVIDED, That such report shall only be filed if the committee has
received a contribution or made an expenditure in the preceding calendar month
and either the total contributions received or total expenditures made since
the last such report exceed two hundred dollars.

When there is no
outstanding debt or obligation, and the campaign fund is closed, and the
campaign is concluded in all respects, and in the case of a political
committee, the committee has ceased to function and has dissolved, the
treasurer shall file a final report. Upon submitting a final report, the
duties of the treasurer shall cease and there shall be no obligation to make
any further reports.

The report filed
twenty-one days before the election shall report all contributions received and
expenditures made as of the end of the fifth business day before the date of
the report. The report filed seven days before the election shall report all
contributions received and expenditures made as of the end of the one business
day before the date of the report. Reports filed on the tenth day of the month
shall report all contributions received and expenditures made from the closing
date of the last report filed through the last day of the month preceding the
date of the current report.

(3) For the period beginning
the first day of the fourth month preceding the date on which the special ((or
general)) election is held, or for the period beginning the first day of
the seventh month before the date on which the general election is held,
and ending on the date of that special or general election, each ((Friday))
Monday the treasurer shall file with the commission and the appropriate
county elections officer a report of each bank deposit made during the previous
seven calendar days. The report shall contain the name of each person
contributing the funds so deposited and the amount contributed by each person.
However, contributions of no more than twenty-five dollars in the aggregate
from any one person may be deposited without identifying the contributor. A copy
of the report shall be retained by the treasurer for his or her records. In
the event of deposits made by a deputy treasurer, the copy shall be forwarded
to the treasurer for his or her records. Each report shall be certified as
correct by the treasurer or deputy treasurer making the deposit.

(4) If a city requires
that candidates or committees for city offices file reports with a city agency,
the candidate or treasurer so filing need not also file the report with the
county auditor or elections officer.

(5) The treasurer or
candidate shall maintain books of account accurately reflecting all
contributions and expenditures on a current basis within five business days of
receipt or expenditure. During the eight days immediately preceding the date
of the election the books of account shall be kept current within one business
day. As specified in the committee's statement of organization filed under RCW
42.17.040, the books of account must be open for public inspection as follows:

(a) For at least two consecutive
hours between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m. on the eighth day immediately before the
election, except when it is a legal holiday, in which case on the seventh day
immediately before the election, at the principal headquarters or, if there is
no headquarters, at the address of the treasurer or such other place as may be
authorized by the commission; and

(b) By appointment for
inspections to be conducted at the designated place for inspections between
8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m. on any other day from the seventh day through the day
immediately before the election, other than Saturday, Sunday, or a legal
holiday. It is a violation of this chapter for a candidate or political
committee to refuse to allow and keep an appointment for an inspection to be
conducted during these authorized times and days in the week prior to the
election. The appointment must be allowed at an authorized time and day for
such inspections that is within twenty-four hours of the time and day that is
requested for the inspection.

(6) The treasurer or
candidate shall preserve books of account, bills, receipts, and all other
financial records of the campaign or political committee for not less than five
calendar years following the year during which the transaction occurred.

(7) All reports filed
pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be certified as correct
by the candidate and the treasurer.

(8) Copies of all
reports filed pursuant to this section shall be readily available for public
inspection for at least two consecutive hours Monday through Friday, excluding
legal holidays, between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m., as specified in the
committee's statement of organization filed pursuant to RCW 42.17.040, at the
principal headquarters or, if there is no headquarters, at the address of the
treasurer or such other place as may be authorized by the commission.

(9) After January 1,
2002, a report that is filed with the commission electronically need not also
be filed with the county auditor or elections officer.

(10) The commission
shall adopt administrative rules establishing requirements for filer
participation in any system designed and implemented by the commission for the
electronic filing of reports.

Sec. 20. RCW 42.17.710 and 1993 c
2 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

During the period
beginning on the thirtieth day before the date a regular legislative session
convenes and continuing ((thirty days past)) through the date of
final adjournment, ((and during the period beginning on the date a special
legislative session convenes and continuing through the date that session
adjourns,)) no state official or a person employed by or acting on behalf
of a state official or state legislator may solicit or accept contributions to
a public office fund, to a candidate or authorized committee, or to retire a
campaign debt.

Sec. 21. RCW 42.52.185 and 1997 c
320 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) During the
twelve-month period beginning on December 1st of the year before a general
election for a state legislator's election to office and continuing through
November 30th immediately after the general election, the legislator may not
mail, either by regular mail or electronic mail, to a constituent at public expense
a letter, newsletter, brochure, or other piece of literature, except as
follows:

(a) The legislator may
mail two mailings of newsletters to constituents. All newsletters within each
mailing of newsletters must be identical as to their content but not as to the
constituent name or address. One such mailing may be mailed no later than
thirty days after the start of a regular legislative session, except that a
legislator appointed during a regular legislative session to fill a vacant seat
may have up to thirty days from the date of appointment to send out the first
mailing. The other mailing may be mailed no ((later than sixty days after
the end of a regular legislative session)) earlier than one day after
the date of the primary established by RCW 29.13.070 and no later than fifteen
days after the date of the primary.

(b) The legislator may
mail an individual letter to (i) an individual constituent who has contacted
the legislator regarding the subject matter of the letter during the
legislator's current term of office; (ii) an individual constituent who holds a
governmental office with jurisdiction over the subject matter of the letter; or
(iii) an individual constituent who has received an award or honor of
extraordinary distinction of a type that is sufficiently infrequent to be
noteworthy to a reasonable person, including, but not limited to: (A) An
international or national award such as the Nobel prize or the Pulitzer prize;
(B) a state award such as Washington scholar; (C) an Eagle Scout award; and (D)
a Medal of Honor.

(2) For purposes of
subsection (1) of this section, "legislator" means a legislator who
is a "candidate," as defined by RCW 42.17.020, for any public office.

(3) A violation of this
section constitutes use of the facilities of a public office for the purpose of
assisting a campaign under RCW 42.52.180.

(4) The house of
representatives and senate shall specifically limit expenditures per member for
the total cost of mailings. Those costs include, but are not limited to,
production costs, printing costs, and postage costs. The limits imposed under
this subsection apply only to the total expenditures on mailings per member and
not to any categorical cost within the total.

(5) For purposes of
this section, persons residing outside the legislative district represented by
the legislator are not considered to be constituents, but students, military
personnel, or others temporarily employed outside of the district who normally
reside in the district are considered to be constituents.

Sec. 22. RCW 27.12.355 and 1987 c
138 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As provided in this
section, a rural county library district, island library district, or
intercounty rural library district may withdraw areas from its boundaries, or
reannex areas into the library district that previously had been withdrawn from
the library district under this section.

(2) The withdrawal of
an area shall be authorized upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the board of
trustees requesting the withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the
board, inclusion of this area within the library district will result in a
reduction of the district's tax levy rate under the provisions of RCW
84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city or town council
approving the withdrawal, if the area is located within the city or town, or
adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority of the county
within which the area is located approving the withdrawal, if the area is
located outside of a city or town. A withdrawal shall be effective at the end
of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the
resolutions are adopted, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for
property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the
adoption of the second resolution.

The authority of an
area to be withdrawn from a library district as provided under this section is
in addition, and not subject, to the provisions of RCW 27.12.380.

The withdrawal of an
area from the boundaries of a library district shall not exempt any property
therein from taxation for the purpose of paying the costs of redeeming any
indebtedness of the library district existing at the time of the withdrawal.

(3) An area that has
been withdrawn from the boundaries of a library district under this section may
be reannexed into the library district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by
the board of trustees proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of a
resolution by the city or town council approving the reannexation, if the area
is located within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county
legislative authority of the county within which the area is located approving
the reannexation, if the area is located outside of a city or town. The
reannexation shall be effective at the end of the day on the thirty-first day
of December in the year in which the adoption of the second resolution occurs,
but for purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the
boundaries shall be established immediately upon the adoption of the second
resolution. Referendum action on the proposed reannexation may be taken by the
voters of the area proposed to be reannexed if a petition calling for a
referendum is filed with the city or town council, or county legislative
authority, within a thirty-day period after the adoption of the second
resolution, which petition has been signed by registered voters of the area
proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten percent of the total number of
the registered voters residing in that area.

If a valid petition
signed by the requisite number of registered voters has been so filed, the
effect of the resolutions shall be held in abeyance and a ballot proposition to
authorize the reannexation shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the
next special election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs ((forty-five))
fifty-two or more days after the petitions have been validated.
Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the reannexation by a simple
majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

Sec. 23. RCW 27.12.370 and 1982 c
123 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The county legislative
authority or authorities shall by resolution call a special election to be held
in such city or town at the next date provided in RCW 29.13.010 but not less
than ((forty-five)) fifty‑two days from the date of the
declaration of such finding, and shall cause notice of such election to be
given as provided for in RCW 29.27.080.

The election on the
annexation of the city or town into the library district shall be conducted by
the auditor of the county or counties in which the city or town is located in
accordance with the general election laws of the state and the results thereof
shall be canvassed by the canvassing board of the county or counties. No
person shall be entitled to vote at such election unless he or she is
registered to vote in said city or town for at least thirty days preceding the
date of the election. The ballot proposition shall be in substantially the
following form:

"Shall
the city or town of . . . . . . be annexed to and be a
part of . . . . . . library district?

YES ........................................... G

NO............................................. G"

If a majority of the
persons voting on the proposition shall vote in favor thereof, the city or town
shall thereupon be annexed and shall be a part of such library district.

Sec. 24. RCW 35.06.070 and 1994 c
81 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

A ballot proposition
authorizing an advancement in classification of a town to a second class city
shall be submitted to the voters of the town if either: (1) Petitions
proposing the advancement are submitted to the town clerk that have been signed
by voters of the town equal in number to at least ten percent of the voters of
the town voting at the last municipal general election; or (2) the town council
adopts a resolution proposing the advancement. The clerk shall immediately
forward the petitions to the county auditor who shall review the signatures and
certify the sufficiency of the petitions.

A ballot proposition
authorizing an advancement shall be submitted to the town voters at the next
municipal general election occurring ((forty-five)) fifty-two or
more days after the petitions are submitted if the county auditor certifies the
petitions as having sufficient valid signatures. The town shall be advanced to
a second class city if the ballot proposition is approved by a simple majority
vote, effective when the corporation is actually reorganized and the new
officers are elected and qualified. The county auditor shall notify the
secretary of state if the advancement of a town to a second class city is
approved.

Sec. 25. RCW 35.13.1821 and 1998
c 286 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The annexation
ordinance provided for in RCW 35.13.182 is subject to referendum for forty-five
days after its passage. Upon the filing of a timely and sufficient referendum
petition with the legislative body, signed by qualified electors in number
equal to not less than ten percent of the votes cast in the last general state
election in the area to be annexed, the question of annexation shall be
submitted to the voters of the area in a general election if one is to be held
within ninety days or at a special election called for that purpose not less
than ((forty-five)) fifty-two days nor more than ninety days
after the filing of the referendum petition. Notice of the election shall be
given as provided in RCW 35.13.080 and the election shall be conducted as
provided in the general election law. The annexation shall be deemed approved
by the voters unless a majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in
opposition thereto.

After the expiration of
the forty-fifth day from but excluding the date of passage of the annexation
ordinance, if no timely and sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the
area annexed shall become a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the
ordinance of annexation.

Sec. 26. RCW 35.61.360 and 1987 c
138 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As provided in this
section, a metropolitan park district may withdraw areas from its boundaries,
or reannex areas into the metropolitan park district that previously had been
withdrawn from the metropolitan park district under this section.

(2) The withdrawal of
an area shall be authorized upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the park
district commissioners requesting the withdrawal and finding that, in the
opinion of the commissioners, inclusion of this area within the metropolitan
park district will result in a reduction of the district's tax levy rate under
the provisions of RCW 84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city
or town council approving the withdrawal, if the area is located within the
city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority
of the county within which the area is located approving the withdrawal, if the
area is located outside of a city or town. A withdrawal shall be effective at
the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the
resolutions are adopted, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for
property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the
adoption of the second resolution.

The withdrawal of an
area from the boundaries of a metropolitan park district shall not exempt any
property therein from taxation for the purpose of paying the costs of redeeming
any indebtedness of the metropolitan park district existing at the time of the
withdrawal.

(3) An area that has
been withdrawn from the boundaries of a metropolitan park district under this
section may be reannexed into the metropolitan park district upon: (a)
Adoption of a resolution by the park district commissioners proposing the
reannexation; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city or town council
approving the reannexation, if the area is located within the city or town, or
adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority of the county
within which the area is located approving the reannexation, if the area is
located outside of a city or town. The reannexation shall be effective at the
end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the
adoption of the second resolution occurs, but for purposes of establishing
boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established
immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution. Referendum action on
the proposed reannexation may be taken by the voters of the area proposed to be
reannexed if a petition calling for a referendum is filed with the city or town
council, or county legislative authority, within a thirty-day period after the
adoption of the second resolution, which petition has been signed by registered
voters of the area proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten percent of
the total number of the registered voters residing in that area.

If a valid petition
signed by the requisite number of registered voters has been so filed, the
effect of the resolutions shall be held in abeyance and a ballot proposition to
authorize the reannexation shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the
next special election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs ((forty-five))
fifty-two or more days after the petitions have been validated.
Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the reannexation by a simple
majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

Sec. 27. RCW 35A.14.299 and 1967
ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.299 are each amended to read as follows:

Such annexation
ordinance as provided for in RCW 35A.14.297 shall be subject to referendum for
forty-five days after the passage thereof. Upon the filing of a timely and
sufficient referendum petition with the legislative body, signed by qualified
electors in number equal to not less than ten percent of the votes cast in the
last general state election in the area to be annexed, the question of
annexation shall be submitted to the voters of such area in a general election
if one is to be held within ninety days or at a special election called for
that purpose not less than ((forty-five)) fifty-two days nor more
than ninety days after the filing of the referendum petition. Notice of such
election shall be given as provided in RCW 35A.14.070 and the election shall be
conducted as provided in RCW ((35A.14.060)) 35A.29.151. The
annexation shall be deemed approved by the voters unless a majority of the
votes cast on the proposition are in opposition thereto.

After the expiration of
the forty-fifth day from but excluding the date of passage of the annexation
ordinance, if no timely and sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the
area annexed shall become a part of the code city upon the date fixed in the
ordinance of annexation. From and after such date, if the ordinance so
provided, property in the annexed area shall be subject to the proposed zoning
regulation prepared and filed for such area as provided in RCW 35A.14.330 and
35A.14.340. If the ordinance so provided, all property within the area annexed
shall be assessed and taxed at the same rate and on the same basis as the
property of such annexing code city is assessed and taxed to pay for any then
outstanding indebtedness of such city contracted prior to, or existing at, the
date of annexation.

Sec. 28. RCW 36.93.030 and 1991 c
363 s 91 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
created and established in each county with a population of two hundred ten
thousand or more a board to be known and designated as a "boundary review
board".

(2) A boundary review
board may be created and established in any other county in the following
manner:

(a) The county
legislative authority may, by majority vote, adopt a resolution establishing a
boundary review board; or

(b) A petition seeking
establishment of a boundary review board signed by qualified electors residing
in the county equal in number to at least five percent of the votes cast in the
county at the last county general election may be filed with the county
auditor.

Upon the filing of such
a petition, the county auditor shall examine the same and certify to the
sufficiency of the signatures thereon. No person may withdraw his or her name
from a petition after it has been filed with the auditor. Within thirty days
after the filing of such petition, the county auditor shall transmit the same
to the county legislative authority, together with his or her certificate of
sufficiency.

After receipt of a
valid petition for the establishment of a boundary review board, the county
legislative authority shall submit the question of whether a boundary review
board should be established to the electorate at the next county primary or
county general election which occurs more than ((forty-five)) fifty-two
days from the date of receipt of the petition. Notice of the election shall be
given as provided in RCW 29.27.080 and shall include a clear statement of the
proposal to be submitted.

If a majority of the
persons voting on the proposition shall vote in favor of the establishment of
the boundary review board, such board shall thereupon be deemed established.

Sec. 29. RCW 52.02.080 and 1989 c
63 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
election on the formation of the district and to elect the initial fire
commissioners shall be conducted by the election officials of the county or
counties in which the proposed district is located in accordance with the
general election laws of the state. This election shall be held at the next
general election date, as specified under RCW 29.13.020, that occurs ((forty-five))
fifty-two or more days after the date of the action by the boundary
review board, or county legislative authority or authorities, approving the
proposal.

Sec. 30. RCW 52.04.056 and 1989 c
63 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As provided in this
section, a fire protection district may withdraw areas from its boundaries, or
reannex areas into the fire protection district that previously had been
withdrawn from the fire protection district under this section.

(2) The withdrawal of
an area shall be authorized upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the board of
fire commissioners requesting the withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion
of the board, inclusion of this area within the fire protection district will
result in a reduction of the district's tax levy rate under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city or town council
approving the withdrawal, if the area is located within the city or town, or
adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority or authorities of
the county or counties within which the area is located approving the
withdrawal, if the area is located outside of a city or town. A withdrawal
shall be effective at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in
the year in which the resolutions are adopted, but for purposes of establishing
boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established
immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution.

The authority of an
area to be withdrawn from a fire protection district as provided under this
section is in addition, and not subject, to the provisions of RCW 52.04.101.

The withdrawal of an
area from the boundaries of a fire protection district shall not exempt any
property therein from taxation for the purpose of paying the costs of redeeming
any indebtedness of the fire protection district existing at the time of the
withdrawal.

(3) An area that has
been withdrawn from the boundaries of a fire protection district under this
section may be reannexed into the fire protection district upon: (a) Adoption
of a resolution by the board of fire commissioners proposing the reannexation;
and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city or town council approving the
reannexation, if the area is located within the city or town, or adoption of a
resolution by the county legislative authority or authorities of the county or
counties within which the area is located approving the reannexation, if the
area is located outside of a city or town. The reannexation shall be effective
at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which
the adoption of the second resolution occurs, but for purposes of establishing
boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established
immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution. Referendum action on
the proposed reannexation may be taken by the voters of the area proposed to be
reannexed if a petition calling for a referendum is filed with the city or town
council, or county legislative authority or authorities, within a thirty-day
period after the adoption of the second resolution, which petition has been
signed by registered voters of the area proposed to be reannexed equal in
number to ten percent of the total number of the registered voters residing in
that area.

If a valid petition
signed by the requisite number of registered voters has been so filed, the
effect of the resolutions shall be held in abeyance and a ballot proposition to
authorize the reannexation shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the
next special election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs ((forty-five))
fifty-two or more days after the petitions have been validated.
Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the reannexation by a simple
majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

Sec. 31. RCW 52.04.071 and 1984 c
230 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The county legislative
authority or authorities shall by resolution call a special election to be held
in the city or town and in the fire protection district at the next date
provided in RCW 29.13.010 but not less than ((forty-five)) fifty-two
days from the date of the declaration of the finding, and shall cause notice of
the election to be given as provided for in RCW 29.27.080.

The election on the
annexation of the city or town into the fire protection district shall be
conducted by the auditor of the county or counties in which the city or town
and the fire protection district are located in accordance with the general
election laws of the state. The results thereof shall be canvassed by the
canvassing board of the county or counties. No person is entitled to vote at
the election unless he or she is a qualified elector in the city or town or
unless he or she is a qualified elector within the boundaries of the fire
protection district. The ballot proposition shall be in substantially the
following form:

"Shall
the city or town of . . . . . . be annexed to and be a
part of . . . . . . fire protection district?

YES .......................................

NO ........................................ "

If a majority of the
persons voting on the proposition in the city or town and a majority of the
persons voting on the proposition in the fire protection district vote in favor
thereof, the city or town shall be annexed and shall be a part of the fire protection
district.

Sec. 32. RCW 53.04.110 and 1998 c
240 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any port district now
existing or which may hereafter be organized under the laws of the state of
Washington is hereby authorized to change its corporate name under the
following conditions and in the following manner:

(1) On presentation, at
least ((forty-five)) fifty-two days before any general port
election to be held in the port district, of a petition to the commissioners of
any port district now existing or which may hereafter be established under the
laws of the state of Washington, signed by at least ten percent of the total
number of voters of the port district who voted at the last general port
election and asking that the corporate name of the port district be changed, it
shall be the duty of the commissioners to submit to the voters of the port
district the proposition as to whether the corporate name of the port shall be
changed. The proposition shall be submitted at the next general port election.

(2) The petition shall
contain the present corporate name of the port district and the corporate name
which is proposed to be given to the port district.

(3) On submitting the
proposition to the voters of the port district it shall be the duty of the port
commissioners to cause to be printed on the official ballot used at the
election the following proposition:

"Shall the corporate name, 'Port of
. . . . . .' be changed to 'Port of
. . . . . . . . .'........................................ YES

"Shall
the corporate name, 'Port of . . . . . .' be changed
to 'Port of . . . . . . . . .'........................................ NO"

(4) At the time when
the returns of the general election shall be canvassed by the commissioners of
the port district, it shall be the duty of the commissioners to canvass the
vote upon the proposition so submitted, recording in their record the result of
the canvass.

(5) Should
a majority of the registered voters of the port district voting at the general
port election vote in favor of the proposition it shall be the duty of the port
commissioners to certify the fact to the auditor of the county in which the
port district shall be situated and to the secretary of state of the state of
Washington, under the seal of the port district. On and after the filing of the
certificate with the county auditor as aforesaid and with the secretary of
state of the state of Washington, the corporate name of the port district shall
be changed, and thenceforth the port district shall be known and designated in
accordance therewith.

Sec. 33. RCW 54.08.010 and 1985 c
469 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

At any general election
held in an even-numbered year, the county legislative authority of any county
in this state may, or, on petition of ten percent of the qualified electors of
the county based on the total vote cast in the last general county election
held in an even-numbered year, shall, by resolution, submit to the voters of
the county the proposition of creating a public utility district which shall be
coextensive with the limits of the county as now or hereafter established. A
form of petition for the creation of a public utility district shall be
submitted to the county auditor within ten months prior to the election at
which the proposition is to be submitted to the voters. Petitions shall be
filed with the county auditor not less than four months before the election and
the county auditor shall within thirty days examine the signatures thereof and
certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency thereof. If the petition be found
to be insufficient, it shall be returned to the persons filing the same, who
may amend or add names thereto for ten days, when the same shall be returned to
the county auditor, who shall have an additional fifteen days to examine the
same and attach his certificate thereto. No person having signed the petition
shall be allowed to withdraw his name therefrom after the filing of the same
with the county auditor: PROVIDED, That each signature shall be dated and that
no signature dated prior to the date on which the form of petition was
submitted to the county auditor shall be valid. Whenever the petition shall be
certified to as sufficient, the county auditor shall forthwith transmit the
same, together with his certificate of sufficiency attached thereto, to the
county legislative authority which shall submit the proposition to the voters
of the county at the next general election in an even-numbered year occurring
((forty-five)) fifty-two days after submission of the proposition
to the legislative authority. The notice of the election shall state the
boundaries of the proposed public utility district and the object of such
election, and shall in other respects conform to the requirements of the
general laws of the state of Washington, governing the time and manner of
holding elections. In submitting the question to the voters for their approval
or rejection, the proposition shall be expressed on the ballot substantially in
the following terms:

Public
Utility District No. .......................... YES G

Public Utility District
No. ............................ NO G

Any petition for the
formation of a public utility district may describe a less area than the entire
county in which the petition is filed, the boundaries of which shall follow the
then existing precinct boundaries and not divide any voting precinct; and in
the event that such a petition is filed the county legislative authority shall
fix a date for a hearing on such petition, and shall publish the petition,
without the signatures thereto appended, for two weeks prior to the date of the
hearing, together with a notice stating the time of the meeting when the
petition will be heard. The publication, and all other publications required
by chapter 1, Laws of 1931, shall be in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county in which the district is situated. The hearing on the petition may
be adjourned from time to time, not exceeding four weeks in all. If upon the
final hearing the county legislative authority shall find that any lands have
been unjustly or improperly included within the proposed public utility
district and will not be benefited by inclusion therein, it shall change and
fix the boundary lines in such manner as it shall deem reasonable and just and
conducive to the public welfare and convenience, and make and enter an order establishing
and defining the boundary lines of the proposed public utility district:
PROVIDED, That no lands shall be included within the boundaries so fixed lying
outside the boundaries described in the petition, except upon the written
request of the owners of those lands. Thereafter the same procedure shall be
followed as prescribed in this chapter for the formation of a public utility
district including an entire county, except that the petition and election
shall be confined solely to the lesser public utility district.

No public
utility district created after September 1, 1979, shall include any other
public utility district within its boundaries: PROVIDED, That this paragraph
shall not alter, amend, or modify provisions of chapter 54.32 RCW.

Sec. 34. RCW 54.08.070 and 1979
ex.s. c 240 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any district which does
not own or operate electric facilities for the generation, transmission or
distribution of electric power on March 25, 1969, or any district which
hereafter does not construct or acquire such electric facilities within ten
years of its creation, shall not construct or acquire any such electric
facilities without the approval of such proposal by the voters of such district:
PROVIDED, That a district shall have the power to construct or acquire electric
facilities within ten years following its creation by action of its commission
without voter approval of such action.

At any general election
held in an even-numbered year, the proposal to construct or acquire electric
facilities may be submitted to the voters of the district by resolution of the
public utility district commission or shall be submitted to the voters of the
district by the county legislative authority on petition of ten percent of the
qualified electors of such district, based on the total vote cast in the last
general county election held in an even-numbered year. A form of petition for
the construction or acquisition of electric facilities by the public utility
district shall be submitted to the county auditor within ten months prior to
the election at which such proposition is to be submitted to the voters.
Petitions shall be filed with the county auditor not less than four months
before such election and the county auditor shall within thirty days examine
the signatures thereof and certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency
thereof. If such petition is found to be insufficient, it shall be returned to
the persons filing the same, who may amend and add names thereto for ten days,
when the same shall be returned to the county auditor, who shall have an
additional fifteen days to examine the same and attach his certificate
thereto. No person having signed such petition shall be allowed to withdraw
his name therefrom after the filing of the same with the county auditor:
PROVIDED, That each signature shall be dated and that no signature dated prior
to the date on which the form of petition was submitted to the county auditor
shall be valid. Whenever such petition shall be certified to as sufficient,
the county auditor shall forthwith transmit the same, together with his
certificate of sufficiency attached thereto, to the county legislative
authority which shall submit such proposition to the voters of said district at
the next general election in an even-numbered year occurring ((forty-five))
fifty-two days after submission of the proposition to said legislative
authority. The notice of the election shall state the object of such election,
and shall in other respects conform to the requirements of the general laws of
Washington, governing the time and manner of holding elections.

The proposal submitted
to the voters for their approval or rejection, shall be expressed on the ballot
substantially in the following terms:

Shall Public Utility
District No. . . . . of . . . . . .
County construct or acquire electric facilities for the generation,
transmission or distribution of electric power?

Yes
G

No G

Within ten days after
such election, the election board of the county shall canvass the returns, and
if at such election a majority of the voters voting on such proposition shall
vote in favor of such construction or acquisition of electric facilities, the
district shall be authorized to construct or acquire electric facilities.

Sec. 35. RCW 57.04.050 and 1999 c
153 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon entry of the
findings of the final hearing on the petition if one or more county legislative
authorities find that the proposed district will be conducive to the public
health, welfare, and convenience and will benefit the land therein, they shall
present a resolution to the county auditor calling for a special election to be
held at a date specified under RCW 29.13.020, that occurs ((forty-five))
fifty-two or more days after the resolution is presented, at which a
ballot proposition authorizing the district to be created shall be submitted to
voters for their approval or rejection. The commissioners shall cause to be
published a notice of the election for four successive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the proposed district, which notice shall state the
hours during which the polls will be open, the boundaries of the district as
finally adopted and the object of the election, and the notice shall also be
posted ten days in ten public places in the proposed district. The district
shall be created if the ballot proposition authorizing the district to be
created is approved by a majority of the voters voting on the proposition.

A separate ballot
proposition authorizing the district, if created, to impose a single-year
excess levy for the preliminary expenses of the district shall be submitted to
voters for their approval or rejection at the same special election, if the
petition to create the district also proposed that a ballot proposition
authorizing an excess levy be submitted to voters for their approval or
rejection. The excess levy shall be proposed in the amount specified in the
petition to create the district, not to exceed one dollar and twenty-five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value, and may only be submitted to voters for
their approval or rejection if the special election is held in February, March,
or April((, or May)). The proposition to be effective must be
approved in the manner set forth in Article VII, section 2(a) of the state
Constitution.

Sec. 36. RCW 70.44.235 and 1987 c
138 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As provided in this
section, a public hospital district may withdraw areas from its boundaries, or
reannex areas into the public hospital district that previously had been
withdrawn from the public hospital district under this section.

(2) The withdrawal of
an area shall be authorized upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the hospital
district commissioners requesting the withdrawal and finding that, in the
opinion of the commissioners, inclusion of this area within the public hospital
district will result in a reduction of the district's tax levy rate under the
provisions of RCW 84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city or
town council approving the withdrawal, if the area is located within the city
or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority of the
county within which the area is located approving the withdrawal, if the area
is located outside of a city or town. A withdrawal shall be effective at the
end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the
resolutions are adopted, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for
property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the
adoption of the second resolution.

The withdrawal of an
area from the boundaries of a public hospital district shall not exempt any
property therein from taxation for the purpose of paying the costs of redeeming
any indebtedness of the public hospital district existing at the time of the
withdrawal.

(3) An area that has
been withdrawn from the boundaries of a public hospital district under this
section may be reannexed into the public hospital district upon: (a) Adoption
of a resolution by the hospital district commissioners proposing the
reannexation; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city or town council
approving the reannexation, if the area is located within the city or town, or
adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority of the county
within which the area is located approving the reannexation, if the area is
located outside of a city or town. The reannexation shall be effective at the
end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the
adoption of the second resolution occurs, but for purposes of establishing
boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established
immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution. Referendum action on
the proposed reannexation may be taken by the voters of the area proposed to be
reannexed if a petition calling for a referendum is filed with the city or town
council, or county legislative authority, within a thirty-day period after the
adoption of the second resolution, which petition has been signed by registered
voters of the area proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten percent of
the total number of the registered voters residing in that area.

If a valid petition
signed by the requisite number of registered voters has been so filed, the
effect of the resolutions shall be held in abeyance and a ballot proposition to
authorize the reannexation shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the
next special election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs ((forty-five))
fifty-two or more days after the petitions have been validated.
Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the reannexation by a simple
majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
37. RCW 29.01.160 (September primary) and
1965 c 9 s 29.01.160 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 38. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---