BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.15.030 and 1998 c
22 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Declarations of
candidacy shall be filed ((with the following filing officers)) as
follows:

(1) ((The secretary
of state for)) Declarations of candidacy for statewide offices, the
United States senate, ((and)) the United States house of
representatives((;

(2) The secretary of
state for declarations of candidacy for the state legislature)), the court of appeals, and the superior court
when voters from a district comprising more than one county vote upon the
candidates((;

(3) The county
auditor for all other offices. For any nonpartisan office, other than judicial
offices and school director in joint districts, where voters from a district
comprising more than one county vote upon the candidates, a declaration of
candidacy shall)) must be
filed with the secretary of state.

(2) Declarations of
candidacy for the state legislature must be filed with either the secretary of
state or the county auditor of the county in which the candidate is registered
to vote. Each county auditor with whom a declaration of candidacy is filed for
the state legislature shall notify the secretary of state about this filing,
using one of the methods of communication designated by the secretary of state,
within one hour of the close of business on the day the declaration was filed.
The filing fee accompanying a declaration of candidacy for the legislature that
is filed with a county auditor will be retained by the county if the
legislative district is located entirely within that county, or the county
shall transfer a portion of the filing fee to each other county in which the
legislative district is located in the same manner as the secretary of state
distributes the filing fee under RCW 29.15.050.

(3) Declarations of
candidacy for all county offices and for all other offices of a local
government that is either coextensive with a county or located completely
within a county must be filed with the county auditor of that county.

(4) Declarations of
candidacy for any other office of a local government that is located in more
than one county, other than a school director of a joint school district, must
be filed with the county auditor of the county in which a majority of the
registered voters of the district reside. ((For school directors in joint
school districts, the declaration of candidacy shall))

(5) Declarations of
candidacy for school director of a joint school district must be filed with
the county auditor of the county designated by the state board of education as
the county to which the joint school district is considered as belonging under
RCW ((28A.315.380)) 28A.323.040.

Each
official with whom declarations of candidacy are filed under this section,
within one business day following the closing of the applicable filing period,
shall forward to the public disclosure commission a copy of each declaration of
candidacy filed in his office during such filing period or a list containing
the name of each candidate who files such a declaration in his office during
such filing period together with a precise identification of the position
sought by each such candidate and the date on which each such declaration was
filed. Such official, within three days following his receipt of any letter
withdrawing a person's name as a candidate, shall also forward a copy of such
withdrawal letter to the public disclosure commission.

--- END ---