BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.24.035 and 1999 c
10 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department is
designated as the state mental health authority.

(2) The secretary may
provide for public, client, and licensed service provider participation in
developing the state mental health program.

(3) The secretary shall
provide for participation in developing the state mental health program for
children and other underserved populations, by including representatives on any
committee established to provide oversight to the state mental health program.

(4) The secretary shall
be designated as the county authority if a county fails to meet state minimum
standards or refuses to exercise responsibilities under RCW 71.24.045.

(5) The secretary
shall:

(a) Develop a biennial
state mental health program that incorporates county biennial needs assessments
and county mental health service plans and state services for mentally ill
adults and children. The secretary may also develop a six-year state mental
health plan;

(b) Assure that any
county community mental health program provides access to treatment for the
county's residents in the following order of priority: (i) The acutely
mentally ill; (ii) chronically mentally ill adults and severely emotionally
disturbed children; and (iii) the seriously disturbed. Such programs shall
provide:

(A) Outpatient
services;

(B) Emergency care
services for twenty-four hours per day;

(C) Day treatment for
mentally ill persons which includes training in basic living and social skills,
supported work, vocational rehabilitation, and day activities. Such services
may include therapeutic treatment. In the case of a child, day treatment
includes age-appropriate basic living and social skills, educational and
prevocational services, day activities, and therapeutic treatment;

(D) Screening for
patients being considered for admission to state mental health facilities to
determine the appropriateness of admission;

(E) Employment
services, which may include supported employment, transitional work, placement
in competitive employment, and other work-related services, that result in
mentally ill persons becoming engaged in meaningful and gainful full or
part-time work. Other sources of funding such as the division of vocational
rehabilitation may be utilized by the secretary to maximize federal funding and
provide for integration of services;

(F) Consultation and
education services; and

(G) Community support
services;

(c) Develop and adopt
rules establishing state minimum standards for the delivery of mental health
services pursuant to RCW 71.24.037 including, but not limited to:

(i) Licensed service
providers;

(ii) Regional support
networks; and

(iii) Residential and
inpatient services, evaluation and treatment services and facilities under
chapter 71.05 RCW, resource management services, and community support
services;

(d) Assure that the
special needs of minorities, the elderly, disabled, children, and low-income
persons are met within the priorities established in this section;

(e) Establish a
standard contract or contracts, consistent with state minimum standards, which
shall be used by the counties;

(f) Establish, ((to
the extent possible, a standardized auditing procedure which minimizes
paperwork requirements of county authorities)) by contract, a definition
of administrative expenditures applicable to the department, counties, and
regional support networks. Administrative expenditures for contracted mental
health services by the department, counties, and regional support networks in
relation to total contracted mental health expenditures shall not exceed twenty
percent;

(g) Establish a
single audit methodology applicable to the counties, regional support networks,
and licensed service providers to minimize administrative costs;

(((g))) (h)
Develop and maintain an information system to be used by the state, counties,
and regional support networks that includes a tracking method which allows the
department and regional support networks to identify mental health clients'
participation in any mental health service or public program on an immediate
basis. The information system shall not include individual patient's case
history files. Confidentiality of client information and records shall be
maintained as provided in this chapter and in RCW 71.05.390, 71.05.400,
71.05.410, 71.05.420, 71.05.430, and 71.05.440;

(((h))) (i)
License service providers who meet state minimum standards;

(((i))) (j)
Certify regional support networks that meet state minimum standards;

(((j))) (k)
Periodically inspect certified regional support networks and licensed service
providers at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner;

(((k))) (l)
Fix fees to be paid by evaluation and treatment centers to the secretary for
the required inspections;

(((l))) (m)
Monitor and audit counties, regional support networks, and licensed service
providers as needed to assure compliance with contractual agreements authorized
by this chapter; and

(((m))) (n)
Adopt such rules as are necessary to implement the department's
responsibilities under this chapter.

(6) The secretary shall
use available resources only for regional support networks.

(7) Each certified
regional support network and licensed service provider shall file with the
secretary, on request, such data, statistics, schedules, and information as the
secretary reasonably requires. A certified regional support network or
licensed service provider which, without good cause, fails to furnish any data,
statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent reports
thereof, may have its certification or license revoked or suspended.

(8) The secretary may
suspend, revoke, limit, or restrict a certification or license, or refuse to
grant a certification or license for failure to conform to: (a) The law; (b)
applicable rules and regulations; (c) applicable standards; or (d) state
minimum standards.

(9) The superior court
may restrain any regional support network or service provider from operating
without certification or a license or any other violation of this section. The
court may also review, pursuant to procedures contained in chapter 34.05 RCW,
any denial, suspension, limitation, restriction, or revocation of certification
or license, and grant other relief required to enforce the provisions of this
chapter.

(10) Upon petition by
the secretary, and after hearing held upon reasonable notice to the facility,
the superior court may issue a warrant to an officer or employee of the
secretary authorizing him or her to enter at reasonable times, and examine the
records, books, and accounts of any regional support network or service
provider refusing to consent to inspection or examination by the authority.

(11) Notwithstanding
the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the secretary may file an action
for an injunction or other process against any person or governmental unit to
restrain or prevent the establishment, conduct, or operation of a regional
support network or service provider without certification or a license under
this chapter.

(12) The standards for
certification of evaluation and treatment facilities shall include standards
relating to maintenance of good physical and mental health and other services
to be afforded persons pursuant to this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34
RCW, and shall otherwise assure the effectuation of the purposes of these
chapters.

(13)(a) The department,
in consultation with affected parties, shall establish a distribution formula
that reflects county needs assessments based on the number of persons who are
acutely mentally ill, chronically mentally ill, severely emotionally disturbed
children, and seriously disturbed. The formula shall take into consideration
the impact on counties of demographic factors in counties which result in
concentrations of priority populations as set forth in subsection (5)(b) of
this section. These factors shall include the population concentrations
resulting from commitments under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW to state
psychiatric hospitals, as well as concentration in urban areas, at border
crossings at state boundaries, and other significant demographic and workload
factors.

(b) The formula shall
also include a projection of the funding allocations that will result for each
county, which specifies allocations according to priority populations,
including the allocation for services to children and other underserved
populations.

(14) The secretary
shall assume all duties assigned to the nonparticipating counties under
chapters 71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW. Such responsibilities shall include
those which would have been assigned to the nonparticipating counties under
regional support networks.

The regional support
networks, or the secretary's assumption of all responsibilities under chapters
71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW, shall be included in all state and federal plans
affecting the state mental health program including at least those required by
this chapter, the medicaid program, and P.L. 99‑660. Nothing in these
plans shall be inconsistent with the intent and requirements of this chapter.

(15) The secretary
shall:

(a) Disburse funds for
the regional support networks within sixty days of approval of the biennial
contract. The department must either approve or reject the biennial contract
within sixty days of receipt.

(b) Enter into biennial
contracts with regional support networks. The contracts shall be consistent
with available resources. No contract shall be approved that does not include
progress toward meeting the goals of this chapter by taking responsibility
for: (i) Short-term commitments; (ii) residential care; and (iii) emergency
response systems.

(c) Allocate one
hundred percent of available resources to the regional support networks in
accordance with subsection (13) of this section.

(d) Notify regional
support networks of their allocation of available resources at least sixty days
prior to the start of a new biennial contract period.

(e) Deny funding
allocations to regional support networks based solely upon formal findings of
noncompliance with the terms of the regional support network's contract with
the department. Written notice and at least thirty days for corrective action
must precede any such action. In such cases, regional support networks shall
have full rights to appeal under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(f) Identify in its
departmental biennial operating and capital budget requests the funds requested
by regional support networks to implement their responsibilities under this
chapter.

(16) The department, in
cooperation with the state congressional delegation, shall actively seek
waivers of federal requirements and such modifications of federal regulations
as are necessary to allow federal medicaid reimbursement for services provided
by free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities certified under chapter
71.05 RCW. The department shall periodically report its efforts to the health
care and corrections committee of the senate and the human services committee
of the house of representatives.

(17) The
secretary shall establish a task force to examine the recruitment, training,
and compensation of qualified mental health professionals in the community,
which shall include the advantages and disadvantages of establishing a training
academy, loan forgiveness program, or educational stipends offered in exchange
for commitments of employment in mental health.

--- END ---