BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.01 RCW to read as follows:

In order
to identify Washington state residents who operate vehicles on Washington state
highways that are registered and licensed in another state, the department of
licensing shall, on a quarterly basis, compare the Washington state driver
license data base with the driver license and vehicle registration data bases
of other states, to include at a minimum, Oregon and Idaho. The department
must report its findings to the Washington state patrol and the department of
revenue for further investigation of potential violations of chapters 46.16,
82.08, and 82.12 RCW.

--- END ---