BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 28A.410

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 Subject to the availability of funds appropriated
for this

_7 specific purpose and to the conditions in this section,
and until

_8 these funds are exhausted, the higher education
coordinating board

_9 may provide tuition and fee reimbursement to a
certificated

10 employee who is assigned to teach in one or more
subjects in which

11 the employee lacks the appropriate endorsements required
by the

12 state board of education:

13 (1) The reimbursement shall not exceed the amount of
tuition

14 and fees paid by the employee or the resident
undergraduate

15 tuition and fee rate at the University of Washington,
whichever is

16 lower; and

17 (2) The reimbursement shall be paid only for earned
credits

18 that apply toward the endorsement or endorsements that
are lacked

p. 1 SHB
1235

_1 by the employee but that are required for the subjects
that the

_2 employee is assigned to teach. School districts shall
submit the

_3 following information to the higher education
coordinating board

_4 for teachers seeking tuition reimbursement under this
section: (a)

_5 Certification that the teacher had been required to
teach out of

_6 the teacher's endorsement area; (b) a list of the
credits earned

_7 toward the new endorsement area; and (c) the amount
eligible for

_8 reimbursement. Annually, the higher education
coordinating board

_9 shall reimburse teachers for the full cost of eligible
credits or

10 a prorated amount that is lower, based on the
legislative

11 appropriation.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1235 p. 2