BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 82.08

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 A person who has paid tax under this chapter on the
sale of a

_8 college textbook may be eligible for an exemption in the
form of a

_9 remittance, as provided in this section. A person
claiming an

10 exemption must pay the tax and then apply to the
department for

11 remittance of retail sales tax paid under this chapter,
chapter

12 82.14 RCW, and any other statute of this state. The
application

13 must include the following information, in a form
satisfactory to

14 the department:

15 (1) Evidence that the textbook was required by an
instructor

16 for a course at a college or university which is
accredited by an

17 accrediting association recognized as such by rule of
the higher

18 education coordinating board;

p. 1 HB
1236

_1 (2) Evidence that the student completed the course
with the

_2 equivalent of a "C" grade if the course was
graded, or a passing

_3 grade if the course was ungraded;

_4 (3) Evidence that retail sales tax has been paid on
the

_5 textbook; and

_6 (4) Any other information required by the department
for the

_7 purposes of this section.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 82.12

_9 RCW to read as follows:

10 The provisions of this chapter do not apply with
respect to the

11 use of a college textbook, if the textbook was required
by an

12 instructor for a course at a college or university which
is

13 accredited by an accrediting association recognized as
such by

14 rule of the higher education coordinating board and the
student

15 using the textbook completed the course with a passing
grade.

16 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
October 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1236 p. 2