BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9A.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of the crime of failing to summon assistance if:

(a) He or she knows
that another person has suffered substantial bodily harm and is in need of
assistance;

(b) He or she could
reasonably summon assistance for the person in need without danger to himself
or herself and without interference with an important duty owed to a third
party;

(c) He or she fails to
summon assistance for the person in need; and

(d) Another person is
not summoning assistance for the person in need.

(2) The duty to summon
assistance is satisfied by making reasonable efforts to summon emergency
police, fire, or medical assistance that identifies the location of the victim.

(3) Except as provided
in RCW 9A.76.050, failing to summon assistance is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.76.050 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 47 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in RCW
9A.76.070, 9A.76.080, and 9A.76.090, a person "renders criminal
assistance" if, with intent to prevent, hinder, or delay the apprehension
or prosecution of another person who he or she knows has committed a
crime or juvenile offense or is being sought by law enforcement officials for
the commission of a crime or juvenile offense or has escaped from a detention
facility, he or she:

(1) Harbors or conceals
such person; or

(2) Warns such person
of impending discovery or apprehension; or

(3) Provides such
person with money, transportation, disguise, or other means of avoiding
discovery or apprehension; or

(4) Prevents or
obstructs, by use of force, deception, or threat, anyone from performing an act
that might aid in the discovery or apprehension of such person; or

(5) Conceals, alters,
or destroys any physical evidence that might aid in the discovery or
apprehension of such person; or

(6) Provides such
person with a weapon; or

(7) Violates section
1 of this act by failing to summon assistance for a victim of such person's
crime or juvenile offense.

Sec. 3. RCW 9A.76.070 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 47 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of rendering criminal assistance in the first degree if he or she
renders criminal assistance to a person who has committed or is being sought
for murder in the first degree or any class A felony or equivalent juvenile
offense.

(2) Rendering criminal
assistance in the first degree is((:

(a) A gross
misdemeanor if it is established by a preponderance of the evidence that the
actor is a relative as defined in RCW 9A.76.060;

(b))) a class C felony ((in all other
cases)).

Sec. 4. RCW 9A.76.080 and 1982
1st ex.s. c 47 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of rendering criminal assistance in the second degree if he or she
renders criminal assistance to a person who has committed or is being sought
for a class B or class C felony or an equivalent juvenile offense or to someone
being sought for violation of parole, probation, or community supervision.

(2) Rendering criminal
assistance in the second degree is((:

(a) A misdemeanor if
it is established by a preponderance of the evidence that the actor is a
relative as defined in RCW 9A.76.060;

(b))) a gross misdemeanor ((in all other
cases)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. RCW 9A.76.060 (Relative defined) and
1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.76.060 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act may be known and
cited as the Joey Levick Act.

---
END ---