BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds and
declares:

(1) Washington has been
following a path of education reform since the implementation of chapter 336,
Laws of 1993;

(2) Washington's
students will be held to higher standards than ever before, standards they must
meet in order to receive a high school diploma;

(3) Parents or
guardians often have the strongest influence on a child's learning and
development and should be welcomed to participate in the education of their
child;

(4) Parents or
guardians should have access to the scored Washington assessment of student
learning booklet used by their child for this state-mandated test. Giving
parents or guardians access to the scored test booklets will allow parents or
guardians to be active participants in the education of their child. Not only
will parents or guardians have a better understanding of what their child is
learning in school, they will also have a clear picture of how curriculum is
being directed in their school building to meet the state's new standards.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.230.195 and 1999
c 373 s 603 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If students' scores
on the test or assessments under RCW 28A.230.190, 28A.230.230, and ((28A.630.885))
28A.655.060 indicate that students need help in identified areas, the
school district shall evaluate its instructional practices and make appropriate
adjustments.

(2) Each school
district shall notify the parents of each student of their child's performance
on the test and assessments conducted under this chapter.

(3) After data are
complete and accurate, the superintendent of public instruction shall make the
writing portion of the Washington assessment of student learning for individual
students available to schools. Schools shall make available the writing
portion of each student's assessment and information on the criteria used to
determine the student's score to the student, the student's parent or guardian,
and the student's teacher. The student's teacher shall not be required to
correct the writing portion of the assessment.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.655.090 and 1999
c 388 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By September 10,
1998, and by September 10th each year thereafter, the superintendent of public
instruction shall report to schools, school districts, and the legislature on
the results of the Washington assessment of student learning and state-mandated
norm-referenced standardized tests.

(2) The reports shall
include the assessment results by school and school district, and include changes
over time. For the Washington assessment of student learning, results shall be
reported as follows:

(a) The percentage of
students meeting the standards;

(b) The percentage of
students performing at each level of the assessment; and

(c) A learning
improvement index that shows changes in student performance within the
different levels of student learning reported on the Washington assessment of
student learning.

(3) The reports shall
contain data regarding the different characteristics of schools, such as
poverty levels, percent of English as a second language students, dropout
rates, attendance, percent of students in special education, and student
mobility so that districts and schools can learn from the improvement efforts
of other schools and districts with similar characteristics.

(4) The reports shall
contain student scores on mandated tests by comparable Washington schools of
similar characteristics.

(5) The reports shall
contain information on public school choice options available to students,
including vocational education.

(6) The reports shall
be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's internet web site.

(7) To protect the
privacy of students, the results of schools and districts that test fewer than
ten students in a grade level shall not be reported. In addition, in order to
ensure that results are reported accurately, the superintendent of public
instruction shall maintain the confidentiality of statewide data files until
the superintendent determines that the data are complete and accurate.

(8) After the data
are complete and accurate, the superintendent of public instruction shall make
the writing portion of the Washington assessment of student learning for
individual students available to schools. Schools shall make available the
writing portion of each student's assessment and information on the criteria
used to determine the student's score to the student, the student's parent or
guardian, and the student's teacher. The student's teacher shall not be
required to correct the writing portion of the assessment.

(9) The
superintendent of public instruction shall monitor the percentage and number of
special education and limited English-proficient students exempted from taking
the assessments by schools and school districts to ensure the exemptions are in
compliance with exemption guidelines.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. By September 1, 2001, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the governor
and the fiscal and education committees of the legislature on the estimated
cost of returning additional test questions and answers to parents and
teachers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Sections 2 and 3 of this
act take effect September 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---