BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.04.071 and 1971 c
81 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

At the next general
election, and at each biennial general election thereafter, there shall be
elected three justices of the supreme court, one from each of the three
supreme court judicial districts, to hold for the full term of six years,
and until their successors are elected and qualified, commencing with the
second Monday in January succeeding their election.

Sec. 2. RCW 2.04.100 and 1971 c
81 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

If a vacancy occurs in
the office of a justice of the supreme court, the governor shall appoint a
person who is a resident of the supreme court judicial district for which
the vacancy occurs to hold the office until the election and qualification
of a justice to fill the vacancy, which election shall take place at the next
succeeding general election, and the justice so elected shall hold the office
for the remainder of the unexpired term.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 2.04 RCW to read as follows:

Prior to January 1,
2003, the secretary of state, in cooperation with the chief justice, shall
assign by lot each supreme court judicial position to be filled in November
2004 to a judicial district, and in a similar manner shall also assign by lot
each judicial position to be filled in November 2006 and in November 2008 to a
supreme court judicial district, so that one justice from each supreme court
judicial district is elected at each biennial general election.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 and 2 of this
act take effect January 1, 2004 if the proposed amendment to Article IV,
section 3 of the state Constitution providing for the election of supreme court
justices from judicial districts (SJR 8201) is validly submitted to and is
approved and ratified by the votes at the next general election. If the
proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void in its
entirety.

---
END ---