BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.135.035 and 2001
c 3 s 8 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1) After July 1, 1995,
any action or combination of actions by the legislature that raises state
revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts may be taken only if approved by
a two-thirds vote of each house, and then only if state expenditures in any
fiscal year, including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure
limits established under this chapter.

(2)(a) If the
legislative action under subsection (1) of this section will result in
expenditures in excess of the state expenditure limit, then the action of the
legislature shall not take effect until approved by a vote of the people at a
November general election. The office of financial management shall adjust the
state expenditure limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the
voters under this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of
revenue generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be adjusted
downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.

(b) The ballot title
for any vote of the people required under this section shall be substantially
as follows:

"Shall taxes be
imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for inflation
and population increases?"

(3)(a) The state
expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration of an emergency for a period
not to exceed twenty-four months by a law approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house of the legislature and signed by the governor. The law shall set forth
the nature of the emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require
immediate government action to alleviate human suffering and provide
humanitarian assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no
more than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.

(b) Additional taxes
required for an emergency under this section may be imposed only until thirty
days following the next general election, unless an extension is approved at
that general election. The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of
the declaration of emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional
taxes for emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the
education construction fund have been exhausted.

(c) The state or any
political subdivision of the state shall not impose any tax on intangible
property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that statute exists on January 1, 1993.

(4)(a) If the
cost of any state program or function is shifted from the state general fund on
or after January 1, 1993, to another source of funding, or if moneys are
transferred from the state general fund to another fund or account, the state
expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower
the state expenditure limit to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this
section, a transfer of money from the state general fund to another fund or
account includes any state legislative action taken after July 1, 2000, that
has the effect of reducing revenues from a particular source, where such
revenues would otherwise be deposited into the state general fund, while
increasing the revenues from that particular source to another state or local
government account.

((This)) (b)
Subsection (4)(a) of this section does not apply to the dedication
or use of lottery revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW
84.52.--- (section 5, chapter 3, Laws of 2001), in support of education or
education expenditures.

(5) If the cost of any
state program or function is shifted to the state general fund on or after
January 1, 2000, from another source of funding, or if moneys are transferred
to the state general fund from another fund or account, the state expenditure
limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall increase the state
expenditure limit to reflect the shift.

(6)
Beginning with calculation of the fiscal year 2002 expenditure limit, the state
expenditure limit committee shall also increase the state expenditure limit for
any state general fund spending measure approved by the voters in a general
election. The amount of this increase shall match the costs for the measure
that are assumed in the enacted state budget.

--- END ---