BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.517 and 1987 c
373 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
refusal of a person to submit to a test of the ((alcoholic content of)) alcohol
or drug concentration in the person's blood or breath under RCW 46.20.308
is admissible into evidence at a subsequent criminal trial.

--- END ---