BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that children who grow up in the foster care system face many financial
challenges. The legislature also finds that these financial challenges can
discourage or prevent these children from pursuing a higher education. The
legislature further finds that access to a higher education will give children
who are in foster care hope for the future. Moreover, the legislature finds
that financial assistance will help these children become successful,
productive, contributing citizens and avoid cycles of abuse, poverty, violence,
and delinquency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Institution
of higher education" includes:

(a) Public institutions
of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016;

(b) Private, nonprofit
educational institutions, the main campuses of which are permanently situated
in the state, providing programs of education beyond the high school level,
leading to a degree or certificate, and accredited by the Northwest association
of schools and colleges as of the effective date of this section;

(c) Other institutions
designated by rule adopted by the higher education coordinating board.

(2) "Eligible
student" means a student who:

(a) Is between the ages
of sixteen and twenty-three;

(b) Has been in foster
care in the state of Washington for a minimum of six months since his or her
fourteenth birthday;

(c) Is a financially
needy student, as defined in RCW 28B.10.802;

(d) Is a resident
student, as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2);

(e) Has entered or will
enter an institution of higher education or vocational program in Washington
state within three years of high school graduation or having successfully
completed his or her GED;

(f) Is not pursuing a
degree in theology; and

(g) Makes satisfactory
progress towards the completion of a degree or certificate program.

(3) "Cost of
attendance" means the cost associated with the attendance of the
institution of higher education as determined by the higher education
coordinating board, including but not limited to tuition, room, board, and
books.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The foster care endowed
scholarship program is created. The purpose of the program is to help students
who were in foster care attend an institution of higher education in the state
of Washington. The foster care endowed scholarship shall be administered by
the higher education coordinating board. In administering the program, the
higher education coordinating board's powers and duties shall include but not
be limited to:

(1) Work with the
department of social and health services and the superintendent of public
instruction to provide information about the foster care endowed scholarship
program to children in foster care in the state of Washington and to students
over the age of sixteen who could be eligible for this program;

(2) Adopt necessary
rules and guidelines;

(3) Publicize the
program;

(4) Administer the
foster care endowed scholarship trust fund and the foster care scholarship
endowment fund;

(5) Contract with a
private agency to perform outreach to the potentially eligible students; and

(6) Establish and
assist the foster care endowed scholarship advisory board in its duties as
described in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The higher education
coordinating board may award scholarships to eligible students from the foster
care scholarship endowment fund in section 7 of this act, from funds
appropriated to the board for this purpose, from any private donations, or from
any other funds given to the board for the program.

(2) The amount of the
award shall be the differential between the cost of attendance at the chosen
institution of higher education and aggregate of the eligible student's Pell
grant and state need grant. Grants shall not exceed the cost of attendance at
a state public research institution of higher education.

(3) The eligible
student may receive a maximum of eight semesters or twelve quarters of grants
for higher education in the state of Washington.

(4) Grants under this
chapter shall not affect eligibility for the state student financial aid
program.

(5) An eligible student
may transfer among institutions of higher education in the state of Washington.

(6) Grants may not
exceed the cost of attendance at a state public research institution of higher
education.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The foster care
endowed scholarship advisory board is created.

(2) The advisory board
shall be composed of not more than seven members appointed by the higher
education coordinating board. The advisory board should include
representatives from the higher education coordinating board, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the foster parent community, and
community organizations serving the foster children and former foster children
community. The advisory board membership shall be reflective of the cultural
diversity of the state.

(3) The advisory board:

(a) Shall assist the
higher education coordinating board in publicizing the foster care endowed
scholarship program;

(b) Shall solicit
grants and donations from public and private sources for the program;

(c) Shall assist the
higher education coordinating board in the program development and the
application screening process; and

(d) May assist in
performing outreach to the targeted students.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) The foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund is created in the custody of the state
treasurer.

(2) Funds appropriated
by the legislature for the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund shall be
deposited in the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund. When conditions
in section 8 of this act are met, the higher education coordinating board shall
deposit state matching moneys from the trust fund into the foster care
scholarship endowment fund.

(3) No appropriation is
required for expenditures from the trust fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The foster care
scholarship endowment fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer.

(1) Moneys received
from the higher education coordinating board, private donations, state matching
moneys, and funds received from any other source may be deposited into the
foster care scholarship endowment fund. Private moneys received as a gift
subject to conditions may be deposited into the endowment fund if the
conditions do not violate state or federal law.

(2) The higher
education coordinating board may disburse grants to eligible students from the
foster care scholarship endowment fund. No appropriation is required for
expenditures from the endowment fund.

(3) When notified by
court order that a condition attached to a gift of private moneys from the
foster care scholarship endowment fund has failed, the higher education
coordinating board shall release those moneys to the donors according to the
terms of the conditional gift.

(4) The principal of
the foster care scholarship endowment fund shall not be invaded. For the
purposes of this section, only the first twenty-five thousand dollars deposited
into the foster care scholarship endowment fund shall be considered the
principal. The release of moneys under subsection (3) of this section shall
not constitute an invasion of the corpus.

(5) The foster care
scholarship endowment fund shall be used solely for the purposes in this
chapter, except when the conditional gift of private moneys in the endowment
fund require a portion of the earnings on such moneys be reinvested in the
endowment fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) The higher education
coordinating board may deposit twenty-five thousand dollars of state matching
funds into the foster care scholarship endowment fund when the board can match
state funds with an equal amount of private cash donations.

(2) After the initial
match of twenty-five thousand dollars, state matching funds from the foster
care endowed scholarship trust fund shall be released to the foster care
scholarship endowment fund semiannually so long as there are funds available in
the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The administrative staff
for the foster care endowed scholarship program shall not exceed one-quarter
full-time equivalent.

Sec. 10. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2000
c 79 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the
treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state
treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same
extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2) All income received
from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set aside in an account
in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment
income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on
behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected
state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial
institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the
state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the investment income
account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the agricultural
local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund,
the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the game
farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium
and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility ((grant))
account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement
account, and the children's trust fund. However, the earnings to be
distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's
service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the advanced environmental
mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account,
the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account,
and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. Sections 1 through 9 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. The sum of one hundred
fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
from the general fund to the higher education coordinating board for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2002, to carry out the purposes of this act.

---
END ---