BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of or charge made for labor and services
rendered in respect to clearing land, moving earth, site preparation,
constructing, repairing, decorating, renovating, expanding, or improving of new
or existing buildings, structures, facilities, or any other improvement under,
upon, or above real property of or for new residential construction. This
exemption from sales tax is limited to the state share of the sales tax and
does not apply to the local sales tax as provided under RCW 82.14.820 and
81.104.170.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.14.820 and 1997 c
450 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
exemptions in RCW 82.08.820 ((and)), 82.12.820, and section 1
of this act are for the state portion of the sales and use tax and do not
extend to the tax imposed in this chapter.

---
END ---