BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.45.060 and 2000 c
103 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is
imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property at the rate of one and
twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the ((selling price)) net
value. An amount equal to seven and seven-tenths percent of the proceeds
of this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the public works
assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050.

(2) As
used in this section, "net value" means the selling price less the
basis in the property conveyed. The "net value" will never be less
than zero when determining the excise tax under this section. The basis equals
the selling price, as defined in RCW 82.45.030, that the seller offered as
consideration to acquire the property. A real estate developer may include
service and material costs directly related to the development of the property
conveyed as part of the basis.

--- END ---