BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.02.060 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

The local ordinance by
which impact fees are imposed:

(1) Shall include a
schedule of impact fees which shall be adopted for each type of development
activity that is subject to impact fees, specifying the amount of the impact
fee to be imposed for each type of system improvement. The schedule shall be
based upon a formula or other method of calculating such impact fees. In
determining proportionate share, the formula or other method of calculating
impact fees shall incorporate, among other things, the following:

(a) The cost of public
facilities necessitated by new development;

(b) An adjustment to
the cost of the public facilities for past or future payments made or
reasonably anticipated to be made by new development to pay for particular
system improvements in the form of user fees, debt service payments, taxes, or
other payments earmarked for or proratable to the particular system improvement;

(c) The availability of
other means of funding public facility improvements;

(d) The cost of
existing public facilities improvements; and

(e) The methods by
which public facilities improvements were financed;

(2) May provide an
exemption for low-income housing, and other development activities with broad
public purposes, from these impact fees, provided that the impact fees for such
development activity shall be paid from public funds other than impact fee
accounts;

(3) Shall provide a
credit for the value of any dedication of land for, improvement to, or new
construction of any system improvements provided by the developer, to
facilities that are identified in the capital facilities plan and that are
required by the county, city, or town as a condition of approving the
development activity;

(4) Shall provide
that impact fees for residential construction be collected at the time of
certificate of occupancy or final inspection or twelve months after the
building permit is issued;

(5) Shall allow
the county, city, or town imposing the impact fees to adjust the standard
impact fee at the time the fee is imposed to consider unusual circumstances in
specific cases to ensure that impact fees are imposed fairly;

(((5))) (6)
Shall include a provision for calculating the amount of the fee to be imposed
on a particular development that permits consideration of studies and data
submitted by the developer to adjust the amount of the fee;

(((6))) (7)
Shall establish one or more reasonable service areas within which it shall
calculate and impose impact fees for various land use categories per unit of
development;

(((7)))
(8) May provide for the imposition of an impact fee for system
improvement costs previously incurred by a county, city, or town to the extent
that new growth and development will be served by the previously constructed
improvements provided such fee shall not be imposed to make up for any system
improvement deficiencies.

--- END ---