BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 74.13 RCW, to be codified after RCW 74.13.230 under the subchapter
heading "Foster Care", to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that children and youth in foster care deserve to be provided with a safe,
secure, and stable home along with the compassion and nurture of a foster
family. The legislature recognizes that foster families open their homes and
hearts to children whose families are in crisis, play a vital role in helping
children and families heal and reconnect, and in launching children into
successful adulthood.

Children in foster care
deserve to be in homes that meet high quality standards that are assured
through accountability. It is the intent of the legislature that children in
foster care are supported in homes that meet their needs, and that foster
parents are supported.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.13 RCW, to be codified after RCW 74.13.010, to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that accreditation by an independent entity improves the quality of services
provided to children and families. Accreditation demonstrates an ongoing
commitment to nationally recognized standards of best practice in child welfare
and provides accountability for achieving outcome goals. Accreditation
provides assurance that the organization delivers effective services that meet
community needs.

Accreditation is a
structured process designed to facilitate organizational change and
improvement. Accreditation means persons served can expect greater
participation in decisions that affect their cases, improved case management
and documentation, and improved internal operations and accountability.
Accreditation improves relationships with biological parents, foster and
adoptive parents, providers, the courts, and members of the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 74.13 RCW, to be codified after section 2 of this act, to read as
follows:

In recognition of the
value of accreditation in improving the child welfare services system, the
legislature supports the department's efforts to seek full accreditation of all
children's administration offices and establishes a goal of achieving
accreditation by an independent entity by July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this act
shall be construed to create a private right of action or claim on the part of
any individual or entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. RCW 74.13.290,
74.14A.050, 74.13.320, and 74.13.325 are each recodified as sections in chapter
74.13 RCW. These recodified sections are to be placed after section 1 of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. RCW 74.14B.020,
74.13.250, 74.13.310, 74.13.260, 74.13.280, 74.13.285, 74.13.300, 74.13.330,
74.13.270, 74.13.315, 74.13.335, 74.13.340, and 74.14B.080 are each recodified
as sections in chapter 74.13 RCW.

---
END ---