BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act may be known
and cited as the Boy

_8 Scouts Protection Act of 2001.

_9 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The legislature
recognizes that the Boy

10 Scouts of America and other private organizations have

11 constitutionally protected rights of freedom of speech
and

12 religion under both the United States Constitution and
the

13 Washington state Constitution. Implicit in the right to
freely

14 engage in these activities as protected by the federal
and state

15 constitutions is a corresponding right to associate with
others in

16 pursuit of a wide variety of political, religious,
social,

17 economic, educational, and cultural ends.

p. 1 HB
1250

_1 This right is crucial in preventing the majority
from imposing

_2 its views on groups that prefer to express other,
perhaps

_3 unpopular, ideas. Thus, the protection of the right to
expressive

_4 association is especially important in preserving
political and

_5 cultural diversity and in shielding dissident expression
from

_6 suppression by the majority.

_7 Government actions that may unconstitutionally
burden this

_8 freedom may take many forms, one of which is
discrimination

_9 against private entities by government through the use
of public

10 policies designed to force such entities to accept
memberships or

11 associations they do not desire or, in the alternative,
forfeit

12 opportunities for obtaining various government benefits
generally

13 available to the public at large. Forcing private
entities to

14 accept certain memberships or associations in order to
enjoy

15 public benefits shared by others unduly impairs and
impermissibly

16 burdens the ability of such entities to express the
views, and

17 only those views, they intend to express. Thus, the
freedom of

18 association plainly presupposes a freedom not to
associate.

19 The legislature finds, therefore, that private
entities have a

20 constitutionally protected right to establish their own
particular

21 values, standards, or criteria for determining
membership or

22 association and that government shall not discriminate
against

23 private entities as a result of policies such entities
may adopt

24 or pursue that qualify membership in or association with
the

25 entity based on the sexual preference or orientation of
any

26 person.

27 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 49.60

28 RCW to read as follows:

29 The state of Washington, and its political
subdivisions,

30 including counties, cities, towns, school districts, and

31 institutions of higher education, and any agency or
officer

32 thereof, shall not enact or enforce any policy that
discriminates,

33 directly or indirectly, against any private entity in
contracting

34 with public entities, receiving public funds, obtaining
access to

35 public facilities, participating in public programs, or
receiving

36 any other public benefit, privilege, advantage, opportunity,
or

37 entitlement based, in whole or in part, on any policy,
purpose, or

HB 1250 p. 2

_1 practice of the entity to exclude, limit, or qualify
membership in

_2 or association with the entity because of the sexual
preference or

_3 orientation of any person.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The provisions of
this act are to be

_5 liberally construed to effectuate the policies and
purposes of

_6 this act. In the event of conflict between this act and
any other

_7 provision of state law, the provisions of this act shall
govern.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If any provision of
this act or its

_9 application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the

10 remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other

11 persons or circumstances is not affected.

12 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary
for the immediate

13 preservation of the public peace, health, morals, or
safety, or

14 support of the state government and its existing public

15 institutions, and takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1250