BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71A.12.010 and 1988
c 176 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

It is declared to be
the policy of the state to authorize the secretary to develop and coordinate
state services for persons with developmental disabilities; to encourage
research and staff training for state and local personnel working with persons
with developmental disabilities; and to cooperate with communities to ((encourage
the establishment and development of)) establish and develop
services to persons with developmental disabilities through locally
administered and locally controlled programs.

The complexities of
developmental disabilities require the services of many state departments as
well as those of the community. Services should be planned and provided as a
part of a continuum. A pattern of facilities and services should be
established, within appropriations designated for this purpose, which is sufficiently
complete to meet the needs of each person with a developmental disability
regardless of age or degree of handicap, and at each stage of the person's
development.

Sec. 2. RCW 71A.12.120 and 1988
c 176 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor may
take whatever action is necessary to enable the state to participate in the
manner set forth in this title in any programs provided by any federal law and
to designate state agencies authorized to administer within this state the
several federal acts providing federal moneys to assist in providing services
and training at the state or local level for persons with developmental
disabilities and for persons who work with persons with developmental disabilities.

(2) Designated state
agencies may apply for and accept and disburse federal grants, matching funds,
or other funds or gifts or donations from any source available for use by the
state or by local government or association of retarded citizens to
provide more adequate services for and habilitation of persons with
developmental disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 71A.14 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that local communities can best administer funding for community-based services
to persons with developmental disabilities. The legislature finds that county
governments and associations for retarded citizens are the entities best
qualified to administer these local funds and services. The legislature
declares its intent that all appropriations for community-based services shall
be administered by either the local county government or local association of
retarded citizens, under contract with the secretary. Such contracts shall be
executed pursuant to the provisions of RCW 71A.14.030 and 71A.14.040.

Sec. 4. RCW 71A.14.030 and 1988
c 176 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

Pursuant to RCW
71A.14.040 the secretary shall work with the county governing authorities ((and)),
developmental disability boards, and associations of retarded citizens,
who apply for state funds to coordinate and provide local services for persons
with developmental disabilities and their families. The secretary ((is
authorized to promulgate)) shall adopt rules establishing the
eligibility of each county ((and)), the developmental disability
board, and association of retarded citizens for state funds to be used
((for the work of the board in coordinating and providing)) to
coordinate and provide services to persons with developmental disabilities
and their families. In developing these rules, the secretary shall give
weight to the efficiency of the proposal as demonstrated through minimized
administrative costs and maximized numbers of persons served. The secretary
shall give weight to the effectiveness of the proposal as demonstrated by
outcome measures. In the case of county governing authorities and
developmental disability boards, an application for state funds shall be
made by the board with the approval of the county governing authority, or by
the county governing authority on behalf of the board. In the case of
associations of retarded citizens, an application for state funds shall be made
by the local association with the approval of its board.

Sec. 5. RCW 71A.14.040 and 1988
c 176 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall
review the applications from the county governing authority and association
of retarded citizens made under RCW 71A.14.030. The secretary ((may))
shall approve an application if it meets the requirements of this
chapter and the rules ((promulgated)) adopted by the secretary. The
amount of the contract shall be the same as the funding administered by the
secretary for community-based services to persons with developmental
disabilities in each county during fiscal years 2001 and 2002. The
secretary shall ((promulgate)) adopt rules to assist in
determining the ((amount of the grant)) distribution of any funding
increase or decrease appropriated to the department in subsequent fiscal years.
In ((promulgating)) adopting the rules, the secretary shall
consider the population of the area served, the needs of the area, and the
ability of the community to provide funds for the developmental disability
program provided in this title.

Sec. 6. RCW 71A.14.050 and 1988
c 176 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may
require by rule that in order to be eligible for state funds, the county ((and)),
the developmental disability board, and the association of retarded citizens
shall provide the following indirect services to the community:

(1) Serve as an
informational and referral agency within the community for persons with
developmental disabilities and their families;

(2) Coordinate all
local services for persons with developmental disabilities and their families
to insure the maximum utilization of all available services;

(3) Prepare
comprehensive plans for present and future development of services and for
reasonable progress toward the coordination of all local services to persons
with developmental disabilities.

Sec. 7. RCW 71A.14.060 and 1988
c 176 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary by rule
may authorize the county ((and)), the developmental disability
board, and the association of retarded citizens to provide any service
for persons with developmental disabilities that the department is authorized
to provide, except for operating residential habilitation centers under chapter
71A.20 RCW.

Sec. 8. RCW 71A.14.070 and 1988
c 176 s 307 are each amended to read as follows:

In order for the
developmental disability board or association of retarded citizens to
plan, coordinate, and provide required services for persons with developmental
disabilities, the county governing authority and the board or association of
retarded citizens shall be eligible to obtain such confidential information
from public or private schools and the department as is necessary to accomplish
the purposes of this chapter. Such information shall be kept in accordance
with state law and rules ((promulgated)) adopted by the secretary
under chapter 34.05 RCW to permit the use of the information to coordinate and
plan services. All persons permitted to have access to or to use such
information shall sign an oath of confidentiality, substantially as follows:

"As a condition of
obtaining information from (fill in facility, agency, or person) I,
. . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or
otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any information
obtained in the course of using such confidential information, where release of
such information may possibly make the person who received such services
identifiable. I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential
information may subject me to civil liability under state law."

Sec. 9. RCW 71A.14.080 and 1988
c 176 s 308 are each amended to read as follows:

The county governing
authority ((and)), the developmental disability board created
under RCW 71A.14.020, and associations of retarded citizens are
authorized to receive and spend funds received from the state under this
chapter, or any federal funds received through any state agency, or any gifts
or donations received by it for the benefit of persons with developmental
disabilities.

Sec. 10. RCW 71A.14.090 and 1988
c 176 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW
71A.12.120 authorizes local governments and associations of retarded
citizens to participate in federal programs for persons with developmental
disabilities.

---
END ---