BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.96A.020 and 1998
c 296 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1)
"Alcoholic" means a person who suffers from the disease of
alcoholism.

(2)
"Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on
alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use,
symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if
use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of
social or economic functioning.

(3) "Approved
treatment program" means a discrete program of chemical dependency
treatment provided by a treatment program certified by the department of social
and health services as meeting standards adopted under this chapter.

(4) "Chemical
dependency" means alcoholism or drug addiction, or dependence on alcohol
and one or more other psychoactive chemicals, as the context requires.

(5) "Chemical
dependency program" means expenditures and activities of the department
designed and conducted to prevent or treat alcoholism and other drug addiction,
including reasonable administration and overhead.

(6)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(7) "Designated
chemical dependency specialist" means a person designated by the county
alcoholism and other drug addiction program coordinator designated under RCW
70.96A.310 to perform the commitment duties described in RCW 70.96A.140 and
qualified to do so by meeting standards adopted by the department.

(8)
"Director" means the person administering the chemical dependency
program within the department.

(9) "Drug
addict" means a person who suffers from the disease of drug addiction.

(10) "Drug
addiction" means a disease characterized by a dependency on psychoactive
chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms
of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is
reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or
economic functioning.

(11) "Emergency
service patrol" means a patrol established under RCW 70.96A.170.

(12) "Gravely
disabled by alcohol or other drugs" means that a person, as a result of
the use of alcohol or other drugs: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm
resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of
health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning
evidenced by a repeated and escalating loss of cognition or volitional control
over his or her actions and is not receiving care as essential for his or her
health or safety.

(13) "Incapacitated
by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals" means that a person, as a
result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, has his or her
judgment so impaired that he or she is incapable of realizing and making a
rational decision with respect to his or her need for treatment and presents a
likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself, to any other person, or to
property.

(14) "Incompetent
person" means a person who has been adjudged incompetent by the superior
court.

(15) "Intoxicated
person" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is
substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive
chemicals.

(16) "Licensed
physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic
medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.

(17) "Likelihood
of serious harm" means either: (a) A substantial risk that physical harm
will be inflicted by an individual upon his or her own person, as evidenced by
threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on one's self;
(b) a substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual
upon another, as evidenced by behavior that has caused the harm or that places
another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining the harm; or (c) a
substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the
property of others, as evidenced by behavior that has caused substantial loss
or damage to the property of others.

(18) "Medical
necessity" for inpatient care of a minor means a requested certified
inpatient service that is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, arrest, or
alleviate a chemical dependency; or (b) prevent the worsening of chemical
dependency conditions that endanger life or cause suffering and pain, or result
in illness or infirmity or threaten to cause or aggravate a handicap, or cause
physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive
alternative available.

(19) "Minor"
means a person less than eighteen years of age.

(20) "Parent"
means the parent or parents who have the legal right to custody of the child.
Parent includes custodian or guardian.

(21) "Peace
officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or
governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers
by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment.

(22) "Person"
means an individual, including a minor.

(23) "Professional
person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician or
chemical dependency counselor as defined in rule by the department, who is
empowered by a certified treatment program with authority to make assessment,
admission, continuing care, and discharge decisions on behalf of the certified
program.

(24) "Religious
organization" means a church, synagogue, mosque, or other religious
institution:

(a) The purpose of
which is the propagation of religious beliefs; and

(b) That is exempt
from federal income tax under section 501 of the internal revenue code of 1986
(26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(a)) by being listed as an exempt organization under section
501(c) of that code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(a)).

(25)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services.

(((25))) (26)
"Treatment" means the broad range of emergency, detoxification,
residential, and outpatient services and care, including diagnostic evaluation,
chemical dependency education and counseling, medical, psychiatric, psychological,
and social service care, vocational rehabilitation and career counseling, which
may be extended to alcoholics and other drug addicts and their families,
persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and
intoxicated persons.

(((26))) (27)
"Treatment program" means an organization, institution, or
corporation, public or private, engaged in the care, treatment, or
rehabilitation of alcoholics or other drug addicts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 70.96A RCW to read as follows:

A faith-based chemical
dependency treatment program shall conspicuously include in any advertisement
or literature that promotes or describes the program or the program's chemical
dependency treatment services the following statement:

"The treatment and
recovery services at (name of program) are exclusively religious in
nature."

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 70.96A RCW to read as follows:

(1) A program described
in section 2 of this act may not admit a person unless the person signs the
following statement on admission:

"DECLARATION:

I understand that:

(1) The treatment and
recovery services at (name of program) are exclusively religious in nature; and

(2) (Name of program)
offers only nonmedical treatment and recovery methods, such as prayer, moral
guidance, spiritual counseling, and scriptural study.

signed
. . . . . . . . . . . date
. . . . . . . . . . ."

(2) The program shall:

(a) Keep the original
signed statement on file; and

(b) Provide a copy of
the signed statement to the person admitted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 70.96A RCW to read as follows:

A state agency may not
deny to an individual a state or federal social service benefit on the basis
that the individual is participating in a faith‑based residential
chemical dependency treatment program licensed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 70.96A RCW to read as follows:

Sections 2
through 4 of this act are not intended to aid religion. These sections are
intended to aid chemically dependent persons by supporting programs that serve
the valid public purpose of combating chemical dependency, regardless of
whether the programs are religious, spiritual, or ecclesiastical in nature.

---
END ---