BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 81.112.100 and 1992
c 101 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

An authority shall have
and exercise all rights with respect to the construction, acquisition,
maintenance, operation, extension, alteration, repair, control and management
of high capacity transportation system facilities that are identified in the
system plan developed pursuant to RCW 81.104.100 that any city, county, county
transportation authority, metropolitan municipal corporation, or public transportation
benefit area within the authority boundary has been previously empowered to
exercise and such powers shall not thereafter be exercised by such agencies
without the consent of the authority. Nothing in this chapter shall restrict
development, construction, or operation of a personal rapid transit system by a
city or county. If utility facilities must be removed or relocated as a
result of the construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of a system, the
costs of the removal or relocation must be included in the costs of the system
and paid by the authority. In no case is the utility responsible for the
costs.

An
authority may adopt, in whole or in part, and may complete, modify, or
terminate any planning, environmental review, or procurement processes related
to the high capacity transportation system that had been commenced by a joint
regional policy committee or a city, county, county transportation authority,
metropolitan municipality, or public transportation benefit area prior to the formation
of the authority.

--- END ---