BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.45 RCW to read as follows:

Exchanges and sales of
real estate are exempt from tax under this chapter if the following conditions
are met:

(1) The exchange
consists of a transfer of privately owned real estate for land administered by
the United States secretary of agriculture or secretary of the interior, or
both; and

(2) The values of the
exchanged parcels are equal, or if not equal, have been equalized in a manner
provided by the act of congress authorizing the exchange; or

(3) The sale is to an
agency of the United States administered by the secretary of agriculture or
secretary of interior, or to a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or
association as defined in RCW 84.34.250, and is made to protect, preserve,
maintain, improve, restore, limit the future use of, or otherwise conserve the
real estate for public use or enjoyment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.46 RCW to read as follows:

The exemption in
section 1 of this act is for the state real estate excise tax and does not
extend to taxes imposed under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---