BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
28A.310.170 and 1985 c 341 s 7 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 (1) Every educational service district board shall
employ and

_7 set the salary of an educational service district
superintendent

_8 who shall be employed by a written contract for a term
to be fixed

_9 by the board, but not to exceed three years, and who may
be

10 discharged for sufficient cause.

11 (2) There is hereby established within each
educational service

12 district an educational service district superintendent
review

13 committee. Such review committee shall be composed of a

14 subcommittee of the board, two school district
superintendents

15 from within the educational service district selected by
the

16 educational service district board, and a
representative of the

17 state superintendent of public instruction selected by
the state

18 superintendent of public instruction.

p. 1 SHB
1256

_1 (3) Prior to the employment by the educational
service district

_2 board of a new educational service district
superintendent, the

_3 review committee shall screen all applicants against
the

_4 established qualifications for the position and
recommend to the

_5 board a list of three or more candidates. The
educational service

_6 district board shall either select the new
superintendent from the

_7 list of three or more candidates ((or shall)),
ask the review

_8 committee to add additional names to the list, or
reject the

_9 entire list and ((request)) ask the review
committee to submit

10 three or more additional candidates((, and))
for consideration. The

11 educational service district board shall repeat this
process until

12 a superintendent is selected.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1256 p. 2