BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The department of
corrections shall implement and obtain through a request for proposal process,
a pilot postsecondary educational program for inmates.

(1) The secretary shall
ensure that the request for proposal is offered to community and four-year
colleges to provide postsecondary educational courses for inmates on a self-pay
system.

(2) Inmates shall pay
all costs and tuition for participation in the postsecondary courses.

(3) The secretary shall
select for the pilot program one institution for males and one institution for
females.

(4) The secretary shall
ensure that the pilot program addresses all modes of instruction, including
distance learning and other technologies.

(5) Inmates may use
their own funds and funds deducted by the department under RCW 72.09.111 from
their personal inmate savings account for the sole purposes of their
postsecondary educational classes.

(6) The department shall
provide any necessary space and administrative support if the college or
university provides the postsecondary educational classes.

(7) The department
shall administer the pilot postsecondary educational program for one year.

(8) The department shall
prepare and submit a report to the legislature, not later than January 2, 2003,
including recommendations regarding whether the pilot postsecondary educational
program should be extended and stating the number of inmates who participated
in the program.

Sec. 2. RCW 72.09.480 and 1999 c
325 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply to this
section.

(a) "Cost of
incarceration" means the cost of providing an inmate with shelter, food,
clothing, transportation, supervision, and other services and supplies as may
be necessary for the maintenance and support of the inmate while in the custody
of the department, based on the average per inmate costs established by the
department and the office of financial management.

(b) "Minimum term
of confinement" means the minimum amount of time an inmate will be
confined in the custody of the department, considering the sentence imposed and
adjusted for the total potential earned early release time available to the
inmate.

(c) "Program"
means any series of courses or classes necessary to achieve a proficiency
standard, certificate, or postsecondary degree.

(2) When an inmate,
except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, receives any funds in
addition to his or her wages or gratuities, the additional funds shall be
subject to the deductions in RCW 72.09.111(1)(a) and the priorities established
in chapter 72.11 RCW.

(3) The amount deducted
from an inmate's funds under subsection (2) of this section shall not exceed
the department's total cost of incarceration for the inmate incurred during the
inmate's minimum or actual term of confinement, whichever is longer.

(4) The deductions
required under subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to funds received
by the department on behalf of an offender for payment of ((one))
fee-based education or vocational programs or related educational materials
that ((is)) are associated with an inmate's work program or a
placement decision made by the department under RCW 72.09.460 to prepare an
inmate for work upon release. Any funds received by the department on
behalf of an offender's education that are requested by that offender to be
used for purposes other than education or vocational programming are subject to
the deductions in subsection (2) of this section.

An inmate may, prior to
the completion of the fee-based education or vocational program authorized
under this subsection, apply to a person designated by the secretary for
permission to make a change in his or her program. The secretary, or his or
her designee, may approve the application based solely on the following
criteria: (a) The inmate has been transferred to another institution by the
department for reasons unrelated to education or a change to a higher security
classification and the offender's current program is unavailable in the
offender's new placement; (b) the inmate entered an academic program as an
undeclared major and wishes to declare a major. No inmate may apply for more
than one change to his or her major and receive the exemption from deductions
specified in this subsection; (c) the educational or vocational institution is
terminating the inmate's current program; or (d) the offender's training or
education has demonstrated that the current program is not the appropriate
program to assist the offender to achieve a placement decision made by the
department under RCW 72.09.460 to prepare the inmate for work upon release.

(5) The deductions
required under subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to any money
received by the department, on behalf of an inmate, from family or other
outside sources for the payment of postage expenses. Money received under this
subsection may only be used for the payment of postage expenses and may not be
transferred to any other account or purpose. Money that remains unused in the
inmate's postage fund at the time of release shall be subject to the deductions
outlined in subsection (2) of this section.

(6) When an inmate
sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility of release or parole, or to
death under chapter 10.95 RCW, receives any funds in addition to his or her
gratuities, the additional funds shall be subject to: Deductions of five
percent to the public safety and education account for the purpose of crime
victims' compensation and twenty percent to the department to contribute to the
cost of incarceration.

(7) The
interest earned on an inmate savings account created as a result of the plan in
section 4, chapter 325, Laws of 1999 shall be exempt from the mandatory
deductions under this section and RCW 72.09.111.

---
END ---