BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
9.94A.190 and 2000 c 28 s 4 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) A sentence that includes a term or terms of
confinement

_8 totaling more than one year shall be served in a
facility or

_9 institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the
state.

10 The costs of incarceration for the portion of the
sentence or

11 sentences served in the county jail, including credit
given to the

12 offender for pretrial time served prior to an
offender's transfer

13 to a state facility shall be the financial
responsibility of the

14 state. Reimbursement to the county for those costs
shall not

15 exceed the highest rate charged by the county under
its contract

16 with a municipal government during the year in which
the costs

17 were incurred. Except as provided in subsection
(3) of this

18 section, a sentence of not more than one year of
confinement shall

19 be served in a facility operated, licensed, or utilized
under

p. 1 HB
1262

_1 contract, by the county, or if home detention or work
crew has

_2 been ordered by the court, in the residence of either
the offender

_3 or a member of the offender's immediate family.

_4 (2) If a county uses a state partial confinement
facility for

_5 the partial confinement of a person sentenced to
confinement for

_6 not more than one year, the county shall reimburse the
state for

_7 the use of the facility as provided in this subsection.
The

_8 office of financial management shall set the rate of
reimbursement

_9 based upon the average per diem cost per offender in the

10 facility. The office of financial management shall
determine to

11 what extent, if any, reimbursement shall be reduced or
eliminated

12 because of funds provided by the legislature to the
department for

13 the purpose of covering the cost of county use of state
partial

14 confinement facilities. The office of financial
management shall

15 reestablish reimbursement rates each even-numbered year.

16 (3) A person who is sentenced for a felony to a term
of not

17 more than one year, and who is committed or returned to

18 incarceration in a state facility on another felony
conviction,

19 either under the indeterminate sentencing laws, chapter 9.95
RCW,

20 or under this chapter shall serve all terms of
confinement,

21 including a sentence of not more than one year, in a
facility or

22 institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the
state,

23 consistent with the provisions of RCW 9.94A.400.

24 (4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section, a

25 sentence imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660 which has a
standard

26 sentence range of over one year, regardless of length,
shall be

27 served in a facility or institution operated, or utilized
under

28 contract, by the state.

29 (5) All revenues derived from this section shall
be considered

30 in contract negotiations under RCW 39.34.180(2).

31 Sec. 2. RCW
70.48.410 and 1984 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read

32 as follows:

33 Persons convicted of a felony as defined by chapter
9A.20 RCW

34 and committed to the care and custody of the department
of

35 corrections shall be the financial responsibility of the

36 department of corrections ((not later than the eighth
day,

37 excluding weekends and holidays, following sentencing
for the

HB 1262 p. 2

_1 felony and notification that the prisoner is
available for

_2 movement to a state correctional institution.
However, if good

_3 cause is shown, a superior court judge may order the
prisoner

_4 detained in the jail beyond the eight-day period for
an additional

_5 period not to exceed ten days. If a superior court
orders a

_6 convicted felon to be detained beyond the eighth day following

_7 sentencing, the county or city shall retain financial

_8 responsibility for that ten-day period or portion
thereof ordered

_9 by the court)).

10 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act
is necessary for the

11 immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or

12 support of the state government and its existing public

13 institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1262