BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
39.34.180 and 1996 c 308 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) Each county, city, and town is responsible for
the

_7 prosecution, adjudication, sentencing, and incarceration
of

_8 misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor offenses committed by
adults in

_9 their respective jurisdictions, and referred from their
respective

10 law enforcement agencies, whether filed under state law
or city

11 ordinance, and must carry out these responsibilities
through the

12 use of their own courts, staff, and facilities, or by
entering

13 into contracts or interlocal agreements under this
chapter to

14 provide these services. The state shall pay all
costs for the

15 prosecution, adjudication, sentencing, and
incarceration of all

16 misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor offenses referred
to each county

17 or city by a state agency, including but not limited
to the state

18 patrol, the department of fish and wildlife, any
public college or

p. 1 HB
1263

_1 university police force, or the state parks department.
State

_2 payment of these costs constitutes a transfer to the
state for

_3 local government costs under RCW 43.135.060(2).
Nothing in this

_4 section is intended to alter the statutory
responsibilities of

_5 each county for the prosecution, adjudication,
sentencing, and

_6 incarceration for not more than one year of felony
offenders, nor

_7 shall this section apply to any offense initially filed
by the

_8 prosecuting attorney as a felony offense or an attempt
to commit a

_9 felony offense.

10 (2) The following principles must be followed in
negotiating

11 interlocal agreements or contracts: Cities and counties
must

12 consider (a) anticipated costs of services; and (b)
anticipated

13 and potential revenues to fund the services, including
fines and

14 fees, criminal justice funding, ((and))
state-authorized sales tax

15 funding levied for criminal justice purposes, and
state

16 reimbursement for prisoners in jails.

17 (3) If an agreement as to the levels of compensation
within an

18 interlocal agreement or contract for gross misdemeanor
and

19 misdemeanor services cannot be reached between a city
and county,

20 then either party may invoke binding arbitration on the

21 compensation issued by notice to the other party. In
the case of

22 establishing initial compensation, the notice shall
request

23 arbitration within thirty days. In the case of
nonrenewal of an

24 existing contract or interlocal agreement, the notice
must be

25 given one hundred twenty days prior to the expiration of
the

26 existing contract or agreement and the existing contract
or

27 agreement remains in effect until a new agreement is
reached or

28 until an arbitration award on the matter of fees is
made. The city

29 and county each select one arbitrator, and the initial
two

30 arbitrators pick a third arbitrator.

31 (4) For cities or towns that have not adopted, in
whole or in

32 part, criminal code or ordinance provisions related to
misdemeanor

33 and gross misdemeanor crimes as defined by state law,
this section

34 shall have no application until July 1, 1998.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1263 p. 2