BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW 3.50.810
and 1993 c 317 s 2 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) Any city having entered into an agreement for
court

_8 services with the county must provide written notice
of the intent

_9 to terminate the agreement to the county legislative authority
not

10 less than one year prior to February 1st of the year
in which all

11 district court judges are subject to election.

12 (2) Any city that terminates ((a municipal
court under this

13 chapter may not establish another municipal court
under this

14 chapter until at least ten years have elapsed from
the date of

15 termination)) an agreement for court services
to be provided by a

16 district court may terminate the agreement only at
the end of a

17 four-year district court judicial term.

18 (3) A county that wishes to terminate an
agreement with a city

p. 1 SHB
1264

_1 for the provision of court services must provide
written notice of

_2 the intent to terminate the agreement to the city
legislative

_3 authority not less than one year prior to the
expiration of the

_4 agreement.

_5 Sec. 2. RCW 3.46.150
and 1984 c 258 s 210 are each amended to

_6 read as follows:

_7 (1) Any city, having established a municipal
department as

_8 provided in this chapter may, by written notice to the
county

_9 legislative authority not less than ((thirty days))
one year prior

10 to February 1st of ((any)) the year in
which all district court

11 judges are subject to election, require the
termination of the

12 municipal department created pursuant to this chapter. A
city may

13 terminate a municipal department only at the end of a
four-year

14 judicial term. However, the city may not give
the written notice

15 required by this section unless the city has reached an
agreement

16 with the county under chapter 39.34 RCW under which the
county is

17 to be paid a reasonable amount for costs associated with

18 prosecution, adjudication, and sentencing in criminal
cases filed

19 in district court as a result of the termination. The
agreement

20 shall provide for periodic review and renewal of the
terms of the

21 agreement. If the municipality and the county are
unable to agree

22 on the terms for renewal of the agreement, they shall be
deemed to

23 have entered into an agreement to submit the issue to
arbitration

24 under chapter 7.04 RCW. Pending conclusion of the
arbitration

25 proceeding, the terms of the agreement shall remain in
effect. The

26 municipality and the county have the same rights and are
subject

27 to the same duties as other parties who have agreed to
submit to

28 arbitration under chapter 7.04 RCW.

29 (2) A county that wishes to terminate a municipal
department of

30 the district court must provide written notice to the
city

31 legislative authority at least one year prior to the
date of the

32 intended termination.

33 Sec. 3. RCW
35.20.010 and 1984 c 258 s 201 are each amended to

34 read as follows:

35 (1) There is hereby created and established in each

36 incorporated city of this state having a population of
more than

SHB 1264 p. 2

_1 four hundred thousand inhabitants, as shown by the
federal or

_2 state census, whichever is the later, a municipal court,
which

_3 shall be styled "The Municipal Court of
. . . . . . (name of city),"

_4 hereinafter designated and referred to as the municipal
court,

_5 which court shall have jurisdiction and shall exercise
all the

_6 powers by this chapter declared to be vested in such
municipal

_7 court, together with such powers and jurisdiction as is
generally

_8 conferred in this state either by common law or statute.

_9 (2) A municipality operating a municipal court under
this

10 section may terminate that court if the municipality has
reached

11 an agreement with the county under chapter 39.34 RCW
under which

12 the county is to be paid a reasonable amount for costs
associated

13 with prosecution, adjudication, and sentencing in
criminal cases

14 filed in district court as a result of the termination.
The

15 agreement shall provide for periodic review and renewal
of the

16 terms of the agreement. If the municipality and the
county are

17 unable to agree on the terms for renewal of the
agreement, they

18 shall be deemed to have entered into an agreement to
submit the

19 issue to arbitration under chapter 7.04 RCW. Pending
conclusion of

20 the arbitration proceeding, the terms of the agreement
shall

21 remain in effect. The municipality and the county have
the same

22 rights and are subject to the same duties as other
parties who

23 have agreed to submit to arbitration under chapter 7.04
RCW.

24 (3) A city that has entered into an agreement for
court

25 services with the county must provide written notice
of the intent

26 to terminate the agreement to the county legislative
authority not

27 less than one year prior to February 1st of the year
in which all

28 district court judges are subject to election. A
city that

29 terminates an agreement for court services to be
provided by a

30 district court may terminate the agreement only at
the end of a

31 four-year district court judicial term.

32 (4) A county that wishes to terminate an
agreement with a city

33 for the provision of court services must provide
written notice of

34 the intent to terminate the agreement to the city
legislative

35 authority not less than one year prior to the
expiration of the

36 agreement.

p. 3 SHB
1264

_1 Sec. 4. RCW
39.34.180 and 1996 c 308 s 1 are each amended to read

_2 as follows:

_3 (1) Each county, city, and town is responsible for
the

_4 prosecution, adjudication, sentencing, and incarceration
of

_5 misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor offenses committed by
adults in

_6 their respective jurisdictions, and referred from their
respective

_7 law enforcement agencies, whether filed under state law
or city

_8 ordinance, and must carry out these responsibilities
through the

_9 use of their own courts, staff, and facilities, or by
entering

10 into contracts or interlocal agreements under this
chapter to

11 provide these services. Nothing in this section is
intended to

12 alter the statutory responsibilities of each county for
the

13 prosecution, adjudication, sentencing, and incarceration
for not

14 more than one year of felony offenders, nor shall this
section

15 apply to any offense initially filed by the prosecuting
attorney

16 as a felony offense or an attempt to commit a felony
offense.

17 (2) The following principles must be followed in
negotiating

18 interlocal agreements or contracts: Cities and counties
must

19 consider (a) anticipated costs of services; and (b)
anticipated

20 and potential revenues to fund the services, including
fines and

21 fees, criminal justice funding, and state-authorized
sales tax

22 funding levied for criminal justice purposes.

23 (3) If an agreement as to the levels of compensation
within an

24 interlocal agreement or contract for gross misdemeanor
and

25 misdemeanor services cannot be reached between a city
and county,

26 then either party may invoke binding arbitration on the

27 compensation issued by notice to the other party. In
the case of

28 establishing initial compensation, the notice shall
request

29 arbitration within thirty days. In the case of
nonrenewal of an

30 existing contract or interlocal agreement, the notice
must be

31 given one hundred twenty days prior to the expiration of
the

32 existing contract or agreement and the existing contract
or

33 agreement remains in effect until a new agreement is
reached or

34 until an arbitration award on the matter of fees is
made. The city

35 and county each select one arbitrator, and the initial
two

36 arbitrators pick a third arbitrator.

37 (4) A city or county that wishes to terminate an
agreement for

SHB 1264 p. 4

_1 the provision of court services must provide written
notice of the

_2 intent to terminate the agreement in accordance with
RCW 3.50.810

_3 and 35.20.010.

_4 (5) For cities or towns that have not
adopted, in whole or in

_5 part, criminal code or ordinance provisions related to
misdemeanor

_6 and gross misdemeanor crimes as defined by state law,
this section

_7 shall have no application until July 1, 1998.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. RCW
3.46.155 (Termination of municipal

_9 department--Waiting period for establishing another) and
1993 c

10 317 s 1 are each repealed.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SHB
1264