BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.160.060 and 1999
c 164 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is authorized
to make direct loans to political subdivisions of the state and to federally
recognized Indian tribes for the purposes of assisting the political
subdivisions and federally recognized Indian tribes in financing the
cost of public facilities, including development of land and improvements for
public facilities, project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land
use, permitting, feasibility(([,])), and marketing studies and
plans; project design, site planning, and analysis; project debt and revenue
impact analysis; as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration,
expansion, or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be authorized
for purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and to the extent that,
a loan is not reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the political
subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe and the finding by
the board that financial circumstances require grant assistance to enable the
project to move forward.

Application for funds
shall be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In making
grants or loans the board shall conform to the following requirements:

(1) The board shall not
provide financial assistance:

(a) For a project the
primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail shopping
development or expansion.

(b) For any project
that evidence exists would result in a development or expansion that would
displace existing jobs in any other community in the state.

(c) For the acquisition
of real property, including buildings and other fixtures which are a part of
real property.

(2) The board shall
only provide financial assistance:

(a) For those projects
which would result in specific private developments or expansions (i) in
manufacturing, production, food processing, assembly, warehousing, advanced
technology, research and development, and industrial distribution; (ii) for
processing recyclable materials or for facilities that support recycling,
including processes not currently provided in the state, including but not
limited to, de-inking facilities, mixed waste paper, plastics, yard waste, and
problem-waste processing; (iii) for manufacturing facilities that rely
significantly on recyclable materials, including but not limited to waste tires
and mixed waste paper; (iv) which support the relocation of businesses from
nondistressed urban areas to rural counties or rural natural resources impact
areas; or (v) which substantially support the trading of goods or services
outside of the state's borders.

(b) For projects which
it finds will improve the opportunities for the successful maintenance,
establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or will
otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic
opportunities.

(c) When the
application includes convincing evidence that a specific private development or
expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the public facility
improvement is made.

(3) The board shall
prioritize each proposed project according to:

(a) The relative
benefits provided to the community by the jobs the project would create, not
just the total number of jobs it would create after the project is completed
and according to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs would be
located; and

(b) The rate of return
of the state's investment, that includes the expected increase in state and
local tax revenues associated with the project.

(4) A responsible
official of the political subdivision or the federally recognized Indian
tribe shall be present during board deliberations and provide information
that the board requests.

Before any
financial assistance application is approved, the political subdivision or
the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking the assistance must
demonstrate to the community economic revitalization board that no other timely
source of funding is available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing
available from the community economic revitalization board.

--- END ---