BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART II

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES

Sec. 201. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 201
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC
SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 1,452,000

Highway Safety Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $........................................... 9,038,000

School Zone Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation $ ((1,004,000))

1,204,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((11,494,000))

11,694,000

The appropriations
in this section ((is)) are subject to the following conditions
and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) $25,000 of the
highway safety account‑-state is provided as a one-time appropriation to
implement the Cooper Jones act, chapter 165, Laws of 1998.

(2) The Washington
traffic safety commission may oversee no more than four pilot projects
regarding the use of traffic safety cameras at school zones and/or railroad
crossings and no more than one pilot project regarding the use of traffic
safety cameras at school zones, stoplights, and/or railroad crossings. The
traffic safety commission shall use the following guidelines to administer the
program:

(a) Traffic safety
cameras may take pictures of the vehicle and vehicle license plate only;

(b) The law enforcement
agency of the city or county government shall plainly mark the locations where
the automated traffic enforcement system is used by placing signs on street
locations that clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone
where traffic laws are enforced by an automated traffic enforcement system;

(c) Cities and counties
using traffic safety cameras must provide periodic notice by mail to its
citizens indicating the zones in which the traffic safety cameras will be used;

(d) Notices of
infractions must be mailed to the registered owner of a vehicle within fourteen
days of the infraction occurring;

(e) The owner of the
vehicle is not responsible for the violation if the owner of the vehicle,
within fifteen days after notification of the violation, furnishes the
officials or agents of the municipality that issued the citation with:

(i) An affidavit made
under oath, stating that the vehicle involved was, at the time, stolen or in
the care, custody, or control of some person other than the registered owner;
or

(ii) Testimony in open
court under oath that the person was not the operator of the vehicle at the
time of the alleged violation;

(f) Infractions
detected through the use of traffic safety cameras are not part of the
registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120;

(g) By January 1, 2001,
the traffic safety commission shall provide a report to the legislature
regarding the use, public acceptance, outcomes, and other relevant issues
regarding traffic safety cameras demonstrated by the pilot projects.

Sec. 202. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 203
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COUNTY ROAD
ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 60,568,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 1,661,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 376,000

County Arterial
Preservation Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 28,542,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 91,147,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) $240,000 of
the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
completion of a study updating the legislature on the freight and goods road
systems on county roads.

(2) The
appropriations contained in this section include funding to assist counties in
providing match for federal emergency funding for earthquake damage as determined
by the county road administration board. The county road administration board
shall report to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives and the office of financial management by September 30, 2001,
on the projects selected to receive match funding.

Sec. 203. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 204
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Urban Arterial Trust
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 104,433,000

Transportation Improvement
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 148,814,000

Public Transportation
Systems Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 4,532,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 11,977,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 269,756,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The
transportation improvement account‑-state appropriation includes
$60,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds, $30,000,000 authorized by RCW
47.26.500, and $30,000,000 authorized by House Bill No. 2788. If House Bill
No. 2788 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature $30,000,000 of the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) The
appropriations contained in this section include funding to assist cities and
counties in providing match for federal emergency funding for earthquake damage
as determined by the transportation improvement board. The transportation
improvement board shall report to the transportation committees of the senate
and house of representatives and the office of financial management by
September 30, 2001, on the projects selected to receive match funding.

Sec. 204. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 211
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL‑-FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((154,314,000))

154,550,000

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ ((6,153,000))

7,097,000

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 169,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((160,636,000))

161,816,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) $1,435,000 of the
state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is provided solely to
the field operations group subprogram as a one-time appropriation to begin
funding phase III of the Washington state patrol's upgrade to the statewide
emergency communication system. The Washington state patrol shall provide a
full analysis of the costs, benefits, and requirements for completing all
phases of the upgrade to the statewide emergency communication system to the
senate transportation committee and the house of representatives transportation
committee by December 1, 1999.

(2) The Washington
state patrol is authorized to use the federal community-oriented policing
program (COPS) for 18 COPS troopers to begin in July 2000. The troopers must
be used on the state's highways and up to six may be utilized in the Vancouver,
Washington area.

Sec. 205. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 212
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL‑-SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((65,621,000))

65,963,000

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ 104,000

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 743,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((66,468,000))

66,810,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: $877,000 of the state
patrol highway account‑‑state appropriation is provided solely to
maintain pursuit vehicles and provide for replacement of the vehicles at
110,000 miles. The agency may purchase a total of 354 pursuit vehicles during
the biennium ending June 30, 2001. The appropriation in this section reflects
carry forward and new funding due to the consolidation of gasoline,
maintenance, parts, and pursuit vehicles into the fleet section of the support
services bureau.

Sec. 206. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 216
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-DRIVER
SERVICES

Motorcycle Safety Education
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 2,210,000

Highway Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ ((77,971,000))

77,901,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((80,181,000))

80,111,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) By January 1, 2001,
the department shall report to the transportation committees of the house of
representatives and the senate on the progress of the driver history initiative
project and make recommendations for implementing this project on a statewide
level.

(2) $2,880,000 of the
highway safety account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
department to enter into a contract for the implementation of an improved state
driver's license and identicard. The contract with the vendor providing the
improved license and identicard shall state that the license and the identicard
shall not contain: (a) The driver's social security number in either visible
or machine readable form; or (b) the driver's fingerprint or thumbprint.
Consistent with RCW 42.17.260(9) the department shall not sell or otherwise
make available any information that it gathers from citizens of the state of
Washington in administering the driver's licensing program except as already
authorized in Title 46 RCW.

(3) In September of
1999 the department of licensing shall report to the senate transportation
committee and the house of representatives transportation committee on:

(a) The controls
implemented by the department to ensure the integrity and credibility of the
written driver's license test administered by the department; and

(b) The policies and
procedures implemented by the department to ensure that the driver's manuals
produced and distributed by the department contain correct data based on
current federal, state, and local statutes, ordinances, and rules.

(4) $17,000 of the
highway safety fund--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House
Bill No. 1774 enacted in the form passed by the legislature. If House Bill No.
1774 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature the amount referenced
in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $130,000 of the
highway safety fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely to implement
House Bill No. 2259 enacted in the form passed by the legislature. If House
Bill No. 2259 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 207. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 217
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND
FACILITIES‑-PROGRAM D‑-OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((45,236,000))

45,563,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ ((400,000))

481,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((45,636,000))

46,044,000

The appropriations
in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: $27,000 of the motor
vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely as a match for federal
emergency management funds available to the department of transportation to
repair damage caused by the February 28th earthquake.

Sec. 208. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 219
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((459,765,000))

460,931,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ ((240,241,000))

242,091,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 50,363,000

Special Category C Account‑-State
Appropriation $ 55,220,000

Puyallup Tribal Settlement
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 8,662,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,880,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account--Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,275,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account--Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,106,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((821,512,000))

824,528,000

The appropriations in
this section are provided for the location, design, right of way acquisition,
or construction of state highway projects designated as improvements under RCW
47.05.030. The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions
and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The special
category C account‑-state appropriation of $55,220,000 includes
$40,500,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by Senate Bill No.
5060 or House Bill No. 1203 enacted in the form passed by the legislature. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(2) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $1,285,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819(1) for match on federal demonstration
projects. The transportation commission may authorize the use of current
revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.

(3) The department
shall report December 1st and June 1st of each year to the senate
transportation committee and the house of representatives transportation
committee and the office of financial management on the timing and the scope of
work being performed for the regional transit authority known as sound
transit. This report shall provide a description of all department activities
related to the regional transit authority including investments in state‑owned
infrastructure.

(4) The motor vehicle
account‑-federal appropriation in this section is transferrable to the
transportation account or multimodal transportation account to ensure efficient
funds management and program delivery.

(5) $2,270,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
north Sumner interchange project. The project shall no longer receive a
portion of its funding from the economic development account.

(6) $4,880,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided solely for
the state program share of freight mobility projects as identified by the
freight mobility strategic investment board. The amount provided in this
subsection can only be expended upon authorization from the freight mobility strategic
investment board.

(7) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $147,000,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.

(8)(a) $50,000,000 of
the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided as a cash
contribution for the development of the public private initiatives project at
Tacoma Narrows. State funds shall be used initially for the acquisition of
right of way and the forensic studies of the existing bridge including purchase
of equipment necessary to conduct the studies. The balance of state funds not
required for acquisition of right of way and forensic studies shall be placed
with the designated bond trustee at the same time the privately secured debt
proceeds are deposited.

(b) The $50,000,000
provided in (a) of this subsection includes $5,527,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.834 for all forms of cash contributions,
or payment of other costs incident to the location, development, design, right
of way, and construction of the Tacoma narrows bridge improvements under the
public-private transportation initiative program authorized under chapter 47.46
RCW.

(9) $5,800,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑‑state appropriation is provided solely for
the completion of the weigh stations at Stanwood and Cle Elum along with weigh
in motion at those sites and weigh in motion at Fort Lewis Northbound. The
Washington state patrol and department of transportation shall work
cooperatively to complete these projects.

(10) $485,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is a reappropriation provided
solely to enable the translake committee to finalize and present its
recommendations. Upon presentation of the recommendations, or upon the
expenditure of the appropriation provided by this subsection, the department of
transportation shall disband the committee.

(11) $800,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation and $3,000,000 of the motor
vehicle account--federal appropriation are provided solely to the Washington
state department of transportation, office of urban mobility, to advance the
recommendations of the translake Washington study committee. These funds shall
be used to develop a scope of work for an environmental impact statement and
related engineering work, including an environmental strategy, a decision
process, a statement of purpose and need, and a formal notice of intent. None
of the appropriation for the scope of work for the environmental impact
statement shall be available to support any activities of the translake
Washington study committee.

(12) $1,166,000 of the motor
vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for predesign of the
northeast 44th street interchange on I-405. This amount shall be placed into a
reserve status until such time as a one-third contribution is made by the city
of Renton and a one-third contribution is made by the project developer. If
the city and developer contributions are not obtained by October 31, 2000, this
amount shall lapse.

(13) The department's
work force levels for highway construction for the 1999-2001 biennium shall be
2200 FTEs. Additional work force increases for highway construction are
authorized and shall not exceed five percent of the authorized work force. The
department shall report quarterly on program delivery and related work force
adjustments.

(14) $1,250,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely to
establish alternatives for flood management and flood hazard reduction projects
in the Chehalis basin.

(a) The department of
transportation shall convene a technical committee to develop watershed-based
solutions to flooding within the Chehalis basin. The technical committee shall
be comprised of representatives of the department of transportation, department
of ecology, department of fish and wildlife, the department of community,
trade, and economic development, the military department's emergency management
division, and affected counties and tribes. The department of transportation
shall also seek the participation of the United States army corps of engineers,
federal emergency management administration, the United States geological
survey, the United States fish and wildlife service, the United States
environmental protection agency, and other entities with critical knowledge
related to the structural or nonstructural flood hazard reduction projects in
the Chehalis basin. Funds shall be distributed by the department of
transportation for alternative analysis, mapping, and model testing projects as
recommended by the technical committee. The solutions considered by the technical
committee shall be consistent with fish and habitat recovery efforts and avoid
additional flood hazard to downstream communities. The department of
transportation shall present a report to the senate transportation committee
and the house of representatives transportation committee by December 1, 1999,
regarding findings and progress made by funded projects.

(b) If the federal
government makes funds available to accomplish the project described in (a) of
this subsection, the department of transportation shall place the appropriation
identified in this section in reserve.

Sec. 209. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 221
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE‑-PROGRAM M

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((239,927,000))

240,627,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ ((486,000))

1,486,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,417,000))

4,917,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((243,830,000))

247,030,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) If portions of the
appropriations in this section are required to fund maintenance work resulting
from major disasters not covered by federal emergency funds such as fire,
flooding, and major slides, supplemental appropriations will be requested to restore
state funding for ongoing maintenance activities.

(2) The department
shall request an unanticipated receipt for any federal moneys received for
emergency snow and ice removal and shall place an equal amount of the motor
vehicle fund‑-state into unallotted status. This exchange shall not
affect the amount of funding available for snow and ice removal.

(3) The department
shall not close any highway rest areas but shall continue to operate and
maintain all existing rest areas. The department shall convene a panel of
stakeholders to evaluate innovative financing options and partnership
opportunities at safety rest areas on state highways. At a minimum, the
evaluation shall include: (a) A survey of relevant laws that impact the
state's ability to create public‑private partnerships or utilize
innovative financing techniques for the maintenance and operation of safety
rest areas; and (b) an identification of maintenance and operation activities
necessary to ensure continuous operation of safety rest areas. By December 1,
2000, the stakeholder panel shall make recommendations to the house of
representatives and senate transportation committees and the office of
financial management on the feasibility of instituting a pilot project for
public‑private partnerships or innovative financing of safety rest areas.

Sec. 210. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 224
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT‑-PROGRAM S

Puget Sound Capital
Construction Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 2,989,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((84,062,000))

84,262,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ ((125,000))

462,000

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 6,353,000

Transportation Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 115,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,402,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((95,046,000))

95,584,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and the
specified amount is provided solely for that activity:

(1) $75,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely to enable
the secretary of transportation to implement a leadership training program at
the department of transportation. The program shall include a mentoring
component. The department shall develop performance measures to evaluate the
effectiveness of the program, including but not limited to a performance
measure to determine the effect of the program on employee retention. The department
shall provide a progress report on the training program to the office of
financial management, the senate transportation committee, and the house of
representatives transportation committee by December 1, 2000.

(2) Appropriation
transfers from transportation management and support to the transportation
equipment fund for management information services activities shall be
permitted through fiscal year 2000. Effective July 1, 2000, expenditures for
these activities shall be charged directly to transportation management and
support.

Sec. 211. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 226
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH‑-PROGRAM
T

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((10,459,000))

10,211,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 17,000,000

Transportation Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 328,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,043,000))

1,291,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 28,830,000

Sec. 212. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 227
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES‑-PROGRAM U

(1) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL TORT CLAIMS SUPPORT

Motor Vehicle Account‑‑State
Appropriation..... $ 2,913,000

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,155,000

(2) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 907,000

(3) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND
CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((3,693,000))

3,943,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 750,000

The appropriations
in this subsection (3) are subject to the following conditions and limitations
and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: $250,000 of the
motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely as a match for
federal emergency management funds available to the department of
transportation to repair damage caused by the February 28th earthquake.

(4) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((1,990,000))

2,240,000

(5) FOR PAYMENT OF
SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 11,539,000

(6) FOR PAYMENT OF
SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Motor Vehicle Fund‑-Puget
Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 3,262,000

(7) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 158,000

(8) FOR PAYMENT OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 1,100,000

(9) FOR ARCHIVES AND
RECORDS MANAGEMENT

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 392,000

Sec. 213. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 230
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-MARINE‑-PROGRAM X

Marine Operating Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 148,330,000

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((137,587,000))

149,415,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,092,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((291,009,000))

302,837,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) Appropriations in
this section shall initially be allotted as appropriated by this section.
Subsequent allotment modifications shall not permit moneys that are provided
solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose. After
May 1, 2000, after approval by the director of financial management and unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer appropriations
between the marine operating account‑-state and the Puget Sound ferry
operations account‑-state appropriations. However, the program shall not
expend more than the total amount appropriated from these accounts.

(2) The appropriation
is based on the budgeted expenditure of (($29,539,000)) $41,367,000
for vessel operating fuel in the 1999-2001 biennium. If the actual cost of
fuel is less than this budgeted amount, the excess amount may not be expended.
If the actual cost exceeds this amount, the department shall request a
supplemental appropriation.

(3) The appropriation
provides for the compensation of ferry employees. The expenditures for
compensation paid to ferry employees during the 1999-2001 biennium may not
exceed $195,690,000 plus a dollar amount, as prescribed by the office of
financial management, that is equal to any insurance benefit increase granted
general government employees in excess of $341.75 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine employees
for the respective fiscal year, a dollar amount as prescribed by the office of
financial management for costs associated with pension amortization charges,
and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of financial management for salary
increases during the 1999-2001 biennium. For the purposes of this section, the
expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees shall be limited to
salaries and wages and employee benefits as defined in the office of financial
management's policies, regulations, and procedures named under objects of
expenditure "A" and "B" (7.2.6.2).

The prescribed salary
and insurance benefit increase or decrease dollar amount that shall be
allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in addition to the
appropriation contained in this section and may be used to increase or decrease
compensation costs, effective July 1, 1999, and thereafter, as established in
the 1999-2001 general fund operating budget.

(4) The department,
when implementing ferry service reductions, shall, to the extent possible,
maintain peak hour vehicle and passenger service capacity, summer tourist route
capacity, and a fall/winter/spring presence on all auto ferry routes, while
ensuring equitable treatment among routes.

(5) The joint task
force on ferries is created.

(a) The joint task
force on ferries is composed of:

(i) Eight members of
the legislature selected as follows:

(A) Four members of the
senate, two from each of the major caucuses, to be appointed by the president
of the senate, who shall select one of the four senate members as cochair;

(B) Four members of the
house of representatives, two from each of the major caucuses, to be appointed
by the cospeaker of the respective caucus. The cospeakers shall jointly select
one of the four house members as cochair; and

(C) The members
appointed from each major caucus of the senate and the house of representatives
must include one member from a legislative district that encompasses a terminus
of a Washington state ferry route and one from a legislative district that does
not include a terminus of a Washington state ferry route;

(ii) At least one
person designated by the cochairs representing each of the following:

(A) Ferry advisory
committees;

(B) Persons who do not
use ferries;

(C) Labor organizations
representing ferry workers;

(D) Washington State
Ferries;

(E) Transit operators;

(F) The office of
financial management; and

(G) Other groups as
deemed appropriate by the cochairs of the task force.

(b) The transportation
committees shall provide staff support as mutually agreed by the cochairs of
the joint task force.

(c) The legislative
transportation committee shall pay the expenses of the legislative committee
members.

(d) The joint task
force on ferries shall report to the full legislature at the beginning of the
2001 legislative session. The report must include, but not be limited to,
analysis and recommendations on the following:

(i) Establishment of a
long-term goal for recovery of operating costs from fare revenue;

(ii) Options for
further cuts in ferry service or full or partial restoration of ferry service
cuts;

(iii) Feasibility of
full or partial privatization of the ferry system, public-private partnerships,
or state and local partnerships; and

(iv) Establishing the
short-term and long-term capital needs of the Washington state ferry system.

Sec. 214. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 232
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((83,435,000))

82,269,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ ((8,040,000))

6,190,000

Transportation Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 321,000

High Capacity
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 150,000

Highway Infrastructure
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,500,000

Highway Infrastructure
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 234,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,381,000

Urban Arterial Trust Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((109,061,000))

106,045,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) $40,692,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
state program share of freight mobility projects as identified by the freight
mobility strategic investment board. The amount provided in this subsection
can only be expended upon authorization from the freight mobility strategic
investment board.

(2) $187,000 of the
transportation account‑-state appropriation and $213,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--state appropriation are provided solely for
a study by the senate transportation committee and the house of representatives
transportation committee in cooperation with the port of Benton developing a
strategic corridor feasibility and master site plan for the port of Benton. If
the port of Benton does not provide at least $200,000 to fund the plan
development, the transportation fund‑-state appropriation referenced in
this subsection shall lapse and this subsection shall be null and void.

(3) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $30,000,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(4) $10,000,000 of the
multimodal transportation account‑-state appropriation is provided solely
to fund the first phase of a multiphase cooperative project with the state of
Oregon to dredge the Columbia river. The department shall not expend the
appropriation in this section unless agreement on ocean disposal sites has been
reached which protects the state's commercial crab fishery. The amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse unless the state of Oregon appropriates
a dollar-for-dollar match to fund its share of the project.

(5) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $1,167,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819(1). The transportation commission
may authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.

(6) $5,000,000 of the
urban arterial trust account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
a small city pavement preservation program, to be administered by the
department's highways and local programs division. The department, in
consultation with stakeholders, shall establish program guidelines. The
guidelines should include but not be limited to a provision limiting program
eligibility to cities with a population of 2,500 or less.

(7) $15,000,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for a
county corridor congestion relief program, to be administered by the
department's highways and local programs division. Urban corridors must
connect to urban or significant activity centers; begin or end at the
intersection of another arterial, state highway, or limited access freeway
system; and provide an alternate route to the limited access freeway system.
The purpose of the program is to provide funding for congested urban corridors,
as defined and selected by the department of transportation in consultation
with counties and regional transportation planning organizations. At a
minimum, project selection criteria should include: Consistency with regional
transportation plans; measurable improvements in mobility; cost effectiveness;
systematic corridor mobility improvements rather than isolated "spot"
improvements; and optimal timing for construction.

(8) $5,000,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
improving traffic and pedestrian safety near schools. The highways and local
programs division within the department of transportation shall administer this
program. Funds should be used for traffic and pedestrian improvements near
schools, including roadway channelization and signalization.

(9) The highways and
local programs division within the department of transportation shall develop a
prequalification procedure for potential bidders on projects administered or
approved by the transportation improvement board. The board shall work with
other interested parties including but not limited to associations representing
general contractors and the office of minority and women's business
enterprises. The prequalification procedure's goal is to ascertain that
bidders are qualified by experience, financing, equipment, and organization to
do the work called for in the contract documents. The prequalification
procedure may require a bidder to (1) satisfy threshold requirements
established by the board prior to being furnished a proposal form on any
contract; or (2) complete a preaward survey of the bidder's qualification prior
to award.

(10) $2,000,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for city
fish passage barrier removal and habitat restoration. Funds should be used for
eliminating fish passage barriers, including stormwater facilities, and
providing for habitat restoration for salmonid species that are listed as
threatened or endangered. The amount provided in this section may only be
expended upon authorization from the department of transportation's
environmental affairs office.

(11)
$10,000,000 of the motor vehicle fund--state appropriation is provided solely
for a city corridor congestion relief program, to be administered by the
department's highways and local programs division. Urban corridors must
connect to urban or significant activity centers, begin or end at the
intersection of another arterial, state highway or limited access freeway
system, and provide an alternate route to the limited access freeway system.
The purpose of the program is to provide funding for congested urban corridors
as defined and selected by the department of transportation in consultation
with counties and regional transportation planning organizations. At a
minimum, project selection criteria should include: Consistency with regional
transportation plans; measurable improvements in mobility; cost effectiveness;
systematic corridor mobility improvements rather than isolated "spot"
improvements; and optimal timing for construction.

(End
of part)

PART
IV

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

Sec. 401. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 401
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES
DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND TRANSPORTATION FUND
REVENUE

Highway Bond Retirement
Account Appropriation... $........................................... ((161,310,000))

154,200,000

Ferry Bond Retirement
Account Appropriation.... $ ((53,592,000))

55,082,000

Transportation Improvement
Board Bond Retirement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((35,909,000))

35,796,000

Puget Sound Capital
Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation...................... ........ $ 270,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ ((1,960,000))

1,600,000

Special Category C Account‑-State
Appropriation $ ((405,000))

100,000

Transportation Improvement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 600,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((254,046,000))

247,648,000

Sec. 402. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 403
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

(1) Motor Vehicle Fund
Appropriation for

motor vehicle fuel tax and
overload penalties

distribution................................... $ ((483,325,000))

480,986,000

(2) Transportation Fund
Appropriation for

motor vehicle excise tax
distribution.......... $ ((178,207,000))

179,882,000

(3) Multimodal
Transportation Account‑‑State

Appropriation for motor
vehicle excise tax

distribution................................... $ ((52,619,000))

52,572,000

Sec. 403. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 404
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

(1) RV Account‑-State
Appropriation:

For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State... $........................................... 1,865,000

(2) State Patrol
Highway Account‑-State

Appropriation: For
transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account‑‑State................................. $ 27,000,000

(3) Highway Safety
Fund--State Appropriation:

For transfer to the
Multimodal Transportation

Account--State................................. $ 3,220,000

(4) ((Puget Sound
Ferry Operations Account‑‑State

Appropriation: For
transfer to the Marine

Operating Account‑‑State....................... $ 1,400,000

(5))) Public Transportation Systems Account‑-

State Appropriation: For
transfer to the

Multimodal Transportation
Account--State........ $...................................... 23,182,000

(((6))) (5)
Transportation Fund--State

Appropriation: For
transfer to the Multimodal

Transportation Account‑-State.................. $ 28,061,000

The department of
transportation shall ((only)) request the state treasurer to
transfer funds provided under subsection (1) of this section only on an
as‑needed basis.

Sec. 404. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 405
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSFERS

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations Account‑-State

Appropriation: For
transfer to the Puget Sound

Capital Construction
Account‑‑State.................. $.................................. 67,000,000

Motor Vehicle
Fund--State Appropriation:

For transfer to the
Advanced Environmental

Mitigation Revolving
Account........................ $ 1,000,000

Motor Vehicle
Fund--State Appropriation:

For transfer to Puget Sound
Capital Construction

Account............................................. $ 18,272,000

Transportation
Equipment Fund--State

Appropriation: For
transfer to the Motor

Vehicle Fund........................................ $ ((2,500,000))

2,509,000

((High Capacity
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation: For
transfer to the Multimodal

Transportation Account.............................. $ 2,036,000

Passenger Ferry
Account‑-State Appropriation:

For transfer to the
Multimodal Transportation

Account............................................. $ 235,000))

The
department of transportation shall only transfer funds to the Puget Sound
capital construction account--state as provided under this subsection on an
as-needed basis. The department of transportation shall transfer all
unexpended funds from the high capacity transportation account, the passenger
ferry account, the public transportation systems account, and the
transportation account to the multimodal transportation account.

(End
of part)

PART
VI

PROVISIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT
APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
601. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End
of part)

INDEX PAGE
#

COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION
BOARD................................ 3

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

DRIVER SERVICES................................................. 5

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES--PROGRAM U......................... 13

HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM M................................. 11

HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND FACILITIES--PROGRAM
D--OPERATING......... 7

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I......................................... 7

LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z...................................... 17

MARINE--PROGRAM X.............................................. 14

TRANSFERS...................................................... 22

TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT--PROGRAM S............... 12

TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND
RESEARCH--PROGRAM T......... 13

STATE TREASURER

BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST................................... 21

STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION................................ 21

TRANSFERS...................................................... 22

TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD................................ 3

WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU......................................... 4

SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU......................................... 5

WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION............................ 1

---
END ---