BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The transportation
budget of the state is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions
hereinafter set forth, the several amounts hereinafter specified, or as much
thereof as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated from the several accounts and funds hereinafter named to the
designated state agencies and offices for employee compensation and other
expenses, for capital projects, and for other specified purposes, including the
payment of any final judgments arising out of such activities, for the period
ending June 30, 2003.

(2) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this act.

(a) "Fiscal year
2002" or "FY 2002" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002.

(b) "Fiscal year
2003" or "FY 2003" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003.

(c) "FTE"
means full-time equivalent.

(d) "Lapse"
or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated
status.

(e) "Provided
solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified
purpose.

(f) "Enacted in
the form passed by the legislature" means the referenced bill, as
identified by a four-digit number, was:

(i) Enacted either with
no provisions vetoed by the governor or with only ministerial or de minimus
changes resulting from a partial veto; or

(ii) Attached in full
onto another bill as an amendment and the entire bill, including the amendment,
was passed by the legislature and is enacted either with no provisions vetoed
by the governor or with only ministerial or de minimus changes resulting from a
partial veto.

PART
I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES-‑OPERATING

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 305,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

The entire
appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the motor fuel
quality program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION
AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 641,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. FOR THE UTILITIES AND
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Grade Crossing Protective
Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 126,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The utilities and
transportation commission shall develop a competitive rail grade crossing
safety grant program which will fully fund selected safety projects to the
extent allowable under chapter 81.53 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 819,000

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely for road maintenance purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
105. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
AUDITOR

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 126,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The appropriation is
a one-time appropriation for the development of the local government finance
project.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES‑-CAPITAL

NEW SECTION. Sec.
106. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
PARKS AND RECREATION‑-CAPITAL PROJECTS

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 763,000

The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation is a one‑time reappropriation and is
provided solely for the projects specified in this section. Any of the
appropriations not expended by June 30, 2003, shall revert to the motor vehicle
account‑-state.

(1) $367,000 is
provided solely for the Cama beach - Damon point project;

(2) $56,000 is provided
solely for the Ike Kinswa park study;

(3) $250,000 is
provided solely for the Beacon Rock state park entrance;

(4)
$90,000 is provided solely for Cama beach state park entrance.

(End
of part)

PART
II

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC
SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 1,788,000

Highway Safety Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $........................................... 5,671,000

School Zone Safety Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,504,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 8,963,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The Washington
traffic safety commission may oversee no more than four pilot projects
implementing the use of traffic safety cameras at school zones, railroad
crossings, construction zones or stoplights, and no more than one pilot project
regarding the use of traffic safety cameras in residential neighborhoods, at
school zones, railroad crossings, construction zones, or stoplights.

(1) In order to ensure
adequate time in the 2001-03 biennium to evaluate the effectiveness of the
pilot program, any programs authorized by the commission must be authorized by
December 31, 2001.

(2) If the state, a
county, or a city has established an authorized traffic safety camera pilot
program under this section, the compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor
of the equipment used: Must be based upon the value of the equipment and services
provided or rendered in support of the system; and may not be based upon a
portion of the fine or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the
equipment.

(3) The traffic safety
commission shall use the following guidelines to administer the program:

(a) Traffic safety
cameras may take pictures of the vehicle and vehicle license plate only;

(b) The law enforcement
agency of the city or county government shall plainly mark the locations where
the automated traffic enforcement system is used by placing signs on street
locations that clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone
where traffic laws are enforced by an automated traffic enforcement system;

(c) Cities and counties
using traffic safety cameras must provide periodic notice by mail to its
citizens indicating the zones in which the traffic safety cameras will be used;

(d) Notices of
infractions must be mailed to the registered owner of a vehicle within fourteen
days of the infraction occurring;

(e) The owner of the
vehicle is not responsible for the violation if the owner of the vehicle,
within fifteen days after notification of the violation, furnishes the
officials or agents of the municipality that issued the citation with:

(i) An affidavit made
under oath, stating that the vehicle involved was, at the time, stolen or in
the care, custody, or control of some person other than the registered owner;
or

(ii) Testimony in open
court under oath that the person was not the operator of the vehicle at the
time of the alleged violation;

(f) Infractions
detected through the use of traffic safety cameras are not part of the
registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120; and

(g) By January 1, 2003,
the traffic safety commission shall provide a report to the legislature
regarding the use, public acceptance, outcomes, and other relevant issues
regarding traffic safety cameras demonstrated by the pilot projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE
COMMISSIONERS

Pilotage Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 306,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. FOR THE COUNTY ROAD
ADMINISTRATION BOARD Rural
Arterial Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 50,182,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 1,887,000

County Arterial
Preservation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 28,551,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 80,620,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) $1,519,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
supervision of counties as set forth in RCW 46.68.120(1).

(2) $368,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for county
ferries as set forth in RCW 47.56.725(4).

(3) No more than
$3,327,000 of the total appropriation may be expended for agency
administration, staffing, and overhead costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Urban Arterial Trust
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 94,690,000

Transportation Improvement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 119,005,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 213,695,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The transportation
improvement account‑-state appropriation includes $47,325,000 in proceeds
from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.26.500.

(2) No more than
$3,103,000 of the total appropriation may be expended for agency
administrative, staffing, and overhead costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
205. FOR THE LEGISLATIVE
TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 3,746,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) $2,823,000 of the
motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for the house of
representatives transportation committee.

(2) The house of representatives
transportation committee shall conduct a study of the use of motorized
scooters. The study shall, at a minimum, identify and analyze the safety
issues associated with use of motorized scooters, including use by children,
commuters, and the disabled. House of representatives transportation
committee cochairs shall each appoint one member from their respective caucus
to serve as cochair of the study group. The chair of the senate transportation
committee may also appoint two members from the senate transportation
committee, one from each caucus, to participate in the study. The study shall
be staffed by house of representatives transportation committee staff. The
study group shall report back to the house of representatives transportation committee
by January 1, 2002.

(3) The house of
representatives transportation committee shall conduct a study of the effect of
the weight of fire-fighting apparatus on state roadways. The study shall
determine, at a minimum, the various types of fire-fighting apparatus currently
in use on state roadways; the size, weight and load effect of fire-fighting
apparatus that are currently in use or that potentially could be in use on the
state roadways, as well as on state bridges; and the effect on public safety. The
study may examine state and federal laws that affect fire-fighting
apparatuses. House of representatives transportation committee cochairs shall
each appoint one member from their respective caucus to serve as cochair of the
study group. The study shall be staffed by house of representatives
transportation committee staff. The study group will report back to the house
of representatives transportation committee by January 1, 2002.

(4) The legislative
transportation committee shall contract with an outside consulting firm to
conduct a study on the preservation, replacement, or supplementation of the
Eagle Harbor maintenance facility. The study must analyze: (a) The costs and
benefits to preserve and maintain or relocate the facility; (b) the impact of
Eagle Harbor employment on the local community and Kitsap county; and (c) a
recommendation on future investment in the Eagle Harbor maintenance facility or
possible alternatives. The contractor must report back to the legislature's
transportation committees no later than December 10, 2001.

(5) The legislative
transportation committee, in cooperation with an areawide transportation system
or systems, shall undertake an evaluation of providing locally sponsored
transit services in a local community supplemental to those services provided
by an areawide system. The evaluation shall address:

(a) The costs and
benefits of providing such services;

(b) The impact of such
service on ridership on the areawide system and on any regional systems;

(c) Funding options for
supplemental services; and

(d) Institutional
arrangements affecting the institution of supplemental services.

The committee shall
work with the department of transportation, areawide transit providers,
community officials, private businesses, labor organizations, and others as
appropriate in conducting the evaluation, and in developing a pilot project if
feasible. The committee shall provide an interim progress report to the
legislature by January 2002. The committee shall report its findings to the
legislature not later than December 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
206. FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES
COMMISSION

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 332,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
207. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 773,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
208. FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY
STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 728,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: $100,000 of the motor
vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for a
comprehensive, long-term, statewide freight needs analysis. These funds
represent 20 percent of the biennial cost and shall lapse if the additional 80
percent funding is not secured from partners.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
209. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL‑-FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 161,872,000

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,084,000

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 169,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 169,125,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for the activities of the field
operations bureau:

(1) As a result of the
elimination of the vehicle inspection number (VIN) program, no permanent
Washington state patrol employee shall be displaced from employment without the
opportunity to fill a vacant patrol position for which he or she has a preference
and meets the minimum qualifications. For the purpose of the VIN program
elimination, the guidelines under chapter 356-26 WAC (Registers-Certifications)
shall be suspended for those employees holding the classification of VIN 1 or
2.

(2) To the extent possible,
the agency shall transfer displaced VIN personnel into the 20 newly created
school bus inspection and motor carrier safety assistance program positions.
The agency shall fill existing vacant positions within the commercial vehicle
division with displaced VIN personnel. The agency shall report by December 31,
2001, to the senate and house of representatives transportation committees on
efforts to relocate displaced VIN personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL‑-SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 71,175,000

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 735,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION................. $ 71,910,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $40,000
of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the development of a uniform impound authorization and inventory
form as provided for in RCW 46.55.075. All law enforcement agencies must use
this form for all vehicle impounds after June 30, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
LICENSING‑-MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT
SERVICES

Marine Fuel Tax Refund
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,000

Motorcycle Safety Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 114,000

Wildlife Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 89,000

Highway Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 7,912,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 4,348,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 12,470,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $58,000
of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
the implementation of House Bill No. 2029, as enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. If House Bill No. 2029 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature by June 30, 2001, this amount shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
LICENSING‑-INFORMATION SYSTEMS

Marine Fuel Tax Refund
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,000

Motorcycle Safety Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 51,000

Wildlife Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 35,000

Highway Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 5,867,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 3,522,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 9,477,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $33,000
of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
the implementation of House Bill No. 2029, as enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. If House Bill No. 2029 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature by June 30, 2001, this amount shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
213. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-VEHICLE
SERVICES

Marine Fuel Tax Refund
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 26,000

Wildlife Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 578,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 57,299,000

Licensing Service
Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,538,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 61,441,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,359,000 of the
licensing service account‑‑state appropriation shall lapse unless
legislation implementing a fifty cent increase in the vehicle license renewal
filing fee under RCW 46.01.140 or a fifty cent increase in the vehicle license
fee under RCW 46.16.0621 is enacted by June 30, 2001.

(2) $825,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill No. 2029, as enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. If House Bill No. 2029 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature by June 30, 2001, this amount shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
214. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-DRIVER
SERVICES

Motorcycle Safety Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,223,000

Highway Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 82,175,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 84,398,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
department of licensing shall prepare a capital project plan adopting a process
for using certificates of participation to purchase licensing services offices if
the combined principle and interest payments are the same or less than existing
or future leases on comparable facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
215. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND
FACILITIES‑-PROGRAM D‑-OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 47,453,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 400,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 47,853,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
216. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-AVIATION‑-PROGRAM F

Aeronautics Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... 4,852,000

Aircraft Search and Rescue
Safety and

Education Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 160,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 5,012,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 462,161,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 230,360,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 38,491,000

Special Category C Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 61,000,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,880,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 796,892,000

The appropriations in
this section are provided for the location, design, right of way acquisition,
or construction of state highway projects designated as improvements under RCW
47.05.030. The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions
and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The special
category C account‑-state appropriation of $61,000,000 includes
$56,500,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.812.
The transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues
available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any
part of the state appropriation.

(2) The department
shall report December 1st and June 1st of each year to the transportation
committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on the
timing and the scope of work being performed for the regional transit authority
known as sound transit. This report shall provide a description of all
department activities related to the regional transit authority including
investments in state‑owned infrastructure.

(3) The motor vehicle
account‑-federal appropriation in this section is transferrable to the
multimodal transportation account to ensure efficient funds management and
program delivery.

(4) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $378,952,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.

(5) The department, in
delivering the highway construction program, shall, to the extent possible,
maximize the use of temporary and overtime full time equivalent positions and,
where appropriate, seasonal employees. The department shall report quarterly
on program delivery and related workforce adjustments.

(6) Savings generated
from the application of new project delivery tools and efficiencies shall be reinvested
into high priority construction activities. These savings shall be documented
with savings from other programs and reported to the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(7) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $3,898,000 in unexpended proceeds
from the January 2001 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.834.

(8) $2,500,000 of the
motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for the predesign
of the northeast 44th street interchange on I-405. The amount represents
one-third of the biennial cost and shall be spent equally with funds provided
by the city of Renton and the developer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
218. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION ECONOMIC
PARTNERSHIPS‑-PROGRAM K‑‑OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 1,153,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION ECONOMIC
PARTNERSHIPS‑-PROGRAM K‑‑CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 1,400,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The motor vehicle
fund‑-state appropriation includes $1,400,000 in proceeds from the sale
of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.834.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE‑-PROGRAM M

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 277,322,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 512,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,567,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 281,401,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-PRESERVATION‑-PROGRAM P

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 89,719,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 316,155,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 8,717,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 64,218,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 95,682,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 574,491,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The motor vehicle
account‑-federal appropriation in this section is transferrable to the
multimodal transportation account to ensure efficient funds management and
program delivery.

(2) The department of
transportation is authorized to maximize the use of federal and state funds to
implement the provisions of this section.

(3) The department, in
delivering the highway construction program, shall, to the extent possible,
maximize the use of temporary and overtime full time equivalent positions and,
where appropriate, seasonal employees. The department shall report quarterly
on program delivery and related workforce adjustments.

(4) Savings generated
from the application of new project delivery tools and efficiencies shall be
reinvested into other high priority construction activities. These savings
shall be documented with savings from other programs and reported to the office
of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(5) The motor vehicle‑-state
appropriation includes $6,524,000 for earthquake repairs and to match federal
emergency relief funds including $3,750,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in RCW 47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for emergency purposes.

(6) The transportation
commission may authorize the use of current revenues available to the
department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRAFFIC OPERATIONS‑-PROGRAM
Q‑‑OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 33,867,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 125,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 33,992,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
223. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRAFFIC OPERATIONS‑-PROGRAM
Q‑‑CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 8,440,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 16,678,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 25,118,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and the
specified amount is provided solely for that activity: The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $2,986,000 for state matching funds
for federally selected competitive grant or congressional earmark projects
other than commercial vehicle information system and network (CVISN). These
moneys shall be placed into reserve status until such time as federal funds are
secured and a state match is required. An additional $104,000 of the motor
vehicle‑-state appropriation is provided for the state share of these
projects to be carried forward from the 1999-2001 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
224. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT‑-PROGRAM S

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 91,031,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 125,000

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,774,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,082,000

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-State

Appropriation...................... ........ $ 926,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 100,938,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
225. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH‑-PROGRAM
T

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 11,796,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 18,800,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 987,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 33,583,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and the
specified amount is provided solely for that activity:

(1) The motor vehicle
account‑‑state appropriation includes funds distributed under RCW
46.68.110(2). $500,000 of these funds are to be used solely by the department
of transportation to collect and enter collision reports into the statewide
collision reporting system for local roadway planning and safety analysis.

(2) The motor vehicle
account--state appropriation includes funds distributed under RCW
46.68.110(2). $500,000 of these funds are provided solely to the department
of transportation for the Washington strategic freight transportation
analysis. The department shall work with the transportation research center to
conduct an origin and destination study to determine the impacts of
trade-related truck traffic and other truck impacts on the highway system. The
department may also conduct other research elements, including, but not limited
to, freight corridor identification, strategic resource access, and road
network review.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
226. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES‑-PROGRAM U

(1) FOR PAYMENT OF
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION OFFICE OF RISK MANAGEMENT FEES

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 464,000

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 154,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 618,000

(2) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 731,000

(3) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND
CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 4,128,000

(4) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 2,240,000

(5) FOR PAYMENT OF
SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 13,892,000

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,204,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 18,096,000

(6) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 278,000

(7) FOR PAYMENT OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 1,547,000

(8) FOR ARCHIVES AND
RECORDS MANAGEMENT

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 469,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
227. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM
V

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 11,160,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,074,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 205,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 14,439,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
228. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 142,630,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 37,472,000

Passenger Ferry
Account--State Appropriation... $ 1,500,000

Passenger Ferry
Account--Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 185,602,000

The appropriations in
this section are provided for improving the Washington state ferry system,
including, but not limited to, vessel acquisition, vessel construction, major
and minor vessel improvements, and terminal construction and improvements. The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $50,000,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the motor vehicle account in
lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(2) $150,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for a
feasibility study of potential for economic partnerships between the Washington
state ferries and local government entities, including but not limited to port
districts. The study shall, at a minimum, identify the market, physical, and
economic factors that should be examined in determining whether an economic or
commercial development partnership project on or around Washington state ferry
terminals is likely to produce revenue for the partners. The study shall apply
those factors to an analysis of each terminal used by Washington state ferries
and recommend whether further exploration of state and local partnerships would
be of potential economic benefit to the partners. The entity selected to
perform the study through the request for proposals process will report back to
the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2001.

(3) Appropriations in
this section include funding for the purchase or lease-purchase of one
passenger ferry and assume the proceeds of the sale of the MV Kalama and MV
Skagit passenger ferries shall be deposited in the passenger ferry account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
229. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-MARINE‑-PROGRAM
X

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 321,673,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The appropriation
is based on the budgeted expenditure of $46,881,000 for vessel operating fuel
in the 2001-2003 biennium. If the actual cost of fuel is less than this
budgeted amount, the excess amount may not be expended. If the actual cost
exceeds this amount, the department shall request a supplemental appropriation.

(2) The appropriation
provides for the compensation of ferry employees. The expenditures for
compensation paid to ferry employees during the 2001-2003 biennium may not
exceed $206,696,000 plus a dollar amount, as prescribed by the office of
financial management, that is equal to any insurance benefit increase granted
general government employees in excess of $432.82 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine employees
for the respective fiscal year, a dollar amount as prescribed by the office of
financial management for costs associated with pension amortization charges,
and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of financial management for salary
increases during the 2001-2003 biennium. For the purposes of this section, the
expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees shall be limited to
salaries and wages and employee benefits as defined in the office of financial
management's policies, regulations, and procedures named under objects of
expenditure "A" and "B" (7.2.6.2).

The prescribed salary
and insurance benefit increase or decrease dollar amount that shall be
allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in addition to the
appropriation contained in this section and may be used to increase or decrease
compensation costs, effective July 1, 2001, and thereafter, as established in
the 2001-2003 general fund operating budget.

(3) The department
shall issue a request for information from entities interested in purchasing
advertising on board Washington state ferry vessels. The department shall
evaluate the proposals and report back to the legislature's transportation
committees in January 2002 regarding the potential for revenue from different
types of advertising.

(4) The department may
enter into contracts with private vendors to sell ferry tickets and medium at
locations other than Washington state ferry terminals or facilities.

(a) The department may
enter into the contracts only (i) with private vendors that are already
established businesses offering goods for sale to the general public; and (ii)
if it determines that the vendor's established location has the potential to
serve a significant percentage of the customers using a particular ferry route.

(b) The department may
adopt necessary rules and procedures to allow the use of credit and debit cards
to purchase ferry tickets or medium from a private vendor who has contracted with
the department to sell ferry tickets or medium. The department may establish a
convenience fee to be paid by all persons purchasing ferry tickets and medium
at locations other than Washington state ferry terminals or facilities. The
convenience fee must be sufficient to offset the charges imposed on the
department by the credit and debit card companies. In no event may the use of
credit or debit cards authorized by this section create a loss of revenue to
the state. The use of a personal credit card does not rely upon the credit of
the state as prohibited by Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
230. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-RAIL‑-PROGRAM Y‑‑OPERATING

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 32,704,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
231. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-RAIL‑-PROGRAM Y‑‑CAPITAL

Essential Rail Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 200,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 12,783,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,630,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION........................ $ 22,613,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
232. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z‑‑OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 5,868,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 2,569,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION........................ $ 8,437,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: $250,000 of the motor
vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for a study of
concurrency issues in urban areas marked by multiple contiguous jurisdictions.
The study, lead by the city of Bellevue, will focus on the jurisdictions of
Bellevue, Kirkland, Issaquah, and Redmond and will look at existing and unused
methodologies for including development in neighboring jurisdictions in
concurrency calculations. The study will also investigate what changes in
state and local laws are needed in order to provide a more effective way of
dealing with concurrency issues. By November 1, 2003, a report of the findings
will be made to the transportation committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
233. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z‑‑CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 77,371,000

Highway Infrastructure
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 234,000

Highway Infrastructure
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,500,000

Urban Arterial Trust
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,674,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,150,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION........................ $ 93,929,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $12,000,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 in addition to $16,420,000 in
unexpended proceeds from the January 2001 bond sale. The transportation
commission may authorize the use of current revenues available to the
department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.

(2) $4,159,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
additional small city pavement preservation program grants, to be administered
by the department's highways and local programs division.

(3) $2,000,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
additional traffic and pedestrian safety improvements near schools. The
highways and local programs division within the department of transportation
shall administer this program. Funds should be used for traffic and pedestrian
improvements near schools, including roadway channelization and signalization.

(4) No federal
enhancement funds may be disbursed for the east lake Sammamish trail until an
interlocal agreement between King county and the cities of Sammamish, Redmond,
and Issaquah has been finalized for the portions of the trail within each of
these affected jurisdictions. These agreements shall address safety, security,
public parking, design, public facilities, and public access to the trail;
maintain King county as the lead agency on the development of the trail; and
preserve the railbanking status of the railroad right-of-way according to
federal law.

(5)
$10,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely to fund the first phase of a multiphase cooperative project
with the state of Oregon to dredge the Columbia river. The department shall
not expend the appropriation in this section unless agreement on ocean disposal
sites has been reached which protects the state's commercial crab fishery. The
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse unless the state of Oregon
provides a matching appropriation to fund its share of the project.

(End
of part)

PART
III

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES CAPITAL
FACILITIES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,720,000

Motor Vehicle
Account--State Appropriation..... $ 6,263,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 7,983,000

The appropriations in
this section are provided for the following capital projects:

(1) $400,000 of the
state patrol highway account‑-state is provided for Shelton academy
administration building HVAC replacement. (02‑1‑002)

(2) $680,000 of the
state patrol highway account‑-state is provided for statewide minor works
preservation. (02-1-003)

(3) $270,000 of the
state patrol highway account‑-state is provided for acquisition/predesign
of Walla Walla detachment office. (02-2-002)

(4) $350,000 of the
state patrol highway account‑-state is provided for land acquisition for
the Colville detachment office. (02‑2-024)

(5) $20,000 of the
state patrol highway account‑-state is provided for North Spokane
detachment office predesign. (02-2-031)

(6) $875,000 of the
motor vehicle fund‑-state is provided for Sea-Tac South I-5 weigh in
motion.

(7) $915,000 of the
motor vehicle fund‑-state is provided for Sea-Tac North I-5 weigh in
motion.

(8) $750,000 of the
motor vehicle fund‑-state is provided for Kelso weigh in motion.

(9) $915,000 of the
motor vehicle fund‑-state is provided for the Spokane port of entry weigh
in motion.

(10) $915,000 of the
motor vehicle fund‑-state is provided for Plymouth port of entry weigh in
motion.

(11) $915,000 of the
motor vehicle fund‑-state is provided for Everett South I-5 weigh in
motion.

(12) $978,000 of the
motor vehicle fund‑-state is provided for Cle Elum East I-90 weigh in motion.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)‑-CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle
Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 13,046,000

(End
of part)

PART
IV

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES
DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND TRANSPORTATION FUND
REVENUE

Highway Bond Retirement
Account Appropriation... $........................................... 203,785,000

Ferry Bond Retirement
Account Appropriation.... $ 62,720,000

Transportation Improvement
Board Bond Retirement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 40,856,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 4,498,000

Special Category C Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 565,000

Transportation Improvement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 473,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 312,897,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE
EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Motor Vehicle Account
Appropriation............. $ 444,000

Special Category C Account
Appropriation........ $ 92,000

Transportation Improvement
Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 136,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 672,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
403. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor Vehicle Account
Appropriation for motor vehicle

fuel tax refunds and
distributions......... $ 458,895,000

Motor Vehicle Account
Appropriation for motor vehicle

fuel tax distributions
to cities and

counties................................... $ 428,546,000

Motor Vehicle Account
Appropriation for license,

permit, and fee
distribution to other

accounts................................... $ 349,936,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
404. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-State Appropriation: For

transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account........... $ 38,737,000

Recreational Vehicle
Account‑-State Appropriation: For

transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account........... $ 1,135,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation: For

transfer to the Puget
Sound Ferry Operations

Account......................................... $ 16,000,000

If House Bill Nos. 2214
or 2216 or Senate Bill No. 5078 is enacted in the form passed by the
legislature, the $38,737,000 transfer from the state patrol highway account‑-state
to the motor vehicle account is null and void. If neither House Bill Nos. 2214
or 2216 nor Senate Bill No. 5078 is enacted in the form passed by the
legislature, the state treasurer shall transfer funds from the state patrol
highway account to the motor vehicle account on a quarterly basis.

The state treasurer
shall transfer funds from the RV account to the motor vehicle account at the
request of the department of transportation on an as-need basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
405. STATUTORY
APPROPRIATIONS. In addition to
the amounts appropriated in this act for revenue for distribution, state
contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system, and bond retirement and interest including ongoing bond registration
and transfer charges, transfers, interest on registered warrants, and
certificates of indebtedness, there is also appropriated such further amounts
as may be required or available for these purposes under any statutory formula
or under any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
406. The department of
transportation is authorized to undertake federal advance construction projects
under the provisions of 23 U.S.C. Sec. 115 in order to maintain progress in
meeting approved highway construction and preservation objectives. The
legislature recognizes that the use of state funds may be required to
temporarily fund expenditures of the federal appropriations for the highway
construction and preservation programs for federal advance construction
projects prior to conversion to federal funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
407. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Fund‑-State
Patrol Highway Account:

For transfer to the
Department of Retirement

Systems Expense Fund............................ $ 211,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 408. The department of
transportation shall transfer all unexpended funds in the high capacity
transportation account, the passenger ferry account, the public transportation
systems account, and the transportation account on June 30, 2001, to the
multimodal transportation account.

(End
of part)

PART
V

PROVISIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT
APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 501. RCW 47.04.210 and 1997 c
94 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Federal funds that are
administered by the department of transportation and are passed through to
municipal corporations or political subdivisions of the state and moneys that
are received as total reimbursement for goods, services, or projects
constructed by the department of transportation are removed from the
transportation budget. To process and account for these expenditures a new
treasury trust account is created to be used for all department of
transportation one hundred percent federal and local reimbursable transportation
expenditures. This new account is nonbudgeted and nonappropriated. At the
same time, federal and private local appropriations and full-time equivalents
in subprograms R2, R3, T6, Y6, and Z2 processed through this new account are
removed from the department of transportation's 1997-99 budget.

The department of
transportation may make expenditures from the account before receiving federal
and local reimbursements. However, at the end of each biennium, the account
must maintain a zero or positive cash balance. In the twenty-fourth month of
each biennium the department of transportation shall calculate and transfer
sufficient cash from either the motor vehicle fund or the multimodal
transportation ((fund)) account to cover any negative cash
balances. The amount transferred is calculated based on expenditures from each
fund. In addition, any interest charges accruing to the new account must be
distributed to the motor vehicle fund and the multimodal transportation
((fund)) account.

The department of transportation
shall provide an annual report to the legislative transportation committee and
the office of financial management on expenditures and full-time equivalents
processed through the new account. The report must also include
recommendations for process changes, if needed.

Sec. 502. RCW 47.04.220 and 1997 c
94 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The miscellaneous
transportation programs account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer.

(2) Moneys from the
account may be used only for the costs of:

(a) Miscellaneous
transportation services provided by the department that are reimbursed by other
public and private entities;

(b) Local
transportation projects for which the department is a conduit for federal
reimbursement to a municipal corporation or political subdivision; or

(c) Other reimbursable
activities as recommended by the legislative transportation committee and
approved by the office of financial management.

(3) Moneys received as
reimbursement for expenditures under subsection (2) of this section must be
deposited into the account.

(4) No appropriation is
required for expenditures from this account. This fund is not subject to
allotment procedures provided under chapter 43.88 RCW.

(5) Only the secretary
of transportation or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account.

(6) It is the intent of
the legislature that this account maintain a zero or positive cash balance at
the end of each biennium. Toward this purpose the department may make
expenditures from the account before receiving reimbursements under subsection
(2) of this section. Before the end of the biennium, the department shall
transfer sufficient cash to cover any negative cash balances from the motor vehicle
fund and the multimodal transportation ((funds)) account
to the miscellaneous transportation programs account for unrecovered
reimbursements. The department shall calculate the distribution of this
transfer based on expenditures. In the ensuing biennium the department shall
transfer the reimbursements received in the miscellaneous transportation
programs account back to the motor vehicle fund and the multimodal
transportation ((funds)) account to the extent of the cash
transferred at biennium end. The department shall also distribute any interest
charges accruing to the miscellaneous transportation programs account to the
motor vehicle fund and the multimodal transportation ((funds))
account. Adjustments for any indirect cost recoveries may also be made
at this time.

(7) The department
shall provide an annual report to the legislative transportation committee and
the office of financial management on the expenditures and full-time
equivalents processed through the miscellaneous transportation programs
account. The report must also include recommendations for changes to the
process, if needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
503. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 504. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End
of part)

INDEX PAGE
#

BOARD OF PILOTAGE
COMMISSIONERS................................. 5

COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD................................ 5

DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE....................................... 2

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

DRIVER SERVICES................................................ 10

INFORMATION SYSTEMS............................................. 9

MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES................................. 9

VEHICLE SERVICES............................................... 10

DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

TRANSFERS...................................................... 25

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

AVIATION--PROGRAM F............................................ 11

CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES--PROGRAM U......................... 15

HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM M................................. 13

HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND FACILITIES--PROGRAM
D--OPERATING........ 10

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I........................................ 11

LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z...................................... 19

MARINE--PROGRAM X.............................................. 17

PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P........................................ 13

PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY
PROJECTS)......... 22

PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM V............................... 16

RAIL--PROGRAM Y................................................ 18

TRAFFIC OPERATIONS--PROGRAM Q.................................. 14

TRANSPORTATION ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K................ 12

TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT--PROGRAM S............... 14

TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND
RESEARCH--PROGRAM T......... 15

WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W............... 16

FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD..................... 7

LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM............... 2

LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE............................ 6

MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION..................................... 7

OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR..................................... 2

STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION........................... 2

STATE TREASURER

BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST................................... 23

STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION................................ 23

TRANSFERS...................................................... 24

STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS....................................... 24

TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION....................................... 7

TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD................................ 6

UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION......................... 2

WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND RECREATION

CAPITAL PROJECTS................................................ 3

WASHINGTON STATE PATROL........................................ 21

FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU......................................... 8

SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU......................................... 8

WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION............................ 4

---
END ---