BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART I

TITLE

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. SHORT TITLE. This act may be known and
cited as the personnel system reform act of 2002.

PART II

CIVIL SERVICE REFORM

Sec. 201. RCW 41.06.030 and 1993 c
281 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

A department of
personnel((, governed by the Washington personnel resources board and
administered by a director of personnel,)) is hereby established as a
separate agency within the state government.

Sec. 202. RCW 41.06.150 and 1999 c
297 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall adopt
rules, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter, as now or
hereafter amended, and with the best standards of personnel administration,
regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:

(1) The reduction,
dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an employee;

(2) Certification of
names for vacancies, including departmental promotions, with the number of
names equal to six more names than there are vacancies to be filled, such names
representing applicants rated highest on eligibility lists: PROVIDED, That
when other applicants have scores equal to the lowest score among the names
certified, their names shall also be certified;

(3) Examinations for
all positions in the competitive and noncompetitive service;

(4) Appointments;

(5) Training and career
development;

(6) Probationary
periods of six to twelve months and rejections of probationary employees,
depending on the job requirements of the class, except that entry level state
park rangers shall serve a probationary period of twelve months;

(7) Transfers;

(8) Sick leaves and
vacations;

(9) Hours of work;

(10) Layoffs when
necessary and subsequent reemployment, both according to seniority;

(11) ((Determination
of appropriate bargaining units within any agency: PROVIDED, That in making
such determination the board shall consider the duties, skills, and working
conditions of the employees, the history of collective bargaining by the
employees and their bargaining representatives, the extent of organization
among the employees, and the desires of the employees;

(12) Certification
and decertification of exclusive bargaining representatives: PROVIDED, That)) Collective bargaining procedures:

(a) After
certification of an exclusive bargaining representative and upon the
representative's request, the director shall hold an election among employees
in a bargaining unit to determine by a majority whether to require as a
condition of employment membership in the certified exclusive bargaining
representative on or after the thirtieth day following the beginning of
employment or the date of such election, whichever is the later, and the
failure of an employee to comply with such a condition of employment constitutes
cause for dismissal: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no more often than once in each
twelve-month period after expiration of twelve months following the date of the
original election in a bargaining unit and upon petition of thirty percent of
the members of a bargaining unit the director shall hold an election to
determine whether a majority wish to rescind such condition of employment:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That for purposes of this clause, membership in the certified
exclusive bargaining representative is satisfied by the payment of monthly or
other periodic dues and does not require payment of initiation, reinstatement,
or any other fees or fines and includes full and complete membership rights:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in order to safeguard the right of nonassociation of
public employees, based on bona fide religious tenets or teachings of a church
or religious body of which such public employee is a member, such public
employee shall pay to the union, for purposes within the program of the union
as designated by such employee that would be in harmony with his or her
individual conscience, an amount of money equivalent to regular union dues
minus any included monthly premiums for union-sponsored insurance programs, and
such employee shall not be a member of the union but is entitled to all the
representation rights of a union member;

(((13))) (b)
Agreements between agencies and certified exclusive bargaining representatives
providing for grievance procedures and collective negotiations on all personnel
matters over which the appointing authority of the appropriate bargaining unit
of such agency may lawfully exercise discretion;

(((14))) (c)
Written agreements may contain provisions for payroll deductions of employee
organization dues upon authorization by the employee member and for the
cancellation of such payroll deduction by the filing of a proper prior notice
by the employee with the appointing authority and the employee organization:
PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein permits or grants to any employee the
right to strike or refuse to perform his or her official duties;

(((15))) (d)
A collective bargaining agreement entered into under this subsection before
July 1, 2004, covering employees subject to sections 301 through 314 of this
act, that expires after July 1, 2004, shall remain in full force during its
duration, or until superseded by a collective bargaining agreement entered into
by the parties under sections 301 through 314 of this act. However, an
agreement entered into before July 1, 2004, may not be renewed or extended
beyond July 1, 2005. This subsection (11) does not apply to collective
bargaining negotiations or collective bargaining agreements entered into under
sections 301 through 314 of this act;

(12) Adoption
and revision of a comprehensive classification plan for all positions in the
classified service, based on investigation and analysis of the duties and
responsibilities of each such position.

(a) The board shall not
adopt job classification revisions or class studies unless implementation of
the proposed revision or study will result in net cost savings, increased
efficiencies, or improved management of personnel or services, and the proposed
revision or study has been approved by the director of financial management in accordance
with chapter 43.88 RCW.

(b) ((Beginning July
1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, in addition to the requirements of (a) of this
subsection:

(i) The board may
approve the implementation of salary increases resulting from adjustments to
the classification plan during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium only if:

(A) The
implementation will not result in additional net costs and the proposed
implementation has been approved by the director of financial management in
accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW;

(B) The implementation
will take effect on July 1, 1996, and the total net cost of all such actions
approved by the board for implementation during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium
does not exceed the amounts specified by the legislature specifically for this
purpose; or

(C) The
implementation is a result of emergent conditions. Emergent conditions are
defined as emergency situations requiring the establishment of positions
necessary for the preservation of the public health, safety, or general
welfare, which do not exceed $250,000 of the moneys identified in section
718(2), chapter 18, Laws of 1995 2nd sp. sess.

(ii) The board shall
approve only those salary increases resulting from adjustments to the
classification plan if they are due to documented recruitment and retention
difficulties, salary compression or inversion, increased duties and
responsibilities, or inequities. For these purposes, inequities are defined as
similar work assigned to different job classes with a salary disparity greater
than 7.5 percent.

(iii) Adjustments
made to the higher education hospital special pay plan are exempt from (b)(i)
through (ii) of this subsection.

(c))) Reclassifications, class studies, and salary
adjustments ((to be implemented during the 1997-99 and subsequent fiscal biennia))
are governed by (a) of this subsection and RCW 41.06.152;

(((16))) (13)
Allocation and reallocation of positions within the classification plan;

(((17))) (14)
Adoption and revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the prevailing
rates in Washington state private industries and other governmental units but
the rates in the salary schedules or plans shall be increased if necessary to
attain comparable worth under an implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and
that, for institutions of higher education and related boards, shall be
competitive for positions of a similar nature in the state or the locality in
which an institution of higher education or related board is located, such
adoption and revision subject to approval by the director of financial
management in accordance with the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW;

(((18))) (15)
Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay grade based on
length of service for all employees whose standards of performance are such as
to permit them to retain job status in the classified service;

(((19))) (16)
Optional lump sum relocation compensation approved by the agency director,
whenever it is reasonably necessary that a person make a domiciliary move in
accepting a transfer or other employment with the state. An agency must
provide lump sum compensation within existing resources. If the person
receiving the relocation payment terminates or causes termination with the
state, for reasons other than layoff, disability separation, or other good cause
as determined by an agency director, within one year of the date of the
employment, the state is entitled to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation
from the person;

(((20))) (17)
Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing statutes, with
recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and subsequent reemployment for
veterans and their surviving spouses by giving such eligible veterans and their
surviving spouses additional credit in computing their seniority by adding to
their unbroken state service, as defined by the board, the veteran's service in
the military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section,
"veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active
military service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who
has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability incurred
in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the government and
who, upon termination of such service has received an honorable discharge, a
discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record, or a release from
active military service with evidence of service other than that for which an
undesirable, bad conduct, or dishonorable discharge shall be given: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the surviving spouse of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of
this section regardless of the veteran's length of active military service:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the purposes of this section "veteran"
does not include any person who has voluntarily retired with twenty or more
years of active military service and whose military retirement pay is in excess
of five hundred dollars per month;

(((21))) (18)
Permitting agency heads to delegate the authority to appoint, reduce, dismiss,
suspend, or demote employees within their agencies if such agency heads do not
have specific statutory authority to so delegate: PROVIDED, That the board may
not authorize such delegation to any position lower than the head of a major
subdivision of the agency;

(((22))) (19)
Assuring persons who are or have been employed in classified positions before
July 1, 1993, will be eligible for employment, reemployment, transfer, and
promotion in respect to classified positions covered by this chapter;

(((23))) (20)
Affirmative action in appointment, promotion, transfer, recruitment, training,
and career development; development and implementation of affirmative action
goals and timetables; and monitoring of progress against those goals and
timetables.

The board shall consult
with the human rights commission in the development of rules pertaining to
affirmative action. The department of personnel shall transmit a report
annually to the human rights commission which states the progress each state
agency has made in meeting affirmative action goals and timetables.

Sec. 203. RCW 41.06.150 and 2002 c
. . . s 202 (section 202 of this act) are each amended to read as
follows:

The ((board)) director
shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this
chapter((, as now or hereafter amended,)) and with the best standards of
personnel administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed
for:

(1) ((The reduction,
dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an employee;

(2))) Certification of names for vacancies((,
including departmental promotions, with the number of names equal to six more
names than there are vacancies to be filled, such names representing applicants
rated highest on eligibility lists: PROVIDED, That when other applicants have
scores equal to the lowest score among the names certified, their names shall
also be certified));

(((3))) (2)
Examinations for all positions in the competitive and noncompetitive service;

(((4))) (3)
Appointments;

(((5) Training and
career development;

(6) Probationary
periods of six to twelve months and rejections of probationary employees,
depending on the job requirements of the class, except that entry level state
park rangers shall serve a probationary period of twelve months;

(7) Transfers;

(8) Sick leaves and
vacations;

(9) Hours of work;

(10) Layoffs when
necessary and subsequent reemployment, both according to seniority;

(11) Collective
bargaining procedures:

(a) After
certification of an exclusive bargaining representative and upon the
representative's request, the director shall hold an election among employees
in a bargaining unit to determine by a majority whether to require as a
condition of employment membership in the certified exclusive bargaining
representative on or after the thirtieth day following the beginning of
employment or the date of such election, whichever is the later, and the
failure of an employee to comply with such a condition of employment
constitutes cause for dismissal: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no more often than
once in each twelve-month period after expiration of twelve months following
the date of the original election in a bargaining unit and upon petition of
thirty percent of the members of a bargaining unit the director shall hold an
election to determine whether a majority wish to rescind such condition of
employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for purposes of this clause, membership in
the certified exclusive bargaining representative is satisfied by the payment
of monthly or other periodic dues and does not require payment of initiation,
reinstatement, or any other fees or fines and includes full and complete
membership rights: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in order to safeguard the right
of nonassociation of public employees, based on bona fide religious tenets or
teachings of a church or religious body of which such public employee is a
member, such public employee shall pay to the union, for purposes within the
program of the union as designated by such employee that would be in harmony
with his or her individual conscience, an amount of money equivalent to regular
union dues minus any included monthly premiums for union-sponsored insurance
programs, and such employee shall not be a member of the union but is entitled
to all the representation rights of a union member;

(b) Agreements
between agencies and certified exclusive bargaining representatives providing
for grievance procedures and collective negotiations on all personnel matters
over which the appointing authority of the appropriate bargaining unit of such
agency may lawfully exercise discretion;

(c) Written
agreements may contain provisions for payroll deductions of employee
organization dues upon authorization by the employee member and for the
cancellation of such payroll deduction by the filing of a proper prior notice
by the employee with the appointing authority and the employee organization:
PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein permits or grants to any employee the
right to strike or refuse to perform his or her official duties;

(d) A collective
bargaining agreement entered into under this subsection before July 1, 2002,
covering employees subject to sections 301 through 314 of this act, that
expires after July 1, 2002, shall remain in full force during its duration, or
until superseded by a collective bargaining agreement entered into by the
parties under sections 301 through 314 of this act. However, an agreement
entered into before July 1, 2002, may not be renewed or extended beyond July 1,
2003. This subsection (11) does not apply to collective bargaining
negotiations or collective bargaining agreements entered into under sections
301 through 314 of this act;

(12))) (4) Adoption and revision of a
comprehensive classification plan, in accordance with rules adopted by the
board under section 205 of this act, for all positions in the classified
service, based on investigation and analysis of the duties and responsibilities
of each such position and allocation and reallocation of positions within
the classification plan.

(a) The ((board))
director shall not adopt job classification revisions or class studies
unless implementation of the proposed revision or study will result in net cost
savings, increased efficiencies, or improved management of personnel or
services, and the proposed revision or study has been approved by the director
of financial management in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.

(b) Reclassifications,
class studies, and salary adjustments are governed by (a) of this subsection
and RCW 41.06.152;

(((13) Allocation
and reallocation of positions within the classification plan;

(14) Adoption and
revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the prevailing rates in
Washington state private industries and other governmental units but the rates
in the salary schedules or plans shall be increased if necessary to attain
comparable worth under an implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and that, for
institutions of higher education and related boards, shall be competitive for
positions of a similar nature in the state or the locality in which an
institution of higher education or related board is located, such adoption and
revision subject to approval by the director of financial management in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW;

(15) Increment
increases within the series of steps for each pay grade based on length of
service for all employees whose standards of performance are such as to permit
them to retain job status in the classified service;

(16) Optional lump
sum relocation compensation approved by the agency director, whenever it is
reasonably necessary that a person make a domiciliary move in accepting a
transfer or other employment with the state. An agency must provide lump sum
compensation within existing resources. If the person receiving the relocation
payment terminates or causes termination with the state, for reasons other than
layoff, disability separation, or other good cause as determined by an agency
director, within one year of the date of the employment, the state is entitled
to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the person;

(17) Providing for
veteran's preference as required by existing statutes, with recognition of
preference in regard to layoffs and subsequent reemployment for veterans and
their surviving spouses by giving such eligible veterans and their surviving
spouses additional credit in computing their seniority by adding to their
unbroken state service, as defined by the board, the veteran's service in the
military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section,
"veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active
military service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who
has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability incurred
in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the government and
who, upon termination of such service has received an honorable discharge, a
discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record, or a release from
active military service with evidence of service other than that for which an
undesirable, bad conduct, or dishonorable discharge shall be given: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the surviving spouse of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of
this section regardless of the veteran's length of active military service:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the purposes of this section "veteran"
does not include any person who has voluntarily retired with twenty or more
years of active military service and whose military retirement pay is in excess
of five hundred dollars per month;

(18))) (5) Permitting agency heads to delegate
the authority to appoint, reduce, dismiss, suspend, or demote employees within
their agencies if such agency heads do not have specific statutory authority to
so delegate: PROVIDED, That the ((board)) director may not
authorize such delegation to any position lower than the head of a major
subdivision of the agency;

(((19))) (6)
Assuring persons who are or have been employed in classified positions before
July 1, 1993, will be eligible for employment, reemployment, transfer, and
promotion in respect to classified positions covered by this chapter;

(((20))) (7)
Affirmative action in appointment, promotion, transfer, recruitment, training,
and career development; development and implementation of affirmative action
goals and timetables; and monitoring of progress against those goals and
timetables.

The ((board)) director
shall consult with the human rights commission in the development of rules
pertaining to affirmative action. The department of personnel shall transmit a
report annually to the human rights commission which states the progress each
state agency has made in meeting affirmative action goals and timetables.

Rules adopted under
this section by the director shall provide for local administration and
management by the institutions of higher education and related boards, subject
to periodic audit and review by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

The director shall
adopt rules, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter and
with the best standards of personnel administration, regarding the basis and
procedures to be followed for:

(1) The reduction,
dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an employee;

(2) Training and career
development;

(3) Probationary
periods of six to twelve months and rejections of probationary employees,
depending on the job requirements of the class, except that entry level state
park rangers shall serve a probationary period of twelve months;

(4) Transfers;

(5) Promotional
preferences;

(6) Sick leaves and
vacations;

(7) Hours of work;

(8) Layoffs when
necessary and subsequent reemployment, except for the financial basis for
layoffs;

(9) The number of names
to be certified for vacancies;

(10) Adoption and
revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the prevailing rates in
Washington state private industries and other governmental units. The rates in
the salary schedules or plans shall be increased if necessary to attain
comparable worth under an implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and, for
institutions of higher education and related boards, shall be competitive for
positions of a similar nature in the state or the locality in which an
institution of higher education or related board is located. Such adoption and
revision is subject to approval by the director of financial management in
accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW;

(11) Increment
increases within the series of steps for each pay grade based on length of
service for all employees whose standards of performance are such as to permit
them to retain job status in the classified service;

(12) Optional lump sum
relocation compensation approved by the agency director, whenever it is
reasonably necessary that a person make a domiciliary move in accepting a
transfer or other employment with the state. An agency must provide lump sum
compensation within existing resources. If the person receiving the relocation
payment terminates or causes termination with the state, for reasons other than
layoff, disability separation, or other good cause as determined by an agency
director, within one year of the date of the employment, the state is entitled
to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the person;

(13) Providing for
veteran's preference as required by existing statutes, with recognition of
preference in regard to layoffs and subsequent reemployment for veterans and
their surviving spouses by giving such eligible veterans and their surviving
spouses additional credit in computing their seniority by adding to their
unbroken state service, as defined by the director, the veteran's service in
the military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section,
"veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active
military service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who
has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability incurred
in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the government and
who, upon termination of such service, has received an honorable discharge, a
discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record, or a release from
active military service with evidence of service other than that for which an
undesirable, bad conduct, or dishonorable discharge shall be given. However,
the surviving spouse of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of this section
regardless of the veteran's length of active military service. For the purposes
of this section, "veteran" does not include any person who has
voluntarily retired with twenty or more years of active military service and
whose military retirement pay is in excess of five hundred dollars per month.

Rules adopted under
this section by the director shall provide for local administration and
management by the institutions of higher education and related boards, subject
to periodic audit and review by the director.

Rules adopted by the
director under this section may be superseded by the provisions of a collective
bargaining agreement negotiated under sections 301 through 314 of this act.
The supersession of such rules shall only affect employees in the respective
collective bargaining units.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
205. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
conduct a comprehensive review of all rules in effect on the effective date of
this section governing the classification, allocation, and reallocation of
positions within the classified service. In conducting this review, the board
shall consult with state agencies, institutions of higher education, employee
organizations, and members of the general public. The department shall assist
the board in the conduct of this review, which shall be completed by the board
no later than July 1, 2003.

(2) By March 15, 2004,
the board shall adopt new rules governing the classification, allocation, and
reallocation of positions in the classified service. In adopting such rules,
the board shall adhere to the following goals:

(a) To improve the
effectiveness and efficiency of the delivery of services to the citizens of the
state through the use of current personnel management processes and to promote
a workplace where the overall focus is on the recipient of governmental
services;

(b) To develop a
simplified classification system that will substantially reduce the number of
job classifications in the classified service and facilitate the most effective
use of the state personnel resources;

(c) To develop a
classification system to permit state agencies to respond flexibly to changing
technologies, economic and social conditions, and the needs of its citizens;

(d) To value workplace
diversity;

(e) To facilitate the
reorganization and decentralization of governmental services; and

(f) To enhance mobility
and career advancement opportunities.

(3) Rules adopted by
the board under subsection (2) of this section shall permit an appointing
authority and an employee organization representing classified employees of the
appointing authority for collective bargaining purposes to make a joint request
for the initiation of a classification study.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
206. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

In accordance with
rules adopted by the board under section 205 of this act, the director shall,
by January 1, 2005, begin to implement a new classification system for
positions in the classified service. Any employee who believes that the
director has incorrectly applied the rules of the board in determining a job
classification for a job held by that employee may appeal the director's
decision to the board by filing a notice in writing within thirty days of the
action from which the appeal is taken. Decisions of the board concerning such
appeals are final and not subject to further appeal.

Sec. 207. RCW 41.06.022 and 1993 c
281 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this
chapter, "manager" means any employee who:

(1) Formulates
statewide policy or directs the work of an agency or agency subdivision;

(2) Is responsible to
administer one or more statewide policies or programs of an agency or agency
subdivision;

(3) Manages, administers,
and controls a local branch office of an agency or agency subdivision,
including the physical, financial, or personnel resources;

(4) Has substantial
responsibility in personnel administration, legislative relations, public
information, or the preparation and administration of budgets; or

(5) Functionally is
above the first level of supervision and exercises authority that is not merely
routine or clerical in nature and requires the consistent use of independent
judgment.

No employee who is a
member of the Washington management service may be included in a collective
bargaining unit established under sections 301 through 314 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
208. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any department,
agency, or institution of higher education may purchase services, including
services that have been customarily and historically provided by employees in
the classified service under this chapter, by contracting with individuals,
nonprofit organizations, businesses, employee business units, or other entities
if the following criteria are met:

(a) The invitation for
bid or request for proposal contains measurable standards for the performance
of the contract;

(b) Employees in the
classified service whose positions or work would be displaced by the contract
are provided an opportunity to offer alternatives to purchasing services by
contract and, if these alternatives are not accepted, compete for the contract
under competitive contracting procedures in subsection (4) of this section;

(c) The contract with
an entity other than an employee business unit includes a provision requiring
the entity to consider employment of state employees who may be displaced by
the contract;

(d) The department,
agency, or institution of higher education has established a contract
monitoring process to measure contract performance, costs, service delivery
quality, and other contract standards, and to cancel contracts that do not meet
those standards; and

(e) The department,
agency, or institution of higher education has demonstrated that the contract
results in savings or efficiency improvements. The contracting agency must
consider the consequences and potential mitigation of improper or failed
performance by the contractor.

(2) Any provision
contrary to or in conflict with this section in any collective bargaining
agreement in effect on the effective date of this section is not effective beyond
the expiration date of the agreement.

(3) Contracting for
services that was authorized by law prior to the effective date of this section
shall not be subject to the processes set forth in subsections (1) and (4)
through (6) of this section.

(4) Competitive
contracting shall be implemented as follows:

(a) At least ninety
days prior to the date the contracting agency requests bids from private
entities for a contract for services provided by classified employees, the
contracting agency shall notify the classified employees whose positions or
work would be displaced by the contract. The employees shall have sixty days
from the date of notification to offer alternatives to purchasing services by
contract, and the agency shall consider the alternatives before requesting
bids.

(b) If the employees
decide to compete for the contract, they shall notify the contracting agency of
their decision. Employees must form one or more employee business units for
the purpose of submitting a bid or bids to perform the services.

(c) The director of
personnel, with the advice and assistance of the department of general
administration, shall develop and make available to employee business units
training in the bidding process and general bid preparation.

(d) The director of
general administration, with the advice and assistance of the department of
personnel, shall, by rule, establish procedures to ensure that bids are
submitted and evaluated in a fair and objective manner and that there exists a
competitive market for the service. Such rules shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) Prohibitions against participation in the bid evaluation
process by employees who prepared the business unit's bid or who perform any of
the services to be contracted; (ii) provisions to ensure no bidder receives an
advantage over other bidders and that bid requirements are applied equitably to
all parties; and (iii) procedures that require the contracting agency to
receive complaints regarding the bidding process and to consider them before
awarding the contract. Appeal of an agency's actions under this subsection is
an adjudicative proceeding and subject to the applicable provisions of chapter
34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, with the final decision to be
rendered by an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW.

(e) An employee
business unit's bid must include the fully allocated costs of the service,
including the cost of the employees' salaries and benefits, space, equipment,
materials, and other costs necessary to perform the function. An employee
business unit's cost shall not include the state's indirect overhead costs
unless those costs can be attributed directly to the function in question and
would not exist if that function were not performed in state service.

(f) A department,
agency, or institution of higher education may contract with the department of
general administration to conduct the bidding process.

(5) As used in this
section:

(a) "Employee
business unit" means a group of employees who perform services to be
contracted under this section and who submit a bid for the performance of those
services under subsection (4) of this section.

(b) "Indirect
overhead costs" means the pro rata share of existing agency administrative
salaries and benefits, and rent, equipment costs, utilities, and materials
associated with those administrative functions.

(c) "Competitive
contracting" means the process by which classified employees of a
department, agency, or institution of higher education compete with businesses,
individuals, nonprofit organizations, or other entities for contracts
authorized by subsection (1) of this section.

(6) The joint
legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a performance audit of the
implementation of this section, including the adequacy of the appeals process
in subsection (4)(d) of this section, and report to the legislature by January
1, 2007, on the results of the audit.

Sec. 209. RCW 41.06.070 and 1998 c
245 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply to:

(a) The members of the
legislature or to any employee of, or position in, the legislative branch of
the state government including members, officers, and employees of the
legislative council, joint legislative audit and review committee, statute law
committee, and any interim committee of the legislature;

(b) The justices of the
supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of the superior courts or
of the inferior courts, or to any employee of, or position in the judicial
branch of state government;

(c) Officers, academic
personnel, and employees of technical colleges;

(d) The officers of the
Washington state patrol;

(e) Elective officers
of the state;

(f) The chief executive
officer of each agency;

(g) In the departments
of employment security and social and health services, the director and the
director's confidential secretary; in all other departments, the executive head
of which is an individual appointed by the governor, the director, his or her
confidential secretary, and his or her statutory assistant directors;

(h) In the case of a
multimember board, commission, or committee, whether the members thereof are
elected, appointed by the governor or other authority, serve ex officio, or are
otherwise chosen:

(i) All members of such
boards, commissions, or committees;

(ii) If the members of
the board, commission, or committee serve on a part-time basis and there is a
statutory executive officer: The secretary of the board, commission, or
committee; the chief executive officer of the board, commission, or committee;
and the confidential secretary of the chief executive officer of the board,
commission, or committee;

(iii) If the members of
the board, commission, or committee serve on a full-time basis: The chief
executive officer or administrative officer as designated by the board,
commission, or committee; and a confidential secretary to the chair of the
board, commission, or committee;

(iv) If all members of
the board, commission, or committee serve ex officio: The chief executive
officer; and the confidential secretary of such chief executive officer;

(i) The confidential
secretaries and administrative assistants in the immediate offices of the
elective officers of the state;

(j) Assistant attorneys
general;

(k) Commissioned and
enlisted personnel in the military service of the state;

(l) Inmate, student,
part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as
defined by the Washington personnel resources board;

(m) The public printer
or to any employees of or positions in the state printing plant;

(n) Officers and
employees of the Washington state fruit commission;

(o) Officers and employees
of the Washington state apple advertising commission;

(p) Officers and
employees of the Washington state dairy products commission;

(q) Officers and
employees of the Washington tree fruit research commission;

(r) Officers and
employees of the Washington state beef commission;

(s) Officers and
employees of any commission formed under chapter 15.66 RCW;

(t) ((Officers and
employees of the state wheat commission formed under chapter 15.63 RCW;

(u))) Officers and employees of agricultural
commissions formed under chapter 15.65 RCW;

(((v))) (u)
Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed under chapter 67.40
RCW;

(((w))) (v)
Executive assistants for personnel administration and labor relations in all
state agencies employing such executive assistants including but not limited to
all departments, offices, commissions, committees, boards, or other bodies
subject to the provisions of this chapter and this subsection shall prevail
over any provision of law inconsistent herewith unless specific exception is
made in such law;

(((x))) (w)
In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy agency heads, assistant
directors or division directors, and not more than three principal policy assistants
who report directly to the agency head or deputy agency heads;

(((y))) (x)
All employees of the marine employees' commission;

(((z) Up to a total
of five senior staff positions of the western library network under chapter
27.26 RCW responsible for formulating policy or for directing program
management of a major administrative unit. This subsection (1)(z) shall expire
on June 30, 1997;

(aa))) (y) Staff employed by the department of
community, trade, and economic development to administer energy policy
functions and manage energy site evaluation council activities under RCW
43.21F.045(2)(m);

(((bb))) (z)
Staff employed by Washington State University to administer energy education,
applied research, and technology transfer programs under RCW 43.21F.045 as
provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5).

(2) The following
classifications, positions, and employees of institutions of higher education
and related boards are hereby exempted from coverage of this chapter:

(a) Members of the
governing board of each institution of higher education and related boards, all
presidents, vice-presidents, and their confidential secretaries,
administrative, and personal assistants; deans, directors, and chairs; academic
personnel; and executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions
employed by institutions of higher education; principal assistants to executive
heads of major administrative or academic divisions; other managerial or
professional employees in an institution or related board having substantial
responsibility for directing or controlling program operations and accountable
for allocation of resources and program results, or for the formulation of
institutional policy, or for carrying out personnel administration or labor
relations functions, legislative relations, public information, development,
senior computer systems and network programming, or internal audits and
investigations; and any employee of a community college district whose place of
work is one which is physically located outside the state of Washington and who
is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned to an educational program
operating outside of the state of Washington;

(b) ((Student,
part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as
defined by the Washington personnel resources board, employed by institutions
of higher education and related boards;

(c))) The governing board of each institution, and
related boards, may also exempt from this chapter classifications involving
research activities, counseling of students, extension or continuing education
activities, graphic arts or publications activities requiring prescribed
academic preparation or special training as determined by the board: PROVIDED,
That no nonacademic employee engaged in office, clerical, maintenance, or food
and trade services may be exempted by the board under this provision;

(((d))) (c)
Printing craft employees in the department of printing at the University of
Washington.

(3) In addition to the
exemptions specifically provided by this chapter, the ((Washington personnel
resources board)) director of personnel may provide for further
exemptions pursuant to the following procedures. The governor or other
appropriate elected official may submit requests for exemption to the ((Washington
personnel resources board)) director of personnel stating the
reasons for requesting such exemptions. The ((Washington personnel
resources board)) director of personnel shall hold a public hearing,
after proper notice, on requests submitted pursuant to this subsection. If the
((board)) director determines that the position for which
exemption is requested is one involving substantial responsibility for the
formulation of basic agency or executive policy or one involving directing and
controlling program operations of an agency or a major administrative division
thereof, the ((Washington personnel resources board)) director of
personnel shall grant the request and such determination shall be final as
to any decision made before July 1, 1993. The total number of additional
exemptions permitted under this subsection shall not exceed one percent of the
number of employees in the classified service not including employees of
institutions of higher education and related boards for those agencies not
directly under the authority of any elected public official other than the
governor, and shall not exceed a total of twenty-five for all agencies under
the authority of elected public officials other than the governor.

The salary and fringe
benefits of all positions presently or hereafter exempted except for the chief
executive officer of each agency, full-time members of boards and commissions,
administrative assistants and confidential secretaries in the immediate office
of an elected state official, and the personnel listed in subsections (1)(j)
through (((v), (y), (z),)) (u) and (x) and (2) of this section,
shall be determined by the ((Washington personnel resources board)) director
of personnel. ((However, beginning with changes proposed for the
1997-99 fiscal biennium,)) Changes to the classification plan
affecting exempt salaries must meet the same provisions for classified salary
increases resulting from adjustments to the classification plan as outlined in
RCW 41.06.152.

Any person holding a
classified position subject to the provisions of this chapter shall, when and
if such position is subsequently exempted from the application of this chapter,
be afforded the following rights: If such person previously held permanent
status in another classified position, such person shall have a right of
reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a position of
similar nature and salary.

Any classified employee
having civil service status in a classified position who accepts an appointment
in an exempt position shall have the right of reversion to the highest class of
position previously held, or to a position of similar nature and salary.

A person occupying an
exempt position who is terminated from the position for gross misconduct or
malfeasance does not have the right of reversion to a classified position as
provided for in this section.

Sec. 210. RCW 41.06.110 and 1993 c
281 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
created a Washington personnel resources board composed of three members
appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the senate. The members
of the personnel board serving June 30, 1993, shall be the members of the
Washington personnel resources board, and they shall complete their terms as
under the personnel board. Each odd-numbered year thereafter the governor
shall appoint a member for a six-year term. Each member shall continue to hold
office after the expiration of the member's term until a successor has been
appointed. Persons so appointed shall have clearly demonstrated an interest
and belief in the merit principle, shall not hold any other employment with the
state, shall not have been an officer of a political party for a period of one
year immediately prior to such appointment, and shall not be or become a
candidate for partisan elective public office during the term to which they are
appointed;

(2) Each member of the
board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250. The members of
the board may receive any number of daily payments for official meetings of the
board actually attended. Members of the board shall also be reimbursed for
travel expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) At its first
meeting following the appointment of all of its members, and annually
thereafter, the board shall elect a chair and vice-chair from among its members
to serve one year. The presence of at least two members of the board shall
constitute a quorum to transact business. A written public record shall be
kept by the board of all actions of the board. The director of personnel
shall serve as secretary.

(4) The board may
appoint and compensate hearing officers to hear and conduct appeals ((until
December 31, 1982)). Such compensation shall be paid on a contractual
basis for each hearing, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW
and rules adopted pursuant thereto, as they relate to personal service
contracts.

Sec. 211. RCW 41.06.160 and 1993 c
281 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

In preparing
classification and salary schedules as set forth in RCW 41.06.150 ((as now
or hereafter amended)) the department of personnel shall give full
consideration to prevailing rates in other public employment and in private
employment in this state. For this purpose the department shall undertake
comprehensive salary and fringe benefit surveys((, with such surveys to be
conducted in the year prior to the convening of every other one hundred five
day regular session of the state legislature. In the year prior to the
convening of each one hundred five day regular session during which a
comprehensive salary and fringe benefit survey is not conducted, the department
shall plan and conduct a trend salary and fringe benefit survey. This survey
shall measure average salary and fringe benefit movement for broad occupational
groups which has occurred since the last comprehensive salary and fringe
benefit survey was conducted. The results of each comprehensive and trend
salary and fringe benefit survey shall be completed and forwarded by September
30 with a recommended state salary schedule to the governor and director of
financial management for their use in preparing budgets to be submitted to the
succeeding legislature. A copy of the data and supporting documentation shall
be furnished by the department of personnel to the standing committees for
appropriations of the senate and house of representatives.

In the case of
comprehensive salary and fringe benefit surveys, the department shall furnish
the following supplementary data in support of its recommended salary schedule:

(1) A total dollar
figure which reflects the recommended increase or decrease in state salaries as
a direct result of the specific salary and fringe benefit survey that has been
conducted and which is categorized to indicate what portion of the increase or
decrease is represented by salary survey data and what portion is represented
by fringe benefit survey data;

(2) An additional
total dollar figure which reflects the impact of recommended increases or
decreases to state salaries based on other factors rather than directly on
prevailing rate data obtained through the survey process and which is
categorized to indicate the sources of the requests for deviation from
prevailing rates and the reasons for the changes;

(3) A list of class
codes and titles indicating recommended monthly salary ranges for all state
classes under the control of the department of personnel with those salary
ranges which do not substantially conform to the prevailing rates developed
from the salary and fringe benefit survey distinctly marked and an explanation
of the reason for the deviation included;

(4) A supplemental
salary schedule which indicates the additional salary to be paid state
employees for hazardous duties or other considerations requiring extra
compensation under specific circumstances. Additional compensation for these
circumstances shall not be included in the basic salary schedule but shall be
maintained as a separate pay schedule for purposes of full disclosure and
visibility; and

(5) A supplemental
salary schedule which indicates those cases where the board determines that
prevailing rates do not provide similar salaries for positions that require or
impose similar responsibilities, judgment, knowledge, skills, and working
conditions. This supplementary salary schedule shall contain proposed salary
adjustments necessary to eliminate any such dissimilarities in compensation.
Additional compensation needed to eliminate such salary dissimilarities shall
not be included in the basic salary schedule but shall be maintained as a
separate salary schedule for purposes of full disclosure and visibility.

It is the intention
of the legislature that requests for funds to support recommendations for
salary deviations from the prevailing rate survey data shall be kept to a
minimum, and that the requests be fully documented when forwarded by the
department of personnel)).

Salary and fringe
benefit survey information collected from private employers which identifies a
specific employer with the salary and fringe benefit rates which that employer
pays to its employees shall not be subject to public disclosure under chapter
42.17 RCW.

((The first
comprehensive salary and fringe benefit survey required by this section shall
be completed and forwarded to the governor and the director of financial
management by September 30, 1986. The first trend salary and fringe benefit
survey required by this section shall be completed and forwarded to the
governor and the director of financial management by September 30, 1988.))

Sec. 212. RCW 41.06.167 and 1991 c
196 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
personnel shall undertake comprehensive compensation surveys for officers and
entry-level officer candidates of the Washington state patrol, with such
surveys to be conducted in the year prior to the convening of every other one
hundred five day regular session of the state legislature. ((In the year
prior to the convening of each one hundred five day regular session during
which a comprehensive compensation survey is not conducted, the department
shall conduct a trend compensation survey. This survey shall measure average
compensation movement which has occurred since the last comprehensive
compensation survey was conducted. The results of each comprehensive and trend
survey shall be completed and forwarded by September 30th, after review and
preparation of recommendations by the chief of the Washington state patrol, to
the governor and director of financial management for their use in preparing
budgets to be submitted to the succeeding legislature. A copy of the data and
supporting documentation shall be furnished by the department of personnel to
the legislative transportation committee and the standing committees for
appropriations of the senate and house of representatives. The office of
financial management shall analyze the survey results and conduct
investigations which may be necessary to arbitrate differences between interested
parties regarding the accuracy of collected survey data and the use of such
data for salary adjustment.

Surveys conducted by
the department of personnel for the Washington state patrol shall be undertaken
in a manner consistent with statistically accurate sampling techniques,
including comparisons of medians, base ranges, and weighted averages of
salaries. The surveys shall compare competitive labor markets of law
enforcement officers. This service performed by the department of personnel
shall be on a reimbursable basis in accordance with the provisions of RCW
41.06.080.

A comprehensive
compensation survey plan and the recommendations of the chief of the Washington
state patrol shall be submitted jointly by the department of personnel and the Washington
state patrol to the director of financial management, the legislative
transportation committee, the committee on ways and means of the senate, and
the committee on appropriations of the house of representatives six months
before the beginning of each periodic survey.)) Salary and fringe benefit survey information collected from
private employers which identifies a specific employer with the salary and
fringe benefit rates which that employer pays to its employees shall not be
subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.

Sec. 213. RCW 41.06.170 and 1993 c
281 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((board or))
director, in the adoption of rules governing suspensions for cause, shall not
authorize an appointing authority to suspend an employee for more than fifteen
calendar days as a single penalty or more than thirty calendar days in any one
calendar year as an accumulation of several penalties. The ((board or))
director shall require that the appointing authority give written notice to the
employee not later than one day after the suspension takes effect, stating the
reasons for and the duration thereof.

(2) Any employee who is
reduced, dismissed, suspended, or demoted, after completing his or her
probationary period of service as provided by the rules of the ((board))
director, or any employee who is adversely affected by a violation of
the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, or rules adopted under it,
shall have the right to appeal ((to the personnel appeals board created by
RCW 41.64.010)), either individually or through his or her authorized
representative, not later than thirty days after the effective date of such
action to the personnel appeals board through June 30, 2005, and to the
Washington personnel resources board after June 30, 2005. The employee
shall be furnished with specified charges in writing when a reduction,
dismissal, suspension, or demotion action is taken. Such appeal shall be in
writing. Decisions of the Washington personnel resources board on appeals
filed after June 30, 2005, shall be final and not subject to further appeal.

(3) Any employee whose
position has been exempted after July 1, 1993, shall have the right to appeal
((to the personnel appeals board created by RCW 41.64.010)), either
individually or through his or her authorized representative, not later
than thirty days after the effective date of such action to the personnel
appeals board through June 30, 2005, and to the Washington personnel resources
board after June 30, 2005.

(4) An employee
incumbent in a position at the time of its allocation or reallocation, or the
agency utilizing the position, may appeal the allocation or reallocation to the
personnel appeals board ((created by RCW 41.64.010)) through December
31, 2005, and to the Washington personnel resources board after December 31,
2005. Notice of such appeal must be filed in writing within thirty days of
the action from which appeal is taken.

(5) Subsections (1)
and (2) of this section do not apply to any employee who is subject to the
provisions of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under sections 301
through 314 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
214. The transfer of the
powers, duties, and functions of the personnel appeals board to the personnel
resources board under section 233 of this act and the transfer of jurisdiction
for appeals filed under section 213, chapter . . ., Laws of 2002 (section
213 of this act) after June 30, 2005, shall not affect the right of an
appellant to have an appeal filed on or before June 30, 2005, resolved by the
personnel appeals board in accordance with the authorities, rules, and
procedures that were established under chapter 41.64 RCW as it existed before
the effective date of this section.

Sec. 215. RCW 41.06.186 and 1993 c
281 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((Washington
personnel resources board)) director shall adopt rules designed to
terminate the state employment of any employee whose performance is so
inadequate as to warrant termination.

Sec. 216. RCW 41.06.196 and 1993 c
281 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((Washington personnel
resources board)) director shall adopt rules designed to remove from
supervisory positions those supervisors who in violation of the rules adopted
under RCW 41.06.186 have tolerated the continued employment of employees under
their supervision whose performance has warranted termination from state
employment.

Sec. 217. RCW 41.06.270 and 1979 c
151 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

A disbursing officer
shall not pay any employee holding a position covered by this chapter unless
the employment is in accordance with this chapter or the rules, regulations and
orders issued hereunder. The ((board and the)) directors of personnel
and financial management shall jointly establish procedures for the
certification of payrolls.

Sec. 218. RCW 41.06.350 and 1993 c
281 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((Washington
personnel resources board)) director is authorized to receive
federal funds now available or hereafter made available for the assistance and
improvement of public personnel administration, which may be expended in
addition to the department of personnel service fund established by RCW
41.06.280.

Sec. 219. RCW 41.06.400 and 1980 c
118 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to
other powers and duties specified in this chapter, the ((board)) director
shall, by rule, prescribe the purpose and minimum standards for training and
career development programs and, in so doing, regularly consult with and
consider the needs of individual agencies and employees.

(2) In addition to
other powers and duties specified in this chapter, the director shall:

(a) Provide for the
evaluation of training and career development programs and plans of agencies ((based
on minimum standards established by the board)). The director shall report
the results of such evaluations to the agency which is the subject of the
evaluation;

(b) Provide training
and career development programs which may be conducted more efficiently and
economically on an interagency basis;

(c) Promote interagency
sharing of resources for training and career development;

(d) Monitor and review
the impact of training and career development programs to ensure that the
responsibilities of the state to provide equal employment opportunities are
diligently carried out. ((The director shall report to the board the impact
of training and career development programs on the fulfillment of such
responsibilities.))

(3) At an agency's
request, the director may provide training and career development programs for
an agency's internal use which may be conducted more efficiently and
economically by the department of personnel.

Sec. 220. RCW 41.06.410 and 1980 c
118 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Each agency subject to
the provisions of this chapter shall:

(1) Prepare an employee
training and career development plan which shall at least meet minimum
standards established by the ((board)) director. A copy of such
plan shall be submitted to the director for purposes of administering the
provisions of RCW 41.06.400(2);

(2) Provide for
training and career development for its employees in accordance with the agency
plan;

(3) Report on its
training and career development program operations and costs to the director in
accordance with reporting procedures adopted by the ((board)) director;

(4) Budget for training
and career development in accordance with procedures of the office of financial
management.

Sec. 221. RCW 41.06.450 and 1993 c
281 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((By January 1,
1983, the Washington personnel resources board)) The director shall
adopt rules applicable to each agency to ensure that information relating to
employee misconduct or alleged misconduct is destroyed or maintained as
follows:

(a) All such
information determined to be false and all such information in situations where
the employee has been fully exonerated of wrongdoing, shall be promptly
destroyed;

(b) All such
information having no reasonable bearing on the employee's job performance or
on the efficient and effective management of the agency, shall be promptly
destroyed;

(c) All other
information shall be retained only so long as it has a reasonable bearing on
the employee's job performance or on the efficient and effective management of
the agency.

(2) Notwithstanding
subsection (1) of this section, an agency may retain information relating to
employee misconduct or alleged misconduct if:

(a) The employee
requests that the information be retained; or

(b) The information is
related to pending legal action or legal action may be reasonably expected to
result.

(3) In adopting rules
under this section, the ((Washington personnel resources board)) director
shall consult with the public disclosure commission to ensure that the public
policy of the state, as expressed in chapter 42.17 RCW, is adequately
protected.

Sec. 222. RCW 41.06.475 and 1993 c
281 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((Washington
personnel resources board)) director shall adopt rules, in
cooperation with the secretary of social and health services, for the
background investigation of persons being considered for state employment in
positions directly responsible for the supervision, care, or treatment of
children or developmentally disabled persons.

Sec. 223. RCW 41.06.490 and 1990 c
204 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the
rules adopted under RCW 41.06.150, the ((board)) director shall
adopt rules establishing a state employee return-to-work program. The program
shall, at a minimum:

(a) Direct each agency
to adopt a return-to-work policy. The program shall allow each agency program
to take into consideration the special nature of employment in the agency;

(b) Provide for
eligibility in the return-to-work program, for a minimum of two years from the
date the temporary disability commenced, for any permanent employee who is
receiving compensation under RCW 51.32.090 and who is, by reason of his or her
temporary disability, unable to return to his or her previous work, but who is
physically capable of carrying out work of a lighter or modified nature;

(c) Allow opportunity
for return-to-work statewide when appropriate job classifications are not
available in the agency that is the appointing authority at the time of injury;

(d) Require each agency
to name an agency representative responsible for coordinating the
return-to-work program of the agency;

(e) Provide that
applicants receiving appointments for classified service receive an explanation
of the return-to-work policy;

(f) Require training of
supervisors on implementation of the return-to-work policy, including but not
limited to assessment of the appropriateness of the return-to-work job for the
employee; and

(g) Coordinate
participation of applicable employee assistance programs, as appropriate.

(2) The agency
full-time equivalents necessary to implement the return-to-work program
established under this section shall be used only for the purposes of the
return-to-work program and the net increase in full-time equivalents shall be
temporary.

Sec. 224. RCW 28B.12.060 and 1994
c 130 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The higher education
coordinating board shall adopt rules as may be necessary or appropriate for
effecting the provisions of this chapter, and not in conflict with this
chapter, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the state
higher education administrative procedure act. Such rules shall include
provisions designed to make employment under the work-study program reasonably
available, to the extent of available funds, to all eligible students in
eligible post-secondary institutions in need thereof. The rules shall include:

(1) Providing work
under the state work-study program that will not result in the displacement of
employed workers or impair existing contracts for services;

(2) Furnishing work
only to a student who:

(a) Is capable, in the
opinion of the eligible institution, of maintaining good standing in such
course of study while employed under the program covered by the agreement; and

(b) Has been accepted
for enrollment as at least a half-time student at the eligible institution or,
in the case of a student already enrolled in and attending the eligible
institution, is in good standing and in at least half-time attendance there
either as an undergraduate, graduate or professional student; and

(c) Is not pursuing a
degree in theology;

(3) Placing priority on
providing:

(a) Work opportunities
for students who are residents of the state of Washington as defined in RCW
28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013 except resident students defined in RCW
28B.15.012(2)(((e))) (f);

(b) Job placements in
fields related to each student's academic or vocational pursuits, with an
emphasis on off-campus job placements whenever appropriate; and

(c) Off-campus
community service placements;

(4) Provisions to
assure that in the state institutions of higher education, utilization of this
work-study program:

(a) Shall only
supplement and not supplant classified positions under jurisdiction of chapter
41.06 RCW;

(b) That all positions
established which are comparable shall be identified to a job classification
under the ((Washington personnel resources board's)) director of
personnel's classification plan and shall receive equal compensation;

(c) Shall not take
place in any manner that would replace classified positions reduced due to lack
of funds or work; and

(d) That work study
positions shall only be established at entry level positions of the classified
service unless the overall scope and responsibilities of the position indicate
a higher level; and

(5) Provisions to
encourage job placements in occupations that meet Washington's economic
development goals, especially those in international trade and international
relations. The board shall permit appropriate job placements in other states
and other countries.

Sec. 225. RCW 34.05.030 and 1994 c
39 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter shall
not apply to:

(a) The state militia,
or

(b) The board of
clemency and pardons, or

(c) The department of
corrections or the indeterminate sentencing review board with respect to
persons who are in their custody or are subject to the jurisdiction of those
agencies.

(2) The provisions of
RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 shall not apply:

(a) To adjudicative
proceedings of the board of industrial insurance appeals except as provided in
RCW 7.68.110 and 51.48.131;

(b) Except for actions
pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, to the denial, suspension, or revocation of a
driver's license by the department of licensing;

(c) To the department
of labor and industries where another statute expressly provides for review of
adjudicative proceedings of a department action, order, decision, or award
before the board of industrial insurance appeals;

(d) To actions of the
Washington personnel resources board((,)) or the director of
personnel((, or the personnel appeals board)); or

(e) To the extent they
are inconsistent with any provisions of chapter 43.43 RCW.

(3) Unless a party
makes an election for a formal hearing pursuant to RCW 82.03.140 or 82.03.190,
RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 do not apply to a review hearing conducted by
the board of tax appeals.

(4) The rule-making
provisions of this chapter do not apply to reimbursement unit values, fee
schedules, arithmetic conversion factors, and similar arithmetic factors used
to determine payment rates that apply to goods and services purchased under
contract for clients eligible under chapter 74.09 RCW.

(5) All other agencies,
whether or not formerly specifically excluded from the provisions of all or any
part of the Administrative Procedure Act, shall be subject to the entire act.

Sec. 226. RCW 34.12.020 and 1995 c
331 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Office"
means the office of administrative hearings.

(2)
"Administrative law judge" means any person appointed by the chief
administrative law judge to conduct or preside over hearings as provided in
this chapter.

(3) "Hearing"
means an adjudicative proceeding within the meaning of RCW 34.05.010(1)
conducted by a state agency under RCW 34.05.413 through 34.05.476.

(4) "State
agency" means any state board, commission, department, or officer
authorized by law to make rules or to conduct adjudicative proceedings, except
those in the legislative or judicial branches, the growth management hearings
boards, the utilities and transportation commission, the pollution control
hearings board, the shorelines hearings board, the forest practices appeals
board, the environmental hearings office, the board of industrial insurance
appeals, the Washington personnel resources board, the public employment
relations commission, ((the personnel appeals board,)) and the board of
tax appeals.

Sec. 227. RCW 41.04.340 and 1998 c
254 s 1 and 1998 c 116 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) An attendance
incentive program is established for all eligible employees. As used in this
section the term "eligible employee" means any employee of the state,
other than eligible employees of the community and technical colleges and the
state board for community and technical colleges identified in RCW 28B.50.553,
and teaching and research faculty at the state and regional universities and
The Evergreen State College, entitled to accumulate sick leave and for whom
accurate sick leave records have been maintained. No employee may receive
compensation under this section for any portion of sick leave accumulated at a
rate in excess of one day per month. The state and regional universities and
The Evergreen State College shall maintain complete and accurate sick leave
records for all teaching and research faculty.

(2) In January of the
year following any year in which a minimum of sixty days of sick leave is
accrued, and each January thereafter, any eligible employee may receive
remuneration for unused sick leave accumulated in the previous year at a rate
equal to one day's monetary compensation of the employee for each four full
days of accrued sick leave in excess of sixty days. Sick leave for which
compensation has been received shall be deducted from accrued sick leave at the
rate of four days for every one day's monetary compensation.

(3) At the time of
separation from state service due to retirement or death, an eligible employee
or the employee's estate may elect to receive remuneration at a rate equal to
one day's current monetary compensation of the employee for each four full days
of accrued sick leave.

(4) Remuneration or
benefits received under this section shall not be included for the purpose of
computing a retirement allowance under any public retirement system in this
state.

(5) Except as provided
in subsections (7) through (9) of this section for employees not covered by
chapter 41.06 RCW, this section shall be administered, and rules shall be
adopted to carry out its purposes, by the ((Washington personnel resources
board)) director of personnel for persons subject to chapter 41.06
RCW: PROVIDED, That determination of classes of eligible employees shall be
subject to approval by the office of financial management.

(6) Should the
legislature revoke any remuneration or benefits granted under this section, no
affected employee shall be entitled thereafter to receive such benefits as a
matter of contractual right.

(7) In lieu of
remuneration for unused sick leave at retirement as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, an agency head or designee may with equivalent funds, provide
eligible employees with a benefit plan that provides for reimbursement for
medical expenses. This plan shall be implemented only after consultation with
affected groups of employees. For eligible employees covered by chapter 41.06
RCW, procedures for the implementation of these plans shall be adopted by the
((Washington personnel resources board)) director of personnel.
For eligible employees exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, and classified employees
who have opted out of coverage of chapter 41.06 RCW as provided in RCW
41.56.201, implementation procedures shall be adopted by an agency head having
jurisdiction over the employees.

(8) Implementing
procedures adopted by the ((Washington personnel resources board)) director
of personnel or agency heads shall require that each medical expense plan
authorized by subsection (7) of this section apply to all eligible employees in
any one of the following groups: (a) Employees in an agency; (b) employees in
a major organizational subdivision of an agency; (c) employees at a major
operating location of an agency; (d) exempt employees under the jurisdiction of
an elected or appointed Washington state executive; (e) employees of the
Washington state senate; (f) employees of the Washington state house of
representatives; (g) classified employees in a bargaining unit established by
the ((Washington personnel resources board)) director of personnel;
or (h) other group of employees defined by an agency head that is not designed
to provide an individual-employee choice regarding participation in a medical
expense plan. However, medical expense plans for eligible employees in any of
the groups under (a) through (h) of this subsection who are covered by a
collective bargaining agreement shall be implemented only by written agreement
with the bargaining unit's exclusive representative and a separate medical
expense plan may be provided for unrepresented employees.

(9) Medical expense
plans authorized by subsection (7) of this section must require as a condition
of participation in the plan that employees in the group affected by the plan
sign an agreement with the employer. The agreement must include a provision to
hold the employer harmless should the United States government find that the
employer or the employee is in debt to the United States as a result of the
employee not paying income taxes due on the equivalent funds placed into the
plan, or as a result of the employer not withholding or deducting a tax,
assessment, or other payment on the funds as required by federal law. The
agreement must also include a provision that requires an eligible employee to
forfeit remuneration under subsection (3) of this section if the employee
belongs to a group that has been designated to participate in the medical
expense plan permitted under this section and the employee refuses to execute
the required agreement.

Sec. 228. RCW 41.50.804 and 1993 c
281 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing contained in
this chapter shall be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining
agreement until any such agreement has expired or until any such bargaining
unit has been modified by action of the ((Washington personnel resources
board)) public employment relations commission as provided by law.

Sec. 229. RCW 43.06.425 and 1993 c
281 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((Washington
personnel resources board)) director of personnel shall adopt rules
to provide that:

(1) Successful
completion of an internship under RCW 43.06.420 shall be considered as
employment experience at the level at which the intern was placed;

(2) Persons leaving
classified or exempt positions in state government in order to take an
internship under RCW 43.06.420: (a) Have the right of reversion to the
previous position at any time during the internship or upon completion of the
internship; and (b) shall continue to receive all fringe benefits as if they
had never left their classified or exempt positions;

(3) Participants in the
undergraduate internship program who were not public employees prior to
accepting a position in the program receive sick leave allowances commensurate
with other state employees;

(4) Participants in the
executive fellows program who were not public employees prior to accepting a
position in the program receive sick and vacation leave allowances commensurate
with other state employees.

Sec. 230. RCW 43.131.090 and 2000
c 189 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the legislature
specifies a shorter period of time, a terminated entity shall continue in
existence until June 30th of the next succeeding year for the purpose of
concluding its affairs: PROVIDED, That the powers and authority of the entity
shall not be reduced or otherwise limited during this period. Unless otherwise
provided:

(1) All employees of
terminated entities classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, shall be transferred as appropriate or as otherwise provided in the
procedures adopted by the ((Washington personnel resources board)) director
of personnel pursuant to RCW 41.06.150;

(2) All documents and
papers, equipment, or other tangible property in the possession of the
terminated entity shall be delivered to the custody of the entity assuming the
responsibilities of the terminated entity or if such responsibilities have been
eliminated, documents and papers shall be delivered to the state archivist and
equipment or other tangible property to the department of general
administration;

(3) All funds held by,
or other moneys due to, the terminated entity shall revert to the fund from
which they were appropriated, or if that fund is abolished to the general fund;

(4) Notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 34.05.020, all rules made by a terminated entity shall be
repealed, without further action by the entity, at the end of the period
provided in this section, unless assumed and reaffirmed by the entity assuming
the related legal responsibilities of the terminated entity;

(5) All contractual
rights and duties of an entity shall be assigned or delegated to the entity
assuming the responsibilities of the terminated entity, or if there is none to
such entity as the governor shall direct.

Sec. 231. RCW 49.46.010 and 1997 c
203 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1)
"Director" means the director of labor and industries;

(2) "Wage"
means compensation due to an employee by reason of employment, payable in legal
tender of the United States or checks on banks convertible into cash on demand
at full face value, subject to such deductions, charges, or allowances as may
be permitted by rules of the director;

(3) "Employ"
includes to permit to work;

(4)
"Employer" includes any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, business trust, or any person or group of persons acting directly
or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee;

(5)
"Employee" includes any individual employed by an employer but shall
not include:

(a) Any individual (i)
employed as a hand harvest laborer and paid on a piece rate basis in an
operation which has been, and is generally and customarily recognized as having
been, paid on a piece rate basis in the region of employment; (ii) who commutes
daily from his or her permanent residence to the farm on which he or she is
employed; and (iii) who has been employed in agriculture less than thirteen
weeks during the preceding calendar year;

(b) Any individual
employed in casual labor in or about a private home, unless performed in the
course of the employer's trade, business, or profession;

(c) Any individual
employed in a bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity or
in the capacity of outside salesman as those terms are defined and delimited by
rules of the director. However, those terms shall be defined and delimited by
the ((Washington personnel resources board)) director of personnel
pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW for employees employed under the director of
personnel's jurisdiction;

(d) Any individual
engaged in the activities of an educational, charitable, religious, state or
local governmental body or agency, or nonprofit organization where the
employer-employee relationship does not in fact exist or where the services are
rendered to such organizations gratuitously. If the individual receives
reimbursement in lieu of compensation for normally incurred out-of-pocket
expenses or receives a nominal amount of compensation per unit of voluntary
service rendered, an employer-employee relationship is deemed not to exist for
the purpose of this section or for purposes of membership or qualification in
any state, local government or publicly supported retirement system other than
that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(e) Any individual
employed full time by any state or local governmental body or agency who
provides voluntary services but only with regard to the provision of the
voluntary services. The voluntary services and any compensation therefor shall
not affect or add to qualification, entitlement or benefit rights under any
state, local government, or publicly supported retirement system other than
that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(f) Any newspaper
vendor or carrier;

(g) Any carrier subject
to regulation by Part 1 of the Interstate Commerce Act;

(h) Any individual
engaged in forest protection and fire prevention activities;

(i) Any individual employed
by any charitable institution charged with child care responsibilities engaged
primarily in the development of character or citizenship or promoting health or
physical fitness or providing or sponsoring recreational opportunities or
facilities for young people or members of the armed forces of the United
States;

(j) Any individual
whose duties require that he or she reside or sleep at the place of his or her
employment or who otherwise spends a substantial portion of his or her work
time subject to call, and not engaged in the performance of active duties;

(k) Any resident,
inmate, or patient of a state, county, or municipal correctional, detention,
treatment or rehabilitative institution;

(l) Any individual who
holds a public elective or appointive office of the state, any county, city,
town, municipal corporation or quasi municipal corporation, political
subdivision, or any instrumentality thereof, or any employee of the state
legislature;

(m) All vessel
operating crews of the Washington state ferries operated by the department of
transportation;

(n) Any individual
employed as a seaman on a vessel other than an American vessel;

(6)
"Occupation" means any occupation, service, trade, business,
industry, or branch or group of industries or employment or class of employment
in which employees are gainfully employed;

(7) "Retail or
service establishment" means an establishment seventy-five percent of
whose annual dollar volume of sales of goods or services, or both, is not for
resale and is recognized as retail sales or services in the particular
industry.

Sec. 232. RCW 41.06.340 and 1993 c
281 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) With respect to
collective bargaining as authorized by sections 301 through 314 of this act,
the public employment relations commission created by chapter 41.58 RCW shall
have authority to adopt rules, on and after the effective date of this section,
relating to determination of appropriate bargaining units within any agency.
In making such determination the commission shall consider the duties, skills,
and working conditions of the employees, the history of collective bargaining
by the employees and their bargaining representatives, the extent of
organization among the employees, and the desires of the employees. The public
employment relations commission created in chapter 41.58 RCW shall adopt rules
and make determinations relating to the certification and decertification of
exclusive bargaining representatives.

(2) Each and
every provision of RCW 41.56.140 through ((41.56.190)) 41.56.160
shall be applicable to this chapter as it relates to state civil service
employees ((and the Washington personnel resources board, or its designee,
whose final decision shall be appealable to the Washington personnel resources
board, which is granted all powers and authority granted to the department of
labor and industries by RCW 41.56.140 through 41.56.190)).

(3) A collective
bargaining agreement entered into under RCW 41.06.150 before July 1, 2004,
covering employees subject to sections 301 through 314 of this act that expires
after July 1, 2004, shall remain in full force during its duration, or until
superseded by a collective bargaining agreement entered into by the parties
under sections 301 through 314 of this act. However, an agreement entered into
before July 1, 2004, may not be renewed or extended beyond July 1, 2005, or
until superseded by a collective bargaining agreement entered into under
sections 301 through 314 of this act, whichever is later.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
233. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The personnel
appeals board is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are
hereby transferred to the Washington personnel resources board. All references
to the executive secretary or the personnel appeals board in the Revised Code
of Washington shall be construed to mean the director of the department of
personnel or the Washington personnel resources board.

(2)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the
possession of the personnel appeals board shall be delivered to the custody of
the department of personnel. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the personnel appeals board
shall be made available to the department of personnel. All funds, credits,
leases, or other assets held by the personnel appeals board shall be assigned
to the department of personnel.

(b) Any appropriations
made to the personnel appeals board shall, on the effective date of this
section, be transferred and credited to the department of personnel.

(c) If any question
arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records,
papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the
exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as
to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of
the personnel appeals board are transferred to the jurisdiction of the
department of personnel. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the
state civil service law, are assigned to the department of personnel to perform
their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights,
subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the
laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all
pending business before the personnel appeals board shall be continued and
acted upon by the Washington personnel resources board. All existing contracts
and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
department of personnel.

(5) The transfer of the
powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the personnel appeals board shall
not affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.

(6) If apportionments
of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this
section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments
to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of
these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and
appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the
certification.

Sec. 234. RCW 13.40.320 and 2001 c
137 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
social and health services shall establish a medium security juvenile offender
basic training camp program. This program for juvenile offenders serving a
term of confinement under the supervision of the department is exempt from the
licensing requirements of chapter 74.15 RCW.

(2) The department may
contract under this chapter with private companies, the national guard, or
other federal, state, or local agencies to operate the juvenile offender basic
training camp((, notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 41.06.380)).

(3) The juvenile
offender basic training camp shall be a structured and regimented model
emphasizing the building up of an offender's self-esteem, confidence, and
discipline. The juvenile offender basic training camp program shall provide
participants with basic education, prevocational training, work-based learning,
work experience, work ethic skills, conflict resolution counseling, substance
abuse intervention, anger management counseling, and structured intensive
physical training. The juvenile offender basic training camp program shall
have a curriculum training and work schedule that incorporates a balanced
assignment of these or other rehabilitation and training components for no less
than sixteen hours per day, six days a week.

The department shall
develop standards for the safe and effective operation of the juvenile offender
basic training camp program, for an offender's successful program completion,
and for the continued after-care supervision of offenders who have successfully
completed the program.

(4) Offenders eligible
for the juvenile offender basic training camp option shall be those with a
disposition of not more than sixty-five weeks. Violent and sex offenders shall
not be eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp program.

(5) If the court
determines that the offender is eligible for the juvenile offender basic
training camp option, the court may recommend that the department place the
offender in the program. The department shall evaluate the offender and may
place the offender in the program. The evaluation shall include, at a minimum,
a risk assessment developed by the department and designed to determine the
offender's suitability for the program. No juvenile who is assessed as a high
risk offender or suffers from any mental or physical problems that could
endanger his or her health or drastically affect his or her performance in the program
shall be admitted to or retained in the juvenile offender basic training camp
program.

(6) All juvenile
offenders eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp sentencing
option shall spend one hundred twenty days of their disposition in a juvenile
offender basic training camp. This period may be extended for up to forty days
by the secretary if a juvenile offender requires additional time to
successfully complete the basic training camp program. If the juvenile
offender's activities while in the juvenile offender basic training camp are so
disruptive to the juvenile offender basic training camp program, as determined
by the secretary according to standards developed by the department, as to
result in the removal of the juvenile offender from the juvenile offender basic
training camp program, or if the offender cannot complete the juvenile offender
basic training camp program due to medical problems, the secretary shall
require that the offender be committed to a juvenile institution to serve the
entire remainder of his or her disposition, less the amount of time already
served in the juvenile offender basic training camp program.

(7) All offenders who
successfully graduate from the juvenile offender basic training camp program
shall spend the remainder of their disposition on parole in a juvenile
rehabilitation administration intensive aftercare program in the local
community. Violation of the conditions of parole is subject to sanctions
specified in RCW 13.40.210(4). The program shall provide for the needs of the
offender based on his or her progress in the aftercare program as indicated by
ongoing assessment of those needs and progress. The intensive aftercare
program shall monitor postprogram juvenile offenders and assist them to successfully
reintegrate into the community. In addition, the program shall develop a
process for closely monitoring and assessing public safety risks. The
intensive aftercare program shall be designed and funded by the department of
social and health services.

(8) The department
shall also develop and maintain a data base to measure recidivism rates
specific to this incarceration program. The data base shall maintain data on
all juvenile offenders who complete the juvenile offender basic training camp
program for a period of two years after they have completed the program. The
data base shall also maintain data on the criminal activity, educational
progress, and employment activities of all juvenile offenders who participated
in the program.

Sec. 235. RCW 39.29.006 and 1998 c
101 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Agency"
means any state office or activity of the executive and judicial branches of
state government, including state agencies, departments, offices, divisions,
boards, commissions, and educational, correctional, and other types of institutions.

(2) "Client
services" means services provided directly to agency clients including,
but not limited to, medical and dental services, employment and training
programs, residential care, and subsidized housing.

(3) "Competitive
solicitation" means a documented formal process providing an equal and
open opportunity to qualified parties and culminating in a selection based on
criteria which may include such factors as the consultant's fees or costs,
ability, capacity, experience, reputation, responsiveness to time limitations,
responsiveness to solicitation requirements, quality of previous performance,
and compliance with statutes and rules relating to contracts or services.

(4)
"Consultant" means an independent individual or firm contracting with
an agency to perform a service or render an opinion or recommendation according
to the consultant's methods and without being subject to the control of the
agency except as to the result of the work. The agency monitors progress under
the contract and authorizes payment.

(5)
"Emergency" means a set of unforeseen circumstances beyond the
control of the agency that either:

(a) Present a real,
immediate threat to the proper performance of essential functions; or

(b) May result in
material loss or damage to property, bodily injury, or loss of life if
immediate action is not taken.

(6) "Evidence of
competition" means documentation demonstrating that the agency has
solicited responses from multiple firms in selecting a consultant.

(7) "Personal
service" means professional or technical expertise provided by a
consultant to accomplish a specific study, project, task, or other work
statement. This term does not include purchased services as defined under
subsection (9) of this section. This term does include client services.

(8) "Personal
service contract" means an agreement, or any amendment thereto, with a
consultant for the rendering of personal services to the state which is
consistent with ((RCW 41.06.380)) section 208 of this act.

(9) "Purchased
services" means services provided by a vendor to accomplish routine,
continuing and necessary functions. This term includes, but is not limited to,
services acquired under RCW 43.19.190 or 43.105.041 for equipment maintenance
and repair; operation of a physical plant; security; computer hardware and
software maintenance; data entry; key punch services; and computer
time-sharing, contract programming, and analysis.

(10) "Sole
source" means a consultant providing professional or technical expertise
of such a unique nature that the consultant is clearly and justifiably the only
practicable source to provide the service. The justification shall be based on
either the uniqueness of the service or sole availability at the location
required.

Sec. 236. RCW 41.04.385 and 1993 c
194 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that (1) demographic, economic, and social trends underlie a critical and
increasing demand for child care in the state of Washington; (2) working
parents and their children benefit when the employees' child care needs have
been resolved; (3) the state of Washington should serve as a model employer by
creating a supportive atmosphere, to the extent feasible, in which its
employees may meet their child care needs; and (4) the state of Washington
should encourage the development of partnerships between state agencies, state
employees, state employee labor organizations, and private employers to expand
the availability of affordable quality child care. The legislature finds
further that resolving employee child care concerns not only benefits the
employees and their children, but may benefit the employer by reducing
absenteeism, increasing employee productivity, improving morale, and enhancing
the employer's position in recruiting and retaining employees. Therefore, the
legislature declares that it is the policy of the state of Washington to assist
state employees by creating a supportive atmosphere in which they may meet
their child care needs. Policies and procedures for state agencies to address
employee child care needs will be the responsibility of the director of
personnel in consultation with the child care coordinating committee, as
provided in RCW 74.13.090, and state employee representatives ((as
provided under RCW 41.06.140)).

Sec. 237. RCW 47.46.040 and 2001 c
64 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All projects
designed, constructed, and operated under this authority must comply with all
applicable rules and statutes in existence at the time the agreement is
executed, including but not limited to the following provisions: Chapter 39.12
RCW, this title, ((RCW 41.06.380)) section 208 of this act,
chapter 47.64 RCW, RCW 49.60.180, and 49 C.F.R. Part 21.

(2) The secretary or a
designee shall consult with legal, financial, and other experts within and
outside state government in the negotiation and development of the agreements.

(3) Agreements shall
provide for private ownership of the projects during the construction period.
After completion and final acceptance of each project or discrete segment
thereof, the agreement shall provide for state ownership of the transportation
systems and facilities and lease to the private entity unless the state elects
to provide for ownership of the facility by the private entity during the term
of the agreement.

The state shall lease
each of the demonstration projects, or applicable project segments, to the
private entities for operating purposes for up to fifty years.

(4) The department may
exercise any power possessed by it to facilitate the development, construction,
financing operation, and maintenance of transportation projects under this
chapter. Agreements for maintenance services entered into under this section
shall provide for full reimbursement for services rendered by the department or
other state agencies. Agreements for police services for projects, involving
state highway routes, developed under agreements shall be entered into with the
Washington state patrol. The agreement for police services shall provide that
the state patrol will be reimbursed for costs on a comparable basis with the
costs incurred for comparable service on other state highway routes. The
department may provide services for which it is reimbursed, including but not
limited to preliminary planning, environmental certification, and preliminary
design of the demonstration projects.

(5) The plans and
specifications for each project constructed under this section shall comply
with the department's standards for state projects. A facility constructed by
and leased to a private entity is deemed to be a part of the state highway
system for purposes of identification, maintenance, and enforcement of traffic
laws and for the purposes of applicable sections of this title. Upon reversion
of the facility to the state, the project must meet all applicable state
standards. Agreements shall address responsibility for reconstruction or
renovations that are required in order for a facility to meet all applicable state
standards upon reversion of the facility to the state.

(6) For the purpose of
facilitating these projects and to assist the private entity in the financing,
development, construction, and operation of the transportation systems and
facilities, the agreements may include provisions for the department to
exercise its authority, including the lease of facilities, rights of way, and
airspace, exercise of the power of eminent domain, granting of development
rights and opportunities, granting of necessary easements and rights of access,
issuance of permits and other authorizations, protection from competition,
remedies in the event of default of either of the parties, granting of
contractual and real property rights, liability during construction and the term
of the lease, authority to negotiate acquisition of rights of way in excess of
appraised value, and any other provision deemed necessary by the secretary.

(7) The agreements
entered into under this section may include provisions authorizing the state to
grant necessary easements and lease to a private entity existing rights of way
or rights of way subsequently acquired with public or private financing. The
agreements may also include provisions to lease to the entity airspace above or
below the right of way associated or to be associated with the private entity's
transportation facility. In consideration for the reversion rights in these
privately constructed facilities, the department may negotiate a charge for the
lease of airspace rights during the term of the agreement for a period not to
exceed fifty years. If, after the expiration of this period, the department
continues to lease these airspace rights to the private entity, it shall do so
only at fair market value. The agreement may also provide the private entity
the right of first refusal to undertake projects utilizing airspace owned by
the state in the vicinity of the public-private project.

(8) Agreements under
this section may include any contractual provision that is necessary to protect
the project revenues required to repay the costs incurred to study, plan,
design, finance, acquire, build, install, operate, enforce laws, and maintain toll
highways, bridges, and tunnels and which will not unreasonably inhibit or
prohibit the development of additional public transportation systems and
facilities. Agreements under this section must secure and maintain liability
insurance coverage in amounts appropriate to protect the project's viability
and may address state indemnification of the private entity for design and
construction liability where the state has approved relevant design and
construction plans.

(9) Agreements shall
include a process that provides for public involvement in decision making with
respect to the development of the projects.

(10)(a) In carrying out
the public involvement process required in subsection (9) of this section, the
private entity shall proactively seek public participation through a process
appropriate to the characteristics of the project that assesses and
demonstrates public support among: Users of the project, residents of
communities in the vicinity of the project, and residents of communities
impacted by the project.

(b) The private entity
shall conduct a comprehensive public involvement process that provides,
periodically throughout the development and implementation of the project,
users and residents of communities in the affected project area an opportunity
to comment upon key issues regarding the project including, but not limited
to: (i) Alternative sizes and scopes; (ii) design; (iii) environmental
assessment; (iv) right of way and access plans; (v) traffic impacts; (vi)
tolling or user fee strategies and tolling or user fee ranges; (vii) project
cost; (viii) construction impacts; (ix) facility operation; and (x) any other
salient characteristics.

(c) If the affected
project area has not been defined, the private entity shall define the affected
project area by conducting, at a minimum: (i) A comparison of the estimated
percentage of residents of communities in the vicinity of the project and in
other communities impacted by the project who could be subject to tolls or user
fees and the estimated percentage of other users and transient traffic that
could be subject to tolls or user fees; (ii) an analysis of the anticipated
traffic diversion patterns; (iii) an analysis of the potential economic impact
resulting from proposed toll rates or user fee rates imposed on residents,
commercial traffic, and commercial entities in communities in the vicinity of
and impacted by the project; (iv) an analysis of the economic impact of tolls
or user fees on the price of goods and services generally; and (v) an analysis
of the relationship of the project to state transportation needs and benefits.

The agreement may
require an advisory vote by users of and residents in the affected project
area.

(d) In seeking public
participation, the private entity shall establish a local involvement committee
or committees comprised of residents of the affected project area, individuals
who represent cities and counties in the affected project area, organizations
formed to support or oppose the project, if such organizations exist, and users
of the project. The private entity shall, at a minimum, establish a committee
as required under the specifications of RCW 47.46.030(6)(b) (ii) and (iii) and
appointments to such committee shall be made no later than thirty days after
the project area is defined.

(e) Local involvement
committees shall act in an advisory capacity to the department and the private
entity on all issues related to the development and implementation of the
public involvement process established under this section.

(f) The department and
the private entity shall provide the legislative transportation committee and
local involvement committees with progress reports on the status of the public
involvement process including the results of an advisory vote, if any occurs.

(11) Nothing in this
chapter limits the right of the secretary and his or her agents to render such
advice and to make such recommendations as they deem to be in the best
interests of the state and the public.

Sec. 238. RCW 72.09.100 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 19 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to vest in the department the power to provide for a comprehensive
inmate work program and to remove statutory and other restrictions which have limited
work programs in the past. For purposes of establishing such a comprehensive
program, the legislature recommends that the department consider adopting any
or all, or any variation of, the following classes of work programs:

(1) CLASS I: FREE VENTURE
INDUSTRIES. The employer model industries in this class shall be operated and
managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit organization pursuant to
an agreement between the organization and the department. The organization
shall produce goods or services for sale to both the public and private sector.

The customer model
industries in this class shall be operated and managed by the department to
provide Washington state manufacturers or businesses with products or services
currently produced or provided by out-of-state or foreign suppliers. The
correctional industries board of directors shall review these proposed
industries before the department contracts to provide such products or
services. The review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the
proposed products and services on the Washington state business community and
labor market.

The department of
corrections shall supply appropriate security and custody services without
charge to the participating firms.

Inmates who work in
free venture industries shall do so at their own choice. They shall be paid a
wage comparable to the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality
in which the industry is located, as determined by the director of correctional
industries. If the director cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage,
then the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.

An inmate who is
employed in the class I program of correctional industries shall not be
eligible for unemployment compensation benefits pursuant to any of the
provisions of Title 50 RCW until released on parole or discharged.

(2) CLASS II: TAX
REDUCTION INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be state-owned and
operated enterprises designed to reduce the costs for goods and services for
tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations. The industries
selected for development within this class shall, as much as possible, match
the available pool of inmate work skills and aptitudes with the work
opportunities in the free community. The industries shall be closely patterned
after private sector industries but with the objective of reducing public
support costs rather than making a profit. The products and services of this
industry, including purchased products and services necessary for a complete
product line, may be sold to public agencies, to nonprofit organizations, and
to private contractors when the goods purchased will be ultimately used by a
public agency or a nonprofit organization. Clothing manufactured by an
industry in this class may be donated to nonprofit organizations that provide
clothing free of charge to low-income persons. Correctional industries
products and services shall be reviewed by the correctional industries board of
directors before offering such products and services for sale to private
contractors. The board of directors shall conduct a yearly marketing review of
the products and services offered under this subsection. Such review shall
include an analysis of the potential impact of the proposed products and
services on the Washington state business community. To avoid waste or
spoilage and consequent loss to the state, when there is no public sector
market for such goods, byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural, and
animal husbandry enterprises may be sold to private persons, at private sale.
Surplus byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural and animal husbandry
enterprises that cannot be sold to public agencies or to private persons may be
donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of surplus products shall be
carried out in accordance with rules prescribed by the secretary.

Security and custody
services shall be provided without charge by the department of corrections.

Inmates working in this
class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall be paid for their
work on a gratuity scale which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a
similar nature in the locality in which the industry is located and which is
approved by the director of correctional industries.

Subject to approval of
the correctional industries board, provisions of ((RCW 41.06.380 prohibiting
contracting out work performed by classified employees)) section 208 of
this act shall not apply to contracts with Washington state businesses entered
into by the department of corrections through class II industries.

(3) CLASS III:
INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be operated
by the department of corrections. They shall be designed and managed to
accomplish the following objectives:

(a) Whenever possible,
to provide basic work training and experience so that the inmate will be able
to qualify for better work both within correctional industries and the free
community. It is not intended that an inmate's work within this class of
industries should be his or her final and total work experience as an inmate.

(b) Whenever possible,
to provide forty hours of work or work training per week.

(c) Whenever possible,
to offset tax and other public support costs.

Supervising,
management, and custody staff shall be employees of the department.

All able and eligible
inmates who are assigned work and who are not working in other classes of
industries shall work in this class.

Except for inmates who
work in work training programs, inmates in this class shall be paid for their
work in accordance with an inmate gratuity scale. The scale shall be adopted
by the secretary of corrections.

(4) CLASS IV:
COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be operated by the
department of corrections. They shall be designed and managed to provide
services in the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The services
shall be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor or infirm, or to
nonprofit organizations.

Inmates in this program
shall reside in facilities owned by, contracted for, or licensed by the
department of corrections. A unit of local government shall provide work
supervision services without charge to the state and shall pay the inmate's wage.

The department of
corrections shall reimburse participating units of local government for
liability and workers compensation insurance costs.

Inmates who work in
this class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall receive a
gratuity which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature in
the locality in which the industry is located.

(5) CLASS V: COMMUNITY
SERVICE PROGRAMS. Programs in this class shall be subject to supervision by
the department of corrections. The purpose of this class of industries is to
enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off all or part of a
community service order as ordered by the sentencing court.

Employment shall be in
a community service program operated by the state, local units of government,
or a nonprofit agency.

To the extent that
funds are specifically made available for such purposes, the department of
corrections shall reimburse nonprofit agencies for workers compensation
insurance costs.

Sec. 239. RCW 41.06.079 and 1993 c
281 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not
apply in the department of transportation to the secretary, a deputy secretary,
an administrative assistant to the secretary, if any, one assistant secretary
for each division designated pursuant to RCW 47.01.081, one confidential
secretary for each of the above-named officers, up to six transportation
district administrators and one confidential secretary for each district
administrator, up to six additional new administrators or confidential
secretaries designated by the secretary of the department of transportation and
approved by the Washington personnel resources board pursuant to the provisions
of RCW 41.06.070(((1)(z))), the legislative liaison for the department,
the state construction engineer, the state aid engineer, the personnel manager,
the state project development engineer, the state maintenance and operations
engineer, one confidential secretary for each of the last-named five positions,
and a confidential secretary for the public affairs administrator. The
individuals appointed under this section shall be exempt from the provisions of
the state civil service law, and shall be paid salaries to be fixed by the
governor in accordance with the procedure established by law for the fixing of
salaries for individuals exempt from the operation of the state civil service
law.

Sec. 240. RCW 41.06.152 and 1999 c
309 s 914 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
adopt only those job classification revisions, class studies, and salary
adjustments under RCW 41.06.150(((15))) (12) that:

(a) Are due to documented
recruitment and retention difficulties, salary compression or inversion,
increased duties and responsibilities, or inequities. For these purposes,
inequities are defined as similar work assigned to different job classes with a
salary disparity greater than 7.5 percent; and

(b) Are such that the
office of financial management has reviewed the agency's fiscal impact
statement and has concurred that the agency can absorb the biennialized cost of
the reclassification, class study, or salary adjustment within the agency's
current authorized level of funding for the current fiscal biennium and
subsequent fiscal biennia.

(2) In addition to
reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments under subsection
(1)(b) of this section, the board may approve other reclassifications, class
studies, and salary adjustments that meet the requirements of subsection (1)(a)
of this section and have been approved under the procedures established under
this subsection.

Before the department
of personnel's biennial budget request is due to the office of financial
management, the board shall prioritize requests for reclassifications, class
studies, and salary adjustments for the next fiscal biennium. The board shall
prioritize according to such criteria as are developed by the board consistent
with RCW 41.06.150(((15))) (12)(a).

The board shall submit
the prioritized list to the governor's office and the fiscal committees of the
house of representatives and senate at the same time the department of
personnel's biennial budget request is submitted. The office of financial
management shall review the biennial cost of each proposed salary adjustment on
the board's prioritized list.

In the biennial
appropriations acts, the legislature may establish a level of funding, from the
state general fund and other accounts, to be applied by the board to the
prioritized list. Upon enactment of the appropriations act, the board may
approve reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments only to the
extent that the total cost does not exceed the level of funding established in
the appropriations acts and the board's actions are consistent with the
priorities established in the list. The legislature may also specify or
otherwise limit in the appropriations act the implementation dates for actions
approved by the board under this section.

(3) When the board
develops its priority list in the 1999-2001 biennium, for increases proposed
for funding in the 2001-2003 biennium, the board shall give top priority to
proposed increases to address documented recruitment and retention increases,
and shall give lowest priority to proposed increases to recognize increased
duties and responsibilities. When the board submits its prioritized list for
the 2001-2003 biennium, the board shall also provide: A comparison of any
differences between the salary increases recommended by the department of
personnel staff and those adopted by the board; a review of any salary
compression, inversion, or inequities that would result from implementing a
recommended increase; and a complete description of the information relied upon
by the board in adopting its proposals and priorities.

(4) This section does
not apply to the higher education hospital special pay plan or to any
adjustments to the classification plan under RCW 41.06.150(((15))) (12)
that are due to emergent conditions. Emergent conditions are defined as
emergency conditions requiring the establishment of positions necessary for the
preservation of the public health, safety, or general welfare.

Sec. 241. RCW 41.06.152 and 2002 c
. . . s 240 (section 240 of this act) are each amended to read as
follows:

(1) The ((board))
director shall adopt only those job classification revisions, class
studies, and salary adjustments under RCW 41.06.150(((12))) (4)
that:

(a) Are due to
documented recruitment and retention difficulties, salary compression or
inversion, increased duties and responsibilities, or inequities. For these
purposes, inequities are defined as similar work assigned to different job
classes with a salary disparity greater than 7.5 percent; and

(b) Are such that the
office of financial management has reviewed the agency's fiscal impact
statement and has concurred that the agency can absorb the biennialized cost of
the reclassification, class study, or salary adjustment within the agency's
current authorized level of funding for the current fiscal biennium and
subsequent fiscal biennia.

(2) In addition to
reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments under subsection
(1)(b) of this section, the board may approve other reclassifications, class
studies, and salary adjustments that meet the requirements of subsection (1)(a)
of this section and have been approved under the procedures established under
this subsection.

Before the department
of personnel's biennial budget request is due to the office of financial
management, the board shall prioritize requests for reclassifications, class
studies, and salary adjustments for the next fiscal biennium. The board shall
prioritize according to such criteria as are developed by the board consistent
with RCW 41.06.150(((12))) (4)(a).

The board shall submit
the prioritized list to the governor's office and the fiscal committees of the
house of representatives and senate at the same time the department of
personnel's biennial budget request is submitted. The office of financial
management shall review the biennial cost of each proposed salary adjustment on
the board's prioritized list.

In the biennial
appropriations acts, the legislature may establish a level of funding, from the
state general fund and other accounts, to be applied by the board to the
prioritized list. Upon enactment of the appropriations act, the board may
approve reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments only to the
extent that the total cost does not exceed the level of funding established in
the appropriations acts and the board's actions are consistent with the
priorities established in the list. The legislature may also specify or
otherwise limit in the appropriations act the implementation dates for actions
approved by the board under this section.

(3) When the board
develops its priority list in the 1999-2001 biennium, for increases proposed
for funding in the 2001-2003 biennium, the board shall give top priority to
proposed increases to address documented recruitment and retention increases,
and shall give lowest priority to proposed increases to recognize increased
duties and responsibilities. When the board submits its prioritized list for
the 2001-2003 biennium, the board shall also provide: A comparison of any
differences between the salary increases recommended by the department of
personnel staff and those adopted by the board; a review of any salary
compression, inversion, or inequities that would result from implementing a
recommended increase; and a complete description of the information relied upon
by the board in adopting its proposals and priorities.

(4) This section does
not apply to the higher education hospital special pay plan or to any
adjustments to the classification plan under RCW 41.06.150(((12))) (4)
that are due to emergent conditions. Emergent conditions are defined as
emergency conditions requiring the establishment of positions necessary for the
preservation of the public health, safety, or general welfare.

Sec. 242. RCW 41.06.500 and 1996 c
319 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in RCW 41.06.070, notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the
director is authorized to adopt, after consultation with state agencies and
employee organizations, rules for managers as defined in RCW 41.06.022. These
rules shall not apply to managers employed by institutions of higher education
or related boards or whose positions are exempt. The rules shall govern
recruitment, appointment, classification and allocation of positions,
examination, training and career development, hours of work, probation,
certification, compensation, transfer, affirmative action, promotion, layoff,
reemployment, performance appraisals, discipline, and any and all other
personnel practices for managers. These rules shall be separate from rules
adopted by the board for other employees, and to the extent that the rules
adopted apply only to managers shall take precedence over rules adopted by the
board, and are not subject to review by the board.

(2) In establishing
rules for managers, the director shall adhere to the following goals:

(a) Development of a
simplified classification system that facilitates movement of managers between
agencies and promotes upward mobility;

(b) Creation of a
compensation system consistent with the policy set forth in RCW 41.06.150(((17)))
(14). The system shall provide flexibility in setting and changing
salaries, and shall require review and approval by the director in the case of
any salary changes greater than five percent proposed for any group of employees;

(c) Establishment of a
performance appraisal system that emphasizes individual accountability for
program results and efficient management of resources; effective planning,
organization, and communication skills; valuing and managing workplace diversity;
development of leadership and interpersonal abilities; and employee
development;

(d) Strengthening
management training and career development programs that build critical
management knowledge, skills, and abilities; focusing on managing and valuing
workplace diversity; empowering employees by enabling them to share in
workplace decision making and to be innovative, willing to take risks, and able
to accept and deal with change; promoting a workplace where the overall focus
is on the recipient of the government services and how these services can be
improved; and enhancing mobility and career advancement opportunities;

(e) Permitting flexible
recruitment and hiring procedures that enable agencies to compete effectively
with other employers, both public and private, for managers with appropriate
skills and training; allowing consideration of all qualified candidates for
positions as managers; and achieving affirmative action goals and diversity in
the workplace;

(f) Providing that
managers may only be reduced, dismissed, suspended, or demoted for cause; and

(g)
Facilitating decentralized and regional administration.

Sec. 243. RCW 41.06.500 and 2002 c
. . . s 242 (section 242 of this act) are each amended to read as
follows:

(1) Except as provided
in RCW 41.06.070, notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the
director is authorized to adopt, after consultation with state agencies and
employee organizations, rules for managers as defined in RCW 41.06.022. These
rules shall not apply to managers employed by institutions of higher education
or related boards or whose positions are exempt. The rules shall govern
recruitment, appointment, classification and allocation of positions,
examination, training and career development, hours of work, probation,
certification, compensation, transfer, affirmative action, promotion, layoff,
reemployment, performance appraisals, discipline, and any and all other personnel
practices for managers. These rules shall be separate from rules adopted ((by
the board)) for other employees, and to the extent that the rules adopted under
this section apply only to managers shall take precedence over rules
adopted ((by the board)) for other employees, and are not subject
to review by the board.

(2) In establishing
rules for managers, the director shall adhere to the following goals:

(a) Development of a
simplified classification system that facilitates movement of managers between agencies
and promotes upward mobility;

(b) Creation of a
compensation system ((consistent with the policy set forth in RCW
41.06.150(14). The system shall provide)) that provides flexibility
in setting and changing salaries, and shall require review and approval by the
director in the case of any salary changes greater than five percent proposed
for any group of employees;

(c) Establishment of a
performance appraisal system that emphasizes individual accountability for
program results and efficient management of resources; effective planning,
organization, and communication skills; valuing and managing workplace
diversity; development of leadership and interpersonal abilities; and employee
development;

(d) Strengthening
management training and career development programs that build critical
management knowledge, skills, and abilities; focusing on managing and valuing
workplace diversity; empowering employees by enabling them to share in
workplace decision making and to be innovative, willing to take risks, and able
to accept and deal with change; promoting a workplace where the overall focus
is on the recipient of the government services and how these services can be
improved; and enhancing mobility and career advancement opportunities;

(e) Permitting flexible
recruitment and hiring procedures that enable agencies to compete effectively
with other employers, both public and private, for managers with appropriate
skills and training; allowing consideration of all qualified candidates for
positions as managers; and achieving affirmative action goals and diversity in
the workplace;

(f) Providing that
managers may only be reduced, dismissed, suspended, or demoted for cause; and

(g) Facilitating
decentralized and regional administration.

Sec. 244. RCW 43.23.010 and 1990 c
37 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to obtain
maximum efficiency and effectiveness within the department of agriculture, the
director may create such administrative divisions within the department as he
or she deems necessary. The director shall appoint a deputy director as well
as such assistant directors as shall be needed to administer the several
divisions within the department. The director shall appoint no more than eight
assistant directors. The officers appointed under this section are exempt from
the provisions of the state civil service law as provided in RCW 41.06.070(((7)))
(1)(g), and shall be paid salaries to be fixed by the governor in
accordance with the procedure established by law for the fixing of salaries for
officers exempt from the operation of the state civil service law. The
director shall also appoint and deputize a state veterinarian who shall be an
experienced veterinarian properly licensed to practice veterinary medicine in
this state.

The
director of agriculture shall have charge and general supervision of the
department and may assign supervisory and administrative duties other than
those specified in RCW 43.23.070 to the division which in his or her judgment
can most efficiently carry on those functions.

Sec. 245. RCW 49.74.030 and 1993 c
281 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission in conjunction with the department of personnel or the state patrol,
whichever is appropriate, shall attempt to resolve the noncompliance through
conciliation. If an agreement is reached for the elimination of noncompliance,
the agreement shall be reduced to writing and an order shall be issued by the
commission setting forth the terms of the agreement. The noncomplying state
agency, institution of higher education, or state patrol shall make a good
faith effort to conciliate and make a full commitment to correct the
noncompliance with any action that may be necessary to achieve compliance,
provided such action is not inconsistent with the rules adopted under RCW
41.06.150(((21))) (19) and 43.43.340(5), whichever is
appropriate.

Sec. 246. RCW 49.74.030 and 2002 c
. . . s 245 (section 245 of this act) are each amended to read as
follows:

The
commission in conjunction with the department of personnel or the state patrol,
whichever is appropriate, shall attempt to resolve the noncompliance through
conciliation. If an agreement is reached for the elimination of noncompliance,
the agreement shall be reduced to writing and an order shall be issued by the
commission setting forth the terms of the agreement. The noncomplying state
agency, institution of higher education, or state patrol shall make a good
faith effort to conciliate and make a full commitment to correct the
noncompliance with any action that may be necessary to achieve compliance,
provided such action is not inconsistent with the rules adopted under RCW
41.06.150(((19))) (6) and 43.43.340(5), whichever is appropriate.

Sec. 247. RCW 49.74.040 and 1985 c
365 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

If no agreement can be reached
under RCW 49.74.030, the commission may refer the matter to the administrative
law judge for hearing pursuant to RCW 49.60.250. If the administrative law
judge finds that the state agency, institution of higher education, or state
patrol has not made a good faith effort to correct the noncompliance, the
administrative law judge shall order the state agency, institution of higher
education, or state patrol to comply with this chapter. The administrative law
judge may order any action that may be necessary to achieve compliance,
provided such action is not inconsistent with the rules adopted under RCW ((28B.16.100(20),))
41.06.150(((21),)) (19) and 43.43.340(5), whichever is
appropriate.

An order by the
administrative law judge may be appealed to superior court.

Sec. 248. RCW 49.74.040 and 2002 c
. . . s 247 (section 247 of this act) are each amended to read as
follows:

If no agreement can be
reached under RCW 49.74.030, the commission may refer the matter to the administrative
law judge for hearing pursuant to RCW 49.60.250. If the administrative law
judge finds that the state agency, institution of higher education, or state
patrol has not made a good faith effort to correct the noncompliance, the
administrative law judge shall order the state agency, institution of higher
education, or state patrol to comply with this chapter. The administrative law
judge may order any action that may be necessary to achieve compliance,
provided such action is not inconsistent with the rules adopted under RCW
41.06.150(((19))) (6) and 43.43.340(5), whichever is appropriate.

An order by the
administrative law judge may be appealed to superior court.

Sec. 249. RCW 41.56.201 and 2000 c
19 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At any time after
July 1, 1993, and prior to July 1, 2003, an institution of higher
education and the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit of
employees classified under chapter ((28B.16 or)) 41.06 RCW as appropriate
may exercise their option to have their relationship and corresponding
obligations governed entirely by the provisions of this chapter by complying
with the following:

(a) The parties will
file notice of the parties' intent to be so governed, subject to the mutual
adoption of a collective bargaining agreement permitted by this section
recognizing the notice of intent. The parties shall provide the notice to the
Washington personnel resources board or its successor and the commission;

(b) During the
negotiation of an initial contract between the parties under this chapter, the
parties' scope of bargaining shall be governed by this chapter and any disputes
arising out of the collective bargaining rights and obligations under this
subsection shall be determined by the commission. If the commission finds that
the parties are at impasse, the notice filed under (a) of this subsection shall
be void and have no effect; and

(c) On the first day of
the month following the month during which the institution of higher education
and the exclusive bargaining representative provide notice to the Washington
personnel resources board or its successor and the commission that they have executed
an initial collective bargaining agreement recognizing the notice of intent
filed under (a) of this subsection, chapter ((28B.16 or)) 41.06 RCW as
appropriate shall cease to apply to all employees in the bargaining unit
covered by the agreement.

(2) All collective
bargaining rights and obligations concerning relations between an institution
of higher education and the exclusive bargaining representative of its
employees who have agreed to exercise the option permitted by this section
shall be determined under this chapter, subject to the following:

(a) The commission
shall recognize, in its current form, the bargaining unit as certified by the
Washington personnel resources board or its successor. For purposes of
determining bargaining unit status, positions meeting the criteria established
under RCW 41.06.070 or its successor shall be excluded from coverage under this
chapter. An employer may exclude such positions from a bargaining unit at any
time the position meets the criteria established under RCW 41.06.070 or its
successor. The limitations on collective bargaining contained in RCW 41.56.100
shall not apply to that bargaining unit.

(b) If, on the date of
filing the notice under subsection (1)(a) of this section, there is a union
shop authorized for the bargaining unit under rules adopted by the Washington
personnel resources board or its successor, the union shop requirement shall
continue in effect for the bargaining unit and shall be deemed incorporated
into the collective bargaining agreement applicable to the bargaining unit.

(c) Salary increases
negotiated for the employees in the bargaining unit shall be subject to the
following:

(i) Salary increases
shall continue to be appropriated by the legislature. The exclusive bargaining
representative shall meet before a legislative session with the governor or
governor's designee and the representative of the institution of higher
education concerning the total dollar amount for salary increases and health
care contributions that will be contained in the appropriations proposed by the
governor under RCW 43.88.060;

(ii) The collective
bargaining agreements may provide for salary increases from local efficiency
savings that are different from or that exceed the amount or percentage for
salary increases provided by the legislature in the omnibus appropriations act
for the institution of higher education or allocated to the board of trustees
by the state board for community and technical colleges, but the base for
salary increases provided by the legislature under (c)(i) of this subsection
shall include only those amounts appropriated by the legislature, and the base
shall not include any additional salary increases provided under this
subsection (2)(c)(ii);

(iii) Any provisions of
the collective bargaining agreements pertaining to salary increases provided
under (c)(i) of this subsection shall be subject to modification by the
legislature. If any provision of a salary increase provided under (c)(i) of
this subsection is changed by subsequent modification of the appropriations act
by the legislature, both parties shall immediately enter into collective
bargaining for the sole purpose of arriving at a mutually agreed upon
replacement for the modified provision.

(3) Nothing in this
section may be construed to permit an institution of higher education to
bargain collectively with an exclusive bargaining representative concerning any
matter covered by: (a) Chapter 41.05 RCW, except for the related cost or
dollar contributions or additional or supplemental benefits as permitted by
chapter 492, Laws of 1993; or (b) chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW.

(4) Any collective
bargaining agreement entered into under this section before July 1, 2004, that
expires after July 1, 2004, shall, unless a superseding agreement complying
with sections 301 through 314 of this act is negotiated by the parties, remain
in full force and effect during its duration, but the agreement may not be
renewed or extended beyond July 1, 2005, or until superseded by a collective
bargaining agreement entered into under sections 301 through 314 of this act,
whichever is later.

PART
III

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING REFORM

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. APPLICATION OF CHAPTER.
Collective bargaining negotiations under this chapter shall commence no later
than July 1, 2004. A collective bargaining agreement entered into under this
chapter shall not be effective prior to July 1, 2005. However, any collective
bargaining agreement entered into before July 1, 2004, covering employees affected
by sections 301 through 314 of this act, that expires after July 1, 2004,
shall, unless a superseding agreement complying with sections 301 through 314
of this act is negotiated by the parties, remain in full force during its
duration, but the agreement may not be renewed or extended beyond July 1, 2005,
or until superseded by a collective bargaining agreement entered into under
sections 301 through 314 of this act, whichever is later.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. NEGOTIATION AND
RATIFICATION OF COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS. (1) For the purpose of
negotiating collective bargaining agreements under this chapter, the employer
shall be represented by the governor or governor's designee, except as provided
for institutions of higher education in subsection (4) of this section.

(2)(a) If an exclusive
bargaining representative represents more than one bargaining unit, the
exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate with each employer
representative as designated in subsection (1) of this section one master
collective bargaining agreement on behalf of all the employees in bargaining
units that the exclusive bargaining representative represents. For those
exclusive bargaining representatives who represent fewer than a total of five
hundred employees each, negotiation shall be by a coalition of all those
exclusive bargaining representatives. The coalition shall bargain for a master
collective bargaining agreement covering all of the employees represented by the
coalition. The governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative
or representatives are authorized to enter into supplemental bargaining of
agency-specific issues for inclusion in or as an addendum to the master
collective bargaining agreement, subject to the parties' agreement regarding
the issues and procedures for supplemental bargaining. This section does not
prohibit cooperation and coordination of bargaining between two or more
exclusive bargaining representatives.

(b) This subsection (2)
does not apply to exclusive bargaining representatives who represent employees
of institutions of higher education, except when the institution of higher
education has elected to exercise its option under subsection (4) of this
section to have its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's
designee under the procedures provided for general government agencies in
subsections (1) through (3) of this section.

(c) If five hundred or
more employees of an independent state elected official listed in RCW 43.01.010
are organized in a bargaining unit or bargaining units under section 308 of
this act, the official shall be consulted by the governor or the governor's
designee before any agreement is reached under (a) of this subsection
concerning supplemental bargaining of agency specific issues affecting the
employees in such bargaining unit.

(3) The governor shall
submit a request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe
benefit provisions in the master collective bargaining agreement or for
legislation necessary to implement the agreement within ten days of the date on
which the exclusive bargaining representative or representatives ratify the
agreement or, if the legislature is not in session, within ten days after the
legislature next convenes. Requests for funds necessary to implement the
provisions of bargaining agreements negotiated by institutions of higher
education according to subsection (4) of this section shall not be submitted to
the legislature by the governor unless such requests:

(a) Have been submitted
to the director of the office of financial management prior to October 1 of the
year they are negotiated; and

(b) Have been certified
by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible
financially for the state.

The legislature shall
approve or reject the submission of the request for funds as a whole. If the
legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, either party may reopen
all or part of the agreement or the exclusive bargaining representative may
seek to implement the procedures provided for in section 310 of this act.

(4) For the purpose of
negotiating agreements for institutions of higher education, the employer shall
be the respective governing board of each of the universities, colleges, or
community and technical colleges or a designee chosen by the board to negotiate
on its behalf. A governing board may elect to have its negotiations conducted
by the governor or governor's designee under the procedures provided for general
government agencies in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section. Prior to
entering into negotiations under this chapter, the institutions of higher
education or their designees shall consult with the director of the office of
financial management regarding financial and budgetary issues that are likely
to arise in the impending negotiations. If appropriations are necessary to
implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of the bargaining
agreements reached between institutions of higher education and exclusive
bargaining representatives agreed to under the provisions of this chapter, the
governor shall submit a request for such funds to the legislature according to
the provisions of subsection (3) of this section.

(5) There is hereby
created a joint committee on employment relations, which consists of two
members with leadership positions in the house of representatives, representing
each of the two largest caucuses; two members of the house appropriations
committee, or its successor, representing each of the two largest caucuses; two
members with leadership positions in the senate, representing each of the two
largest caucuses; and two members of the senate ways and means committee, or
its successor, representing each of the two largest caucuses. The governor
shall periodically consult with the committee regarding appropriations
necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions in the
master collective bargaining agreements, and upon completion of negotiations,
advise the committee on the elements of the agreements and on any legislation
necessary to implement the agreements.

(6) If, after the
compensation and fringe benefit provisions of an agreement are approved by the
legislature, a significant revenue shortfall occurs resulting in reduced
appropriations, both parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining
for a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.

(7) After the
expiration date of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this
chapter, all of the terms and conditions specified in the collective bargaining
agreement remain in effect until the effective date of a subsequently
negotiated agreement, not to exceed one year from the expiration date stated in
the agreement. Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement according
to law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. SCOPE OF BARGAINING. (1)
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the matters subject to bargaining
include wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment, and the
negotiation of any question arising under a collective bargaining agreement.

(2) The employer is not
required to bargain over matters pertaining to:

(a) Health care
benefits or other employee insurance benefits, except as required in subsection
(3) of this section;

(b) Any retirement
system or retirement benefit; or

(c) Rules of the
director of personnel or the Washington personnel resources board adopted under
section 203, chapter . . ., Laws of 2002 (section 203 of this act).

(3) Matters subject to
bargaining include the number of names to be certified for vacancies, promotional
preferences, and the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee for
health care benefits. However, except as provided otherwise in this subsection
for institutions of higher education, negotiations regarding the number of
names to be certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar
amount expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits shall be
conducted between the employer and one coalition of all the exclusive
bargaining representatives subject to this chapter. Any such provision agreed
to by the employer and the coalition shall be included in all master collective
bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties. For institutions of higher
education, promotional preferences and the number of names to be certified for
vacancies shall be bargained under the provisions of section 302(4) of this
act.

(4) The employer and
the exclusive bargaining representative shall not agree to any proposal that
would prevent the implementation of approved affirmative action plans or that
would be inconsistent with the comparable worth agreement that provided the
basis for the salary changes implemented beginning with the 1983-1985 biennium
to achieve comparable worth.

(5) The employer and
the exclusive bargaining representative shall not bargain over matters
pertaining to management rights established in section 305 of this act.

(6) Except as otherwise
provided in this chapter, if a conflict exists between an executive order,
administrative rule, or agency policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and
conditions of employment and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under
this chapter, the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision
of a collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a statute
is invalid and unenforceable.

(7) This section does
not prohibit bargaining that affects contracts authorized by section 208 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
304. CONTENTS OF COLLECTIVE
BARGAINING AGREEMENTS. (1) The parties to a collective bargaining agreement
shall reduce the agreement to writing and both shall execute it.

(2) A collective
bargaining agreement shall contain provisions that:

(a) Provide for a
grievance procedure that culminates with final and binding arbitration of all
disputes arising over the interpretation or application of the collective
bargaining agreement and that is valid and enforceable under its terms when
entered into in accordance with this chapter; and

(b) Require processing
of disciplinary actions or terminations of employment of employees covered by
the collective bargaining agreement entirely under the procedures of the
collective bargaining agreement. Any employee, when fully reinstated, shall be
guaranteed all employee rights and benefits, including back pay, sick leave,
vacation accrual, and retirement and federal old age, survivors, and disability
insurance act credits, but without back pay for any period of suspension.

(3)(a) If a collective
bargaining agreement between an employer and an exclusive bargaining
representative is concluded after the termination date of the previous
collective bargaining agreement between the employer and an employee organization
representing the same bargaining units, the effective date of the collective
bargaining agreement may be the day after the termination of the previous
collective bargaining agreement, and all benefits included in the new
collective bargaining agreement, including wage or salary increases, may accrue
beginning with that effective date.

(b) If a collective
bargaining agreement between an employer and an exclusive bargaining
representative is concluded after the termination date of the previous
collective bargaining agreement between the employer and the exclusive
bargaining representative representing different bargaining units, the
effective date of the collective bargaining agreement may be the day after the
termination date of whichever previous collective bargaining agreement covering
one or more of the units terminated first, and all benefits included in the new
collective bargaining agreement, including wage or salary increases, may accrue
beginning with that effective date.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
305. MANAGEMENT RIGHTS. The
employer shall not bargain over rights of management which, in addition to all
powers, duties, and rights established by constitutional provision or statute,
shall include but not be limited to the following:

(1) The functions and
programs of the employer, the use of technology, and the structure of the
organization;

(2) The employer's
budget and the size of the agency work force, including determining the
financial basis for layoffs;

(3) The right to direct
and supervise employees; and

(4) The right to take
whatever actions are deemed necessary to carry out the mission of the state and
its agencies during emergencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
306. RIGHTS OF EMPLOYEES.
Except as may be specifically limited by this chapter, employees shall have the
right to self-organization, to form, join, or assist employee organizations,
and to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing for
the purpose of collective bargaining free from interference, restraint, or
coercion. Employees shall also have the right to refrain from any or all such
activities except to the extent that they may be required to pay a fee to an
exclusive bargaining representative under a union security provision
authorized by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
307. RIGHT TO STRIKE NOT
GRANTED. Nothing contained in chapter . . ., Laws of 2002 (this act)
permits or grants to any employee the right to strike or refuse to perform his
or her official duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
308. BARGAINING UNITS. (1) A
bargaining unit of employees covered by this chapter existing on the effective
date of this section shall be considered an appropriate unit, unless the unit
does not meet the requirements of (a) and (b) of this subsection. The
commission, after hearing upon reasonable notice to all interested parties,
shall decide, in each application for certification as an exclusive bargaining
representative, the unit appropriate for certification. In determining the new
units or modifications of existing units, the commission shall consider: The
duties, skills, and working conditions of the employees; the history of
collective bargaining; the extent of organization among the employees; the
desires of the employees; and the avoidance of excessive fragmentation.
However, a unit is not appropriate if it includes:

(a) Both supervisors
and nonsupervisory employees. A unit that includes only supervisors may be
considered appropriate if a majority of the supervisory employees indicates by
vote that they desire to be included in such a unit; or

(b) More than one
institution of higher education. For the purposes of this section, any branch
or regional campus of an institution of higher education is part of that
institution of higher education.

(2) The exclusive
bargaining representatives certified to represent the bargaining units existing
on the effective date of this section shall continue as the exclusive bargaining
representative without the necessity of an election.

(3) If a single
employee organization is the exclusive bargaining representative for two or
more units, upon petition by the employee organization, the units may be
consolidated into a single larger unit if the commission considers the larger
unit to be appropriate. If consolidation is appropriate, the commission shall
certify the employee organization as the exclusive bargaining representative of
the new unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
309. REPRESENTATION. (1) The
commission shall determine all questions pertaining to representation and shall
administer all elections and be responsible for the processing and adjudication
of all disputes that arise as a consequence of elections. The commission shall
adopt rules that provide for at least the following:

(a) Secret balloting;

(b) Consulting with
employee organizations;

(c) Access to lists of
employees, job classification, work locations, and home mailing addresses;

(d) Absentee voting;

(e) Procedures for the
greatest possible participation in voting;

(f) Campaigning on the
employer's property during working hours; and

(g) Election observers.

(2)(a) If an employee
organization has been certified as the exclusive bargaining representative of
the employees of a bargaining unit, the employee organization may act for and
negotiate master collective bargaining agreements that will include within the
coverage of the agreement all employees in the bargaining unit as provided in
section 302(2)(a) of this act. However, if a master collective bargaining
agreement is in effect for the exclusive bargaining representative, it shall
apply to the bargaining unit for which the certification has been issued.
Nothing in this section requires the parties to engage in new negotiations
during the term of that agreement.

(b) This subsection (2)
does not apply to exclusive bargaining representatives who represent employees
of institutions of higher education.

(3) The certified
exclusive bargaining representative shall be responsible for representing the
interests of all the employees in the bargaining unit. This section shall not
be construed to limit an exclusive representative's right to exercise its
discretion to refuse to process grievances of employees that are unmeritorious.

(4) No question
concerning representation may be raised if:

(a) Fewer than twelve
months have elapsed since the last certification or election; or

(b) A valid collective
bargaining agreement exists covering the unit, except for that period of no
more than one hundred twenty calendar days nor less than ninety calendar days
before the expiration of the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
310. IMPASSE. Should the
parties fail to reach agreement in negotiating a collective bargaining
agreement, either party may request of the commission the assistance of an
impartial third party to mediate the negotiations.

If a collective
bargaining agreement previously negotiated under this chapter should expire
while negotiations are underway, the terms and conditions specified in the
collective bargaining agreement shall remain in effect for a period not to
exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement. Thereafter,
the employer may unilaterally implement according to law.

If resolution is not
reached through mediation by one hundred days beyond the expiration date of a
contract previously negotiated under this chapter, or one hundred days from the
initiation of mediated negotiations if no such contract exists, an independent
fact-finder shall be appointed by the commission.

The fact-finder shall
meet with the parties or their representatives, or both, and make inquiries and
investigations, hold hearings, and take such other steps as may be
appropriate. If the dispute is not settled, the fact-finder shall make
findings of fact and recommend terms of settlement within thirty days.

Such recommendations,
together with the findings of fact, shall be submitted in writing to the
parties and the commission privately before they are made public. The
commission, the fact-finder, the employer, or the exclusive bargaining
representative may make such findings and recommendations public if the dispute
is not settled within ten working days after their receipt from the
fact-finder.

Nothing in this section
shall be construed to prohibit an employer and an exclusive bargaining
representative from agreeing to substitute, at their own expense, their own
procedure for resolving impasses in collective bargaining for that provided in
this section or from agreeing to utilize for the purposes of this section any
other governmental or other agency or person in lieu of the commission.

Costs for mediator
services shall be borne by the commission, and costs for fact-finding shall be
borne equally by the negotiating parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
311. UNION SECURITY. (1) A
collective bargaining agreement may contain a union security provision
requiring as a condition of employment the payment, no later than the thirtieth
day following the beginning of employment or the effective date of this
section, whichever is later, of an agency shop fee to the employee organization
that is the exclusive bargaining representative for the bargaining unit in
which the employee is employed. The amount of the fee shall be equal to the
amount required to become a member in good standing of the employee
organization. Each employee organization shall establish a procedure by which
any employee so requesting may pay a representation fee no greater than the
part of the membership fee that represents a pro rata share of expenditures for
purposes germane to the collective bargaining process, to contract
administration, or to pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and other
conditions of employment.

(2) An employee who is
covered by a union security provision and who asserts a right of nonassociation
based on bona fide religious tenets, or teachings of a church or religious body
of which the employee is a member, shall, as a condition of employment, make
payments to the employee organization, for purposes within the program of the
employee organization as designated by the employee that would be in harmony
with his or her individual conscience. The amount of the payments shall be
equal to the periodic dues and fees uniformly required as a condition of
acquiring or retaining membership in the employee organization minus any
included monthly premiums for insurance programs sponsored by the employee
organization. The employee shall not be a member of the employee organization
but is entitled to all the representation rights of a member of the employee
organization.

(3) Upon filing with
the employer the written authorization of a bargaining unit employee under this
chapter, the employee organization that is the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit shall have the exclusive right to have
deducted from the salary of the employee an amount equal to the fees and dues
uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the
employee organization. The fees and dues shall be deducted each pay period
from the pay of all employees who have given authorization for the deduction
and shall be transmitted by the employer as provided for by agreement between
the employer and the employee organization.

(4) Employee
organizations that before the effective date of this section were entitled to
the benefits of this section shall continue to be entitled to these benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
312. UNFAIR LABOR PRACTICES
ENUMERATED. (1) It is an unfair labor practice for an employer:

(a) To interfere with,
restrain, or coerce employees in the exercise of the rights guaranteed by this
chapter;

(b) To dominate or
interfere with the formation or administration of any employee organization or
contribute financial or other support to it: PROVIDED, That subject to rules
adopted by the commission, an employer shall not be prohibited from permitting
employees to confer with it or its representatives or agents during working
hours without loss of time or pay;

(c) To encourage or
discourage membership in any employee organization by discrimination in regard
to hire, tenure of employment, or any term or condition of employment;

(d) To discharge or
discriminate otherwise against an employee because that employee has filed
charges or given testimony under this chapter;

(e) To refuse to
bargain collectively with the representatives of its employees.

(2) It is an unfair labor
practice for an employee organization:

(a) To restrain or
coerce an employee in the exercise of the rights guaranteed by this chapter:
PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not impair the right of an employee
organization to prescribe its own rules with respect to the acquisition or
retention of membership in the employee organization or to an employer in the
selection of its representatives for the purpose of bargaining or the
adjustment of grievances;

(b) To cause or attempt
to cause an employer to discriminate against an employee in violation of
subsection (1)(c) of this section;

(c) To discriminate
against an employee because that employee has filed charges or given testimony
under this chapter;

(d) To refuse to
bargain collectively with an employer.

(3) The expressing of
any views, arguments, or opinion, or the dissemination thereof to the public,
whether in written, printed, graphic, or visual form, shall not constitute or
be evidence of an unfair labor practice under this chapter, if such expression
contains no threat of reprisal or force or promise of benefit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
313. UNFAIR LABOR PRACTICE
PROCEDURES. (1) The commission is empowered and directed to prevent any unfair
labor practice and to issue appropriate remedial orders: PROVIDED, That a
complaint shall not be processed for any unfair labor practice occurring more
than six months before the filing of the complaint with the commission. This
power shall not be affected or impaired by any means of adjustment, mediation,
or conciliation in labor disputes that have been or may hereafter be
established by law.

(2) If the commission
determines that any person has engaged in or is engaging in an unfair labor
practice, the commission shall issue and cause to be served upon the person an
order requiring the person to cease and desist from such unfair labor practice,
and to take such affirmative action as will effectuate the purposes and policy
of this chapter, such as the payment of damages and the reinstatement of
employees.

(3) The commission may
petition the superior court for the county in which the main office of the
employer is located or in which the person who has engaged or is engaging in
such unfair labor practice resides or transacts business, for the enforcement
of its order and for appropriate temporary relief.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
314. ENFORCEMENT OF COLLECTIVE
BARGAINING AGREEMENTS. (1) For the purposes of implementing final and binding
arbitration under grievance procedures required by section 304 of this act, the
parties to a collective bargaining agreement may agree on one or more permanent
umpires to serve as arbitrator, or may agree on any impartial person to serve
as arbitrator, or may agree to select arbitrators from any source available to
them, including federal and private agencies, in addition to the staff and list
of arbitrators maintained by the commission. If the parties cannot agree to
the selection of an arbitrator, the commission shall supply a list of names in
accordance with the procedures established by the commission.

(2) An arbitrator may
require any person to attend as a witness and to bring with him or her any
book, record, document, or other evidence. The fees for such attendance shall be
paid by the party requesting issuance of the subpoena and shall be the same as
the fees of witnesses in the superior court. Arbitrators may administer
oaths. Subpoenas shall issue and be signed by the arbitrator and shall be
served in the same manner as subpoenas to testify before a court of record in
this state. If any person so summoned to testify refuses or neglects to obey
such subpoena, upon petition authorized by the arbitrator, the superior court
may compel the attendance of the person before the arbitrator or punish the
person for contempt in the same manner provided for the attendance of witnesses
or the punishment of them in the courts of this state.

(3) The arbitrator
shall appoint a time and place for the hearing and notify the parties thereof,
and may adjourn the hearing from time to time as may be necessary, and, on
application of either party and for good cause, may postpone the hearing to a
time not extending beyond the date fixed by the collective bargaining agreement
for making the award. The arbitration award shall be in writing and signed by
the arbitrator. The arbitrator shall, promptly upon its rendition, serve a
true copy of the award on each of the parties or their attorneys of record.

(4) If a party to a
collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter refuses to submit
a grievance for arbitration, the other party to the collective bargaining
agreement may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court of Thurston county
or of any county in which the labor dispute exists and such court shall have
jurisdiction to issue an order compelling arbitration. Disputes concerning
compliance with grievance procedures shall be reserved for determination by the
arbitrator. Arbitration shall be ordered if the grievance states a claim that
on its face is covered by the collective bargaining agreement. Doubts as to
the coverage of the arbitration clause shall be resolved in favor of
arbitration.

(5) If a party to a
collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter refuses to comply
with the award of an arbitrator determining a grievance arising under the
collective bargaining agreement, the other party to the collective bargaining
agreement may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court of Thurston county
or of any county in which the labor dispute exists and such court shall have
jurisdiction to issue an order enforcing the arbitration award.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
315. All powers, duties, and
functions of the department of personnel pertaining to collective bargaining
are transferred to the public employment relations commission except mediation
of grievances and contracts, arbitration of grievances and contracts, and
unfair labor practices, filed under a collective bargaining agreement existing
before the effective date of this section. Any mediation, arbitration, or
unfair labor practice issue filed between July 1, 2004, and July 1, 2005, under
a collective bargaining agreement existing before the effective date of this
section, shall be resolved by the Washington personnel resources board in
accordance with the authorities, rules, and procedures that were established
under RCW 41.06.150(11) as it existed before the effective date of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
316. All reports, documents,
surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession
of the department of personnel pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred in section 315 of this act shall be delivered to the custody of the
public employment relations commission. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
department of personnel in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred in section 315 of this act shall be made available to the public
employment relations commission. All funds, credits, leases, and other assets
held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred in
section 315 of this act shall be assigned to the public employment relations
commission.

Any appropriations made
to the department of personnel for carrying out the powers, functions, and
duties transferred in section 315 of this act shall be deleted at the time that
such powers, functions, and duties are transferred to the public employment
relations commission. All funding required to perform these transferred
powers, functions, and duties is to be provided by the public employment
relations commission once the transfers occur.

Whenever any question
arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records,
papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the
exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as
to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
317. After the effective date
of this section, the director of personnel and the executive director of the
public employment relations commission shall meet and agree upon a schedule for
the transfer of department of personnel labor relation employees and property
to the commission. Whenever a question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial
management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify
the same to the state agencies concerned.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
318. All business pending
before the department of personnel pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred in section 315 of this act shall be continued and acted upon
by the public employment relations commission. All existing contracts and
obligations of the department of personnel, pertaining to collective
bargaining, shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the public
employment relations commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
319. The transfer of the
powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of personnel shall
not affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
320. If apportionments of
budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by sections 316
through 319 of this act, the director of financial management shall certify the
apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with
the certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
321. DEFINITIONS. Unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1) "Agency"
means any agency as defined in RCW 41.06.020 and covered by chapter 41.06 RCW.

(2) "Collective
bargaining" means the performance of the mutual obligation of the
representatives of the employer and the exclusive bargaining representative to
meet at reasonable times and to bargain in good faith in an effort to reach
agreement with respect to the subjects of bargaining specified under section
303 of this act. The obligation to bargain does not compel either party to
agree to a proposal or to make a concession, except as otherwise provided in
this chapter.

(3) "Commission"
means the public employment relations commission.

(4) "Confidential
employee" means an employee who, in the regular course of his or her
duties, assists in a confidential capacity persons who formulate, determine,
and effectuate management policies with regard to labor relations or who, in
the regular course of his or her duties, has authorized access to information
relating to the effectuation or review of the employer's collective bargaining
policies, or who assists or aids a manager. "Confidential employee"
also includes employees who assist assistant attorneys general who advise and
represent managers or confidential employees in personnel or labor relations
matters, or who advise or represent the state in tort actions.

(5)
"Director" means the director of the public employment relations
commission.

(6)
"Employee" means any employee, including employees whose work has
ceased in connection with the pursuit of lawful activities protected by this
chapter, covered by chapter 41.06 RCW, except:

(a) Employees covered
for collective bargaining by chapter 41.56 RCW;

(b) Confidential
employees;

(c) Members of the
Washington management service;

(d) Internal auditors
in any agency; or

(e) Any employee of the
commission, the office of financial management, or the department of personnel.

(7) "Employee
organization" means any organization, union, or association in which
employees participate and that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of
collective bargaining with employers.

(8)
"Employer" means the state of Washington.

(9) "Exclusive
bargaining representative" means any employee organization that has been
certified under this chapter as the representative of the employees in an
appropriate bargaining unit.

(10) "Institutions
of higher education" means the University of Washington, Washington State
University, Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University,
Western Washington University, The Evergreen State College, and the various
state community colleges.

(11) "Labor
dispute" means any controversy concerning terms, tenure, or conditions of
employment, or concerning the association or representation of persons in
negotiating, fixing, maintaining, changing, or seeking to arrange terms or
conditions of employment with respect to the subjects of bargaining provided in
this chapter, regardless of whether the disputants stand in the proximate
relation of employer and employee.

(12)
"Manager" means "manager" as defined in RCW 41.06.022.

(13)
"Supervisor" means an employee who has authority, in the interest of
the employer, to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge,
direct, reward, or discipline employees, or to adjust employee grievances, or
effectively to recommend such action, if the exercise of the authority is not
of a merely routine nature but requires the consistent exercise of individual
judgment. However, no employee who is a member of the Washington management
service may be included in a collective bargaining unit established under this
section.

(14) "Unfair labor
practice" means any unfair labor practice listed in section 312 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
322. OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT'S LABOR RELATIONS SERVICE ACCOUNT. (1) The office of financial
management's labor relations service account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer to be used as a revolving fund for the payment of labor
relations services required for the negotiation of the collective bargaining
agreements entered into under this chapter. An amount not to exceed one
percent of the approved allotments of salaries and wages for all bargaining
unit positions in the classified service in each of the agencies subject to
this chapter, except the institutions of higher education, shall be charged to
the operations appropriations of each agency and credited to the office of
financial management's labor relations service account as the allotments are
approved pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. Subject to the above limitations, the
amount shall be charged against the allotments pro rata, at a rate to be fixed
by the director of financial management from time to time. Payment for
services rendered under this chapter shall be made on a quarterly basis to the
state treasurer and deposited into the office of financial management's labor
relations service account.

(2) Moneys from the
office of financial management's labor relations service account shall be
disbursed by the state treasurer by warrants on vouchers authorized by the
director of financial management or the director's designee. An appropriation
is not required.

PART
IV

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 41.06.163 (Comprehensive salary and
fringe benefit survey plan required--Contents) and 1993 c 281 s 30, 1987 c 185
s 9, 1986 c 158 s 6, 1979 c 151 s 59, & 1977 ex.s. c 152 s 3; and

(2) RCW 41.06.165 (Salary surveys--Criteria)
and 1977 ex.s. c 152 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed:

(1) RCW 41.06.140 (Employee participation in
policy and rule making, administration, etc.--Publication of board rules) and
1961 c 1 s 14;

(2) RCW 41.50.804 (Existing collective
bargaining agreements not affected) and 2002 c . . . s 228 (section
228 of this act), 1993 c 281 s 40, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 17; and

(3) RCW 41.06.520 (Administration,
management of institutions of higher education--Rules--Audit and review by
board) and 1993 c 281 s 11.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
403. The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed:

(1) RCW 41.06.380 (Purchasing services by
contract not prohibited--Limitations) and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 2;

(2) RCW 41.06.382 (Purchasing services by
contract not prohibited--Limitations) and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 1;

(3) RCW 41.56.023 (Application of chapter to
employees of institutions of higher education) and 1993 c 379 s 301;

(4) RCW 41.56.201 (Employees of institutions
of higher education--Option to have relationship and obligations governed by
chapter) and 2000 c 19 s 2 & 1993 c 379 s 304; and

(5) RCW 28B.16.015 (Option to have
relationship and obligations governed by chapter 41.56 RCW) and 1993 c 379 s
310.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
404. The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed:

(1) RCW 41.64.010 (Personnel appeals
board--Created--Membership--Definitions) and 1981 c 311 s 1;

(2) RCW 41.64.020 (Removal of
members--Hearing) and 1981 c 311 s 3;

(3) RCW 41.64.030 (Compensation of
members--Travel expenses--Disclosure of financial affairs) and 1984 c 287 s 73,
1984 c 34 s 4, & 1981 c 311 s 4;

(4) RCW 41.64.040 (Election of
chairperson--Biennial meetings) and 1981 c 311 s 5;

(5) RCW 41.64.050 (Executive
secretary--Appointment of assistants) and 1981 c 311 s 6;

(6) RCW 41.64.060 (Location of principal
office--Hearings--Procedure) and 1981 c 311 s 7;

(7) RCW 41.64.070 (Journal of official
actions) and 1981 c 311 s 8;

(8) RCW 41.64.080 (Employee
appeals--Hearings examiners) and 1981 c 311 s 9;

(9) RCW 41.64.090 (Employee
appeals--Jurisdiction) and 1993 c 281 s 41 & 1981 c 311 s 10;

(10) RCW 41.64.100 (Employee
appeals--Hearing--Decision to be rendered within ninety days, exceptions) and
1997 c 386 s 43 & 1981 c 311 s 11;

(11) RCW 41.64.110 (Employee
appeals--Hearing--Procedure--Official record) and 1985 c 461 s 7 & 1981 c
311 s 12;

(12) RCW 41.64.120 (Employee
appeals--Findings of fact, conclusions of law, order--Notice to employee and
employing agency) and 1981 c 311 s 13;

(13) RCW 41.64.130 (Employee appeals--Review
by superior court--Grounds--Notice, service--Certified transcript) and 1981 c
311 s 14;

(14) RCW 41.64.140 (Employee appeals--Review by
superior court--Procedure--Appellate review) and 1988 c 202 s 42 & 1981 c
311 s 15; and

(15) RCW 41.64.910 (Severability--1981 c 311)
and 1981 c 311 s 24.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
405. SECTION CAPTIONS. Part
headings and section captions used in this act do not constitute part of the
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
406. Sections 301 through 322
of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
407. The governor shall take
such action as is necessary to ensure that sections 301 through 314 of this act
are implemented on their effective dates.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
408. Until July 1, 2004, the
public employment relations commission is authorized to contract with the
department of personnel for labor relations staffing necessary to carry out its
functions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
409. (1) Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 301 of this act, the parties to collective bargaining to
be conducted under sections 301 through 314 of this act shall meet by September
1, 2003, to identify those payroll-related bargaining issues that affect the
capacity of the central state payroll system, as determined by the department
of personnel. The parties shall agree on which bargaining issues will be
bargained in a coalition of employee representatives and will be agreed to
uniformly in each collective bargaining agreement. This agreement is effective
only for collective bargaining agreements entered into for implementation
during the 2005-2007 biennium. The purpose of the agreement is to minimize the
risk to the payroll system resulting from agreements reached in the first round
of collective bargaining under this act.

(2) This section
expires June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
410. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder
of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
411. (1) Sections 203, 204,
213 through 223, 227, 229 through 231, 241, 243, 246, 248, 301 through 307, 309
through 316, 318, 319, and 402 of this act take effect July 1, 2004.

(2) Section 224 of this
act takes effect March 15, 2005.

(3) Sections 208, 234
through 238, and 403 of this act take effect July 1, 2005.

(4) Sections 225, 226,
233, and 404 of this act take effect July 1, 2006.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 412. Section 230 of this act
expires June 30, 2015.

---
END ---