BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 10.40

_8 RCW to read as follows:

_9 (1) At the arraignment of any defendant who is being
charged

10 with a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the
court shall

11 issue a no-contact order as a condition of any pretrial
release

12 prohibiting the defendant from having any contact with
the alleged

13 victim or initiating any contact with any other member
of the

14 alleged victim's family. The no-contact order must
include a

15 provision that the defendant shall not knowingly reside
within one

16 mile of the residence of the alleged victim or knowingly
come

17 within, or knowingly remain within, one thousand feet
from the

18 residence of the alleged victim.

p. 1 HB
1270

_1 (2)(a) Willful violation of a court order issued
under this

_2 section is punishable under RCW 26.50.110.

_3 (b) The written order releasing the person charged
shall

_4 contain the court's directives and shall bear the

_5 legend: "Violation of this order is a criminal
offense under

_6 chapter 26.50 RCW and will subject a violator to arrest;
any

_7 assault, drive-by shooting, or reckless endangerment
that is a

_8 violation of this order is a felony. You can be
arrested even if

_9 any person protected by the order invites or allows you
to violate

10 the order's prohibitions. You have the sole
responsibility to avoid

11 or refrain from violating the order's provisions. Only
the court

12 can change the order."

13 (c) A certified copy of the order shall be provided
to the

14 victim.

15 (3) Whenever a no-contact order is issued, modified,
or

16 terminated under this section, the clerk of the court
shall

17 forward a copy of the order on or before the next
judicial day to

18 the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the
order. Upon

19 receipt of the copy of the order the law enforcement
agency shall

20 enter the order for one year or until the expiration
date

21 specified on the order into any computer-based criminal

22 intelligence information system available in this state
used by

23 law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants.
Entry into

24 the computer-based criminal intelligence information
system

25 constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of
the

26 existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable
in any

27 jurisdiction in the state. Upon receipt of notice that
an order has

28 been terminated under this section, the law enforcement
agency

29 shall remove the order from the computer-based criminal

30 intelligence information system.

31 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 13.40

32 RCW to read as follows:

33 Upon the filing of an information charging a
juvenile with a

34 sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the court shall
issue a

35 no-contact order prohibiting the respondent from having
any

36 contact with the alleged victim or initiating any
contact with any

37 other member of the alleged victim's family. The
no-contact order

HB 1270 p. 2

_1 must include a provision that the respondent shall not
knowingly

_2 reside within one mile of the residence of the alleged
victim or

_3 knowingly come within, or knowingly remain within, one
thousand

_4 feet from the residence of the alleged victim.

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 72.04A

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 In making all discretionary decisions regarding
release plans

_8 for and supervision of sex offenders, the department of

_9 corrections shall impose a no-contact requirement as a
condition

10 of any release prohibiting the defendant from having any
contact

11 with the victim or initiating any contact with any other
member of

12 the victim's family. The no-contact requirement shall
include a

13 provision that the defendant shall not knowingly reside
within one

14 mile of the residence of the victim or knowingly come
within, or

15 knowingly remain within, one thousand feet from the
residence of

16 the victim.

17 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is
added to chapter 9.95 RCW

18 to read as follows:

19 In making all discretionary decisions regarding
release plans

20 for and supervision of sex offenders, the board shall
impose a no-

21 contact requirement as a condition of any release
prohibiting the

22 defendant from having any contact with the victim or
initiating

23 any contact with any other member of the victim's
family. The no-

24 contact requirement shall include a provision that the
defendant

25 shall not knowingly reside within one mile of the
residence of the

26 victim or knowingly come within, or knowingly remain
within, one

27 thousand feet from the residence of the victim.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1270