BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 7.68.060 and 1996 c
122 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
applying for benefits under this chapter, the rights, privileges,
responsibilities, duties, limitations and procedures contained in RCW
51.28.020, 51.28.030, 51.28.040 and 51.28.060 shall apply: PROVIDED, That except
for applications received pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, no
compensation of any kind shall be available under this chapter if:

(a) An application for
benefits is not received by the department within two years after the date the
criminal act was reported to a local police department or sheriff's office or
the date the rights of dependents or beneficiaries accrued, unless the director
has determined that "good cause" exists to expand the time permitted
to receive the application. "Good cause" shall be determined by the
department on a case-by-case basis and may extend the period of time in which
an application can be received for up to five years after the date the criminal
act was reported to a local police department or sheriff's office or the date
the rights of dependents or beneficiaries accrued; or

(b) The criminal act is
not reported by the victim or someone on his or her behalf to a local police
department or sheriff's office within twelve months of its occurrence or, if it
could not reasonably have been reported within that period, within twelve months
of the time when a report could reasonably have been made. In making
determinations as to reasonable time limits, the department shall give greatest
weight to the needs of the victims.

(2) This section shall
apply only to criminal acts reported after December 31, 1985.

(3) Because victims of
childhood criminal acts may repress conscious memory of such criminal acts far
beyond the age of eighteen, the rights of adult victims of childhood criminal
acts shall accrue at the time the victim discovers or reasonably should have
discovered the elements of the crime. In making determinations as to
reasonable time limits, the department shall give greatest weight to the needs
of the victim.

(4) A
right to benefits under this chapter is available to any victim of a person
against whom the state initiates proceedings under chapter 71.09 RCW. The
right created under this subsection shall accrue when the victim is notified of
proceedings under chapter 71.09 RCW or the victim is interviewed, deposed, or
testifies as a witness in connection with the proceedings. An application for
benefits under this subsection must be received by the department within two
years after the date the victim's right accrued unless the director determines
that good cause exists to expand the time to receive the application. The
director shall determine "good cause" on a case-by-case basis and may
extend the period of time in which an application can be received for up to five
years after the date the right of the victim accrued. Benefits under this
subsection shall be limited to compensation for costs or losses incurred on or
after the date the victim's right accrues for a claim allowed under this
subsection.

--- END ---