BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
13.64.040 and 1993 c 294 s 4 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 The hearing on the petition shall be before a judge or
superior

_7 court commissioner of a unified family court,
sitting without a

_8 jury. Prior to the presentation of proof the judge or
superior

_9 court commissioner of a unified family court
shall determine

10 whether: (1) The petitioning minor understands the
consequences of

11 the petition regarding his or her legal rights and

12 responsibilities; (2) a guardian ad litem should be
appointed to

13 investigate the allegations of the petition and file a
report with

14 the court.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SHB
1274