BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 2.56.010
and 1984 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read as

_5 follows:

_6 There shall be a state office to be known as the
office of

_7 administrator for the courts who shall be appointed by
the supreme

_8 court of this state from a list of five persons
submitted by the

_9 governor of the state of Washington, and shall hold office
at the

10 pleasure of the appointing power. ((He shall not be
over the age of

11 sixty years at the time of his appointment. He shall
receive a))

12 The administrator's salary ((to)) shall
be fixed by the supreme

13 court.

14 Sec. 2. RCW 2.56.020
and 1957 c 259 s 2 are each amended to read

15 as follows:

16 The administrator for the courts, with the approval
of the

17 chief justice of the supreme court of this state, shall
appoint

p. 1 SHB
1275

_1 and fix the compensation of such assistants as are
necessary to

_2 enable ((him to perform)) performance of
the power and duties

_3 vested in ((him. During his term of office or
employment,)) the

_4 office of administrator for the courts. Neither
the administrator

_5 nor any assistant shall engage ((directly or
indirectly)) in the

_6 practice of law for remuneration in this state. This
section does

_7 not prohibit the administrator or an assistant from
providing pro

_8 bono legal services or from providing legal services
for himself

_9 or herself or immediate family members.

10 Sec. 3. RCW 2.56.030
and 1997 c 41 s 2 are each amended to read as

11 follows:

12 The administrator for the courts shall, under the
supervision

13 and direction of the chief justice:

14 (1) Examine the administrative methods and systems
employed in

15 the offices of the judges, clerks, stenographers, and
employees of

16 the courts and make recommendations, through the chief
justice,

17 for the improvement of the same;

18 (2) Examine the state of the dockets of the courts
and

19 determine the need for assistance by any court;

20 (3) Make recommendations to the chief justice
relating to the

21 assignment of judges where courts are in need of
assistance and

22 carry out the direction of the chief justice as to the
assignments

23 of judges to counties and districts where the courts are
in need

24 of assistance;

25 (4) Collect and compile statistical and other data
and make

26 reports of the business transacted by the courts and
transmit the

27 same to the chief justice to the end that proper action
may be

28 taken in respect thereto;

29 (5) Prepare and submit budget estimates of state appropriations

30 necessary for the maintenance and operation of the
judicial system

31 and make recommendations in respect thereto;

32 (6) Collect statistical and other data and make
reports

33 relating to the expenditure of public moneys, state and
local, for

34 the maintenance and operation of the judicial system and
the

35 offices connected therewith;

36 (7) Obtain reports from clerks of courts in
accordance with law

37 or rules adopted by the supreme court of this state on
cases and

SHB 1275 p. 2

_1 other judicial business in which action has been delayed
beyond

_2 periods of time specified by law or rules of court and
make report

_3 thereof to supreme court of this state;

_4 (8) Act as secretary of the judicial conference
referred to in

_5 RCW 2.56.060;

_6 (9) Submit annually, as of February 1st, to the
chief justice,

_7 a report of the activities of the administrator's office
for the

_8 preceding calendar year including activities related to
courthouse

_9 security;

10 (10) Administer programs and standards for the
training and

11 education of judicial personnel;

12 (11) Examine the need for new superior court and
district judge

13 positions under a weighted caseload analysis that takes
into

14 account the time required to hear all the cases in a
particular

15 court and the amount of time existing judges have
available to

16 hear cases in that court. The results of the weighted
caseload

17 analysis shall be reviewed by the board for judicial

18 administration which shall make recommendations to the

19 legislature. It is the intent of the legislature that
weighted

20 caseload analysis become the basis for creating
additional

21 district court positions, and recommendations should
address that

22 objective;

23 (12) Provide staff to the judicial retirement
account plan

24 under chapter 2.14 RCW;

25 (13) Attend to such other matters as may be assigned
by the

26 supreme court of this state;

27 (14) Within available funds, develop a curriculum
for a general

28 understanding of child development, placement, and
treatment

29 resources, as well as specific legal skills and
knowledge of

30 relevant statutes including chapters 13.32A, 13.34, and
13.40 RCW,

31 cases, court rules, interviewing skills, and special
needs of the

32 abused or neglected child. This curriculum shall be
completed and

33 made available to all juvenile court judges, court
personnel, and

34 service providers and be updated yearly to reflect
changes in

35 statutes, court rules, or case law;

36 (15) Develop, in consultation with the entities set
forth in

37 RCW 2.56.150(3), a comprehensive statewide curriculum
for persons

38 who act as guardians ad litem under Title 13 or 26 RCW.
The

p. 3 SHB
1275

_1 curriculum shall be made available July 1, 1997, and
include

_2 specialty sections on child development, child sexual
abuse, child

_3 physical abuse, child neglect, clinical and forensic
investigative

_4 and interviewing techniques, family reconciliation and
mediation

_5 services, and relevant statutory and legal
requirements. The

_6 curriculum shall be made available to all superior court
judges,

_7 court personnel, and all persons who act as guardians ad
litem;

_8 (16) Develop a curriculum for a general
understanding of crimes

_9 of malicious harassment, as well as specific legal
skills and

10 knowledge of RCW 9A.36.080, relevant cases, court rules,
and the

11 special needs of malicious harassment victims. This
curriculum

12 shall be made available to all superior court and court
of appeals

13 judges and to all justices of the supreme court;

14 (17) Develop, in consultation with the criminal
justice

15 training commission and the commissions established
under chapters

16 43.113, 43.115, and 43.117 RCW, a curriculum for a
general

17 understanding of ethnic and cultural diversity and its

18 implications for working with youth of color and their
families.

19 The curriculum shall be available to all superior court
judges and

20 court commissioners assigned to juvenile court, and
other court

21 personnel. Ethnic and cultural diversity training shall
be provided

22 annually so as to incorporate cultural sensitivity and
awareness

23 into the daily operation of juvenile courts statewide;

24 (18) Authorize the use of closed circuit television
and other

25 electronic equipment in judicial proceedings. The
administrator

26 shall promulgate necessary standards and procedures and
shall

27 provide technical assistance to courts as required;

28 (19) Periodically undertake an assessment of the
unmet civil

29 legal needs of low-income people in the state,
including the needs

30 of persons who suffer disparate access barriers, and
develop a

31 funding plan to meet the civil legal needs of such
persons. The

32 assessment should be conducted in consultation with
the Washington

33 state bar association and the access to justice
board;

34 (20) Administer state funds as may be
appropriated for

35 improving the operation of the courts and provide
support for

36 court coordinating councils, under the direction of
the board for

37 judicial administration.

SHB 1275 p. 4

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The sum of five
hundred thousand dollars,

_2 or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
for the

_3 biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the public safety
and

_4 education account to the office of administrator for the
courts,

_5 under the direction of the board of judicial
administration,

_6 solely for the support of court coordinating council
planning

_7 activities.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SHB
1275