BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 59.18.060 and 1991 c
154 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The landlord will at
all times during the tenancy keep the premises fit for human habitation, and
shall in particular:

(1) Maintain the
premises to substantially comply with any applicable code, statute, ordinance,
or regulation governing their maintenance or operation, which the legislative
body enacting the applicable code, statute, ordinance or regulation could
enforce as to the premises rented if such condition substantially endangers or
impairs the health or safety of the tenant;

(2) Maintain the roofs,
floors, walls, chimneys, fireplaces, foundations, and all other structural
components in reasonably good repair so as to be usable and capable of resisting
any and all normal forces and loads to which they may be subjected;

(3) Keep any shared or
common areas reasonably clean, sanitary, and safe from defects increasing the
hazards of fire or accident;

(4) Provide a
reasonable program for the control of infestation by insects, rodents, and
other pests at the initiation of the tenancy and, except in the case of a
single family residence, control infestation during tenancy except where such
infestation is caused by the tenant;

(5) Except where the
condition is attributable to normal wear and tear, make repairs and
arrangements necessary to put and keep the premises in as good condition as it
by law or rental agreement should have been, at the commencement of the
tenancy;

(6) Provide reasonably
adequate locks and furnish keys to the tenant;

(7) Maintain all
electrical, plumbing, heating, and other facilities and appliances supplied by
him in reasonably good working order;

(8) Maintain the
dwelling unit in reasonably weathertight condition;

(9) Except in the case
of a single family residence, provide and maintain appropriate receptacles in
common areas for the removal of ashes, rubbish, and garbage, incidental to the
occupancy and arrange for the reasonable and regular removal of such waste;

(10) Except where the
building is not equipped for the purpose, provide facilities adequate to supply
heat and water and hot water as reasonably required by the tenant;

(11) Provide a written
notice to the tenant that the dwelling unit is equipped with a smoke detection
device as required in RCW 48.48.140. The notice shall inform the tenant of the
tenant's responsibility to maintain the smoke detection device in proper
operating condition and of penalties for failure to comply with the provisions
of RCW 48.48.140(3). The notice must be signed by the landlord or the
landlord's authorized agent and tenant with copies provided to both parties((.));

(12)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, designate to the tenant the name and
address of the person who is the landlord by a statement on the rental
agreement or by a notice conspicuously posted on the premises. The tenant
shall be notified immediately of any changes by certified mail or by an updated
posting. If the person designated in this section does not reside in the state
where the premises are located, there shall also be designated a person who
resides in the county who is authorized to act as an agent for the purposes of
service of notices and process, and if no designation is made of a person to
act as agent, then the person to whom rental payments are to be made shall be
considered such agent.

(b) In instances
where a tenant is unable to ascertain the physical location of the landlord by
statement or posting, and service of a legal document is deemed necessary, the
superior or district court having jurisdiction under RCW 59.18.050 shall
approve the service of the legal document by certified mail to the address
posted on the property owner's tax statement, or address provided to the tenant
for payment of rent.

No duty shall devolve
upon the landlord to repair a defective condition under this section, nor shall
any defense or remedy be available to the tenant under this chapter, where the
defective condition complained of was caused by the conduct of such tenant, his
family, invitee, or other person acting under his control, or where a tenant
unreasonably fails to allow the landlord access to the property for purposes of
repair. When the duty imposed by subsection (1) of this section is
incompatible with and greater than the duty imposed by any other provisions of
this section, the landlord's duty shall be determined pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 4.28.080 and 1997 c
380 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Service made in the
modes provided in this section shall be taken and held to be personal service.
The summons shall be served by delivering a copy thereof, as follows:

(1) If the action be
against any county in this state, to the county auditor or, during normal
office hours, to the deputy auditor, or in the case of a charter county,
summons may be served upon the agent, if any, designated by the legislative
authority.

(2) If against any town
or incorporated city in the state, to the mayor, city manager, or, during
normal office hours, to the mayor's or city manager's designated agent or the
city clerk thereof.

(3) If against a school
or fire district, to the superintendent or commissioner thereof or by leaving
the same in his or her office with an assistant superintendent, deputy
commissioner, or business manager during normal business hours.

(4) If against a
railroad corporation, to any station, freight, ticket or other agent thereof
within this state.

(5) If against a
corporation owning or operating sleeping cars, or hotel cars, to any person
having charge of any of its cars or any agent found within the state.

(6) If against a
domestic insurance company, to any agent authorized by such company to solicit
insurance within this state.

(7) If against a
foreign or alien insurance company, as provided in chapter 48.05 RCW.

(8) If against a
company or corporation doing any express business, to any agent authorized by
said company or corporation to receive and deliver express matters and collect
pay therefor within this state.

(9) If the suit be
against a company or corporation other than those designated in the preceding
subdivisions of this section, to the president or other head of the company or
corporation, the registered agent, secretary, cashier or managing agent thereof
or to the secretary, stenographer or office assistant of the president or other
head of the company or corporation, registered agent, secretary, cashier or
managing agent.

(10) If the suit be
against a foreign corporation or nonresident joint stock company, partnership
or association doing business within this state, to any agent, cashier or
secretary thereof.

(11) If against a minor
under the age of fourteen years, to such minor personally, and also to his or
her father, mother, guardian, or if there be none within this state, then to
any person having the care or control of such minor, or with whom he or she
resides, or in whose service he or she is employed, if such there be.

(12) If against any
person for whom a guardian has been appointed for any cause, then to such
guardian.

(13) If against a
foreign or alien steamship company or steamship charterer, to any agent
authorized by such company or charterer to solicit cargo or passengers for
transportation to or from ports in the state of Washington.

(14) If against a self‑insurance
program regulated by chapter 48.62 RCW, as provided in chapter 48.62 RCW.

(15) In all other
cases, to the defendant personally, or by leaving a copy of the summons at the
house of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion
then resident therein.

(16) In
lieu of service under subsection (15) of this section, where the person cannot
with reasonable diligence be served as described, the summons may be served as
provided in this subsection, and shall be deemed complete on the tenth day
after the required mailing: By leaving a copy at his or her usual mailing
address with a person of suitable age and discretion who is a resident,
proprietor, or agent thereof, and by thereafter mailing a copy by first class
mail, postage prepaid, to the person to be served at his or her usual mailing
address. For the purposes of this subsection, "usual mailing
address" shall not include a United States postal service post office box,
except as provided in RCW 59.18.060, or the person's place of employment.

---
END ---