BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.40.0301 and 1994
c 301 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon review by any
court, or appellate body, of a determination of the valuation of property for
purposes of taxation, when the increase in valuation is two percent or less
per year, it shall be presumed that the determination of the public
official charged with the duty of establishing ((such)) this
value is correct but this presumption shall not be a defense against any
correction indicated by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence. When
the increase in valuation is more than two percent per year, it is the burden
of the public official charged with the duty of establishing this value to show
it is correct.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act
applies to court or appellate reviews commenced on or after August 1, 2001.

---
END ---