BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that a Washington state day of peace is:

(1) An occasion of
significant interest to the young people of our state and nation;

(2) A day that means
more than the absence of war;

(3) A day that
represents a life where we and our children are free from physical, mental, emotional,
and psychological violence;

(4) A day of being
conscious of the importance of nonviolence within our homes, our neighborhoods,
our communities, our nation, and our hearts and lives;

(5) A day that is
intended to promote peace by bringing individuals, private sector entities, and
public sector entities together to work for peace;

(6) A day for everyone
to follow the time-honored admonition to "Love our neighbors as
ourselves";

(7) A day when the
media should refrain from focusing on negative things and instead focus on all
the positive things done by numerous young people throughout this country each
and every day;

(8) A day that begins
with each of us when we respect ourselves, others, the earth, and the things we
have been provided, and we work out our differences and problems peacefully and
without violence; and

(9) A day to urge all
our citizens to celebrate for peace on earth, honor the countless good our
young people do each day, acknowledge the importance of promoting peace and
harmony every day throughout the year, support nonviolent solutions to
conflict, and encourage respect for every human being.

Sec. 2. RCW 1.16.050 and 2000 c
60 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The following are legal
holidays: Sunday; the first day of January, commonly called New Year's Day;
the third Monday of January, being celebrated as the anniversary of the birth
of Martin Luther King, Jr.; the third Monday of February to be known as
Presidents' Day and to be celebrated as the anniversary of the births of
Abraham Lincoln and George Washington; the last Monday of May, commonly known
as Memorial Day; the fourth day of July, being the anniversary of the
Declaration of Independence; the first Monday in September, to be known as
Labor Day; the eleventh day of November, to be known as Veterans' Day; the
fourth Thursday in November, to be known as Thanksgiving Day; the day
immediately following Thanksgiving Day; and the twenty-fifth day of December,
commonly called Christmas Day.

Employees of the state
and its political subdivisions, except employees of school districts and except
those nonclassified employees of institutions of higher education who hold
appointments or are employed under contracts to perform services for periods of
less than twelve consecutive months, shall be entitled to one paid holiday per
calendar year in addition to those specified in this section. Each employee of
the state or its political subdivisions may select the day on which the
employee desires to take the additional holiday provided for herein after
consultation with the employer pursuant to guidelines to be promulgated by rule
of the appropriate personnel authority, or in the case of local government by
ordinance or resolution of the legislative authority.

If any of the above
specified state legal holidays are also federal legal holidays but observed on
different dates, only the state legal holidays shall be recognized as a paid
legal holiday for employees of the state and its political subdivisions except
that for port districts and the law enforcement and public transit employees of
municipal corporations, either the federal or the state legal holiday, but in
no case both, may be recognized as a paid legal holiday for employees.

Whenever any legal
holiday, other than Sunday, falls upon a Sunday, the following Monday shall be
the legal holiday.

Whenever any legal
holiday falls upon a Saturday, the preceding Friday shall be the legal holiday.

Nothing in this section
shall be construed to have the effect of adding or deleting the number of paid
holidays provided for in an agreement between employees and employers of political
subdivisions of the state or as established by ordinance or resolution of the
local government legislative authority.

The legislature
declares that the twelfth day of October shall be recognized as Columbus Day
but shall not be considered a legal holiday for any purposes.

The legislature
declares that the ninth day of April shall be recognized as former prisoner of
war recognition day but shall not be considered a legal holiday for any
purposes.

The legislature
declares that the twentieth day of April shall be recognized as a Washington
state day of peace but shall not be considered a legal holiday for any
purposes.

The legislature
declares that the twenty-sixth day of January shall be recognized as Washington
army and air national guard day but shall not be considered a legal holiday for
any purposes.

The legislature
declares that the seventh day of August shall be recognized as purple heart
recipient recognition day but shall not be considered a legal holiday for any
purposes.

The legislature declares
that the second Sunday in October be recognized as Washington state children's
day but shall not be considered a legal holiday for any purposes.

The legislature
declares that the sixteenth day of April shall be recognized as Mother Joseph
day and the fourth day of September as Marcus Whitman day, but neither shall be
considered legal holidays for any purpose.

The
legislature declares that the seventh day of December be recognized as Pearl
Harbor remembrance day but shall not be considered a legal holiday for any
purpose.

---
END ---