BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to sales of clothing with a selling price of one
hundred dollars or less during the period every year beginning at 12:01 a.m.,
August 3 and ending 12:00 a.m., August 11. For the purposes of this section,
"clothing" means any article of wearing apparel, including footwear,
intended to be worn on or about the human body. "Clothing" does not
include watches, watchbands, jewelry, handbags, handkerchiefs, umbrellas,
scarves, ties, headbands, or belt buckles.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of clothing, as
defined in section 1 of this act, if the clothing has a value of one hundred
dollars or less and is purchased during the period every year beginning at
12:01 a.m., August 3 and ending 12:00 a.m., August 11.

---
END ---