BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.56 RCW to read as follows:

The code reviser shall
serve as an additional member of the board of commissioners.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
August 1, 2001.

---
END ---