BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The department may,
upon receipt of approval from the federal health care financing administration,
implement a waiver under section 1115 of the federal social security act to
provide family planning services to persons with family incomes at or below two
hundred percent of the federal poverty level. For purposes of this section, family
planning services includes all federal food and drug administration-approved
contraceptives, sterilization services, and medical services associated with
use of contraceptive and sterilization services, educational services,
intensive follow-up services to support contraceptive use, and interpretive
services necessary to aid individuals to avoid unintended pregnancy.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---