BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
54.16.330 and 2000 c 81 s 3 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) A public utility district in existence on June
8, 2000, may

_8 construct, purchase, acquire, develop, finance, lease,
license,

_9 handle, provide, add to, contract for, interconnect,
alter,

10 improve, repair, operate, and maintain any
telecommunications

11 facilities within or without the district's limits for
the

12 following purposes:

13 (a) For the district's internal telecommunications
needs; and

14 (b) For the provision of wholesale
telecommunications services

15 within the district and by contract with another public
utility

16 district.

17 ((Nothing in this subsection shall be construed
to authorize

18 public utility districts to provide
telecommunications services to

p. 1 HB
1284

_1 end users.))

_2 (2) Public utility districts are not authorized
to provide

_3 telecommunications services or facilities to end
users. Contracts

_4 with government agencies under chapter 39.34 RCW or
otherwise for

_5 the provision of telecommunications services or
facilities by

_6 public utility districts, in existence before the
effective date

_7 of this act, shall terminate within twenty-four
months thereof or

_8 as soon as an authorized telecommunications or
internet provider

_9 can provide services.

10 (3) A public utility district providing
wholesale

11 telecommunications services shall ensure that rates,
terms, and

12 conditions for such services are not unduly or
unreasonably

13 discriminatory or preferential. Rates, terms, and
conditions are

14 discriminatory or preferential when a public utility
district

15 offering rates, terms, and conditions to an entity for
wholesale

16 telecommunications services does not offer substantially
similar

17 rates, terms, and conditions to all other entities
seeking

18 substantially similar services.

19 (((3) When a public utility district establishes
a separate

20 utility function for the provision of wholesale telecommunications

21 services, it)) (4) A public utility district
providing wholesale

22 telecommunications services under subsection (1) of
this section

23 shall establish a separate utility function for
wholesale

24 telecommunications services.

25 (5) A public utility district providing wholesale

26 telecommunications services shall account for any
and all revenues

27 and expenditures related to its wholesale
telecommunications

28 facilities and services separately from revenues and
expenditures

29 related to its internal telecommunications operations.
Any revenues

30 received from the provision of wholesale
telecommunications

31 services must be dedicated to the utility function that
includes

32 the provision of wholesale telecommunications services
for costs

33 incurred to build and maintain the telecommunications
facilities

34 until such time as any bonds or other financing
instruments

35 executed after June 8, 2000, and used to finance the

36 telecommunications facilities are discharged or retired.

37 (((4))) (6) When a public utility
district establishes a

38 separate utility function for the provision of wholesale

HB 1284 p. 2

_1 telecommunications services, all telecommunications
services

_2 rendered by the separate function to the district for
the

_3 district's internal telecommunications needs shall be
charged at

_4 its true and full value. A public utility district may
not charge

_5 its nontelecommunications operations rates that are
preferential

_6 or discriminatory compared to those it charges entities
purchasing

_7 wholesale telecommunications services.

_8 (((5))) (7) A public utility district
shall not exercise powers

_9 of eminent domain to acquire telecommunications
facilities or

10 contractual rights held by any other person or entity to

11 telecommunications facilities.

12 (((6))) (8) Except as otherwise
specifically provided, a public

13 utility district may exercise any of the powers granted
to it

14 under this title and other applicable laws in carrying
out the

15 powers authorized under this section. Nothing in
chapter 81, Laws

16 of 2000 limits any existing authority of a public
utility district

17 under this title.

18 Sec. 2. RCW
53.08.370 and 2000 c 81 s 7 are each amended to read

19 as follows:

20 (1) A rural port district in existence on June 8,
2000, may

21 construct, purchase, acquire, develop, finance, lease,
license,

22 handle, provide, add to, contract for, interconnect,
alter,

23 improve, repair, operate, and maintain any
telecommunications

24 facilities within or without the district's limits for
the

25 following purposes:

26 (a) For the district's own use; and

27 (b) For the provision of wholesale
telecommunications services

28 within the district's limits. ((Nothing in this
subsection shall be

29 construed to authorize rural port districts to
provide

30 telecommunications services to end users.))

31 (2) Rural port districts are not authorized to
provide

32 telecommunications services or facilities to end
users. Contracts

33 with government agencies under chapter 39.34 RCW or
otherwise for

34 the provision of telecommunications services or
facilities by

35 rural port districts, in existence before the
effective date of

36 this act, shall terminate within twenty-four months
thereof or as

p. 3 HB
1284

_1 soon as an authorized telecommunications or internet
provider can

_2 provide services.

_3 (3) A rural port district providing wholesale

_4 telecommunications services under this section shall
ensure that

_5 rates, terms, and conditions for such services are not
unduly or

_6 unreasonably discriminatory or preferential. Rates,
terms, and

_7 conditions are discriminatory or preferential when a
rural port

_8 district offering such rates, terms, and conditions to
an entity

_9 for wholesale telecommunications services does not offer

10 substantially similar rates, terms, and conditions to
all other

11 entities seeking substantially similar services.

12 (((3) When a rural port district establishes a
separate utility

13 function for the provision of wholesale
telecommunications

14 services, it)) (4) A rural port district
providing wholesale

15 telecommunications services under subsection (1) of
this section

16 shall establish a separate utility function for
wholesale

17 telecommunications services.

18 (5) A rural port district providing wholesale

19 telecommunications services shall account for any
and all revenues

20 and expenditures related to its wholesale telecommunications

21 facilities and services separately from revenues and
expenditures

22 related to its internal telecommunications operations.
Any revenues

23 received from the provision of wholesale
telecommunications

24 services must be dedicated to the utility function that
includes

25 the provision of wholesale telecommunications services
for costs

26 incurred to build and maintain the telecommunications
facilities

27 until such time as any bonds or other financing
instruments

28 executed after June 8, 2000, and used to finance the

29 telecommunications facilities are discharged or retired.

30 (((4))) (6) When a rural port district
establishes a separate

31 utility function for the provision of wholesale
telecommunications

32 services, all telecommunications services rendered by
the separate

33 function to the district for the district's internal

34 telecommunications needs shall be charged at its true
and full

35 value. A rural port district may not charge its

36 nontelecommunications operations rates that are
preferential or

37 discriminatory compared to those it charges entities
purchasing

38 wholesale telecommunications services.

HB 1284 p. 4

_1 (((5))) (7) A rural port district
shall not exercise powers of

_2 eminent domain to acquire telecommunications facilities
or

_3 contractual rights held by any other person or entity to

_4 telecommunications facilities.

_5 (((6))) (8) Except as otherwise
specifically provided, a rural

_6 port district may exercise any of the powers granted to
it under

_7 this title and other applicable laws in carrying out the
powers

_8 authorized under this section. Nothing in chapter 81,
Laws of 2000

_9 limits any existing authority of a rural port district
under this

10 title.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 HB
1284