BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW 77.95.210
and 2000 c 107 s 11 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, the

_8 department may supply, at a reasonable charge, surplus
salmon eggs

_9 to a person for use in the cultivation of salmon. The
department

10 shall not intentionally create a surplus of salmon to
provide eggs

11 for sale. The department shall only sell salmon eggs from
stocks

12 that are not suitable for salmon population rehabilitation
or

13 enhancement in state waters in Washington after the
salmon harvest

14 on surplus salmon has been first maximized by both
commercial and

15 recreational fishers.

16 (2) The department shall not destroy hatchery origin
salmon for

17 the purposes of destroying viable eggs that would
otherwise be

18 useful for propagation or salmon recovery purposes, as
determined

p. 1 ESHB
1286

_1 by the department or federally approved tribes in
Washington, for

_2 replenishing fish runs. Eggs deemed surplus by the
state must be

_3 provided, in the following order of priority, to:

_4 (a) Hatcheries of federally approved tribes in
Washington to

_5 whom eggs are moved, not sold, under the interlocal
cooperation

_6 act, chapter 39.34 RCW;

_7 (b) Voluntary cooperative salmon culture programs
under the

_8 supervision of the department under chapter 77.100
RCW;

_9 (c) Regional fisheries enhancement group salmon
culture

10 programs under supervision of the department under
this chapter;

11 (d) Governmental hatcheries in Washington,
Oregon, and Idaho;

12 (e) Salmon culture programs requested by lead
entities and

13 approved by the salmon funding recovery board under
chapter 77.85

14 RCW.

15 The order of priority established in this
subsection for

16 distributing surplus eggs does not apply when there
is a shortfall

17 in the supply of eggs.

18 (3) All sales or transfers shall be
consistent with the

19 department's egg transfer and aquaculture disease
control

20 regulations as now existing or hereafter amended. Prior
to

21 department determination that eggs of a salmon stock are
surplus

22 and available for sale, the department shall assess the

23 productivity of each watershed that is suitable for
receiving

24 eggs.

25 Sec. 2. RCW 77.95.270
and 1989 c 336 s 6 are each amended to read

26 as follows:

27 Except as provided in RCW 77.95.210, the
department may make

28 available to private contractors salmon eggs in excess of

29 department hatchery needs for the purpose of contract
rearing to

30 release the smolts into public waters. However,
providing salmon

31 eggs as specified in RCW 77.95.210(2) has the highest
priority.

32 The priority of providing eggs surplus after meeting the

33 requirements of RCW 77.95.210(2) to contract rearing
((shall be))

34 is a higher priority than providing eggs to
aquaculture purposes

35 ((which)) that are not destined for release
into Washington public

36 waters.

ESHB 1286 p. 2

_1 Sec. 3. RCW 77.100.050
and 1987 c 505 s 73 are each amended to

_2 read as follows:

_3 (1) The department shall:

_4 (a) Encourage and support the establishment of
cooperative

_5 agreements for the development and operation of cooperative
food

_6 fish, shellfish, game fish, game bird, game animal, and
nongame

_7 wildlife projects, and projects which provide an
opportunity for

_8 volunteer groups to become involved in resource and
habitat-

_9 oriented activities. All cooperative projects shall be
fairly

10 considered in the approval of cooperative agreements;

11 (b) Identify regions and species or activities that
would be

12 particularly suitable for cooperative projects providing
benefits

13 compatible with department goals;

14 (c) Determine the availability of rearing space at
operating

15 facilities or of net pens, egg boxes, portable rearing
containers,

16 incubators, and any other rearing facilities for use in

17 cooperative projects, and allocate them to volunteer groups
as

18 fairly as possible;

19 (d) Make viable eggs available for replenishing fish
runs, and

20 salmon carcasses for nutrient enhancement of streams.
If a regional

21 fisheries enhancement group, lead entity, volunteer
cooperative

22 group, federally approved tribe in Washington, or a governmental

23 hatchery in Washington, Oregon, or Idaho requests the
department

24 for viable eggs, the department must include the request
within

25 the brood stock document prepared for use by the
regional

26 offices. The eggs shall be distributed in accordance
with the

27 priority established in RCW 77.95.210 if they are
available. A

28 request for viable eggs may only be denied if the eggs
would not

29 be useful for propagation or salmon recovery purposes,
as

30 determined under RCW 77.95.210.

31 (e) Exempt volunteer groups from payment of fees
to the

32 department for activities related to the project;

33 (((e))) (f) Publicize the cooperative
program;

34 (((f))) (g) Not substitute a new
cooperative project for any

35 part of the department's program unless mutually agreeable
to the

36 department and volunteer group;

37 (((g))) (h) Not approve agreements that
are incompatible with

38 legally existing land, water, or property rights.

p. 3 ESHB
1286

_1 (2) The department may, when requested, provide to
volunteer

_2 groups its available professional expertise and assist
the

_3 volunteer group to evaluate its project. The
department must

_4 conduct annual workshops in each administrative
region of the

_5 department that has fish stocks listed as threatened
or endangered

_6 under the federal endangered species act, 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 1531 et

_7 seq., in order to assist volunteer groups with egg
rearing, share

_8 information on successful salmon recovery projects
accomplished by

_9 volunteers within the state, and provide basic
training on

10 monitoring efforts that can be accomplished by
volunteers in order

11 to help determine if their efforts are successful.

12 Sec. 4. RCW 77.100.060
and 2000 c 107 s 112 are each amended to

13 read as follows:

14 The commission shall establish by rule:

15 (1) The procedure for entering a cooperative agreement
and the

16 application forms for a permit to release fish or wildlife

17 required by RCW 77.12.457. The procedure shall indicate
the

18 information required from the volunteer group as well as
the

19 process of review by the department. The process of review
shall

20 include the means to coordinate with other agencies and
Indian

21 tribes when appropriate and to coordinate the review of any

22 necessary hydraulic permit approval applications.

23 (2) The procedure for providing within forty-five days
of

24 receipt of a proposal a written response to the volunteer
group

25 indicating the date by which an acceptance or rejection of
the

26 proposal can be expected, the reason why the date was
selected,

27 and a written summary of the process of review. The
response should

28 also include any suggested modifications to the proposal
which

29 would increase its likelihood of approval and the date by
which

30 such modified proposal could be expected to be accepted.
If the

31 proposal is rejected, the department must provide in
writing the

32 reasons for rejection. The volunteer group may request the
director

33 or the director's designee to review information provided
in the

34 response.

35 (3) The priority of the uses to which eggs, seed,
juveniles, or

36 brood stock are put. Use by cooperative projects shall be
second in

37 priority only to the needs of programs of the department or
of

ESHB 1286 p. 4

_1 other public agencies within the territorial boundaries
of the

_2 state. Sales of eggs, seed, juveniles, or brood stock
have a lower

_3 priority than use for cooperative projects. The
rules must include

_4 directives for allowing more hatchery salmon to spawn
naturally,

_5 including the outplanting of adult fish particularly
in areas

_6 where progeny of hatchery fish have spawned, in order
to increase

_7 the number of viable salmon eggs and restore healthy
numbers of

_8 fish within the state.

_9 (4) The procedure for the director to notify a
volunteer group

10 that the agreement for the project is being revoked for
cause and

11 the procedure for revocation. Revocation shall be
documented in

12 writing to the volunteer group. Cause for revocation
may

13 include: (a) The unavailability of adequate biological
or financial

14 resources; (b) the development of unacceptable
biological or

15 resource management conflicts; or (c) a violation of
agreement

16 provisions. Notice of cause to revoke for a violation
of agreement

17 provisions may specify a reasonable period of time
within which

18 the volunteer group must comply with any violated provisions
of

19 the agreement.

20 (5) An appropriate method of distributing among
volunteer

21 groups fish, bird, or animal food or other supplies
available for

22 the program.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added
to chapter 77.04

24 RCW to read as follows:

25 (1) The department shall prepare an annual surplus
salmon

26 report. This report shall include the disposition of adult

27 salmonids that have returned to salmonid hatchery
facilities

28 operated under the jurisdiction of the state that:

29 (a) Have not been harvested; and

30 (b) Were not allowed to escape for natural spawning.

31 (2) The report shall include by species, the number and

32 estimated weight of surplus salmon and steelhead and a
description

33 of the disposition of the adult carcasses including, but
not

34 limited to, the following categories:

35 (a) Disposed in landfills;

36 (b) Transferred to another government agency for
reproductive

37 purposes;

p. 5 ESHB
1286

_1 (c) Sold to contract buyers in the round;

_2 (d) Sold to contract buyers after spawning;

_3 (e) Transferred to Native American tribes;

_4 (f) Donated to food banks; and

_5 (g) Used in stream nutrient enrichment programs.

_6 (3) The report shall also include by species,
information on

_7 the number of requests for viable salmon eggs, the
number of these

_8 requests that were granted and the number that were
denied, the

_9 geographic areas for which these requests were granted
or denied,

10 and a brief explanation given for each denial of a
request for

11 viable salmon eggs.

12 (4) The report shall also be included in the
biennial state of

13 the salmon report required by RCW 77.85.020 and other
similar

14 state reports on salmon.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary
for the immediate

16 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

17 the state government and its existing public institutions,
and

18 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

ESHB 1286 p. 6