BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
80.04.130 and 1998 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) Whenever any public service company shall file
with the

_7 commission any schedule, classification, rule or
regulation, the

_8 effect of which is to change any rate, charge, rental or
toll

_9 theretofore charged, the commission shall have power,
either upon

10 its own motion or upon complaint, upon notice, to enter
upon a

11 hearing concerning such proposed change and the
reasonableness and

12 justness thereof, and pending such hearing and the
decision

13 thereon the commission may suspend the operation of such
rate,

14 charge, rental or toll for a period not exceeding ten
months from

15 the time the same would otherwise go into effect, and
after a full

16 hearing the commission may make such order in reference
thereto as

17 would be provided in a hearing initiated after the same
had become

18 effective. The commission shall not suspend a tariff
that makes a

p. 1 HB
1287

_1 decrease in a rate, charge, rental, or toll filed by a

_2 telecommunications company pending investigation of the
fairness,

_3 justness, and reasonableness of the decrease when the
filing does

_4 not contain any offsetting increase to another rate,
charge,

_5 rental, or toll and the filing company agrees to not
file for an

_6 increase to any rate, charge, rental, or toll to recover
the

_7 revenue deficit that results from the decrease for a
period of one

_8 year. The filing company shall file with any decrease
sufficient

_9 information as the commission by rule may require to
demonstrate

10 the decreased rate, charge, rental, or toll is above the
long run

11 incremental cost of the service. A tariff decrease that
results in

12 a rate that is below long run incremental cost, or is
contrary to

13 commission rule or order, or the requirements of this
chapter,

14 shall be rejected for filing and returned to the
company. The

15 commission may prescribe a different rate to be
effective on the

16 prospective date stated in its final order after its

17 investigation, if it concludes based on the record that
the

18 originally filed and effective rate is unjust, unfair,
or

19 unreasonable.

20 For the purposes of this section, tariffs for the
following

21 telecommunications services, that temporarily waive or
reduce

22 charges for existing or new subscribers for a period not
to exceed

23 sixty days in order to promote the use of the services
shall be

24 considered tariffs that decrease rates, charges,
rentals, or

25 tolls:

26 (a) Custom calling service;

27 (b) Second access lines; or

28 (c) Other services the commission specifies by rule.

29 The commission may suspend any promotional tariff
other than

30 those listed in (a) through (c) of this subsection.

31 The commission may suspend the initial tariff filing
of any

32 water company removed from and later subject to
commission

33 jurisdiction because of the number of customers or the
average

34 annual gross revenue per customer provisions of RCW
80.04.010. The

35 commission may allow temporary rates during the
suspension

36 period. These rates shall not exceed the rates charged
when the

37 company was last regulated. Upon a showing of good
cause by the

HB 1287 p. 2

_1 company, the commission may establish a different level
of

_2 temporary rates.

_3 (2) At any hearing involving any change in any
schedule,

_4 classification, rule or regulation the effect of which
is to

_5 increase any rate, charge, rental or toll theretofore
charged, the

_6 burden of proof to show that such increase is just and
reasonable

_7 shall be upon the public service company.

_8 (3) The implementation of mandatory local measured

_9 telecommunications service is a major policy change in
available

10 telecommunications service. The commission shall not
accept for

11 filing a price list, nor shall it accept for filing or
approve,

12 prior to June 1, ((2001)) 2005, a tariff
filed by a

13 telecommunications company which imposes mandatory local
measured

14 service on any customer or class of customers, except
that, upon

15 finding that it is in the public interest, the
commission may

16 accept for filing a price list or it may accept for
filing and

17 approve a tariff that imposes mandatory measured service
for a

18 telecommunications company's extended area service or
foreign

19 exchange service. This subsection does not apply to
land, air, or

20 marine mobile service, or to pay telephone service, or
to any

21 service which has been traditionally offered on a
measured service

22 basis.

23 (4) The implementation of Washington telephone
assistance

24 program service is a major policy change in available

25 telecommunications service. The implementation of
Washington

26 telephone assistance program service will aid in
achieving the

27 stated goal of universal telephone service.

28 (5) If a utility claims a sales or use tax exemption
on the

29 pollution control equipment for an electrical generation
facility

30 and abandons the generation facility before the
pollution control

31 equipment is fully depreciated, any tariff filing for a
rate

32 increase to recover abandonment costs for the pollution
control

33 equipment shall be considered unjust and unreasonable
for the

34 purposes of this section.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1287