BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 74.13

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 The department shall attempt to place a child
removed from his

_7 or her family home into a foster care placement that is
within the

_8 child's school district. If circumstances do not permit
foster

_9 care placement within the child's school district, the
department

10 shall strive to place the child in the child's home
county.

11 If a child is placed in foster care in a setting
outside of the

12 child's home county, and that child acts in a manner
that requires

13 detention in a county financed juvenile detention
facility, the

14 department shall reimburse the county for the cost of
detention.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 HB
1288