BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.118.041 and 1998
c 298 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the
manufacturer, its agent, or the new motor vehicle dealer is unable to conform
the new motor vehicle to the warranty by repairing or correcting any
nonconformity after a reasonable number of attempts, the manufacturer, within
forty calendar days of a consumer's written request to the manufacturer's
corporate, dispute resolution, zone, or regional office address shall, at the
option of the consumer, replace or repurchase the new motor vehicle.

(a) The replacement
motor vehicle shall be identical or reasonably equivalent to the motor vehicle
to be replaced as the motor vehicle to be replaced existed at the time of
original purchase or lease, including any service contract, undercoating,
rustproofing, and factory or dealer installed options. Where the manufacturer
supplies a replacement motor vehicle, the manufacturer shall be responsible for
sales tax, license, registration fees, and refund of any incidental costs.
Compensation for a reasonable offset for use shall be paid by the consumer to
the manufacturer in the event that the consumer accepts a replacement motor
vehicle.

(b) When repurchasing
the new motor vehicle, the manufacturer shall refund to the consumer the
purchase price, all collateral charges, and incidental costs, less a reasonable
offset for use. When repurchasing the new motor vehicle, in the instance of a
lease, the manufacturer shall refund to the consumer all payments made by the
consumer under the lease including but not limited to all lease payments,
trade-in value or inception payment, security deposit, all collateral charges
and incidental costs less a reasonable offset for use. The manufacturer shall
make such payment to the lessor and/or lienholder of record as necessary to
obtain clear title to the motor vehicle and upon the lessor's and/or
lienholder's receipt of that payment and payment by the consumer of any late
payment charges, the consumer shall be relieved of any future obligation to the
lessor and/or lienholder.

(c)(i) Except as
provided in (c)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection, the reasonable offset for
use shall be computed as follows:

(A) If the
repurchase or replacement is in response to a consumer's written request under
this section, by multiplying the number of miles that the vehicle traveled
directly attributable to use by the consumer times the purchase price, and
dividing the product by one hundred twenty thousand((, except in the case of
a motor home, in which event it shall be divided by ninety thousand. However,)).

(B) If the
repurchase or replacement is awarded by an arbitration board under RCW
19.118.090, the reasonable offset for use shall be computed by multiplying the
number of miles the vehicle traveled directly attributable to use by the
consumer, times the purchase price, and dividing the product by one hundred
twenty thousand. However, an arbitration board under RCW 19.118.090 may modify
the offset total by decreasing or increasing the offset total up to a maximum
of one-third of the offset total after considering the total number of repair
attempts for all nonconformities, and the cumulative total of calendar days
during which the vehicle has been out of service by reason of diagnosis or
repair of one or more nonconformities.

(ii) If the motor
vehicle is a motor home, the product shall be divided by ninety thousand, and
the reasonable offset for use calculation total for a motor home is subject to
modification by the board by decreasing or increasing the offset total up to a
maximum of one-third of the offset total. The board may modify the offset
total in those circumstances where the board determines that the wear and tear
on those portions of the motor home designated, used, or maintained primarily
as a mobile dwelling, office, or commercial space are significantly greater or
significantly less than that which could be reasonably expected based on the
mileage attributable to the consumer's use of the motor home.

(iii) Where the
consumer is a second or subsequent purchaser, lessee, or transferee of the
motor vehicle and the consumer selects repurchase of the motor vehicle,
"the number of miles that the vehicle traveled" shall be calculated
from the date of purchase or lease by the consumer. Where the consumer is a
second or subsequent purchaser, lessee, or transferee of the motor vehicle and
the consumer selects replacement of the motor vehicle, "the number of
miles that the vehicle traveled" shall be calculated from the original purchase,
lease, or in-service date.

(2) Reasonable number
of attempts, except in the case of a new motor vehicle that is a motor home
acquired after June 30, 1998, shall be deemed to have been undertaken by the
manufacturer, its agent, or the new motor vehicle dealer to conform the new
motor vehicle to the warranty within the warranty period, if: (a) The same
serious safety defect has been subject to diagnosis or repair two or more
times, at least one of which is during the period of coverage of the applicable
manufacturer's written warranty, and the serious safety defect continues to
exist; (b) the same nonconformity has been subject to diagnosis or repair four
or more times, at least one of which is during the period of coverage of the
applicable manufacturer's written warranty, and the nonconformity continues to
exist; or (c) the vehicle is out of service by reason of diagnosis or repair of
one or more nonconformities for a cumulative total of thirty calendar days, at
least fifteen of them during the period of the applicable manufacturer's
written warranty. For purposes of this subsection, the manufacturer's written
warranty shall be at least one year after the date of the original delivery to
the consumer of the vehicle or the first twelve thousand miles of operation,
whichever occurs first.

(3)(a) In the case of a
new motor vehicle that is a motor home acquired after June 30, 1998, a
reasonable number of attempts shall be deemed to have been undertaken by the
motor home manufacturers, their respective agents, or their respective new
motor vehicle dealers to conform the new motor vehicle to the warranty within
the warranty period, if: (i) The same serious safety defect has been subject
to diagnosis or repair one or more times during the period of coverage of the
applicable motor home manufacturer's written warranty, plus a final attempt to
repair the vehicle as provided for in (b) of this subsection, and the serious
safety defect continues to exist; (ii) the same nonconformity has been subject
to repair three or more times, at least one of which is during the period of
coverage of the applicable motor home manufacturer's written warranty, plus a
final attempt to repair the vehicle as provided for in (b) of this subsection,
and the nonconformity continues to exist; or (iii) the vehicle is out of
service by reason of diagnosis or repair of one or more nonconformities for a
cumulative total of sixty calendar days aggregating all motor home manufacturer
days out of service, and the motor home manufacturers have had at least one
opportunity to coordinate and complete an inspection and any repairs of the
vehicle's nonconformities after receipt of notification from the consumer as
provided for in (c) of this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, each
motor home manufacturer's written warranty must be at least one year after the
date of the original delivery to the consumer of the vehicle or the first
twelve thousand miles of operation, whichever occurs first.

(b) In the case of a
new motor vehicle that is a motor home, after one attempt has been made to
repair a serious safety defect, or after three attempts have been made to
repair the same nonconformity, the consumer shall give written notification of
the need to repair the nonconformity to each of the motor home manufacturers at
their respective corporate, zone, or regional office addresses to allow the
motor home manufacturers to coordinate and complete a final attempt to cure the
nonconformity. The motor home manufacturers each have fifteen days, commencing
upon receipt of the notification, to respond and inform the consumer of the
location of the facility where the vehicle will be repaired. If the vehicle is
unsafe to drive due to a serious safety defect, or to the extent the repair
facility is more than one hundred miles from the motor home location, the motor
home manufacturers are responsible for the cost of transporting the vehicle to
and from the repair facility. The motor home manufacturers have a cumulative
total of thirty days, commencing upon delivery of the vehicle to the designated
repair facility by the consumer, to conform the vehicle to the applicable motor
home manufacturer's written warranty. This time period may be extended if the
consumer agrees in writing. If a motor home manufacturer fails to respond to
the consumer or perform the repairs within the time period prescribed, that
motor home manufacturer is not entitled to a final attempt to cure the
nonconformity.

(c) In the case of a
new motor vehicle that is a motor home, if the vehicle is out of service by
reason of diagnosis or repair of one or more nonconformities by the motor home
manufacturers, their respective agents, or their respective new motor vehicle
dealers for a cumulative total of thirty or more days aggregating all motor
home manufacturer days out of service, the consumer shall so notify each motor
home manufacturer in writing at their respective corporate, zone, or regional
office addresses to allow the motor home manufacturers, their respective
agents, or their respective new motor vehicle dealers an opportunity to
coordinate and complete an inspection and any repairs of the vehicle's
nonconformities. The motor home manufacturers have fifteen days, commencing
upon receipt of the notification, to respond and inform the consumer of the
location of the facility where the vehicle will be repaired. If the vehicle is
unsafe to drive due to a serious safety defect, or to the extent the repair
facility is more than one hundred miles from the motor home location, the motor
home manufacturers are responsible for the cost of transporting the vehicle to
and from the repair facility. Once the buyer delivers the vehicle to the
designated repair facility, the inspection and repairs must be completed by the
motor home manufacturers either (i) within ten days or (ii) before the vehicle
is out of service by reason of diagnosis or repair of one or more
nonconformities for sixty days, whichever time period is longer. This time
period may be extended if the consumer agrees in writing. If a motor home
manufacturer fails to respond to the consumer or perform the repairs within the
time period prescribed, that motor home manufacturer is not entitled to at
least one opportunity to inspect and repair the vehicle's nonconformities after
receipt of notification from the buyer as provided for in this subsection
(3)(c).

(4) No new
motor vehicle dealer may be held liable by the manufacturer for any collateral
charges, incidental costs, purchase price refunds, or vehicle replacements.
Manufacturers shall not have a cause of action against dealers under this
chapter. Consumers shall not have a cause of action against dealers under this
chapter, but a violation of any responsibilities imposed upon dealers under
this chapter is a per se violation of chapter 19.86 RCW. Consumers may pursue
rights and remedies against dealers under any other law, including chapters
46.70 and 46.71 RCW. Manufacturers and consumers may not make dealers parties
to arbitration board proceedings under this chapter.

--- END ---