BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
77.04.030 and 2000 c 107 s 203 are each amended to

_6 read as follows:

_7 The fish and wildlife commission consists of nine
registered

_8 voters of the state. In January of each odd-numbered
year, the

_9 governor shall appoint with the advice and consent of
the senate

10 two registered voters to the commission to serve for
terms of six

11 years from that January or until their successors are
appointed

12 and qualified. If a vacancy occurs on the commission
prior to the

13 expiration of a term, the governor shall appoint a
registered

14 voter within sixty days to complete the term. Three members
shall

15 be residents of that portion of the state lying east of
the summit

16 of the Cascade mountains, and three shall be residents
of that

17 portion of the state lying west of the summit of the
Cascade

18 mountains. Three additional members shall be appointed
at large,

p. 1 HB
1290

_1 with at least one of these members being a person
with a

_2 disability. No two members may be residents of
the same county. The

_3 legal office of the commission is at the administrative
office of

_4 the department in Olympia.

_5 For the purposes of this section, a person with a
disability

_6 includes:

_7 (1) A permanently disabled person who is not
ambulatory over

_8 natural terrain without a prosthesis or assistive
device;

_9 (2) A permanently disabled person who is unable
to hold or use

10 any legal fishing or shell fishing device;

11 (3) A permanently disabled person who is unable
to hold or

12 shoot a firearm or other legal hunting device in a
conventionally

13 acceptable manner;

14 (4) A person who is totally blind or visually
impaired; or

15 (5) A permanently disabled person with upper or
lower extremity

16 impairments who has lost the use of one or both upper
or lower

17 extremities.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1290 p. 2