BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.12.0251 and 1997
c 301 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of any article of tangible
personal property brought into the state of Washington by a nonresident thereof
for his or her use or enjoyment while temporarily within the state of
Washington unless such property is used in conducting a nontransitory business
activity within the state of Washington; or in respect to the use by a
nonresident of Washington of a motor vehicle or trailer which is registered or
licensed under the laws of the state of his or her residence, and which is not
required to be registered or licensed under the laws of Washington, including
motor vehicles or trailers exempt pursuant to a declaration issued by the
department of licensing under RCW 46.85.060; or in respect to the use of
household goods, personal effects, and private motor vehicles, ((not))
including motor homes, by a bona fide resident of Washington, or nonresident
members of the armed forces who are stationed in Washington pursuant to
military orders, if such articles were acquired and used by such person in
another state while a bona fide resident thereof and such acquisition and use
occurred more than ninety days prior to the time he or she entered Washington.

For purposes of this
section, "state" means a state of the United States, any political
subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia, and any foreign country or
political subdivision thereof.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
August 1, 2001.

---
END ---