BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.96A.020 and 1998
c 296 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1)
"Alcoholic" means a person who suffers from the disease of
alcoholism.

(2)
"Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on
alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use,
symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if
use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of
social or economic functioning.

(3) "Approved
treatment program" means a discrete program of chemical dependency
treatment provided by a treatment program certified by the department of social
and health services as meeting standards adopted under this chapter.

(4) "Chemical
dependency" means:

(a) Alcoholism
((or)); (b) drug addiction((,)); or (c)
dependence on alcohol and one or more other psychoactive chemicals, as the
context requires.

(5) "Chemical
dependency program" means expenditures and activities of the department
designed and conducted to prevent or treat alcoholism and other drug addiction,
including reasonable administration and overhead.

(6)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(7) "Designated
chemical dependency specialist" or "specialist" means a
person designated by the county alcoholism and other drug addiction program
coordinator designated under RCW 70.96A.310 to perform the commitment duties
described in RCW 70.96A.140 and qualified to do so by meeting standards adopted
by the department.

(8)
"Director" means the person administering the chemical dependency
program within the department.

(9) "Drug
addict" means a person who suffers from the disease of drug addiction.

(10) "Drug
addiction" means a disease characterized by a dependency on psychoactive
chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms
of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is
reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or
economic functioning.

(11) "Emergency
service patrol" means a patrol established under RCW 70.96A.170.

(12) "Gravely
disabled by alcohol or other ((drugs)) psychoactive chemicals"
or "gravely disabled" means that a person, as a result of the
use of alcohol or other ((drugs)) psychoactive chemicals: (a) Is
in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his
or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe
deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by a repeated and escalating
loss of cognition or volitional control over his or her actions and is not
receiving care as essential for his or her health or safety.

(13) "History
of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior
to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but
not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, or a long-term
alcoholism or drug treatment facility, or in confinement.

(14)
"Incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals" means that
a person, as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, ((has
his or her judgment so impaired that he or she is incapable of realizing and
making a rational decision with respect to his or her need for treatment and))
is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to himself
or herself, to any other person, or to property.

(((14))) (15)
"Incompetent person" means a person who has been adjudged incompetent
by the superior court.

(((15))) (16)
"Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical
functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or
other psychoactive chemicals.

(((16))) (17)
"Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or
osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.

(((17))) (18)
"Likelihood of serious harm" means ((either)):

(a) A substantial risk
that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon his or
her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or
inflict physical harm on one's self; (((b) a substantial risk that)) (ii)
physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another, as evidenced by
behavior that has caused the harm or that places another person or persons in
reasonable fear of sustaining the harm; or (((c) a substantial risk that))
(iii) physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the property
of others, as evidenced by behavior that has caused substantial loss or damage
to the property of others; or

(b) The individual
has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more
violent acts.

(((18))) (19)
"Medical necessity" for inpatient care of a minor means a requested
certified inpatient service that is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose,
arrest, or alleviate a chemical dependency; or (b) prevent the worsening of
chemical dependency conditions that endanger life or cause suffering and pain,
or result in illness or infirmity or threaten to cause or aggravate a handicap,
or cause physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less
restrictive alternative available.

(((19))) (20)
"Minor" means a person less than eighteen years of age.

(((20))) (21)
"Parent" means the parent or parents who have the legal right to
custody of the child. Parent includes custodian or guardian.

(((21))) (22)
"Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency
or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer
powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment.

(((22))) (23)
"Person" means an individual, including a minor.

(((23))) (24)
"Professional person in charge" or "professional person"
means a physician or chemical dependency counselor as defined in rule by the
department, who is empowered by a certified treatment program with authority to
make assessment, admission, continuing care, and discharge decisions on behalf
of the certified program.

(((24))) (25)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services.

(((25))) (26)
"Treatment" means the broad range of emergency, detoxification,
residential, and outpatient services and care, including diagnostic evaluation,
chemical dependency education and counseling, medical, psychiatric,
psychological, and social service care, vocational rehabilitation and career
counseling, which may be extended to alcoholics and other drug addicts and
their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive
chemicals, and intoxicated persons.

(((26))) (27)
"Treatment program" means an organization, institution, or
corporation, public or private, engaged in the care, treatment, or
rehabilitation of alcoholics or other drug addicts.

(28) "Violent
act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, nonfatal
injuries, or substantial damage to property.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.96A.050 and 1989
c 270 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall:

(1) Develop, encourage,
and foster statewide, regional, and local plans and programs for the prevention
of alcoholism and other drug addiction, treatment of alcoholics and other drug
addicts and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other
psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons in cooperation with public and
private agencies, organizations, and individuals and provide technical
assistance and consultation services for these purposes;

(2) Coordinate the
efforts and enlist the assistance of all public and private agencies,
organizations, and individuals interested in prevention of alcoholism and drug
addiction, and treatment of alcoholics and other drug addicts and their
families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and
intoxicated persons;

(3) Cooperate with
public and private agencies in establishing and conducting programs to provide
treatment for alcoholics and other drug addicts and their families, persons
incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated
persons who are clients of the correctional system;

(4) Cooperate with the
superintendent of public instruction, state board of education, schools, police
departments, courts, and other public and private agencies, organizations and
individuals in establishing programs for the prevention of alcoholism and other
drug addiction, treatment of alcoholics or other drug addicts and their
families, persons incapacitated by alcohol ((and)) or other
psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons, and preparing curriculum
materials thereon for use at all levels of school education;

(5) Prepare, publish,
evaluate, and disseminate educational material dealing with the nature and
effects of alcohol and other psychoactive chemicals and the consequences of
their use;

(6) Develop and
implement, as an integral part of treatment programs, an educational program
for use in the treatment of alcoholics or other drug addicts, persons
incapacitated by alcohol ((and)) or other psychoactive chemicals,
and intoxicated persons, which program shall include the dissemination of
information concerning the nature and effects of alcohol and other psychoactive
chemicals, the consequences of their use, the principles of recovery, and HIV
and AIDS;

(7) Organize and foster
training programs for persons engaged in treatment of alcoholics or other drug
addicts, persons incapacitated by alcohol ((and)) or other
psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons;

(8) Sponsor and
encourage research into the causes and nature of alcoholism and other drug
addiction, treatment of alcoholics and other drug addicts, persons
incapacitated by alcohol ((and)) or other psychoactive chemicals,
and intoxicated persons, and serve as a clearing house for information relating
to alcoholism or other drug addiction;

(9) Specify uniform
methods for keeping statistical information by public and private agencies,
organizations, and individuals, and collect and make available relevant
statistical information, including number of persons treated, frequency of
admission and readmission, and frequency and duration of treatment;

(10) Advise the
governor in the preparation of a comprehensive plan for treatment of alcoholics
and other drug addicts, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive
chemicals, and intoxicated persons for inclusion in the state's comprehensive
health plan;

(11) Review all state
health, welfare, and treatment plans to be submitted for federal funding under
federal legislation, and advise the governor on provisions to be included
relating to alcoholism and other drug addiction, persons incapacitated by
alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons;

(12) Assist in the
development of, and cooperate with, programs for alcohol and other psychoactive
chemical education and treatment for employees of state and local governments
and businesses and industries in the state;

(13) Use the support
and assistance of interested persons in the community to encourage alcoholics
and other drug addicts voluntarily to undergo treatment;

(14) Cooperate with
public and private agencies in establishing and conducting programs designed to
deal with the problem of persons operating motor vehicles while intoxicated;

(15) Encourage general
hospitals and other appropriate health facilities to admit without
discrimination alcoholics and other drug addicts, persons incapacitated by
alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons and to provide
them with adequate and appropriate treatment;

(16) Encourage all
health and disability insurance programs to include alcoholism and other drug
addiction as a covered illness; and

(17)
Organize and sponsor a statewide program to help court personnel, including
judges, better understand the disease of alcoholism and other drug addiction
and the uses of chemical dependency treatment programs.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.96A.140 and 1995
c 312 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated
chemical dependency specialist receives information alleging that a person ((is
incapacitated)) presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely
disabled as a result of chemical dependency, the designated chemical
dependency specialist, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts
alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the information, may file a
petition for commitment of such person with the superior court ((or)),
district court, or in another court permitted by court rule.

If a petition for
commitment is not filed in the case of a minor, the parent, guardian, or
custodian who has custody of the minor may seek review of that decision made by
the designated chemical dependency specialist in superior or district court.
The parent, guardian, or custodian shall file notice with the court and provide
a copy of the designated chemical dependency specialist's report.

If the designated
chemical dependency specialist finds that the initial needs of such person
would be better served by placement within the mental health system, the person
shall be referred to either a county designated mental health professional
or an evaluation and treatment facility as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or
71.34.020. If placement in a chemical dependency program is available and
deemed appropriate, the petition shall allege that: The person is chemically
dependent and ((is incapacitated)) presents a likelihood of serious
harm or is gravely disabled by alcohol or drug addiction, or that the
person has twice before in the preceding twelve months been admitted for
detoxification, sobering services, or chemical dependency treatment
pursuant to RCW 70.96A.110 or 70.96A.120, and is in need of a more
sustained treatment program, or that the person is chemically dependent and has
threatened, attempted, or inflicted physical harm on another and is likely to
inflict physical harm on another unless committed. A refusal to undergo
treatment, by itself, does not constitute evidence of lack of judgment as to
the need for treatment. The petition shall be accompanied by a certificate of
a licensed physician who has examined the person within five days before
submission of the petition, unless the person whose commitment is sought has
refused to submit to a medical examination, in which case the fact of refusal
shall be alleged in the petition. The certificate shall set forth the licensed
physician's findings in support of the allegations of the petition. A
physician employed by the petitioning program or the department is eligible to
be the certifying physician.

(2) Upon filing the
petition, the court shall fix a date for a hearing no less than two and no more
than seven days after the date the petition was filed unless the person
petitioned against is presently being detained in a program, pursuant to RCW
70.96A.120, 71.05.210, or 71.34.050, in which case the hearing shall be held
within seventy-two hours of the filing of the petition: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That the above specified seventy-two hours shall be computed by excluding
Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays: PROVIDED FURTHER, That, the court may, upon
motion of the person whose commitment is sought, or upon motion of petitioner
with written permission of the person whose commitment is sought, or his or her
counsel and, upon good cause shown, extend the date for the hearing. A copy of
the petition and of the notice of the hearing, including the date fixed by the
court, shall be served by the designated chemical dependency specialist on the
person whose commitment is sought, his or her next of kin, a parent or his or
her legal guardian if he or she is a minor, and any other person the court
believes advisable. A copy of the petition and certificate shall be delivered
to each person notified.

(3) At the hearing the
court shall hear all relevant testimony, including, if possible, the testimony,
which may be telephonic, of at least one licensed physician who has examined
the person whose commitment is sought. Communications otherwise deemed
privileged under the laws of this state are deemed to be waived in proceedings
under this chapter when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion
determines that the waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person
or the public. The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to
records or testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained person for purposes
of a proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained person, or on
its own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony sought by a petitioner
to determine whether it is within the scope of the waiver.

The record maker shall
not be required to testify in order to introduce medical, nursing, or
psychological records of detained persons so long as the requirements of RCW
5.45.020 are met, except that portions of the record that contain opinions as
to whether the detained person is chemically dependent shall be deleted from
the records unless the person offering the opinions is available for
cross-examination. The person shall be present unless the court believes that
his or her presence is likely to be injurious to him or her; in this event the
court may deem it appropriate to appoint a guardian ad litem to represent him
or her throughout the proceeding. If deemed advisable, the court may examine
the person out of courtroom. If the person has refused to be examined by a
licensed physician, he or she shall be given an opportunity to be examined by a
court appointed licensed physician. If he or she refuses and there is
sufficient evidence to believe that the allegations of the petition are true,
or if the court believes that more medical evidence is necessary, the court may
make a temporary order committing him or her to the department for a period of
not more than five days for purposes of a diagnostic examination.

(4) If after hearing
all relevant evidence, including the results of any diagnostic examination, the
court finds that grounds for involuntary commitment have been established by
clear, cogent, and convincing proof, it shall make an order of commitment to an
approved treatment program. It shall not order commitment of a person unless
it determines that an approved treatment program is available and able to
provide adequate and appropriate treatment for him or her.

(5) A person committed
under this section shall remain in the program for treatment for a period of
sixty days unless sooner discharged. At the end of the sixty-day period, he or
she shall be discharged automatically unless the program, before expiration of
the period, files a petition for his or her recommitment upon the grounds set
forth in subsection (1) of this section for a further period of ninety days
unless sooner discharged.

If a petition for
recommitment is not filed in the case of a minor, the parent, guardian, or
custodian who has custody of the minor may seek review of that decision made by
the designated chemical dependency specialist in superior or district court.
The parent, guardian, or custodian shall file notice with the court and provide
a copy of the treatment progress report.

If a person has been
committed because he or she is chemically dependent and likely to inflict
physical harm on another, the program shall apply for recommitment if after
examination it is determined that the likelihood still exists.

(6) Upon the filing of
a petition for recommitment under subsection (5) of this section, the court
shall fix a date for hearing no less than two and no more than seven days after
the date the petition was filed: PROVIDED, That, the court may, upon motion of
the person whose commitment is sought and upon good cause shown, extend the
date for the hearing. A copy of the petition and of the notice of hearing,
including the date fixed by the court, shall be served by the treatment program
on the person whose commitment is sought, his or her next of kin, the original
petitioner under subsection (1) of this section if different from the
petitioner for recommitment, one of his or her parents or his or her legal
guardian if he or she is a minor, and his or her attorney and any other person
the court believes advisable. At the hearing the court shall proceed as
provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(7) The approved
treatment program shall provide for adequate and appropriate treatment of a
person committed to its custody. A person committed under this section may be
transferred from one approved public treatment program to another if transfer
is medically advisable.

(8) A person committed
to the custody of a program for treatment shall be discharged at any time
before the end of the period for which he or she has been committed and he or
she shall be discharged by order of the court if either of the following
conditions are met:

(a) In case of a
chemically dependent person committed on the grounds of likelihood of
infliction of physical harm upon himself, herself, or another, the likelihood
no longer exists; or further treatment will not be likely to bring about
significant improvement in the person's condition, or treatment is no longer
adequate or appropriate.

(b) In case of a
chemically dependent person committed on the grounds of the need of treatment
and incapacity, that the incapacity no longer exists.

(9) The court shall
inform the person whose commitment or recommitment is sought of his or her
right to contest the application, be represented by counsel at every stage of
any proceedings relating to his or her commitment and recommitment, and have
counsel appointed by the court or provided by the court, if he or she wants the
assistance of counsel and is unable to obtain counsel. If the court believes
that the person needs the assistance of counsel, the court shall require, by
appointment if necessary, counsel for him or her regardless of his or her
wishes. The person shall, if he or she is financially able, bear the costs of
such legal service; otherwise such legal service shall be at public expense.
The person whose commitment or recommitment is sought shall be informed of his
or her right to be examined by a licensed physician of his or her choice. If
the person is unable to obtain a licensed physician and requests examination by
a physician, the court shall employ a licensed physician.

(10) A person committed
under this chapter may at any time seek to be discharged from commitment by
writ of habeas corpus in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(11) The venue for
proceedings under this section is the county in which person to be committed resides
or is present.

(12) When in the
opinion of the professional person in charge of the program providing
involuntary treatment under this chapter, the committed patient can be
appropriately served by less restrictive treatment before expiration of the
period of commitment, then the less restrictive care may be required as a
condition for early release for a period which, when added to the initial
treatment period, does not exceed the period of commitment. If the program
designated to provide the less restrictive treatment is other than the program
providing the initial involuntary treatment, the program so designated must
agree in writing to assume such responsibility. A copy of the conditions for
early release shall be given to the patient, the designated chemical dependency
specialist of original commitment, and the court of original commitment. The
program designated to provide less restrictive care may modify the conditions
for continued release when the modifications are in the best interests of the
patient. If the program providing less restrictive care and the designated
chemical dependency specialist determine that a conditionally released patient
is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of his or her release, or that
substantial deterioration in the patient's functioning has occurred, then the
designated chemical dependency specialist shall notify the court of original
commitment and request a hearing to be held no less than two and no more than
seven days after the date of the request to determine whether or not the person
should be returned to more restrictive care. The designated chemical
dependency specialist shall file a petition with the court stating the facts
substantiating the need for the hearing along with the treatment recommendations.
The patient shall have the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and
counsel as for the original involuntary treatment proceedings. The issues to
be determined at the hearing are whether the conditionally released patient did
or did not adhere to the terms and conditions of his or her release to less
restrictive care or that substantial deterioration of the patient's functioning
has occurred and whether the conditions of release should be modified or the
person should be returned to a more restrictive program. The hearing may be
waived by the patient and his or her counsel and his or her guardian or
conservator, if any, but may not be waived unless all such persons agree to the
waiver. Upon waiver, the person may be returned for involuntary treatment or
continued on conditional release on the same or modified conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 70.96A RCW to read as follows:

The county alcoholism
and other drug addiction program coordinator may designate the county
designated mental health professional to perform the detention and commitment
duties described in RCW 70.96A.120 and 70.96A.140.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---