BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.21.290 and 1965 c
7 s 35.21.290 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Cities and
towns owning their own waterworks, or electric light or power plants shall have
a lien against the premises to which water, electric light, or power services
were furnished for four months charges therefor due or to become due, but not
for any charges more than four months past due: PROVIDED, That the owner of
the premises or the owner of a delinquent mortgage thereon may give written
notice to the superintendent or other head of such works or plant to cut off
service to such premises accompanied by payment or tender of payment of the
then delinquent and unpaid charges for such service against the premises
together with the cut-off charge, whereupon the city or town shall have no lien
against the premises for charges for such service thereafter furnished, nor
shall the owner of the premises or the owner of a delinquent mortgage thereon
be held for the payment thereof.

(2) A city or town
may provide a real property owner or the owner's designee with duplicate bills
for service to tenants, or may notify an owner or the owner's designee that a
tenant's service account is delinquent. However, if an owner or the owner's
designee notifies the city or town in writing that a property served by the
city or town is a rental property, asks to be notified of a tenant's
delinquency, and has provided, in writing, a complete and accurate mailing
address, the city or town shall notify the owner or the owner's designee of a
tenant's delinquency at the same time and in the same manner the city or town
notifies the tenant of the tenant's delinquency or by mail. When a city or
town provides a real property owner or the owner's designee with duplicates of
tenant utility service bills or notice that a tenant's utility account is
delinquent, the city or town shall notify the tenant that it is providing the
duplicate bills or delinquency notice to the owner or the owner's designee.
After January 1, 2002, if a city or town fails to notify the owner of a
tenant's delinquency after receiving a written request to do so and after
receiving the other information required by this subsection, the city or town
shall have no lien against the premises for the tenant's delinquent and unpaid
charges.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.67.200 and 1991 c
36 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Cities and
towns owning their own sewer systems shall have a lien for delinquent and
unpaid rates and charges for sewer service, penalties levied pursuant to RCW
35.67.190, and connection charges, including interest thereon, against the
premises to which such service has been furnished or is available, which lien
shall be superior to all other liens and encumbrances except general taxes and
local and special assessments. The city or town by ordinance may provide that
delinquent charges shall bear interest at not exceeding eight percent per annum
computed on a monthly basis: PROVIDED, That a city or town using the property
tax system for utility billing may, by resolution or ordinance, adopt the
alternative lien procedure as set forth in RCW 35.67.215.

(2) A city or town
may provide a real property owner or the owner's designee with duplicate bills
for service to tenants, or may notify an owner or the owner's designee that a
tenant's service account is delinquent. However, if an owner or the owner's
designee notifies the city or town in writing that a property served by the
city or town is a rental property, asks to be notified of a tenant's
delinquency, and has provided, in writing, a complete and accurate mailing
address, the city or town shall notify the owner or the owner's designee of a
tenant's delinquency at the same time and in the same manner the city or town
notifies the tenant of the tenant's delinquency or by mail. When a city or
town provides a real property owner or the owner's designee with duplicates of
tenant utility service bills or notice that a tenant's utility account is
delinquent, the city or town shall notify the tenant that it is providing the
duplicate bills or delinquency notice to the owner or the owner's designee.
After January 1, 2002, if a city or town fails to notify the owner of a
tenant's delinquency after receiving a written request to do so and after
receiving the other information required by this subsection, the city or town
shall have no lien against the premises for the tenant's delinquent and unpaid
charges.

Sec. 3. RCW 36.94.150 and 1997 c
393 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All counties
operating a system of sewerage and/or water shall have a lien for delinquent
connection charges and charges for the availability of sewerage and/or water
service, together with interest fixed by resolution at eight percent per annum
from the date due until paid. Penalties of not more than ten percent of the
amount due may be imposed in case of failure to pay the charges at times fixed
by resolution. The lien shall be for all charges, interest, and penalties and
shall attach to the premises to which the services were available. The lien
shall be superior to all other liens and encumbrances, except general taxes and
local and special assessments of the county.

(2) The county
department established in RCW 36.94.120 shall certify periodically the
delinquencies to the auditor of the county at which time the lien shall attach.

(3) Upon the
expiration of sixty days after the attachment of the lien, the county may bring
suit in foreclosure by civil action in the superior court of the county where
the property is located. Costs associated with the foreclosure of the lien,
including but not limited to advertising, title report, and personnel costs,
shall be added to the lien upon filing of the foreclosure action. In addition
to the costs and disbursements provided by statute, the court may allow the
county a reasonable attorney's fee. The lien shall be foreclosed in the same
manner as the foreclosure of real property tax liens.

(4) A county may
provide a real property owner or the owner's designee with duplicate bills for
service to tenants, or may notify an owner or the owner's designee that a tenant's
service account is delinquent. However, if an owner or the owner's designee
notifies the county in writing that a property served by the county is a rental
property, asks to be notified of a tenant's delinquency, and has provided, in
writing, a complete and accurate mailing address, the county shall notify the
owner or the owner's designee of a tenant's delinquency at the same time and in
the same manner the county notifies the tenant of the tenant's delinquency or
by mail. When a county provides a real property owner or the owner's designee
with duplicates of tenant utility service bills or notice that a tenant's
utility account is delinquent, the county shall notify the tenant that it is
providing the duplicate bills or delinquency notice to the owner or the owner's
designee. After January 1, 2002, if a county fails to notify the owner of a
tenant's delinquency after receiving a written request to do so and after
receiving the other information required by this subsection, the county shall
have no lien against the premises for the tenant's delinquent and unpaid
charges.

Sec. 4. RCW 80.28.010 and 1995 c
399 s 211 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All charges made,
demanded or received by any gas company, electrical company or water company
for gas, electricity or water, or for any service rendered or to be rendered in
connection therewith, shall be just, fair, reasonable and sufficient.

(2) Every gas company,
electrical company and water company shall furnish and supply such service,
instrumentalities and facilities as shall be safe, adequate and efficient, and
in all respects just and reasonable.

(3) All rules and
regulations issued by any gas company, electrical company or water company,
affecting or pertaining to the sale or distribution of its product, shall be
just and reasonable.

(4) Utility service for
residential space heating shall not be terminated between November 15 through
March 15 if the customer:

(a) Notifies the
utility of the inability to pay the bill, including a security deposit. This
notice should be provided within five business days of receiving a payment
overdue notice unless there are extenuating circumstances. If the customer
fails to notify the utility within five business days and service is
terminated, the customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and
fulfilling the requirements of this section, receive the protections of this
chapter;

(b) Provides
self-certification of household income for the prior twelve months to a grantee
of the department of community, trade, and economic development which
administers federally funded energy assistance programs. The grantee shall
determine that the household income does not exceed the maximum allowed for
eligibility under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance under 42
U.S.C. 8624 and shall provide a dollar figure that is seven percent of
household income. The grantee may verify information provided in the
self-certification;

(c) Has applied for
home heating assistance from applicable government and private sector
organizations and certifies that any assistance received will be applied to the
current bill and future utility bills;

(d) Has applied for
low-income weatherization assistance to the utility or other appropriate agency
if such assistance is available for the dwelling;

(e) Agrees to a payment
plan and agrees to maintain the payment plan. The plan will be designed both
to pay the past due bill by the following October 15 and to pay for continued
utility service. If the past due bill is not paid by the following October 15,
the customer shall not be eligible for protections under this chapter until the
past due bill is paid. The plan shall not require monthly payments in excess
of seven percent of the customer's monthly income plus one-twelfth of any
arrearage accrued from the date application is made and thereafter during
November 15 through March 15. A customer may agree to pay a higher percentage
during this period, but shall not be in default unless payment during this
period is less than seven percent of monthly income plus one-twelfth of any
arrearage accrued from the date application is made and thereafter. If
assistance payments are received by the customer subsequent to implementation
of the plan, the customer shall contact the utility to reformulate the plan;
and

(f) Agrees to pay the
moneys owed even if he or she moves.

(5) The utility shall:

(a) Include in any
notice that an account is delinquent and that service may be subject to
termination, a description of the customer's duties in this section;

(b) Assist the customer
in fulfilling the requirements under this section;

(c) Be authorized to
transfer an account to a new residence when a customer who has established a
plan under this section moves from one residence to another within the same
utility service area;

(d) Be permitted to
disconnect service if the customer fails to honor the payment program.
Utilities may continue to disconnect service for those practices authorized by
law other than for nonpayment as provided for in this subsection. Customers
who qualify for payment plans under this section who default on their payment
plans and are disconnected can be reconnected and maintain the protections
afforded under this chapter by paying reconnection charges, if any, and by
paying all amounts that would have been due and owing under the terms of the
applicable payment plan, absent default, on the date on which service is
reconnected; and

(e) Advise the customer
in writing at the time it disconnects service that it will restore service if
the customer contacts the utility and fulfills the other requirements of this
section.

(6) A payment plan
implemented under this section is consistent with RCW 80.28.080.

(7) Every gas company
and electrical company shall offer residential customers the option of a budget
billing or equal payment plan. The budget billing or equal payment plan shall
be offered low-income customers eligible under the state's plan for low-income
energy assistance prepared in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 8624(C)(1) without
limiting availability to certain months of the year, without regard to the
length of time the customer has occupied the premises, and without regard to
whether the customer is the tenant or owner of the premises occupied.

(8) Every gas company,
electrical company and water company shall construct and maintain such
facilities in connection with the manufacture and distribution of its product
as will be efficient and safe to its employees and the public.

(9) An agreement
between the customer and the utility, whether oral or written, shall not waive
the protections afforded under this chapter.

(10) In establishing
rates or charges for water service, water companies as defined in RCW 80.04.010
may consider the achievement of water conservation goals and the discouragement
of wasteful water use practices.

(11)
Every gas company, electrical company, and water company may provide a real
property owner or the owner's designee with duplicate bills for service to
tenants, or may notify an owner or the owner's designee that a tenant's service
account is delinquent. However, if an owner or the owner's designee notifies
the gas company, electric company, and water company in writing that a property
served by the gas company, electric company, and water company is a rental
property, asks to be notified of a tenant's delinquency, and has provided, in
writing, a complete and accurate mailing address, the gas company, electric
company, and water company shall notify the owner or the owner's designee of a
tenant's delinquency at the same time and in the same manner the gas company,
electric company, and water company notifies the tenant of the tenant's
delinquency or by mail. When a gas company, electric company, and water
company provides a real property owner or the owner's designee with duplicates
of tenant utility service bills or notice that a tenant's utility account is
delinquent, the gas company, electric company, and water company shall notify
the tenant that it is providing the duplicate bills or delinquency notice to
the owner or the owner's designee. After January 1, 2002, if a gas company,
electric company, and water company fails to notify the owner of a tenant's
delinquency after receiving a written request to do so and after receiving the
other information required by this subsection, the gas company, electric
company, and water company shall have no lien against the premises for the
tenant's delinquent and unpaid charges.

---
END ---