BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.21.290 and 1965 c
7 s 35.21.290 are each amended to read as follows:

Cities and towns owning
their own waterworks, or electric light or power plants shall have a lien
against the premises to which water, electric light, or power services were
furnished for four months charges therefor due or to become due, but not for
any charges more than four months past due: PROVIDED, That the owner of the
premises or the owner of a delinquent mortgage thereon may give written notice
to the superintendent or other head of such works or plant to cut off service
to such premises accompanied by payment or tender of payment of the then
delinquent and unpaid charges for such service against the premises together
with the cut-off charge, whereupon the city or town shall have no lien against
the premises for charges for such service thereafter furnished, nor shall the
owner of the premises or the owner of a delinquent mortgage thereon be held for
the payment thereof.

All charges made for
utility services must be charged to the customer who contracts for the
services. In cases where the service contract is with the tenant of a
property, collection of charges must be made from the tenant, and liens against
the property owner are prohibited. A city or town may not refuse to provide
service to a residential customer who is a tenant based on the nonpayment for
services by the prior customer. The city or town may refuse to provide service
if the prior nonpaying customer continues to reside in the premises.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.67.200 and 1991 c
36 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Cities and towns owning
their own sewer systems shall have a lien for delinquent and unpaid rates and
charges for sewer service, penalties levied pursuant to RCW 35.67.190, and
connection charges, including interest thereon, against the premises to which
such service has been furnished or is available, which lien shall be superior
to all other liens and encumbrances except general taxes and local and special
assessments. The city or town by ordinance may provide that delinquent charges
shall bear interest at not exceeding eight percent per annum computed on a
monthly basis: PROVIDED, That a city or town using the property tax system for
utility billing may, by resolution or ordinance, adopt the alternative lien
procedure as set forth in RCW 35.67.215.

All charges made for
utility services must be charged to the customer who contracts for the
services. In cases where the service contract is with the tenant of a
property, collection of charges must be made from the tenant, and liens against
the property owner are prohibited. A city or town may not refuse to provide
service to a residential customer who is a tenant based on the nonpayment for
services by the prior customer. The city or town may refuse to provide service
if the prior nonpaying customer continues to reside in the premises.

Sec. 3. RCW 36.94.150 and 1997 c
393 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

All counties operating
a system of sewerage and/or water shall have a lien for delinquent connection
charges and charges for the availability of sewerage and/or water service,
together with interest fixed by resolution at eight percent per annum from the
date due until paid. Penalties of not more than ten percent of the amount due
may be imposed in case of failure to pay the charges at times fixed by
resolution. The lien shall be for all charges, interest, and penalties and
shall attach to the premises to which the services were available. The lien
shall be superior to all other liens and encumbrances, except general taxes and
local and special assessments of the county.

The county department
established in RCW 36.94.120 shall certify periodically the delinquencies to
the auditor of the county at which time the lien shall attach.

Upon the expiration of
sixty days after the attachment of the lien, the county may bring suit in
foreclosure by civil action in the superior court of the county where the
property is located. Costs associated with the foreclosure of the lien,
including but not limited to advertising, title report, and personnel costs,
shall be added to the lien upon filing of the foreclosure action. In addition
to the costs and disbursements provided by statute, the court may allow the
county a reasonable attorney's fee. The lien shall be foreclosed in the same
manner as the foreclosure of real property tax liens.

All charges made for
utility services must be charged to the customer who contracts for the
services. In cases where the service contract is with the tenant of a
property, collection of charges must be made from the tenant, and liens against
the property owner are prohibited. A county may not refuse to provide service
to a residential customer who is a tenant based on the nonpayment for services
by the prior customer. The county may refuse to provide service if the prior
nonpaying customer continues to reside in the premises.

Sec. 4. RCW 57.08.081 and 1999 c
153 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commissioners
of any district shall provide for revenues by fixing rates and charges for
furnishing sewer and drainage service and facilities to those to whom service
is available or for providing water, such rates and charges to be fixed as
deemed necessary by the commissioners, so that uniform charges will be made for
the same class of customer or service and facility. Rates and charges may be
combined for the furnishing of more than one type of sewer or drainage service
and facilities.

(2) In classifying
customers of such water, sewer, or drainage system, the board of commissioners
may in its discretion consider any or all of the following factors: The
difference in cost to various customers; the location of the various customers
within and without the district; the difference in cost of maintenance,
operation, repair, and replacement of the various parts of the system; the
different character of the service furnished various customers; the quantity
and quality of the service and facility furnished; the time of its use; the
achievement of water conservation goals and the discouragement of wasteful
practices; capital contributions made to the system including but not limited
to assessments; and any other matters which present a reasonable difference as
a ground for distinction. Rates shall be established as deemed proper by the
commissioners and as fixed by resolution and shall produce revenues sufficient
to take care of the costs of maintenance and operation, revenue bond and
warrant interest and principal amortization requirements, and all other charges
necessary for efficient and proper operation of the system. Prior to
furnishing services, a district may require a deposit to guarantee payment for
services. However, failure to require a deposit does not affect the validity
of any lien authorized by this section.

(3) The commissioners
shall enforce collection of connection charges, and rates and charges for water
supplied against property owners connecting with the system or receiving such
water, and for sewer and drainage services charged against property to which
and its owners to whom the service is available, such charges being deemed
charges against the property served, by addition of penalties of not more than
ten percent thereof in case of failure to pay the charges at times fixed by
resolution. The commissioners may provide by resolution that where either
connection charges or rates and charges for services supplied are delinquent
for any specified period of time, the district shall certify the delinquencies
to the auditor of the county in which the real property is located, and the
charges and any penalties added thereto and interest thereon at the rate of not
more than the prime lending rate of the district's bank plus four percentage
points per year shall be a lien against the property upon which the service was
received, subject only to the lien for general taxes.

(4) All charges made
for utility services must be charged to the customer who contracts for the
services. In cases where the service contract is with the tenant of a
property, collection of charges must be made from the tenant, and liens against
the property owner are prohibited. A district may not refuse to provide
service to a residential customer who is a tenant based on the nonpayment for
services by the prior customer. The district may refuse to provide service if
the prior nonpaying customer continues to reside in the premises.

(5) The district
may, at any time after the connection charges or rates and charges for services
supplied or available and penalties are delinquent for a period of sixty days,
bring suit in foreclosure by civil action in the superior court of the county
in which the real property is located. The court may allow, in addition to the
costs and disbursements provided by statute, attorneys' fees, title search and
report costs, and expenses as it adjudges reasonable. The action shall be in
rem, and may be brought in the name of the district against an individual or
against all of those who are delinquent in one action. The laws and rules of
the court shall control as in other civil actions.

(((5))) (6)
In addition to the right to foreclose provided in this section, the district
may also cut off all or part of the service after charges for water or sewer
service supplied or available are delinquent for a period of thirty days.

(((6))) (7)
A district may determine how to apply partial payments on past due accounts.

(((7))) (8)
A district may provide a real property owner or the owner's designee with
duplicate bills for service to tenants, or may notify an owner or the owner's
designee that a tenant's service account is delinquent. However, if an owner
or the owner's designee notifies the district in writing that a property served
by the district is a rental property, asks to be notified of a tenant's
delinquency, and has provided, in writing, a complete and accurate mailing
address, the district shall notify the owner or the owner's designee of a
tenant's delinquency at the same time and in the same manner the district
notifies the tenant of the tenant's delinquency or by mail. When a district
provides a real property owner or the owner's designee with duplicates of
tenant utility service bills or notice that a tenant's utility account is
delinquent, the district shall notify the tenant that it is providing the
duplicate bills or delinquency notice to the owner or the owner's designee.
After January 1, 1999, if a district fails to notify the owner of a tenant's
delinquency after receiving a written request to do so and after receiving the
other information required by this subsection (((7))) (8), the
district shall have no lien against the premises for the tenant's delinquent
and unpaid charges.

Sec. 5. RCW 80.28.010 and 1995 c
399 s 211 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All charges made,
demanded or received by any gas company, electrical company or water company
for gas, electricity or water, or for any service rendered or to be rendered in
connection therewith, shall be just, fair, reasonable and sufficient. To
meet the requirements of this subsection, all charges made for utility services
must be charged to the customer who contracts for the services. In cases where
the service contract is with the tenant of a property, collection of charges
must be made from the tenant, and liens against the property owner are
prohibited.

(2) Every gas company,
electrical company and water company shall furnish and supply such service,
instrumentalities and facilities as shall be safe, adequate and efficient, and
in all respects just and reasonable.

(3) All rules and
regulations issued by any gas company, electrical company or water company,
affecting or pertaining to the sale or distribution of its product, shall be
just and reasonable.

(4) Utility service for
residential space heating shall not be terminated between November 15 through
March 15 if the customer:

(a) Notifies the
utility of the inability to pay the bill, including a security deposit. This
notice should be provided within five business days of receiving a payment
overdue notice unless there are extenuating circumstances. If the customer
fails to notify the utility within five business days and service is
terminated, the customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and
fulfilling the requirements of this section, receive the protections of this
chapter;

(b) Provides
self-certification of household income for the prior twelve months to a grantee
of the department of community, trade, and economic development which
administers federally funded energy assistance programs. The grantee shall
determine that the household income does not exceed the maximum allowed for
eligibility under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance under 42
U.S.C. 8624 and shall provide a dollar figure that is seven percent of
household income. The grantee may verify information provided in the
self-certification;

(c) Has applied for
home heating assistance from applicable government and private sector
organizations and certifies that any assistance received will be applied to the
current bill and future utility bills;

(d) Has applied for
low-income weatherization assistance to the utility or other appropriate agency
if such assistance is available for the dwelling;

(e) Agrees to a payment
plan and agrees to maintain the payment plan. The plan will be designed both
to pay the past due bill by the following October 15 and to pay for continued
utility service. If the past due bill is not paid by the following October 15,
the customer shall not be eligible for protections under this chapter until the
past due bill is paid. The plan shall not require monthly payments in excess
of seven percent of the customer's monthly income plus one-twelfth of any
arrearage accrued from the date application is made and thereafter during
November 15 through March 15. A customer may agree to pay a higher percentage
during this period, but shall not be in default unless payment during this
period is less than seven percent of monthly income plus one-twelfth of any
arrearage accrued from the date application is made and thereafter. If
assistance payments are received by the customer subsequent to implementation
of the plan, the customer shall contact the utility to reformulate the plan;
and

(f) Agrees to pay the
moneys owed even if he or she moves.

(5) The utility shall:

(a) Include in any
notice that an account is delinquent and that service may be subject to
termination, a description of the customer's duties in this section;

(b) Assist the customer
in fulfilling the requirements under this section;

(c) Be authorized to
transfer an account to a new residence when a customer who has established a
plan under this section moves from one residence to another within the same
utility service area;

(d) Be permitted to
disconnect service if the customer fails to honor the payment program.
Utilities may continue to disconnect service for those practices authorized by
law other than for nonpayment as provided for in this subsection. Customers
who qualify for payment plans under this section who default on their payment
plans and are disconnected can be reconnected and maintain the protections
afforded under this chapter by paying reconnection charges, if any, and by
paying all amounts that would have been due and owing under the terms of the
applicable payment plan, absent default, on the date on which service is
reconnected; and

(e) Advise the customer
in writing at the time it disconnects service that it will restore service if
the customer contacts the utility and fulfills the other requirements of this
section.

(6) A payment plan
implemented under this section ((is)) must be consistent with RCW
80.28.080.

(7) Every gas company
and electrical company shall offer residential customers the option of a budget
billing or equal payment plan. The budget billing or equal payment plan shall
be offered low-income customers eligible under the state's plan for low-income
energy assistance prepared in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 8624(C)(1) without
limiting availability to certain months of the year, without regard to the
length of time the customer has occupied the premises, and without regard to
whether the customer is the tenant or owner of the premises occupied.

(8) A gas company,
electric company, or water company may not refuse to provide service to a
residential customer who is a tenant based on the nonpayment for services by
the prior customer. The company may refuse to provide service if the prior
nonpaying customer continues to reside in the premises.

(9) Every gas
company, electrical company and water company shall construct and maintain such
facilities in connection with the manufacture and distribution of its product
as will be efficient and safe to its employees and the public.

(((9))) (10)
An agreement between the customer and the utility, whether oral or written,
shall not waive the protections afforded under this chapter.

(((10)))
(11) In establishing rates or charges for water service, water companies
as defined in RCW 80.04.010 may consider the achievement of water conservation
goals and the discouragement of wasteful water use practices.

---
END ---