BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.163.090 and 1998
c 245 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority shall
adopt a general plan of economic development finance objectives to be
implemented by the authority during the period of the plan. The authority may
exercise the powers authorized under this chapter prior to the adoption of the
initial plan. In developing the plan, the authority shall consider and set
objectives for:

(1) Employment
generation associated with the authority's programs;

(2) The application of
funds to sectors and regions of the state economy evidencing need for improved access
to capital markets and funding resources;

(3) Geographic
distribution of funds and programs available through the authority;

(4) Eligibility
criteria for participants in authority programs;

(5) The use of funds
and resources available from or through federal, state, local, and private
sources and programs;

(6) Standards for
economic viability and growth opportunities of participants in authority
programs;

(7) New programs which
serve a targeted need for financing assistance within the purposes of this
chapter; and

(8) Opportunities to
improve capital access as evidenced by programs existent in other states or as
they are made possible by results of private capital market circumstances.

The authority shall, as
part of the finance plan required under this section, develop an outreach and
marketing plan designed to increase its financial services to ((distressed))
rural counties. As used in this section, "((distressed)) rural
counties" has the same meaning as ((distressed area)) provided
in RCW 43.168.020.

At least one public
hearing shall be conducted by the authority on the plan prior to its adoption.
The plan shall be adopted by resolution of the authority no later than November
15, 1990. The authority may periodically update the plan as determined
necessary by the authority. The plan or updated plan shall include a report on
authority activities conducted since the commencement of authority operation or
since the last plan was reported, whichever is more recent, including a
statement of results achieved under the purposes of this chapter and the plan.
Upon adoption, the authority shall conduct its programs in observance of the
objectives established in the plan.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.163.130 and 1998
c 48 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority may
issue its nonrecourse revenue bonds in order to obtain the funds to carry out
the programs authorized in this chapter. The bonds shall be special
obligations of the authority, payable solely out of the special fund or funds
established by the authority for their repayment.

(2) Any bonds issued
under this chapter may be secured by a financing document between the authority
and the purchasers or owners of such bonds or between the authority and a
corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of
a trust company within or without the state.

(a) The financing
document may pledge or assign, in whole or in part, the revenues and funds held
or to be received by the authority, any present or future contract or other
rights to receive the same, and the proceeds thereof.

(b) The financing
document may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights,
security, and remedies of bondowners as may be reasonable and proper, including,
without limiting the generality of the foregoing, provisions defining defaults
and providing for remedies in the event of default which may include the
acceleration of maturities, restrictions on the individual rights of action by
bondowners, and covenants setting forth duties of and limitations on the
authority in conduct of its programs and the management of its property.

(c) In addition to
other security provided in this chapter or otherwise by law, bonds issued by
the authority may be secured, in whole or in part, by financial guaranties, by
insurance or by letters of credit issued to the authority or a trustee or any
other person, by any bank, trust company, insurance or surety company or other
financial institution, within or without the state. The authority may pledge
or assign, in whole or in part, the revenues and funds held or to be received
by the authority, any present or future contract or other rights to receive the
same, and the proceeds thereof, as security for such guaranties or insurance or
for the reimbursement by the authority to any issuer of such letter of credit
of any payments made under such letter of credit.

(3) Without limiting
the powers of the authority contained in this chapter, in connection with each
issue of its obligation bonds, the authority shall create and establish one or
more special funds, including, but not limited to debt service and sinking
funds, reserve funds, project funds, and such other special funds as the
authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient.

(4) Any security
interest created against the unexpended bond proceeds and against the special
funds created by the authority shall be immediately valid and binding against
the money and any securities in which the money may be invested without authority
or trustee possession. The security interest shall be prior to any party
having any competing claim against the moneys or securities, without filing or
recording under Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code, Title 62A RCW, and
regardless of whether the party has notice of the security interest.

(5) The bonds may be
issued as serial bonds, term bonds or any other type of bond instrument
consistent with the provisions of this chapter. The bonds shall bear such date
or dates; mature at such time or times; bear interest at such rate or rates,
either fixed or variable; be payable at such time or times; be in such
denominations; be in such form; bear such privileges of transferability,
exchangeability, and interchangeability; be subject to such terms of redemption;
and be sold at public or private sale, in such manner, at such time or times,
and at such price or prices as the authority shall determine. The bonds shall
be executed by the manual or facsimile signatures of the authority's chair and
either its secretary or executive director, and may be authenticated by the
trustee (if the authority determines to use a trustee) or any registrar which
may be designated for the bonds by the authority.

(6) Bonds may be issued
by the authority to refund other outstanding authority bonds, at or prior to
maturity of, and to pay any redemption premium on, the outstanding bonds.
Bonds issued for refunding purposes may be combined with bonds issued for the
financing or refinancing of new projects. Pending the application of the
proceeds of the refunding bonds to the redemption of the bonds to be redeemed,
the authority may enter into an agreement or agreements with a corporate
trustee regarding the interim investment of the proceeds and the application of
the proceeds and the earnings on the proceeds to the payment of the principal
of and interest on, and the redemption of, the bonds to be redeemed.

(7) The bonds of the
authority may be negotiable instruments under Title 62A RCW.

(8) Neither the members
of the authority, nor its employees or agents, nor any person executing the
bonds shall be personally liable on the bonds or be subject to any personal
liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of the bonds.

(9) The authority may
purchase its bonds with any of its funds available for the purchase. The
authority may hold, pledge, cancel or resell the bonds subject to and in
accordance with agreements with bondowners.

(10) The authority
shall not exceed ((five)) seven hundred fifty million dollars
in total outstanding debt at any time.

(11) The state finance
committee shall be notified in advance of the issuance of bonds by the
authority in order to promote the orderly offering of obligations in the
financial markets.

(12) The authority may
not issue any bonds after June 30, ((2004)) 2006.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.163.210 and 1998
c 48 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of
facilitating economic development in the state of Washington and encouraging
the employment of Washington workers at meaningful wages:

(1) The authority may
develop and conduct a program or programs to provide nonrecourse revenue bond financing
for the project costs for economic development activities.

(2) The authority may
develop and conduct a program that will stimulate and encourage the development
of new products within Washington state by the infusion of financial aid for
invention and innovation in situations in which the financial aid would not
otherwise be reasonably available from commercial sources. The authority is
authorized to provide nonrecourse revenue bond financing for this program.

(a) For the purposes of
this program, the authority shall have the following powers and duties:

(i) To enter into
financing agreements with eligible persons doing business in Washington state,
upon terms and on conditions consistent with the purposes of this chapter, for
the advancement of financial and other assistance to the persons for the
development of specific products, procedures, and techniques, to be developed
and produced in this state, and to condition the agreements upon contractual
assurances that the benefits of increasing or maintaining employment and tax
revenues shall remain in this state and accrue to it;

(ii) Own, possess, and
take license in patents, copyrights, and proprietary processes and negotiate
and enter into contracts and establish charges for the use of the patents,
copyrights, and proprietary processes when the patents and licenses for
products result from assistance provided by the authority;

(iii) Negotiate royalty
payments to the authority on patents and licenses for products arising as a
result of assistance provided by the authority;

(iv) Negotiate and
enter into other types of contracts with eligible persons that assure that
public benefits will result from the provision of services by the authority;
provided that the contracts are consistent with the state Constitution;

(v) Encourage and
provide technical assistance to eligible persons in the process of developing
new products;

(vi) Refer eligible
persons to researchers or laboratories for the purpose of testing and
evaluating new products, processes, or innovations; and

(vii) To the extent
permitted under its contract with eligible persons, to consent to a
termination, modification, forgiveness, or other change of a term of a
contractual right, payment, royalty, contract, or agreement of any kind to which
the authority is a party.

(b) Eligible persons
seeking financial and other assistance under this program shall forward an
application, together with an application fee prescribed by rule, to the
authority. An investigation and report concerning the advisability of
approving an application for assistance shall be completed by the staff of the
authority. The investigation and report may include, but is not limited to,
facts about the company under consideration as its history, wage standards, job
opportunities, stability of employment, past and present financial condition
and structure, pro forma income statements, present and future markets and
prospects, integrity of management as well as the feasibility of the proposed
product and invention to be granted financial aid, including the state of
development of the product as well as the likelihood of its commercial
feasibility. After receipt and consideration of the report set out in this
subsection and after other action as is deemed appropriate, the application
shall be approved or denied by the authority. The applicant shall be promptly
notified of action by the authority. In making the decision as to approval or
denial of an application, priority shall be given to those persons operating or
planning to operate businesses of special importance to Washington's economy,
including, but not limited to: (i) Existing resource-based industries of
agriculture, forestry, and fisheries; (ii) existing advanced technology
industries of electronics, computer and instrument manufacturing, computer
software, and information and design; and (iii) emerging industries such as
environmental technology, biotechnology, biomedical sciences, materials
sciences, and optics.

(3) The authority may
also develop and implement, if authorized by the legislature, such other
economic development financing programs adopted in future general plans of
economic development finance objectives developed under RCW 43.163.090.

(4) The authority may
not issue any bonds for the programs authorized under this section after June
30, ((2004)) 2006.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---