BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 11.94

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 (1) For the purposes of this section:

_7 (a) "Act in good faith" means to act
consistently with a

_8 legally sufficient psychiatric advance directive of the
principal

_9 or information otherwise made known by the principal,
unless the

10 actor has actual knowledge of the modification or
revocation of

11 the information expressed. If these sources of
information do not

12 provide adequate guidance to the actor, "act in
good faith" means

13 acting in the best interests of the principal,
considering the

14 principal's overall general health condition and
prognosis and the

15 principal's personal values to the extent known.

16 (b) "Decision‑making capacity" or
"capacity" means the ability

17 to understand the significant benefits, risks, and
alternatives to

p. 1 HB
1299

_1 proposed health care and to make and communicate a
health care

_2 decision.

_3 (c) "Health care" means any care,
treatment, service, or

_4 procedure to maintain, diagnose, or otherwise affect a
person's

_5 physical or mental condition.

_6 (d) "Health care agent" or
"agent" means an individual age

_7 eighteen or older who is appointed by a principal in a
psychiatric

_8 advance directive or health care power of attorney to
make health

_9 care decisions on behalf of the principal.

10 (e) "Health care decision" means the
consent, refusal of

11 consent, or withdrawal of consent to health care.

12 (f) "Health care facility" means a
hospital or other entity

13 licensed under the laws of this state.

14 (g) "Health care instruction" means a written
statement of the

15 principal's values, preferences, guidelines, or
directions

16 regarding health care.

17 (h) "Health care power of attorney" means
an instrument

18 appointing one or more health care agents to make health
care

19 decisions for the principal.

20 (i) "Health care provider" means a person,
health care

21 facility, organization, or corporation licensed,
certified, or

22 otherwise authorized or permitted by the laws of this
state to

23 administer health care directly or through an
arrangement with

24 other health care providers, including health
maintenance

25 organizations.

26 (j) "Principal" means an individual age
eighteen or older who

27 has executed a psychiatric advance directive.

28 (k) "Psychiatric advance directive" means
a written instrument

29 that complies with this section and includes one or more
health

30 care instructions, a health care power of attorney, or
both.

31 (2) A principal with the decision-making capacity to
do so may

32 execute a psychiatric advance directive. A psychiatric
advance

33 directive may include one or more health care
instructions to

34 direct health care providers, others assisting with
health care,

35 family members, and a health care agent. A psychiatric
advance

36 directive may include a health care power of attorney to
appoint a

37 health care agent to make health care decisions for the
principal

HB 1299 p. 2

_1 when the principal, in the judgment of the principal's
attending

_2 physician, lacks decision‑making capacity, unless
otherwise

_3 specified in the psychiatric advance directive.

_4 (3) To be legally sufficient in this state, a
psychiatric

_5 advance directive must:

_6 (a) Be in writing;

_7 (b) Be dated;

_8 (c) State the principal's name;

_9 (d) Be executed by a principal with capacity to do
so with the

10 signature of the principal or with the signature of
another person

11 authorized by the principal to sign on behalf of the
principal;

12 (e) Contain verification of the principal's
signature or the

13 signature of the person authorized by the principal to
sign on

14 behalf of the principal, either by a notary public or by
witnesses

15 as provided under this section; and

16 (f) Include a health care instruction, a health care
power of

17 attorney, or both.

18 (4) An individual appointed by the principal under
subsection

19 (2) of this section to make the determination of the
principal's

20 decision‑making capacity is not eligible to act as
the health care

21 agent.

22 (5) The following individuals are not eligible to
act as the

23 health care agent, unless the individual appointed is
related to

24 the principal by blood, marriage, registered domestic
partnership,

25 or adoption, or unless the principal has otherwise
specified in

26 the psychiatric advance directive:

27 (a) A health care provider attending the principal
on the date

28 of execution of the psychiatric advance directive or on
the date

29 the health care agent must make decisions for the
principal; or

30 (b) An employee of a health care provider attending
the

31 principal on the date of execution of the psychiatric
advance

32 directive or on the date the health care agent must make
decisions

33 for the principal.

34 (6) A health care agent or alternate health care
agent

35 appointed in a health care power of attorney may not act
as a

36 witness or notary public for the execution of the
psychiatric

37 advance directive that includes the health care power of
attorney.

38 (7) At least one witness to the execution of the psychiatric

p. 3 HB
1299

_1 advance directive must not be a health care provider
providing

_2 direct care to the principal or an employee of a health
care

_3 provider providing direct care to the principal on the
date of

_4 execution. A person notarizing a psychiatric advance
directive may

_5 be an employee of a health care provider providing
direct care to

_6 the principal.

_7 (8) A health care agent acting pursuant to a
psychiatric

_8 advance directive has the same right as the principal to
receive,

_9 review, and obtain copies of medical records of the
principal, and

10 to consent to the disclosure of medical records of the
principal,

11 unless the principal has otherwise specified in the
psychiatric

12 advance directive.

13 (9) A principal with the capacity to do so may
revoke a

14 psychiatric advance directive in whole or in part at any
time by

15 doing any of the following:

16 (a) Canceling, defacing, obliterating, burning,
tearing, or

17 otherwise destroying the psychiatric advance directive
instrument

18 or directing another in the presence of the principal to
destroy

19 the psychiatric advance directive instrument, with the
intent to

20 revoke the psychiatric advance directive in whole or in
part;

21 (b) Executing a statement, in writing and dated,
expressing the

22 principal's intent to revoke the psychiatric advance
directive in

23 whole or in part;

24 (c) Verbally expressing the principal's intent to
revoke the

25 psychiatric advance directive in whole or in part in the
presence

26 of two witnesses who do not have to be present at the
same time;

27 or

28 (d) Executing a subsequent psychiatric advance
directive, to

29 the extent the subsequent instrument is inconsistent
with any

30 prior instrument.

31 (10) Unless the principal has otherwise specified in
the

32 psychiatric advance directive, the appointment by the
principal of

33 the principal's spouse or registered domestic partner as
health

34 care agent under a health care power of attorney is
revoked by the

35 commencement of proceedings for dissolution, annulment,
or

36 termination of the principal's marriage or commencement
of

37 proceedings for termination of the principal's
registered domestic

38 partnership.

HB 1299 p. 4

_1 (11) The principal is presumed to have the capacity
to execute

_2 a psychiatric advance directive and to revoke a
psychiatric

_3 advance directive, absent clear and convincing evidence
to the

_4 contrary.

_5 (12) A health care provider or health care agent may
presume

_6 that a psychiatric advance directive is legally
sufficient absent

_7 actual knowledge to the contrary. A psychiatric advance
directive

_8 is presumed to be properly executed, absent clear and
convincing

_9 evidence to the contrary.

10 (13) A health care agent, and a health care provider
acting

11 pursuant to the direction of a health care agent, are
presumed to

12 be acting in good faith, absent clear and convincing
evidence to

13 the contrary.

14 (14) A psychiatric advance directive is presumed to
remain in

15 effect until the principal modifies or revokes it,
absent clear

16 and convincing evidence to the contrary.

17 (15) This section does not create a presumption
concerning the

18 intention of an individual who has not executed a psychiatric

19 advance directive and, except as otherwise provided by
this

20 section, does not impair or supersede any right or
responsibility

21 of an individual to consent, refuse to consent, or
withdraw

22 consent to health care on behalf of another in the
absence of a

23 psychiatric advance directive.

24 (16) A copy of a psychiatric advance directive is
presumed to

25 be a true and accurate copy of the executed original,
absent clear

26 and convincing evidence to the contrary, and must be
given the

27 same effect as an original.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 HB
1299