BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 2.08.180
and 1987 c 73 s 1 are each amended to read as

_5 follows:

_6 A case in the superior court of any county may be
tried by a

_7 judge pro tempore, who must be either: (1) A
member of the bar,

_8 agreed upon in writing by the parties litigant, or their
attorneys

_9 of record, approved by the court, and sworn to try the
case; ((and

10 his)) or (2) pursuant to supreme court rule,
any previously

11 elected judge, active or retired. Any action in
the trial of such

12 cause shall have the same effect as if ((he were))
it was made by

13 a judge of such court. ((However, if a previously
elected judge of

14 the superior court retires leaving a pending case in
which the

15 judge has made discretionary rulings, the judge is
entitled to

16 hear the pending case as a judge pro tempore without
any written

17 agreement.))

p. 1 HB
1300

_1 A judge pro tempore shall, before entering upon his or
her

_2 duties in any cause, take and subscribe the following
oath or

_3 affirmation:

_4 "I do solemnly swear (or affirm, as the case
may be,) that I

_5 will support the Constitution of the United States and
the

_6 Constitution of the State of Washington, and that I will

_7 faithfully discharge the duties of the office of judge
pro tempore

_8 in the cause wherein
. . . . . . is plaintiff and
. . . . . . defendant,

_9 according to the best of my ability."

10 A judge pro tempore who is a practicing attorney and
who is not

11 a retired justice of the supreme court or judge of a
superior

12 court of the state of Washington, or who is not an
active judge of

13 an inferior court of the state of Washington, shall
receive a

14 compensation of one-two hundred and fiftieth of the
annual salary

15 of a superior court judge for each day engaged in ((said))
a

16 trial, to be paid in the same manner as the salary of
the superior

17 court judge. A judge who is an active judge of
an inferior court of

18 the state of Washington shall receive no compensation as
judge pro

19 tempore. A justice or judge who has retired from the
supreme court,

20 court of appeals, or superior court of the state of
Washington

21 shall receive compensation as judge pro tempore in the
amount of

22 sixty percent of the amount payable to a judge pro
tempore under

23 this section.

24 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002, if

25 the proposed amendment to Article IV, section 7 of the
state

26 Constitution, relating to qualifications for judges pro
tempore,

27 is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by
the voters

28 at the next general election. If the proposed amendment
is not

29 approved and ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1300 p. 2