BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to improve care to patients by minimizing confusion, eliminating
unnecessary paperwork, decreasing administrative burdens, and streamlining
dispensing of prescription products paid for by third-party payors.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A health carrier
that provides coverage for prescription drugs provided on an outpatient basis
and issues a card or other technology for claims processing, or an
administrator of a health benefit plan including, but not limited to,
third-party administrators for self-insured plans, pharmacy benefits managers,
and state administered plans, shall issue to its enrollees a pharmacy
identification card or other technology containing all information required for
proper claims adjudication. At a minimum, the card or technology shall contain
the following information, if required for proper claims adjudication:

(a) The name or logo of
the issuer of the card;

(b) The processor
control number;

(c) The bin number;

(d) The group number;

(e) The person code;

(f) The card holder ID
name and number; and

(g) The pharmacy help
desk phone number.

(2) Upon renewal of the
health benefit plan, information on the pharmacy identification card or other
technology shall be made current by the health carrier or other entity that
issues the card.

(3) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to require any health carrier to issue a pharmacy
identification card or other technology separate from another identification
card issued to an enrollee under the health benefit plan if the identification
card contains all of the information required under subsection (1) of this
section.

(4) This section
applies to health benefit plans that are delivered, issued for delivery, or
renewed on or after July 1, 2003. For the purposes of this section, renewal of
a health benefit policy, contract, or plan occurs on each anniversary of the
date on which coverage was first effective on the person or persons covered by
the health benefit plan.

(5) The
insurance commissioner may adopt rules to implement this act, taking into
consideration any relevant standards developed by the national council for
prescription drug programs and the requirements of the federal health insurance
portability and accountability act of 1996.

---
END ---