BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that banks, other financial institutions, and licensed check cashers engage in
cashing checks, drafts, money orders, and other commercial paper as part of
their customary business. Banks, other financial institutions, and licensed check
cashers are generally permitted to charge fees for such services.

The legislature also
finds that other entities sometimes engage in cashing checks as a minor part of
their customary business. The legislature hereby declares that certain other
entities should be prohibited from charging fees for such services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout section 3 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(1)(a) "Labor
pool" means a business entity that operates a labor hall by one or more of
the following methods:

(i) Contracting with
third-party users to supply day laborers to them on a temporary basis;

(ii) Hiring, employing,
recruiting, or contracting with workers to fulfill these temporary labor
contracts for day labor; or

(iii) Fulfilling any
contracts for day labor in accordance with this subsection, even if the entity
also conducts other business.

(b) "Labor
pool" does not mean:

(i) A farm labor
contractor as defined in RCW 19.30.010;

(ii) An employee
leasing agency as defined in RCW 50.04.245;

(iii) A temporary
services agency as defined in RCW 50.04.245 that is engaged in supplying solely
white collar employees, secretarial employees, clerical employees, or skilled
laborers;

(iv) A labor union
hiring hall; or

(v) A labor bureau or
employment office operated by a business entity for the sole purpose of
employing an individual for its own use.

(2) "Day
labor" means temporary labor or employment that is occasional or irregular
for which the worker is employed for not longer than the time period required
to complete the temporary assignment for which the individual worker was hired,
although an individual may be eligible for additional temporary assignments
when available.

(3) "Labor
hall" means a central location maintained by a labor pool where day
laborers assemble and are dispatched to work for a third-party user.

(4) "Business
entity" means any individual, corporation, business partnership, firm,
institution, or association.

(5) "Third-party
user" means a business entity that uses the services of a day laborer
provided by a labor pool.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) A labor pool must
compensate day laborers for work performed in legal tender of the United States
or checks on banks convertible into cash on demand at full face value.

(2) A labor pool may
not charge a day laborer for directly or indirectly cashing the day laborer's
check, or request or require that a day laborer waive the protections of this
section.

(3) A day laborer
aggrieved by a violation of this section may bring a civil action against the
labor pool in superior court to recover actual damages, including incidental
and consequential damages, or one thousand dollars, whichever is greater,
together with the costs of the suit and reasonable attorneys' fees. The remedy
under this section is in addition to any other remedies at law or equity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 2 and 3 of this
act are each added to chapter 49.48 RCW.

---
END ---