BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the department of fish and wildlife issues thousands of hydraulic project
approvals each year at a substantial commitment of government resources for
individual permitting review and writing. The legislature recognizes the importance
of such individual approval processes to ensure proper protection of fish life
and reasonable conditioning for hydraulic project approval decisions. However,
the legislature also recognizes that certain subjects, such as small scale
mining which is addressed by RCW 77.55.270, can be more effectively addressed
by pamphlets that describe general rules which, if followed, will ensure proper
protection of fish life and lessen the burden on applicants and allow the
department to address its significant responsibilities. The legislature does
not seek to alter the scope of the department's existing authority regarding
what activities are "hydraulic projects" or the department's existing
obligation to regulate solely for the protection of fish life. The legislature,
however, adopts this act to authorize and encourage the department to address
appropriate, defined activities by rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 77.55 RCW to read as follows:

(1) As an alternative
to requiring and issuing individual hydraulic project approvals under RCW
77.55.100, 77.55.110, and 77.55.200, the department may adopt rules that
describe approved and disapproved time, manner, locations, methods, or other
conditions for conducting hydraulic projects or other work that will use,
divert, obstruct, or change the natural flow or bed of any of the salt or fresh
waters of the state. The conditions for approval or disapproval shall be
reasonably necessary to protection of fish life. The rules shall:

(a) Describe the time,
manner, locations, methods, or other conditions under which the described
activity is approved;

(b) Describe the
activity that is exempt from individual hydraulic project approval, if
conducted in conformance with the rules;

(c) Be published in
pamphlets, which may provide other reasonably necessary information or
educational materials designed to aid compliance with the approved time,
manner, and methods provided by rule; and

(d) Be provided by the
department for free or, when determined by the fish and wildlife commission,
for a fee that shall reasonably reflect the cost of publication, preparation,
and distribution of the pamphlet.

(2) Rules adopted under
this section may require possession of the pamphlet at the hydraulic project
activity site or while conducting the activity. The rules shall be enforced
under RCW 77.15.300.

(3) In adopting rules
to implement this section, the department shall ensure that this alternative
hydraulic project approval is only available for repetitive low-risk permit
approval requests for which there are predictable mitigation measures, and that
complex projects, or projects that generally require site-specific mitigation
measures, will continue to undergo individual hydraulic project approval. The
rules must also include a description of the method that the department will
use to track, monitor, and evaluate the projects approved by this alternative
process. The fish and wildlife commission shall provide for public review and
comment of any candidates for the pamphlet type of approval before committing
to final selection.

(4) The department
shall report to the appropriate legislative committees by January 1, 2006, on
the number and type of alternative permit approvals granted under this
section. The report shall include information regarding how resources that
would have been used to process these alternative permits as individual permits
were shifted to more complex projects.

(5) This section
expires July 1, 2006.

Sec. 3. RCW 77.15.300 and 2000 c
107 s 239 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project activities if the person:

(a) Constructs
any form of hydraulic project or performs other work on a hydraulic project
and((:

(a))) fails to have a hydraulic project
approval required under chapter 77.55 RCW for such construction or work; ((or))

(b) Violates any
requirements or conditions of the hydraulic project approval for such construction
or work; or

(c) Violates any
rule adopted under RCW 77.55.150, 77.55.270, or section 2 of this act that
identifies the time, manner, locations, methods, or other conditions under
which an activity is approved or not approved.

(2)
Unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project activities is a gross misdemeanor.

---
END ---