BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.24.630 and 1999 c
248 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person who
goes onto the land of another and who removes timber, crops, minerals, or other
similar valuable property from the land, or wrongfully causes waste or injury to
the land, or wrongfully injures personal property or improvements to real
estate on the land, is liable to the injured party for treble the amount of the
damages caused by the removal, waste, or injury. For purposes of this section,
a person acts "wrongfully" if the person intentionally and
unreasonably commits the act or acts while knowing, or having reason to know,
that he or she lacks authorization to so act. Damages recoverable under this
section include, but are not limited to, damages for the market value of the
property removed or injured, and for injury to the land, including the costs of
restoration. In addition, the person is liable for reimbursing the injured
party for the party's reasonable costs, including but not limited to
investigative costs and reasonable attorneys' fees and other litigation-related
costs.

(2) This section does
not apply in any case where liability for damages is provided under RCW
64.12.030, 79.01.756, 79.01.760, 79.40.070, or where there is immunity from
liability under RCW 64.12.035.

(3)
This section applies to rights and interests in land that constitute real
property in RCW 64.04.130. As used in this section, the term "goes onto
the land of another" includes, but is not limited to, interference with
rights or interests by the owner of the subservient estate.

--- END ---