BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.50.030 and 1998 c
190 s 77 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person shall not
use, operate, or maintain a gill net which exceeds ((1500)) one
thousand five hundred feet in length or a drag seine in the waters of the
Columbia river for catching salmon.

(2) A person shall not
construct, install, use, operate, or maintain within state waters a pound net,
round haul net, lampara net, fish trap, fish wheel, scow fish wheel, set net,
weir, or fixed appliance for catching salmon or steelhead except under the
authority of a trial or experimental fishery permit, when an emerging
commercial fishery has been designated allowing use of one or more of these
gear types to assist in salmon recovery. The director may authorize the
use of this gear for scientific investigations.

(3) The
department, in coordination with the Oregon department of fish and wildlife,
shall adopt rules to regulate the use of monofilament in gill net webbing on
the Columbia river.

--- END ---