BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
46.01.140 and 1996 c 315 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) The county auditor, if appointed by the director
of

_7 licensing shall carry out the provisions of this title
relating to

_8 the licensing of vehicles and the issuance of vehicle
license

_9 number plates under the direction and supervision of the
director

10 and may with the approval of the director appoint
assistants as

11 special deputies and recommend subagents to accept
applications

12 and collect fees for vehicle licenses and transfers and
to deliver

13 vehicle license number plates.

14 (2) A county auditor appointed by the director may
request that

15 the director appoint subagencies within the county.
Upon

16 authorization of the director, the auditor shall
advertise a

17 request for proposals and use the process for soliciting
vendors

18 under RCW 39.04.190(2), except that the provision
requiring the

p. 1 HB
1310

_1 contract to be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder
shall not

_2 apply. The auditor shall submit all proposals to the
director, and

_3 shall recommend the appointment of one or more subagents
who have

_4 applied through the request for proposal process. The
director has

_5 final appointment authority.

_6 (3)(a) A county auditor who is appointed as an agent
by the

_7 department shall enter into a standard contract provided
by the

_8 director, developed with the advice of the title and
registration

_9 advisory committee.

10 (b) A subagent appointed under subsection (2) of
this section

11 shall enter into a standard contract with the county
auditor,

12 developed with the advice of the title and registration
advisory

13 committee. The director shall provide the standard
contract to

14 county auditors.

15 (c) The contracts provided for in (a) and (b) of
this

16 subsection must contain at a minimum provisions that:

17 (i) Describe the responsibilities, and where
applicable, the

18 liability, of each party relating to the service
expectations and

19 levels, equipment to be supplied by the department, and
equipment

20 maintenance;

21 (ii) Require the specific type of insurance or bonds
so that

22 the state is protected against any loss of collected
motor vehicle

23 tax revenues or loss of equipment;

24 (iii) Specify the amount of training that will be
provided by

25 the state, the county auditor, or subagents;

26 (iv) Describe allowable costs that may be charged to
vehicle

27 licensing activities as provided for in (d) of this
subsection;

28 (v) Describe the causes and procedures for
termination of the

29 contract, which may include mediation and binding
arbitration.

30 (d) The department shall develop procedures that
will

31 standardize and prescribe allowable costs that may be
assigned to

32 vehicle licensing and vessel registration and title
activities

33 performed by county auditors.

34 (e) The contracts may include any provision that the
director

35 deems necessary to ensure acceptable service and the
full

36 collection of vehicle and vessel tax revenues.

37 (f) The director may waive any provisions of the
contract

HB 1310 p. 2

_1 deemed necessary in order to ensure that readily
accessible

_2 service is provided to the citizens of the state.

_3 (4)(a) At any time any application is made to the
director, the

_4 county auditor, or other agent pursuant to any law
dealing with

_5 licenses, registration, or the right to operate any
vehicle or

_6 vessel upon the public highways or waters of this state,
excluding

_7 applicants already paying such fee under RCW 46.16.070
or

_8 46.16.085, the applicant shall pay to the director,
county

_9 auditor, or other agent a fee of three dollars for each

10 application in addition to any other fees required by
law.

11 (b) Counties that do not cover the expenses of
vehicle

12 licensing and vessel registration and title activities
may submit

13 to the department a request for cost-coverage moneys.
The request

14 must be submitted on a form developed by the
department. The

15 department shall develop procedures to verify whether a
request is

16 reasonable. Payment shall be made on requests found to
be allowable

17 from the licensing services account.

18 (c) Applicants for certificates of ownership,
including

19 applicants paying fees under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085,
shall pay

20 to the director, county auditor, or other agent a fee of
four

21 dollars in addition to any other fees required by law.

22 (d) The fees under (a) and (c) of this subsection,
if paid to

23 the county auditor as agent of the director, or if paid
to a

24 subagent of the county auditor, shall be paid to the
county

25 treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by
the county

26 auditor and credited to the county current expense
fund. If the fee

27 is paid to another agent of the director, the fee shall
be used by

28 the agent to defray his or her expenses in handling the

29 application.

30 (5) A subagent shall collect a service fee of (a) ((seven))

31 eight dollars and fifty cents for changes in a
certificate of

32 ownership, with or without registration renewal, or
verification

33 of record and preparation of an affidavit of lost title
other than

34 at the time of the title application or transfer and (b)
three

35 dollars and fifty cents for registration renewal
only, issuing a

36 transit permit, or any other service under this section.

37 (6) If the fee is collected by the state patrol as
agent for

38 the director, the fee so collected shall be certified to
the state

p. 3 HB
1310

_1 treasurer and deposited to the credit of the state
patrol highway

_2 account. If the fee is collected by the department of

_3 transportation as agent for the director, the fee shall
be

_4 certified to the state treasurer and deposited to the
credit of

_5 the motor vehicle fund. All such fees collected by the
director or

_6 branches of his office shall be certified to the state
treasurer

_7 and deposited to the credit of the highway safety fund.

_8 (7) Any county revenues that exceed the cost of
providing

_9 vehicle licensing and vessel registration and title
activities in

10 a county, calculated in accordance with the procedures
in

11 subsection (3)(d) of this section, shall be expended as
determined

12 by the county legislative authority during the process
established

13 by law for adoption of county budgets.

14 (8) The director may adopt rules to implement this
section.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1310 p. 4