BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) The state's
education reform efforts are built on a foundation that couples high learning
standards for students with increased autonomy and flexibility for schools and
school districts;

(2) The state board of
education had the challenging assignment of aligning state high school
graduation requirements with the state's learning standards and the essential
academic learning requirements;

(3) The state board of
education should be commended for the thoughtful and collaborative way it
approached its assignment to restructure state high school graduation
requirements;

(4) Although the board
used a commendable process to determine state high school graduation
requirements, the new requirement that students must complete a plan and
culminating project before graduation provides school districts with less
autonomy and flexibility than they had before the new requirements were
adopted. In addition, the requirement may constrain a student's opportunity to
participate in programs such as running start and tech-prep; and

(5) While the state
board should define the types of knowledge and skill students should have in
order to graduate, the decision on how to organize learning opportunities for
students to gain that knowledge and skill should remain with local school
boards.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.230.090 and 1997
c 222 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state board of
education shall establish minimum high school graduation requirements or
equivalencies for students. Any course in Washington state history and
government used to fulfill high school graduation requirements is encouraged to
include information on the culture, history, and government of the American Indian
peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state. When adopting minimum
high school graduation requirements, the state board shall limit those
requirements to the subject matter competencies that students must demonstrate
and the subject matter Carnegie units they may complete. Local school directors
have the sole authority to determine the organization of a student's learning
opportunities and the means by which a student will demonstrate subject matter
competence and acquisition of the knowledge and skill needed to meet the goals
of the state's basic education act in RCW 28A.150.210.

(2) In recognition of
the statutory authority of the state board of education to establish and
enforce minimum high school graduation requirements, the state board shall
periodically reevaluate the graduation requirements and shall report such
findings to the legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state
board.

(3) Pursuant to any
requirement for instruction in languages other than English established by the
state board of education or a local school district, or both, for purposes of
high school graduation, students who receive instruction in American sign
language or one or more American Indian languages shall be considered to have
satisfied the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.

(4) If requested by the
student and his or her family, a student who has completed high school courses
before attending high school shall be given high school credit which shall be
applied to fulfilling high school graduation requirements if:

(a) The course was
taken with high school students, if the academic level of the course exceeds
the requirements for seventh and eighth grade classes, and the student has
successfully passed by completing the same course requirements and examinations
as the high school students enrolled in the class; or

(b) The academic level
of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth grade classes and
the course would qualify for high school credit, because the course is similar
or equivalent to a course offered at a high school in the district as
determined by the school district board of directors.

(5) Students who have
taken and successfully completed high school courses under the circumstances in
subsection (4) of this section shall not be required to take an additional
competency examination or perform any other additional assignment to receive
credit. Subsection (4) of this section shall also apply to students enrolled
in high school on April 11, 1990, who took the courses before attending high
school.

(6) At the
college or university level, five quarter or three semester hours equals one
high school credit.

---
END ---