BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) A budget is hereby
adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the
several amounts specified in parts I through VIII of this act, or so much
thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are
hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries, wages, and
other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and for other specified
purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June 30,
2003, except as otherwise provided, out of the several funds of the state
hereinafter named.

(2) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this act.

(a) "Fiscal year
2002" or "FY 2002" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002.

(b) "Fiscal year
2003" or "FY 2003" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003.

(c) "FTE"
means full time equivalent.

(d) "Lapse"
or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated
status.

(e) "Provided
solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified
purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of
an amount provided solely for a specified purpose which is unnecessary to
fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART
I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 28,313,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 28,497,000

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 45,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 56,855,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $15,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is
provided for the legislature to continue the services of expert counsel on
legal issues relating to services for persons with developmental disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. FOR THE SENATE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 22,025,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 23,160,000

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 45,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 45,230,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $15,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is
provided for the legislature to continue the services of expert counsel on
legal issues relating to services for persons with developmental disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT
AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,171,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,938,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,109,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely
for the joint legislative audit and review committee to conduct an evaluation
of the client outcomes of the high school transition program operated by the
department of social and health services division of developmental
disabilities. The study shall identify the different approaches that have been
used in providing transition services and whether some approaches are more or
less successful in helping young adults with developmental disabilities achieve
greater levels of independence. The study shall evaluate how transition
programs reduce the level of support provided to clients as they achieve
greater levels of independence, and shall be submitted to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2002.

(2) $250,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $125,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for studies of the field services caseloads in the division of
developmental disabilities and the child protective services and child welfare
services caseloads in the children's administration of the department of social
and health services. The committee may contract for consulting services in
conducting these studies. The studies shall include:

(a) A management audit
and review of the ratios of case managers and/or case workers to client
caseloads. Attention shall be given to the differences between active and
inactive cases, characteristics of cases by functional categories (i.e., CAP
waiver, community protection, etc.), the workloads of noncase-carrying case
workers, as well as a description of existing staffing models in the division
of developmental disabilities and the children's administration. A report of
this management audit and review shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2001.

(b) The analysis and
development of caseload staffing models. The purpose of the analysis is to
evaluate the validity of the department's existing staffing models in
establishing appropriate staffing levels as well as to evaluate and propose
alternative approaches to defining staffing needs for field based staff. The
purpose of the staffing model is to develop a mechanism to assess field based
staffing requirements and costs for the biennial budget process. The study and
model development shall include but not be limited to:

(i) An analysis of the
current process and assumptions involved in developing budget requests for
staffing;

(ii) An assessment of
alternatives to current practices, to include alternatives to "cases per
worker" ratios, such as methods that define tasks and staff time required
to complete tasks; and

(iii) The development,
in consultation with the department of social and health services and the
office of financial management, of staffing model options that will be used in
the biennial budget building process and updated to reflect changing mandates,
caseload mix, and policy priorities.

A report of the analysis
and development of caseload staffing models shall be submitted to the fiscal
committees of the legislature and to the office of financial management by July
30, 2002.

(3) The committee shall
study and report on pipeline safety as provided in section 149 of this act.

(4) Within the amounts
provided in this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall complete the public lands inventory project authorized in the 1997-99
capital budget for the interagency committee for outdoor recreation. The
interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall transfer all materials and
information gathered for the public lands inventory project to the joint
legislative audit and review committee and shall provide assistance to complete
the study.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION
AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,467,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,484,000

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 203,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,154,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $80,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided to
convene a work group to explore the feasibility of a central repository for
teacher education and experience information and to make recommendations for
establishing a central repository. The feasibility study shall analyze the
costs and benefits of a central repository including, but not limited to, the
following:

(i) Whether increased
accuracy is likely;

(ii) Whether school
districts can save administrative and training costs;

(iii) Whether teachers
will benefit;

(iv) Whether a central
repository allows for innovative use of the internet and other information
technology;

(v) Whether improved
methods could be used to better ensure data reliability and integrity; and

(vi) Whether audits can
be done more efficiently.

(b) The feasibility
study shall also estimate the cost of a central repository and estimate the
savings a central repository would generate compared to the current methods of
gathering and maintaining this information.

(c) As a basis for the
study and before convening the work group, the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee shall identify or design one or more models
for a multiple user data gathering and management system that can be
incorporated into the concept of the central repository.

(d) The work group
shall include the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
office of the state auditor, the department of information services, and a
representative from each of the following: Teachers, a large school district,
a small school district, educational service districts, school administrators,
and others at the discretion of the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.

(e) Staffing for the
work group shall be provided by the legislative accountability and evaluation
program committee with assistance from the state agencies on the work group.

(2) The feasibility
study and recommendations shall be provided to the education and fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 15, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
ACTUARY

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 1,923,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE
SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,421,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 7,455,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION ................. $ 13,876,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations shall be transferred to the legislative systems revolving fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 3,909,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 4,038,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 7,947,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $41,000
of the general fund fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $43,000 of the general
fund fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely for the uniform
legislation commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES. In order to achieve operating efficiencies
within the financial resources available to the legislative branch, the
executive rules committee of the house of representatives and the facilities
and operations committee of the senate by joint action may transfer funds among
the house of representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and review
committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, office
of the state actuary, joint legislative systems committee, and statute law
committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. FOR THE SUPREME COURT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 5,423,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 5,510,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 10,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. FOR THE LAW LIBRARY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,982,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,983,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,965,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 12,630,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 12,856,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 25,486,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $505,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$606,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are provided solely for lease increases associated with the division I
facility. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the court of appeals
shall conduct a space planning study exploring options dealing with remodeling
existing space to accommodate needs and evaluating the cost and benefits of
moving to another location.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL
CONDUCT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 925,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 966,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,891,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE
COURTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 14,280,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 14,419,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 30,222,000

Judicial Information
Systems Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 27,152,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 86,073,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in
the judicial information systems account appropriation shall be used for the
operations and maintenance of technology systems that improve services provided
by the supreme court, the court of appeals, the office of public defense, and
the administrator for the courts.

(2) No moneys
appropriated in this section may be expended by the administrator for the
courts for payments in excess of fifty percent of the employer contribution on
behalf of superior court judges for insurance and health care plans and federal
social security and medicare and medical aid benefits. As required by Article
IV, section 13 of the state Constitution and 1996 Attorney General's Opinion
No. 2, it is the intent of the legislature that the costs of these employer
contributions shall be shared equally between the state and county or counties
in which the judges serve. The administrator for the courts shall continue to
implement procedures for the collection and disbursement of these employer
contributions. During each fiscal year in the 2001-03 biennium, the office of
the administrator for the courts shall send written notice to the office of
community development in the department of community, trade, and economic
development when each county pays its fifty percent share for the year.

(3) $223,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
gender and justice commission.

(4) $308,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the minority
and justice commission.

(5) $278,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $285,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $263,000 of
the public safety and education account appropriation are provided solely for
the workload associated with tax warrants and other state cases filed in
Thurston county.

(6) $750,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $750,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for court-appointed special advocates to represent children in
dependency matters. The administrator for the courts, after consulting with
the association of juvenile court administrators and the association of
court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad litem programs, shall distribute
the funds to volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad litem
programs. The distribution of funding shall be based on the number of children
who need volunteer court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be
equally accessible to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian
ad litem programs. The administrator for the courts shall not retain more than
six percent of total funding to cover administrative or any other agency costs.

(7) $750,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for judicial program enhancements. Within the funding provided in this
subsection, the administrator for the courts, in consultation with the supreme
court, shall determine the program or programs to receive an enhancement.
Among the programs that may be funded from the amount provided in this
subsection are unified family courts.

(8) $1,200,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for increases for juror pay. The office of the administrator for the
courts may contract with local governments to provide additional juror pay.
The contract shall provide that the local government is responsible for the
first ten dollars of juror compensation for each day or partial day of jury
service, and the state shall reimburse the local government for any additional
compensation, excluding the first day, up to a maximum of five dollars per day.

(9) $400,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for juror parking assistance in counties where jurors pay more than ten
dollars per day for parking. The office of the administrator for the courts
shall identify counties where jurors pay more than ten dollars per day for
parking and may contract with the identified counties to provide juror parking
assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 600,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 12,409,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 13,009,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $251,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to
increase the reimbursement for private attorneys providing constitutionally
mandated indigent defense in nondeath penalty cases.

(2) Amounts provided from
the public safety and education account appropriation in this section include
funding for investigative services in death penalty personal restraint
petitions.

(3) The entire general
fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the continuation of a
dependency and termination legal representation funding pilot program.

(a) The goal of the
pilot program shall be to enhance the quality of legal representation in
dependency and termination hearings, thereby reducing the number of
continuances requested by contract attorneys, including those based on the
unavailability of defense counsel. To meet the goal, the pilot shall include
the following components:

(i) A maximum caseload
requirement of 90 dependency and termination cases per full-time attorney;

(ii) Implementation of
enhanced defense attorney practice standards, including but not limited to
those related to reasonable case preparation and the delivery of adequate
client advice, as developed by Washington state public defense attorneys and
included in the office of public defense December 1999 report Costs of
Defense and Children's Representation in Dependency and Termination Hearings;

(iii) Use of
investigative and expert services in appropriate cases; and

(iv) Effective
implementation of indigency screening of all dependency and termination
parents, guardians, and legal custodians represented by appointed counsel.

(b) The pilot program
shall be established in one eastern and one western Washington juvenile court.

(c) The director shall
contract for an independent evaluation of the pilot program benefits and
costs. A final evaluation shall be submitted to the governor and the fiscal
committees of the legislature no later than October 1, 2002.

(d) The chair of the
office of public defense advisory committee shall appoint an implementation
committee to:

(i) Develop criteria
for a statewide program to improve dependency and termination defense;

(ii) Examine caseload
impacts to the courts resulting from improved defense practices; and

(iii) Identify methods
for the efficient use of expert services and means by which parents may
effectively access services.

If sufficient funds are
available, the office of public defense shall contract with the Washington
state institute for public policy to research how reducing dependent and
termination case delays affects foster care and to identify factors that are
reducing the number of family reunifications that occur in dependency and
termination cases.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 5,913,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 5,744,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 219,000

Water Quality Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 704,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 700,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 13,280,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $100,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely
for the salmon recovery office to support the efforts of the independent
science panel.

(2) $1,252,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,252,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, $219,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation, $704,000 of the water quality
account‑-state appropriation, and $700,000 of the state toxics control
account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the Puget Sound
water quality action team for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 436,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 439,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,910,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,903,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,813,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 10,513,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 8,707,000

Archives and Records
Management Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 7,295,000

Archives and Records
Management Account‑-Private/

Local Appropriation............................. $ 3,860,000

Department of Personnel
Service Account

Appropriation................................... $ 719,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 31,094,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,296,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election
costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures.
Counties shall be reimbursed only for those odd-year election costs that the
secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.

(2) $2,193,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,712,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the verification of initiative and referendum petitions, maintenance
of related voter registration records, and the publication and distribution of
the voters and candidates pamphlet.

(3) $125,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $125,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for legal advertising of state measures under RCW 29.27.072.

(4)(a) $1,944,004 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,986,772
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce
gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other
events of statewide significance during the 2001-2003 biennium. An eligible
nonprofit organization must be formed solely for the purpose of, and be
experienced in, providing gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state
government deliberations and other events of statewide significance and must
have received a determination of tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of
the federal internal revenue code. The funding level for each year of the
contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection and adjusted
to reflect the implicit price deflator for the previous year. The nonprofit
organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make
contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the
state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or
partial payment once all criteria in (a) and (b) of this subsection have been
satisfactorily documented.

(b) The legislature
finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure
continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that
purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a four-year contract with the
nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage through June 30,
2006.

(c) The nonprofit
organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial
statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success
of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any
amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or
indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to
influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the
state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision
of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of
any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making
contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any: (A)
Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a
public officer or employee.

(6)(a) $149,316 of the
archives and records management‑-state appropriation and $597,266 of the
archives and records management‑-private/local appropriation are provided
solely for the construction of an eastern regional archives. The amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse if:

(i) The financing
contract for the construction of an eastern regional archives building is not
authorized in the capital budget for the 2001-03 fiscal biennium; or

(ii) Substitute House
Bill No. 1926 (increasing the surcharge on county auditor recording fees) is
not enacted by June 30, 2001.

(b) $613,879 of the
archives and records management‑-state appropriation and $463,102 of the
archives and records management‑-private/local appropriation are provided
solely for the design and establishment of an electronic data archive,
including the acquisition of hardware and software. The amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse if:

(i) The financing
contract for acquisition of technology hardware and software for the electronic
data archive is not authorized in the capital budget for the 2001-03 fiscal
biennium; or

(ii) Substitute House
Bill No. 1926 (increasing the surcharge on county auditor recording fees) is
not enacted by June 30, 2001.

(7) If the financing
contract for expansion of the state records center is not authorized in the
capital budget for fiscal biennium 2001-03, then $641,000 of the archives and
records management account‑-state appropriation shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF
INDIAN AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 269,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 282,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 551,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. FOR THE COMMISSION ON
ASIAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 233,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 233,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 466,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. FOR THE STATE TREASURER

State Treasurer's Service
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 12,870,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. FOR THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 856,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 20,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 876,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: On
January 1, 2003, any unspent portions of this appropriation shall be deposited
in the common school construction fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. FOR THE STATE AUDITOR

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,087,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,125,000

State Auditing Services
Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 13,540,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 15,752,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Audits of school
districts by the division of municipal corporations shall include findings
regarding the accuracy of: (a) Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience
and education of the district's certified instructional staff, as reported to
the superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.

(2) $420,000 of the
general fund appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $420,000 of the general
fund appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for staff and
related costs to audit special education programs that exhibit unusual rates of
growth, extraordinarily high costs, or other characteristics requiring
attention of the state safety net committee, and other school districts for
baseline purposes and to determine if there are common errors. The auditor
shall consult with the superintendent of public instruction regarding training
and other staffing assistance needed to provide expertise to the audit staff.

(3) $490,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $490,000 of the general fund
fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely for staff and related costs
to: Verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for state
funding purposes or program audits of state funded public school programs; and
establish the specific amount of funds to be recovered whenever the amount is
not firmly established in the course of any public school audits conducted by
the state auditor's office. The results of the audits shall be submitted to
the superintendent of public instruction for corrections of data and
adjustments of funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON
SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 72,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 160,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 232,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 4,811,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 4,806,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,868,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,789,000

New Motor Vehicle
Arbitration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,163,000

Tobacco Prevention and
Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 277,000

Legal Services Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 147,018,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 162,732,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney
general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and
actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The
report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days
after the end of each fiscal year.

(2) Prior to entering
into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state that exceeds five
million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of financial
management and the chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
26. FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST
COUNCIL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 528,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 521,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,049,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
27. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY,
TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 67,060,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 68,414,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 173,338,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 6,983,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,420,000

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,910,000

Film and Video Promotion
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 25,000

Building Code Council
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,061,000

Administrative Contingency
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,777,000

Low-Income Weatherization
Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,292,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 4,381,000

Manufactured Home
Installation Training Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 256,000

Washington Housing Trust
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,596,000

Developmental Disabilities
Endowment Trust

Fund‑-State
Appropriation.................. $ 460,000

Public Facility
Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 550,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 344,523,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) It is the intent of
the legislature that the department of community, trade, and economic
development receive separate programmatic allotments for the office of
community development and the office of trade and economic development. Any
appropriation made to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties of either office
shall be credited to the appropriate office.

(2) $3,085,500 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $3,085,500 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for a contract with the Washington technology center. For work
essential to the mission of the Washington technology center and conducted in
partnership with universities, the center shall not pay any increased indirect
rate nor increases in other indirect charges above the absolute amount paid
during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium.

(3) $61,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $62,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item
OCD-01.

(4) $10,403,445 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely for the drug
control and system improvement formula grant program, to be distributed in
state fiscal year 2002 as follows:

(a) $3,603,250 to local
units of government to continue multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(b) $620,000 to the
department to continue the drug prosecution assistance program in support of
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(c) $1,363,000 to the
Washington state patrol for coordination, investigative, and supervisory
support to the multijurisdictional narcotics task forces and for
methamphetamine education and response;

(d) $200,000 to the
department for grants to support tribal law enforcement needs;

(e) $991,000 to the
department of social and health services, division of alcohol and substance
abuse, for drug courts in eastern and western Washington;

(f) $302,551 to the
department for training and technical assistance of public defenders
representing clients with special needs;

(g) $88,000 to the
department to continue a substance abuse treatment in jails program, to test
the effect of treatment on future criminal behavior;

(h) $697,075 to the
department to continue domestic violence legal advocacy;

(i) $903,000 to the
department of social and health services, juvenile rehabilitation
administration, to continue youth violence prevention and intervention
projects;

(j) $60,000 to the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to complete the state and
local components of the national incident-based reporting system;

(k) $60,000 to the
department for community-based advocacy services to victims of violent crime,
other than sexual assault and domestic violence;

(l) $91,000 to the
department to continue the governor's council on substance abuse;

(m) $99,000 to the
department to continue evaluation of Byrne formula grant programs;

(n) $500,469 to the
office of financial management for criminal history records improvement; and

(o) $825,100 to the
department for required grant administration, monitoring, and reporting on
Byrne formula grant programs.

These amounts represent
the maximum Byrne grant expenditure authority for each program. No program may
expend Byrne grant funds in excess of the amounts provided in this subsection.
If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this subsection become available,
whether from prior or current fiscal year Byrne grant distributions, the
department shall hold these moneys in reserve and may not expend them without
specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried forward and applied to
the pool of moneys available for appropriation for programs and projects in the
succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget request for the succeeding year,
the department shall estimate and request authority to spend any funds
remaining in reserve as a result of this subsection.

(5) $1,250,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,250,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters for homeless families
with children.

(6) $2,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,500,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for grants to operate transitional housing for homeless families with
children. The grants may also be used to make partial payments for rental
assistance.

(7) $1,250,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,250,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for consolidated emergency assistance to homeless families with
children.

(8) $205,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $205,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for grants to Washington Columbia river gorge counties to implement
their responsibilities under the national scenic area management plan. Of this
amount, $390,000 is provided for Skamania county and $20,000 is provided for
Clark county.

(9) $698,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $698,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $1,101,000 of
the administrative contingency account appropriation are provided solely for
contracting with associate development organizations to maintain existing
programs.

(10) $600,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for sexual
assault prevention and treatment programs.

(11) $680,000 of the
Washington housing trust account appropriation is provided solely to conduct a
pilot project designed to lower infrastructure costs for residential
development.

(12) Up to $460,000 of
the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund appropriation may be used
for support of the developmental disabilities endowment governing board and
startup costs of the endowment program. The director of the department shall
implement fees to support the administrative costs of the program as provided
under RCW 43.330.152.

(13) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided to
the department solely for providing technical assistance to developers of
housing for farmworkers.

(14) $297,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $297,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $25,000 of
the film and video promotion account appropriation are provided solely for the
film office to bring film and video production to Washington state.

(15) Repayments of outstanding
loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600, the mortgage and rental assistance program,
shall be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account
balances. The department shall contract with a lender or contract collection
agent to act as a collection agent of the state. The lender or contract
collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit them
into an interest-bearing account. The funds collected shall be remitted to the
department quarterly. Interest earned in the account may be retained by the
lender or contract collection agent, and shall be considered a fee for
processing payments on behalf of the state. Repayments of loans granted under
this chapter shall be made to the lender or contract collection agent as long
as the loan is outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal of the chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
28. FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE
FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 512,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 514,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,026,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
29. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 12,308,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 11,876,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 23,657,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement

Account‑‑State
Appropriation............... $ 229,000

State Auditing Services
Revolving

Account‑‑State
Appropriation............... $ 25,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 48,095,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
30. FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE
HEARINGS

Administrative Hearings
Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 21,938,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
31. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Department of Personnel
Service Account‑-State

Appropriation................. ............ $ 17,297,000

Higher Education Personnel
Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,636,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 18,933,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
department of personnel may charge agencies through the data processing
revolving account up to $561,000 in fiscal year 2002 to study the development
of a new personnel and payroll system. Funding to cover these expenses shall
be realized from agency FICA savings associated with the pretax benefits
contributions plans. Funding is subject to section 902 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
32. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY

Lottery Administrative
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 22,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
33. FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC
AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 226,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 234,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 460,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
34. FOR THE COMMISSION ON
AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 211,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 209,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 420,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
35. FOR THE PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD

Department of Personnel Service
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,679,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
36. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-OPERATIONS

Dependent Care
Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 378,000

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 48,600,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 48,978,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,000,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for support of the information systems project known as the electronic
document image management system.

(2) $120,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for locating inactive members entitled to retirement benefits.

(3) $117,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for modifications to the retirement information systems to accommodate
tracking of postretirement employment on an hourly basis.

(4) $440,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account is provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1046 (Washington state patrol
retirement systems plan 2). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $6,420,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account is provided solely for the
implementation of public employees' retirement system plan 3 (chapter 247, Laws
of 2000).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
37. FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD

State Investment Board
Expense Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 12,876,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
38. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 78,158,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 76,831,000

Timber Tax Distribution
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,981,000

Waste
Education/Recycling/Litter Control‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 101,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 67,000

Oil Spill Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 160,152,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
39. FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,193,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,038,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,231,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
40. FOR THE MUNICIPAL RESEARCH
COUNCIL

City and Town Research
Services Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 3,764,000

County Research Services
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 751,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,515,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
41. FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND
WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

OMWBE Enterprises Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,412,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
42. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 549,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 630,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,930,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 444,000

State Capitol Vehicle
Parking Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 154,000

General Administration
Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 41,411,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 45,118,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $60,000
of the general administration services account appropriation is provided solely
for costs associated with the development of the information technology architecture
to link the risk management information system and the tort division's case
management system, and the reconciliation of defense cost reimbursement
information.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
43. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
INFORMATION SERVICES

Data Processing Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,706,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Fifteen independent
private, nonprofit colleges, located in Washington state, have requested
connection to the K-20 educational telecommunications network. These K-20
connections shall be provided to the private schools on a full cost
reimbursement basis, net of the value of services and information provided by
the private institutions, based on criteria approved by the K-20 board.

(2) Some private K-12
schools have requested limited "pilot connections" to the K-20
network to test the technical and economic feasibility of one or more connection
models. These K-20 connections shall be provided to the private K-12 schools
on a full cost reimbursement basis, net of the value of services and
information provided by the private K-12 schools based on criteria approved by
the K-20 board.

(3) In the 2001-03
biennium, the department shall incorporate statewide elements for a common
technology infrastructure into the state strategic information technology plan
that state agencies shall then use in establishing individual agency business
applications.

(4) The department
shall implement the $10,800,000 service rate reduction it proposed on August
14, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
44. FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 622,000

Insurance Commissioners
Regulatory Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 28,360,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 28,982,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $45,000 of the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is provided solely to
implement a study of the use and possible regulation of third-party
administrators, including whether such administrators should be regulated and
the possible nature and extent of such regulation.

(2) $164,000 of the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1792 (holding company act
for health care service contractors and health maintenance organizations). If
Substitute House Bill No. 1792 is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
45. FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY

Certified Public
Accountants' Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,716,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $355,000
of the certified public accountants' account appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5593
(public accountancy act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, this
amount shall lapse. During fiscal years 2002 and 2003, the board is authorized
to increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor pursuant to RCW
43.135.055.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
46. FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION
COUNCIL

Death Investigations
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 310,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of the
death investigation account appropriation is provided solely for providing
financial assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations.
The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding these
funds for multiple death investigations involving an unanticipated,
extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving multiple jurisdictions.

(2) $34,000 of the
death investigations account appropriation is provided solely for
implementation of House Bill No. 1216 (sudden infant death). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
47. FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION

Horse Racing Commission
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,504,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
48. FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,483,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,484,000

Liquor Control Board
Construction and Maintenance

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 8,114,000

Liquor Revolving Account‑-State
Appropriation... $........................................... 142,148,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 153,229,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,573,000 of the
liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for the agency
information technology upgrade. This amount provided in this subsection is
conditioned upon satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act.

(2) $4,803,000 of the
liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for the costs
associated with the development and implementation of a merchandising business
system. Expenditures of any funds for this system are conditioned upon the
approval of the merchandising business system's feasibility study by the
information services board. The amount provided in this subsection is also
conditioned upon satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
49. FOR THE UTILITIES AND
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Public Service Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 27,108,000

Pipeline Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 3,305,000

Pipeline Safety Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 822,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 31,235,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,011,000 of the
pipeline safety account‑-state appropriation and $822,000 of the pipeline
safety account‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5182 (pipeline safety). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(2) $294,000 of the
pipeline safety account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for an
interagency agreement with the joint legislative audit and review committee for
a report on hazardous liquid and gas pipeline safety programs. The committee
shall review staff use, inspection activity, fee methodology, and costs of the
hazardous liquid and gas pipeline safety programs and report to the appropriate
legislative committees by July 1, 2003. The report shall include a comparison
of interstate and intrastate programs, including but not limited to the number
and complexity of regular and specialized inspections, mapping requirements for
each program, and allocation of administrative costs to each program. If
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5182 (pipeline safety) is not enacted by June 30,
2001, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
50. FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER
FIREFIGHTERS

Volunteer Firefighters'
Relief and Pension

Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 543,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
51. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 9,072,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 8,889,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 22,509,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 234,000

Enhanced 911 Account‑-State
Appropriation...... $ 16,544,000

Disaster Response Account‑-State
Appropriation. $ 582,000

Disaster Response Account‑-Federal
Appropriation $ 3,392,000

Worker and Community Right
to Know Fund‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 283,000

Nisqually Earthquake
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 37,884,000

Nisqually Earthquake
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 157,795,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 257,184,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $582,000 of the
disaster response account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
state share of response and recovery costs associated with federal emergency
management agency (FEMA) disasters approved in the 1999-01 biennium budget.
The military department may, upon approval of the director of financial
management, use portions of the disaster response account‑-state
appropriation to offset costs of new disasters occurring before June 30, 2003.
The military department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing disaster
costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b) incremental changes from
the previous estimate; (c) actual expenditures; (d) estimates of total
remaining costs to be paid; and (d) estimates of future payments by biennium.
This information shall be displayed by individual disaster, by fund, and by
type of assistance. The military department shall also submit a report
quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees
detailing information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available fund
balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end
of the 2001-03 biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.

(2) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely
for implementation of the conditional scholarship program pursuant to chapter
28B.103 RCW.

(3) $60,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $60,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5256 (emergency management
compact). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $35,000 of the
general fund‑‑state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $35,000 of
the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided
solely for the north county emergency medical service.

(5) $1,374,000 of the
Nisqually earthquake account‑-state appropriation and $3,861,000 of the
Nisqually earthquake account‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for the military department's costs associated with coordinating the state's
response to the February 28, 2001, earthquake.

(6) $1,347,000 of the
Nisqually earthquake account‑-state appropriation and $5,359,000 of the
Nisqually earthquake account‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for mitigation costs associated with the earthquake for state and local
agencies. Of the amount from the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state
appropriation, $898,000 is provided for the state matching share for state
agencies and $449,000 is provided for one-half of the local matching share for
local entities. The amount provided for the local matching share constitutes a
revenue distribution for purposes of RCW 43.135.060(1).

(7) $35,163,000 of the
Nisqually earthquake account‑-state appropriation and $148,575,000 of the
Nisqually earthquake account‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for public assistance costs associated with the earthquake for state and local
agencies. Of the amount from the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state
appropriation, $20,801,000 is provided for the state matching share for state
agencies and $14,362,000 is provided for one-half of the local matching share
for local entities. The amount provided for the local matching share
constitutes a revenue distribution for purposes of RCW 43.135.060(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
52. FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT
RELATIONS COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,154,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,164,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,318,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
53. FOR THE GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS
BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,497,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,506,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,003,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
54. FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND
TRADE CENTER

State Convention and Trade
Center Operating

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 37,848,000

State Convention and Trade
Center Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 29,886,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION............. $ 67,734,000

(End
of part)

PART
II

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES. (1)
Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services
shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment
modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this
act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications
permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for
other than that purpose, except as expressly provided in subsection (3) of this
section.

(2) The department of
social and health services shall not initiate any services that will require
expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this
act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW
43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long
as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the
program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department
receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the
office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees.
As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes
block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on
specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3) The appropriations
to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended
for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 222,657,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 235,883,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 354,422,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 400,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 989,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 814,351,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,239,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation, $2,295,000 of the
fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation, and $1,594,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the category
of services titled "intensive family preservation services."

(2) $686,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $703,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided to
contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care facility. The
facility shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through two
years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must
be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or
foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three months of
consultation and support to parents accepting placement of children from the
facility. The facility may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents
for infants served by the facility. The department shall not require case
management as a condition of the contract.

(3) $524,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $537,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided for up to
three nonfacility-based programs for the training, consultation, support, and
recruitment of biological, foster, and adoptive parents of children through age
three in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers,
except that each program may serve up to three medically fragile
nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs,
preference shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing pediatric
interim care program.

(4) $1,955,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation, $3,466,000 of the
fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation, and $4,596,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for reducing the
average caseload level per case-carrying social worker. It is the intent of
the legislature that the department use these funds to achieve an average
caseload ratio of 1:24.

(5) $1,869,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation, $1,869,000 of the
fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation, and $238,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for foster parent
respite care services to improve retention of foster parents and increase
stability of foster placements.

(6) $1,767,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $2,461,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $1,485,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for rate and
capacity increases for child placing agencies. Child placing agencies shall
increase their capacity by 15 percent in fiscal year 2002 and 30 percent in
fiscal year 2003.

(7) The department
shall provide secure crisis residential facilities across the state in a manner
that: (a) Retains geographic provision of these services; and (b) retains beds
in high use areas.

(8) The amounts
provided in this section are sufficient to fully implement the passport program
for all children who have been in foster care longer than 90 days.

(9) $125,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $125,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for a foster parent retention program. This program is directed at
foster parents caring for children who act out sexually, as described in House
Bill No. 1525 (foster parent retention program).

(10) The amounts
provided in this section are sufficient to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5500 (BECCA and HOPE acts).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-JUVENILE REHABILITATION
PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 36,944,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 38,860,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 14,706,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 380,000

Juvenile Accountability
Incentive

Account‑-Federal Appropriation.............. $ 9,361,000

Public Safety and Education

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 6,209,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 22,014,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 128,474,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $686,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance account for costs
to the criminal justice system associated with the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this
subsection are intended to provide funding for county adult court costs
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

(b) $5,980,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code
revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide
funding for county impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 338,
Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.

(c) $1,208,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,209,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $5,190,000 of
the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are provided
solely to implement community juvenile accountability grants pursuant to
chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided in this
subsection may be used solely for community juvenile accountability grants,
administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.

(d) $2,515,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally
committed offenders. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award
these moneys on a competitive basis to counties that submitted a plan for the
provision of services approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for
evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall
assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.

(e) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $100,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for juvenile rehabilitation administration to contract with the
institute for public policy for responsibilities assigned in chapter 338, Laws
of 1997 (juvenile code revisions).

(f) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $100,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for a contract for expanded services of the teamchild project.

(g) $16,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $16,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of chapter 167, Laws of 1999 (firearms on school
property). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide
funding for county impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 167,
Laws of 1999, and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.

(h) $3,441,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $3,441,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators to fund the
costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth
petitions. The department shall not retain any portion of these funds to cover
administrative or any other departmental costs. The department, in conjunction
with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding
distribution formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher
than average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with
lower than average per-petition processing costs.

(i) $6,000,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators to fund the
costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth
petitions. To the extent that distributions made under (h) and (i) of this
subsection and pursuant to section 801 of this act exceed actual costs of
processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions,
the department, in consultation with the respective juvenile court
administrator and the county, may approve expenditure of funds provided in this
subsection on other costs of the civil or criminal justice system. When this
occurs, the department shall notify the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees. The department shall not retain any portion of
these funds to cover administrative or any other departmental costs. The
department, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop
an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula shall neither reward
counties with higher than average per-petition processing costs nor shall it
penalize counties with lower than average per-petition processing costs.

(j) The distributions
made under (h) and (i) of this subsection and distributions from the county
criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act
constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or
increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(k) Each quarter during
the 2001-03 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions
processed and the total actual costs of processing the petitions in each of the
following categories: Truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk
youth. Counties shall submit the reports to the department no later than 45
days after the end of the quarter. The department shall forward this
information to the chair and ranking minority member of the house of
representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means
committee no later than 60 days after a quarter ends. These reports are deemed
informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(l) $1,692,000 of the
juvenile accountability incentive account‑-federal appropriation is
provided solely for the continued implementation of a pilot program to provide
for postrelease planning and treatment of juvenile offenders with co-occurring
disorders.

(m) $22,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely for the evaluation of the juvenile offender co-occurring disorder pilot
program implemented pursuant to (l) of this subsection.

(n) $900,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $900,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the continued implementation of the juvenile violence prevention
grant program established in section 204, chapter 309, Laws of 1999.

(o) $33,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $29,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1070 (juvenile offender basic
training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(p) $21,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $42,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5468 (chemical dependency).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(q) $1,377,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,669,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for contracted beds at local county detention facilities.

(r) The juvenile
rehabilitation administration, in consultation with the juvenile court
administrators, may agree on a formula to allow the transfer of funds among
amounts appropriated for consolidated juvenile services, community juvenile
accountability act grants, the chemically dependent disposition alternative,
and the special sex offender disposition alternative.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 51,314,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 53,219,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 14,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 740,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 7,078,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 112,365,000

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,738,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,765,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 307,000

Juvenile Accountability
Incentive Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,100,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 421,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 5,331,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY
SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 190,043,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 193,900,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 341,491,000

General Fund‑-Local
Appropriation.......... ... $ 5,881,000

Health Services Account
Appropriation.......... $ 2,450,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 733,765,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Regional support
networks shall use portions of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
implementation of working agreements with the vocational rehabilitation program
which will maximize the use of federal funding for vocational programs.

(b) From the general
fund‑-state appropriations in this subsection, the secretary of social
and health services shall assure that regional support networks reimburse the
aging and adult services program for the general fund‑-state cost of
medicaid personal care services that enrolled regional support network
consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(c) $388,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,927,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $2,349,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
development and operation of community residential and support services for
persons who are appropriately discharged from state psychiatric hospitals. In
the event that there are not enough vacant beds at the state hospitals to close
at least two hospital wards by July 2002, and two additional wards by April
2003, a proportional share of these funds shall be transferred to the
appropriations in subsection (2) of this section to support continued care of
the patients in the state hospitals. Primary responsibility and accountability
for provision of appropriate community support for persons who would otherwise
require long-term state hospital care shall reside with the mental health
program and the regional support networks, with partnership and active support
from the alcohol and substance abuse and from the aging and adult services
programs.

(d) At least $1,000,000
of the federal block grant funding appropriated in this subsection shall be
used for (i) initial development, training, and operation of the community
support teams which will work with long-term state hospital residents prior and
subsequent to their return to the community; and (ii) development of support
strategies which will reduce the unnecessary and excessive use of state and
local hospitals for short-term crisis stabilization services. Such strategies
may include training and technical assistance to community long-term care and
substance abuse providers; the development of diversion beds and stabilization
support teams; examination of state hospital policies regarding admissions; and
the development of new contractual standards to assure that the statutory
requirement that 85 percent of short-term detentions be managed locally is
being fulfilled. The department shall report to the fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature on the results of these efforts by November 1,
2001, and again by November 1, 2002.

(e) The department is
authorized to implement a new formula for allocating available resources among
the regional support networks. The distribution formula shall use the number
of persons eligible for the state medical programs funded under chapter 74.09
RCW as the primary measure of the population factors which are to be considered
in accordance with RCW 71.24.035(13)(a). The new formula shall be phased in
over a period of no less than six years. Furthermore, the department shall
increase the medicaid capitation rates which a regional support network would
otherwise receive under the formula by an amount sufficient to assure that
total funding allocated to the regional support network in fiscal year 2002 and
fiscal year 2003 is not less than the total funding that would have been
received in those years under the methodology known as the historical
distribution, and provided that the nonfederal share of the higher medicaid
payment rate is provided by the regional support network from local funds.

(f) $125,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $125,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and
$250,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for a study of the prevalence of mental illness among the state's regional
support networks. The study shall examine how reasonable estimates of the
prevalence of mental illness relate to the incidence of medicaid eligible
persons in each regional support network. In conducting its review, the
division of mental health shall consult with the joint legislative audit and
review committee, the regional support networks, community mental health
providers, and mental health consumer representatives. The department shall
provide sufficient resources, through an interagency agreement, for the joint legislative
audit and review committee to review all aspects of the study, including but
not limited to the request for proposals; the selection of contractor(s); the
study design and workplan; the implementation of the study; and the draft and
final reports. The division shall contract for consulting services in
conducting this study. The division shall submit a final report to the fiscal,
health care, and human services committees of the legislature by November 1,
2003.

(g) Within funds
appropriated in this subsection, the department shall contract with the Clark
county regional support network for development and operation of a project
demonstrating collaborative methods for providing intensive mental health
services in the school setting for severely emotionally disturbed children who
are medicaid eligible. Project services are to be delivered by teachers and
teaching assistants who qualify as, or who are under the supervision of, mental
health professionals meeting the requirements of chapter 275-57 WAC. The
department shall increase medicaid payments to the regional support network by
the amount necessary to cover the necessary and allowable costs of the
demonstration, not to exceed the upper payment limit specified for the regional
support network in the department's medicaid waiver agreement with the federal
government after meeting all other medicaid spending requirements assumed in
this subsection. The regional support network shall provide the department
with (i) periodic reports on project service levels, methods, and outcomes; and
(ii) an intergovernmental transfer equal to the state share of the increased
medicaid payment provided for operation of this project.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 83,964,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 81,378,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 138,694,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 29,289,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 333,325,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state mental
hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and
supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is
cost-effective to do so.

(b) The mental health
program at Western state hospital shall continue to use labor provided by the
Tacoma prerelease program of the department of corrections.

(c) The department
shall seek to reduce the census of the two state psychiatric hospitals by 120
beds by April 2003 by arranging and providing community residential, mental
health, and other support services for long-term state hospital patients who
were appropriately discharged from the state hospitals and whose treatment
needs would be better served by a community placement.

(d) For each month
subsequent to the month in which a state hospital bed has been closed in
accordance with (c) of this subsection, the mental health program shall
transfer to the medical assistance program state funds equal to the state share
of the monthly per capita expenditure amount estimated for categorically
needy-disabled persons in the most recent forecast of medical assistance
expenditures.

(3) CIVIL COMMITMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 19,231,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 20,853,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 40,084,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $1,049,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,592,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for operational costs associated with a less restrictive step-down
placement facility on McNeil Island.

(b) By October 1, 2001,
the department shall report to the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate detailing
information on plans for increasing the efficiency of staffing patterns at the
new civil commitment center facility being constructed on McNeil Island.

(c) A maximum amount of
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided for mitigation funding for jurisdictions affected by the
placement of less restrictive alternative facilities for persons conditionally
released from the special commitment center at McNeil Island. The department
of social and health services shall enter into negotiations with affected
counties and determine a methodology of distributing the mitigation funds. If
no agreement is reached by September 1, 2001, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 444,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 443,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,082,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,969,000

(5) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,798,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,838,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 5,097,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 10,733,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and $126,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to evaluate the impacts of chapter
214, Laws of 1999 (mentally ill offenders) and chapter 297, Laws of 1998
(commitment of mentally ill persons).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
205. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 225,429,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 238,513,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 389,856,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 741,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 854,539,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The health services
account appropriation and $753,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits for home care
workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level who
are employed through state contracts for twenty hours per week or more.
Premium payments for individual provider home care workers shall be made only
to the subsidized basic health plan. Home care agencies may obtain coverage
either through the basic health plan or through an alternative plan with
substantially equivalent benefits.

(b) $266,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,788,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $1,958,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for community
services for residents of residential habilitation centers (RHCs) who are able
to be adequately cared for in community settings and who choose to live in those
community settings. The department shall ensure that the average cost per day
for all program services other than start-up costs shall not exceed $280. If
the number and timing of residents choosing to move into community settings is
not sufficient to achieve the RHC cottage consolidation plan assumed in the
appropriations in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall transfer
sufficient appropriations from this subsection to subsection (2) of this
section to cover the added costs incurred in the RHCs. The department shall
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days
following each fiscal year quarter, the number of residents moving into
community settings and the actual expenditures for all community services to support
those residents.

(c) $1,440,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $3,041,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $4,311,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for expanded
community services for persons with developmental disabilities who also have
community protection issues or are diverted or discharged from state
psychiatric hospitals. The department shall ensure that the average cost per
day for all program services other than start-up costs shall not exceed $275.
The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served
with these additional community services, where they were residing, what kinds
of services they were receiving prior to placement, and the actual expenditures
for all community services to support these clients.

(d) $1,005,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $2,262,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $2,588,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
increasing case/resource management resources to improve oversight and quality
of care for persons enrolled in the medicaid home and community services waiver
for persons with developmental disabilities. The department shall not increase
enrollment in the waiver except for increases assumed in additional funding
provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 71,826,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 69,924,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 147,064,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 10,230,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 299,044,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
Pursuant to RCW 71A.12.160, if residential habilitation center capacity is not
being used for permanent residents, the department may make residential
habilitation center vacancies available for respite care and any other services
needed to care for clients who are not currently being served in a residential
habilitation center and whose needs require staffing levels similar to current
residential habilitation center residents. Providing respite care shall not
impede the department's ability to consolidate cottages as assumed in the
appropriations in this subsection.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,728,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,735,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,033,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 7,496,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,995,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
206. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-AGING AND ADULT SERVICES
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 510,530,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 527,746,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,061,811,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 4,324,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 4,523,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,108,934,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The entire health
services account appropriation, $1,210,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,423,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $6,794,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits for home care
workers who are employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours per
week. Premium payments for individual provider home care workers shall be made
only to the subsidized basic health plan, and only for persons with incomes
below 200 percent of the federal poverty level. Home care agencies may obtain
coverage either through the basic health plan or through an alternative plan
with substantially equivalent benefits.

(2) $1,706,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,706,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, plus the
associated vendor rate increase for each year, are provided solely for
operation of the volunteer chore services program.

(3) For purposes of
implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment
rate for fiscal year 2002 shall be no more than $117.38 for the noncapital
portion of the rate. For fiscal year 2003, the weighted average nursing
facility payment rate shall be no more than $119.67 for the noncapital portion of
the rate.

(4) In accordance with
House Bill No. 2242 (nursing home rates) the department may issue certificates
of capital authorization totaling $28,200,000 in fiscal year 2002 and
$28,200,000 in fiscal year 2003. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001,
this subsection is null and void.

(5) The department
shall apply any savings generated by the provisions of section 10 of House Bill
No. 2242 (nursing home rates) towards increasing the case mix direct care rate
paid to nursing facilities under chapter 74.46 RCW. Savings shall be
calculated on a quarterly basis and shall be applied in such a way as to
increase equally, on a percentage basis, the direct care rate paid all
facilities who are paid under case mix reimbursement. In calculating any savings
and applying median rate adjustments, the department shall perform separate
calculations for metropolitan statistical areas from nonmetropolitan
statistical areas. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, this
subsection is null and void.

(6) In accordance with
chapter 74.46 RCW, noncapital rate components shall be adjusted for economic
trends and conditions by 2.2 percent on July 1, 2001, and by 2.5 percent on
July 1, 2002, except that only facilities whose direct care rates are paid
under case mix are provided an increase in their direct care rates. Any moneys
remaining pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall be applied in such a
way as to increase equally, on a percentage basis, the direct care rate paid
all facilities who are paid under case mix reimbursement.

(7) Adult day health
services shall not be considered a duplication of services for persons
receiving care in long-term care settings licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36,
or 70.128 RCW.

(8) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for payments to any nursing facility licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW
that meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The nursing home
entered into an arm's length agreement for a facility lease prior to January 1,
1980;

(b) The lessee
purchased the leased nursing home after January 1, 1980; and

(c) The lessor
defaulted on its loan or mortgage for the assets of the home after January 1,
1991, and prior to January 1, 1992. Payments provided pursuant to this
subsection shall not be subject to the settlement, audit, or rate-setting
requirements contained in chapter 74.46 RCW.

(9) In accordance with
Substitute House Bill No. 1341 (community options), the department may
implement two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not qualify for such
services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval and the following
conditions and limitations:

(a) One waiver program
shall include coverage of home-based services, and the second shall include
coverage of care in community residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver
covering home-based services shall not exceed 150 persons by the end of fiscal
year 2002, nor 200 persons by the end of fiscal year 2003. Enrollment in the
waiver covering community residential services shall not exceed 500 persons by
the end of fiscal year 2002, nor 900 persons by the end of fiscal year 2003.

(b) For each month of
waiver service delivered to a person who was not covered by medicaid prior to
his or her enrollment in the waiver, the aging and adult services program shall
transfer to the medical assistance program state and federal funds equal to the
monthly per capita expenditure amount, net of drug rebates, estimated for
medically needy-aged persons in the most recent forecast of medical assistance
expenditures.

(c) The department
shall identify the number of medically needy nursing home residents, and
enrollment and expenditures on each of the two medically needy waivers, on
monthly management reports.

(d) If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2001, this subsection is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
207. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 436,397,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 425,508,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,372,707,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 31,788,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,266,400,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $273,430,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $269,888,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
$1,226,906,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, and
$29,358,000 of the general fund‑-local appropriation are provided solely
for the WorkFirst program and child support operations. WorkFirst expenditures
include TANF grants, diversion services, subsidized child care, employment and
training, other WorkFirst related services, allocated field services operating
costs, and allocated economic services program administrative costs. Within
the amounts provided in this subsection, the department shall:

(a) Continue to
implement WorkFirst program improvements that are designed to achieve progress
against outcome measures specified in RCW 74.08A.410. Valid outcome measures
of job retention and wage progression shall be developed and reported quarterly
to appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature for families who
leave assistance, measured after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months. An
increased attention to job retention and wage progression is necessary to
emphasize the legislature's goal that the WorkFirst program succeed in helping
recipients gain long-term economic independence and not cycle on and off public
assistance. The wage progression measure shall report the median percentage
increase in quarterly earnings and hourly wage after 12 months, 24 months, and
36 months. The wage progression report shall also report the percent with
earnings above one hundred percent and two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level. The report shall compare former WorkFirst participants with
similar workers who did not participate in WorkFirst. The department shall
also report the percentage of families who have returned to temporary
assistance for needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months.

(b) Develop
informational materials that educate families about the difference between cash
assistance and work support benefits. These materials must explain, among
other facts, that the benefits are designed to support their employment, that
there are no time limits on the receipt of work support benefits, and that
immigration or residency status will not be affected by the receipt of benefits.
These materials shall be posted in all community service offices and
distributed to families. Materials must be available in multiple languages.
When a family leaves the temporary assistance for needy families program,
receives cash diversion assistance, or withdraws a temporary assistance for
needy families application, the department of social and health services shall
educate them about the difference between cash assistance and work support
benefits and offer them the opportunity to begin or to continue receiving work
support benefits, so long as they are eligible. The department shall provide
this information through in-person interviews, over the telephone, and/or
through the mail. Work support benefits include food stamps, medicaid for all
family members, medicaid or state children's health insurance program for
children, and child care assistance. The department shall report annually to
the legislature the number of families who have had exit interviews, been
reached successfully by phone, and been sent mail. The report shall also
include the percentage of families who elect to continue each of the benefits
and the percentage found ineligible by each substantive reason code. A
substantive reason code shall not be "other." The report shall
identify barriers to informing families about work support benefits and
describe existing and future actions to overcome such barriers.

(c) From the amounts
provided in this subsection, provide $50,000 from the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000 from the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 to the Washington institute for public
policy for continuation of the WorkFirst evaluation database.

(d) Submit a report by
December 1, 2001, to the office of financial management and the fiscal
committees of the legislature containing a spending plan for the WorkFirst
program. The plan shall identify how spending levels in the 2001-2003 biennium
will be adjusted by June 30, 2003, to be sustainable within available federal
grant levels and the carryforward level of state funds.

(2) $48,341,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $48,341,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for cash assistance and other services to recipients in the general
assistance‑-unemployable program. Within these amounts, the department
may expend funds for services that assist recipients to reduce their dependence
on public assistance, provided that expenditures for these services and cash
assistance do not exceed the funds provided.

(3) $5,632,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $5,632,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the food assistance program for legal immigrants. The level of
benefits shall be equivalent to the benefits provided by the federal food stamp
program.

(4) $48,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
to implement House Bill No. 1716 (veterans/Philippines). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE
ABUSE PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 36,546,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 37,216,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 91,869,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 723,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,062,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 52,549,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 232,965,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,616,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for treatment of methamphetamine users.

(2) $1,083,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for adult and juvenile drug courts that have a net loss of federal grant
funding in state fiscal year 2002 and state fiscal year 2003. This appropriation
is intended to cover approximately one-half of lost federal funding. It is the
intent of the legislature to provide state assistance to counties to cover a
part of lost federal funding for drug courts for a maximum of three years.

(3) $2,490,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation and $1,080,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for drug
and alcohol treatment for SSI clients. The department shall continue research
and post-program evaluation of these clients to further determine the
post-treatment utilization of medical services and the service effectiveness of
consolidation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,048,662,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,123,587,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,179,171,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 209,737,000

Emergency Medical Services
and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account‑-State
Appropriation......... $ 9,200,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 640,750,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION.... ............ $ 6,211,107,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department
shall increase its efforts to restrain the growth of health care costs funded
in the 2001-03 biennium. The appropriations in this section assume that a
combination of cost containment and utilization strategies will be applied by
the department and that projected general fund‑-state costs will be
reduced by approximately 3 percent in the 2001-03 biennium. The department
shall monitor progress on achieving these savings, and if it is determined that
satisfactory progress is not being made on achieving the savings assumptions,
the department shall impose ratable reductions sufficient to meet these
assumptions. Progress reports shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of
the legislature by July 1, 2002, and January 1, 2003.

(2) The department
shall continue to extend medicaid eligibility to children through age 18
residing in households with incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty
level.

(3) In determining
financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the department is authorized
to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other
assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(4) $502,000 of the
health services account appropriation, $400,000 of the general fund‑-private/local
appropriation, and $1,676,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation
are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1058
(breast and cervical cancer treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2001, or if private funding is not contributed equivalent to the general fund‑-private/local
appropriation, the funds appropriated in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) Sufficient funds
are appropriated in this section for the department to continue full-scope
vision coverage for medicaid-eligible adults.

(6) Funding is provided
in this section for a limited adult dental program for Title XIX categorically
eligible and medically needy persons.

(7) $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $31,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $62,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6020 (dental sealants). If
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6020 is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $660,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $90,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5430 (children's hair
prosthetics). The department shall establish eligibility standards, including
a sliding fee schedule and provisions for a waiting list for individuals
eligible for cranial hair prostheses under the provisions of Senate Bill No.
5430. The department shall operate the cranial hair prosthesis program within
the amount appropriated in this subsection. If Senate Bill No. 5430 is not
enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) In accordance with
RCW 74.46.625, $53,613,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2002, $40,399,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2003, and $95,588,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes
operated by rural public hospital districts. The payments shall be conditioned
upon (a) a contractual commitment by the association of public hospital
districts and participating rural public hospital districts to make an
intergovernmental transfer to the state treasurer, for deposit into the health
services account, equal to at least 90 percent of the fiscal year 2002
supplemental payments and at least 87 percent of the fiscal year 2003
supplemental payments; and (b) a contractual commitment by the participating
districts to not allow expenditures covered by the supplemental payments to be
used for medicaid nursing home rate-setting. The participating districts shall
retain no more than a total of $20,000,000 for the 2001-03 biennium.

(10) $62,970,000 of the
health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $48,829,000 of the
health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $113,721,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
additional disproportionate share and medicare upper payment limit payments to
public hospital districts. The payments shall be conditioned upon a
contractual commitment by the participating public hospital districts to make
an intergovernmental transfer to the health services account equal to 94
percent of the additional payments; however, the participating districts shall
retain the greater of $14,000,000 or 6 percent of the additional
disproportionate share payment. At least 28 percent of the amounts retained by
the participating hospital districts shall be allocated to the state's teaching
hospitals.

(11) $435,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $932,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $826,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill No. 1162 (small rural hospitals). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 11,515,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 10,007,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 85,302,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 360,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 107,184,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The division of
vocational rehabilitation shall negotiate cooperative interagency agreements
with state and local organizations to improve and expand employment
opportunities for people with severe disabilities.

(2) Within amounts
appropriated in this section, the department shall provide vocational
rehabilitation services for individuals enrolled for services with the
developmental disabilities program who complete their high school curriculum in
2001 or 2002, and are classified as most significantly disabled.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 30,444,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 29,364,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 50,563,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 810,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 111,181,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: By
November 1, 2001, the department shall report to the fiscal committees of the
legislature the least costly plan for assuring that billing and accounting
technologies in the state psychiatric hospitals adequately and efficiently
comply with standards set by third-party payers. The plan shall be developed
with participation by and oversight from the office of financial management,
the department's information systems services division, and the department of
information services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-PAYMENTS TO OTHER
AGENCIES PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 43,053,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 43,053,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 26,665,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 112,771,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
213. FOR THE STATE HEALTH
CARE AUTHORITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,524,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 19,876,000

State Health Care Authority
Administrative

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 19,841,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 411,758,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,611,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 461,610,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,423,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $6,422,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for health care services provided through local community clinics.

(2) Within funds
appropriated in this section and sections 205 and 206 of this 2001 act, the
health care authority shall continue to provide an enhanced basic health plan
subsidy option for foster parents licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers
in state-funded home care programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster
parents and home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the
federal poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at a
cost of ten dollars per covered worker per month.

(3) The health care
authority shall require organizations and individuals that are paid to deliver
basic health plan services and that choose to sponsor enrollment in the
subsidized basic health plan to pay the following: (i) A minimum of fifteen
dollars per enrollee per month for persons below 100 percent of the federal
poverty level; and (ii) a minimum of twenty dollars per enrollee per month for
persons whose family income is 100 percent to 125 percent of the federal
poverty level.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
214. FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,688,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,700,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,544,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 100,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 7,032,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
215. FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL
INSURANCE APPEALS

Worker and Community
Right-to-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 20,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 14,700,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... 14,703,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 29,423,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
216. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE
TRAINING COMMISSION

Municipal Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-

Local Appropriation........................ $ 460,000

Death Investigations
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 148,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 18,028,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 18,636,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $124,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to allow
the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to increase the
technical and training support provided to local criminal justice agencies on
the new incident-based reporting system and the national incident-based
reporting system.

(2) $136,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to allow
the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys to enhance the training
provided to criminal justice personnel.

(3) $23,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to
increase payment rates for the criminal justice training commission's
contracted food service provider.

(4) $34,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to
increase payment rates for the criminal justice training commission's contract
with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

(5) $233,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
training and equipping local law enforcement officers to respond to
methamphetamine crime.

(6) $374,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill No. 1062 (certification of peace officers). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(7) $100,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for grants
to be distributed by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
for electronic mapping of school facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 7,738,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 7,682,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,250,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 19,862,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,950,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,200,000

Asbestos Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 688,000

Electrical License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 28,412,000

Farm Labor Revolving
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 28,000

Worker and Community
Right-to-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,281,000

Public Works Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,856,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 179,932,000

Accident Account‑-Federal
Appropriation........ $ 11,568,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... 187,461,000

Medical Aid Account‑-Federal
Appropriation..... $ 2,438,000

Plumbing Certificate
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,015,000

Pressure Systems Safety
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,274,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 466,635,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Pursuant to RCW
7.68.015, the department shall operate the crime victims compensation program
within the public safety and education account funds appropriated in this
section. In the event that cost containment measures are necessary, the
department may (a) institute copayments for services; (b) develop preferred
provider contracts; or (c) other cost containment measures. Cost containment
measures shall not include holding invoices received in one fiscal period for
payment from appropriations in subsequent fiscal periods. No more than
$4,835,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation shall be
expended for department administration of the crime victims compensation
program.

(2) $1,438,000 of the
accident account‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,438,000
of the medical aid account‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 are
provided solely for the one-time cost of implementing a recent state supreme
court ruling regarding calculation of workers' compensation benefits. The
department shall develop and recommend to appropriate committees of the
legislature statutory language that provides greater certainty in the
calculation of benefits. The recommended statutory language shall be submitted
by October 1, 2001.

(3) $53,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5270 (modifying requirements
for certain victims of sexually violent predators to be eligible for victims'
compensation).

(4) It is the intent of
the legislature that elevator inspection fees shall fully cover the cost of the
elevator inspection program. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2001-03
fiscal biennium the department may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth
factor, if the increases are necessary to fully fund the cost of the elevator
inspection program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
218. FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE
REVIEW BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 999,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 999,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,998,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS
AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,529,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,533,000

Charitable, Educational,
Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,069,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,620,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,648,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 155,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,663,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 7,086,000

(3) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,832,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 4,600,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 28,739,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 25,614,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 65,785,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $3,664,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation and $7,377,000 of the general fund‑-private/local
appropriation are provided solely for the department to acquire, establish, and
operate a nursing facility dedicated to serving men and women from eastern
Washington who have served in the nation's armed forces.

(b)(i) $400,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided
solely as a one-time appropriation for start-up costs for an eastern Washington
veterans' home.

(ii) The department
shall reimburse the general fund‑-state in fiscal year 2003 for the
$400,000 start-up costs provided in (b)(i) of this subsection.

(c) If the financing
contract for acquisition of an eastern Washington nursing home is not
authorized in the capital budget for the 2001-03 fiscal biennium by June 30,
2001, the amounts provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 64,281,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 65,314,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 276,840,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 81,526,000

Hospital Commission Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,718,000

Health Professions Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 38,456,000

Emergency Medical Services
and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account‑-State
Appropriation......... $ 14,858,000

Safe Drinking Water Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,701,000

Drinking Water Assistance
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 13,400,000

Waterworks Operator
Certification‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 622,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 13,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 3,328,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 257,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $ 45,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,817,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 23,217,000

Medical Test Site Licensure
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,369,000

Youth Tobacco Prevention
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,797,000

Tobacco Prevention and
Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 29,992,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 622,551,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department or
any successor agency is authorized to raise existing fees charged to the
drinking water operator certification, newborn screening, radioactive
materials, x-ray compliance, drinking water plan review, midwifery, hearing and
speech, veterinarians, psychologists, pharmacists, hospitals, podiatrists, and
home health and home care programs, in excess of the fiscal growth factor
established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary, to meet the actual
costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section.

(2) $1,657,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $1,658,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely
for the implementation of the Puget Sound water work plan and agency action
items, DOH-01, DOH-02, DOH-03, and DOH-04.

(3) The department of
health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state
general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The
department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does
not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted
federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act
or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal
amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any
moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects
or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(4) $10,610,000 of the
health services account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
purchase and distribution of the pneumococcal conjugate vaccine as part of the
state's program of universal access to essential childhood vaccines.

(5) $85,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $65,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely
for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1365 (infant and child
products). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $58,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1590
(breastfeeding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 31,533,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 31,742,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,576,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement

Account Appropriation...................... $ 12,500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 77,351,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$12,500,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the department's
offender-based tracking system. This amount is conditioned on the department
satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act. The department shall
prepare an assessment of the fiscal impact of any changes to the replacement
project. The assessment shall:

(a) Include a
description of any changes to the replacement project;

(b) Provide the
estimated costs for each component in the 2001-03 and subsequent biennia;

(c) Include a schedule
that provides the time estimated to complete changes to each component of the
replacement project; and

(d) Be provided to the
staff of the fiscal committees of the senate and the house of representatives
no later than November 1, 2002.

(2) CORRECTIONAL
OPERATIONS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 398,270,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 408,085,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 12,096,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 1,614,000

Public Health Services
Account Appropriation... $ 1,453,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 821,518,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department may
expend funds generated by contractual agreements entered into for mitigation of
severe overcrowding in local jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual
costs shall be deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not
exceed revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as recovery of
costs.

(b) The department
shall provide funding for the pet partnership program at the Washington
corrections center for women at a level at least equal to that provided in the
1995-97 biennium.

(c) The department of
corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the least possible impact
on correctional custody staff, community custody staff, and correctional
industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff
means employees responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.

(d) $594,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,284,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to increase payment rates for contracted education providers, contracted
chemical dependency providers, and contracted work release facilities.

(e) During the 2001-03
biennium, when contracts are established or renewed for offender pay phone and
other telephone services provided to inmates, the department shall select the
contractor or contractors primarily based on the following factors: (i) The
lowest rate charged to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone
call; and (ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department to provide
the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient revenues for the
activities funded from the institutional welfare betterment account as of
January 1, 2000.

(f) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $100,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the
amounts provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(g) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the correctional industries board of directors to hire one staff
person, responsible directly to the board, to assist the board in fulfilling
its duties.

(3) COMMUNITY
SUPERVISION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 61,428,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 62,936,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,125,000

Public Safety and Education

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 15,841,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 141,330,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of
corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the least possible
impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff, and correctional
industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff
means employees responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.

(b) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the department of corrections to contract with the institute for
public policy for responsibilities assigned in chapter 196, Laws of 1999
(offender accountability act) and sections 7 through 12 of chapter 197, Laws of
1999 (drug offender sentencing).

(c) $17,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $36,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to increase payment rates for contracted chemical dependency providers.

(d) $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5118 (interstate
compact for adult offender supervision). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) INTERAGENCY
PAYMENTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 18,568,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 18,569,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 37,137,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES
FOR THE BLIND

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,476,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,475,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,140,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 80,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 14,171,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
223. FOR THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 936,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 857,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,793,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

$78,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely for the
sentencing guidelines commission to conduct a comprehensive review and
evaluation of state sentencing policy. The review and evaluation shall include
an analysis of whether current sentencing ranges and standards, as well as
existing mandatory minimum sentences, existing sentence enhancements, and
special sentencing alternatives, are consistent with the purposes of the
sentencing reform act as set out in RCW 9.94A.010, including the intent of the
legislature to emphasize confinement for the violent offender and alternatives
to confinement for the nonviolent offender. The review and evaluation shall
also examine whether current sentencing ranges and standards are consistent
with existing corrections capacity.

The review and
evaluation shall consider studies on the cost-effectiveness of sentencing
alternatives, as well as the fiscal impact of sentencing policies on state and
local government. In conducting the review and evaluation, the commission
shall consult with the superior court judges' association, the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington defenders' association,
the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, organizations representing crime
victims, and other organizations and individuals with expertise and interest in
sentencing policy.

Not later than December
1, 2001, the commission shall present to the appropriate standing committees of
the legislature the report of its comprehensive review and evaluation, together
with any recommendations for revisions and modifications to state sentencing
policy, including sentencing ranges and standards, mandatory minimum sentences,
and sentence enhancements. If implementation of the recommendations of the
commission would result in exceeding the capacity of correctional facilities,
the commission shall at the same time present to the legislature a list of
revised standard sentence ranges which are consistent with currently authorized
rated and operational corrections capacity, and consistent with the purposes of
the sentencing reform act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
224. FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY
DEPARTMENT

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 180,628,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 30,119,000

Unemployment Compensation
Administration Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ 181,677,000

Administrative Contingency
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 13,914,000

Employment Service
Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 20,001,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 426,339,000

(End
of part)

PART
III

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER
GORGE COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 398,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 391,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation........... $ 749,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 1,538,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $40,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $40,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to implement the scenic area management plan for Klickitat
county. If Klickitat county adopts an ordinance to implement the scenic area
management plan in accordance with the national scenic area act, P.L. 99-663,
then these amounts shall be provided as a grant to Klickitat county to
implement its responsibilities under the act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 47,530,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 47,329,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 56,805,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 4,351,000

Special Grass Seed Burning
Research Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 14,000

Reclamation Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,810,000

Flood Control Assistance
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 4,098,000

State Emergency Water
Projects Revolving Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 878,000

Waste
Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 13,537,000

State Drought Preparedness
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,325,000

State and Local
Improvements Revolving Account

(Water Supply Facilities)‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 587,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 7,584,000

Wood Stove Education and
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 353,000

Worker and Community
Right-to-Know Account‑-

State Appropriation...... ................. $ 3,288,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 68,002,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 350,000

Local Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,751,000

Water Quality Permit
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 23,826,000

Underground Storage Tank
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,682,000

Environmental Excellence
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 504,000

Biosolids Permit Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 589,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,308,000

Air Pollution Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,066,000

Oil Spill Prevention
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,641,000

Air Operating Permit Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,609,000

Freshwater Aquatic Weeds
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,898,000

Oil Spill Response Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,078,000

Metals Mining Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 5,000

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 467,000

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ 2,316,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 322,581,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,874,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $3,874,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, $394,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation, and $3,686,000 of the water quality permit
account--state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan.

(2) $170,000 of the oil
spill prevention account appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
the Puget Sound work plan through a contract with the University of
Washington's sea grant program to develop an educational program targeted to
small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and
marinas.

(3) Up to $11,365,000
of the state toxics control account appropriation is provided for the
remediation of contaminated sites. Of this amount, up to $2,000,000 may be
used to pay existing site remediation liabilities owed to the federal environmental
protection agency for clean-up work that has been completed. The department
shall monitor actual revenue collections into the state toxics control account,
and is authorized to limit actual expenditures of the appropriation provided in
this section consistent with available revenue.

(4) $500,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely for an assessment
of the financial assurance requirements of hazardous waste management
facilities. By September 30, 2002, the department shall provide to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature a report that: (a)
Evaluates current statutes and regulations governing hazardous waste management
facilities; (b) analyzes and makes recommendations for improving financial assurance
regulatory control; and (c) makes recommendations for funding financial
assurance regulatory control of hazardous waste management facilities.

(5) $1,000,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely for planning,
designing, and implementing storm water management strategies to implement
phase II storm water requirements in western Washington by March 2003. The
department shall complete the eastern Washington storm water manual, provide
technical assistance to local governments on storm water management, and
increase implementation of the department's existing storm water program.

(6) $1,200,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely for the
department, in conjunction with affected local governments, to address emergent
areawide soil contamination problems in western Washington. The department's
efforts shall include public involvement processes and completing assessments
of the geographical extent of toxic contamination including highly contaminated
areas.

(7) $3,000,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $3,000,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to
implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1832 (water resources
management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) $3,114,000 of the
water quality account appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1832 (water resources management). Of this amount:
(a) $2,100,000 is provided for grants to local governments for targeted
watershed assessments consistent with Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1832;
and (b) the remainder of the funding is provided solely for development of a
state environmental policy act template to streamline environmental review,
creation of a blue ribbon panel to develop long-term watershed planning
implementation funding options, and technical assistance. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $524,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $525,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 and $564,000 of the state
drought preparedness account‑‑state appropriation are provided
solely for enhanced streamflow monitoring in critical salmon recovery basins.
$640,000 of this amount is provided solely to implement the Puget Sound work
plan.

(10) $4,500,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $4,500,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
grants to local governments to conduct watershed planning.

(11) $325,000 of the
state drought preparedness account--state appropriation is provided solely for
an environmental impact statement of the Pine Hollow reservoir project to be
conducted in conjunction with the local irrigation district.

(12) $50,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided
solely to a conservation district in the Moses Lake region for a culvert
removal project on Rocky Ford Creek for the purpose of reducing flooding and
improving water quality.

(13) $150,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $150,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to the conservation commission for the Washington grazing lands
conservation initiative's establishment of the Washington watershed, science
and technology program to provide technical assistance to private landowners in
conducting water quality monitoring, riparian vegetation management, and
noxious weed control.

(14) $75,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided
solely to a conservation district in the Palouse region for a pilot project to
evaluate the ability of existing voluntary and regulatory programs to improve
water quality in water quality limited segments listed pursuant to section
303(d) of the federal clean water act.

(15) $350,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $350,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and
$300,000 of the water quality account‑-state appropriation are provided
solely to the department for a groundwater study in the Yakima basin. In
providing funding for this study, the legislature is not acquiescing to any
determination or hypothesis of any party regarding the hydraulic continuity of
the ground waters in the Yakima river basin with the surface water flows of the
Yakima river or its tributaries, and the legislature is not acquiescing in any
determination or hypothesis of any party regarding state or federal
jurisdiction over the ground water resources in the Yakima basin.

(16) $300,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $300,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for setting instream flows in six basins currently not planning
under the watershed planning act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 30,625,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 31,105,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,690,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 60,000

Winter Recreation Program
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 787,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 274,000

Snowmobile Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $ 4,682,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 337,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 48,000

Water Trail Program Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 24,000

Parks Renewal and
Stewardship Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 36,320,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 106,952,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $189,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan.

(2) Fees approved by
the state parks and recreation commission in 2001 are authorized to exceed the
fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.

(3) $79,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $79,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, $8,000 of the snowmobile
account‑-state appropriation and $8,000 of the winter recreation program
account--state appropriation are provided solely for a grant for the operation
of the Northwest avalanche center.

(4) $432,000 of the
parks renewal and stewardship account appropriation is provided solely for the
operation of the Silver Lake visitor center. If a long-term management
agreement is not reached with the U.S. forest service by September 30, 2001,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
304. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 518,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 520,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation.................. $.................................. 8,358,000

Firearms Range Account‑-State
Appropriation......... $ 13,000

Recreation Resources
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 2,584,000

Recreation Resources
Account‑-Federal Appropriation. $ 481,000

NOVA Program Account‑-State
Appropriation........... $ 611,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 13,085,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $375,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $375,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to
implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5637 (watershed health). Funds shall be
used for the development of a comprehensive salmon recovery and watershed
health monitoring strategy and action plan. The strategy and action plan shall
address the monitoring recommendations of the independent science panel in its
report, Recommendations for Monitoring Salmonid Recovery in Washington State
(December 2000), and of the joint legislative audit and review committee in its
report Investing in the Environment: Environmental Quality Grant and Loan
Programs Performance Audit (January 2001).

(2) $8,000,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
the forest and fish agreement rules. These funds will be passed through to the
department of natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
305. FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL
HEARINGS OFFICE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 846,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 847,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 1,693,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
306. FOR THE CONSERVATION
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 3,676,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 3,667,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 692,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 8,035,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $247,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $247,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan.

(2) $500,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely for
the agriculture, fish, and water (AFW) negotiations to develop best management
practices that will protect and recover salmon.

(3) $800,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $801,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
the completion of limiting factors analysis for watersheds affected by listings
of salmon and bull trout under the federal endangered species act.

(4) The conservation
reserve enhancement program (CREP) contract with the federal farm service
agency shall be amended to allow funding of flexible technical riparian buffer
standards, one of which is modeled after the Skagit county agricultural
riparian program (MARP) buffer. This buffer standard shall be available for
farmers statewide to utilize in the CREP. The CREP funding shall also be
available for farmers who are complying with ordinances adopted through municipal
regulations in compliance with the state growth management act requirement to
protect critical areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
307. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 52,329,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 52,792,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 37,966,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 24,365,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 475,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,094,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 586,000

Recreational Fisheries
Enhancement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 3,032,000

Warm Water Game Fish
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,567,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant
Enhancement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 750,000

Wildlife Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 47,243,000

Wildlife Account‑-Federal
Appropriation........ $ 38,182,000

Wildlife Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 15,133,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,941,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,591,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 350,000

Environmental Excellence
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 15,000

Regional Fisheries Salmonid
Recovery Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ 1,750,000

Oil Spill Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 963,000

Oyster Reserve Land Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 135,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 296,259,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,682,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,682,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan.

(2) $2,000,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided for cooperative
volunteer projects.

(3) $200,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $200,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
the department to update the salmon and steelhead stock inventory.

(4) $550,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $550,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
salmonid smolt production monitoring.

(5) $1,875,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$1,875,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely to fund grants to lead entities established under
chapter 77.85 RCW. The department, in consultation with the lead entity
advisory group and individual lead entities, shall establish an application
process and evaluation criteria to allocate funds to up to 26 lead entities to
provide core activities identified in chapter 77.85 RCW. Grants to individual lead
entities may range from $37,500 to $150,000 per year.

(6) $600,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $600,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to fund four cooperative compliance programs, two in Western
Washington and two in Eastern Washington. The cooperative compliance program
shall conduct fish screen, fish way, and fish passage barrier assessments and
correction plans for landowners seeking cooperative compliance agreements with
the department.

(7) $388,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $388,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to
implement the forests and fish agreement and includes funding to continue
statewide coordination and implementation of the forests and fish rules,
integration of portions of the hydraulic code into the forest practices rules
to provide permit streamlining, and sharing the responsibility of developing
and implementing the required forests and fish agreement monitoring and
adaptive management program.

(8) $850,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $850,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
local salmon recovery technical assistance.

(9) $194,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $195,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
staff to represent the state's fish and wildlife interests in hydroelectric
project relicensing processes by the federal energy regulatory commission.

(10) $156,000 of the
wildlife account--state appropriation is provided solely for a youth fishing
coordinator to develop partnerships with local communities, and to identify,
develop, fund, and promote youth fishing events and opportunities.

(11) $135,000 of the
oyster reserve land account appropriation is provided solely to implement
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5837 (state oyster reserve lands). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(12) $250,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $250,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
the department to implement a hatchery endangered species act response. The
response shall include emergency hatchery responses, production, and
retrofitting of hatcheries for salmon recovery.

(13) $650,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $650,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $3,500,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for economic adjustment
assistance to fishermen pursuant to the 1999 Pacific Salmon Treaty Agreement.

(14) $875,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $875,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to fund grants to lead entities established under chapter 77.85
RCW or watershed planning units established under chapter 90.82 RCW that agree
to coordinate the development of comprehensive local and regional salmon
recovery plans. The department shall establish a model for local and regional
plans as well as eligibility and evaluation criteria for distribution of funds
to lead entities and watershed planning units. No annual grant shall exceed
$125,000 per year.

(15) $125,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $125,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for a grant to the lower Skykomish River habitat conservation
group to develop a salmon recovery plan.

(16) $91,000 of the
warm water game fish account is provided solely for warm water fish culture at
the Rod Meseberg warm water fish production facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 38,072,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 37,628,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,440,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,865,000

Forest Development Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 54,297,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,684,000

Surveys and Maps Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,689,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,633,000

Resources Management Cost
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 87,732,000

Surface Mining Reclamation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,549,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State

Appropriation............ ................. $ 625,000

Aquatic Land Dredged
Material Disposal Site

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 1,056,000

Natural Resource
Conservation Areas Stewardship

Account Appropriation...................... $ 34,000

Air Pollution Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 629,000

Metals Mining Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 64,000

Agricultural College Trust
Management Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,021,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 239,018,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $18,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $18,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $998,000 of the aquatic
lands enhancement account appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan.

(2) $7,657,859 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $7,657,859 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
emergency fire suppression.

(3)(a) $625,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation, $3,538,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, and $3,538,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for implementation of
chapter 4, Laws of 1999 sp. sess. (forest practices and salmon recovery).

(b) $250,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for and shall be
expended to develop a small forest landowner data base in ten counties.
$150,000 of this amount shall be used to purchase the data. $100,000 of this
amount shall be used to purchase contracted analysis of the data.

(4) $446,000 of the
forest fire protection assessment account appropriation is provided solely to
implement Substitute House Bill No. 2104 (modifying forest fire protection
assessments). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)(a) $895,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $895,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
deposit in the agricultural college trust land account.

(b) The entire
agricultural college trust land account appropriation is provided solely to
manage agricultural college trust lands.

(6) $828,000 of the
surface mine reclamation account appropriation is provided to implement
Engrossed House Bill No. 1845 (surface mining fees). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $246,000 of the
resource management cost account appropriation is provided to the department
for continuing control of spruce budworm.

(8) $375,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $375,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to
the department for maintenance and stewardship of public lands.

(9) $100,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $100,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $400,000 of the aquatic
lands enhancement account appropriation are provided solely for spartina
control.

(10) $2,916,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,484,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for fire protection activities and to implement provisions of the 1997
tridata fire program review.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
309. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 10,590,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 9,999,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 4,586,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,110,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,304,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,035,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 30,624,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $36,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $37,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan.

(2) $1,480,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided solely to implement
a plan to eradicate infestations of spartina in Puget Sound, Hood Canal, and
Grays Harbor.

(3) $350,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $350,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $700,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1891
(marketing of agriculture). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) Amounts
appropriated in this section are sufficient to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5533 (pesticides in schools).

(5) $2,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for deposit in the state fair fund.

(6) $450,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for deposit in the agricultural local nonappropriated account for the plant
pest account to reimburse county horticultural pest and disease boards for the
costs of pest control activities, including tree removal, conducted under their
existing authorities in chapters 15.08 and 15.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
310. FOR THE WASHINGTON
POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM

Pollution Liability
Insurance Program Trust Account‑-

State Appropriation............................. $ 1,003,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 311. It is the intent of the
legislature that any funding for shoreline management updates, critical area
ordinance and growth management updates, and persistent bioaccumulative toxins
will be determined in separate legislation to be adopted by the legislature.

(End
of part)

PART
IV

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 5,389,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 5,377,000

Architects' License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 707,000

Cemetery Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 214,000

Professional Engineers'
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,032,000

Real Estate Commission‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 6,777,000

Master License Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 8,409,000

Uniform Commercial Code
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,104,000

Real Estate Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 301,000

Funeral Directors and Embalmers
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 490,000

Washington Real Estate
Research Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 316,000

Data Processing Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 23,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 34,139,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: In
accordance with RCW 43.24.086, it is the policy of the state of Washington that
the cost of each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. For each
licensing program covered by RCW 43.24.086, the department shall set fees at
levels sufficient to fully cover the cost of administering the licensing
program, including any costs associated with policy enhancements funded in the
2001-03 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2001-03 fiscal
biennium, the department may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth
factor, if the increases are necessary to fully fund the costs of the licensing
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. FOR THE STATE PATROL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 21,855,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 10,054,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 4,178,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 369,000

Death Investigations
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,899,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 16,070,000

County Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,490,000

Municipal Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 987,000

Fire Service Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 125,000

Fire Service Training Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,328,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 461,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 277,000

Fingerprint Identification
Account‑-State

Appropriation.. ........................... $ 3,684,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 70,777,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,419,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for combating the proliferation of methamphetamine labs. The amounts in
this subsection are provided solely for the following activities: (a) The
establishment of a regional methamphetamine enforcement, training, and
education program; (b) additional members for the statewide methamphetamine
incident response team; and (c) two forensic scientists with the necessary
equipment to perform lab analysis in the crime laboratory division.

(2) $354,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to
continue enhanced law enforcement and security coverage on the west capitol
campus.

(3) When a program
within the agency is supported by more than one fund and one of the funds is
the state general fund, the agency shall charge its expenditures in such a
manner as to ensure that each fund is charged in proportion to its support of
the program. The agency may adopt guidelines for the implementation of this
subsection. The guidelines may account for federal matching requirements,
budget provisos, or other requirements to spend other moneys in a particular
manner.

(4) $100,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5896 (DNA testing of evidence).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(5) A
study regarding the mobilization of state fire service resources in response to
state declared mobilizations shall be performed by the chief of the Washington
state patrol through the director of fire protection. The study shall examine
and evaluate the cost effectiveness and efficiency of the fire services
mobilization plan, and the fire resources mobilization processes and
procedures. One member of each of the following organizations shall be
represented and shall provide assistance to the director of fire protection
with this task: Emergency management division, department of natural
resources, Washington state fire commissioners, Washington state association of
fire chiefs, Washington state association of fire fighters, and the Washington
state fire fighters council. In addition, one rural fire chief and one urban
fire chief shall be designated. The chief of the Washington state patrol shall
report the findings through the director of fire protection to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2001.

(End
of part)

PART
V

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
501. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR STATE ADMINISTRATION

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 33,616,000

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 37,966,000

General Fund--Federal
Appropriation.................. $.................................. 236,684,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 308,266,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) AGENCY OPERATIONS

(a) $441,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $441,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely
for the operation and expenses of the state board of education, including basic
education assistance activities.

(b) $431,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $431,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
the operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator standards
board.

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS

(a) $2,524,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for in-service training and
educational programs conducted by the Pacific Science Center.

(b) $1,729,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state
leadership assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership
coordinated at the Pacific Science Center.

(c) $2,854,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for educational centers,
including state support activities. $100,000 of this amount is provided to
help stabilize funding through distribution among existing education centers
that are currently funded by the state at an amount less than $100,000 a
biennium.

(d) $17,210,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for a safety
allocation to districts subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(i) Allocations to
school districts shall be made for each of the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years
at a maximum rate of $10.00 multiplied by the full-time equivalent enrollment
of the district. For the purposes of this subsection (d)(i), the
"full-time equivalent student enrollment of the district" means the
district's average annual K-12 full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior
school year or 200 full-time equivalent students, whichever is greater.

(ii) School districts
shall use funds allocated under this section for employing or contracting for
building security monitors in schools during school hours and school events and
for school safety purposes including but not limited to planning; training;
equipment; before, during, and after-school safety; and minor building
renovations related to school safety or security.

(e) $500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for House Bill No.
1444 or Senate Bill No. 5528 (anti-bullying/harassment training). If neither
of these bills is enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(f) $200,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $200,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $400,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation transferred from the department of health
are provided solely for a program that provides grants to school districts for
media campaigns promoting sexual abstinence and addressing the importance of
delaying sexual activity, pregnancy, and childbearing until individuals are
ready to nurture and support their children. Grants to the school districts
shall be for projects that are substantially designed and produced by
students. The grants shall require a local private sector match equal to
one-half of the state grant, which may include in-kind contribution of
technical or other assistance from consultants or firms involved in public
relations, advertising, broadcasting, and graphics or video production or other
related fields.

(g) $1,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,500,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely
for school district petitions to juvenile court for truant students as provided
in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. Allocation of this money to school
districts shall be based on the number of petitions filed.

(h) A maximum of
$300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for alcohol
and drug prevention programs pursuant to RCW 66.08.180.

(i) $4,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for a K-20 telecommunications
network technical support system in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures
and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and
video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to
purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network. A maximum
of $650,000 may be expended for state-level administration and staff training
on the K-20 network.

(j) $4,300,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for complex need grants. Grants
shall be provided according to amounts shown in LEAP Document 30C as developed
on April 27, 1997, at 03:00 hours.

(k) $2,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the partnership
grant program and the alternative route conditional scholarship program created
in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5695 (alternative routes to
teacher certification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. In selecting school districts
and consortia of school districts to receive partnership grants, the Washington
professional educator standards board shall give priority to districts
emphasizing route three internships. Route three interns are individuals with
baccalaureate degrees, who are not employed in the district at the time of
application, or who hold emergency substitute certificates. The professional
educator standards board shall report to the education committees of the
legislature by December 15, 2002, on the districts applying for partnership
grants, the districts receiving partnership grants, and the number of interns
per route enrolled in each district.

(l) $5,242,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for a corps of
nurses located at educational service districts, as determined by the
superintendent of public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy
schools to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.

(m) $200,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for support for
vocational student leadership organizations.

(n) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided
solely for grants to school districts for programs to prepare high school
students to achieve information technology industry skills certifications. The
funds may be expended to provide or improve internet access; purchase and
install networking or computer equipment; train faculty; or acquire curriculum
materials. A match of cash or in-kind contributions from nonstate sources
equal to at least half of the cash amount of the grant is required. To assure
continuity of the curriculum with higher education institutions, the grant
program shall be designed and implemented by an interagency team comprised of
representatives from the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
the state board for community and technical colleges, the higher education
coordinating board, and the office of financial management. School districts
may apply for grants in cooperation with other school districts or community or
technical colleges and must demonstrate in the grant application a cooperative
relationship with a community or technical college in information technology
programs. Preference for grants shall be given to districts with sound
technology plans, which offer student access to computers outside of school
hours, which demonstrate involvement of the private sector in information
technology programs, and which serve the needs of low-income communities.

(o) $300,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington
civil liberties education program.

(p) $300,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the World War II oral
history project.

(q) $200,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for the purchase of
filtering servers necessary for districts to implement a computer technology
filtering system for schools. Priority shall be given to districts that do not
have any filtering systems in place. Funding shall be provided only at the
request of that district's school board.

(r) $9,900,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for the Washington Reads
project to enhance high quality reading instruction and school programs.

(s) $30,700,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for school renovation
grants for school districts with urgent school renovation needs, special
education-related renovations, and technology-related renovations.

(t) $1,952,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for LINKS technology
challenge grants to integrate educational reform with state technology systems
and development of technology products that enhance professional development
and classroom instruction.

(u) $423,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for the advanced
placement fee program to increase opportunities for low-income students and
under-represented populations to participate in advanced placement courses and
to increase the capacity of schools to provide advanced placement courses to
students.

(v) $12,318,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for comprehensive school
reform demonstration projects to provide grants to low-income schools for
improving student achievement through adoption and implementation of
research-based curricula and instructional programs.

(w) $4,228,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for teacher quality
enhancement through provision of consortia grants to school districts and
higher education institutions to improve teacher preparation and professional
development.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
502. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 3,724,647,000

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 3,707,010,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 7,431,657,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Allocations for
certificated staff salaries for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years shall be
determined using formula‑generated staff units calculated pursuant to
this subsection. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in (d) through
(f) of this subsection shall be reduced for vocational full-time equivalent
enrollments. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6
shall be the greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under
(d) and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be as
follows:

(a) On the basis of each
1,000 average annual full-time equivalent enrollments, excluding full-time
equivalent enrollment otherwise recognized for certificated staff unit
allocations under (c) through (f) of this subsection:

(i) Four certificated
administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades
K-12;

(ii) 49 certificated
instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades
K-3;

(iii) Forty‑six
certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students
in grades 4-12; and

(iv) An additional 4.2
certificated instructional staff units for grades K-3 and an additional 7.2
certificated instructional staff units for grade 4. Any funds allocated for
the additional certificated units provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be
considered as basic education funding;

(A) Funds provided
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of the amount required to maintain
the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be
allocated only if the district documents an actual ratio equal to or greater
than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent
students in grades K-4. For any school district documenting a lower
certificated instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio achieved in
that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;

(B) Districts at or
above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per one thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate up to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding
ratio to employ additional classified instructional assistants assigned to
basic education classrooms in grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a
district's staff ratio under this section, funds used by the district to employ
additional classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual certificated
instructional staff ratio. Additional classified instructional assistants, for
the purposes of this subsection, shall be determined using the 1989-90 school
year as the base year;

(C) Any district
maintaining a ratio equal to or greater than 53.2 certificated instructional
staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may use
allocations generated under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of that
required to maintain the minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b)
to employ additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) shall only be expended to reduce class size in grades
K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional funding ratio amount
may be expended for provision of classified instructional assistants;

(b) For school
districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time equivalent students whose
full-time equivalent student enrollment count in a given month exceeds the
first of the month full-time equivalent enrollment count by 5 percent, an
additional state allocation of 110 percent of the share that such increased
enrollment would have generated had such additional full-time equivalent
students been included in the normal enrollment count for that particular
month;

(c)(i) On the basis of
full-time equivalent enrollment in:

(A) Vocational
education programs approved by the superintendent of public instruction, a
maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative staff units for each 19.5 full-time equivalent vocational
students for the 2001-02 school year and the 2002-03 school year; and

(B) Skills center
programs meeting the standards for skill center funding recommended by the
superintendent of public instruction, January 1999, 0.92 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative units for each
16.67 full-time equivalent vocational students; and

(ii) Vocational
full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as
the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be
adjusted for reported vocational enrollments on the same monthly basis as those
adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support;

(d) For districts
enrolling not more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent
students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district
which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the state board of
education and enroll not more than twenty‑five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling
no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and
0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than
five students, plus one‑twentieth of a certificated instructional staff
unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those enrolling
students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff units and 0.32
certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one‑tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;

(e) For specified
enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty‑five but not more
than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8,
and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than
twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8
and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the state board of
education:

(i) For enrollment of
up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative
staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of
up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8,
0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative staff units;

(f) For districts
operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three
hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades
9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools:

(i) For remote and
necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty‑five
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one‑half
certificated instructional staff units and one‑quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other
small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff
units and one‑half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the
first sixty average annual full time equivalent students, and additional staff
units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and
0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty‑three
and one‑half average annual full time equivalent students.

Units calculated under
(f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced by certificated staff units at the
rate of forty‑six certificated instructional staff units and four
certificated administrative staff units per thousand vocational full-time
equivalent students;

(g) For each nonhigh
school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average
full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students,
operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half
of a certificated instructional staff unit; and

(h) For each nonhigh
school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average
full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students,
operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one‑half
of a certificated instructional staff unit.

(3) Allocations for
classified salaries for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years shall be
calculated using formula‑generated classified staff units determined as
follows:

(a) For enrollments
generating certificated staff unit allocations under subsection (2)(d) through
(h) of this section, one classified staff unit for each three certificated
staff units allocated under such subsections;

(b) For all other
enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational full-time equivalent
enrollments, one classified staff unit for each sixty average annual full-time
equivalent students; and

(c) For each nonhigh
school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time
equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional
one‑half of a classified staff unit.

(4) Fringe benefit
allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 11.27 percent in the 2001‑02
and 2002-03 school years for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 12.92 percent in the 2001‑02
and 2002-03 school years for classified salary allocations provided under
subsection (3) of this section.

(5) Insurance benefit
allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate specified in section
504(2) of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows:

(a) The number of
certificated staff units determined in subsection (2) of this section; and

(b) The number of
classified staff units determined in subsection (3) of this section multiplied
by 1.152. This factor is intended to adjust allocations so that, for the
purposes of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified
employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with
no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.

(6)(a) For
nonemployee-related costs associated with each certificated staff unit
allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d) through (h) of this section,
there shall be provided a maximum of $8,519 per certificated staff unit in the
2001-02 school year and a maximum of $8,715 per certificated staff unit in the
2002-03 school year.

(b) For
nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated staff
unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this section, there shall be
provided a maximum of $20,920 per certificated staff unit in the 2001-02 school
year and a maximum of $21,401 per certificated staff unit in the 2002-03 school
year.

(c) For
nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated staff
unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this section, there shall be
provided a maximum of $16,233 per certificated staff unit in the 2001-02 school
year and a maximum of $16,606 per certificated staff unit in the 2002-03 school
year.

(7) Allocations for
substitute costs for classroom teachers shall be distributed at a maintenance
rate of $494.34 for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years per allocated
classroom teachers exclusive of salary increase amounts provided in section 504
of this act. Solely for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom
teachers shall be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio between
the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and the number of
actual basic education certificated instructional staff reported statewide for
the 2000-01 school year.

(8) Any school district
board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by
submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any
portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The
superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if
it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be
for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant
to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(9) For the 2002-03
school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall distribute directly
to the national guard youth challenge program, for students enrolled in the
program and earning high school graduation credit, funding generated under the
provisions of chapter 28A.150 RCW. Funding shall be provided based on
statewide average per pupil apportionment rates. Funding for one annual
average full-time equivalent student shall be provided for each 900 hours of
scheduled instruction for high school graduation credit, and shall be based on
the opening day enrollment information submitted by the program.

(10) The superintendent
may distribute a maximum of $6,510,000 outside the basic education formula
during fiscal years 2002 and 2003 as follows:

(a) For fire protection
for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter
established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW, a maximum of $480,000 may be
expended in fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $491,000 may be expended in
fiscal year 2003;

(b) For summer
vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of $2,098,000 may be expended
each fiscal year;

(c) A maximum of
$343,000 may be expended for school district emergencies; and

(d) A maximum of
$500,000 per fiscal year may be expended for programs providing skills training
for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work
programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds
shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent
student enrolled in those programs.

(11) For purposes of
RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent student in state basic
education appropriations provided under this act, including appropriations for
salary and benefits increases, is 1.2 percent from the 2000-01 school year to
the 2001-02 school year, and 3.0 percent from the 2001-02 school year to the
2002-03 school year.

(12) If two or more
school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic
education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this
section, the following shall apply:

(a) For three school
years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff
units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units received
by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth
through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the
basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school year
prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section shall
be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
503. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION. (1) The following
calculations determine the salaries used in the general fund allocations for
certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff
units under section 502 of this act:

(a) Salary allocations
for certificated instructional staff units shall be determined for each
district by multiplying the district's certificated instructional total base
salary shown on LEAP Document 12E for the appropriate year, by the district's
average staff mix factor for basic education and special education certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP Document 1S; and

(b) Salary allocations
for certificated administrative staff units and classified staff units for each
district shall be based on the district's certificated administrative and
classified salary allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document 12E for the
appropriate year.

(2) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Basic
education certificated instructional staff" is defined as provided in RCW
28A.150.100 and "special education certificated staff" means staff
assigned to the state-supported special education program pursuant to chapter
28A.155 RCW in positions requiring a certificate;

(b) "LEAP Document
1S" means the computerized tabulation establishing staff mix factors for
certificated instructional staff according to education and years of
experience, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee on March 25, 1999, at 16:56 hours; and

(c) "LEAP Document
12E" means the computerized tabulation of 2001-02 and 2002-03 school year
salary allocations for certificated administrative staff and classified staff
and derived and total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on
April 14, 2001, at 04:09 hours.

(3) Incremental fringe
benefit factors shall be applied to salary adjustments at a rate of 10.63
percent for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years for certificated staff and
9.42 percent for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years for classified staff.

(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410, the following statewide salary allocation schedules for
certificated instructional staff are established for basic education salary
allocations:

K-12 Salary Schedule
for Certificated Instructional Staff

2001-02
School Year

Years of

Service BA
BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 27,467 28,209 28,977 29,746 32,219

1 27,836 28,588 29,366 30,171 32,668

2 28,464 29,231 30,025 30,900 33,414

3 29,401 30,192 31,009 31,931 34,490

4 30,063 30,896 31,727 32,689 35,290

5 30,750 31,595 32,443 33,468 36,085

6 31,147 31,974 32,850 33,928 36,531

7 32,164 33,010 33,909 35,055 37,724

8 33,195 34,088 35,008 36,248 38,954

9 35,205 36,169 37,455 40,223

10 37,344 38,724 41,529

11 40,029 42,895

12 41,293 44,298

13 45,736

14 47,181

15 48,408

16 or more 49,376

Years of MA+90

Service BA+135 MA MA+45 or
PHD

0 33,811 32,931 35,403 36,996

1 34,252 33,297 35,793 37,377

2 35,030 33,995 36,509 38,124

3 36,177 35,027 37,585 39,273

4 37,007 35,755 38,355 40,072

5 37,853 36,503 39,121 40,889

6 38,308 36,904 39,508 41,285

7 39,569 38,031 40,700 42,546

8 40,867 39,225 41,930 43,843

9 42,201 40,430 43,200 45,177

10 43,572 41,700 44,505 46,549

11 44,979 43,005 45,872 47,956

12 46,446 44,362 47,275 49,422

13 47,947 45,766 48,712 50,923

14 49,505 47,212 50,251 52,481

15 50,792 48,439 51,557 53,846

16 or more 51,808 49,407 52,589 54,923

K-12 Allocation Salary
Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2002-03
School Year

Years of

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 28,181 28,942 29,730 30,520 33,056

1 28,560 29,331 30,130 30,956 33,517

2 29,203 29,991 30,805 31,703 34,283

3 30,165 30,977 31,816 32,761 35,387

4 30,844 31,699 32,552 33,539 36,207

5 31,549 32,417 33,287 34,338 37,023

6 31,956 32,805 33,704 34,809 37,481

7 33,000 33,868 34,790 35,966 38,704

8 34,058 34,975 35,918 37,191 39,967

9 36,120 37,109 38,429 41,269

10 38,315 39,730 42,608

11 41,069 44,011

12 42,366 45,450

13 46,924

14 48,407

15 49,666

16 or more 50,660

Years of MA+90

Service BA+135 MA MA+45 or
PHD

0 34,690 33,787 36,323 37,957

1 35,142 34,162 36,724 38,348

2 35,941 34,878 37,458 39,115

3 37,117 35,938 38,562 40,294

4 37,969 36,685 39,353 41,114

5 38,837 37,452 40,138 41,952

6 39,304 37,863 40,535 42,358

7 40,598 39,020 41,758 43,652

8 41,929 40,244 43,020 44,983

9 43,298 41,481 44,323 46,352

10 44,705 42,784 45,662 47,759

11 46,149 44,123 47,064 49,202

12 47,653 45,515 48,503 50,707

13 49,193 46,955 49,978 52,247

14 50,792 48,439 51,557 53,845

15 52,113 49,698 52,897 55,245

16 or more 53,154 50,692 53,956 56,350

(b) As used in this
subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer to the number of
credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate degree.

(c) For credits earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree, any credits in
excess of forty‑five credits may be counted after the masters degree.
Thus, as used in this subsection, the column headings "MA+(N)" refer
to the total of:

(i) Credits earned
since receiving the masters degree; and

(ii) Any credits in
excess of forty‑five credits that were earned after the baccalaureate
degree but before the masters degree.

(5) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "BA"
means a baccalaureate degree.

(b) "MA"
means a masters degree.

(c) "PHD"
means a doctorate degree.

(d) "Years of
service" shall be calculated under the same rules adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction.

(e) "Credits"
means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed
in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and 28A.415.023.

(6) No more than ninety
college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate
degree may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state salary
allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in this act, or any
replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a) The employee has a
masters degree; or

(b) The credits were
used in generating state salary allocations before January 1, 1992.

(7) The certificated
instructional staff base salary specified for each district in LEAP Document
12E and the salary schedules in subsection (4)(a) of this section include three
learning improvement days originally added in the 1999-00 school year. A
school district is eligible for the learning improvement day funds for school
years 2001-02 and 2002-03, only if three learning improvement days have been
added to the 180 day contract year. If fewer than three days are added, the
additional learning improvement allocation shall be adjusted accordingly. The
additional days shall be for activities related to improving student learning
consistent with education reform implementation. The length of a learning
improvement day shall not be less than the length of a full day under the base
contract. The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that school
districts adhere to the intent and purposes of this subsection.

(8) The salary allocation
schedules established in this section are for allocation purposes only except
as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
504. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 121,701,000

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 254,478,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION...................... $ 376,179,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $300,506,000 is
provided for a cost of living adjustment of 3.7 percent effective September 1,
2001, and another 2.6 percent effective September 1, 2002, for state formula
staff units, in accordance with chapter 4, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No.
732). It is the intent of the legislature that the cost of living adjustment
provided effective September 1, 2002, be adjusted to reflect the actual
calendar year 2001 Seattle consumer price index increase as required by chapter
4, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 732). The appropriations include
associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at rates of 10.63 percent for
the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years for certificated staff and 9.42 percent
for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years for classified staff.

(a) The appropriations
in this section include the increased portion of salaries and incremental
fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this
act in accordance with chapter 4, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 732).
Salary adjustments for state employees in the office of superintendent of
public instruction and the education reform program are provided in part VII of
this act. Increases for general apportionment are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in section 502 of this act. Increases for
special education result from increases in each district's general
apportionment allocation per student. Increases for educational service
districts and institutional education programs are determined by the
superintendent of public instruction using the methodology for general
apportionment salaries and benefits in section 502 of this act.

(b) The appropriations
in this section provide cost-of-living and incremental fringe benefit
allocations based on formula adjustments as follows:

School
Year

2001-02 2002-03

Pupil Transportation (per
weighted pupil mile) $ 0.77 $ 1.33

Highly Capable (per formula
student) $ 8.75 $ 15.13

Transitional Bilingual
Education (per eligible

bilingual student) $
22.73 $ 39.30

Learning Assistance (per
entitlement unit) $ 11.23 $ 19.41

Substitute Teacher
(allocation per teacher,

section 502(7)) $
18.29 $ 31.62

(2) $75,673,000 is
provided for adjustments to insurance benefit allocations. The maintenance
rate for insurance benefit allocations is $427.73 per month for the 2001-02 and
2002-03 school years. The appropriations in this section provide for a rate
increase to $453.77 per month for the 2001-02 school year and $490.18 per month
for the 2002-03 school year at the following rates:

School
Year

2001-02 2002-03

Pupil Transportation (per
weighted pupil mile) $ 0.24 $ 0.57

Highly Capable (per formula
student) $ 1.67 $ 3.97

Transitional Bilingual
Education (per eligible

bilingual student) $
4.22 $ 10.11

Learning Assistance (per
entitlement unit) $ 3.32 $ 7.95

(3) The rates specified
in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
505. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 193,198,000

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 194,293,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 387,491,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) A maximum of
$1,552,000 may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted
by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest
extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(3) $15,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $20,000 of the fiscal year 2003
appropriation are provided solely for the transportation of students enrolled
in "choice" programs. Transportation shall be limited to low-income
students who are transferring to "choice" programs solely for
educational reasons.

(4) Allocations for
transportation of students shall be based on reimbursement rates of $37.11 per
weighted mile in the 2001-02 school year and $37.38 per weighted mile in the
2002-03 school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided in
section 504 of this act. Allocations for transportation of students
transported more than one radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as
determined by superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for transportation of
students living within one radius mile shall be based on the number of enrolled
students in grades kindergarten through five living within one radius mile of
their assigned school multiplied by the per mile reimbursement rate for the
school year multiplied by 1.29.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
506. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE
PROGRAMS

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 3,100,000

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 3,100,000

General Fund--Federal
Appropriation.................. $.................................. 218,630,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 224,830,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,000,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriations are provided for state matching money for
federal child nutrition programs.

(2) $200,000 of the
general fund--state appropriations are provided for summer food programs for
children in low-income areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
507. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 419,264,000

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 418,106,000

General Fund--Federal
Appropriation.................. $.................................. 178,685,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 1,016,055,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding for special
education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW
28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure, to the greatest extent possible,
that special education students receive their appropriate share of the general
apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and 504 of this act. To
the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for
special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general
apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special
education allocation funded in this section.

(2)(a) Effective with
the 2001-02 school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall change
the S-275 personnel reporting system and all related accounting requirements to
ensure that:

(i) Special education
students are basic education students first;

(ii) As a class,
special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation;
and

(iii) Special education
students are basic education students for the entire school day.

(b) Effective with the
2001-02 school year, the S-275 and accounting changes shall supercede any prior
excess cost methodologies and shall be required of all school districts.

(3) Each general fund‑-state
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(4) The superintendent
of public instruction shall distribute state funds to school districts based on
two categories: The optional birth through age two program for special
education eligible developmentally delayed infants and toddlers, and the
mandatory special education program for special education eligible students
ages three to twenty-one. A "special education eligible student"
means a student receiving specially designed instruction in accordance with a
properly formulated individualized education program.

(5) For the 2001-02 and
2002-03 school years, the superintendent shall distribute state funds to each
district based on the sum of:

(a) A district's annual
average headcount enrollment of developmentally delayed infants and toddlers
ages birth through two, multiplied by the district's average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and

(b) A district's annual
average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment multiplied by the
funded enrollment percent determined pursuant to subsection (6)(c) of this
section, multiplied by the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.

(6) The definitions in this
subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Average basic
education allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district
shall be based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.

(b) "Annual
average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment" means the
resident enrollment including students enrolled through choice (RCW
28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts (RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding
students residing in another district enrolled as part of an interdistrict
cooperative program (RCW 28A.225.250).

(c) "Enrollment
percent" means the district's resident special education annual average
enrollment including those students counted under the special education
demonstration projects, excluding the birth through age two enrollment, as a
percent of the district's annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment. For the 2001-02 and the 2002-03 school years, each district's funded
enrollment percent shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment
percent for the school year for which the allocation is being determined or
12.7 percent.

(7) At the request of
any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost
services for special education students of the districts are provided by the
cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be 12.7, and shall be
calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For
purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than
individual district units.

(8) A maximum of
$12,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $12,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided as safety net funding for districts with
demonstrated needs for state special education funding beyond the amounts
provided in subsection (5) of this section. Safety net funding shall be
awarded by the state safety net oversight committee.

(a) The safety net
oversight committee shall first consider the needs of districts adversely
affected by the 1995 change in the special education funding formula. Awards
shall be based on the amount required to maintain the 1994-95 state special
education excess cost allocation to the school district in aggregate or on a
dollar per funded student basis.

(b) The committee shall
then consider unusual needs of districts due to a special education population
which differs significantly from the assumptions of the state funding formula.
Awards shall be made to districts that convincingly demonstrate need due to the
concentration and/or severity of disabilities in the district. Differences in
program costs attributable to district philosophy or service delivery style are
not a basis for safety net awards.

(c) The maximum
allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net eligibility may not exceed
the federal restricted indirect cost rate for the district plus one percent.

(d) Safety net awards
shall be adjusted based on the percent of potential medicaid eligible students
billed as calculated by the superintendent in accordance with RCW 74.09.5255
and 74.09.5256.

(e) Safety net awards
must be adjusted for any audit findings or exceptions related to special
education funding.

(f) The superintendent
may expend up to $120,000 per year of the amounts provided in this subsection
to provide staff assistance to the committee in analyzing applications for
safety net funds received by the committee.

(9) The superintendent
of public instruction may adopt such rules and procedures as are necessary to
administer the special education funding and safety net award process. Prior
to revising any standards, procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall
consult with the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of
the legislature.

(10) The safety net
oversight committee appointed by the superintendent of public instruction shall
consist of:

(a) One staff person
from the office of superintendent of public instruction;

(b) Staff of the office
of the state auditor;

(c) Staff of the office
of the financial management; and

(d) One or more
representatives from school districts or educational service districts
knowledgeable of special education programs and funding.

(11) To the extent
necessary, $5,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation shall be
expended for safety net funding to meet the extraordinary needs of one or more
individual special education students. If safety net awards to meet the
extraordinary needs of one or more individual special education students exceed
$5,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, the superintendent
shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this
need. General fund‑-state funds shall not be expended for this purpose.

(12) The superintendent
shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85
percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased
federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education
services from educational service districts, and for staff development
activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(13) A maximum of
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for
projects to provide special education students with appropriate job and
independent living skills, including work experience where possible, to
facilitate their successful transition out of the public school system. The
funds provided by this subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.

(14) A maximum of
$678,000 may be expended from the general fund‑-state appropriations to
fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time equivalent aides at
children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This amount is in lieu of
money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education
program.

(15) A maximum of
$1,200,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation may be expended by the
superintendent for projects related to use of inclusion strategies by school
districts for provision of special education services. The superintendent
shall prepare an information database on laws, best practices, examples of
programs, and recommended resources. The information may be disseminated in a
variety of ways, including workshops and other staff development activities.

(16) For the 2002-03
school year, the superintendent shall distribute directly to the national guard
youth challenge program, for students earning high school graduation credit,
funding for special education eligible students, as defined in subsection (4)
of this section, who are enrolled in the national guard youth challenge
program. The superintendent shall distribute state funds directly to the
national guard youth challenge program based on the program's annual average
full-time equivalent basic education enrollment as determined under section
502(9) of this act, multiplied by the funded enrollment percent determined
pursuant to subsection (6)(c) of this section, multiplied by the program's
average basic education allocation under section 502(9) of this act per full-time
equivalent student, multiplied by 0.9309.

(17) A school district
may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of general fund‑-state
funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended
in the special education program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
508. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRAFFIC SAFETY EDUCATION
PROGRAMS

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 3,595,000

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 2,589,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 6,184,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations
include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in each
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) A maximum of
$507,000 may be expended for regional traffic safety education coordinators.

(3) Allocations to
provide tuition assistance for students from low-income families who complete
the program shall be a maximum of $203.97 per eligible student in the 2001-02
and 2002-03 school years.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
509. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE
DISTRICTS

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 4,768,000

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 4,768,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 9,536,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The educational
service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the
superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

(2) $250,000 of the
general fund appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $250,000 of the general
fund appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for student
teaching centers as provided in RCW 28A.415.100.

(3) A maximum of
$500,000 is provided for centers for the improvement of teaching pursuant to
RCW 28A.415.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
510. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 136,315,000

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 148,329,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 284,644,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
511. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 19,133,000

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 19,115,000

General Fund--Federal
Appropriation.................. $.................................. 8,548,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 46,796,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund‑-state
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding
provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a
220‑day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall
monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs
to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for
each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual
average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each
category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97
biennium.

(4) The funded staffing
ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of
corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99
biennium.

(5) $141,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $139,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related
support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not
sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff
to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and health
services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under
the department of corrections, and programs for juveniles under the juvenile
rehabilitation administration.

(6) Ten percent of the
funds allocated for each institution may be carried over from one year to the
next.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
512. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY
CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 6,443,000

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 6,397,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 12,840,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Allocations for
school district programs for highly capable students shall be distributed at a
maximum rate of $328.10 per funded student for the 2001-02 school year and
$328.05 per funded student for the 2002-03 school year, exclusive of salary and
benefit adjustments pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded
students shall be a maximum of two percent of each district's full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.

(3) $350,000 of the
appropriation is for the centrum program at Fort Worden state park.

(4) $186,000 of the
appropriation is for the Washington imagination network and future
problem-solving programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
513. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR THE ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY
SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT

General Fund--Federal
Appropriation.................. $.................................. 288,166,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
514. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION‑-FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT
PROGRAM

Student Achievement
Fund--State Appropriation

(FY 2002).............................. ........ $ 184,232,000

Student Achievement Fund‑-State
Appropriation

(FY 2003)....................................... $ 209,068,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 393,300,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations
are allocated for the uses specified in chapter 28A.505 RCW as amended by
chapter 3, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 728).

(2) Funding for school
district student achievement programs shall be allocated at a maximum rate of
$193.92 per FTE student for the 2001-02 school year and $220.59 per FTE student
for the 2002-03 school year. For the purposes of this section and in
accordance with RCW 84.52.068 (section 5 of Initiative Measure No. 728), FTE
student refers to the school district annual average full-time equivalent
students in grades kindergarten through twelve for the prior school year.

(3) The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall distribute ten percent of the annual
allocation to districts each month for the months of September through June.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
515. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS

General Fund--State Appropriation
(FY 2002)......... $ 37,059,000

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 41,307,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 78,366,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $322,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $322,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the academic achievement and accountability commission.

(2) $2,357,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $5,343,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
focused assistance to schools and school districts in accordance with Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5625 (focused assistance to schools). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse. Of these amounts, $142,000 in fiscal year 2002 and $136,000 in
fiscal year 2003 are provided for the increased responsibilities of the
academic achievement and accountability commission, and $215,000 in fiscal year
2002 and $207,000 in fiscal year 2003 are provided for the increased
responsibilities of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) $26,502,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for development and
implementation of the Washington assessments of student learning. Up to
$689,000 of the appropriation may be expended for data analysis and data
management of test results.

(4) $2,190,000 is
provided solely for training of paraprofessional classroom assistants and
certificated staff who work with classroom assistants as provided in RCW
28A.415.310.

(5) $4,695,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for mentor teacher assistance, including state support activities, under RCW
28A.415.250 and 28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy. Up to $200,000 of the
amount in this subsection may be used to operate a mentor academy to help
districts provide effective training for peer mentors. Funds for the teacher
assistance program shall be allocated to school districts based on the number
of beginning teachers.

(6) $4,695,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely
for the peer mentor program established by this subsection and for a mentor
academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in this subsection may be used to
operate a mentor academy to help districts provide effective training for peer
mentors. The superintendent shall distribute funding to an eligible peer
mentor program based on the number of first year teachers.

(a) An eligible peer
mentor program is a program that provides to a beginning teacher services that
include but are not limited to:

(i) An orientation
process and individualized assistance to help beginning teachers who have been
hired prior to the start of the school year prepare for the start of a school
year;

(ii) The assignment of
a peer mentor whose responsibilities to the beginning teacher include but are
not limited to constructive feedback, the modeling of instructional strategies,
and frequent meetings and other forms of contact;

(iii) The provision by
peer mentors of strategies, training, and guidance in critical areas such as
classroom management, student discipline, curriculum management, instructional
skill, assessment, communication skills, and professional conduct. A district
may provide these components through a variety of means including one-on-one
contact and workshops offered by peer mentors to groups, including cohort
groups, of beginning teachers;

(iv) The provision of
release time, substitutes, mentor training in observation techniques, and other
measures for both peer mentors and beginning teachers, to allow each an
adequate amount of time to observe the other and to provide the classroom
experience that each needs to work together effectively;

(v) Assistance in the
incorporation of the essential academic learning requirements into instructional
plans and in the development of complex teaching strategies, including
strategies to raise the achievement of students with diverse learning styles
and backgrounds; and

(vi) Guidance and
assistance in the development and implementation of a professional growth
plan. The plan shall include a professional self-evaluation component and one
or more informal performance assessments. A peer mentor may not be involved in
any evaluation under RCW 28A.405.100 of a beginning teacher whom the peer mentor
has assisted through this program.

(b) In addition to the
services provided in (a) of this subsection, an eligible peer mentor program
shall include but is not limited to the following components:

(i) Strong
collaboration among the peer mentor, the beginning teacher's principal, and the
beginning teacher;

(ii) Stipends for peer
mentors and, at the option of a district, for beginning teachers. The stipends
shall not be deemed compensation for the purposes of salary lid compliance
under RCW 28A.400.200 and are not subject to the continuing contract provisions
of Title 28A RCW; and

(iii) To the extent
that resources are available for this purpose and that assistance to beginning
teachers is not adversely impacted, the program may serve second year and more
experienced teachers who request the assistance of peer mentors.

(c) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout subsection (6) of this section.

(i) "Peer
mentor" means an educator, including an individual in retirement status,
who in consultation with the building principals who will be working with the
peer mentor, is selected by the district to serve in that capacity up to and
including full time, and who meets the following qualifications:

(A) Possession of one
or more valid certificates issued by the superintendent of public instruction
under RCW 28A.410.010;

(B) Possession of five
or more years of teaching experience;

(C) Stature as an
excellent teacher as determined by the teacher's evaluations pursuant to RCW
28A.405.100 and criteria developed by the district in cooperation with the
local bargaining unit representing classroom teachers; and

(D) Experience, skills,
and interest in facilitating adult learning.

Classroom teachers,
representing the bargaining unit certified pursuant to RCW 41.59.090, in the
school where the mentor teacher will be assigned, shall participate in the peer
mentor selection process.

(ii) "Beginning
teacher" means a first year teacher who holds a valid residency,
provisional, or initial certificate issued by the superintendent of public
instruction under RCW 28A.410.010.

(7) $4,050,000 is
provided for improving technology infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on
school district technology development, promoting standards for school district
technology, promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support centers,
including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW. The
superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate a process to facilitate
the evaluation and provision of online curriculum courses to school districts
that includes the following: Creation of a general listing of the types of
available online curriculum courses; a survey conducted by each regional educational
technology support center of school districts in its region regarding the types
of online curriculum courses desired by school districts; a process to evaluate
and recommend to school districts the best online courses in terms of
curriculum, student performance, and cost; and assistance to school districts
in procuring and providing the courses to students.

(8) $7,200,000 is
provided for grants to school districts to provide a continuum of care for
children and families to help children become ready to learn. Grant proposals
from school districts shall contain local plans designed collaboratively with
community service providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area
in which the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible. Grant
funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.

(9) $5,000,000 is
provided solely for the meals for kids program under RCW 28A.235.145 through
28A.235.155.

(10) $2,818,000 is
provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents,
principals, and program administrators.

(11) $4,656,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the mathematics
helping corps subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) In order to
increase the availability and quality of technical mathematics assistance
statewide, the superintendent of public instruction shall employ mathematics
school improvement specialists to provide assistance to schools and districts.
The specialists shall be hired by and work under the direction of a statewide
school improvement coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall
serve on a rotating basis from one to three years and shall not be permanent
employees of the superintendent of public instruction.

(b) The school
improvement specialists shall provide the following:

(i) Assistance to
schools to disaggregate student performance data and develop improvement plans
based on those data;

(ii) Consultation with
schools and districts concerning their performance on the Washington assessment
of student learning and other assessments emphasizing the performance on the
mathematics assessments;

(iii) Consultation
concerning curricula that aligns with the essential academic learning
requirements emphasizing the academic learning requirements for mathematics,
the Washington assessment of student learning, and meets the needs of diverse
learners;

(iv) Assistance in the
identification and implementation of research-based instructional practices in
mathematics;

(v) Staff training that
emphasizes effective instructional strategies and classroom-based assessment
for mathematics;

(vi) Assistance in
developing and implementing family and community involvement programs
emphasizing mathematics; and

(vii) Other assistance
to schools and school districts intended to improve student mathematics
learning.

(12) $5,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington
reading corps subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Grants shall be
allocated to schools and school districts to implement proven, research-based
mentoring and tutoring programs in reading for low-performing students in
grades K-6. If the grant is made to a school district, the principals of
schools enrolling targeted students shall be consulted concerning design and
implementation of the program.

(b) The programs may be
implemented before, after, or during the regular school day, or on Saturdays,
summer, intercessions, or other vacation periods.

(c) Two or more schools
may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(d) A program is
eligible for a grant if it meets the following conditions:

(i) The program employs
methods of teaching and student learning based on reliable reading/literacy
research and effective practices;

(ii) The program design
is comprehensive and includes instruction, on-going student assessment,
professional development, parental/community involvement, and program
management aligned with the school's reading curriculum;

(iii) It provides
quality professional development and training for teachers, staff, and
volunteer mentors and tutors;

(iv) It has measurable
goals for student reading aligned with the essential academic learning
requirements; and

(v) It contains an
evaluation component to determine the effectiveness of the program.

(e) Funding priority
shall be given to low-performing schools.

(f) Beginning and
end-of-program testing data shall be available to determine the effectiveness
of funded programs and practices. Common evaluative criteria across programs,
such as grade-level improvements shall be available for each reading corps
program. The superintendent of public instruction shall provide program
evaluations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.
Administrative and evaluation costs may be assessed from the annual
appropriation for the program.

(g) Grants provided
under this section may be used by schools and school districts for expenditures
from September 2001 through August 31, 2003.

(13) $307,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $530,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for salary bonuses for teachers who attain certification by the national
board for professional teaching standards.

(a) In the 2001-02
school year, teachers who have attained certification by the national board in
the 2000-01 school year or the 2001-02 school year shall receive an annual
bonus not to exceed $3,500.

(b) In the 2002-03
school year, teachers who have attained certification by the national board in
the 2001-02 school year or the 2002-03 school year shall receive an annual
bonus not to exceed $3,500.

(c) The annual bonus
shall be paid in a lump sum amount and shall not be included in the definition
of "earnable compensation" under RCW 41.32.010(10).

(d) It is the intent of
the legislature that teachers achieving certification by the national board of
professional teaching standards will receive no more than two bonus payments
under this subsection.

(14) $1,250,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for a principal leadership
development program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
may contract with an independent organization to administer the program. The
program shall include: (a) Development of an individualized professional
growth plan for a new principal or principal candidate; and (b) participation
of a mentor principal who works over a period of between one and three years
with the new principal or principal candidate to help him or her build the
skills identified as critical to the success of the professional growth plan.

(15) $71,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $71,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for the second grade reading test. The funds shall be expended
for assessment training for new second grade teachers and replacement of
assessment materials.

(16) $768,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for the superintendent to
assist schools in implementing high academic standards, aligning curriculum
with these standards, and training teachers to use assessments to improve
student learning. Funds may also be used to increase community and parental
awareness of education reform.

(17) $260,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for the development and
posting of web-based instructional tools, assessment data, and other
information that assists schools and teachers implementing higher academic
standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
516. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL
PROGRAMS

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 43,044,000

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 45,171,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 88,215,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) The superintendent
shall distribute a maximum of $687.19 per eligible bilingual student in the
2001-02 and 2002-03 school years, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided in section 504 of this act. The superintendent shall distribute
directly to the national guard youth challenge program, for students earning
high school graduation credit, a maximum of $687.19 per eligible bilingual
student enrolled in the national guard youth challenge program in the 2002-03
school year.

(3) The superintendent
may withhold up to $295,000 in school year 2001-02 and up to $268,000 in school
year 2002-03, and adjust the per eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this
section accordingly, for the central provision of assessments as provided in
subsections (5)(a) and (b) of this section.

(4) $70,000 of the
amounts appropriated in this section are provided solely for the tracking of
current and former transitional bilingual program students as provided in
subsection (5)(c) of this section.

(5) The superintendent
of public instruction shall develop and implement an evaluation system designed
to measure increases in the English and academic proficiency of eligible
pupils. When developing and implementing the system, the superintendent shall:

(a) Require school
districts to assess potentially eligible pupils within ten days of registration
using an English proficiency assessment or assessments as specified by the
superintendent of public instruction. Results of these assessments shall be
made available to both the superintendent of public instruction and the school
district;

(b) Require school
districts to annually assess all eligible pupils at the end of the school year
using an English proficiency assessment or assessments as specified by the
superintendent of public instruction. Results of these assessments shall be
made available to both the superintendent of public instruction and the school
district;

(c) Develop and
implement a system to evaluate increases in the English and academic
proficiency of students who are, or were, eligible pupils. This evaluation
shall include students when they are in the program and after they exit the
program until they finish their K-12 career or transfer from the school
district. The purpose of the evaluation system is to inform schools, school
districts, parents, and the state of the effectiveness of the transitional
bilingual programs in school and school districts in teaching these students
English and other content areas, such as mathematics and writing; and

(d) Report to the
education and fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2002,
regarding the implementation of this section.

(6) The superintendent
of public instruction shall review the criteria used to determine the point at
which limited English proficient students are required to take the Washington
assessment of student learning. The review shall be used to determine if the
criteria are developmentally appropriate and in the best interest of the
students. In conducting the review, the superintendent shall consult with
parents, teachers, principals, classroom aides, recognized experts in
second-language instruction, and statewide ethnic organizations that represent
second-language learners. Results of the review shall be reported to the
education and fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2001.

(7) Beginning with the
spring 2001 testing cycle, the results of the Washington assessment of student
learning for students receiving instructional services in the state
transitional bilingual program shall not be included in a school's assessment
results unless the students have been in the United States for a total of
thirty-six months or more. The results may be used to track student progress
in meeting the state's essential academic learning requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
517. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 70,593,000

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 68,827,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 139,420,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Funding for school
district learning assistance programs shall be allocated at maximum rates of
$408.38 per funded unit for the 2001-02 school year and $409.41 per funded unit
for the 2002-03 school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided in section 504 of this act.

(3) For purposes of
this section, test results refers to the district results from the
norm-referenced test administered in the specified grade level. The
norm-referenced test results used for the third and sixth grade calculations
shall be consistent with the third and sixth grade tests required under RCW
28A.230.190 and 28A.230.193.

(4) A school district's
funded units for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years shall be the sum of the
following:

(a) The district's
full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-6, multiplied by the 5-year average
4th grade lowest quartile test results as adjusted for funding purposes in the
school years prior to 1999‑2000, multiplied by 0.92. As the 3rd grade
test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average on a 1-year
lag; and

(b) The district's
full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 7-9, multiplied by the 5-year average
8th grade lowest quartile test results as adjusted for funding purposes in the
school years prior to 1999‑2000, multiplied by 0.92. As the 6th grade
test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average for these
grades on a 1-year lag; and

(c) The district's
full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 10-11 multiplied by the 5-year
average 11th grade lowest quartile test results, multiplied by 0.92. As the
9th grade test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average
for these grades on a 1-year lag; and

(d) If, in the prior
school year, the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in
grades K-12 eligible for free and reduced price lunch exceeded the state
average, subtract the state average percentage of students eligible for free
and reduced price lunch from the district's percentage and multiply the result
by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the
current school year multiplied by 22.3 percent.

(5) School districts
may carryover from one year to the next up to 10 percent of funds allocated
under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning
assistance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
518. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-LOCAL ENHANCEMENT FUNDS

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 27,359,000

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 27,310,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 54,669,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)(a) Funds are
provided for local education program enhancements to meet educational needs as
identified by the school district, including alternative education programs.

(b) For the 2002-03
school year, the superintendent shall distribute directly to the national guard
youth challenge program, for students enrolled in the program and earning high
school graduation credit, funding provided under subsection (3) of this
section. Funding for one annual average full-time equivalent student shall be
provided for each 900 hours of scheduled instruction for high school graduation
credit, and shall be based on the opening day enrollment information submitted
by the national guard youth challenge program.

(3) Allocations for the
2001-02 school year shall be at a maximum annual rate of $28.81 per full-time
equivalent student and $28.81 per full-time equivalent student for the 2002-03
school year. Allocations shall be made on the monthly apportionment payment
schedule provided in RCW 28A.510.250 and shall be based on school district
annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in grades kindergarten through
twelve: PROVIDED, That for school districts enrolling not more than one
hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, and for small school plants
within any school district designated as remote and necessary schools, the
allocations shall be as follows:

(a) Enrollment of not
more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students in grades
kindergarten through six shall generate funding based on sixty full-time
equivalent students;

(b) Enrollment of not
more than twenty average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven
and eight shall generate funding based on twenty full-time equivalent students;
and

(c) Enrollment of not
more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine
through twelve shall generate funding based on sixty full-time equivalent
students.

(4) Funding provided
pursuant to this section does not fall within the definition of basic education
for purposes of Article IX of the state Constitution and the state's funding
duty thereunder.

(5) The superintendent
shall not allocate up to one-fourth of a district's funds under this section
if:

(a) The district is not
maximizing federal matching funds for medical services provided through special
education programs, pursuant to RCW 74.09.5241 through 74.09.5256 (Title XIX
funding); or

(b) The district is not
in compliance in filing truancy petitions as required under chapter 312, Laws
of 1995 and RCW 28A.225.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
519. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-BETTER SCHOOLS PROGRAM

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 8,996,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$8,996,000 is provided solely to complete the 2000-01 school year allocation
for class size reduction and expanded learning opportunities pursuant to
section 518, chapter 1, Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
520. K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND
PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS. State
general fund appropriations provided to the superintendent of public instruction
for state entitlement programs in the public schools in this part V of this act
may be expended as needed by the superintendent for adjustments to
apportionment for prior fiscal periods. Recoveries of state general fund
moneys from school districts and educational service districts for a prior
fiscal period shall be made as reductions in apportionment payments for the
current fiscal period and shall be shown as prior year adjustments on
apportionment reports for the current period. Such recoveries shall not be
treated as revenues to the state, but as a reduction in the amount expended
against the appropriation for the current fiscal period.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
521. FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Education Savings
Account--State Appropriation...... $ 36,720,000

Education Construction
Account--State Appropriation. $ 154,500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 191,220,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $36,720,000 from
the education savings account‑-state is appropriated to the common school
construction account.

(2) The
education construction account appropriation shall be deposited in the common
school construction account.

(End
of part)

PART
VI

HIGHER EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
601. The appropriations in
sections 603 through 609 of this act are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:

(1)
"Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.

(2)(a) The salary
increases provided or referenced in this subsection shall be the only allowable
salary increases provided at institutions of higher education, excluding
increases associated with normally occurring promotions and increases related
to faculty and professional staff retention, and excluding increases associated
with employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW.

(b) Each institution of
higher education shall provide to each classified staff employee as defined by
the office of financial management a salary increase of 3.0 percent on July 1,
2001, and a salary increase of 2.6 percent on July 1, 2002, except for
classified staff at the technical colleges.

(c) The University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern
Washington University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen State
College shall provide to instructional and research faculty, exempt
professional staff, academic administrators, academic librarians, counselors,
teaching and research assistants as classified by the office of financial
management, and all other nonclassified staff, including those employees under
RCW 28B.16.015, an average salary increase of 3.0 percent on July 1, 2001, and
an average salary increase of 2.6 percent on July 1, 2002.

(i) The community and
technical colleges shall provide to exempt professional staff and academic
administrators an average salary increase of 3.0 percent on July 1, 2001, and
an average salary increase of 2.6 percent on July 1, 2002.

(ii) The community and
technical colleges shall provide to academic employees and the technical
colleges shall provide to classified employees under chapter 41.56 RCW an
average salary increase of 3.7 percent on July 1, 2001, and an average salary
increase of 2.6 percent on July 1, 2002. For these employees, it is the intent
of the legislature that the average salary increase for July 1, 2002, will be
adjusted to reflect the actual calendar year 2001 Seattle consumer price index
as required by chapter 4, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 732).

(d) For employees under
the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW, distribution of the salary increases
will be in accordance with the applicable collective bargaining agreement.
However, an increase shall not be provided to any classified employee whose
salary is above the approved salary range maximum for the class to which the
employee's position is allocated.

(e) The University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern
Washington University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen State
College may provide from the higher education operating fees account an
additional salary increase up to twenty million dollars for competitively
offered recruitment and retention salary adjustments for faculty, and all other
nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015. Any
salary increase granted under the authority of this subsection (2)(e) shall not
be included in an institution's salary base. The University of Washington,
Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern Washington
University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen State College
shall provide a report in their 2003-2005 biennial operating budget request submittals
on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes of this section. It is
the intent of the legislature that general fund--state support for an
institution shall not increase during the current or any future biennium as a
result of any salary increases authorized under this subsection (2)(e).

(f) To collect
consistent data for use by the legislature, the office of financial management,
and other state agencies for policy and planning purposes, institutions of
higher education shall report personnel data to be used in the department of
personnel's human resource data warehouse in compliance with uniform reporting
procedures established by the department of personnel.

(g) Specific salary
increases authorized in section 603 of this act are in addition to any salary
increase provided in this subsection.

(3) The tuition fees,
as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW, charged to full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 academic years,
other than the summer term, may be adjusted by the governing boards of the
state universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the
state board for community and technical colleges as provided in this
subsection.

(a) For the 2001-02
academic year, the governing boards and the state board may implement an
increase no greater than six and nine-tenths percent over tuition fees charged
to full-time students for the 2000-01 academic year.

(b) For the 2002-03
academic year, the governing boards and the state board may implement an
increase no greater than five and nine-tenths percent over the tuition fees
charged to full-time students for the 2001-02 academic year.

(c) For the 2001-02
academic year, the governing boards may implement an increase for law and
graduate business programs no greater than twelve percent over tuition fees
charged to graduate law and graduate business students for the 2000-01 academic
year.

(d) For the 2002-03
academic year, the governing boards may implement an increase for law and
graduate business programs no greater than twelve percent over tuition fees
charged to graduate law and graduate business students for the 2001-02 academic
year.

(e) For the 2001-02 and
the 2002-03 academic years, the state board for community and technical
colleges may increase fees differentially based on student credit hour load,
but the percentage increase for students taking fifteen or fewer credits shall
not exceed the limits in subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section.

(f) For the 2001-02 biennium,
the governing boards and the state board may adjust full-time operating fees
for factors that may include time of day and day of week, as well as delivery
method and campus, to encourage full use of the state's educational facilities
and resources.

(g) The tuition
increases adopted under (a), (b), (e), and (f) of this subsection need not
apply uniformly across student categories as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW so
long as the increase for each student category does not exceed the percentages
specified in this subsection.

(4) Pursuant to RCW
43.15.055, institutions of higher education receiving appropriations under
sections 603 through 609 of this act are authorized to increase summer term
tuition in excess of the fiscal growth factor during the 2001-03 biennium.
Tuition levels increased pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed the per
credit hour rate calculated from the academic year tuition levels adopted under
this act.

(5) Community colleges
may increase services and activities fee charges in excess of the fiscal growth
factor up to the maximum level authorized by the state board for community and
technical colleges.

(6) Each institution
receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of this act shall
submit a biennial plan to achieve measurable and specific improvements each
academic year as part of a continuing effort to make meaningful and substantial
progress towards the achievement of long-term performance goals. The plans, to
be prepared at the direction of the higher education coordinating board, shall
be submitted by August 15, 2001. The higher education coordinating board shall
set biennial performance targets for each institution and shall review actual
achievements annually. Institutions shall track their actual performance on
the state-wide measures as well as faculty productivity, the goals and targets
for which may be unique to each institution. A report on progress towards
state-wide and institution-specific goals, with recommendations for the ensuing
biennium, shall be submitted to the fiscal and higher education committees of
the legislature by November 15, 2003.

(7) The state board for
community and technical colleges shall develop a biennial plan to achieve
measurable and specific improvements each academic year as part of a continuing
effort to make meaningful and substantial progress to achieve long-term
performance goals. The board shall set biennial performance targets for each
college or district, where appropriate, and shall review actual achievements annually.
Colleges shall track their actual performance on the state-wide measures. A
report on progress towards the state-wide goals, with recommendations for the
ensuing biennium, shall be submitted to the fiscal and higher education
committees of the legislature by November 15, 2003.

(8) Institutions
receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act shall
provide enrollment data for students engaged in distance learning to the office
of financial management as part of the distance learning enrollment information
project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
602. The appropriations in
sections 603 through 609 of this act provide state general fund support for
full-time equivalent student enrollments at each institution of higher
education. Listed below are the annual full-time equivalent student
enrollments by institutions assumed in this act.

2001-2002 2002-2003

Annual Annual

Average Average

University of Washington

Main campus 32,321 32,427

Bothell branch 1,169 1,235

Tacoma branch 1,330 1,484

Washington State University

Main campus 17,332 17,493

Spokane branch 551 593

Tri-Cities branch 616 616

Vancouver branch 1,071 1,153

Central Washington
University 7,470 7,470

Eastern Washington
University 7,908 7,992

The Evergreen State College 3,754 3,837

Western Washington
University 10,877 10,984

State Board for Community
and

Technical Colleges 125,012 126,762

Higher Education
Coordinating

Board 0 250

When allocating newly
budgeted enrollments, each institution of higher education shall give priority
to high demand fields, including but not limited to technology, health
professions, and education. At the end of each fiscal year, each institution
of higher education and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall submit a report to the higher education coordinating board detailing how
newly budgeted enrollments have been allocated.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
603. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 513,507,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 544,924,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,404,000

Education Savings Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,074,335,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The technical
colleges may increase tuition and fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor to
conform with the percentage increase in community college operating fees.

(2) $1,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $3,500,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for salary and related benefit increases to part-time faculty. The
state board shall report by December 1 of each fiscal year to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal and higher education committees
on the distribution of these funds and the resulting wage adjustments for
part-time faculty.

(3) $1,432,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,868,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for faculty salary increments and associated benefits and may be used in
combination with salary and benefit savings from faculty turnover to provide
faculty salary increments and associated benefits. To the extent general
salary increase funding is used to pay faculty increments, the general salary
increase shall be reduced by the same amount.

(4) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
for a program to fund the start-up of new community and technical college
programs in rural counties as defined under RCW 43.160.020(12) and in
communities impacted by business closures and job reductions. Successful
proposals must respond to local economic development strategies and must
include a plan to continue programs developed with this funding.

(5) $1,000,000 of the general
fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for a grant program to fund expansion of information technology
and other high demand programs at Washington community and technical colleges.
Successful proposals shall include a match of private sector cash, in-kind
contributions, or donations up to the grant amount, unless otherwise approved
by the state board for community and technical colleges.

(6) $212,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $212,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for allocation to Olympic college. Olympic college shall
contract with accredited baccalaureate institution(s) to bring a program of
upper-division courses to Bremerton. Funds provided are sufficient to support
at least 30 additional annual full-time equivalent students. The state board
for community and technical colleges shall provide a report to the office of
financial management and to the fiscal and higher education committees of the
legislature on implementation of this subsection by December 1 of each fiscal
year.

(7) The entire
education savings account appropriation is provided solely for the development
of a multicollege student-centered online service center for distance learners,
including self-service internet applications and staff support 24 hours per
day.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
604. FOR UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 343,618,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 359,108,000

Education Savings Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 700,000

Death Investigations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 259,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 6,207,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... 6,258,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 716,150,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) It is the intent of
the legislature that at least ninety-nine of the full-time equivalent
enrollments allocated to the university's Tacoma branch campus for the 2002-03
academic year may be used to establish the technology institute.

(2) The university may
reallocate 10 percent of newly budgeted enrollments to campuses other than as
specified by the legislature in section 602 of this act in order to focus on high
demand areas. The university shall report the details of these reallocations
to the office of financial management and the fiscal and higher education
committees of the legislature for monitoring purposes at the end of each
academic year. The report shall provide details of undergraduate and graduate
enrollments at the main campus and each of the branch campuses.

(3) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation, and $700,000 of the education savings
account‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
research faculty clusters in the advanced technology initiative program.

(4) The department of
environmental health shall report to the legislature the historical, current,
and anticipated use of funds provided from the accident and medical aid
accounts. The report shall be submitted prior to the convening of the 2002
legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
605. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 200,453,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 209,857,000

Education Savings Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 700,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION.... ............ $ 411,010,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university may
reallocate 10 percent of newly budgeted enrollments to campuses other than
specified by the legislature in section 602 of this act in order to focus on
high demand areas. The university will report the details of these
reallocations to the office of financial management and the fiscal and higher
education committees of the legislature for monitoring purposes at the end of each
academic year. The report will provide details of undergraduate and graduate
enrollments at the main campus and each of the branch campuses.

(2) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation, and $700,000 of the education savings
account‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
research faculty clusters in the advanced technology initiative program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
606. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 45,310,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 47,330,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 92,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
607. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 44,392,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 45,034,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 89,426,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $500,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are provided solely for the development and implementation of the university's
stabilization plan. The university shall report back to the fiscal committees
of the legislature, the office of financial management, and the higher
education coordinating board at the end of each fiscal year with details of its
stabilization plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
608. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 25,104,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 26,222,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 51,326,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $33,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $11,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct the
evaluation of the alternative routes to teacher certification partnership grant
program as required by Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5695
(alternative routes to teacher certification). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $60,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the Washington state institute for public policy to examine options for
revising the state's funding formula for the learning assistance program to
enhance accountability for school performance in meeting education reform
goals. The institute shall submit its report to the legislature by June 30,
2002.

(3) $90,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $90,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely
for the institute for public policy to examine school districts' use of student
achievement fund allocations and the impacts of the funds. The institute shall
submit interim reports to the house of representatives and senate education and
fiscal committees by January 15, 2002, and January 15, 2003, and a final report
by September 30, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
609. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 59,343,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 62,287,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 121,630,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $665,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$771,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are provided solely for the operations of the North Snohomish, Island, Skagit
(NSIS) higher education consortium.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
610. FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD‑-POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,685,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 4,768,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 636,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 8,089,000

The appropriations in
this section are provided to carry out the accountability, performance
measurement, policy coordination, planning, studies and administrative
functions of the board and are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1) The board shall
review, recommend changes if necessary, and approve plans required by section
601(6) of this act for achieving measurable and specific improvements in
academic years 2001-02 and 2002-03.

(2)(a) $2,200,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is
provided solely to contract for 250 full-time equivalent undergraduate students
to be competitively awarded for programs in the health professions, education,
and other high demand fields.

(b) The higher
education coordinating board shall report to the office of financial management
and the legislative fiscal and higher education committees on the results of
the awards.

(3) $600,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the higher education coordinating board fund for innovation and quality
under RCW 28B.120.040.

(4) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to continue the teacher training pilot program pursuant to chapter 177,
Laws of 1999.

(5) $125,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $125,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for a demonstration project to improve rural access to post-secondary
education by bringing distance learning technologies into Jefferson county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
611. FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD‑-FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 120,695,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 124,477,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 7,511,000

Advanced College Tuition
Payment Program Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 3,604,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 256,287,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $534,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $529,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the displaced homemakers program.

(2) $220,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $225,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the western interstate commission for higher education.

(3) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the health professional conditional scholarship and loan program
under chapter 28B.115 RCW. This amount shall be deposited to the health
professional loan repayment and scholarship trust fund to carry out the
purposes of the program.

(4) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for higher education student child care matching grants under chapter
28B.135 RCW.

(5) $122,042,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $117,472,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for student financial aid, including all administrative costs.
Of these amounts:

(a) $83,726,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $88,402,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the state need grant program. After April 1 of each fiscal year, up
to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state need grant program may
be transferred to the state work study program;

(b) $16,340,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $17,360,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the state work study program. After April 1 of each fiscal year, up
to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state work study program may
be transferred to the state need grant program;

(c) $2,920,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,920,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for educational opportunity grants. The board may deposit sufficient
funds from its appropriation into the state education trust fund as established
in RCW 28B.10.821 to provide a one-year renewal of the grant for each new
recipient of the educational opportunity grant award. For the purpose of
establishing eligibility for the equal opportunity grant program for placebound
students under RCW 28B.101.020, Thurston county lies within the branch campus
service area of the Tacoma branch campus of the University of Washington;

(d) A maximum of 2.1
percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
2.1 percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
may be expended for financial aid administration, excluding the 4 percent state
work study program administrative allowance provision;

(e) $1,415,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,603,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to implement the Washington scholars program. Any Washington scholars
program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the
board to the Washington award for vocational excellence;

(f) $588,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $589,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to implement Washington award for vocational excellence program. Any
Washington award for vocational program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each
year may be transferred by the board to either the educator's excellence awards
or the Washington scholars program;

(g) $121,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $381,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for community scholarship matching grants of $2,000 each. To be
eligible for the matching grant, a nonprofit community organization organized
under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code must demonstrate that it
has raised $2,000 in new moneys for college scholarships after the effective
date of this act. An organization may receive more than one $2,000 matching
grant and preference shall be given to organizations affiliated with the
citizens' scholarship foundation; and

(h) $10,200,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $11,200,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the Washington promise scholarship program subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(i) Within available
funds, the higher education coordinating board shall award scholarships for use
at accredited institutions of higher education in the state of Washington to as
many students as possible from among those qualifying under (iii) of this
subsection. Each qualifying student shall receive two consecutive annual
installments, the value of each not to exceed the full-time annual resident
tuition rates charged by community colleges.

(ii) The Washington's
promise scholarship account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
The account shall be a discrete nonappropriated account. Other than funds
provided for program administration, the higher education coordinating board
shall deposit in this account all money received for the program. The account
shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds appropriated by the legislature
for these scholarships, private contributions, and receipts from refunds of
tuition and fees.

(iii) Scholarships in
the 2001-03 biennium shall be awarded to students who graduate from high school
or its equivalent whose family income does not exceed one hundred thirty-five
percent of the state's median family income, adjusted for family size, if they
meet any of the following academic criteria:

(A) Students graduating
from public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW must be
in the top fifteen percent of their graduating class, or must equal or exceed a
cumulative scholastic assessment test score of 1200 on their first attempt;

(B) Students
participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW must
equal or exceed a cumulative scholastic assessment test score of 1200 on their
first attempt.

(iv) For students
eligible under (iii) of this subsection, the superintendent of public instruction
shall provide the higher education coordinating board with the names,
addresses, and unique numeric identifiers of students in the top fifteen
percent or who meet the scholastic aptitude test score requirement, as
appropriate in each of the respective high school senior or home based
instruction classes in Washington state. This shall be provided no later than
October 1 of each year.

(v) Scholarships
awarded under this section may only be used at accredited institutions of
higher education in the state of Washington for college-related expenses,
including but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books, materials, and
transportation. The Washington promise scholarship award shall not supplant
other scholarship awards, financial aid, or tax programs related to
postsecondary education. Scholarships may not be transferred or refunded to
students.

(vi) The higher
education coordinating board shall evaluate the impact and effectiveness of the
Washington promise scholarship program. The evaluation shall include, but not
be limited to: (A) An analysis of other financial assistance promise
scholarship recipients are receiving through other federal, state, and
institutional programs, including grants, work study, tuition waivers, and loan
programs; (B) an analysis of whether the implementation of the promise
scholarship program has had an impact on student indebtedness; and (C) an
evaluation of what types of students are successfully completing high school
but do not have the financial ability to attend college because they cannot
obtain financial aid or the financial aid is insufficient. The board shall
report its findings to the governor and the legislature by December 30, 2002.

(vii) The higher
education coordinating board may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
612. FOR THE SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE
RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,200,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,200,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,400,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,200,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,200,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute
(SIRTI).

(2) SIRTI will secure
additional funds from nonstate sources and revenue producing ventures to
provide adequate administrative, operating and program management support and
for future operations of the institute.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
613. FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND
EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,262,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,220,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 44,987,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 47,469,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
614. FOR WASHINGTON STATE LIBRARY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 8,791,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 8,786,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 6,976,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 24,553,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: At least
$2,700,000 shall be expended for a contract with the Seattle public library for
library services for the Washington book and braille library.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
615. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 2,623,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 2,624,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation.................. $.................................. 1,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 6,247,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
616. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 2,899,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 3,129,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 6,028,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $90,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$285,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are provided solely for activities related to the Lewis and Clark Bicentennial.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
617. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 1,508,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 1,389,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 2,897,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
618. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE
BLIND

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 4,520,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 4,585,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation........... $ 1,173,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 10,278,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
619. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE
DEAF

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 7,395,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 7,432,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation........... $ 232,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 15,059,000

(End
of part)

PART
VII

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
701. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT
TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 581,097,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 615,290,000

State Building Construction
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 11,351,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable
Bond Retire Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 2,591,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,210,329,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
general fund appropriations are for deposit into the debt-limit general fund
bond retirement account. The appropriation for fiscal year 2002 shall be
deposited in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by June 30,
2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
702. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL
OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES

State Convention and Trade
Center Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 39,950,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 5,590,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... 5,590,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 51,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
703. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL
OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 24,542,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 26,706,000

Capitol Historic District
Construction

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 454,000

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 815,000

State Higher Education
Construction Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 348,000

State Vehicle Parking
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 35,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable
Bond Retirement Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 128,043,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 180,943,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
general fund appropriation is for deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund
bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
704. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE
EXPENSES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 567,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 568,000

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 77,000

State Higher Education
Construction Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 42,000

State Building Construction
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,488,000

State Vehicle Parking
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,000

Capitol Historic District
Construction

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 130,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
705. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-EMERGENCY FUND

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 850,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 850,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,700,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations in this section are for the governor's emergency fund for the
critically necessary work of any agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
706. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL. The sum of three million dollars, or so much
thereof as may be available on June 30, 2001, from the total amount of unspent
fiscal year 2001 fire contingency funding in the disaster response account and
the moneys appropriated to the disaster response account in section 707 of this
act, is appropriated for the purpose of making allocations to the military
department for fire mobilizations costs or to the department of natural
resources for fire suppression costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
707. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-FIRE CONTINGENCY INITIATIVE.

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,000,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
entire amount is appropriated to the disaster response account for the purposes
specified in section 706 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
708. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL
JUSTICE COSTS

Public Safety and Education‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 975,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
director of financial management shall distribute the appropriation to the
following counties in the amounts designated for extraordinary criminal justice
costs:

Cowlitz.................................... $ 89,000

Franklin................................... $ 303,000

Klickitat.................................. $ 45,000

Skagit..................................... $ 102,000

Spokane.................................... $ 192,000

Thurston................................... $ 122,000

Yakima..................................... $ 121,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
709. BELATED CLAIMS. The agencies and institutions of the state may
expend moneys appropriated in this act, upon approval of the office of
financial management, for the payment of supplies and services furnished to the
agency or institution in prior fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
710. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-DIGITAL GOVERNMENT POOL

Digital Government
Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,000,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The digital
government revolving account appropriation is provided solely to provide
digital services of government to citizens, businesses, and to state and other
governments. The office of financial management, in consultation with the
department of information services, shall allocate these funds as needed for
digital government projects.

(2) To facilitate the
transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the state treasurer is
directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account to
the digital government revolving account, hereby created in the state treasury,
in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management for
digital government projects.

(3) Agencies receiving
these allocations shall report at a minimum to the information services board
and to the office of financial management on the progress of digital government
projects and efforts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
711. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-TECHNOLOGY POOL

Digital Government
Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,000,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The digital
government account appropriation is provided solely for an information
technology funding pool for state executive branch agencies, excluding schools
and institutions of higher education. The department may distribute funding
from the pool for information technology purposes, including infrastructure
improvements, technology required to satisfy federal reporting requirements,
equipment purchase and replacement, web site and internet services, and
software and systems upgrades.

(2) Agencies that wish
to receive these funds may make an application to the department of information
services. The office of financial management, in consultation with the
department of information services and using criteria adopted by the
information services board, shall allocate these funds as needed for digital
government projects.

(3) Allocations from
this section may be made only for items and in proportion to the extent to
which items would be typically funded by the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
712. DEATH BENEFIT‑-COMMON SCHOOLS. For the period from July 1, 2001, through June
30, 2003, a one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid as a
sundry claim to the estate of an employee in the common school system of the
state who is killed in the course of employment. The determination of
eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the
department of labor and industries. The department of labor and industries
shall notify the director of the department of general administration by order
under RCW 51.52.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
713. DEATH BENEFIT‑-STATE AGENCIES. For the period from July 1, 2001, through June
30, 2003, a one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid as a
sundry claim to the estate of an employee of any state agency or higher
education institution not otherwise provided a death benefit through coverage
under their enrolled retirement system. The determination of eligibility for
the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of
labor and industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the
director of the department of general administration by order under RCW
51.52.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
714. FOR THE GOVERNOR‑-COMPENSATION‑-INSURANCE
BENEFITS

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,736,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 18,847,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 8,186,000

General Fund‑‑Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 429,000

Salary and Insurance
Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 18,334,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 52,532,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The monthly
employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees'
benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed
$455.79 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2002, and $494.28 for fiscal year
2003.

(b) Within the rates in
(a) of this subsection, $2.02 per eligible employee shall be included in the
employer funding rate for fiscal year 2002, and $4.10 per eligible employee
shall be included in the employer funding rate for fiscal year 2003, solely to
increase life insurance coverage in accordance with a court approved settlement
in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county superior court
cause no. 94-2-02560-8).

(c) In order to achieve
the level of funding provided for health benefits, the public employees'
benefits board may require employee premium copayments, increase
point-of-service cost sharing, and/or implement managed competition.

(d) The health care
authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical
plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals,
subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior
uniform medical plan claims payments, into the public employees' and retirees'
insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not
be used for administrative expenditures.

(2) To facilitate the
transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the state treasurer is
directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account to
the special fund salary and insurance contribution increase revolving fund in
accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management.

(3) The health care
authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board,
shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or
disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for
parts A and B of medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2002,
through December 31, 2002, the subsidy shall be $83.98. Starting January 1,
2003, the subsidy shall be $100.77 per month.

(4) Technical colleges,
school districts, and educational service districts shall remit to the health
care authority for deposit into the public employees' and retirees' insurance
account established in RCW 41.05.120 the following amounts:

(a) For each full-time
employee, $32.21 per month beginning September 1, 2001, and $37.10 beginning
September 1, 2002;

(b) For each part-time
employee who, at the time of the remittance, is employed in an eligible
position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or 41.40.010 and is eligible for employer
fringe benefit contributions for basic benefits, $32.21 each month beginning
September 1, 2001, and $37.10 beginning September 1, 2002, prorated by the
proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee
that the part-time employee receives.

The remittance
requirements specified in this subsection shall not apply to employees of a
technical college, school district, or educational service district who
purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

(5) The salary and
insurance increase revolving account appropriation includes amounts sufficient
to fund health benefits for ferry workers at the premium levels specified in
subsection (1) of this section, consistent with the 2001-03 transportation
appropriations act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
715. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-CONTRIBUTIONS TO
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis beginning July
1, 2001, consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW as amended by this act, and the
appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on
a quarterly basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.

(1) There is
appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system:

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 15,552,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 16,668,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations include reductions of $3,848,000 general fund‑-state for
fiscal year 2002 and $4,132,000 general fund‑-state for fiscal year 2003,
to reflect savings resulting from the implementation of state pension
contribution rates effective July 1, 2001, as provided in House Bill No. 2236
(public pension systems).

(2) There is
appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,000,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 6,000,000

(3) There is
appropriated for contributions to the judges retirement system:

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 250,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 250,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 44,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
716. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-CONTRIBUTIONS TO
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ (21,652,000)

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ (22,222,000)

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. (11,469,000)

General Fund‑‑Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ (683,000)

Special Account Retirement
Contribution Increase

Revolving Account
Appropriation............. $ (26,102,000)

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ (82,128,000)

The appropriations in
this section are provided solely to reduce agency appropriations to reflect
savings resulting from the implementation of employer pension contribution
rates, effective July 1, 2001, for the public employees' retirement system, and
effective September 1, 2001, for the teachers' retirement system, as provided
in House Bill No. 2236 (public pension systems).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
717. SALARY COST-OF-LIVING
ADJUSTMENT

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 33,830,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 65,131,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 32,628,000

General Fund‑‑Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,999,000

Salary and Insurance
Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 79,668,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 213,256,000

The appropriations in
this section shall be expended solely for the purposes designated in this
section and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) In addition to the
purposes set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, appropriations
in this section are provided solely for a 3.0 percent salary increase effective
July 1, 2001, and a 2.6 percent salary increase effective July 1, 2002, for all
classified employees, except the certificated employees of the state schools
for the deaf and blind, and including those employees in the Washington
management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the
personnel resources board.

(2) The appropriations
in this section are sufficient to fund a 3.0 percent salary increase effective
July 1, 2001, and a 2.6 percent increase effective July 1, 2002, for general
government, legislative, and judicial employees exempt from merit system rules
whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected
officials.

(3) The salary and
insurance increase revolving account appropriation in this section includes
funds sufficient to fund a 3.0 percent salary increase effective July 1, 2001,
and a 2.6 percent salary increase effective July 1, 2002, for ferry workers
consistent with the 2001-03 transportation appropriations act.

(4)(a) No salary
increase may be paid under this section to any person whose salary has been
Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the personnel resources board.

(b) The average salary
increases paid under this section to agency officials whose maximum salaries
are established by the committee on agency official salaries shall not exceed
the average increases provided by subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
718. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY
REVOLVING ACCOUNT

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 11,264,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 11,264,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION........................ $ 22,528,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations
in this section are provided solely for deposit in the education technology
revolving account for the purpose of covering operational and transport costs
incurred by the K-20 educational network program in providing telecommunication
services to network participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
719. FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL‑-SALARY ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 989,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,082,000

Legal Services Revolving
Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,071,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,142,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations are provided solely for increases in salaries and related
benefits of assistant attorneys general effective July 1, 2001, and another
increase effective July 1, 2002. This funding is provided solely for: (1)
Increases in beginning salaries; (2) merit-based increases to recognize
outstanding performance; and (3) increases to address critical recruitment and
retention problems in specialty practice areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
720. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-RECRUITMENT AND
RETENTION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 10,500,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 10,500,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 6,015,000

General Fund‑-Local
Appropriation.............. $ 368,000

Salary and Insurance
Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,617,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 42,000,000

The appropriations in
this section shall be expended solely for the purposes designated in this
section and are subject to the conditions and limitations specified in this
section. The office of financial management, in consultation with the
Washington personnel resources board, shall allocate the appropriations in this
section to state agencies for the purposes of providing compensation increases
to selected positions that are experiencing recruitment and retention
problems. Priority consideration shall be given to those classes providing
direct care, nursing, mental health services, and similar job classes, where
those classes have documented recruitment and retention problems. In
identifying which job classes will be provided funding in this section, the
personnel resources board shall take into account other compensation provided
in this act, including cost-of-living adjustments and salary survey increases.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
721. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-PERSONNEL RESOURCES
BOARD'S SALARY SURVEY FOR STATE AND HIGHER EDUCATION EMPLOYEES

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 4,802,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 4,802,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,680,000

General Fund‑‑Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 164,000

Salary and Insurance
Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,683,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 19,131,000

The appropriations in
this section shall be expended solely for the purposes designated in this
section and are subject to the conditions and limitations in this section.

(1) Sufficient funding
is provided to bring within 10 ranges of market rate, including any
cost-of-living adjustments and associated benefit costs, the salary ranges of
those state and higher education classified and exempt classes under the
Washington personnel resources board whose current base salary is greater than
10 ranges from the approved survey applied salary range as determined under RCW
41.06.160.

(2) Funding is provided
in sufficient amounts to maintain the salary alignment as recommended under RCW
34.12.100 for those exempt employees who are not otherwise authorized any
increase under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Implementation of
the salary adjustments for the various classifications is effective July 1,
2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
722. INCENTIVE SAVINGS‑‑FY 2002. The sum of one hundred million dollars or so
much thereof as may be available on June 30, 2002, from the total amount of
unspent fiscal year 2002 state general fund appropriations is appropriated for
the purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.

(1) Of the total
appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that is attributable to incentive
savings, not to exceed twenty-five million dollars, is appropriated to the
savings incentive account for the purpose of improving the quality, efficiency,
and effectiveness of agency services, and credited to the agency that generated
the savings.

(2) The remainder of
the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five million dollars, is appropriated
to the education savings account.

(3) For purposes of
this section, the total amount of unspent state general fund appropriations
does not include the appropriations made in this section or any amounts
included in across-the-board allotment reductions under RCW 43.88.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
723. INCENTIVE SAVINGS‑-FY 2003. The sum of one hundred million dollars or so
much thereof as may be available on June 30, 2003, from the total amount of
unspent fiscal year 2003 state general fund appropriations is appropriated for
the purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.

(1) Of the total
appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that is attributable to incentive
savings, not to exceed twenty-five million dollars, is appropriated to the
savings incentive account for the purpose of improving the quality, efficiency,
and effectiveness of agency services, and credited to the agency that generated
the savings.

(2) The remainder of
the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five million dollars, is appropriated
to the education savings account.

(3) For purposes of
this section, the total amount of unspent state general fund appropriations
does not include the appropriations made in this section or any amounts
included in across-the-board allotment reductions under RCW 43.88.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
724. PUGET SOUND FERRY
OPERATIONS ACCOUNT

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 20,000,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 10,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 30,000,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations in this section are for appropriation to the Puget Sound ferry
operations account to carry out the purposes of the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
725. LOCAL GOVERNMENT
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE

It is the intent of the
legislature to provide state funding for the 2001-03 biennium for a portion of
local governments' costs for public safety, criminal justice, public health,
and other operations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
726. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-COUNTY CORPORATION
ASSISTANCE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 20,774,562

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 20,774,562

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 41,549,124

The appropriations in
this section are subject to section 725 of this act and to the following
conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The department
shall withhold distributions under subsection (2) of this section to any county
that has not paid its fifty percent share of the employer contribution on
behalf of superior court judges for insurance and health care plans and federal
social security and medicare and medical aid benefits for the fiscal year. As
required by Article IV, section 13 of the state Constitution and 1996 Attorney
General's Opinion No. 2, it is the intent of the legislature that the costs of
these employer contributions shall be shared equally between the state and
county or counties in which the judges serve.

(b) After receiving
written notification from the office of the administrator for the courts that a
county has paid its fifty percent share as required under (a) of this
subsection, the department shall distribute the amount designated for the
fiscal year under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The director of
community, trade, and economic development shall distribute the appropriations
to the following counties in the amounts designated:

2001-03

County FY 2002 FY 2003 Biennium

Adams 285,647 285,647 571,294

Asotin 410,676 410,676 821,352

Benton 936,021 936,021 1,872,042

Chelan 625,506 625,506 1,251,012

Clallam 435,918 435,918 871,836

Clark 302,114 302,114 604,227

Columbia 552,876 552,876 1,105,752

Cowlitz 749,919 749,919 1,499,838

Douglas 483,661 483,661 967,322

Ferry 383,655 383,655 767,310

Franklin 421,679 421,679 843,358

Garfield 562,140 562,140 1,124,280

Grant 556,095 556,095 1,112,190

Grays Harbor 531,649 531,649 1,063,298

Island 464,797 464,797 929,594

Jefferson 230,288 230,288 460,576

King 1,305,948 1,305,948 2,611,895

Kitsap 230,697 230,697 461,394

Kittitas 351,437 351,437 702,874

Klickitat 191,845 191,845 383,690

Lewis 571,225 571,225 1,142,450

Lincoln 279,888 279,888 559,776

Mason 881,661 881,661 1,763,322

Okanogan 539,254 539,254 1,078,508

Pacific 338,529 338,529 677,058

Pend Oreille 275,846 275,846 551,692

Pierce 606,125 606,125 1,212,249

San Juan 39,738 39,738 79,475

Skagit 879,935 879,935 1,759,870

Skamania 170,068 170,068 340,136

Snohomish 488,786 488,786 977,571

Spokane 787,446 787,446 1,574,892

Stevens 789,528 789,528 1,579,056

Thurston 1,005,033 1,005,033 2,010,066

Wahkiakum 499,388 499,388 998,776

Walla Walla 236,345 236,345 472,690

Whatcom 387,277 387,277 774,554

Whitman 131,969 131,969 263,938

Yakima 1,853,955 1,853,955 3,707,910

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS 20,774,562 20,774,562 41,549,123

NEW SECTION. Sec.
727. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
ASSISTANCE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 38,214,091

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 38,214,091

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 76,428,182

The appropriations in
this section are subject to section 725 of this act and the following
conditions and limitations: The director of community, trade, and economic
development shall distribute $38,214,091 of the fiscal year 2002 appropriation
and $38,214,091 of the fiscal year 2003 appropriation to the following cities
and municipalities in the amounts designated:

2001-03

City FY 2002 FY 2003 Biennium

Aberdeen $93,589 $93,589 $187,178

Airway Heights $95,683 $95,683 $191,365

Albion $59,705 $59,705 $119,410

Algona $26,791 $26,791 $53,582

Almira $10,766 $10,766 $21,533

Anacortes $55,325 $55,325 $110,651

Arlington $31,758 $31,758 $63,516

Asotin $49,556 $49,556 $99,112

Auburn $144,304 $144,304 $288,608

Bainbridge Island $252,712 $252,712 $505,424

Battle Ground $101,741 $101,741 $203,481

Beaux Arts $1,392 $1,392 $2,783

Bellevue $393,152 $393,152 $786,305

Bellingham $287,914 $287,914 $575,829

Benton City $95,787 $95,787 $191,574

Bingen $5,150 $5,150 $10,299

Black Diamond $229,228 $229,228 $458,456

Blaine $15,640 $15,640 $31,280

Bonney Lake $136,515 $136,515 $273,029

Bothell $102,953 $102,953 $205,905

Bremerton $166,936 $166,936 $333,871

Brewster $8,775 $8,775 $17,550

Bridgeport $169,394 $169,394 $338,789

Brier $478,810 $478,810 $957,620

Buckley $58,675 $58,675 $117,350

Bucoda $45,473 $45,473 $90,947

Burien $233,097 $233,097 $466,195

Burlington $20,555 $20,555 $41,111

Camas $40,241 $40,241 $80,481

Carbonado $51,107 $51,107 $102,213

Carnation $7,483 $7,483 $14,965

Cashmere $103,889 $103,889 $207,778

Castle Rock $24,584 $24,584 $49,167

Cathlamet $5,137 $5,137 $10,275

Centralia $83,169 $83,169 $166,339

Chehalis $25,951 $25,951 $51,902

Chelan $15,222 $15,222 $30,443

Cheney $270,312 $270,312 $540,624

Chewelah $57,389 $57,389 $114,777

Clarkston $72,163 $72,163 $144,325

Cle Elum $6,780 $6,780 $13,560

Clyde Hill $117,629 $117,629 $235,258

Colfax $64,218 $64,218 $128,436

College Place $473,832 $473,832 $947,664

Colton $23,627 $23,627 $47,254

Colville $18,243 $18,243 $36,487

Conconully $12,308 $12,308 $24,615

Concrete $23,225 $23,225 $46,450

Connell $141,857 $141,857 $283,714

Cosmopolis $12,008 $12,008 $24,016

Coulee City $2,187 $2,187 $4,374

Coulee Dam $52,811 $52,811 $105,622

Coupeville $6,012 $6,012 $12,024

Covington $621,766 $621,766 $1,243,532

Creston $11,098 $11,098 $22,197

Cusick $8,033 $8,033 $16,067

Darrington $51,461 $51,461 $102,921

Davenport $57,061 $57,061 $114,122

Dayton $79,709 $79,709 $159,418

Deer Park $12,526 $12,526 $25,052

Des Moines $1,274,623 $1,274,623 $2,549,246

Dupont $6,082 $6,082 $12,164

Duvall $56,870 $56,870 $113,740

East Wenatchee $23,929 $23,929 $47,858

Eatonville $6,901 $6,901 $13,803

Edgewood $811,589 $811,589 $1,623,179

Edmonds $374,196 $374,196 $748,391

Electric City $78,519 $78,519 $157,037

Ellensburg $63,946 $63,946 $127,892

Elma $72,821 $72,821 $145,643

Elmer City $26,830 $26,830 $53,660

Endicott $25,882 $25,882 $51,764

Entiat $50,090 $50,090 $100,180

Enumclaw $41,350 $41,350 $82,700

Ephrata $49,189 $49,189 $98,379

Everett $371,571 $371,571 $743,142

Everson $58,065 $58,065 $116,129

Fairfield $15,944 $15,944 $31,889

Farmington $10,865 $10,865 $21,730

Federal Way $366,740 $366,740 $733,479

Ferndale $61,229 $61,229 $122,457

Fife $19,058 $19,058 $38,117

Fircrest $332,086 $332,086 $664,171

Forks $95,212 $95,212 $190,425

Friday Harbor $7,343 $7,343 $14,687

Garfield $40,737 $40,737 $81,473

George $16,614 $16,614 $33,229

Gig Harbor $23,711 $23,711 $47,423

Gold Bar $121,078 $121,078 $242,156

Goldendale $40,606 $40,606 $81,211

Grand Coulee $4,528 $4,528 $9,056

Grandview $220,458 $220,458 $440,917

Granger $155,785 $155,785 $311,569

Granite Falls $8,538 $8,538 $17,076

Hamilton $14,996 $14,996 $29,992

Harrah $42,252 $42,252 $84,505

Harrington $15,572 $15,572 $31,144

Hartline $10,253 $10,253 $20,506

Hatton $10,958 $10,958 $21,917

Hoquiam $322,417 $322,417 $644,833

Hunts Point $1,824 $1,824 $3,648

Ilwaco $10,783 $10,783 $21,566

Index $3,596 $3,596 $7,191

Ione $15,107 $15,107 $30,214

Issaquah $37,502 $37,502 $75,003

Kahlotus $18,189 $18,189 $36,378

Kalama $6,156 $6,156 $12,312

Kelso $53,745 $53,745 $107,490

Kenmore $989,456 $989,456 $1,978,911

Kennewick $228,957 $228,957 $457,913

Kent $270,468 $270,468 $540,936

Kettle Falls $55,403 $55,403 $110,806

Kirkland $166,072 $166,072 $332,144

Kittitas $65,428 $65,428 $130,856

Krupp $4,001 $4,001 $8,001

La Center $29,597 $29,597 $59,194

Lacey $111,730 $111,730 $223,459

La Conner $2,863 $2,863 $5,726

La Crosse $17,321 $17,321 $34,643

Lake Forest Park $808,139 $808,139 $1,616,278

Lake Stevens $122,374 $122,374 $244,747

Lakewood $2,541,394 $2,541,394 $5,082,787

Lamont $6,743 $6,743 $13,486

Langley $4,136 $4,136 $8,273

Latah $10,287 $10,287 $20,575

Leavenworth $9,142 $9,142 $18,284

Liberty Lake $25,000 $25,000 $50,000

Lind $1,729 $1,729 $3,459

Long Beach $8,010 $8,010 $16,020

Longview $194,872 $194,872 $389,744

Lyman $15,067 $15,067 $30,134

Lynden $33,319 $33,319 $66,639

Lynnwood $122,684 $122,684 $245,369

Mabton $128,242 $128,242 $256,484

Malden $19,429 $19,429 $38,858

Mansfield $24,070 $24,070 $48,139

Maple Valley $309,151 $309,151 $618,302

Marcus $12,713 $12,713 $25,427

Marysville $79,582 $79,582 $159,164

Mattawa $90,058 $90,058 $180,115

McCleary $90,994 $90,994 $181,988

Medical Lake $98,318 $98,318 $196,636

Medina $10,766 $10,766 $21,533

Mercer Island $314,492 $314,492 $628,984

Mesa $14,478 $14,478 $28,956

Metaline Falls $6,637 $6,637 $13,275

Metaline $12,735 $12,735 $25,470

Mill Creek $150,066 $150,066 $300,131

Millwood $18,548 $18,548 $37,095

Milton $21,863 $21,863 $43,727

Monroe $44,083 $44,083 $88,167

Montesano $49,388 $49,388 $98,776

Morton $4,595 $4,595 $9,190

Moses Lake $82,423 $82,423 $164,845

Mossyrock $14,229 $14,229 $28,457

Mount Vernon $102,008 $102,008 $204,017

Mountlake Terrace $611,622 $611,622 $1,223,243

Moxee $34,785 $34,785 $69,571

Mukilteo $236,055 $236,055 $472,109

Naches $6,258 $6,258 $12,516

Napavine $86,427 $86,427 $172,854

Nespelem $15,853 $15,853 $31,705

Newcastle $250,089 $250,089 $500,178

Newport $10,843 $10,843 $21,686

Nooksack $50,033 $50,033 $100,066

Normandy Park $440,202 $440,202 $880,403

North Bend $15,566 $15,566 $31,131

North Bonneville $26,294 $26,294 $52,587

Northport $21,140 $21,140 $42,280

Oak Harbor $239,215 $239,215 $478,430

Oakesdale $27,954 $27,954 $55,908

Oakville $37,333 $37,333 $74,667

Ocean Shores $53,166 $53,166 $106,333

Odessa $3,682 $3,682 $7,365

Okanogan $9,612 $9,612 $19,224

Olympia $148,857 $148,857 $297,714

Omak $20,371 $20,371 $40,743

Oroville $10,255 $10,255 $20,510

Orting $164,441 $164,441 $328,883

Othello $20,910 $20,910 $41,820

Pacific $59,447 $59,447 $118,893

Palouse $47,358 $47,358 $94,715

Pasco $102,412 $102,412 $204,825

Pateros $24,098 $24,098 $48,196

Pe Ell $49,320 $49,320 $98,640

Pomeroy $45,137 $45,137 $90,274

Port Angeles $97,184 $97,184 $194,368

Port Orchard $32,602 $32,602 $65,203

Port Townsend $36,758 $36,758 $73,517

Poulsbo $23,859 $23,859 $47,718

Prescott $10,620 $10,620 $21,240

Prosser $18,827 $18,827 $37,654

Pullman $502,807 $502,807 $1,005,613

Puyallup $113,799 $113,799 $227,598

Quincy $15,790 $15,790 $31,581

Rainier $100,369 $100,369 $200,738

Raymond $73,367 $73,367 $146,735

Reardan $34,366 $34,366 $68,731

Redmond $161,444 $161,444 $322,889

Renton $176,290 $176,290 $352,580

Republic $21,573 $21,573 $43,146

Richland $362,221 $362,221 $724,442

Ridgefield $47,848 $47,848 $95,696

Ritzville $6,628 $6,628 $13,257

Riverside $24,484 $24,484 $48,967

Rock Island $31,413 $31,413 $62,826

Rockford $16,310 $16,310 $32,620

Rosalia $31,578 $31,578 $63,157

Roslyn $55,531 $55,531 $111,062

Roy $1,282 $1,282 $2,564

Royal City $57,325 $57,325 $114,650

Ruston $43,266 $43,266 $86,531

Sammamish $2,125,290 $2,125,290 $4,250,579

Seatac $99,137 $99,137 $198,275

Seattle $2,392,010 $2,392,010 $4,784,019

Sedro-Woolley $45,015 $45,015 $90,029

Selah $66,177 $66,177 $132,355

Sequim $17,056 $17,056 $34,113

Shelton $45,365 $45,365 $90,730

Shoreline $1,277,219 $1,277,219 $2,554,437

Skykomish $1,105 $1,105 $2,211

Snohomish $31,763 $31,763 $63,526

Snoqualmie $7,190 $7,190 $14,381

Soap Lake $88,393 $88,393 $176,787

South Bend $65,210 $65,210 $130,421

South Cle Elum $42,162 $42,162 $84,325

South Prairie $16,158 $16,158 $32,315

Spangle $1,090 $1,090 $2,179

Spokane $870,807 $870,807 $1,741,614

Sprague $19,720 $19,720 $39,440

Springdale $9,529 $9,529 $19,058

St. John $3,481 $3,481 $6,962

Stanwood $15,856 $15,856 $31,712

Starbuck $8,054 $8,054 $16,108

Steilacoom $245,794 $245,794 $491,588

Stevenson $9,572 $9,572 $19,144

Sultan $54,351 $54,351 $108,702

Sumas $5,914 $5,914 $11,828

Sumner $31,448 $31,448 $62,897

Sunnyside $55,228 $55,228 $110,456

Tacoma $1,080,024 $1,080,024 $2,160,048

Tekoa $42,461 $42,461 $84,922

Tenino $59,185 $59,185 $118,370

Tieton $67,055 $67,055 $134,111

Toledo $6,629 $6,629 $13,258

Tonasket $4,290 $4,290 $8,580

Toppenish $381,400 $381,400 $762,799

Tukwila $56,490 $56,490 $112,980

Tumwater $46,386 $46,386 $92,772

Twisp $3,739 $3,739 $7,477

Union Gap $20,347 $20,347 $40,694

Uniontown $17,032 $17,032 $34,065

University Place $1,700,921 $1,700,921 $3,401,842

Vader $36,579 $36,579 $73,157

Vancouver $965,619 $965,619 $1,931,238

Waitsburg $69,743 $69,743 $139,487

Walla Walla $261,317 $261,317 $522,634

Wapato $198,473 $198,473 $396,947

Warden $90,826 $90,826 $181,653

Washougal $152,239 $152,239 $304,478

Washtucna $18,589 $18,589 $37,177

Waterville $62,677 $62,677 $125,354

Waverly $9,230 $9,230 $18,461

Wenatchee $115,130 $115,130 $230,259

West Richland $421,187 $421,187 $842,373

Westport $10,698 $10,698 $21,395

White Salmon $46,222 $46,222 $92,443

Wilbur $20,308 $20,308 $40,616

Wilkeson $16,135 $16,135 $32,271

Wilson Creek $16,563 $16,563 $33,125

Winlock $30,282 $30,282 $60,565

Winthrop $1,317 $1,317 $2,634

Woodinville $42,039 $42,039 $84,078

Woodland $14,009 $14,009 $28,018

Woodway $10,261 $10,261 $20,521

Yacolt $31,507 $31,507 $63,014

Yakima $380,457 $380,457 $760,915

Yarrow Point $27,624 $27,624 $55,248

Yelm $12,228 $12,228 $24,456

Zillah $86,703 $86,703 $173,407

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS 38,214,091 38,214,091 76,428,182

NEW SECTION. Sec.
728. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH
ASSISTANCE

Health Services Account (FY
2002).............. $ 23,780,499

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation(FY 2003)..... $ 24,490,303

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 48,270,802

The appropriations in
this section are subject to section 725 of this act and to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of the department of community, trade,
and economic development shall distribute the appropriations to the following
counties and health districts in the amounts designated:

2001-03

Health District FY 2002 FY 2003 Biennium

Adams County Health District 30,824 31,428 62,252

Asotin County Health District 65,375 70,818 136,193

Benton-Franklin Health District 1,147,987 1,196,390 2,344,377

Chelan-Douglas Health District 176,979 194,628 371,607

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department 140,557 144,547 285,104

Southwest Washington Health District 1,067,962 1,113,221 2,181,183

Columbia County Health District 40,362 41,153 81,515

Cowlitz County Health Department 273,147 287,116 560,263

Garfield County Health District 14,966 15,259 30,225

Grant County Health District 111,767 126,762 238,529

Grays Harbor Health Department 183,113 186,702 369,815

Island County Health Department 86,600 98,221 184,821

Jefferson County Health and Human Services 82,856 89,676 172,532

Seattle-King County Department of Public Health 9,489,273 9,681,772 19,171,045

Bremerton-Kitsap County Health District 551,913 563,683 1,115,596

Kittitas County Health Department 87,822 98,219 186,041

Klickitat County Health Department 57,872 67,636 125,508

Lewis County Health Department 103,978 108,817 212,795

Lincoln County Health Department 26,821 32,924 59,745

Mason County Department of Health Services 91,638 101,422 193,060

Okanogan County Health District 62,844 64,788 127,632

Pacific County Health Department 77,108 78,619 155,727

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department 2,802,613 2,870,392 5,673,005

San Juan County Health and Community Services 35,211 40,274 75,485

Skagit County Health Department 215,464 234,917 450,381

Snohomish Health District 2,238,523 2,303,371 4,541,894

Spokane County Health District 2,091,092 2,135,477 4,226,569

Northeast Tri-County Health District 106,019 116,135 222,154

Thurston County Health Department 593,358 614,255 1,207,613

Wahkiakum County Health Department 13,715 13,984 27,699

Walla Walla County-City Health Department 170,852 175,213 346,065

Whatcom County Health Department 846,015 875,369 1,721,384

Whitman County Health Department 78,081 80,274 158,355

Yakima Health District 617,792 636,841 1,254,633

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS $23,780,499 $24,490,303 $48,270,802

NEW SECTION. Sec.
729. FOR THE LIABILITY ACCOUNT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 34,628,000

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for deposit in the liability
account.

(End
of part)

PART
VIII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND
APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
801. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation
for fire insurance

premium distributions...................... $ 6,528,600

General Fund Appropriation
for public utility

district excise tax
distributions.......... $ 36,427,306

General Fund Appropriation
for prosecuting

attorney distributions..................... $ 3,090,000

General Fund Appropriation
for boating safety/

education and law
enforcement

distributions.............................. $ 3,780,000

General Fund Appropriation
for other tax

distributions.............................. $ 39,566

Death Investigations
Account Appropriation for

distribution to counties
for publicly

funded autopsies........................... $ 1,587,537

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account Appropriation

for harbor improvement
revenue

distribution............................... $ 147,500

Timber Tax Distribution
Account Appropriation for

distribution to
"timber" counties.......... $ 68,562,000

County Criminal Justice
Assistance

Appropriation.............................. $ 49,835,213

Municipal Criminal Justice
Assistance

Appropriation.............................. $ 19,988,097

Liquor Excise Tax Account
Appropriation for

liquor excise tax
distribution............. $ 28,659,331

Liquor Revolving Account
Appropriation for

liquor profits
distribution................ $ 55,344,817

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 273,989,967

The total expenditures
from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not
exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
802. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑‑FOR
THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE
ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety
Account Appropriation... $........................................... 1,843,260

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the
2001-03 biennium in accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to
counties for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred
prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210,
Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI
penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of
1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties);
and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
803. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑‑FOR
THE MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL
JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety
Account Appropriation... $........................................... 1,228,840

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the
2001-03 biennium to all cities ratably based on population as last determined
by the office of financial management. The distributions to any city that
substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990,
and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases
under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the
city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the costs of
implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to:
Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209,
Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition
interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of
1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
804. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-FEDERAL REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation
for federal grazing

fees distribution.......................... $ 2,050,334

General Fund Appropriation
for federal flood

control funds
distribution.................. $ 26,524

Forest Reserve Fund
Appropriation for federal

forest reserve fund
distribution........... $ 47,689,181

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 49,766,039

The total expenditures
from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not
exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
805. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

Public Facilities
Construction Loan and

Grant Revolving
Account: For transfer

to the data processing
revolving account

on or before December
31, 2001............. $ 1,418,456

Financial Services
Regulation Fund: To be

transferred from the
financial services

regulation fund to the
digital government

revolving account
during the period between

July 1, 2001, and
December 31, 2001. If

House Bill No. 1211
(financial services

regulation fund) is not
enacted by July

1, 2001, this amount
shall be transferred

from the securities
regulation fund to the

digital government
revolving account during

the period between July
1, 2001, and December

31, 2001................................... $ 2,000,000

Local Toxics Control
Account: For transfer

to the state toxics
control account.

Transferred funds will
be utilized

for methamphetamine lab
cleanup, to

address areawide soil
contamination

problems, storm water,
agricultural

pesticides strategy,
Puget Sound

action team, and clean
up contaminated

sites as part of the
clean sites

initiative................................. $ 6,845,000

General Fund: For transfer
to the flood

control assistance
account.................. $ 4,000,000

Water Quality Account: For
transfer to the

water pollution control
account. Transfers

shall be made at
intervals coinciding with

deposits of federal
capitalization grant

money into the
account. The amounts

transferred shall not
exceed the match

required for each
federal deposit.......... $ 12,600,000

State Treasurer's Service
Account: For

transfer to the digital
government revolving

account on or before
June 30, 2003, an amount

in excess of the cash
requirements of the state

treasurer's service
account................ $ 8,000,000

Public Works Assistance
Account: For

transfer to the
drinking water

assistance account......................... $ 7,700,000

Tobacco Settlement
Account: For transfer

to the health services
account, in an

amount not to exceed
the actual balance

of the tobacco
settlement account.......... $ 310,000,000

General Fund: For transfer
to the water quality

account.................................... $ 60,326,000

Health Services Account:
For transfer to the

general fund‑‑state
during the period

between June 1, 2002,
and June 30

2002....................................... $ 103,000,000

Health Services Account:
For transfer to the

general fund‑‑state
during fiscal

year 2003.................................. $ 24,000,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement

Account: For transfer
to the general

fund‑‑state
during fiscal year 2002........ $ 4,101,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement

Account: For transfer
to the general

fund‑‑state
during fiscal year 2003........ $ 4,101,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
806. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-TRANSFERS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation: For

transfer to the
department of retirement

systems expense
account: For the

administrative expenses
of the judicial

retirement
system.......................... $ 26,605

(End
of part)

PART
IX

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
901. EXPENDITURE
AUTHORIZATIONS. The
appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure authorizations.
Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the treasury on the basis of a
formal loan agreement shall be recorded as loans receivable and not as
expenditures for accounting purposes. To the extent that moneys are disbursed
on a loan basis, the corresponding appropriation shall be reduced by the amount
of loan moneys disbursed from the treasury during the 1999-01 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
902. INFORMATION SYSTEMS
PROJECTS. Agencies shall comply
with the following requirements regarding information systems projects when
specifically directed to do so by this act.

(1) Agency planning and
decisions concerning information technology shall be made in the context of its
information technology portfolio. "Information technology portfolio"
means a strategic management approach in which the relationships between agency
missions and information technology investments can be seen and understood,
such that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and business
functions are assessed and understood before implementation; and agency
activities are consistent with the development of an integrated, nonduplicative
statewide infrastructure.

(2) Agencies shall use
their information technology portfolios in making decisions on matters related
to the following:

(a) System
refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;

(b) Setting goals and
objectives for using information technology in meeting legislatively-mandated
missions and business needs;

(c) Assessment of
overall information processing performance, resources, and capabilities;

(d) Ensuring
appropriate transfer of technological expertise for the operation of any new
systems developed using external resources; and

(e) Progress toward
enabling electronic access to public information.

(3) Each project will
be planned and designed to take optimal advantage of Internet technologies and
protocols. Agencies shall ensure that the project is in compliance with the
architecture, infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.

(4) The agency shall
produce a feasibility study for information technology projects at the
direction of the information services board and in accordance with published
department of information services policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such
studies shall include a statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change;
(b) the business value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation
of benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment based on
the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state operations, its
visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d) the impact on agency and
statewide information infrastructure; and (e) the impact of the proposed
enhancements to an agency's information technology capabilities on meeting
service delivery demands.

(5) The agency shall
produce a comprehensive management plan for each project. The plan or plans
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of each project.
The plan(s) shall include, but is not limited to, the following elements: A
description of the problem or opportunity that the information technology
project is intended to address; a statement of project objectives and
assumptions; a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for the
phased approach shall be such that the business case justification for a
project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or adds measurable
value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business functions within each
development cycle.

(6) The agency shall
produce quality assurance plans for information technology projects.
Consistent with the direction of the information services board and the
published policies and guidelines of the department of information services,
the quality assurance plan shall address all factors critical to successful
completion of the project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance plans
shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project progress can be
measured, a specification of quality assurance responsibilities, and a
statement of reporting requirements. The quality assurance plans shall set out
the functionality requirements for each phase of a project.

(7) A copy of each
feasibility study, project management plan, and quality assurance plan shall be
provided to the department of information services, the office of financial
management, and legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall
demonstrate a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer
funds on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system on
the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined use of
preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of private-sector
expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for individual information
systems projects is conditioned on the approval of the relevant feasibility
study, project management plan, and quality assurance plan by the department of
information services and the office of financial management.

(8) Quality assurance
status reports shall be submitted to the department of information services,
the office of financial management, and legislative fiscal committees at
intervals specified in the project's quality assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
903. VIDEO
TELECOMMUNICATIONS. The
department of information services shall act as lead agency in coordinating
video telecommunications services for state agencies. As lead agency, the
department shall develop standards and common specifications for leased and
purchased telecommunications equipment and assist state agencies in developing
a video telecommunications expenditure plan. No agency may spend any portion
of any appropriation in this act for new video telecommunication equipment, new
video telecommunication transmission, or new video telecommunication
programming, or for expanding current video telecommunication systems without
first complying with chapter 43.105 RCW, including but not limited to, RCW 43.105.041(2),
and without first submitting a video telecommunications expenditure plan, in
accordance with the policies of the department of information services, for
review and assessment by the department of information services under RCW
43.105.052. Prior to any such expenditure by a public school, a video
telecommunications expenditure plan shall be approved by the superintendent of
public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall submit the plans to the department of information services in a form
prescribed by the department. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications in public
schools by providing educational information to local school districts and shall
assist local school districts and educational service districts in
telecommunications planning and curriculum development. Prior to any such
expenditure by a public institution of postsecondary education, a
telecommunications expenditure plan shall be approved by the higher education
coordinating board. The higher education coordinating board shall coordinate
the use of video telecommunications for instruction and instructional support
in postsecondary education, including the review and approval of instructional
telecommunications course offerings.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
904. PROGRAM COST SHIFTS. Any program costs or moneys in this act that
are shifted to the general fund from another fund or account require an
adjustment to the expenditure limit under RCW 43.135.035(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
905. EMERGENCY FUND
ALLOCATIONS. Whenever
allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund appropriation to an
agency that is financed in whole or in part by other than general fund moneys,
the director of financial management may direct the repayment of such allocated
amount to the general fund from any balance in the fund or funds which finance
the agency. No appropriation shall be necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
906. STATUTORY
APPROPRIATIONS. In addition to
the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues for distribution, state
contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 2, and bond retirement and interest including ongoing bond
registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on registered warrants,
and certificates of indebtedness, there is also appropriated such further
amounts as may be required or available for these purposes under any statutory
formula or under chapters 39.94 and 39.96 RCW or any proper bond covenant made
under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
907. BOND EXPENSES. In addition to such other appropriations as are
made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to the state finance committee
from legally available bond proceeds in the applicable construction or building
funds and accounts such amounts as are necessary to pay the expenses incurred
in the issuance and sale of the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
908. VOLUNTARY SEPARATION
INCENTIVES. As a management
tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of resources, while improving
employee productivity and morale, agencies may offer voluntary separation
and/or downshifting incentives and options according to procedures and
guidelines established by the department of personnel and the department of
retirement systems in consultation with the office of financial management.
The options may include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for:
Voluntary resignation and retirement, voluntary leave-without-pay, voluntary
workweek or work hour reduction, voluntary downward movement, or temporary
separation for development purposes. No employee shall have a contractual
right to a financial incentive offered pursuant to this section.

Agencies shall report
on the outcomes of their plans, and offers shall be reviewed and monitored
jointly by the department of personnel, the department of retirement systems,
and the office of human resources for reporting to the office of financial
management by December 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
909. VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT
INCENTIVES. It is the intent of
the legislature that agencies may implement a voluntary retirement incentive
program that is cost neutral or results in cost savings provided that such a
program is approved by the directors of retirement systems, the office of human
resources, and the office of financial management. Agencies participating in
this authorization are required to submit a report by June 30, 2003, to the
legislature and the office of financial management on the outcome of their
approved retirement incentive program. The report should include information
on the details of the program including resulting service delivery changes,
agency efficiencies, the cost of the retirement incentive per participant, the
total cost to the state, and the projected or actual net dollar savings over
the 2001-03 biennium.

Sec. 910. RCW 43.08.250 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 911 are each amended to read as follows:

The money received by
the state treasurer from fees, fines, forfeitures, penalties, reimbursements or
assessments by any court organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, or chapter 2.08
RCW, shall be deposited in the public safety and education account which is
hereby created in the state treasury. The legislature shall appropriate the
funds in the account to promote traffic safety education, highway safety,
criminal justice training, crime victims' compensation, judicial education, the
judicial information system, civil representation of indigent persons, winter
recreation parking, drug court operations, and state game programs.
During the fiscal biennium ending June 30, ((2001)) 2003, the
legislature may appropriate moneys from the public safety and education account
for purposes of appellate indigent defense and other operations of the office
of public defense, the criminal litigation unit of the attorney general's
office, the treatment alternatives to street crimes program, crime victims
advocacy programs, justice information network telecommunication planning, treatment
for supplemental security income clients, sexual assault treatment,
operations of the office of administrator for the courts, security in the
common schools, alternative school start-up grants, programs for disruptive
students, criminal justice data collection, Washington state patrol criminal
justice activities, ((drug court operations, department of ecology methamphetamine-related
activities,)) unified family courts, local court backlog assistance,
financial assistance to local jurisdictions for extraordinary costs incurred in
the adjudication of criminal cases, domestic violence treatment and related
services, the department of corrections' costs in implementing chapter 196,
Laws of 1999, reimbursement of local governments for costs associated with
implementing criminal and civil justice legislation, ((and)) the
replacement of the department of corrections' offender-based tracking system,
and methamphetamine-related enforcement, education, training, and drug and
alcohol treatment activities.

Sec. 911. RCW 43.72.902 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 913 are each amended to read as follows:

The public health
services account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account may be expended only
for maintaining and improving the health of Washington residents through the
public health system. For purposes of this section, the public health system
shall consist of the state board of health, the state department of health, and
local health departments and districts. During the ((1999-2001)) 2001-2003
biennium, moneys in the fund may also be used for costs associated with
hepatitis C testing and treatment in correctional facilities.

Sec. 912. RCW 43.79.465 and 1998 c
302 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The education savings
account is created in the state treasury. The account shall consist of all
moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature.

(1) Ten percent of
legislative appropriations to the education savings account shall be
distributed as follows: (a) Fifty percent to the distinguished professorship
trust fund under RCW 28B.10.868; (b) seventeen percent to the graduate
fellowship trust fund under RCW 28B.10.882; and (c) thirty-three percent to the
college faculty awards trust fund under RCW 28B.50.837.

(2) The remaining
moneys in the education savings account may be appropriated solely for (a)
common school construction projects that are eligible for funding from the
common school construction account, ((and)) (b) technology improvements
in the common schools, and (c) during the 2001-03 fiscal biennium,
technology improvements in public higher education institutions.

Sec. 913. RCW 43.320.110 and 2001
c ... (HB 1211) s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created a
local fund known as the "financial services regulation fund" which
shall consist of all moneys received by the divisions of the department of
financial institutions, except for the division of securities which shall
deposit thirteen percent of all moneys received, and which shall be used for
the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the payment of salaries,
wages, and utilities; the establishment of reserves; and other incidental costs
required for the proper regulation of individuals and entities subject to
regulation by the department. The state treasurer shall be the custodian of
the fund. Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the
director of financial institutions or the director's designee. In order to
maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.

Between July 1,
2001, and December 31, 2001, the treasurer may transfer up to two million
dollars from the financial services regulation fund to the digital government
revolving account.

Sec. 914. RCW 46.10.040 and 1997 c
241 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Application for
registration shall be made to the department in the manner and upon forms the
department prescribes, and shall state the name and address of each owner of
the snowmobile to be registered, and shall be signed by at least one such
owner, and shall be accompanied by an annual registration fee to be established
by the commission, after consultation with the committee and any state-wide
snowmobile user groups. ((The fee shall be fifteen dollars pending action by
the commission to increase the fee.)) The commission shall increase the current
fee of twenty dollars by ((two)) five dollars ((and
fifty cents)) effective September 30, ((1996)) 2001, and the
commission shall increase the fee by another ((two)) five dollars
((and fifty cents)) effective September 30, ((1997)) 2002.
After the fee increase effective September 30, ((1997)) 2002, the
commission shall not increase the fee. Upon receipt of the application and the
application fee, the snowmobile shall be registered and a registration number
assigned, which shall be affixed to the snowmobile in a manner provided in RCW
46.10.070.

The registration
provided in this section shall be valid for a period of one year. At the end
of the period of registration, every owner of a snowmobile in this state shall
renew his or her registration in the manner the department prescribes, for an
additional period of one year, upon payment of the annual registration fee as
determined by the commission.

Any person acquiring a
snowmobile already validly registered under the provisions of this chapter
must, within ten days of the acquisition or purchase of the snowmobile, make
application to the department for transfer of the registration, and the
application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of one dollar and
twenty-five cents.

A snowmobile owned by a
resident of another state or Canadian province where registration is not
required by law may be issued a nonresident registration permit valid for not
more than sixty days. Application for the permit shall state the name and
address of each owner of the snowmobile to be registered and shall be signed by
at least one owner and shall be accompanied by a registration fee of five
dollars. The registration permit shall be carried on the vehicle at all times
during its operation in this state.

The registration fees
provided in this section shall be in lieu of any personal property or excise
tax heretofore imposed on snowmobiles by this state or any political
subdivision thereof, and no city, county, or other municipality, and no state
agency shall hereafter impose any other registration or license fee on any
snowmobile in this state.

The department shall
make available a pair of uniform decals consistent with the provisions of RCW
46.10.070. In addition to the registration fee provided in this section the
department shall charge each applicant for registration the actual cost of the
decal. The department shall make available replacement decals for a fee
equivalent to the actual cost of the decals.

Sec. 915. RCW 49.70.170 and 1999 c
309 s 917 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The worker and
community right to know fund is hereby established in the custody of the state
treasurer. The department shall deposit all moneys received under this chapter
in the fund. Moneys in the fund may be spent only for the purposes of this chapter
following legislative appropriation. Disbursements from the fund shall be on
authorization of the director or the director's designee. During the ((1999-2001))
2001-2003 fiscal biennium, moneys in the fund may also be used by the
military department for the purpose of assisting the state emergency response
commission and coordinating local emergency planning activities. The fund is
subject to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW.

(2) The department
shall assess each employer who reported ten thousand four hundred or more
worker hours in the prior calendar year an annual fee to provide for the
implementation of this chapter. The department shall promulgate rules
establishing a fee schedule for all employers who reported ten thousand four
hundred or more worker hours in the prior calendar year and are engaged in
business operations having a standard industrial classification, as designated
in the standard industrial classification manual prepared by the federal office
of management and budget, within major group numbers 01 through 08 (agriculture
and forestry industries), numbers 10 through 14 (mining industries), numbers 15
through 17 (construction industries), numbers 20 through 39 (manufacturing
industries), numbers 41, 42, and 44 through 49 (transportation, communications,
electric, gas, and sanitary services), number 75 (automotive repair, services,
and garages), number 76 (miscellaneous repair services), number 80 (health
services), and number 82 (educational services). The department shall
establish the annual fee for each employer who reported ten thousand four
hundred or more worker hours in the prior calendar year in industries
identified by this section, provided that fees assessed shall not be more than
two dollars and fifty cents per full time equivalent employee. The annual fee
shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars. The fees shall be collected solely
from employers whose industries have been identified by rule under this
chapter. The department shall promulgate rules allowing employers who do not
have hazardous substances at their workplace to request an exemption from the
assessment and shall establish penalties for fraudulent exemption requests.
All fees collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be
collected in a cost-efficient manner and shall be deposited in the fund.

(3) Records required by
this chapter shall at all times be open to the inspection of the director, or
his designee including, the traveling auditors, agents or assistants of the department
provided for in RCW 51.16.070 and 51.48.040. The information obtained from
employer records under the provisions of this section shall be subject to the
same confidentiality requirements as set forth in RCW 51.16.070.

(4) An employer may
appeal the assessment of the fee or penalties pursuant to the procedures set
forth in Title 51 RCW and accompanying rules except that the employer shall not
have the right of appeal to superior court as provided in Title 51 RCW. The
employer from whom the fee or penalty is demanded or enforced, may however,
within thirty days of the board of industrial insurance appeal's final order,
pay the fee or penalty under written protest setting forth all the grounds upon
which such fee or penalty is claimed to be unlawful, excessive or otherwise
improper and thereafter bring an action in superior court against the
department to recover such fee or penalty or any portion of the fee or penalty
which was paid under protest.

(5) Repayment shall be
made to the general fund of any moneys appropriated by law in order to
implement this chapter.

Sec. 916. RCW 69.50.520 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 917 are each amended to read as follows:

The violence reduction
and drug enforcement account is created in the state treasury. All designated
receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8), 66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(h)(1),
82.08.150(5), 82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and section 420, chapter 271, Laws of
1989 shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be
used only for funding services and programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and
chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess., including state incarceration costs. Funds
from the account may also be appropriated to reimburse local governments for
costs associated with implementing criminal justice legislation including
chapter 338, Laws of 1997. During the ((1999-2001)) 2001-2003
biennium, funds from the account may also be used for costs associated with
providing grants to local governments in accordance with chapter 338, Laws of
1997, ((the design, sitework, and construction of the special commitment
center,)) the replacement of the department of corrections' offender-based
tracking system, maintenance and operating costs of the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs jail reporting system, and for
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces. ((After July 1, 2001, at least
seven and one-half percent of expenditures from the account shall be used for
providing grants to community networks under chapter 70.190 RCW by the family
policy council.))

Sec. 917. RCW 72.11.040 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 914 are each amended to read as follows:

The cost of supervision
fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
assessments made under RCW 9.94A.270 and 72.04A.120 shall be deposited into the
fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only to support the collection of
legal financial obligations. During the ((1999-2001)) 2001-2003
biennium, funds from the account may also be used for costs associated with the
department's supervision of the offenders in the community((, and the
replacement of the department of corrections' offender-based tracking system)).
Only the secretary of the department of corrections or the secretary's designee
may authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
expenditures.

Sec. 918. RCW 72.36.035 and 1993
sp.s. c 3 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this
chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1) "Actual bona
fide residents of this state" means persons who have a domicile in the
state of Washington immediately prior to application for admission to a state
veterans' home.

(2)
"Department" means the Washington state department of veterans affairs.

(3)
"Domicile" means a person's true, fixed, and permanent home and place
of habitation, and shall be the place where the person intends to remain, and
to which the person expects to return when the person leaves without intending
to establish a new domicile elsewhere.

(4) "State
veterans' home" means ((either)) the Washington soldiers' home and
colony in Orting, ((or)) the Washington veterans' home in Retsil, ((or
both)) and the eastern Washington veterans' home if the financing
contract for the acquisition of an eastern Washington home is authorized in the
capital budget for the 2001-03 fiscal biennium.

(5) "Veteran"
has the same meaning established in RCW 41.04.005.

Sec. 919. RCW 79.24.580 and 1999 c
309 s 919 are each amended to read as follows:

After deduction for
management costs as provided in RCW 79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW
79.92.110(2), all moneys received by the state from the sale or lease of
state-owned aquatic lands and from the sale of valuable material from
state-owned aquatic lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement
account which is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation,
these funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for
the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public purposes;
for providing and improving access to such lands; and for volunteer cooperative
fish and game projects. During the fiscal biennium ending June 30, ((2001))
2003, the funds may be appropriated for boating safety, local park
projects, shellfish management, enforcement, and enhancement and for
developing and implementing plans for population monitoring and restoration of
native wild salmon stock.

Sec. 920. RCW 82.14.310 and 1999 c
309 s 920 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county criminal
justice assistance account is created in the state treasury. Beginning in
fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall transfer into the county criminal
justice assistance account from the general fund the sum of twenty-three
million two hundred thousand dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring
on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter,
the state treasurer shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth
factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the
office of financial management in November of the preceding year.

(2) The moneys
deposited in the county criminal justice assistance account for distribution
under this section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection
(4) of this section, shall be distributed at such times as distributions are
made under RCW 82.44.150 and on the relative basis of each county's funding factor
as determined under this subsection.

(a) A county's funding
factor is the sum of:

(i) The population of
the county, divided by one thousand, and multiplied by two-tenths;

(ii) The crime rate of
the county, multiplied by three-tenths; and

(iii) The annual number
of criminal cases filed in the county superior court, for each one thousand in
population, multiplied by five-tenths.

(b) Under this section
and RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330:

(i) The population of
the county or city shall be as last determined by the office of financial
management;

(ii) The crime rate of
the county or city is the annual occurrence of specified criminal offenses, as
calculated in the most recent annual report on crime in Washington state as
published by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, for each
one thousand in population;

(iii) The annual number
of criminal cases filed in the county superior court shall be determined by the
most recent annual report of the courts of Washington, as published by the office
of the administrator for the courts;

(iv) Distributions and
eligibility for distributions in the 1989‑91 biennium shall be based on
1988 figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of this subsection
and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as described under (iii)
of this subsection. Future distributions shall be based on the most recent
figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of this subsection and
the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as described under (iii) of
this subsection.

(3) Moneys distributed
under this section shall be expended exclusively for criminal justice purposes
and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal
justice purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist the
criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where ancillary
benefit to the civil or juvenile justice system occurs, and which includes (a)
domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic violence programs,
community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020, and (b)
during the ((1999-2001)) 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, juvenile
dispositional hearings relating to petitions for at-risk youth, truancy, and
children in need of services. Existing funding for purposes of this subsection
is defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal
justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for
criminal justice purposes exclude the following: Expenditures for
extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for
criminal justice services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction
receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(4) Not more than five
percent of the funds deposited to the county criminal justice assistance
account shall be available for appropriations for enhancements to the state
patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing costs related to these
enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for such enhancements shall
not supplant existing funds from the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
921. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 922. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for section 913 of this act, which takes effect July 1,
2001.

(End
of part)

INDEX

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE
COURTS.................................... 7

OPERATIONS..................................................... 23

ATTORNEY
GENERAL............................................... 16

SALARY
ADJUSTMENTS............................................ 147

BELATED
CLAIMS................................................ 140

BOARD
FOR VOLUNTEER FIRE FIGHTERS.............................. 27

BOARD
OF ACCOUNTANCY........................................... 25

BOARD
OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS.......................... 55

BOARD
OF TAX APPEALS........................................... 23

BOND
EXPENSES................................................. 167

CASELOAD
FORECAST COUNCIL...................................... 16

CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 130

CITIZENS'
COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS......... 15

COLUMBIA
RIVER GORGE COMMISSION................................ 66

COMMISSION
ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS......................... 22

COMMISSION
ON ASIAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS........................... 14

COMMISSION
ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS................................. 21

COMMISSION
ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT.................................. 7

CONSERVATION
COMMISSION........................................ 72

COURT
OF APPEALS................................................ 7

CRIMINAL
JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION........................... 55

DEATH
BENEFIT

COMMON
SCHOOLS................................................ 142

STATE
AGENCIES................................................ 142

DEPARTMENT
OF AGRICULTURE...................................... 78

DEPARTMENT
OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT....... 16

COUNTY
CORPORATION ASSISTANCE................................. 150

COUNTY
PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE............................... 157

MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION ASSISTANCE.............................. 151

DEPARTMENT
OF CORRECTIONS...................................... 61

DEPARTMENT
OF ECOLOGY.......................................... 66

DEPARTMENT
OF FISH AND WILDLIFE................................ 73

DEPARTMENT
OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION........................... 24

DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH........................................... 59

DEPARTMENT
OF INFORMATION SERVICES............................. 24

DEPARTMENT
OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES............................. 56

DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING........................................ 80

DEPARTMENT
OF NATURAL RESOURCES................................ 76

DEPARTMENT
OF PERSONNEL........................................ 21

DEPARTMENT
OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

CONTRIBUTIONS
TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS........................... 144

OPERATIONS..................................................... 22

TRANSFERS..................................................... 163

DEPARTMENT
OF REVENUE.......................................... 23

DEPARTMENT
OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND........................... 64

DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES....................... 31

ADMINISTRATION
AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM................. 53

AGING
AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM............................... 45

ALCOHOL
AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM............................ 49

CHILDREN
AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM........................... 31

DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM............................. 42

ECONOMIC
SERVICES PROGRAM...................................... 47

JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM................................ 33

MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM..................................... 50

MENTAL
HEALTH PROGRAM.......................................... 38

PAYMENTS
TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM............................. 54

VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM.............................. 53

DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AFFAIRS................................. 58

EASTERN
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY................... 137

EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 129

ECONOMIC
AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL.......................... 21

EMERGENCY
FUND ALLOCATIONS.................................... 167

EMPLOYMENT
SECURITY DEPARTMENT................................. 65

ENVIRONMENTAL
HEARINGS OFFICE.................................. 72

EXPENDITURE
AUTHORIZATIONS.................................... 164

FORENSIC
INVESTIGATION COUNCIL................................. 26

GOVERNOR

COMPENSATION--INSURANCE
BENEFITS.............................. 142

GOVERNOR'S
OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS............................ 14

GROWTH
PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD................................. 30

HIGHER
EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

FINANCIAL
AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS.............................. 132

POLICY
COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION........................ 131

HORSE
RACING COMMISSION........................................ 26

HOUSE
OF REPRESENTATIVES........................................ 2

HUMAN
RIGHTS COMMISSION........................................ 55

INCENTIVE
SAVINGS

FY
2002....................................................... 148

FY
2003....................................................... 149

INDETERMINATE
SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD............................ 58

INFORMATION
SYSTEMS PROJECTS.................................. 164

INSURANCE
COMMISSIONER......................................... 25

INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION................... 71

JOINT
LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE.................... 3

JOINT
LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE............................. 6

K-12
CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS........... 120

LAW
LIBRARY..................................................... 7

LEGISLATIVE
AGENCIES............................................ 6

LEGISLATIVE
EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE..... 4

LIABILITY
ACCOUNT............................................. 158

LIEUTENANT
GOVERNOR............................................ 11

LIQUOR
CONTROL BOARD........................................... 26

LOCAL
GOVERNMENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE......................... 149

MILITARY
DEPARTMENT............................................ 28

MUNICIPAL
RESEARCH COUNCIL..................................... 23

OFFICE
OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS.............................. 21

OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT................................. 21

CONTRIBUTIONS
TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS........................... 145

DIGITAL
GOVERNMENT POOL....................................... 141

EDUCATION
TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT........................ 146

EMERGENCY
FUND................................................ 139

EXTRAORDINARY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS.......................... 140

FIRE
CONTINGENCY POOL......................................... 140

PERSONNEL
RESOURCES BOARD'S SALARY SURVEY..................... 148

RECRUITMENT
AND RETENTION ADJUSTMENTS......................... 147

TECHNOLOGY
POOL............................................... 141

OFFICE
OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES............ 23

OFFICE
OF PUBLIC DEFENSE........................................ 9

OFFICE
OF THE GOVERNOR......................................... 11

OFFICE
OF THE STATE ACTUARY..................................... 6

PERSONNEL
APPEALS BOARD........................................ 22

PROGRAM
COST SHIFTS........................................... 167

PUBLIC
DISCLOSURE COMMISSION................................... 11

PUBLIC
EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION......................... 29

PUGET
SOUND FERRY OPERATIONS ACCOUNT.......................... 149

REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION....................................... 14

SALARY
COST-OF-LIVING ADJUSTMENT.............................. 145

SECRETARY
OF STATE............................................. 12

SENATE.......................................................... 2

SENTENCING
GUIDELINES COMMISSION............................... 64

SPOKANE
INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE..... 136

STATE
AUDITOR.................................................. 15

STATE
BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES.............. 126

STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION...................................... 121

STATE
CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER.............................. 30

STATE
HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY.................................... 54

STATE
PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION.......................... 70

STATE
PATROL................................................... 81

STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND.................................... 137

STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF..................................... 137

STATE
TREASURER................................................ 14

BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST............................. 138, 139

COUNTY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT.................... 160

FEDERAL
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION............................. 161

MUNICIPAL
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT................. 160

STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION............................... 159

TRANSFERS..................................................... 161

STATUTE
LAW COMMITTEE........................................... 6

STATUTORY
APPROPRIATIONS...................................... 167

SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION.......................... 108

BASIC
EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION.......................... 94

EDUCATION
REFORM PROGRAMS..................................... 109

EDUCATIONAL
SERVICE DISTRICTS................................. 106

ELEMENTARY
AND SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT............... 108

GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT.......................................... 87

INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS.............................. 107

LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM................................... 117

LOCAL
EFFORT ASSISTANCE....................................... 107

LOCAL
ENHANCEMENT FUNDS....................................... 119

PROGRAMS
FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS.......................... 108

PUPIL
TRANSPORTATION.......................................... 100

SCHOOL
EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS....................... 98

SCHOOL
FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS.................................. 101

SPECIAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS.................................... 101

STATE
ADMINISTRATION........................................... 83

STUDENT
ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM................................... 108

TRAFFIC
SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAMS............................. 106

TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS............................... 116

SUPREME
COURT................................................... 6

THE
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE................................... 130

UNIVERSITY
OF WASHINGTON...................................... 128

UTILITIES
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION........................ 27

VIDEO
TELECOMMUNICATIONS...................................... 166

VOLUNTARY
RETIREMENT INCENTIVES............................... 168

VOLUNTARY
SEPARATION INCENTIVES............................... 168

WASHINGTON
POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM............. 79

WASHINGTON
STATE ARTS COMMISSION.............................. 137

WASHINGTON
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY........................... 137

WASHINGTON
STATE LIBRARY...................................... 136

WASHINGTON
STATE LOTTERY....................................... 21

WASHINGTON
STATE UNIVERSITY................................... 129

WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 131

WORK
FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD.......... 136

---
END ---