BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.73.250 and 1999 c
337 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All of the state's
ambulance and aid services shall make epinephrine available to their emergency
medical technicians in their emergency care supplies. The emergency medical
technician may administer epinephrine to a patient of any age upon the presentation
of evidence of a prescription for epinephrine or to a patient under eighteen
years of age:

(a) Upon the request of
the patient or his or her parent or guardian; or

(b) Upon the request of
a person who presents written authorization from the patient or his or her
parent or guardian making such a request.

(2) Any emergency
medical technician, emergency medical service, or medical program director
acting in good faith and in compliance with the provisions of this section
shall not be liable for any civil damages arising out of the furnishing or
administration of epinephrine.

(3) Nothing in this
section authorizes the administration of epinephrine by a first responder.

(((4)
This section shall expire December 31, 2001.))

--- END ---