BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.05.020 and 2000 c
94 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician that
a person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;

(2) "Antipsychotic
medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious
manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which
includes, but is not limited to atypical antipsychotic medications;

(3) "Attending
staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having
responsibility for the care and treatment of a patient;

(4)
"Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person should
be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an
inpatient or a less restrictive setting;

(5) "Conditional
release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be
revoked upon violation of any of its terms;

(6) "County
designated mental health professional" means a mental health professional
appointed by the county to perform the duties specified in this chapter;

(7) "Custody"
means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter
10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment
from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment;

(8)
"Department" means the department of social and health services;

(9)
"Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a
person, under the provisions of this chapter;

(10)
"Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has
specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or
working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist,
psychologist, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities
professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary;

(11)
"Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW
71A.10.020(3);

(12)
"Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The
commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order;

(13) "Evaluation
and treatment facility" means any facility which can provide directly, or
by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency
evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient
care to persons suffering from a mental disorder, and which is certified as
such by the department. A physically separate and separately operated portion
of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility.
A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department or any federal agency
will not require certification. No correctional institution or facility, or
jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this
chapter;

(14) "Gravely
disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a result of a mental
disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure
to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b)
manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and
escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and
is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;

(15) "Habilitative
services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist
persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of
physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services
include education, training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative
process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety
presented by the individual being assisted as manifested by prior charged
criminal conduct;

(16) "History of
one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior to
the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not
any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility or in confinement as a
result of a criminal conviction;

(17)
"Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a
developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for
an individual with developmental disabilities, which shall state:

(a) The nature of the
person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation
needs;

(b) The conditions and
strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;

(c) The intermediate
and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable
for the attainment;

(d) The rationale for
using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range
goals;

(e) The staff
responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f) Where relevant in
light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the
criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for
proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for
discharge or release; and

(g) The type of
residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of
residences;

(18) "Judicial
commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter;

(19) "Likelihood
of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk
that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon his or her own
person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict
physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by an individual
upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which
places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or
(iii) physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the property of
others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to
the property of others; or

(b) The individual has
threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more
violent acts;

(20) "Mental
disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has
substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional
functions;

(21) "Mental
health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric
nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be
defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter;

(22) "Outpatient
commitment" means court-ordered outpatient treatment for a person who:

(a) Has had more
than two involuntary inpatient or outpatient detentions within the last
twenty-four months;

(b) Is suffering
from a severe mental disorder;

(c) Is capable of
surviving safely in the community with supervision;

(d) Based on
treatment history and current behavior, is now in need of treatment in order to
prevent a relapse or deterioration that would predictably result in the person
becoming imminently dangerous or in need of hospitalization;

(e) Is unable to
make an informed decision to seek or comply with recommended treatment; and

(f) Has a reasonable
prospect that outpatient treatment will be beneficial;

(23)
"Outpatient treatment" includes: Medication; individual or group
therapy; day or partial day programming activities; services and training,
including educational and vocational activities; supervision of living
arrangements; and other services prescribed to either alleviate the person's
disorder or disability, to maintain semi-independent functioning, or to prevent
further deterioration that may reasonably be predicted to result in the need
for hospitalization;

(24)
"Outpatient treatment psychiatrist or agency," "supervising
psychiatrist, agency, or provider," or similar terms mean the psychiatrist
or agency who is responsible for the management and supervision of a person's
outpatient treatment under order of the court;

(25) "Peace
officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or
governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers
by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment;

(((23))) (26)
"Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or
association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in
part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or
private institution, hospital, or sanitarium, which is conducted for, or
includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons
who are mentally ill;

(((24))) (27)
"Professional person" means a mental health professional and shall
also mean a physician, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by
rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(((25))) (28)
"Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and
surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of graduate
training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical
association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible
to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology;

(((26))) (29)
"Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a psychologist
pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;

(((27))) (30)
"Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or
institution, hospital, or sanitarium which is conducted for, or includes a
department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons who are
mentally ill; if the agency is operated directly by, federal, state, county, or
municipal government, or a combination of such governments;

(((28))) (31)
"Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the
provisions of this chapter;

(((29))) (32)
"Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24
RCW;

(((30))) (33)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services, or his or her designee;

(((31))) (34)
"Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced
degree from an accredited school of social work or a degree deemed equivalent
under rules adopted by the secretary;

(((32))) (35)
"Subject of the order" means a person who has been ordered by the
court to obtain outpatient treatment under an order of outpatient commitment;

(36) "Subject
of the petition" means a person who, under a petition filed with the
court, is alleged to meet the criteria for outpatient commitment;

(37)
"Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted
suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to property.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A person may be
ordered to obtain involuntary outpatient treatment under this chapter if the
court finds that the person:

(a) Has had more than
two involuntary inpatient or outpatient detentions within the last twenty-four
months;

(b) Is suffering from a
severe mental disorder;

(c) Is capable of
surviving safely in the community with supervision;

(d) Based on treatment
history and current behavior, is now in need of treatment in order to prevent a
relapse or deterioration that would predictably result in the person becoming
imminently dangerous or in need of hospitalization;

(e) Is unable to make
an informed decision to seek or comply with recommended treatment; and

(f) Has a reasonable
prospect that outpatient treatment will be beneficial.

(2) A person may file a
petition, executed subject to the penalties of perjury, with the court alleging
that another person meets the criteria for involuntary outpatient treatment.
The petition must state:

(a) Each of the
criteria under subsection (1) (a) through (f) of this section for outpatient
commitment;

(b) The petitioner's
good faith belief that the subject of the petition meets each of the criteria
of this section;

(c) Facts that support
the petitioner's good faith belief that the subject of the petition meets each
of the criteria of this section, but the hearing on the petition need not be
limited to the stated facts; and

(d) That the subject of
the petition is present within the county where the petition is filed.

(3) The petitioner may
request the court to subpoena witnesses, if necessary, who are needed to
support the petition.

(4) The petition may be
accompanied by a statement of a psychiatrist, or of a physician and a mental
health professional, who has examined the subject of the petition before the
submission of the petition. If the subject of the petition has refused to
submit to examination by a psychiatrist, physician, or mental health
professional, the fact of the refusal must be alleged in the petition.

(5) At a probable cause
hearing conducted under RCW 71.05.200, 71.05.240, or 71.05.310, the court may
order outpatient commitment as an option for treatment without the necessity of
receiving a petition for outpatient commitment. However, the criteria for
outpatient commitment must be met and supported by the evidence.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The court shall hold
a hearing on a petition filed under section 2 of this act as soon as possible,
but within six calendar days after filing of the petition.

(2) Notice of the
hearing must be delivered personally or mailed by certified or registered mail,
return receipt requested, deliverable to addressee only, to the subject of the
petition, and those interested parties identified by the petitioner, if any.
All reasonable efforts must be used to notify the subject of the petition of
the hearing. The subject and necessary witnesses must be notified as soon as
possible, but in all cases at least two court days before the hearing. The
petitioner shall certify that the notices have been mailed and to whom, but
proof of receipt of the notices is not required. Notice must also be served on
any other person that the court designates.

(3) The notice must
include the following:

(a) The date, time, and
place of hearing, a clear statement of the purpose of the hearing and possible
consequences to the subject, and a statement of the legal standard upon which
outpatient commitment is authorized;

(b) A copy of the
petition; and

(c) Notice that the
subject of the petition is entitled to be represented by an attorney and that
the court will appoint a public defender or other attorney for the subject if
the subject desires one and is indigent.

(4) The court may
continue the hearing for failure to timely notify the subject of the petition
or those interested parties whom the petitioner designates should receive
notice.

(5) The time and form
of the procedure incident to hearing the issues in the petition must be
provided by court rule and be consistent with this section.

(6) The hearing may be
held at a convenient place within the circuit. The subject of the petition, an
interested person, or the court upon its own motion may request a hearing in
another court because of inconvenience to the parties, witnesses, or the court,
or because of the subject's physical or mental condition.

(7) The hearing must be
closed to the public, unless the subject of the petition requests otherwise.

(8) The subject of the
petition shall be present at the hearing. However, if the subject has been
notified of the petition and does not appear at the hearing, the court, in its
discretion, may go forward with the hearing.

(9) The subject of the
petition may be represented by an attorney. If the subject desires an attorney
and is indigent, or if the court determines that the legal or factual issues
raised are of such complexity that the assistance of an attorney is necessary
for an adequate presentation of the merits or that the subject of the petition
is unable to speak for the subject's self, the court shall order the
appointment of a public defender or other attorney to represent the subject and
continue the hearing for not more than five days.

(10) A subject of the
petition may not be ordered to outpatient commitment unless at least one psychiatrist,
or a licensed physician and a mental health professional, states the full
condition of the subject of the petition and the facts that support the
allegation that the subject meets all the criteria for outpatient commitment,
the recommended outpatient treatment, and the rationale for the recommended
outpatient treatment.

(11) If the subject of
the petition has refused to be examined by a licensed psychiatrist, the court
may request the subject to consent to examination by a psychiatrist or agency
appointed by the court. If the subject of the petition does not consent and
the court finds sufficient evidence to believe that the allegations in the
petition are true, the court may order the commitment of the subject to a
psychiatric facility for examination. The commitment may not be for more than
seventy-two hours. The examining psychiatrist shall submit the findings and
recommendations to the court.

(12) The subject of the
petition may secure one or more psychiatric examinations and present the findings
as evidence at the hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) If, after hearing all
relevant evidence, including the results of an examination ordered by the
court, if any, the court finds that the subject of the petition filed under
section 2 of this act does not meet the criteria for outpatient commitment, the
court shall dismiss the petition.

(2) If, after hearing
all relevant evidence, including the results of an examination ordered by the
court, if any, the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the
subject of the petition meets the criteria for outpatient commitment, the court
shall order the subject to outpatient commitment and treatment for a period of
not more than twelve months.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The court shall state
the beginning and ending dates of the period of commitment, which may not
exceed twelve months, in an order made under section 4 of this act.

(2) The order must also
state who should receive notice of intent to terminate the order of outpatient
commitment early, in the event that the outpatient treatment psychiatrist or
agency determines, before the end of the court-ordered period of treatment,
that the order of outpatient commitment should be terminated early.

(3) The court shall
also designate on the order the outpatient treatment psychiatrist or agency who
is to be responsible for the management and supervision of the subject's
outpatient treatment, or shall designate the regional support network, who in
turn shall designate the agency or psychiatrist. However, the psychiatrist or
agency must agree to the designation.

(4) The court shall
order the subject to obtain outpatient treatment under the treatment plan. The
order shall require that the subject cooperate with the treatment provider and
comply with the course of treatment.

(5) The order must
state that if the subject of the order does not comply with the subject's
treatment plan and deterioration is evident, the supervising psychiatrist or
agency shall recommend to the psychiatric review board, facilitated return to
inpatient treatment. The psychiatric review board shall approve or disapprove
the recommendation within seventy-two hours of receipt of the recommendation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The psychiatric review
board may require return of the participant in an outpatient treatment program
under sections 2 through 5 of this act to inpatient treatment if the
participant does not comply with the treatment plan, and deterioration is
evident, and may authorize peace officers to facilitate the return if
necessary. In the event the psychiatric review board requires the participant
to return to inpatient treatment, it shall notify the court within twenty-four
hours of the person being taken into custody.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The regional support
network shall assure that resources are available to cover costs related to
outpatient commitment for persons ordered to outpatient commitment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A person adversely
affected or aggrieved by an order of outpatient commitment under sections 2
through 6 of this act is entitled to judicial review.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. An outpatient commitment
order issued under section 4 of this act is automatically and fully terminated
at the end of the court-ordered period of outpatient commitment, a period of
not more than twelve months, unless a new court order has been obtained as
provided in sections 2 through 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) A person may petition
the court for the early termination of an order of outpatient commitment issued
under sections 2 through 6 of this act during the period of outpatient
treatment if done more than sixty days after the most recent hearing involving
the subject of the order. The petition must be filed, notice given, hearing
held, and order made in the same manner as provided for the original petition
alleging that the subject of the order met the criteria for outpatient
commitment.

(2) The treating
psychiatrist may commence the early termination procedure for a subject of the
order if the treating psychiatrist finds that the subject no longer meets the
criteria for outpatient commitment.

(3) To commence the
early termination procedure, the treating psychiatrist shall send to the clerk
of the court that issued the order for outpatient commitment notification that,
in the psychiatrist's opinion, the order should be terminated before the end of
the period specified in the court order.

(4) The clerk of the
court shall, upon receipt of a notification under subsection (3) of this
section, prepare and mail, to the persons whom the court order specified are
entitled to notice, a notice of intent of early termination of the order. The
notice of early termination must be mailed at least five days before the
intended date of termination.

(5) If an objection is
not filed within five days of the mailing of notice, the court shall enter an
order of termination.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A person who has received
a notice of intent to terminate an order of outpatient commitment early may
file an objection with the court. Upon receipt of an objection, the court
shall hold a hearing on the termination. The hearing must be conducted as provided
in section 3 of this act. If the court finds by clear and convincing evidence
that the subject of the order continues to meet the criteria for outpatient
commitment, the court shall order the subject to continue the outpatient
treatment for the unexpired period of its earlier order. If the court finds
that the subject of the order does not meet the criteria for outpatient
commitment, the court shall dismiss the objection and terminate the order
early.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. Before the expiration of
the period of outpatient commitment ordered by the court, a person, including
the treating psychiatrist, may file a petition with the court for an order of
continued outpatient commitment. The petition must be filed and notice
provided in the same manner as under sections 2 and 3 of this act. The court
shall hold a hearing on the petition and make its decision in the same manner
as provided under section 3 of this act. The court may order the continued
outpatient commitment for not more than twelve months after the date of the
hearing. This section is in addition to the provisions on the objection to
termination.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. (1) Each regional support
network shall have its own psychiatric review board. The regional support
network shall appoint the members of the psychiatric review board, for one-year
terms, and temporary members as described in subsection (2) of this section.
The nominees must have appropriate credentials, licenses, and experience
relevant to making decisions under this chapter.

(2) The psychiatric
review board shall be composed of: (a) Five to seven regular members who must
include:

(i) A duly licensed
psychiatrist or physician;

(ii) A duly licensed
mental health professional;

(iii) A duly licensed
attorney;

(iv) Two lay persons
who are active in mental health advocacy within their counties of residence;

(v) A consumer who has
received services in the county of the consumer's residence within the last
five years; and

(b) Temporary members
required by the circumstances on an as-needed basis.

(3) A regional support
network shall formulate its own protocols for nomination of candidates,
screening of candidates, appointment, filling of vacancies, meetings, appointment
of a chair, and procedures of the psychiatric review board.

(4) The psychiatric
review board shall monitor sections 2 through 12 of this act for procedural and
substantive compliance. The psychiatric review board shall make determinations
on such issues as are properly brought before it. The psychiatric review board
shall report to the court, and other agencies, as required. The regional
support networks shall formulate the policies, procedures, jurisdiction,
reporting requirements, and other operating procedures of the psychiatric
review board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. Sections 2 through 13 of
this act are each added to chapter 71.05 RCW.

---
END ---