BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that prescription drugs play an increasingly important role in maintaining and
improving the health of Washington citizens. The high cost of prescription
drugs affects the budget of state health care programs. For citizens who are
not covered by state health care programs or do not have insurance coverage
that includes prescription drugs, the high cost of prescription drugs acts as a
barrier to the delivery of effective, affordable health care services. The
legislature intends to pursue strategies that will ensure the availability of
affordable prescription drugs to citizens covered by state health care programs
and to citizens who are not covered by state health care programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---