BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to sales of liquified petroleum gas when the gas is
delivered to a container for which the principal purpose is to supply fuel for
the purpose of home heating and for which the capacity is in excess of fifty
gallons.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter do not apply with respect to the use of liquified petroleum gas when
the gas is delivered to a container for which the principal purpose is to
supply fuel for the purpose of home heating and for which the capacity is in
excess of fifty gallons.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
October 1, 2001.

---
END ---