BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The sum of sixteen
million four hundred

_5 thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is

_6 appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003,
from the

_7 general fund to the department of veterans affairs, to
be used

_8 exclusively as matching funds for the construction of
replacement

_9 nursing care beds at Retsil. However, this
appropriation may only

10 be committed or expended if a construction grant has
been

11 certified from the federal department of veterans
affairs and is

12 available to Washington state to be used for these

13 purposes. Further, this appropriation is in addition to
other

14 moneys appropriated to the department of veterans
affairs by

15 either the omnibus biennial appropriations act or the
omnibus

16 capital budget for the same fiscal year.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 HB
1323