BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
19.28.311 and 2000 c 238 s 3 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 There is hereby created an electrical board,
consisting of

_8 ((fourteen)) fifteen members to be
appointed by the governor with

_9 the advice of the director of labor and industries as
herein

10 provided. It shall be the purpose and function of the
board to

11 advise the director on all matters pertaining to the
enforcement

12 of this chapter including, but not limited to standards
of

13 electrical and telecommunications installation, minimum
inspection

14 procedures, and the adoption of rules pertaining to the electrical

15 inspection division: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no rules
shall be

16 amended or repealed until the electrical board has first
had an

17 opportunity to consider any proposed amendments or
repeals and had

18 an opportunity to make recommendations to the director
relative

p. 1 HB
1324

_1 thereto. The members of the electrical board shall be
selected and

_2 appointed as follows: One member shall be an employee
or officer

_3 of a corporation or public agency generating or distributing

_4 electric power; one member must be an employee or
officer of a

_5 facilities-based telecommunications service provider
regulated by

_6 the Washington state utilities and transportation
commission;

_7 three members shall be licensed electrical contractors:
PROVIDED,

_8 That one of these members may be a representative of a
trade

_9 association in the electrical industry; one member shall
be a

10 licensed telecommunications contractor; one member shall
be an

11 employee, or officer, or representative of a corporation
or firm

12 engaged in the business of manufacturing or distributing

13 electrical and telecommunications materials, equipment,
or

14 devices; one member shall be a person with knowledge of
the

15 electrical industry, not related to the electrical
industry, to

16 represent the public; three members shall be certified

17 electricians; one member shall be a telecommunications
worker; one

18 member shall be a licensed professional electrical
engineer

19 qualified to do business in the state of Washington and
designated

20 as a registered communications distribution designer; one
member

21 shall be an outside line worker; and one
nonvoting member must be

22 a building official from an incorporated city or town
with an

23 electrical inspection program established under RCW
19.28.141. The

24 regular term of each member shall be four years:
PROVIDED,

25 HOWEVER, The original board shall be appointed on June
9, 1988,

26 for the following terms: The first term of the member

27 representing a corporation or public agency generating
or

28 distributing electric power shall serve four years; two
members

29 representing licensed electrical contractors shall serve
three

30 years; the member representing a manufacturer or
distributor of

31 electrical equipment or devices shall serve three years;
the

32 member representing the public and one member
representing

33 licensed electrical contractors shall serve two years;
the three

34 members selected as certified electricians shall serve for
terms

35 of one, two, and three years, respectively; the member
selected as

36 the licensed professional electrical engineer shall
serve for one

37 year. The first term for the member representing
outside line

38 workers is for four years. In appointing the
original board, the

HB 1324 p. 2

_1 governor shall give due consideration to the value of
continuity

_2 in membership from predecessor boards. Thereafter, the
governor

_3 shall appoint or reappoint board members for terms of
four years

_4 and to fill vacancies created by the completion of the
terms of

_5 the original members. When new positions are created,
the governor

_6 may appoint the initial members to the new positions to
staggered

_7 terms of one to three years. The governor shall also
fill vacancies

_8 caused by death, resignation, or otherwise for the
unexpired term

_9 of such members by appointing their successors from the
same

10 business classification. The same procedure shall be
followed in

11 making such subsequent appointments as is provided for
the

12 original appointments. The board, at this first meeting
shall elect

13 one of its members to serve as chairman. Any person
acting as the

14 chief electrical inspector shall serve as secretary of
the board

15 during his or her tenure as chief state inspector.
Meetings of the

16 board shall be held at least quarterly in accordance
with a

17 schedule established by the board. Each member of the
board shall

18 receive compensation in accordance with RCW 43.03.240
and shall be

19 reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050

20 and 43.03.060 which shall be paid out of the electrical
license

21 fund, upon vouchers approved by the director of labor
and

22 industries.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The governor shall
appoint the member

24 representing outside line workers within ninety days
after the

25 effective date of this act.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1324