BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

In computing tax there
may be deducted from the measure of tax amounts paid by the owner of an
amusement device, as defined in RCW 66.44.316, to the person upon whose
premises the device is operated, if the amounts are paid at the time they are
collected from the amusement device.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
August 1, 2001.

---
END ---