BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any person who is
found to be the proximate cause of injury or damage to another while
simultaneously operating a moving vehicle and using a personal wireless service
as defined in RCW 80.36.375 may be subject to a fee of thirty-five dollars per
infraction. However, this section does not apply if:

(a) The personal
wireless service was used for making an emergency call; or

(b) The personal
wireless service was being operated in hands-free mode.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "hands-free mode" means the use of a wireless phone
with a speaker phone, headset, or earpiece.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act
takes effect January 1, 2002.

---
END ---