BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that:

(a) Washington state is
the most trade-dependent state in the United States;

(b) The state's economy
and economic well-being depend heavily on foreign trade and international
relations;

(c) It is important to
the economic future of the state to promote international awareness and
understanding; and

(d) Enhanced
international trade, cultural, and educational opportunities are developed when
governments reach out.

(2) The legislature
declares that the purpose of this act is to enhance Washington state's ability
to develop relationships and contacts throughout the world enabling us to
expand international education and trade opportunities for all citizens of the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) A humanitarian
relief council is created comprised of the governor, the lieutenant governor,
and the secretary of state.

(b) The council shall
determine which disasters and hardships qualify for state support and how much
the state will contribute from the worldwide humanitarian relief treasury
account created in subsection (2) of this section. The council shall
coordinate its assistance with recognized relief agencies so as to not
duplicate efforts or waste state money.

(c) The council shall
consult with the emergency management board and establish necessary criteria
for receiving assistance from the state.

(d) The council shall
adopt rules to implement this subsection.

(e) Staff support for
the council shall be provided by the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the department of agriculture, and the military
department.

(2) The worldwide
humanitarian relief treasury account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from revenues as determined under RCW 82.08.020(3) must be deposited
into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for humanitarian
relief.

(3)(a) The council may
accept gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises, of real or personal
property, or both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange, invest, or
expend these donations or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income from the
donations except as limited by the donor's terms. The council shall adopt
rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds.

(b) The humanitarian
relief account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts
from gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises under this subsection
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for humanitarian relief. Only the humanitarian relief council or the
council's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation
is not required for expenditures.

(4) This section may be
known and cited as the good samaritan act.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.08.020 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and
there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this state equal to six
and ((five-tenths)) six-tenths percent of the selling price.

(2) There is levied and
there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail car rental,
regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal to five and
nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected under this
subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created
in RCW 47.66.070.

(3) One-tenth of one
percent of the revenues collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deposited into the worldwide humanitarian relief treasury account created in
section 2 of this act.

(4) The taxes
imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive retail sales of the same
property.

(((4))) (5)
The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12
RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The secretary of state
shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or
rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance
with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

---
END ---