BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.40.165 and 1997 c
338 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The purpose of
this disposition alternative is to ensure that successful treatment options to
reduce recidivism are available to eligible youth, pursuant to RCW 70.96A.520.
The court must consider eligibility for the chemical dependency disposition
alternative when a juvenile offender is subject to a standard range
disposition of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not
committed an A- or B+ offense, other than a first time B+ offense under
chapter 69.50 RCW. The court, on its own motion or the motion of the state
or the respondent if the evidence shows that the offender may be chemically
dependent or substance abusing, may order an examination by a chemical
dependency counselor from a chemical dependency treatment facility approved
under chapter 70.96A RCW to determine if the youth is chemically dependent ((and
amenable to treatment)) or substance abusing. The offender shall pay the
cost of any examination ordered under this subsection (1) unless the court
finds that the offender is indigent and no third party insurance coverage is
available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(2) The report of the
examination shall include at a minimum the following: The respondent's version
of the facts and the official version of the facts, the respondent's offense
history, an assessment of drug-alcohol problems and previous treatment
attempts, the respondent's social, educational, and employment situation, and
other evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the
examiner's information.

(3) The examiner shall
assess and report regarding the respondent's ((amenability to treatment and))
relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall be provided
and shall include, at a minimum:

(a) Whether inpatient
and/or outpatient treatment is recommended;

(b) Availability of
appropriate treatment;

(c) Monitoring plans,
including any requirements regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements,
and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or others;

(d) Anticipated length
of treatment; and

(e) Recommended
crime-related prohibitions((; and

(f) Whether the
respondent is amenable to treatment)).

(4) The court on its
own motion may order, or on a motion by the state or the respondent
shall order, a second examination ((regarding the offender's amenability to
treatment)). The evaluator shall be selected by the party making the
motion. The ((defendant)) requesting party shall pay the cost of
any examination ordered under this subsection (4) ((or subsection (1) of
this section)) unless the requesting party is the offender and the
court finds that the offender is indigent and no third party insurance coverage
is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(5)(a) After receipt of
reports of the examination, the court shall then consider whether the offender
and the community will benefit from use of this chemical dependency disposition
alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should
receive a treatment disposition under this section.

(b) If the court
determines that this chemical dependency disposition alternative is
appropriate, then the court shall impose the standard range for the offense,
suspend execution of the disposition, and place the offender on community
supervision for up to one year. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the
court shall require the offender to undergo available outpatient drug/alcohol
treatment and/or inpatient drug/alcohol treatment. For purposes of this
section, ((the sum of confinement time and)) inpatient treatment may not
exceed ninety days. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court may
impose conditions of community supervision and other sanctions, including up to
thirty days of confinement, one hundred fifty hours of community service, and
payment of legal financial obligations and restitution.

(6) The drug/alcohol
treatment provider shall submit monthly reports on the respondent's progress in
treatment to the court and the parties. The reports shall reference the
treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of attendance,
respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the
respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other material specified
by the court at the time of the disposition.

At the time of the
disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the court considers
appropriate.

If the offender
violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that the
respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court may
revoke the suspension and order execution of the disposition. The court shall
give credit for any confinement time previously served if that confinement was
for the offense for which the suspension is being revoked.

(7) For purposes of
this section, "victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct
result of the offense charged.

(8) Whenever a juvenile
offender is entitled to credit for time spent in detention prior to a
dispositional order, the dispositional order shall specifically state the
number of days of credit for time served.

(9) In no case shall
the term of confinement imposed by the court at disposition exceed that to
which an adult could be subjected for the same offense.

(10) A
disposition under this section is not appealable under RCW 13.40.230.

--- END ---