BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that an increasing number of individuals with developmental
disabilities receive services in home and community-based settings. The
legislature intends to promote the quality of services and increase consumer
protections for individuals with developmental disabilities by creating
ombudsman services for individuals with developmental disabilities.

The legislature finds
that individuals with developmental disabilities have the right to choose the
appropriate services and supports they need within the appropriated funds
available. The services and supports must be appropriate to the needs of the
individual with developmental disabilities, designed to maximize the
developmental potential of the individual, and be provided in the setting that
is least restrictive to the individual's personal liberty. The services and
supports must be provided in a manner that promotes the individual's health and
safety and is respectful of individual self-dignity and human rights as
enumerated in federal and state laws.

Therefore the
legislature intends to create an independent developmental disabilities
ombudsman to promote quality services, the protection of rights, and provide
the necessary assistance to individuals with developmental disabilities
consistent with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The developmental
disabilities ombudsman is created.

(2) All individuals
with developmental disabilities who are eligible persons as defined in RCW
71A.10.020 are eligible for developmental disabilities ombudsman services,
except for those individuals who reside in facilities licensed under chapter
70.128, 18.51, 18.20, or 74.15 RCW and therefore are eligible for ombudsman
services under chapter 43.190 or 43.06A RCW.

(3) Within available
funding, priority consideration shall be given to medicaid-funded individuals
receiving community-based services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The department of
community, trade, and economic development shall contract with a private,
nonprofit organization to provide ombudsman services to individuals with
developmental disabilities.

(2) The organization
selected to provide ombudsman services for individuals with developmental
disabilities must be an independent, competent advocacy organization and must:

(a) Not be a provider
of paid services to individuals with developmental disabilities, except
advocacy services;

(b) Have the capacity
to deliver services to individuals in all areas of the state;

(c) Have staff with
experience and knowledge in dispute or problem resolution techniques, including
investigation, mediation, and negotiation, have a wide range of experience and
expertise with social and legal systems, and have knowledge of developmental
disabilities;

(d) Have experience in
managing a large budget, particularly a budget with reporting requirements;

(e) Have private
nonprofit status and eligibility for tax exempt status under section 501(c)(3)
of the internal revenue code; and

(f) Have the knowledge
and commitment necessary to competently serve diverse ethnic and cultural
communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The developmental
disabilities ombudsman has the following duties:

(1) To investigate,
upon receipt of a complaint or when the ombudsman has reasonable cause for
concern, an act or omission alleged to be contrary to law, rule, contract, or
applicable policy that may adversely affect the health, safety, welfare, and
rights of those eligible for services under this chapter;

(2) To protect the
interests of and advocate for individuals with developmental disabilities
consistent with the duties of this chapter;

(3) To provide
information to those eligible for services under this chapter on the rights and
responsibilities they have and provide information, as appropriate, to public
agencies regarding the problems individuals with developmental disabilities are
having in receiving services;

(4) To enter into
coordination agreements to avoid duplication of services with the state long-term
care ombudsman, the office of family and children's ombudsman, the Washington
protection and advocacy system, the department of social and health services,
and other ombudsman functions in the state where there is overlapping
authority;

(5) To develop procedures
for referral of complaints to appropriate state or local government agencies,
seek to resolve complaints at the lowest, most appropriate level possible, and
follow up on cases referred;

(6) To report
abandonment, abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of vulnerable adults in
accordance with RCW 74.34.035 and report abuse and neglect of children in
accordance with RCW 26.44.030;

(7) To establish
procedures consistent with this chapter, chapters 26.44, 42.17, and 74.34 RCW,
and other applicable federal and state laws, for access to the records of the
department of social and health services, including procedures to protect the
confidentiality of the records and ensure that the identity of any individual
with developmental disabilities will not be disclosed without the written
consent of the individual, or the individual's legal representative, or upon
court order;

(8) To establish a
statewide uniform reporting system to collect and analyze data relating to
complaints, for the purpose of identifying and resolving significant problems;

(9) As necessary, to
contract with local advocacy agencies to fulfill the duties of the
developmental disabilities ombudsman services and, as necessary, recruit
volunteers to perform the functions of the developmental disabilities
ombudsman;

(10) To provide
training for staff and volunteers to ensure they:

(a) Are qualified,
through experience or training in working with people with developmental
disabilities;

(b) Are able to
identify and resolve problems;

(c) Are able to assist
people with developmental disabilities in assertion of their civil and human
rights;

(d) Know and use
complaint procedures for mandatory reporting; and

(e) Are knowledgeable
of the laws, rules, and policies that govern services provided under medicaid
and the developmental disabilities system and other applicable statute or rule
governing service settings;

(11) To develop ethical
standards for the conduct of ombudsman services;

(12) To establish a
toll-free number; and

(13) To engage in
outreach activities to make services of the developmental disabilities
ombudsman known by at least:

(a) Providing, through
the department of social and health services, information describing the
developmental disabilities ombudsman services to persons as they are being
determined eligible under RCW 71A.16.040 and annually thereafter to eligible
persons; and

(b) Providing
information about ombudsman services and how individuals can contact the
ombudsman to programs and individuals contracting with the department of social
and health services to provide services under Title 71A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The department of
community, trade, and economic development, in consultation with the
developmental disabilities council, shall provide the support necessary to
contract out the developmental disabilities ombudsman services and adopt rules
necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The developmental
disabilities ombudsman shall prepare an annual report to the legislature that
identifies at least but not limited to the following:

(1) The demographic
status of those served by the office;

(2) A description of
the issues addressed by the office;

(3) A description of
case scenarios without compromising confidentiality;

(4) The number of
visits made, number of complaints received, and the types of investigations
conducted;

(5) Recommendations of
actions by agencies that would improve the quality of services to individuals
with developmental disabilities and how the agency responded to the
recommendations; and

(6) Recommendations for
legislative action that would result in improved services to individuals with
developmental disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The developmental
disabilities ombudsman shall treat all matters under investigation, including
the identities of service recipients, complainants, and individuals from whom
information is acquired, as confidential, except as far as disclosures may be
necessary to enable the developmental disabilities ombudsman to perform its
duties, comply with abuse reporting requirements, and to support any
recommendations resulting from an investigation. Upon receipt of information
that by law is confidential or privileged, the developmental disabilities
ombudsman shall maintain confidentiality of such information and shall not
further disclose or disseminate the information except as provided by
applicable state or federal law. Investigative records of the developmental
disabilities ombudsman are confidential and are exempt from public disclosure
under chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) The developmental
disabilities ombudsman may not be compelled, in any judicial or administrative
proceeding, to testify or to produce evidence regarding:

(a) The exercise of the
official duties of the developmental disabilities ombudsman;

(b) Identifying
information about complainants or witnesses;

(c) Memoranda, work
products, notes, and case files relating to the official duties of the
developmental disabilities ombudsman.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "identifying information" includes the complainant's or
witness's name, location, telephone number, likeness, social security number,
or other identification number or identification of immediate family members
and employees of the department of social and health services and its
contractors.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The privilege in sections
7 and 8 of this act does not apply when:

(1) The complainant or
witness waives confidentiality;

(2) The developmental
disabilities ombudsman, staff, or volunteer has direct knowledge of an alleged
crime or becomes aware of a risk of harm to any person and the testimony,
evidence, or discovery sought in a judicial or adjudicative proceeding is
relevant to the action;

(3) The developmental
disabilities ombudsman, staff, or volunteers have reported as required under
chapter 74.34 or 26.44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) An employee or
volunteer of the developmental disabilities ombudsman is not liable for good
faith performance of responsibilities under this chapter.

(2) No discriminatory,
disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be taken against an employee of the
department of social and health services, an employee of a contracting agency,
or a recipient of services for any communication made, or information given or
disclosed, to aid the developmental disabilities ombudsman in carrying out its
responsibilities, unless the communication or information is made, given, or
disclosed maliciously or without good faith. This subsection is not intended
to infringe on the rights of the employer to supervise, discipline, or
terminate an employee for other reasons.

(3) All communications
by an ombudsman, if reasonably related to the requirements of that individual's
responsibilities under this chapter and done in good faith, are privileged
under RCW 9.58.070 and that privilege is a defense in any action in libel or
slander.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. (1) The department of
social and health services shall:

(a) Allow the
developmental disabilities ombudsman to communicate privately with any client
eligible for services under this chapter for the purposes of carrying out the
duties of this chapter;

(b) Permit the
developmental disabilities ombudsman physical access to all facilities and
programs serving clients eligible for services under this chapter for the
purpose of carrying out the duties of this chapter; and

(c) Provide, upon the
request of the developmental disabilities ombudsman, and in accordance with
applicable laws and rules, immediate access to all relevant information, records,
case files, reports, or documents in possession or control of the department of
social and health services or its contractors that the developmental
disabilities ombudsman considers necessary in an investigation.

(2) The same access
applies to all records of related services received by an eligible client that
the developmental disabilities ombudsman considers necessary in an
investigation.

Sec. 12. RCW 43.190.060 and 1999
c 133 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A long-term care
ombudsman shall:

(1) Identify,
investigate, and resolve complaints made by or on behalf of residents of
long-term care facilities relating to administrative action, inaction, or
decisions which may adversely affect the health, safety, welfare, and rights of
these individuals;

(2) Coordinate with
the developmental disabilities ombudsman when investigating complaints
involving individuals with developmental disabilities, and where advocacy by
other ombudsman programs are necessary to resolve a problem;

(3) Monitor the
development and implementation of federal, state, and local laws, rules,
regulations, and policies with respect to long-term care facilities in this
state;

(((3))) (4)
Provide information as appropriate to residents, resident representatives, and
others regarding the rights of residents, and to public agencies regarding the
problems of individuals residing in long-term care facilities; and

(((4))) (5)
Provide for training volunteers and promoting the development of citizen
organizations to participate in the ombudsman program. A trained volunteer
long-term care ombudsman, in accordance with the policies and procedures
established by the state long-term care ombudsman program, shall inform
residents, their representatives, and others about the rights of residents, and
may identify, investigate, and resolve complaints made by or on behalf of
residents of long-term care facilities relating to action, inaction, or decisions,
that may adversely affect the health, safety, welfare, and rights of these
individuals.

Nothing in chapter 133,
Laws of 1999 shall be construed to empower the state long-term care ombudsman
or any local long-term care ombudsman with statutory or regulatory licensing or
sanctioning authority.

Sec. 13. RCW 43.06A.030 and 1996
c 131 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The ombudsman shall
perform the following duties:

(1) Provide information
as appropriate on the rights and responsibilities of individuals receiving
family and children's services, and on the procedures for providing these
services;

(2) Coordinate as
appropriate with the developmental disabilities ombudsman when investigating
complaints involving children with developmental disabilities residing in
facilities, and collaborate when action by both ombudsman programs is necessary
to investigate or resolve a complaint or systemic issue;

(3) Investigate,
upon his or her own initiative or upon receipt of a complaint, an
administrative act alleged to be contrary to law, rule, or policy, imposed
without an adequate statement of reason, or based on irrelevant, immaterial, or
erroneous grounds; however, the ombudsman may decline to investigate any
complaint as provided by rules adopted under this chapter;

(((3))) (4)
Monitor the procedures as established, implemented, and practiced by the
department to carry out its responsibilities in delivering family and
children's services with a view toward appropriate preservation of families and
ensuring children's health and safety;

(((4))) (5)
Review periodically the facilities and procedures of state institutions serving
children, and state-licensed facilities or residences;

(((5))) (6)
Recommend changes in the procedures for addressing the needs of families and
children;

(((6))) (7)
Submit annually to the committee and to the governor by November 1st a
report analyzing the work of the office including recommendations;

(((7))) (8)
Grant the committee access to all relevant records in the possession of the
ombudsman unless prohibited by law; and

(((8))) (9)
Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. Sections 1 through 11 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---