BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 90.80 RCW to read as follows:

An action shall not be
brought or maintained against a commissioner, agent, or employee of a water
conservancy board for any noncontractual acts or omissions of the water
conservancy board or its commissioners, agents, or employees which are related
to water transfers under this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.80.100 and 1997 c
441 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

((Neither)) The
county ((nor)), the water conservancy board, and the department
shall not be subject jointly or severally to any cause of action
or claim for damages arising out of transfers approved or denied by a
board under this chapter.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.80.080 and 1997 c
441 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an
application for a transfer is approved by the board, the board shall submit
a copy of the proposed certificate conditionally approving the transfer to the
department for review. If an application for a transfer is denied by the
board, the board shall submit a copy of a record of its decision denying the
transfer to the department for review. The board shall also submit a
report summarizing any factual findings on which the board relied in deciding
to approve or deny the proposed transfer. The board shall also transmit
notice of its decision approving or denying the transfer by mail to any
person who objected to the transfer or who requested notice.

(2) The director shall
review each proposed transfer conditionally approved by a board and each
decision by a board denying an application for such a transfer for
compliance or noncompliance with state water transfer laws including RCW
90.03.380, 90.03.390, and 90.44.100, rules and guidelines adopted by the
department, and other applicable law.

(3) Any party to a
transfer or a third party who alleges his or her water right will be impaired
by the proposed transfer may file objections with the department. If
objections to the transfer are filed with the department, the board shall
forward the files and records upon which it based its decision to the
department.

(4) The
director shall review the action of the board and affirm, reverse, or modify
the action of the board within forty-five days of receipt. The forty-five day
time period may be extended for an additional thirty days by the director, upon
the consent of the parties to the transfer. If the director fails to act within
this time period, the board's action is final. Upon approval of a water
transfer by the action or nonaction of the director, the conditional
certificate issued by the board is final and valid.

---
END ---