BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.35.060 and 1996 c
186 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may
impose fees upon affected public agencies for the review of life-cycle cost
analyses. The fees shall be deposited in the ((energy efficiency services
account established in RCW 39.35C.110)) general administration services
account. The purpose of the fees is to recover the costs by the department
for review of the analyses. The department shall set fees at a level necessary
to recover all of its costs related to increasing the energy efficiency of
state-supported new construction. The fees shall not exceed one-tenth of one
percent of the total cost of any project or exceed two thousand dollars for any
project unless mutually agreed to. The department shall provide detailed
calculation ensuring that the energy savings resulting from its review of
life-cycle cost analysis justify the costs of performing that review.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.19.025 and 1998 c
105 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The general ((services))
administration (([general administration services])) services
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer, subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, and shall be used for all
activities previously budgeted and accounted for in the following internal
service funds: The motor transport account, the general administration
management fund, the general administration facilities and services revolving
fund, the central stores revolving fund, the surplus property purchase
revolving fund, ((and)) the risk management account, and the energy
efficiency services account. Only the director or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.19.1923 and 1998
c 105 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The general
administration services account shall be used for the purchase of supplies and
equipment handled or rented through central stores, and the payment of
salaries, wages, and other costs incidental to the acquisition, operation, and
maintenance of the central stores, and other activities connected therewith,
which shall include utilities services. ((Disbursements from the account
for the purchasing and contract administration activities of the division of
purchasing within the department are subject to appropriation and allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. Disbursements for all other state
purchasing activities within the general administration services account are
not subject to appropriation.)) The account shall be credited with all receipts
from the rental, sale, or distribution of supplies, equipment, and
services rendered to the various state agencies. Central stores, utilities
services, and other activities within the general administration services
account shall be treated as separate operating entities for financial and
accounting control. Financial records involving the general administration
services account shall be designed to provide data for achieving maximum
effectiveness and economy of each individual activity within the account.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.99I.020 and 1997
c 456 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

Bonds issued under RCW
43.99I.010 are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

General obligation
bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of one billion two hundred
seventy-one million sixty‑five thousand dollars, or so much thereof as
may be required, shall be issued for the purposes described and authorized by
the legislature in the capital and operating appropriations acts for the 1991‑93
fiscal biennium and subsequent fiscal biennia, and to provide for the
administrative cost of such projects, including costs of bond issuance and
retirement, salaries and related costs of officials and employees of the state,
costs of insurance or credit enhancement agreements, and other expenses
incidental to the administration of capital projects. Subject to such changes
as may be required in the appropriations acts, the proceeds from the sale of
the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection shall be deposited in the
state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020 and transferred as
follows:

(1) Eight hundred
thirty-five thousand dollars to the state higher education construction account
created by RCW 28B.10.851;

(2) Eight hundred
seventy-one million dollars to the state building construction account created
by RCW 43.83.020;

(3) Two million eight
hundred thousand dollars to the ((energy efficiency services account created
by RCW 39.35C.110)) general administration services account for energy
efficiency services;

(4) Two hundred
fifty-five million five hundred thousand dollars to the common school
reimbursable construction account hereby created in the state treasury;

(5) Ninety-eight
million six hundred forty-eight thousand dollars to the higher education
reimbursable construction account hereby created in the state treasury;

(6) Three million two
hundred eighty-four thousand dollars to the data processing building
construction account created in RCW 43.99I.100; and

(7) Nine hundred
thousand dollars to the Washington state dairy products commission facility
account created in RCW 43.99I.110.

These proceeds shall be
used exclusively for the purposes specified in this subsection, and for the
payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for
the purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the office of
financial management, subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. RCW 39.35C.110 (Energy efficiency
services account--Fees) and 1996 c 186 s 415 & 1991 c 201 s 12 are each
repealed.

---
END ---