BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
26.44.020 and 2000 c 162 s 19 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter

_7 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

_8 (1) "Court" means the superior court of
the state of

_9 Washington, juvenile department.

10 (2) "Law enforcement agency" means the
police department, the

11 prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public

12 safety, or the office of the sheriff.

13 (3) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or
"practitioner" means

14 a person licensed by this state to practice podiatric
medicine and

15 surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry,
osteopathic

16 medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to
provide other

17 health services. The term "practitioner"
includes a duly accredited

18 Christian Science practitioner: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That
a person

p. 1 SHB
1344

_1 who is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a
duly

_2 accredited Christian Science practitioner will not be
considered,

_3 for that reason alone, a neglected person for the
purposes of this

_4 chapter.

_5 (4) "Institution" means a private or public
hospital or any

_6 other facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment or
care.

_7 (5) "Department" means the state
department of social and

_8 health services.

_9 (6) "Child" or "children" means
any person under the age of

10 eighteen years of age.

11 (7) "Professional school personnel"
include, but are not

12 limited to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child
care

13 facility personnel, and school nurses.

14 (8) "Social service counselor" means
anyone engaged in a

15 professional capacity during the regular course of
employment in

16 encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support or
education

17 of children, or providing social services to adults or
families,

18 including mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and
domestic

19 violence programs, whether in an individual capacity, or
as an

20 employee or agent of any public or private organization
or

21 institution.

22 (9) "Psychologist" means any person
licensed to practice

23 psychology under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an

24 individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any
public or

25 private organization or institution.

26 (10) "Pharmacist" means any registered
pharmacist under chapter

27 18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or
as an

28 employee or agent of any public or private organization
or

29 institution.

30 (11) "Clergy" means any regularly licensed
or ordained

31 minister, priest, or rabbi of any church or religious

32 denomination, whether acting in an individual capacity
or as an

33 employee or agent of any public or private organization
or

34 institution.

35 (12) "Abuse or neglect" means the injury,
sexual abuse, sexual

36 exploitation, negligent treatment, or maltreatment of a
child by

37 any person under circumstances which indicate that the
child's

SHB 1344 p. 2

_1 health, welfare, and safety is harmed, excluding conduct
permitted

_2 under RCW 9A.16.100. An abused child is a child who has
been

_3 subjected to child abuse or neglect as defined in this
section.

_4 (13) "Child protective services section"
means the child

_5 protective services section of the department.

_6 (14) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a)
Allowing, permitting,

_7 or encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any
person; or

_8 (b) allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in
the obscene

_9 or pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of
a child by

10 any person.

11 (15) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment"
means an act or

12 omission, or an identifiable pattern of conduct,
that evidences

13 ((a serious disregard of consequences of such
magnitude as to

14 constitute a clear and present danger to the child's
health,

15 welfare, and safety)) the failure of a parent
or guardian, or

16 other person having custody and control of a child,
to exercise a

17 minimum degree of care in supplying the child with
adequate food,

18 clothing, shelter, sanitation, medical treatment, or
supervision,

19 though financially able to do so or though offered financial
or

20 other reasonable means to do so, which results in a
child whose

21 physical, mental, or emotional condition has been
impaired or is

22 at substantial risk of impairment. The fact that
siblings share a

23 bedroom is not, in and of itself, negligent treatment or

24 maltreatment.

25 (16) "Child protective services" means
those services provided

26 by the department designed to protect children from
child abuse

27 and neglect and safeguard such children from future
abuse and

28 neglect, and conduct investigations of child abuse and
neglect

29 reports. Investigations may be conducted regardless of
the location

30 of the alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective
services includes

31 referral to services to ameliorate conditions that
endanger the

32 welfare of children, the coordination of necessary
programs and

33 services relevant to the prevention, intervention, and
treatment

34 of child abuse and neglect, and services to children to
ensure

35 that each child has a permanent home. In determining
whether

36 protective services should be provided, the department
shall not

37 decline to provide such services solely because of the
child's

p. 3 SHB
1344

_1 unwillingness or developmental inability to describe the
nature

_2 and severity of the abuse or neglect.

_3 (17) "Malice" or "maliciously"
means an evil intent, wish, or

_4 design to vex, annoy, or injure another person. Such
malice may be

_5 inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the
rights of

_6 another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or
excuse,

_7 or an act or omission of duty betraying a willful
disregard of

_8 social duty.

_9 (18) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a
child who is defined

10 in RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive
youth.

11 (19) "Unfounded" means available
information indicates that,

12 more likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not
occur. No

13 unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect may be
disclosed to

14 a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any
other

15 provider licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SHB 1344 p. 4