BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 39.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of
financial management shall adopt uniform guidelines for the effective and
efficient management of personal service contracts and client service contracts
by all state agencies. The guidelines must, at a minimum, include:

(a) Accounting methods,
systems, measures, and principles to be used by agencies and contractors;

(b) Precontract
procedures for selecting potential contractors based on their qualifications
and ability to perform;

(c) Incorporation of
performance measures and measurable benchmarks in contracts, and the use of
performance audits;

(d) Uniform contract
terms to ensure contract performance and compliance with state and federal
standards;

(e) Proper payment and
reimbursement methods to ensure that the state receives full value for taxpayer
moneys, including cost settlements and cost allowance;

(f) Postcontract
procedures, including methods for recovering improperly spent or overspent
moneys for disallowance and adjustment;

(g) Adequate contract
remedies and sanctions to ensure compliance;

(h) Monitoring, fund
tracking, risk assessment, and auditing procedures and requirements;

(i) Financial
reporting, record retention, and record access procedures and requirements;

(j) Procedures and
criteria for terminating contracts for cause or otherwise; and

(k) Any other subject
related to effective and efficient contract management.

(2) The office of
financial management shall submit the guidelines required by subsection (1) of
this section to the governor and the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature no later than December 1, 2002.

(3) The office of
financial management shall publish a guide book for use by state agencies
containing the guidelines required by subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 39.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A state agency
entering into or renewing personal service contracts or client service
contracts shall follow the guidelines required by section 1 of this act.

(2) A state agency that
has entered into or renewed personal service contracts or client service
contracts during a calendar year shall, on or before January 1st of the
following calendar year, provide the office of financial management with a
report detailing the procedures the agency employed in entering into, renewing,
and managing the contracts.

(3) The provisions of
this section apply to state agencies entering into or renewing contracts after
January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 39.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of
financial management shall provide a training course for agency personnel
responsible for executing and managing personal service contracts and client
service contracts. The course must contain training on effective and efficient
contract management under the guidelines established under section 1 of this
act. State agencies shall require agency employees responsible for executing
or managing personal service contracts and client service contracts to complete
the training course to the satisfaction of the office of financial management.
Beginning January 1, 2004, no agency employee may execute or manage personal service
contracts or client service contracts unless the employee has completed the
training course. Any request for exception to this requirement shall be
submitted to the office of financial management in writing and shall be
approved by the office of financial management prior to the employee executing
or managing the contract.

(2)(a) The office of
financial management shall conduct risk-based audits of the contracting
practices associated with individual personal service and client service
contracts from multiple state agencies to ensure compliance with the guidelines
established in section 1 of this act. The office of financial management shall
conduct the number of audits deemed appropriate by the director of the office
of financial management based on funding provided.

(b) The office of
financial management shall forward the results of the audits conducted under
this section to the governor, the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature, and the joint legislative audit and review committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 39.29 RCW to read as follows:

The state auditor and
the attorney general shall annually by November 30th of each year provide a
collaborative report of contract audit and investigative findings, enforcement
actions, and the status of agency resolution to the governor and the policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature.

Sec. 5. RCW 39.29.040 and 1998 c
101 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter does not
apply to:

(1) Contracts
specifying a fee of less than five thousand dollars if the total of the
contracts from that agency with the contractor within a fiscal year does not
exceed five thousand dollars;

(2) Contracts awarded
to companies that furnish a service where the tariff is established by the
utilities and transportation commission or other public entity;

(3) Intergovernmental
agreements awarded to any governmental entity, whether federal, state, or local
and any department, division, or subdivision thereof;

(4) Contracts awarded
for services to be performed for a standard fee, when the standard fee is
established by the contracting agency or any other governmental entity and a
like contract is available to all qualified applicants;

(5) Contracts for
services that are necessary to the conduct of collaborative research if prior
approval is granted by the funding source;

(6) Contracts for
client services except as otherwise indicated in this chapter;

(7) Contracts for
architectural and engineering services as defined in RCW 39.80.020, which shall
be entered into under chapter 39.80 RCW;

(8) Contracts for the
employment of expert witnesses for the purposes of litigation; and

(9) Contracts for bank
supervision authorized under RCW 30.38.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Section 1 of this act is
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 2 and 3 of this
act take effect January 1, 2003.

---
END ---