BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This chapter may be known
and cited as the structured settlement protection act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Annuity
issuer" means an insurer that has issued a contract to fund periodic
payments under a structured settlement.

(2)
"Dependents" means a payee's spouse and minor children and all other
persons for whom the payee is legally obligated to provide support, including
alimony.

(3) "Discounted
present value" means the present value of future payments determined by
discounting such payments to the present using the most recently published
applicable federal rate for determining the present value of an annuity, as
issued by the United States internal revenue service.

(4) "Gross advance
amount" means the sum payable to the payee or for the payee's account as
consideration for a transfer of structured settlement payment rights before any
reductions for transfer expenses or other deductions to be made from such
consideration.

(5) "Independent
professional advice" means advice of an attorney, certified public
accountant, actuary, or other licensed professional adviser.

(6) "Interested
parties" means, with respect to any structured settlement, the payee, any
beneficiary irrevocably designated under the annuity contract to receive
payments following the payee's death, the annuity issuer, the structured
settlement obligor, and any other party that has continuing rights or
obligations under such structured settlement.

(7) "Net advance
amount" means the gross advance amount less the aggregate amount of the
actual and estimated transfer expenses required to be disclosed under section
3(5) of this act.

(8) "Payee"
means an individual who is receiving tax-free payments under a structured
settlement and proposes to make a transfer of payment rights thereunder.

(9) "Periodic
payments" means (a) recurring payments and (b) scheduled future lump sum
payments.

(10) "Qualified
assignment agreement" means an agreement providing for a qualified
assignment within the meaning of section 130 of the United States Internal
Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 130), as amended.

(11) "Responsible
administrative authority" means, with respect to a structured settlement,
any government authority vested by law with exclusive jurisdiction over the
settled claim resolved by such structured settlement.

(12) "Settled
claim" means the original tort claim or workers' compensation claim
resolved by a structured settlement.

(13) "Structured
settlement" means an arrangement for periodic payment of compensation for
injuries or sickness as described in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 104(a)(1) or (2), as
amended, or an arrangement for periodic payment of benefits under a special
needs trust as described in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396p(d)(4), as amended.

(14) "Structured
settlement agreement" means the agreement, judgment, stipulation, or
release embodying the terms of a structured settlement.

(15) "Structured
settlement obligor" means, with respect to any structured settlement, the
party that has the continuing obligation to make periodic payments to the payee
under a structured settlement agreement or a qualified assignment agreement.

(16) "Structured
settlement payment rights" means rights to receive periodic payments under
a structured settlement, whether from the structured settlement obligor or the
annuity issuer, if:

(a) The payee is
domiciled in, or the domicile or principal place of business of the structured
settlement obligor or the annuity issuer is located in, this state;

(b) The structured
settlement agreement was approved by a court or responsible administrative
authority in this state; or

(c) The structured
settlement agreement is expressly governed by the laws of this state.

(17) "Terms of the
structured settlement" means, with respect to any structured settlement,
the terms of the structured settlement agreement, the annuity contract, any
qualified assignment agreement and any order or other approval of any court or
responsible administrative authority or other government authority that
authorized or approved such structured settlement.

(18)
"Transfer" means any sale, assignment, pledge, hypothecation or other
alienation or encumbrance of structured settlement payment rights made by a
payee for consideration. However, "transfer" does not mean the
creation or perfection of a security interest in structured settlement payment
rights under a blanket security agreement entered into with an insured
depository institution, in the absence of any action to redirect the structured
settlement payments to such insured depository institution, or an agent or
successor in interest thereof, or otherwise to enforce such blanket security
interest against the structured settlement payment rights.

(19) "Transfer
agreement" means the agreement providing for a transfer of structured
settlement payment rights.

(20) "Transfer
expenses" means all expenses of a transfer that are required under the
transfer agreement to be paid by the payee or deducted from the gross advance
amount, including, without limitation, court filing fees, attorneys' fees,
escrow fees, lien recordation fees, judgment and lien search fees, finders'
fees, commissions, and other payments to a broker or other intermediary.
"Transfer expenses" does not mean preexisting obligations of the
payee payable for the payee's account from the proceeds of a transfer.

(21)
"Transferee" means a party acquiring or proposing to acquire
structured settlement payment rights through a transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Not less than three days
prior to the date on which a payee signs a transfer agreement, the transferee
shall provide to the payee a separate disclosure statement, in bold type no
smaller than 14 points, setting forth:

(1) The amounts and due
dates of the structured settlement payments to be transferred;

(2) The aggregate
amount of such payments;

(3) The discounted
present value of the payments to be transferred, which shall be identified as
the "calculation of current value of the transferred structured settlement
payments under federal standards for valuing annuities", and the amount of
the applicable federal rate used in calculating such discounted present value;

(4) The gross advance
amount;

(5) An itemized listing
of all applicable transfer expenses, other than attorneys' fees and related
disbursements payable in connection with the transferee's application for
approval of the transfer, and the transferee's best estimate of the amount of
any such fees and disbursements;

(6) The net advance
amount;

(7) The amount of any
penalties or liquidated damages payable by the payee in the event of any breach
of the transfer agreement by the payee; and

(8) A statement that
the payee has the right to cancel the transfer agreement, without penalty or
further obligation, not later than the third business day after the date the
agreement is signed by the payee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A direct or indirect
transfer of structured settlement payment rights is not effective and a
structured settlement obligor or annuity issuer is not required to make any
payment directly or indirectly to any transferee of structured settlement
payment rights unless the transfer has been approved in advance in a final
court order or order of a responsible administrative authority based on express
findings by such court or responsible administrative authority that:

(1) The transfer is in
the best interest of the payee, taking into account the welfare and support of
the payee's dependents;

(2) The payee has been
advised in writing by the transferee to seek independent professional advice
regarding the transfer and has either received such advice or knowingly waived
such advice in writing; and

(3) The transfer does
not contravene any applicable statute or the order of any court or other
government authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Following a transfer of
structured settlement payment rights under this chapter:

(1) The structured
settlement obligor and the annuity issuer shall, as to all parties except the
transferee, be discharged and released from any and all liability for the
transferred payments;

(2) The transferee
shall be liable to the structured settlement obligor and the annuity issuer:

(a) If the transfer
contravenes the terms of the structured settlement, for any taxes incurred by
such parties as a consequence of the transfer; and

(b) For any other
liabilities or costs, including reasonable costs and attorneys' fees, arising
from compliance by such parties with the order of the court or responsible
administrative authority or arising as a consequence of the transferee's
failure to comply with this chapter;

(3) Neither the annuity
issuer nor the structured settlement obligor may be required to divide any
periodic payment between the payee and any transferee or assignee or between
two, or more, transferees or assignees; and

(4) Any further
transfer of structured settlement payment rights by the payee may be made only
after compliance with all of the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) An application under
this chapter for approval of a transfer of structured settlement payment rights
shall be made by the transferee and may be brought in the county in which the
payee resides, in the county in which the structured settlement obligor or the
annuity issuer maintains its principal place of business, or in any court or
before any responsible administrative authority which approved the structured
settlement agreement.

(2) Not less than
twenty days prior to the scheduled hearing on any application for approval of a
transfer of structured settlement payment rights under section 4 of this act,
the transferee shall file with the court or responsible administrative authority
and serve on all interested parties a notice of the proposed transfer and the
application for its authorization, including with such notice:

(a) A copy of the
transferee's application;

(b) A copy of the
transfer agreement;

(c) A copy of the
disclosure statement required under section 3 of this act;

(d) A listing of each
of the payee's dependents, together with each dependent's age;

(e) Notification that
any interested party is entitled to support, oppose, or otherwise respond to
the transferee's application, either in person or by counsel, by submitting
written comments to the court or responsible administrative authority or by
participating in the hearing; and

(f) Notification of the
time and place of the hearing and notification of the manner in which and the
time by which written responses to the application must be filed, which may not
be less than fifteen days after service of the transferee's notice, in order to
be considered by the court or responsible administrative authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The provisions of
this chapter may not be waived by any payee.

(2) Any transfer
agreement entered into on or after the effective date of this act by a payee
who resides in this state shall provide that disputes under such transfer
agreement, including any claim that the payee has breached the agreement, shall
be determined in and under the laws of this state. Such a transfer agreement
may not authorize the transferee or any other party to confess judgment or consent
to entry of judgment against the payee.

(3) Transfer of
structured settlement payment rights do not extend to any payments that are
life contingent unless, prior to the date on which the payee signs the transfer
agreement, the transferee has established and has agreed to maintain procedures
reasonably satisfactory to the annuity issuer and the structured settlement
obligor for (a) periodically confirming the payee's survival, and (b) giving
the annuity issuer and the structured settlement obligor prompt written notice
in the event of the payee's death.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Sections 1 through 7 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---