BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that many teachers must live some distance from the schools in which they
teach. The legislature also finds that some teachers must juggle the demands
of teaching young students, raising young children, and commuting long distances
on increasingly congested roads. Many of these teachers are in the beginning
phase of their teaching careers, so their salaries are at the lowest steps of
the salary schedule. This circumstance complicates the teachers' ability to
manage financial obligations such as the repayment of college debts, meeting
housing costs, commuting, and paying for child care. The legislature finds
that school districts could provide a great boon to these teachers by giving
them the option of enrolling their school-age children in the school and school
district in which the teacher works. Therefore, the legislature intends to
permit the children of teachers to attend school in the school or district
where their parent teaches.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.225.220 and 1995
c 335 s 602 and 1995 c 52 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1) Any board of
directors may make agreements with adults choosing to attend school, and may
charge the adults reasonable tuition.

(2) A district is strongly
encouraged to honor the request of a parent or guardian for his or her child to
attend a school in another district or the request of a parent or guardian for
his or her child to transfer as a student receiving home-based instruction.

(3) A district shall
permit children of a certificated employee to attend a school to which the
employee is assigned. The district shall also permit a certificated employee
to register his or her children either from the employee's home address or from
a school to which the employee is assigned.

(4) A district
shall release a student to a nonresident district that agrees to accept the
student if:

(a) A financial,
educational, safety, or health condition affecting the student would likely be
reasonably improved as a result of the transfer; or

(b) Attendance at the
school in the nonresident district is more accessible to the parent's place of
work or to the location of child care; or

(c) There is a special
hardship or detrimental condition.

(((4))) (5)
A district may deny the request of a resident student to transfer to a
nonresident district if the release of the student would adversely affect the
district's existing desegregation plan.

(((5))) (6)
For the purpose of helping a district assess the quality of its education
program, a resident school district may request an optional exit interview or
questionnaire with the parents or guardians of a child transferring to another
district. No parent or guardian may be forced to attend such an interview or
complete the questionnaire.

(((6)))
(7) Beginning with the 1993-94 school year, school districts may not
charge transfer fees or tuition for nonresident students enrolled under
subsection (((3))) (4) of this section and RCW 28A.225.225.
Reimbursement of a high school district for cost of educating high school
pupils of a nonhigh school district shall not be deemed a transfer fee as
affecting the apportionment of current state school funds.

---
END ---