BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to assure that appeals of department of ecology decisions regarding changes or
transfers of water rights that are the subject of an ongoing general
adjudication of water rights are governed by an appeals process that is
efficient and eliminates unnecessary duplication, while fully preserving the
rights of all affected parties.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.21B.110 and 1998
c 262 s 18, 1998 c 156 s 8, and 1998 c 36 s 22 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1) The hearings board
shall only have jurisdiction to hear and decide appeals from the following
decisions of the department, the director, local conservation districts, and
the air pollution control boards or authorities as established pursuant to
chapter 70.94 RCW, or local health departments:

(a) Civil penalties
imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431, 70.105.080, 70.107.050,
88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and 90.56.330.

(b) Orders issued
pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060, 43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332,
70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070, 90.14.130, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.

(c) Except as provided
in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance, modification, or termination of any
permit, certificate, or license by the department or any air authority in the
exercise of its jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste
disposal permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit, or a
decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste permit exemption
under RCW 70.95.300.

(d) Decisions of local
health departments regarding the grant or denial of solid waste permits
pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.

(e) Decisions of local
health departments regarding the issuance and enforcement of permits to use or
dispose of biosolids under RCW 70.95J.080.

(f) Decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived fertilizer or micronutrient fertilizer under
RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the department regarding waste-derived soil
amendments under RCW 70.95.205.

(g) Decisions of local
conservation districts related to the denial of approval or denial of
certification of a dairy nutrient management plan; conditions contained in a
plan; application of any dairy nutrient management practices, standards,
methods, and technologies to a particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to
the plan review and approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.

(h) Any other decision
by the department or an air authority which pursuant to law must be decided as
an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The following
hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings board:

(a) Hearings required
by law to be conducted by the shorelines hearings board pursuant to chapter
90.58 RCW.

(b) Hearings conducted
by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332, 70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400,
70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.

(c) Proceedings conducted
by the department ((relating to general adjudications of water rights
pursuant to chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW)), or the department's designee,
under RCW 90.03.160 through 90.03.210 or 90.44.220.

(d) Hearings conducted
by the department to adopt, modify, or repeal rules.

(3) Review of rules and
regulations adopted by the hearings board shall be subject to review in
accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter
34.05 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 34.05.514 and 1995 c
347 s 113 and 1995 c 292 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, proceedings for review
under this chapter shall be instituted by paying the fee required under RCW
36.18.020 and filing a petition in the superior court, at the petitioner's
option, for (a) Thurston county, (b) the county of the petitioner's residence
or principal place of business, or (c) in any county where the property owned
by the petitioner and affected by the contested decision is located.

(2) For proceedings
involving institutions of higher education, the petition shall be filed either
in the county in which the principal office of the institution involved is
located or in the county of a branch campus if the action involves such branch.

(3) For proceedings
involving decisions of the department on applications for changes or transfers
of water rights that are the subject of a general adjudication of water rights
that is being litigated actively under chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW, the petition
must be filed with the superior court conducting the adjudication, to be
consolidated by the court with the general adjudication.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.21B.310 and 1992
c 73 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), any order issued by the department, the administrator
of the office of marine safety, or authority pursuant to RCW 70.94.211,
70.94.332, 70.105.095, 43.27A.190, 86.16.020, 88.46.070, or 90.48.120(2) or any
provision enacted after July 26, 1987, or any permit, certificate, or license
issued by the department may be appealed to the pollution control hearings
board if the appeal is filed with the board and served on the department or
authority within thirty days after receipt of the order. Except as provided
under chapter 70.105D RCW and RCW 90.03.210(2), this is the exclusive
means of appeal of such an order.

(2) The department, the
administrator, or the authority in its discretion may stay the effectiveness of
an order during the pendency of such an appeal.

(3) At any time during
the pendency of an appeal of such an order to the board, the appellant may
apply pursuant to RCW 43.21B.320 to the hearings board for a stay of the order
or for the removal thereof.

(4) Any appeal must
contain the following in accordance with the rules of the hearings board:

(a) The appellant's
name and address;

(b) The date and docket
number of the order, permit, or license appealed;

(c) A description of
the substance of the order, permit, or license that is the subject of the
appeal;

(d) A clear, separate,
and concise statement of every error alleged to have been committed;

(e) A clear and concise
statement of facts upon which the requester relies to sustain his or her
statements of error; and

(f) A statement setting
forth the relief sought.

(5) Upon failure to
comply with any final order of the department or the administrator, the
attorney general, on request of the department or the administrator, may bring
an action in the superior court of the county where the violation occurred or
the potential violation is about to occur to obtain such relief as necessary,
including injunctive relief, to insure compliance with the order. The air
authorities may bring similar actions to enforce their orders.

(6) An appealable
decision or order shall be identified as such and shall contain a conspicuous
notice to the recipient that it may be appealed only by filing an appeal with
the hearings board and serving it on the department within thirty days of
receipt.

Sec. 5. RCW 90.03.210 and 1988 c
202 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) During the
pendency of such adjudication proceedings prior to judgment or upon review by
an appellate court, the stream or other water involved shall be regulated or
partially regulated according to the schedule of rights specified in the
department's report upon an order of the court authorizing such regulation:
PROVIDED, Any interested party may file a bond and obtain an order staying the
regulation of said stream as to him, in which case the court shall make such
order regarding the regulation of the stream or other water as he may deem
just. The bond shall be filed within five days following the service of notice
of appeal in an amount to be fixed by the court and with sureties satisfactory
to the court, conditioned to perform the judgment of the court.

(2) Any appeal of a
decision of the department on an application to change or transfer a water
right subject to a general adjudication that is being litigated actively and was
commenced before October 13, 1977, shall be conducted as follows:

(a) The appeal shall
be filed with the court conducting the adjudication and served under RCW
34.05.542(3). The content of the notice of appeal shall conform to RCW
34.05.546.

(b) If the appeal
includes a challenge to the portion of the department's decision that contains
tentative determinations of the validity and extent of the water right, review
of those tentative determinations shall be conducted by the court consistent
with the provisions of RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, except that the review
shall be de novo.

(c) If the appeal
includes a challenge to any portion of the department's decision other than the
tentative determinations of the validity and extent of the right, the court
must certify to the pollution control hearings board for review and decision
those portions of the department's decision. Review by the pollution control
hearings board shall be conducted consistent with chapter 43.21B RCW and the
board's implementing regulations, except that:

(i) The requirements
for filing, service, and content of the notice of appeal shall be governed by
(a) of this subsection; and

(ii) The board shall
render a decision on the issues certified by the court within one hundred eighty
days after the date the certification is received by the board. The time
period may be extended by the board for a period of thirty days upon a showing
of good cause or may be waived by the parties.

(d) Any person
wishing to appeal the decision of the board made under (c) of this subsection
shall seek review of the decision in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, except
that the petition for review must be filed with the superior court conducting
the adjudication.

(3) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to affect or modify any treaty or other federal
rights of an Indian tribe, or the rights of any federal agency or other person
or entity arising under federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Nothing in this act shall
be construed to affect or modify any treaty or other federal rights of an
Indian tribe, or the rights of any federal agency or other person or entity
arising under federal law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---