BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to increase the authority of the public disclosure commission and
the courts to more effectively foster compliance with our state's requirements
regarding campaign finance and contribution limits, lobbying, political
advertising, and reporting of public officials' financial affairs. It is the
intent of the legislature to make the agency's penalty authority for violations
of the campaign, lobbying, political advertising, and public officials'
financial affairs provisions in RCW 42.17.010 through 42.17.245 and 42.17.350
through 42.17.790 more consistent with other agencies that enforce state ethics
laws.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.17.390 and 1993 c
2 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

One or more of the
following civil remedies and sanctions may be imposed by court order in
addition to any other remedies provided by law:

(1) If the court finds
that the violation of any provision of this chapter by any candidate or
political committee probably affected the outcome of any election, the result
of said election may be held void and a special election held within sixty days
of such finding. Any action to void an election shall be commenced within one
year of the date of the election in question. It is intended that this remedy
be imposed freely in all appropriate cases to protect the right of the
electorate to an informed and knowledgeable vote.

(2) If any lobbyist or
sponsor of any grass roots lobbying campaign violates any of the provisions of
this chapter, his or her registration may be revoked or suspended and he
or she may be enjoined from receiving compensation or making
expenditures for lobbying: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That imposition of such sanction
shall not excuse said lobbyist from filing statements and reports required by
this chapter.

(3) Any person who
violates any of the provisions of ((this chapter)) RCW 42.17.010
through 42.17.245 and 42.17.350 through 42.17.790 may be subject to a civil
penalty of not more than ((ten)) forty thousand dollars for each
such violation. However, a person or entity who violates RCW 42.17.640 may be ordered
to return a contribution illegally accepted and may be subject to a civil
penalty of ((ten)) forty thousand dollars or three times the
amount of the contribution illegally made or accepted, whichever is greater.

(4) Any person who
fails to file a properly completed statement or report within the time required
by this chapter may be subject to a civil penalty of ten dollars per day for
each day each such delinquency continues.

(5) Any person who
fails to report a contribution or expenditure as required by this chapter
may be subject to a civil penalty equivalent to the amount ((he failed to
report)) not reported as required.

(6) Any person found
to have violated RCW 42.17.130 or 42.17.190 may be ordered to pay restitution
in addition to paying any penalties imposed.

(7) Any person found
to have violated RCW 42.17.130 or 42.17.190 may be ordered to pay any civil
penalty and any restitution with funds that are not public funds as defined in
RCW 43.88.020 or as derived through taxes, fees, penalties, or other similar
sources.

(8) Any person
subject to RCW 42.17.010 through 42.17.245 or 42.17.350 through 42.17.790 may
be ordered to take all actions necessary to comply with those sections and
Title 390 WAC, including but not limited to the returning of contributions made
or received in violation of RCW 42.17.105(8) or 42.17.640.

(9) The court
may enjoin any person to prevent the doing of any act herein prohibited, or to
compel the performance of any act required herein. The court may also
enjoin:

(a) Any lobbyist,
lobbyist employer, or sponsor of a grass roots lobbying campaign who has not
paid penalties imposed by the court or the commission from registering as a
lobbyist, receiving compensation as a lobbyist, or making expenditures for
lobbying purposes until the lobbyist, lobbyist employer, or sponsor pays such
fines in full;

(b) Any candidate,
authorized committee, political committee, or the officers or employees thereof
who have not paid penalties imposed by the court or the commission from
soliciting, raising, accepting, or spending campaign funds or contributions
until the time such fines are paid in full. This restriction applies to the
political committee against which an order and remedies were issued as well as
to a political committee that has a majority of the same persons serving as
committee officers as the committee that is subject to the order.

Sec. 3. RCW 42.17.395 and 1989 c
175 s 91 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission may
(a) determine whether an actual violation of ((this chapter)) RCW
42.17.010 through 42.17.245 or 42.17.350 through 42.17.790 has occurred;
and (b) issue and enforce an appropriate order following such determination.

(2) The commission, in
cases where it chooses to determine whether an actual violation ((of this
chapter)) has occurred, shall hold a hearing pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to make such determination. Any order that
the commission issues under this section shall be pursuant to such hearing.

(3) In lieu of holding
a hearing or issuing an order under this section, the commission may refer the
matter to the attorney general or other enforcement agency as provided in RCW
42.17.360.

(4) The person against
whom an order is directed under this section shall be designated as the
respondent. The order may require the respondent to cease and desist from the
activity that constitutes a violation and in addition, or alternatively, may
impose one or more of the remedies provided in RCW 42.17.390(((1) (b), (c),
(d), or (e))) (2) through (8): PROVIDED, That no ((individual))
penalty assessed by the commission may exceed ((one)) five
thousand dollars((, and in any case where multiple violations are involved
in a single complaint or hearing, the maximum aggregate penalty may not exceed
two thousand five hundred dollars)) per violation.

(5) An order issued by
the commission under this section shall be subject to judicial review under the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. If the commission's order is
not satisfied and no petition for review is filed within thirty days as
provided in RCW 34.05.542, the commission may petition a court of competent
jurisdiction of any county in which a petition for review could be filed under
that section, for an order of enforcement. Proceedings in connection with the
commission's petition shall be in accordance with RCW 42.17.397.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---