BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The sponsor of
political advertising who, within twenty-one days of an election, publishes,
mails, or otherwise presents to the public political advertising supporting or
opposing a candidate or ballot proposition that qualifies as an independent expenditure
with a fair market value of one thousand dollars or more shall deliver, either
electronically or in written form, a special report to the commission within
twenty-four hours of, or on the first working day after, the date the political
advertising is first published, mailed, or otherwise presented to the public.

(2) If a sponsor is
required to file a special report under this section, the sponsor shall also
deliver to the commission within the delivery period established in subsection
(1) of this section a special report for each subsequent independent
expenditure of any size supporting or opposing the same candidate who was the
subject of the previous independent expenditure, supporting or opposing that
candidate's opponent, or supporting or opposing the same ballot proposition
that was the subject of the previous independent expenditure.

(3) The special report
must include at least:

(a) The name and
address of the person making the expenditure;

(b) The name and
address of the person to whom the expenditure was made;

(c) A detailed
description of the expenditure;

(d) The date the
expenditure was made and the date the political advertising was first published
or otherwise presented to the public;

(e) The amount of the
expenditure;

(f) The name of the
candidate supported or opposed by the expenditure, the office being sought by
the candidate, and whether the expenditure supports or opposes the candidate;
or the name of the ballot proposition supported or opposed by the expenditure
and whether the expenditure supports or opposes the ballot proposition; and

(g) Any other
information the commission may require by rule.

(4) All persons
required to report under RCW 42.17.080, 42.17.090, and 42.17.100 are subject to
the requirements of this section. The commission may determine that reports
filed pursuant to this section also satisfy the requirements of RCW 42.17.100.

(5) The sponsor of
independent expenditures supporting a candidate or opposing that candidate's
opponent required to report under this section shall file with each required
report an affidavit or declaration of the person responsible for making the
independent expenditure that the expenditure was not made in cooperation,
consultation, or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, the
candidate, the candidate's authorized committee, or the candidate's agent, or
with the encouragement or approval of the candidate, the candidate's authorized
committee, or the candidate's agent.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.17.105 and 1995 c
397 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Campaign treasurers
shall prepare and deliver to the commission a special report regarding any
contribution or aggregate of contributions which: ((Exceeds five hundred))
Is one thousand dollars or more; is from a single person or
entity; and is received during a special reporting period.

Any political committee
making a contribution or an aggregate of contributions to a single entity which
((exceeds five hundred)) is one thousand dollars or more
shall also prepare and deliver to the commission the special report if the
contribution or aggregate of contributions is made during a special reporting
period.

For the purposes of
subsections (1) through (7) of this section:

(a) Each of the
following intervals is a special reporting period: (i) The interval beginning
after the period covered by the last report required by RCW 42.17.080 and
42.17.090 to be filed before a primary and concluding on the end of the day
before that primary; and (ii) the interval composed of the twenty-one days
preceding a general election; and

(b) An aggregate of
contributions includes only those contributions received from a single entity
during any one special reporting period or made by the contributing political
committee to a single entity during any one special reporting period.

(2) If a campaign
treasurer files a special report under this section for one or more
contributions received from a single entity during a special reporting period,
the treasurer shall also file a special report under this section for each
subsequent contribution of any size which is received from that entity during
the special reporting period. If a political committee files a special report
under this section for a contribution or contributions made to a single entity
during a special reporting period, the political committee shall also file a
special report for each subsequent contribution of any size which is made to
that entity during the special reporting period.

(3) Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, the special report required by this section
shall be delivered electronically or in written form, including but not limited
to mailgram, telegram, or nightletter. The special report required of a
contribution recipient by subsection (1) of this section shall be delivered to
the commission within forty-eight hours of the time, or on the first working
day after: The contribution ((exceeding five hundred)) of one
thousand dollars or more is received by the candidate or treasurer;
the aggregate received by the candidate or treasurer first ((exceeds five
hundred)) equals one thousand dollars or more; or the
subsequent contribution that must be reported under subsection (2) of this section
is received by the candidate or treasurer. The special report required of a
contributor by subsection (1) of this section or RCW 42.17.175 shall be
delivered to the commission, and the candidate or political committee to whom
the contribution or contributions are made, within twenty-four hours of the
time, or on the first working day after: The contribution is made; the
aggregate of contributions made first ((exceeds five hundred)) equals
one thousand dollars or more; or the subsequent contribution that
must be reported under subsection (2) of this section is made.

(4) The special report
may be transmitted orally by telephone to the commission to satisfy the
delivery period required by subsection (3) of this section if the written form
of the report is also mailed to the commission and postmarked within the
delivery period established in subsection (3) of this section or the file
transfer date of the electronic filing is within the delivery period
established in subsection (3) of this section.

(5) The special report
shall include at least:

(a) The amount of the
contribution or contributions;

(b) The date or dates
of receipt;

(c) The name and
address of the donor;

(d) The name and
address of the recipient; and

(e) Any other
information the commission may by rule require.

(6) Contributions
reported under this section shall also be reported as required by other
provisions of this chapter.

(7) The commission
shall prepare daily a summary of the special reports made under this section
and RCW 42.17.175.

(8) It is a violation
of this chapter for any person to make, or for any candidate or political
committee to accept from any one person, contributions reportable under RCW
42.17.090 in the aggregate exceeding fifty thousand dollars for any campaign
for statewide office or exceeding five thousand dollars for any other campaign
subject to the provisions of this chapter within twenty-one days of a general
election. This subsection does not apply to contributions made by, or accepted
from, a bona fide political party as defined in this chapter, excluding the
county central committee or legislative district committee.

(9)
Contributions governed by this section include, but are not limited to,
contributions made or received indirectly through a third party or entity
whether the contributions are or are not reported to the commission as
earmarked contributions under RCW 42.17.135.

Sec. 3. RCW 42.17.175 and 1991 c
157 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any lobbyist registered
under RCW 42.17.150, any person who lobbies, and any lobbyist's employer making
a contribution or an aggregate of contributions to a single entity that ((exceeds
five hundred)) is one thousand dollars or more during a
special reporting period before a primary or general election, as such period
is specified in RCW 42.17.105(1), shall file one or more special reports for
the contribution or aggregate of contributions and for subsequent contributions
made during that period under the same circumstances and to the same extent
that a contributing political committee must file such a report or reports
under RCW 42.17.105. Such a special report shall be filed in the same manner
provided under RCW 42.17.105 for a special report of a contributing political
committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002.

---
END ---