BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART 1

ADULT FAMILY HOME ADVISORY COMMITTEE

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. RCW 18.48.060 (Advisory
committee--Composition--Vacancies--Meetings--Travel expenses--Civil immunity)
and 2000 c 171 s 18 & 1998 c 272 s 8 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. A new section is added
to chapter 18.48 RCW to read as follows:

In consultation with
stakeholders interested in maintaining a healthy option for the aging
population in a community setting, the secretary of the department of health
shall establish appropriate public involvement and outreach mechanisms designed
to ensure effective communication on regulation, enforcement, staffing,
training requirements, and other matters pertaining to adult family homes.

PART
2

PRODUCTIVITY BOARD

Sec. 201. RCW 41.60.150 and 2000 c
139 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((Other than)) In
addition to suggestion awards and incentive pay unit awards provided in
section 203 of this act, agencies shall have the authority to recognize
employees, either individually or as a class, for accomplishments including
outstanding achievements, safety performance, longevity, outstanding public
service, or service as employee suggestion evaluators and implementors.
Recognition awards may not exceed two hundred dollars in value per award. Such
awards may include, but not be limited to, cash or such items as pen and desk
sets, plaques, pins, framed certificates, clocks, and calculators. Award costs
shall be paid by the agency giving the award.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 41.60.010 (Definitions) and 1999 c
50 s 1, 1993 c 467 s 1, 1987 c 387 s 1, 1983 c 54 s 1, 1982 c 167 s 6, 1977
ex.s. c 169 s 103, 1969 ex.s. c 152 s 3, & 1965 ex.s. c 142 s 1;

(2) RCW 41.60.015 (Productivity board
created--Also known as employee involvement and recognition
board--Members--Terms--Compensation) and 2000 c 139 s 1, 1999 c 50 s 2, 1993 c
467 s 2, 1987 c 387 s 2, 1985 c 114 s 1, 1984 c 287 s 72, 1983 c 54 s 2, &
1982 c 167 s 1;

(3) RCW 41.60.020 (Employee suggestion
program--Rules for administration of chapter) and 1999 c 50 s 3, 1995 c 181 s
1, 1993 c 467 s 3, 1982 c 167 s 7, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 122 s 1, 1969 ex.s. c
152 s 4, & 1965 ex.s. c 142 s 2;

(4) RCW 41.60.030 (Employee suggestion
program--Determination of award) and 1999 c 50 s 4, 1982 c 167 s 8, & 1965
ex.s. c 142 s 3;

(5) RCW 41.60.041 (Employee suggestion
program--Amount and payment of award--Transfer of funds to general fund) and
1999 c 50 s 5, 1989 c 56 s 1, 1987 c 387 s 3, 1985 c 114 s 2, & 1982 c 167
s 9;

(6) RCW 41.60.050 (Appropriations for
administrative costs) and 1991 sp.s. c 16 s 918, 1987 c 387 s 4, 1985 c 114 s
3, 1983 c 54 s 3, 1982 c 167 s 11, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 122 s 3, 1969 ex.s. c
152 s 6, & 1965 ex.s. c 142 s 5;

(7) RCW 41.60.080 (Employee suggestion
program--Contests to encourage participation) and 1999 c 50 s 6, 1982 c 167 s
12, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 122 s 5;

(8) RCW 41.60.100 (Employee teamwork
incentive program--Applications) and 1999 c 50 s 7, 1993 c 467 s 4, 1989 c 56 s
2, 1987 c 387 s 5, 1985 c 114 s 4, & 1982 c 167 s 2;

(9) RCW 41.60.110 (Employee teamwork
incentive program--Evaluation of savings) and 1999 c 50 s 8, 1993 c 467 s 5,
1989 c 56 s 3, 1987 c 387 s 6, 1985 c 114 s 5, & 1982 c 167 s 3;

(10) RCW 41.60.120 (Employee teamwork
incentive program--Awards) and 1999 c 50 s 9, 1993 c 467 s 6, 1989 c 56 s 4,
1987 c 387 s 7, 1985 c 114 s 6, & 1982 c 167 s 4;

(11) RCW 41.60.160 (Persons ineligible for
awards) and 1993 c 467 s 7 & 1987 c 387 s 8;

(12) RCW 41.60.910 (Severability--1975-'76
2nd ex.s. c 122) and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 122 s 9; and

(13) RCW 41.60.911 (Effective dates--1987 c
387) and 1987 c 387 s 11.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. A new section is added
to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

The office of financial
management, in consultation with the department of personnel and employee
organizations, shall establish program guidelines, objectives, and appropriate
accounting controls for a statewide employee suggestion program to be administered
by individual agencies. The program shall include both an individual employee
suggestion program and a team incentive program, and provide monetary
incentives. The program shall be designed to promote productivity suggestions
that are linked to an agency's quality improvement program and its performance
goals and objectives.

PART
3

DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

REGIONAL ADVISORY COMMITTEES

Sec. 301. RCW 43.20A.360 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 9 s 214 and 1989 c 11 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:

(1) The secretary is
hereby authorized to appoint such advisory committees or councils as may be
required by any federal legislation as a condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the department. The secretary may appoint statewide committees or
councils in the following subject areas: (a) Health facilities; (b) children
and youth services; (c) blind services; (d) medical and health care; (e) drug
abuse and alcoholism; (f) social services; (g) economic services; (h)
vocational services; (i) rehabilitative services; and on such other subject
matters as are or come within the department's responsibilities. ((The
secretary shall appoint committees or councils advisory to the department in
each service delivery region to be designated by the secretary.)) The
statewide ((and the regional)) councils shall have representation from
both major political parties and shall have substantial consumer
representation. Such committees or councils shall be constituted as required
by federal law or as the secretary in his or her discretion may determine. The
members of the committees or councils shall hold office for three years except
in the case of a vacancy, in which event appointment shall be only for the remainder
of the unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs. No member shall serve more
than two consecutive terms.

(2) Members of such
state advisory committees or councils may be paid their travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter
amended. ((Members of regional advisory committees may, in the discretion
of the secretary, be paid the same travel expenses as set forth above.))

(3) The secretary,
in consultation with affected constituent groups, shall establish appropriate
public involvement and outreach mechanisms designed to ensure effective
communication relating to the programs, policies, and operations of the
department, from both a regional and statewide perspective.

PART
4

DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

STATE ADVISORY COMMITTEE

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.20A.370 (State advisory committee
to department--Created--Membership--Terms--Vacancies) and 1988 c 49 s 1, 1984 c
259 s 2, & 1971 ex.s. c 189 s 13;

(2) RCW 43.20A.375 (State advisory committee
to department--Powers and duties) and 1999 c 372 s 6, 1988 c 49 s 2, 1984 c 259
s 3, & 1971 ex.s. c 189 s 14; and

(3) RCW 43.20A.380 (State advisory committee
to department--Travel expenses) and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 99 & 1971
ex.s. c 189 s 15.

PART
5

WASHINGTON STATE JOB TRAINING
COORDINATING COUNCIL

NEW SECTION. Sec.
501. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 50.67.010 (Council created) and 1991
c 238 s 14;

(2) RCW 50.67.020 (Membership of
council--Assistance to work force training and education coordinating board)
and 1991 c 238 s 15; and

(3) RCW 50.67.030 (Washington youthbuild
program--Council to advise) and 1994 sp.s. c 3 s 8.

PART
6

SOLID WASTE ADVISORY COMMITTEE

Sec. 601. RCW 70.95.030 and 1998 c
36 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1) "City"
means every incorporated city and town.

(2)
"Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.

(3) (("Committee"
means the state solid waste advisory committee.

(4))) "Composted material" means organic
solid waste that has been subjected to controlled aerobic degradation at a
solid waste facility in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
Natural decay of organic solid waste under uncontrolled conditions does not
result in composted material.

(((5))) (4)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(((6))) (5)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology.

(((7))) (6)
"Disposal site" means the location where any final treatment,
utilization, processing, or deposit of solid waste occurs.

(((8))) (7)
"Energy recovery" means a process operating under federal and state
environmental laws and regulations for converting solid waste into usable
energy and for reducing the volume of solid waste.

(((9))) (8)
"Functional standards" means criteria for solid waste handling
expressed in terms of expected performance or solid waste handling functions.

(((10))) (9)
"Incineration" means a process of reducing the volume of solid waste
operating under federal and state environmental laws and regulations by use of
an enclosed device using controlled flame combustion.

(((11))) (10)
"Jurisdictional health department" means city, county, city-county,
or district public health department.

(((12))) (11)
"Landfill" means a disposal facility or part of a facility at which
solid waste is placed in or on land and which is not a land treatment facility.

(((13))) (12)
"Local government" means a city, town, or county.

(((14))) (13)
"Modify" means to substantially change the design or operational
plans including, but not limited to, removal of a design element previously set
forth in a permit application or the addition of a disposal or processing
activity that is not approved in the permit.

(((15))) (14)
"Multiple family residence" means any structure housing two or more
dwelling units.

(((16))) (15)
"Person" means individual, firm, association, copartnership,
political subdivision, government agency, municipality, industry, public or
private corporation, or any other entity whatsoever.

(((17))) (16)
"Recyclable materials" means those solid wastes that are separated
for recycling or reuse, such as papers, metals, and glass, that are identified
as recyclable material pursuant to a local comprehensive solid waste plan.
Prior to the adoption of the local comprehensive solid waste plan, adopted
pursuant to RCW 70.95.110(2), local governments may identify recyclable
materials by ordinance from July 23, 1989.

(((18))) (17)
"Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing waste materials
into usable or marketable materials for use other than landfill disposal or
incineration.

(((19))) (18)
"Residence" means the regular dwelling place of an individual or
individuals.

(((20))) (19)
"Sewage sludge" means a semisolid substance consisting of settled
sewage solids combined with varying amounts of water and dissolved materials,
generated from a wastewater treatment system, that does not meet the
requirements of chapter 70.95J RCW.

(((21))) (20)
"Soil amendment" means any substance that is intended to improve the
physical characteristics of the soil, except composted material, commercial
fertilizers, agricultural liming agents, unmanipulated animal manures, unmanipulated
vegetable manures, food wastes, food processing wastes, and materials exempted
by rule of the department, such as biosolids as defined in chapter 70.95J RCW
and wastewater as regulated in chapter 90.48 RCW.

(((22))) (21)
"Solid waste" or "wastes" means all putrescible and
nonputrescible solid and semisolid wastes including, but not limited to,
garbage, rubbish, ashes, industrial wastes, swill, sewage sludge, demolition
and construction wastes, abandoned vehicles or parts thereof, and recyclable
materials.

(((23))) (22)
"Solid waste handling" means the management, storage, collection,
transportation, treatment, utilization, processing, and final disposal of solid
wastes, including the recovery and recycling of materials from solid wastes,
the recovery of energy resources from solid wastes or the conversion of the
energy in solid wastes to more useful forms or combinations thereof.

(((24))) (23)
"Source separation" means the separation of different kinds of solid
waste at the place where the waste originates.

(((25))) (24)
"Vehicle" includes every device physically capable of being moved
upon a public or private highway, road, street, or watercourse and in, upon, or
by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public
or private highway, road, street, or watercourse, except devices moved by human
or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

(((26))) (25)
"Waste-derived soil amendment" means any soil amendment as defined in
this chapter that is derived from solid waste as defined in RCW 70.95.030, but
does not include biosolids or biosolids products regulated under chapter 70.95J
RCW or wastewaters regulated under chapter 90.48 RCW.

(((27))) (26)
"Waste reduction" means reducing the amount or toxicity of waste
generated or reusing materials.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
602. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 70.95.040 (Solid waste advisory
committee--Members--Meetings--Travel expenses--"Governor's award of
excellence") and 1991 c 319 s 401, 1987 c 115 s 1, 1982 c 108 s 1, &
1977 c 10 s 1; and

(2) RCW 70.95.050 (Solid waste advisory
committee--Staff services and facilities) and 1969 ex.s. c 134 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
603. A new section is added
to chapter 70.95 RCW to read as follows:

In consultation with
affected constituent groups, the director shall establish appropriate public
involvement and outreach mechanisms designed to provide the department with
effective public input on programs and policies relating to solid and dangerous
waste management.

PART
7

REGIONAL
CITIZEN'S ADVISORY COMMITTEES

MODEL TOXICS CONTROL ACT

Sec. 701. RCW 70.105D.030 and 1997
c 406 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
exercise the following powers in addition to any other powers granted by law:

(a) Investigate,
provide for investigating, or require potentially liable persons to investigate
any releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances, including but not
limited to inspecting, sampling, or testing to determine the nature or extent
of any release or threatened release. If there is a reasonable basis to
believe that a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance may
exist, the department's authorized employees, agents, or contractors may enter
upon any property and conduct investigations. The department shall give
reasonable notice before entering property unless an emergency prevents such
notice. The department may by subpoena require the attendance or testimony of
witnesses and the production of documents or other information that the
department deems necessary;

(b) Conduct, provide
for conducting, or require potentially liable persons to conduct remedial
actions (including investigations under (a) of this subsection) to remedy
releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances. In carrying out such
powers, the department's authorized employees, agents, or contractors may enter
upon property. The department shall give reasonable notice before entering
property unless an emergency prevents such notice. In conducting, providing
for, or requiring remedial action, the department shall give preference to
permanent solutions to the maximum extent practicable and shall provide for or
require adequate monitoring to ensure the effectiveness of the remedial action;

(c) Indemnify
contractors retained by the department for carrying out investigations and
remedial actions, but not for any contractor's reckless or wilful misconduct;

(d) Carry out all state
programs authorized under the federal cleanup law and the federal resource,
conservation, and recovery act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq., as amended;

(e) Classify substances
as hazardous substances for purposes of RCW 70.105D.020(7) and classify
substances and products as hazardous substances for purposes of RCW
82.21.020(1);

(f) Issue orders or
enter into consent decrees or agreed orders that include, or issue written
opinions under (i) of this subsection that may be conditioned upon, deed
restrictions where necessary to protect human health and the environment from a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance from a facility. Prior
to establishing a deed restriction under this subsection, the department shall
notify and seek comment from a city or county department with land use planning
authority for real property subject to a deed restriction;

(g) Enforce the
application of permanent and effective institutional controls that are
necessary for a remedial action to be protective of human health and the
environment;

(h) Require holders to
conduct remedial actions necessary to abate an imminent or substantial
endangerment pursuant to RCW 70.105D.020(12)(b)(ii)(C);

(i) Provide informal
advice and assistance to persons regarding the administrative and technical
requirements of this chapter. This may include site-specific advice to persons
who are conducting or otherwise interested in independent remedial actions.
Any such advice or assistance shall be advisory only, and shall not be binding
on the department. As a part of providing this advice and assistance for
independent remedial actions, the department may prepare written opinions
regarding whether the independent remedial actions or proposals for those
actions meet the substantive requirements of this chapter or whether the
department believes further remedial action is necessary at the facility. The
department may collect, from persons requesting advice and assistance, the
costs incurred by the department in providing such advice and assistance;
however, the department shall, where appropriate, waive collection of costs in
order to provide an appropriate level of technical assistance in support of
public participation. The state, the department, and officers and employees of
the state are immune from all liability, and no cause of action of any nature
may arise from any act or omission in providing, or failing to provide,
informal advice and assistance; and

(j) Take any other
actions necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including the
power to adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The department
shall immediately implement all provisions of this chapter to the maximum
extent practicable, including investigative and remedial actions where appropriate.
The department shall adopt, and thereafter enforce, rules under chapter 34.05
RCW to:

(a) Provide for public
participation, including at least (i) ((the establishment of regional
citizen's advisory committees, (ii))) public notice of the development of
investigative plans or remedial plans for releases or threatened releases((,))
and (((iii))) (ii) concurrent public notice of all compliance
orders, agreed orders, enforcement orders, or notices of violation;

(b) Establish a hazard
ranking system for hazardous waste sites;

(c) Provide for
requiring the reporting by an owner or operator of releases of hazardous
substances to the environment that may be a threat to human health or the
environment within ninety days of discovery, including such exemptions from
reporting as the department deems appropriate, however this requirement shall
not modify any existing requirements provided for under other laws;

(d) Establish
reasonable deadlines not to exceed ninety days for initiating an investigation
of a hazardous waste site after the department receives notice or otherwise
receives information that the site may pose a threat to human health or the
environment and other reasonable deadlines for remedying releases or threatened
releases at the site;

(e) Publish and
periodically update minimum cleanup standards for remedial actions at least as
stringent as the cleanup standards under section 121 of the federal cleanup
law, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9621, and at least as stringent as all applicable state and
federal laws, including health-based standards under state and federal law; and

(f) Apply industrial
clean-up standards at industrial properties. Rules adopted under this
subsection shall ensure that industrial properties cleaned up to industrial
standards cannot be converted to nonindustrial uses without approval from the
department. The department may require that a property cleaned up to
industrial standards is cleaned up to a more stringent applicable standard as a
condition of conversion to a nonindustrial use. Industrial clean-up standards
may not be applied to industrial properties where hazardous substances
remaining at the property after remedial action pose a threat to human health
or the environment in adjacent nonindustrial areas.

(3) Before November 1st
of each even-numbered year, the department shall develop, with public notice
and hearing, and submit to the ways and means and appropriate standing
environmental committees of the senate and house of representatives a ranked
list of projects and expenditures recommended for appropriation from both the
state and local toxics control accounts. The department shall also provide the
legislature and the public each year with an accounting of the department's
activities supported by appropriations from the state toxics control account,
including a list of known hazardous waste sites and their hazard rankings,
actions taken and planned at each site, how the department is meeting its top
two management priorities under RCW 70.105.150, and all funds expended under this
chapter.

(4) The department
shall establish a scientific advisory board to render advice to the department
with respect to the hazard ranking system, cleanup standards, remedial actions,
deadlines for remedial actions, monitoring, the classification of substances as
hazardous substances for purposes of RCW 70.105D.020(7) and the classification
of substances or products as hazardous substances for purposes of RCW
82.21.020(1). The board shall consist of five independent members to serve
staggered three-year terms. No members may be employees of the department.
Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.

(5) The department
shall establish a program to identify potential hazardous waste sites and to
encourage persons to provide information about hazardous waste sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
702. A new section is added
to chapter 70.105D RCW to read as follows:

In consultation with
affected constituent groups, the director shall establish appropriate public
involvement and outreach mechanisms designed to provide the department with
effective public input on programs and policies relating to the management and
control of hazardous substances.

PART
8

SEA URCHIN AND
SEA CUCUMBER ADVISORY REVIEW BOARD

COASTAL CRAB ADVISORY REVIEW
BOARD

NEW SECTION. Sec.
801. RCW 77.70.030 (Advisory review boards)
and 2000 c 107 s 57, 1999 c 151 s 1601, & 1995 c 269 s 3101 are each
repealed.

PART
9

OCEAN PINK SHRIMP ADVISORY REVIEW
BOARD

NEW SECTION. Sec.
901. RCW 77.70.270 (Ocean pink
shrimp--Delivery license--Reduction of landing requirement) and 2000 c 107 s 75
& 1993 c 376 s 10 are each repealed.

PART
10

SHORELINES GUIDELINES COMMISSION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1001. By July 1, 2001, the
director of the department of ecology shall abolish the shorelines guidelines
commission.

PART
11

WETLANDS MITIGATION BANKING ADVISORY
TEAM

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1101. By July 1, 2001, the
director of the department of ecology shall abolish the wetlands mitigation
banking advisory team.

PART
12

THE
COMMISSION ON LEGISLATIVE BUILDING

PRESERVATION AND RENOVATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1201. By July 1, 2001, the
commission on legislative building preservation and renovation created in House
Concurrent Resolution No. 4410 is abolished.

PART
13

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1301. PART HEADINGS NOT LAW. Part headings used in
this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1302. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---