BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
74.04.005 and 2000 c 218 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 For the purposes of this title, unless the context
indicates

_7 otherwise, the following definitions shall apply:

_8 (1) "Public assistance" or
"assistance"‑-Public aid to persons

_9 in need thereof for any cause, including services,
medical care,

10 assistance grants, disbursing orders, work relief,
general

11 assistance and federal-aid assistance.

12 (2) "Department"‑-The department of
social and health services.

13 (3) "County or local office"‑-The
administrative office for one

14 or more counties or designated service areas.

15 (4) "Director" or "secretary"
means the secretary of social and

16 health services.

17 (5) "Federal-aid assistance"‑-The
specific categories of

18 assistance for which provision is made in any federal
law existing

p. 1 HB
1356

_1 or hereafter passed by which payments are made from the
federal

_2 government to the state in aid or in respect to payment
by the

_3 state for public assistance rendered to any category of
needy

_4 persons for which provision for federal funds or aid may
from time

_5 to time be made, or a federally administered needs-based
program.

_6 (6)(a) "General assistance"‑-Aid to
persons in need who:

_7 (i) Are not eligible to receive federal-aid
assistance, other

_8 than food stamps or food stamp benefits transferred
electronically

_9 and medical assistance; however, an individual who
refuses or

10 fails to cooperate in obtaining federal-aid assistance,
without

11 good cause, is not eligible for general assistance;

12 (ii) Meet one of the following conditions:

13 (A) Pregnant: PROVIDED, That need is based on the
current

14 income and resource requirements of the federal
temporary

15 assistance for needy families program; or

16 (B) Subject to chapter 165, Laws of 1992,
incapacitated from

17 gainful employment by reason of bodily or mental
infirmity that

18 will likely continue for a minimum of ninety days as
determined by

19 the department.

20 (C) Persons who are unemployable due to alcohol or
drug

21 addiction are not eligible for general assistance.
Persons

22 receiving general assistance on July 26, 1987, or
becoming

23 eligible for such assistance thereafter, due to an
alcohol or drug-

24 related incapacity, shall be referred to appropriate
assessment,

25 treatment, shelter, or supplemental security income
referral

26 services as authorized under chapter 74.50 RCW.
Referrals shall be

27 made at the time of application or at the time of
eligibility

28 review. Alcoholic and drug addicted clients who are
receiving

29 general assistance on July 26, 1987, may remain on
general

30 assistance if they otherwise retain their eligibility
until they

31 are assessed for services under chapter 74.50 RCW.
Subsection

32 (6)(a)(ii)(B) of this section shall not be construed to
prohibit

33 the department from granting general assistance benefits
to

34 alcoholics and drug addicts who are incapacitated due to
other

35 physical or mental conditions that meet the eligibility
criteria

36 for the general assistance program;

37 (iii) Are citizens or aliens lawfully admitted for
permanent

38 residence or otherwise residing in the United States
under color

HB 1356 p. 2

_1 of law; and

_2 (iv) Have furnished the department their social
security

_3 account number. If the social security account number
cannot be

_4 furnished because it has not been issued or is not
known, an

_5 application for a number shall be made prior to
authorization of

_6 assistance, and the social security number shall be
provided to

_7 the department upon receipt.

_8 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection
(6)(a)(i),

_9 (ii), and (c) of this section, general assistance shall
be

10 provided to the following recipients of federal-aid
assistance:

11 (i) Recipients of supplemental security income whose
need, as

12 defined in this section, is not met by such supplemental
security

13 income grant because of separation from a spouse; or

14 (ii) To the extent authorized by the legislature in
the

15 biennial appropriations act, to recipients of temporary
assistance

16 for needy families whose needs are not being met because
of a

17 temporary reduction in monthly income below the entitled
benefit

18 payment level caused by loss or reduction of wages or
unemployment

19 compensation benefits or some other unforeseen
circumstances. The

20 amount of general assistance authorized shall not exceed
the

21 difference between the entitled benefit payment level
and the

22 amount of income actually received.

23 (c) General assistance shall be provided only to
persons who

24 are not members of assistance units receiving federal
aid

25 assistance, except as provided in subsection
(6)(a)(ii)(A) and (b)

26 of this section, and will accept available services
which can

27 reasonably be expected to enable the person to work or
reduce the

28 need for assistance unless there is good cause to
refuse. Failure

29 to accept such services shall result in termination
until the

30 person agrees to cooperate in accepting such services
and subject

31 to the following maximum periods of ineligibility after

32 reapplication:

33 (i) First failure: One week;

34 (ii) Second failure within six months: One month;

35 (iii) Third and subsequent failure within one year:
Two

36 months.

37 (d) Persons found eligible for general assistance
based on

38 incapacity from gainful employment may, if otherwise
eligible,

p. 3 HB
1356

_1 receive general assistance pending application for
federal

_2 supplemental security income benefits. Any general
assistance that

_3 is subsequently duplicated by the person's receipt of
supplemental

_4 security income for the same period shall be considered
a debt due

_5 the state and shall by operation of law be subject to
recovery

_6 through all available legal remedies.

_7 (e) The department shall adopt by rule medical
criteria for

_8 general assistance eligibility to ensure that
eligibility

_9 decisions are consistent with statutory requirements and
are based

10 on clear, objective medical information.

11 (f) The process implementing the medical criteria
shall involve

12 consideration of opinions of the treating or consulting
physicians

13 or health care professionals regarding incapacity, and
any

14 eligibility decision which rejects uncontroverted
medical opinion

15 must set forth clear and convincing reasons for doing
so.

16 (g) Recipients of general assistance based upon a
finding of

17 incapacity from gainful employment who remain otherwise
eligible

18 shall not have their benefits terminated absent a clear
showing of

19 material improvement in their medical or mental
condition or

20 specific error in the prior determination that found the
recipient

21 eligible by reason of incapacitation. Recipients of
general

22 assistance based upon pregnancy who relinquish their
child for

23 adoption, remain otherwise eligible, and are not
eligible to

24 receive benefits under the federal temporary assistance
for needy

25 families program shall not have their benefits
terminated until

26 the end of the month in which the period of six weeks
following

27 the birth of the recipient's child falls. Recipients of
the federal

28 temporary assistance for needy families program who lose
their

29 eligibility solely because of the birth and relinquishment
of the

30 qualifying child may receive general assistance through
the end of

31 the month in which the period of six weeks following the
birth of

32 the child falls.

33 (h) No person may be considered an eligible
individual for

34 general assistance with respect to any month if during
that month

35 the person:

36 (i) Is fleeing to avoid prosecution of, or to avoid
custody or

37 confinement for conviction of, a felony, or an attempt
to commit a

38 felony, under the laws of the state of Washington or the
place

HB 1356 p. 4

_1 from which the person flees; or

_2 (ii) Is violating a condition of probation,
community

_3 supervision, or parole imposed under federal or state
law for a

_4 felony or gross misdemeanor conviction.

_5 (7) "Applicant"‑-Any person who has
made a request, or on

_6 behalf of whom a request has been made, to any county or
local

_7 office for assistance.

_8 (8) "Recipient"‑-Any person
receiving assistance and in

_9 addition those dependents whose needs are included in
the

10 recipient's assistance.

11 (9) "Standards of assistance"‑-The
level of income required by

12 an applicant or recipient to maintain a level of living
specified

13 by the department.

14 (10) "Resource"‑-Any cash or
other asset((, tangible or

15 intangible,)) readily convertible to cash
owned by or available to

16 the applicant ((at the time of application)),
which can be applied

17 toward meeting the applicant's need((, either
directly or by

18 conversion into money or its equivalent)). The
department ((may))

19 shall by rule designate maximum resources
that an applicant may

20 retain and ((not)) be ((ineligible)) eligible
for public

21 assistance ((because of such resources. Exempt
resources shall

22 include, but are not limited to:

23 (a) A home that an applicant, recipient, or their
dependents is

24 living in, including the surrounding property;

25 (b) Household furnishings and personal effects;

26 (c) A motor vehicle, other than a motor home,
used and useful

27 having an equity value not to exceed five thousand
dollars;

28 (d) A motor vehicle necessary to transport a
physically

29 disabled household member. This exclusion is limited
to one vehicle

30 per physically disabled person;

31 (e) All other resources, including any excess of
values

32 exempted, not to exceed one thousand dollars or other
limit as set

33 by the department, to be consistent with limitations
on resources

34 and exemptions necessary for federal aid assistance.
The department

35 shall also allow recipients of temporary assistance
for needy

36 families to exempt savings accounts with combined
balances of up

37 to an additional three thousand dollars;

38 (f) Applicants for or recipients of general
assistance shall

p. 5 HB
1356

_1 have their eligibility based on resource limitations
consistent

_2 with the temporary assistance for needy families
program rules

_3 adopted by the department; and

_4 (g) If an applicant for or recipient of public assistance

_5 possesses property and belongings in excess of the
ceiling value,

_6 such value shall be used in determining the need of
the applicant

_7 or recipient, except that: (i) The department may
exempt

_8 resources or income when the income and resources are
determined

_9 necessary to the applicant's or recipient's
restoration to

10 independence, to decrease the need for public
assistance, or to

11 aid in rehabilitating the applicant or recipient or a
dependent of

12 the applicant or recipient; and (ii) the department
may provide

13 grant assistance for a period not to exceed nine
months from the

14 date the agreement is signed pursuant to this section
to persons

15 who are otherwise ineligible because of excess real
property owned

16 by such persons when they are making a good faith
effort to

17 dispose of that property: PROVIDED, That:

18 (A) The applicant or recipient signs an agreement
to repay the

19 lesser of the amount of aid received or the net
proceeds of such

20 sale;

21 (B) If the owner of the excess property ceases to
make good

22 faith efforts to sell the property, the entire amount
of

23 assistance may become an overpayment and a debt due
the state and

24 may be recovered pursuant to RCW 43.20B.630;

25 (C) Applicants and recipients are advised of
their right to a

26 fair hearing and afforded the opportunity to
challenge a decision

27 that good faith efforts to sell have ceased, prior to
assessment

28 of an overpayment under this section; and

29 (D) At the time assistance is authorized, the
department files

30 a lien without a sum certain on the specific property)).

31 (11) "Income"‑-(a) All appreciable
gains in real or personal

32 property (((cash or kind))) or other assets,
which are received by

33 or become available for use and enjoyment by an
applicant or

34 recipient during the month of application or after
applying for or

35 receiving public assistance. The department may by rule
((and

36 regulation)) exempt income received by an
applicant for or

37 recipient of public assistance which can be used by him
or her to

38 decrease his or her need for public assistance or to aid
in

HB 1356 p. 6

_1 rehabilitating him or her or his or her dependents((,
but such

_2 exemption shall not, unless otherwise provided in
this title,

_3 exceed the exemptions of resources granted under this
chapter to

_4 an applicant for public assistance)). In
addition, for cash

_5 assistance the department may disregard income pursuant
to RCW

_6 74.08A.230 and 74.12.350.

_7 (b) If, under applicable federal requirements, the
state has

_8 the option of considering property in the form of lump
sum

_9 compensatory awards or related settlements received by
an

10 applicant or recipient as income or as a resource, the
department

11 shall consider such property to be a resource.

12 (12) "Need"‑-The difference between
the applicant's or

13 recipient's standards of assistance for himself or
herself and the

14 dependent members of his or her family, as measured by
the

15 standards of the department, and value of all nonexempt
resources

16 and nonexempt income received by or available to the
applicant or

17 recipient and the dependent members of his or her
family.

18 (13) For purposes of determining eligibility for
public

19 assistance and participation levels in the cost of
medical care,

20 the department shall exempt restitution payments made to
people of

21 Japanese and Aleut ancestry pursuant to the Civil
Liberties Act of

22 1988 and the Aleutian and Pribilof Island Restitution
Act passed

23 by congress, P.L. 100‑383, including all income
and resources

24 derived therefrom.

25 (14) In the construction of words and phrases used
in this

26 title, the singular number shall include the plural, the
masculine

27 gender shall include both the feminine and neuter
genders and the

28 present tense shall include the past and future tenses,
unless the

29 context thereof shall clearly indicate to the contrary.

30 Sec. 2. RCW
74.13.0903 and 1997 c 58 s 404 are each amended to

31 read as follows:

32 The office of child care policy is established to
operate under

33 the authority of the department of social and health
services. The

34 duties and responsibilities of the office include, but
are not

35 limited to, the following, within appropriated funds:

36 (1) Staff and assist the child care coordinating
committee in

37 the implementation of its duties under RCW 74.13.090;

p. 7 HB
1356

_1 (2) Work in conjunction with the statewide child
care resource

_2 and referral network as well as local governments,
nonprofit

_3 organizations, businesses, and community child care
advocates to

_4 create local child care resource and referral
organizations. These

_5 organizations may carry out needs assessments, resource

_6 development, provider training, technical assistance,
and parent

_7 information and training;

_8 (3) Actively seek public and private money for
distribution as

_9 grants to the statewide child care resource and referral
network

10 and to existing or potential local child care resource
and

11 referral organizations;

12 (4) Adopt rules regarding the application for and
distribution

13 of grants to local child care resource and referral

14 organizations. The rules shall, at a minimum, require
an applicant

15 to submit a plan for achieving the following objectives:

16 (a) Provide parents with information about child
care

17 resources, including location of services and subsidies;

18 (b) Carry out child care provider recruitment and
training

19 programs, including training under RCW 74.25.040;

20 (c) Offer support services, such as parent and
provider

21 seminars, toy-lending libraries, and substitute banks;

22 (d) Provide information for businesses regarding
child care

23 supply and demand;

24 (e) Advocate for increased public and private sector
resources

25 devoted to child care;

26 (f) Provide technical assistance to employers
regarding

27 employee child care services; and

28 (g) Serve recipients of temporary assistance for
needy families

29 and low-income working parents ((with incomes
at or below

30 household incomes of one hundred seventy-five percent
of the

31 federal poverty line));

32 (5) Provide staff support and technical assistance
to the

33 statewide child care resource and referral network and
local child

34 care resource and referral organizations;

35 (6) Maintain a statewide child care licensing data
bank and

36 work with department of social and health services
licensors to

37 provide information to local child care resource and
referral

38 organizations about licensed child care providers in the
state;

HB 1356 p. 8

_1 (7) Through the statewide child care resource and
referral

_2 network and local resource and referral organizations,
compile

_3 data about local child care needs and availability for
future

_4 planning and development;

_5 (8) Coordinate with the statewide child care
resource and

_6 referral network and local child care resource and
referral

_7 organizations for the provision of training and
technical

_8 assistance to child care providers; and

_9 (9) Collect and assemble information regarding the
availability

10 of insurance and of federal and other child care funding
to assist

11 state and local agencies, businesses, and other child
care

12 providers in offering child care services.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 9 HB
1356