BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 60.72

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) Any landlord may sell on the mobile home lot or
any other

_8 location a mobile home, manufactured home, park model,
or any

_9 other personal property located on the mobile home lot
after the

10 tenant has been evicted from the mobile home lot under
an unlawful

11 detainer action. A landlord, in the alternative, may
have the

12 tenant's mobile home, manufactured home, park model, or
any other

13 personal property located on the mobile home lot removed
from the

14 park.

15 (2) A mobile home, manufactured home, park model, or
any other

16 personal property located on the mobile home lot may be
sold at a

17 public auction after the following notice and
publication:

p. 1 HB
1357

_1 (a) Notification by first class mail of any owner
and any

_2 lienholder of record of the mobile home, manufactured
home, park

_3 model, or personal property;

_4 (b) Posting of notice on the mobile home,
manufactured home,

_5 park model, or personal property; and

_6 (c) Publication one time in a newspaper of general
circulation

_7 in the city or county where the mobile home,
manufactured home,

_8 park model, or personal property are located.

_9 (3) The notice shall contain the following
information:

10 (a) A description of the mobile home, manufactured
home, park

11 model, or personal property and the location;

12 (b) The time, date, and location of the public
auction; and

13 (c) The name, address, and telephone number of the
landlord who

14 is selling the mobile home, manufactured home, park
model, or

15 personal property.

16 (4) The public auction may be held fifteen days
after

17 completion of the notice and publication requirements in

18 subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

19 (5) Prior to the sale at public auction of the
mobile home,

20 manufactured home, park model, or personal property, an
owner or

21 lienholder of record may regain possession of the mobile
home,

22 manufactured home, park model, or personal property by
the

23 following actions:

24 (a) Making payment to the landlord of all charges,
to include

25 attorneys' fees and costs incurred by the landlord in
regard to

26 the mobile home, manufactured home, park model, or
personal

27 property, and to include any unlawful detainer action;
and

28 (b) Making arrangements satisfactory with the
landlord for the

29 immediate removal of the mobile home, manufactured home,
park

30 model, or personal property from the mobile home lot.

31 (6) The proceeds of a sale under this section shall
be applied

32 first to the payment of any lienholder with a security
interest in

33 the mobile home, manufactured home, park model, or
personal

34 property; then to payment of the charges, attorneys'
fees, and

35 costs under subsection (5) of this section; and then to
satisfy

36 any other liens on the mobile home, manufactured home,
park model,

37 or personal property in order of their priority. The
balance, if

38 any, shall be paid to the mobile home, manufactured
home, park

HB 1357 p. 2

_1 model, or personal property owner. If the owner cannot
in the

_2 exercise of due diligence be located by the landlord
within one

_3 year of the date of the sale, the excess funds from the
sale shall

_4 revert to the department of revenue under chapter 63.29
RCW. If the

_5 sale is for a sum less than the applicable charges,
attorneys'

_6 fees, and costs under subsection (5) of this section,
the landlord

_7 is entitled to assert a claim for deficiency against the
owner of

_8 the mobile home, manufactured home, park model, or
personal

_9 property.

10 (7) In the event no one purchases the mobile home,
manufactured

11 home, park model, or personal property at a public
auction, or the

12 mobile home, manufactured home, park model, or personal
property

13 is not removed from the lot, or other arrangements
agreed to by

14 the landlord are not made within ten days of sale,
ownership of

15 the mobile home, manufactured home, park model, or
personal

16 property shall revert to the landlord.

17 (8) The rights granted to a landlord under this
section are in

18 addition to any other legal rights a landlord may have
and in no

19 manner does this section alter those legal rights.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1357