BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A capital budget is
hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the
several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and
authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period ending June
30, 2003, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART
1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
OF STATE

Deferred Maintenance
Reduction Backlog Projects: Regional Archive (02-1-002)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 415,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 515,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE
SECRETARY OF STATE

Eastern Branch ArchivesBDesign (98-2-001)

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely for the design of the eastern regional archives
facility to be sited on the Eastern Washington University campus in Cheney.
Construction of the facility will be financed through alternative financing
authority provided in section 907 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 295,482

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 530,972

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 826,454

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY,
TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Rural Washington Loan
Fund (RWLF)(88-2-002)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 558,554

Rural Washington Loan
Account‑-Federal.......... $ 441,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation............. .... $ 999,554

Appropriation:

Rural Washington Loan
Account‑-Federal.......... $ 5,650,367

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 19,309,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,958,921

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Grays Harbor Dredging
(88-2-006)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 982,500

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 17,500

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
105. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Snohomish County
Drainage (92-2-011)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 128,584

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 79,584

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 208,168

NEW SECTION. Sec.
106. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Seventh Street Theatre
(90-2-008)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 51,110

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 78,890

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
107. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Mirabeau Point
Community Complex (98-2-010)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The amount is
provided solely for a grant to Spokane county for design and development costs
for Mirabeau Point community complex.

(2) The amount
represents the entire state contribution to the project and shall be matched by
$8,500,000 in contributions toward the project from nonstate sources.

(3) The reappropriation
is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b) of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 351,255

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,148,745

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
108. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Sand Point Shoreline
Restoration (00-1-002)

The reappropriation in
this section is provided to the city of Seattle for shoreline improvements and
wetland restoration at Sand Point. The reappropriation in this section is
subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b) of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
109. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Building for the Arts
(00-2-005)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $750,000 of the
reappropriation in this section shall support the projects as listed in section
113, chapter 379, Laws of 1999.

(2) $250,000 of the
reappropriation in this section and the new appropriation from the state
building construction account is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.750.

(3) The following
projects are eligible for funding:

Projects Recommendation

Orcas Theatre, Eastsound $400,000

Empty Space Theatre,
Fremont $29,000

Music Works Northwest,
Bellevue $475,000

Hands on Children's Museum,
Olympia $130,000

Spokane Symphony, Spokane $230,000

Mt. Baker Theatre,
Bellingham $128,000

IKEA Performing Arts
Center, Renton $135,000

Seattle Art Museum, Seattle $1,000,000

Town Hall, Seattle $175,000

Gladish Center, Pullman $29,000

Broadway Center, Tacoma $50,000

CREATE, Newport $21,000

Spectrum Dance Theatre,
Seattle $78,000

Gallery One, Ellensburg $225,000

Lake Chelan Bachfest,
Chelan $38,000

Historic Seattle
Preservation, Seattle $390,000

Historic Everett Theatre,
Everett $350,000

Holy Names Music Center,
Spokane $50,000

Youth Theatre Northwest,
Mercer Island $67,000

Subtotal $4,000,000

Alternate Projects

Youth Theatre Northwest,
Mercer Island $158,000

Subtotal $158,000

Total $4,158,000

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,750,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 30,848,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 16,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 51,598,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
110. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community Services
Facilities Program (00-02-006)

The reappropriation in
this section shall support the projects as listed in section 1007, chapter 1,
Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 10,253,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,653,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
111. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community Services
Facilities Program (02-4-007)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125. The following
projects are eligible for funding:

Projects Recommendation

YMCA of Grays Harbor,
Aberdeen $300,000

Community Youth Services,
Olympia $300,000

Skagit County Community
Action, Concrete $300,000

Kindering Center, Bellevue $300,000

Bellevue Family YMCA,
Bellevue $300,000

Refugee Women's Alliance,
Seattle $300,000

YWCA of Walla Walla, Walla
Walla $300,000

Pierce County Alliance
(facility), Tacoma $61,000

Compass Health, Everett $300,000

Mid-City Concerns, Spokane $28,000

Children's Home Society,
Vaughn $70,000

Children's Home society,
Spokane $238,000

Catholic Family/Child
Services, Yakima $152,000

Korean Women's Association,
Tacoma $218,000

Factory Small Biz
Incubator, Tacoma $300,000

Lao Highland Association of
King County, Seattle $119,000

First Place, Seattle $300,000

NE Washington Rural
Resources, Colville $114,000

Filipino Community Center,
Seattle $200,000

Filipino Community Center,
Wapato $25,000

Subtotal $4,225,000

Alternate Projects

NE Washington Rural
Resources, Colville $148,000

Nooksack Community Aid
Society, Deming $165,000

Childhaven, Seattle $149,000

Subtotal $462,000

Total $4,687,000

(2) $200,000 of the
appropriation in this section for the Filipino Community Center in Seattle
shall be matched by $200,000 in additional contributions toward the project
from local government.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,225,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 16,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
112. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Housing for Homeless
Families With Children Program (00-2-009)

The reappropriation in
this section is provided solely for the development of emergency shelters and
transitional housing opportunities for homeless families with children. The
department shall minimize the amount of funds that are utilized for staff and
administrative purposes.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,500,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
113. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Housing for Homeless
Families with Children Program (02-4-012)

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely for the development of emergency shelters and
transitional housing opportunities for homeless families with children. The
department shall minimize the amount of funds that are utilized for staff and administrative
purposes.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
114. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Farmworker Housing
Assistance (00-2-011)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
is provided solely for facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, and
temporary farmworkers.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature that operation of the facilities built under this section be in
compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1342.

(3) The department
shall minimize the amount of these funds that are utilized for staff and
administrative purposes or for other administrative purposes.

(4) By December 15,
2001, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the progress of the development of housing for
farmworkers, including a list of projects funded under this section.

(5) The department
shall work with the farmworker housing advisory committee to prioritize funding
of projects to the areas of highest need.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 7,500,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
115. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Farmworker Housing
Assistance (02-4-011)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
is provided solely for facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or
temporary farmworkers.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature that operation of the facilities built under this section be in
compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1342.

(3) The department
shall minimize the amount of these funds that are utilized for staff and
administrative purposes or other operational expenses.

(4) By September 1,
2002, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the progress of the development of housing for
farmworkers, including a list of projects funded under this section.

(5) The department
shall work with the farmworker housing advisory committee to prioritize funding
of projects to the areas of highest need.

(6) Funding may also be
provided, to the extent qualified projects are submitted, for health and safety
projects.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 32,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
116. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Housing Assistance,
Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (00‑2‑003)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations set forth in section
111, chapter 379, Laws of 1999.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 26,800,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 35,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)....... ........ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 61,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
117. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Housing Assistance,
Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (02‑4‑010)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) At least $9,000,000
of the new appropriation from the state building construction account is
provided solely for weatherization administered through the energy matchmakers
program.

(2) $5,000,000 of the
new appropriation from the state building construction account is provided
solely to promote development of safe and affordable housing units for persons
eligible for services from the division of developmental disabilities within
the department of social and health services.

(3) $2,000,000 of the
appropriation from the state building construction account is provided solely
for grants to nonprofit organizations and public housing authorities for
revolving loan, self-help housing programs for low and moderate income
families.

(4) $1,000,000 of the
new appropriation from the state building construction account is provided
solely for shelters, transitional housing, or other housing facilities for
victims of domestic violence.

(5) Reappropriations in
this section shall not be included in the annual funds available for
determining the administrative costs authorized under RCW 43.185.050.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 55,000,000

Washington Housing
Trust Account................ $ 5,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 60,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 200,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 260,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
118. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Burke Museum Governance
and Siting Study (00-2-012)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funds are provided
for a study of the governance of the Burke museum and for an examination of the
potential expansion of the museum facility including siting issues. The study
shall be facilitated by the University of Washington, the department of community,
trade, and economic development's tourism and economic development units, the
executive director of the Washington state historical society, the city of
Seattle, King county, and members of the community and businesses from various
geographic regions of the state. The department shall provide a report to the
legislature by June 30, 2002, outlining funding strategies for an expanded
state natural history museum that recognizes the limited state resources for
capital facilities programmatic enhancements, and outlines alternative funding
resources and partners.

(2) The reappropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section
906(2)(b) of this act.

Reappropriation:

University of
Washington Building

Account‑-State............. ............ $ 350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
119. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Clark County Skills
Center (00-4-100)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section must be matched by at least $1,300,000 from other sources.

(2) The reappropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section
906(2)(b) of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
120. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Holly Park Education
Center (00-4-101)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is provided solely for education space in the Holly Park
housing development for South Seattle Community College.

(2) The reappropriation
in this section must be matched by an equal amount from other sources.

(3) The reappropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section
906(2)(b) of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
121. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

County Public Facility
Construction (00-2-010)

The reappropriations in
this section shall be used solely for financial assistance to distressed
counties that have experienced extraordinary costs due to the location of a
major new business facility or the substantial expansion of an existing
business facility in the county. The entire reappropriation from the state
building construction account shall be provided as a grant to support the Grays
Harbor water system project and is subject to the conditions and limitations of
section 906(2)(b) of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,500,000

Distressed County
Facilities Construction Loan

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,619,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 6,119,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,119,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
122. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community Economic
Revitalization (CERB) (86-1-001)

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State.......... $ 655,517

Public Facility
Construction Loan

Revolving
Account‑‑State.................. $ 4,868,347

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 5,523,864

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 7,433,892

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,957,756

NEW SECTION. Sec.
123. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community Economic
Revitalization (CERB)(00-2-001)

The reappropriation in
this section from the public facilities construction loan revolving account is
subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department
shall ensure that all funds transferred from the public works assistance
account into the public facility construction loan revolving account during the
1999‑2001 biennium are used only for loans to local governments.

(2) The department
shall ensure that all principal and interest payments from these loans are paid
into the public works assistance account.

Reappropriation:

Public Facility
Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State........................... $ 5,519,054

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,121,946

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)....... ........ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,641,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
124. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community Economic
Revitalization (CERB) (02-4-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: By
December 15, 2002, the office of financial management shall make
recommendations to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on a
permanent funding source for the CERB program.

Appropriation:

Public Facility
Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,275,000

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 5,275,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,275,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
125. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Drinking Water
Assistance Program (98-2-008)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding from the
state public works trust fund program shall be matched with federal sources to
improve the quality of drinking water in the state, and shall be used solely
for projects that achieve the goals of the federal safe drinking water act.

(2) The department
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1,
2002, on the progress of the program, including administrative and technical
assistance procedures, the application process and funding priorities.

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water
Assistance Account‑-State........ $ 3,926,937

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 13,722,063

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,649,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
126. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Drinking Water
Assistance Program (00-2-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding from the
state public works trust fund program shall be matched with new federal sources
to improve the quality of drinking water in the state, and shall be used solely
for projects that achieve the goals of the federal safe drinking water act.

(2) The department
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1,
2002, on the progress of the program, including administrative and technical
assistance procedures, the application process, and funding priorities.

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water
Assistance Account‑-State........ $ 7,700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
127. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Drinking Water
Assistance Program (02-4-008)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding from the
state public works trust fund program shall be matched with new federal sources
to improve the quality of drinking water in the state, and shall be used solely
for projects that achieve the goals of the federal safe drinking water act.

(2) The department
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1,
2002, on the progress of the program, including administrative and technical
assistance procedures, the application process, and funding priorities.

Appropriation:

Drinking Water
Assistance Account‑-State........ $ 7,700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 30,800,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 38,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
128. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Public Works Trust Fund
(94-2-001)

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State.......... $ 75,159,028

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 68,460,146

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)... ............ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 143,619,174

NEW SECTION. Sec.
129. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Public Works Trust Fund
(00-2-002)

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State.......... $ 143,971,288

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 59,178,712

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 203,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
130. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Public Works Trust Fund
(01-H-001)

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State.......... $ 93,593,068

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 93,593,068

NEW SECTION. Sec.
131. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Public Works Trust Fund
(02-4-013)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

$20,000,000 of the
general fund federal appropriation is provided solely for infrastructure
projects that will improve water quality and benefit salmon. Projects should
be designed to have immediate benefits to water quality and salmon as
alternatives to habitat acquisition and improvements. The public works board
is authorized and directed to seek funding through the Northwest power planning
council, the conservation and reinvestment act, and other federal funding
sources to supplement existing loan programs with grants or loans for water
quality projects. The public works board shall utilize existing programs
within chapter 43.155 RCW to distribute these additional grants or loans, with
an emphasis on projects providing immediate benefits to water quality and
salmon habitat. For the purposes of this section, the public works board may
utilize federal funds as grants in conjunction with loans from chapter 43.155
RCW.

Appropriation:

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State..... $ 236,000,000

General Fund‑-Federal...................... $ 20,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ 256,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 1,215,700,000

TOTAL............................... $ 1,471,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
132. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Seattle Center
Redevelopment (01-S-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
133. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Fort Vancouver National
Historic Reserve (01-S-002)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
134. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Chewelah Peak
Environmental Learning Center (01-S-003)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
135. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Cancer Research
Facility Grant (01-S-005)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation in this section is provided as a grant for equipment and
facilities improvements for a prostate cancer research project at the
University of Washington medical center. The appropriation shall be matched by
an equal amount from nonstate sources.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
136. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Fox Theater Project
(01-S-006)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
137. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Upper Kittitas County,
Emergency Management Service Facility (01-S-16)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 920,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 920,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
138. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Republic Baseball and
Softball Fields (01-H-002)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 30,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 30,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
139. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Nevitt Pool Renovation
(01-H-003)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 70,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 70,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
140. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Local Jails (01-H-012)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
department shall make grants available to local governments for local jail
facility needs based on a competitive process that considers need, available
resources, and other criteria developed by the department. To be eligible for
these grants, the local government must have enacted the tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.350.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
141. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT

Budget System
Improvements (02-1-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

Funds are provided
solely for the following studies and activities:

(1) Budget evaluation
study team reviews of project proposals;

(2) The compilation of
benchmarking data and the development of standards for construction costs;

(3) Contracts
associated with a higher education facility financial responsibility study to
be conducted in conjunction with the higher education coordinating board and
the state board for community and technical colleges that shall provide
guidelines for project cost sharing between state and federal funds,
institutional funds, student fees and charges, and private donations; and

(4) Other studies and
system improvements planned in consultation with the house capital budget
committee and the senate committee on ways and means.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State.. ... $ 150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,200,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
142. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION

East Plaza Repairs
(96-1-002)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$16,000,000 of the appropriation from the state vehicle parking account‑-state
is subject to the approval of a reimbursable bond for this project in a bond
bill; if the bond bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, authorizing bonds for
this project, the appropriation from the state vehicle parking account‑-state
in this section shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 900,000

Appropriation:

State Vehicle Parking
Account‑-State............. $ 19,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 21,667,150

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 14,200,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 55,767,150

NEW SECTION. Sec.
143. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Transportation Building
Preservation (98-1-008)

Reappropriation:

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,884,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,234,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
144. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Transportation Building
Preservation (02-1-008)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,001,250

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,098,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,099,250

NEW SECTION. Sec.
145. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Heritage Park/Capitol
Lake (00-1-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction

Account‑‑State........................... $ 250,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 700,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 950,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,650,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
146. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Heritage Park
Development (01-H-004)

Appropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction

Account‑‑State........................... $ 2,100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 10,765,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 6,358,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,223,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
147. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Legislative Building:
Safety and Infrastructure (98-1-005)

Reappropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 660,000

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 440,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,210,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,310,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
148. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Legislative Building:
Rehabilitation (01‑1‑008)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations
in this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902
and 903 of this act.

(2) $1,259,320 of the
new appropriation from the capitol building construction account is provided
solely for renovation of the hearing rooms in the John L. O'Brien building.

(3) The department of general
administration, in consultation with the legislature, the governor, and the
state capitol committee, shall immediately begin planning and initiate an
accelerated design/construction schedule for the renovation of the state
legislative building as follows:

(a) No new permanent
buildings shall be constructed, and the department shall follow standards for
historic preservation;

(b) The goal shall be
to reoccupy the building in time for the 2005 legislative session;

(c) The department
shall make temporary accommodations for the displacement of legislators and
legislative staff in the John L. O'Brien building, the Pritchard building, the
Cherberg building, and the Newhouse building. Decisions on the use of space
for the Pritchard building will be made by legislative leadership by July 1,
2001, to make it available for use by the legislature by April 1, 2002;

(d) The department
shall temporarily move the state library from the Pritchard building by October
1, 2001, and, if needed, the department shall lease storage facilities in
Thurston county for books and other library assets;

(e) The department
shall make temporary accommodations for other tenants of the state legislative
building as follows:

(i) The office of the
insurance commissioner shall be temporarily moved to leased space in Thurston
county;

(ii) The office of the
governor shall be moved to the Insurance building;

(iii) The office of the
code reviser and the lieutenant governor shall be moved to a location on the
west capitol campus; and

(iv) The other tenants,
including the office of the state treasurer, the office of the state auditor,
and the office of the secretary of state shall be moved to leased space in
Thurston county;

(f) The state
legislative building shall be completely vacated by the office of the governor,
the office of lieutenant governor, the office of the secretary of state, the
office of treasurer, and the office of the state auditor by November 1, 2001,
and by the legislature by June 1, 2002, to make it available for renovation by
the contractor; and

(g) State contracts for
the legislative building renovation, Nisqually earthquake repair, and future
earthquake mitigation shall conform to all rules, regulations, and requirements
of the federal emergency management agency.

(4) The state capitol
committee, in conjunction with a legislative building renovation oversight
committee consisting of two members from both the house of representatives and
senate, each appointed by legislative leadership, shall periodically advise the
department regarding the rehabilitation, the receipt and use of private funds,
and other issues that may arise.

(5) The department
shall report on the progress of accelerated planning, design, and relocations
related to the renovation of the state legislative building to the legislature
and the governor by July 15, 2001, and November 15, 2001, and shall consult
with the legislature and governor on major decisions including placement of the
cafeteria and exiting stairs in the legislative building by August 31, 2001.

(6) In the event of any
conflicts between the conditions and limitations in this section and section 3,
chapter ... (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1625), Laws of 2001, the
conditions and limitations of this section shall apply.

Reappropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 2,000,000

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,500,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 4,500,000

Appropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 81,681,000

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,300,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 82,981,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,300,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 90,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
149. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Emergency/Small Repairs
and Improvements (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 100,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 900,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 6,500,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
150. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Thurston County
Facilities: Preservation (00-1-009)

Reappropriation:

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,450,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
151. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Thurston County
Facilities: Preservation (02-1-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Capitol Building Construction
Account‑-State.... $ 1,110,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,060,000

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,751,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 6,921,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 35,636,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 42,557,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
152. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Capitol Campus
Facilities: Preservation (00-1-003)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 900,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 75,000

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,025,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,140,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
153. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Capitol Campus
Infrastructure Preservation (02-1-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 75,000

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,750,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,825,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 24,050,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
154. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

North Cascades Gateway
Center: Preservation (00-1-010)

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 210,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 397,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 607,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
155. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

North Cascades Gateway
Center Minor Works (02-1-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

General
Fund/Private/Local....................... $ 500,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 850,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 6,685,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,035,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
156. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Pritchard Library:
Rehabilitation (02-1-006)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
157. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (02-1-999)

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 915 of this act may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW SECTION. Sec.
158. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Capitol Campus Chiller
Plant and Loop (02-2-006)

Appropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 50,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 550,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 600,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 21,220,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
159. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Engineering and
Architectural Services (02-2-012)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section shall be used to provide those services to state agencies
required by RCW 43.19.450 that are essential and mandated activities defined as
core services and are included in the engineering and architectural services
responsibilities and task list for general public works projects of normal
complexity. The department may negotiate agreements with agencies for
additional fees to manage exceptional projects including projects financed with
alternative financing or for services above core services as described as
optional and extra services in the task list.

(2) The department
shall continue to analyze future state office space needs in Thurston county,
by agency, for the next ten years and consult with state agencies, private
developers, and building owners to determine the inventory of space available
and planned over the next ten years in government and nongovernment buildings.
Planning for state office expansion shall consider the impact on current office
space.

Appropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 220,700

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 772,700

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,057,800

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 386,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 9,437,200

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 43,049,325

TOTAL.................................... $ 52,486,525

NEW SECTION. Sec.
160. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Small Agency, Board,
and Commission Colocation Office: Feasibility Study (02-3-007)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 190,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
161. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Isabella Bush Records
Center: Expansion (02-3-001)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital
Facilities Account‑-State $ 344,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 344,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
162. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Tumwater Office
Building 1 (01-S-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

Planning funds are
provided to lease/develop a state office building of 150,000 to 200,000 square
feet on state-owned property in Tumwater according to the terms of the
agreement with the Port of Olympia when the property was acquired or within the
preferred development/leasing areas in Thurston county. The building shall be
constructed and financed so that agency occupancy costs will not exceed
comparable private market rental rates. The comparable general office space
rate shall be calculated based on the three latest Thurston county leases of new
space of at least 100,000 rentable square feet adjusted for inflation as
determined by the department of general administration. The department of
general administration shall coordinate with potential state agency tenants
whose current lease expire near the time of occupancy so that buyout of current
leases do not add to state expense.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
163. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Office Building Two
Rehabilitation (98-1-007)

Reappropriation:

Thurston County Capital
Facilities Account‑‑

State.................................... $ 2,000,000

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital
Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 5,850,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 9,250,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,310,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,410,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
164. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

General Administration
Building Renovation or Redevelopment (00-1-004)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑

State.................................... $ 150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 850,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,635,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,635,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
165. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works to Support
Federal Construction Projects (98-1-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 280,913

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 305,193

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 586,106

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,766,394

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,352,500

NEW SECTION. Sec.
166. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Minor Works to Support
Federal Construction Projects (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 10,248,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,277,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 12,525,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 62,340,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 74,865,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
167. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Yakima Readiness
Center: Construction (98-2-001)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funds expended on
this project for off‑site utility infrastructure that may include the
provision of electricity, natural gas service, water service, or sewer service
shall be for the benefit of the state. Entities that subsequently connect or
use this off‑site utility infrastructure shall reimburse the state at a
rate proportional to their use. The department shall develop policies and
procedures to ensure that this reimbursement occurs.

(2) The appropriations
in this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902
and 903 of this act.

(3) No money shall be
committed or expended from the state building construction account until the
general fund‑‑federal construction funds are received and allotted
in accordance with section 903 of this act.

(4) In addition to the
annual project progress reporting requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the
department will file quarterly project progress reports with the office of
financial management. These reports will contain local, state, and federal
funding reconciliations and balance sheets for this project and will detail any
federal intentions on future readiness center projects.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 1,523,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,520,966

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 3,043,966

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 6,522,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 653,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 7,175,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 11,737,876

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,956,842

NEW SECTION. Sec.
168. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Centralia Readiness
Center: Preservation (00-1-030)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 700,000

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
169. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Preservation
Projects-Statewide (02-1-006)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,478,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,116,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,594,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
170. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Infrastructure
Projects-Savings (02-1-009)

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 915 of this act may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW SECTION. Sec.
171. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Spokane Combined Public
Safety Training Center (02-2-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902
and 903 of this act.

(2) No money shall be
committed or expended from the state building construction account until the
general fund‑‑federal construction funds are received and allotted
in accordance with section 903 of this act.

(3) In addition to the
annual project progress reporting requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the
department will file quarterly project progress reports with the office of
financial management. These reports will contain local, state, and federal
funding reconciliations and balance sheets for this project and will detail any
federal intentions on future readiness center projects.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 9,996,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,920,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 15,916,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 7,899,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 23,815,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
172. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Bremerton Readiness
Center (02-2-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902
and 903 of this act.

(2) No money shall be
committed or expended from the state building construction account until the
general fund‑‑federal construction funds are received and allotted
in accordance with section 903 of this act.

(3) In addition to the
annual project progress reporting requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department
will file quarterly project progress reports with the office of financial
management. These reports will contain local, state, and federal funding
reconciliations and balance sheets for this project and will detail any federal
intentions on future readiness center projects.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 5,446,000

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 5,535,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 10,981,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,981,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
173. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Fort Lewis Readiness
Center (02-2-010)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 19,941,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)....... ........ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,941,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
174. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Combined Support
Maintenance Shop (02-2-011)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 17,032,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)....... ........ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,032,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
175. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Combined Regional
Training Institute (02-2-012)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 14,712,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)....... ........ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,712,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
176. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Phase 2 Yakima Maneuver
and Training Equipment Site (02-2-013)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 11,304,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,304,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
177. FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND
TRADE CENTER

Seattle Convention
Center: Replacement Housing (00-2-002)

Reappropriation:

State Convention and
Trade Center

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,745,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,255,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
178. FOR THE STATE CONVENTION
AND TRADE CENTER

Seattle - Convention
Center: Replacement Housing (01-H-005)

$5,000,000 of the
appropriation in this section is provided solely for additional low-income and
affordable housing associated with the expansion of the convention center. The
housing division of the department of community, trade, and economic
development shall select the low-income and affordable housing projects, which
shall be distributed throughout King county.

Appropriation:

State Convention and
Trade Center

Account‑-State........................... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
179. FOR THE STATE CONVENTION
AND TRADE CENTER

Repairs and
Improvements (01-S-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $545,000 is
provided for payment to the department of transportation for fire control and
other improvements to the I-90 tunnel.

(2) $2,650,000 is
provided for chiller and window replacement and roof repairs.

Appropriation:

State Convention and
Trade Center

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,195,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL............. ...................... $ 3,195,000

(End
of part)

PART
2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE
TRAINING COMMISSION

Site Improvements -
Minor Works (02-1-005)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 600,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE
TRAINING COMMISSION

Building Omnibus Minor
Works (02-1-007)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 600,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES

Maple Lane School:
Wastewater Treatment Plant (94‑1‑201)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 339,945

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,767,109

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,107,054

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Crisis Residential
Centers (96‑1‑900)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,450,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
205. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen Children's
Center ‑ Site: Infrastructure Improvements (96‑2‑229)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,215,229

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,312,523

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,527,752

NEW SECTION. Sec.
206. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School
Redevelopment: 416 Bed Institution (96‑2‑230)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,853,668

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 14,995,479

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,849,147

NEW SECTION. Sec.
207. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Medical Lake Wastewater
Treatment Facility (96‑1‑301)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 921,597

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 8,459,550

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,381,147

NEW SECTION. Sec.
208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State
Hospital: Legal Offender Unit (98‑2‑002)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,365,463

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 15,330,537

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,696,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen Children's
Center ‑ Vocational Education: Construction (98‑2‑211)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 298,838

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,916,667

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 156,162

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,371,667

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State
Hospital: Legal Offender Unit (98‑2‑052)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 25,829,040

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,059,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 22,406,301

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,294,341

NEW SECTION. Sec.
211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple Lane: 124 Bed
Housing (98-2-216)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 126,545

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,620,021

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,746,566

NEW SECTION. Sec.
212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State
Hospital: Security Improvements (99‑1‑001)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 487,963

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 166,037

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 654,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
213. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Americans with
Disabilities Act (00-9-036)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 103,348

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 14,852

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 118,200

NEW SECTION. Sec.
214. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and
Treatment Center - Cottages: Modifications (00‑1‑015)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,376,682

Appropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑‑State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 23,318

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,678,262

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,578,262

NEW SECTION. Sec.
215. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State
Hospital: Campus Renovation, Phase 5 (00-2-002)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 677,100

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 9,154,750

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 268,150

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
216. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen Children's
Center ‑ Eleven Cottages: Renovation (00‑1‑041)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 75,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 16,131,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,906,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Emergency and Small
Repairs (00-1-006)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 475,165

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 875,165

NEW SECTION. Sec.
218. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide: Emergency
and Small Repair Projects (02‑1‑042)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 750,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,609,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,359,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Lakeland Village:
Cottage Renovation (00-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 425,057

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 24,943

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple Lane School -
Multi-Services Building: Renovation (00-1-003)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 640,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 60,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,550,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works:
Preservation (00-1-018)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State.............. $ 3,200,000

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,700,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 6,900,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,459,966

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,359,966

NEW SECTION. Sec.
222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide: Omnibus
Preservation Projects (02‑1‑069)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State.............. $ 2,700,000

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,800,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 5,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 42,253,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 47,753,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
223. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works: Program
(00‑2‑019)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 148,725

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,148,725

NEW SECTION. Sec.
224. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide: Omnibus
Programmatic Projects (02‑2‑070)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State.............. $ 418,500

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State.. ... $ 473,375

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 891,875

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,812,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,703,875

NEW SECTION. Sec.
225. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Mission Creek Youth
Camp - Main Building: Renovation Phase 2 (00‑1‑010)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,642,973

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 357,027

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
226. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment
Center ‑ Secure Facility: Construction (00‑2‑001)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act. To the extent that the department projects savings and
efficiencies through design or scope changes, funds appropriated in this
section may be transferred to the statewide omnibus preservation project
(02-1-069) for expenditure for minor works projects in accordance with the
provisions of section 905 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 13,100,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 47,665,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,400,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,970,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 70,135,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
227. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment
Center ‑ Less Restrictive Alternative (02‑2‑075)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,207,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,207,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
228. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School ‑
Entry/Security/Visitation: Addition (02‑2‑064)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
229. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School ‑
Health Center Building: Renovation (02‑1‑061)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
230. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School ‑
Intensive Management Unit: Renovation (02‑1‑054)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
231. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (00‑1‑053)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 563,057

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 436,944

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,001

NEW SECTION. Sec.
232. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (02‑1‑053)

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 915 of this act, may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW SECTION. Sec.
233. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Capital Project
Management (02-1-041)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Penal,
Educational, and

Reformatory
Institutions Account‑‑State... $ 1,800,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 9,625,800

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,425,800

NEW SECTION. Sec.
234. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School -
Laundry: Equipment (00-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 435,602

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 14,398

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
235. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide: Facilities
Condition Assessment and Preservation Plan (02‑1‑047)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State.............. $ 185,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 800,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 985,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
236. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide: Hazardous
Materials Abatement (02‑1‑043)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,430,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,730,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
237. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Referendum 38 (86‑2‑099)

Reappropriation:

State and Local
Improvements Revolving Account

(Water Supply
Facilities)‑‑State......... $ 158,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 541,483

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 699,483

NEW SECTION. Sec.
238. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratory: Repairs and Improvements (96‑1‑001)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,292,693

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,203,406

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,496,099

NEW SECTION. Sec.
239. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratories: Consolidation of Facilities (96‑2‑001)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,228,332

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,444,719

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,673,051

NEW SECTION. Sec.
240. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratory: Wastewater Treatment Systems (00-1-008)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 208,802

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 208,802

NEW SECTION. Sec.
241. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratory: Chiller Plant Upgrade (02‑1‑004)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,355,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL............................ ........ $ 2,355,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
242. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratory: Repairs and Improvements (02‑1‑005)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 172,400

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,944,200

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,116,600

NEW SECTION. Sec.
243. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratory: Biosafety Level 3 Facility (02‑2‑001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,231,485

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,231,485

NEW SECTION. Sec.
244. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratory: C‑Wing Remodel (02‑2‑002)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 295,900

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 295,900

NEW SECTION. Sec.
245. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratory: E‑Wing Remodel (02‑2‑003)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 295,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 295,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
246. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Drinking Water
Assistance Program (97‑2‑001)

The reappropriation in
this section is provided solely for an interagency agreement with the
department of community, trade, and economic development to make, in
cooperation with the public works board, loans to local governments and public
water systems for projects and activities to protect and improve the state's
drinking water facilities and resources.

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water
Assistance Account‑‑Federal...... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 30,086,024

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 35,086,024

NEW SECTION. Sec.
247. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Drinking Water
Assistance Program (02‑4‑004)

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely for an interagency agreement with the
department of community, trade, and economic development to make, in
cooperation with the public works board, loans to local governments and public
water systems for projects and activities to protect and improve the state's
drinking water facilities and resources.

Appropriation:

Drinking Water
Assistance Account‑‑Federal...... $ 24,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 77,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 101,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
248. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS'
AFFAIRS

Retsil Veterans' Home:
Minor Works Mechanical/Electrical/HVAC (02‑1‑001)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State............. $ 1,070,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 777,750

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,847,750

NEW SECTION. Sec.
249. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS' AFFAIRS

Orting Soldiers' Home:
Minor Works Mechanical/Electrical/HVAC (02‑1‑002)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State............. $ 127,736

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,060,835

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,188,571

NEW SECTION. Sec.
250. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS' AFFAIRS

Orting Soldiers' Home:
Minor Works Buildings (02‑1‑004)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State............. $ 140,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,813,590

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,953,590

NEW SECTION. Sec.
251. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS' AFFAIRS

Emergency Funds (02‑1‑007)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State............. $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
252. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS' AFFAIRS

Retsil Veterans' Home:
Steam Plant Seismic Upgrade (02‑1‑010)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State............. $ 1,391,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,391,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
253. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS' AFFAIRS

240 Bed Nursing
Facility (02‑2‑008)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section, combined with the authorities granted in section 907(4) of
this act, for a total of $16.5 million, are authorized to apply for a matching
grant from the federal department of veterans' affairs.

(2) The department
shall not commit or expend funds from these authorities until the federal
construction grant has been certified and is available to Washington state for
the purpose of constructing replacement nursing care beds.

(3) By September 1,
2002, the department shall submit recommendations to the appropriate committees
of the legislature on a transition plan and program for the Orting soldiers'
home, including costs and funding assumptions.

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State.............. $ 3,000,000

State Building Construction
Account‑‑State...... $ 1,500,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 4,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 30,477,200

TOTAL.................................... $ 34,977,200

NEW SECTION. Sec.
254. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Expand Coyote Ridge
Corrections Center (98‑2‑011)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 447,348

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 802,069

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 227,763,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 230,162,417

NEW SECTION. Sec.
255. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Clallam Bay Corrections
Center - Youthful Offender Facility Improvements (97‑2‑005)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,170,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,330,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
256. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Stafford Creek
Corrections Center Construction (98‑2‑001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 7,648,233

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 16,389,590

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 24,037,823

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 172,988,377

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 197,026,200

NEW SECTION. Sec.
257. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections
Center ‑ Expand Special Offender Unit (98‑2‑010)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 5,436,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 37,499,280

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 42,935,280

NEW SECTION. Sec.
258. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections
Center for Women ‑ Special Needs and Reception Unit (96‑2‑006)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 15,336,885

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,463,155

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
259. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections
Center: Infrastructure Evaluation (99‑2‑005)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 310,438

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 39,562

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
260. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Violent Offender/Truth
in Sentencing Grant Administration (99‑2‑004)

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 359,000

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State.............. $ 55,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 414,000

Appropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 386,536

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State.............. $ 42,592

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 429,128

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 194,514

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 214,743

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,252,385

NEW SECTION. Sec.
261. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Americans with
Disabilities Act (00‑1‑011)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 66,500

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 20,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 86,500

NEW SECTION. Sec.
262. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Local Criminal Justice
Facilities (99-2-003)

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 2,952,091

Appropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 1,335,619

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,193,270

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 966,338

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,447,318

NEW SECTION. Sec.
263. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

McNeil Island ‑
Special Commitment Center (00‑2‑005)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 259,665

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,240,335

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
264. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

McNeil Island
Underground Storage Tank (00‑1‑001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 377,896

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 414,415

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 792,311

NEW SECTION. Sec.
265. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections
Center: Kitchen Consolidations/Modifications (00‑2‑011)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 952,109

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 147,891

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
266. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections
Center ‑ Hazardous Materials (00‑1‑002)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑‑State...... $ 52,950

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 52,950

NEW SECTION. Sec.
267. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections
Center - 100 Bed Intensive Management and Segregation Units (00‑2‑008)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 40,665

Appropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 18,162,205

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,521,795

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 20,684,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 149,335

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 17,727,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 38,601,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
268. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington State
Penitentiary ‑ Intensive Management Unit Improvements (00‑1‑025)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,199,502

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 852,462

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 300,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,351,964

NEW SECTION. Sec.
269. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Correctional Industries
Space Statewide (98‑2‑005)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 327,206

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 4,150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,972,794

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,652,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,102,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
270. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

McNeil Island: Replace
Main Institution Water Storage Tank (02‑1‑022)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,644,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)............ ... $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,644,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
271. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Minor Works:
Preservation (00‑1‑020)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 15,530,719

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,479,281

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,010,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
272. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Minor Works: Omnibus
Preservation (02‑1‑015)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,619,247

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 23,619,247

NEW SECTION. Sec.
273. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Minor Works: Program
(00‑2‑010)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,933,797

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,066,203

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
274. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Minor Works: Omnibus
Program (02‑2‑030)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State.. ... $ 1,375,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
275. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections
Center: Regional Training Center (02‑2‑016)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,705,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,705,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
276. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Statewide: Department
of Corrections Emergency Funds (02‑1‑028)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State............. $ 1,700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 901,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,800,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,401,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
277. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Statewide: Intensive
Management Unit Repairs (02‑1‑040)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,612,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,612,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
278. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections
Center ‑ Building Water Pipe Replacement Phase 2 (02‑1‑008)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,694,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,694,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
279. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections
Center ‑ Domestic Water Systems Improvements (02‑1‑007)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,531,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,531,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
280. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections
Center ‑ Replace Steam and Condensate Piping (02‑1‑006)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 6,170,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
281. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington State
Penitentiary ‑ Replace Old Sanitary and Domestic Water Lines (02‑1‑026)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,070,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,640,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,710,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
282. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington State
Penitentiary ‑ Replace Electrical Supply System (02‑1‑024)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 4,061,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,655,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,716,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
283. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Larch Corrections
Center - Pave Larch Access Road (02-1-037)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,807,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,807,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
284. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Olympic Corrections
Center - Replace Telecommunications Systems (02-1-041)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,406,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
285. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Pine Lodge - Replace
Telecommunications System (02-1-009)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,139,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,139,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
286. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Statewide: Emergency
Funds (R) (00-1-021)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State.............. $ 742,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 13,723,016

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,465,016

(End
of part)

PART
3

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Referendum 26 Waste
Disposal Facilities (74-2-004)

Reappropriation:

State and Local
Improvements Revolving

Account (Waste
Facilities)‑-State........ $ 398,083

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,810,539

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,208,622

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Referendum 39 Waste
Disposal Facilities (82-2-005)

Reappropriation:

State and Local
Improvements Revolving

Account - Waste
Facilities 1980‑-State... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 9,928,221

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,428,221

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Local Toxics Grants to
Locals for Cleanup and Prevention (88-2-008)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is provided solely for projects under contract on or before
June 30, 2001. Reappropriated funds not associated with contracted projects
shall lapse on June 30, 2001. The office of financial management may grant
waivers from this lapse requirement for specific projects upon findings of
exceptional circumstances after notification of the chairs of the house of
representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means committee.

(2) The department
shall submit a report to the office of financial management and house of
representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means committee by
December 1, 2001, listing all projects funded from this section.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control
Account‑-State............. $ 20,749,772

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control
Account‑-State............. $ 50,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 84,103,008

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 154,852,780

NEW SECTION. Sec.
304. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Methow Basin Water
Conservation (92-2-009)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under contract
on or before June 30, 2001. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects shall lapse on June 30, 2001.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 87,689

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 87,689

NEW SECTION. Sec.
305. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Low-Level Nuclear Waste
Disposal Trench Closure (97-2-012)

Reappropriation:

Site Closure Account‑-State..................... $ 5,292,009

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,045,451

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,337,460

NEW SECTION. Sec.
306. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Water Rights
Purchase/Lease (99-1-005)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to the department of ecology for the purchase and
lease of water rights. The department of fish and wildlife shall consult with
the department of ecology on the benefits to fish and prioritization of
proposed water rights acquisitions.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 6,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 7,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)....... ............ $ 1,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
307. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Minor Works (02-1-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 865,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 12,291,745

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,156,745

NEW SECTION. Sec.
308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay (02-2-006)

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 1,885,800

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 808,200

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 2,694,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,694,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
309. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Local Hazardous Waste
Liability (02-4-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is provided solely for grants to local governmental agencies
named as potentially liable persons or potentially responsible parties when
those agencies have conducted a moderate risk waste or similar program, and have
become financially liable for clean-up and corrective action due to
circumstances at a facility they used for hazardous waste treatment, storage,
recycling, or disposal services.

(2) The department
shall adopt rules for this financial assistance program. For the purposes of
this grant program, the department may offer grants up to one hundred percent
of total eligible costs. Eligible costs may include retroactive costs and
legal fees associated with facility cleanup or corrective action.

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control
Account‑-State............. $ 2,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
310. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account (90-2-002)

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

State.................................... $ 38,403,302

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

Federal.................................. $ 44,795,830

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 83,199,132

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 169,901,509

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 253,100,641

NEW SECTION. Sec.
311. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account (02-4-002)

Appropriation:

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

State.................................... $ 113,835,792

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

Federal.................................. $ 45,277,010

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 159,112,802

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 467,108,040

TOTAL.................................... $ 626,220,842

NEW SECTION. Sec.
312. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Referendum 38 Water
Supply Facilities (02-4-006)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
is provided solely for projects under contracts on or before June 30, 2001.
Reappropriated funds not associated with contracted projects shall lapse on
June 30, 2001.

(2) The office of
financial management may grant waivers from this lapse requirement for specific
projects upon findings of exceptional circumstances after notification of the
chairs of the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways
and means committee.

(3) The department
shall submit a report to the office of financial management and house of
representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means committee by
December 1, 2001, listing all projects funded from this section.

(4) $2,500,000 of the
reappropriation from the state drought preparedness account is provided solely
to purchase or lease water pursuant to section 306 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Drought
Preparedness‑-State............... $ 5,525,000

State and Local
Improvements Revolving

Account (Water
Supply Facilities)‑-State. $ 6,000,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 11,525,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,029,098

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,554,098

NEW SECTION. Sec.
313. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Referendum 38 Water
Supply Facilities (02-4-006)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $250,000
is provided solely to study the development of the Lake Wenatchee water storage
project.

Appropriation:

State and Local
Improvements Revolving

Account (Water
Supply Facilities)‑-

State.................................... $ 6,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 12,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
314. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water
Fund (86-2-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is provided solely for projects under contract on or before
June 30, 2001. Reappropriated funds not associated with contracted projects
shall lapse on June 30, 2001.

(2) The office of
financial management may grant waivers from this lapse requirement for specific
projects upon findings of exceptional circumstances after notification of the
chairs of the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways
and means committee.

(3) The department
shall submit a report to the office of financial management and house of
representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means committee by
December 1, 2001, listing all projects funded from this section.

(4) The entire public
works assistance account reappropriation is provided for water quality facility
grants for communities with a population of less than 5,000. The department
shall give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a regulatory
order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with water quality
regulations; (b) projects for which design work has been completed; and (c)
projects with a local match from reasonable water quality rates and charges.

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State.......... $ 7,013,151

Water Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 27,318,809

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 34,331,960

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 131,764,921

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 166,096,881

NEW SECTION. Sec.
315. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water
Fund (02-4-007)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $15,097,000
of the water quality account appropriation is provided for the extended grant
payment to Metro/King county.

(2) Up to $10,000,000
of the water quality account appropriation is provided for the extended grant
payment to Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.

(3) $250,000 is
provided solely for a water reclamation project for the city of Pullman and
Washington State University.

(4) The remaining
appropriation in this section is provided for statewide water quality
implementation and planning grants and loans. The department shall give
priority consideration to projects located in basins with critical or depressed
salmonid stocks.

Appropriation:

Water Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 49,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 208,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 257,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
316. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation
Efficiencies (01-H-010)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation is provided solely to provide grants to conservation districts to
assist the agricultural community to implement water conservation measures and irrigation
efficiencies in the 16 critical basins. A conservation district receiving
funds shall manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the water saved by
the water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency will be placed as a
purchase or a lease in the trust water rights program to enhance instream
flows. The proportion of saved water placed in the trust water rights program
must be equal to the percentage of the public investment in the conservation
measure or irrigation efficiency. The percentage of the public investment may
not exceed 85 percent of the total cost of the conservation measure or
irrigation efficiency. In awarding grants, a conservation district shall give
first priority to family farms.

By February 1, 2003,
the state conservation commission shall submit a progress report to the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature on: (1) The amount of
public funds expended from this section; and (2) the location and amount of
water placed in the trust water rights program pursuant to this section.

Appropriation:

State and Local
Improvements Revolving Account

(Water Supply
Facilities)‑‑State......... $ 4,000,000

Water Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 4,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 8,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
317. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Water Measuring Devices
and Gauges (01-H-009)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for water measuring devices
and gauges. The department shall prioritize the distribution of water
measuring devices and gauges to locations participating in the department of
fish and wildlife fish screens and cooperative compliance programs.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
318. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Spokane Centennial
Trail (89-5-112)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 206,534

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 89,888

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 296,422

NEW SECTION. Sec.
319. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Recreation
Development Program (98-2-008)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) $33,881 of the
general fund‑-federal reappropriation is provided for the continuation of
the United States national park service and the United States department of
energy grants as described in section 325, chapter 379, Laws of 1999.

(3) $647,240 of the
general fund‑-federal reappropriation is provided for the continuation of
the United States forest service grant as described in section 325, chapter
379, Laws of 1999.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 868,255

General Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 29,294

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,502,376

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 2,399,925

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,154,673

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,554,598

NEW SECTION. Sec.
320. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Recreation Development
(02-2-007)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 is
provided solely for Grayland Beach state park development, including expanding
campsites, installing yurts, adding comfort stations, and related park
infrastructure development.

(2) $164,000 of this
appropriation is provided as state match to federal funds for the Iron Horse
depot.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 664,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,664,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
321. FOR THE STATE PARKS
AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cama Beach State Park
Development (99-2-001)

Reappropriation:

Parks Renewal and
Stewardship Account‑-State.... $ 310,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 690,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
322. FOR THE STATE PARKS
AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Major Park Renovation -
Cama Beach (02-1-022)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to complete electrical power, water, and sewer
utilities, and for other park development and renovation.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)....... ............ $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
323. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Coastal Facility
Relocation (00-1-005)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 500,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
324. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Historic Structure and
Land Use Program (00-1-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,477,393

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,022,607

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL............. ...................... $ 6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
325. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Lewis and Clark Trail
Bicentennial (00-1-010)

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely to renovate facilities and enhance exhibits at
Lewis and Clark trail interpretive centers located at Sacajawea state park and
Fort Canby state park.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,250,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 250,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
326. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Park Housing (00-1-014)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 250,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
327. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Park Housing (02-2-008)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) The appropriation
in this section is provided solely to replace five existing substandard housing
units.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
328. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Americans with
Disabilities Act (00-9-036)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) The department
shall minimize the expenditure of these funds for staff and administrative
purposes or for other operational expenses.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 226,845

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 195,887

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 422,732

NEW SECTION. Sec.
329. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Facilities
Preservation: Statewide (98-1-003)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) $399,000 of the
reappropriation and $50,000 of the new appropriation from the state building
construction account‑‑state are provided solely to transfer
Mukilteo state park to the city of Mukilteo.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,700,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 50,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,934,532

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,684,532

NEW SECTION. Sec.
330. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Facility
Preservation and Deferred Maintenance (99-1-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,700,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
331. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Facility
Preservation (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) The appropriation
in this section is provided solely to continue minor works projects that reduce
the deferred maintenance backlog.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 12,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 40,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 52,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
332. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden State Park
Preservation and Multi-Purpose Facilities (02-1-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) The appropriation
in this section is provided solely for park preservation and for development of
the multi-purpose dining and meeting facility.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
333. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Emergency and Unforseen
Needs (02-1-004)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,200,000

TOTAL........ ........................... $ 3,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
334. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Natural/Historic
Stewardship (02-1-006)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
335. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Environmental Learning
Centers (02-1-010)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation is provided solely for the Seahurst environmental learning
center.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
336. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Facilities Assessment
Program (02-2-005)

The appropriation in
this section shall lapse on June 30, 2003.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
337. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Parkland Acquisition
Account (02-2-016)

Appropriation:

Parkland Acquisition
Account‑-State............. $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
338. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Boat Pumpouts
Federal Clean Vessel Act (02-2-020)

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
339. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Beacon Rock State
Park: Pierce Trust Donation (02-3-018)

Appropriation:

Parks Renewal
Stewardship Account‑-State........ $ 200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 800,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
340. FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE
FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Firearms Range Program
(FARR) (98-2-004)

Reappropriation:

Firearms Range Account‑-State................... $ 256,120

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,021,638

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,277,758

NEW SECTION. Sec.
341. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Boating Facilities
Projects (98-2-001)

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources
Account‑-State............. $ 13,331,774

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 9,825,791

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 23,157,565

NEW SECTION. Sec.
342. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Boating Facilities
Projects (02-4-001)

Appropriation:

Recreation Resources
Account‑-State............. $ 8,318,013

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 40,300,368

TOTAL.................................... $ 48,618,381

NEW SECTION. Sec.
343. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Nonhighway Road and
Off-Road Vehicle Activities (NOVA) (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:

NOVA Program Account‑-State..................... $ 7,273,884

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 7,682,997

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,956,881

NEW SECTION. Sec.
344. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Nonhighway Road and Off-Road
Vehicle Activities (NOVA) (02-4-002)

Appropriation:

NOVA Program Account‑-State..................... $ 5,527,551

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 23,559,218

TOTAL.................................... $ 29,086,769

NEW SECTION. Sec.
345. FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Washington Wildlife and
Recreation Program (98-2-003)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,663,227

Outdoor Recreation
Account‑-State............... $ 28,237,251

Habitat Conservation
Account‑-State............. $ 37,205,932

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 69,106,410

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 247,993,590

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 317,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
346. FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Washington Wildlife and
Recreation Program (02-4-003)

The appropriation in
this section for the wildlife and recreation program under chapter 43.99A RCW
and RCW 43.99A.040 is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
new appropriation is provided for the approved list of projects included in
LEAP capital document No. 01-25, as developed on April 25, 2001.

Appropriation:

Outdoor Recreation
Account‑-State............... $ 22,500,000

Habitat Conservation
Account‑-State............. $ 22,500,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 45,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 180,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 225,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
347. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Land and Water
Conservation Fund (LWCF) (98-2-005)

Reappropriation:

Outdoor Recreation
Account‑-Federal............. $ 975,325

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 849,761

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,825,087

NEW SECTION. Sec.
348. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Land and Water
Conservation Fund (LWCF) (02-4-005)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,400,000 of the
recreation resources account‑‑federal is appropriated for projects
chosen by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation.

(2) By January 1, 2002,
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall provide a report to the
legislature that:

(a) Describes those
projects funded subject to subsection (1) of this section; and

(b) Recommends
legislation creating a competitive process for the selection of projects that
will result in a list of projects to be submitted to the legislature for its
approval.

Appropriation:

Recreation Resources
Account‑-Federal........... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
349. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

National Recreation
Trails (NRTP) (98-2-006)

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources
Account‑-Federal........... $ 1,768,874

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 782,443

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,551,317

NEW SECTION. Sec.
350. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

National Recreation
Trails (NRTP) (02-4-006)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $200,000
of the new appropriation is provided solely to construct the twin tunnels
bridge on the iron goat trail.

Appropriation:

Recreation Resources
Account‑-Federal........... $ 2,132,936

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 977,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,109,936

NEW SECTION. Sec.
351. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Salmon Recovery
(00-2-001)

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 56,200,530

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,121,243

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State.................. $ 24,285,080

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 83,606,853

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 36,321,147

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 119,928,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
352. FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Salmon Recovery
(02-4-007)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Jobs for the
environment projects submitted by lead entities are eligible to receive
funding, including wages for jobs for the environment participants.

(2) $1,000,000 is
provided solely for a grant to the people for salmon organization to coordinate
and implement volunteer salmon recovery efforts.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 27,642,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 27,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 54,642,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 264,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 318,189,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
353. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Hatchery Management
(02-4-009)

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 11,200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 440,627

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,640,627

NEW SECTION. Sec.
354. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Boating Infrastructure
Grant (BIG) Program (02-4-010)

Appropriation:

Recreation Resources
Account‑-Federal........... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
355. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION
COMMISSION

Water Quality Grants
Program (98-2-001)

Reappropriation:

Water Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 1,227,740

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 14,272,260

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
356. FOR THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation Reserve
Enhancement Program (00-2-004)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,100,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,053,148

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,153,148

NEW SECTION. Sec.
357. FOR THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Water Quality Grants
Program (02-4-001)

Appropriation:

Water Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 3,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 23,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
358. FOR THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Dairy Waste Management
Grants Program (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:

Water Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 971,830

State Building
Construction Account--State...... $ 2,304,535

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 3,276,365

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,223,635

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
359. FOR THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Dairy Nutrient
Management Grants Program (02-4-002)

Appropriation:

Water Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 5,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 22,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
360. FOR THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Puget Sound District
Grants (02-4-003)

Appropriation:

Water Quality Account‑-State....... ............ $ 840,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,360,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
361. FOR THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Skykomish Flood
Mitigation Project (01-H-013)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 618,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 618,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
362. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND
WILDLIFE

Tideland Acquisition
(94-2-003)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 640,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,360,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
363. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Nemah Hatchery Building
and Incubation System Replacement (96‑1‑006)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 110,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,590,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
364. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Shellfish Laboratory
and Hatchery Upgrades (96-1-009)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 120,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 30,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 354,947

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 504,947

NEW SECTION. Sec.
365. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works
Preservation (98-1-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,030,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,998,572

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,028,572

NEW SECTION. Sec.
366. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Facilities Renovation
(98-1-005)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-

State.................................... $ 420,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,831,201

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,251,201

NEW SECTION. Sec.
367. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hatchery Renovation
(98-1-006)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,227,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,165,326

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,392,326

NEW SECTION. Sec.
368. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Recreational Access
Redevelopment (98-1-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 80,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,357,787

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,437,787

NEW SECTION. Sec.
369. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Coast and Puget Sound
Wild Salmonid Habitat Restoration (98-1-009)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,300,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
370. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Coast and Puget Sound
Wildstock Restoration: Hatcheries (98-1-010)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 110,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 890,000

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
371. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Statewide Fencing
Renovation and Construction (98-1-012)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) Expenditures of the
reappropriation in this section for fencing shall comply with chapter 16.60
RCW.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 185,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 826,118

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,011,118

NEW SECTION. Sec.
372. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wildlife Renovation
(98-1-013)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 80,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 170,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
373. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Issaquah Hatchery
Improvements (98-1-015)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,285,955

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,435,955

NEW SECTION. Sec.
374. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Warm Water Game Fish
Access Facilities (98-2-006)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Warm Water Game Fish
Account‑-State............. $ 340,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,095,955

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,435,955

NEW SECTION. Sec.
375. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Recreational Fish
Enhancement (98-2-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Recreational Fisheries
Enhancement‑‑State........ $ 400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 678,313

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,078,313

NEW SECTION. Sec.
376. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitigation Projects and
Dedicated Funds (98‑2‑008)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑‑State............. $ 81,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑‑Private/Local.... $ 898,000

Subtotal Reappropriation.................. $ 979,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 342,383

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,321,383

NEW SECTION. Sec.
377. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Migratory Waterfowl
Habitat Acquisition and Development (98‑2‑009)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Wildlife Account‑‑State......................... $ 200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 669,849

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 869,849

NEW SECTION. Sec.
378. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Clam and Oyster Beach
Enhancement (98‑2‑019)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑‑State........ $ 35,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,988,803

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,023,803

NEW SECTION. Sec.
379. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Deep Water Slough
Restoration (98‑2‑013)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)............ ... $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
380. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Salmon Restoration (99‑2‑001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 210,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑‑State.................. $ 500,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 710,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,040,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
381. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Upland Wildlife
Habitat: Replacement (00-2-005)

Reappropriation:

Wildlife Account‑-State......................... $ 600,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
382. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Goldsborough Creek
Restoration (00-2-008)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 63,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,067,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
383. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hatchery Reform
Facility Retrofits (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 10,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 60,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
384. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Forest and Fish Road
Upgrade and Abandonment on Agency Lands (02‑1‑003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 1,900,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 2,400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 11,600,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
385. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Code Compliance and
Protection (02-1-005)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 550,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 1,250,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,350,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 4,150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 28,500,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 32,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
386. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Facility and
Infrastructure Standards and Renovations (02-1-009)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) $305,000 of the
appropriation in this section shall be used to replace or renovate the
caretaker residence and construct pheasant rearing pens at the Lewis county
game farm.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 3,100,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 1,500,000

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 150,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,700,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 11,450,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 46,420,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 57,870,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
387. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Infrastructure Savings
(02-1-010)

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 915 of this act may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW SECTION. Sec.
388. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Endangered Species Act
Compliance on Agency Lands (02-2-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 8,800,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 9,800,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 39,200,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 49,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
389. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Diverse Fish and
Wildlife Population Health and Protection (02‑2‑004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Wildlife Account‑-State......................... $ 1,200,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,450,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,800,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
390. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Commercial and
Recreational Customer Satisfaction Improvements (02‑2‑006)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Warm Water Game Fish
Account‑-State............. $ 560,000

Wildlife Account‑-State......................... $ 500,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,060,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,700,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
391. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Watchable Wildlife
Program (00-2-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 42,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 58,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
392. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Watchable Fish and
Wildlife and Recreation Sites (02-2-007)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Wildlife Account‑-State......................... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,628,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,628,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
393. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Partnership
Improvements with Internal and External Customers (02‑2-008)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) Expenditures of the
appropriation in this section for fencing shall comply with chapter 16.60 RCW.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 4,000,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 2,000,000

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 150,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-State............. $ 50,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-Federal.......... $ 3,725,400

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-Private/Local.... $ 50,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 10,375,400

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 46,824,700

TOTAL.................................... $ 57,200,100

NEW SECTION. Sec.
394. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Youth Sport Fishing
Program (01-H-008)

Appropriation:

Wildlife Account‑-State.. ...................... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
395. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Fish Screens (01-H-011)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for the inventory, design,
construction, and installation of fish screens and fishways. To the extent
practicable and cost effective, the department shall contract for the design,
construction, and installation of fish screens and fishways. Funds provided by
this appropriation may be used to match federal funds appropriated under HR
1444, the Fisheries Restoration and Irrigation Mitigation Act of 2000.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 3,500,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
396. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES

Administrative Site
Preservation (02‑1‑002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 240,000

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 318,000

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 380,920

Agricultural College
Trust Management

Account‑‑State........................... $ 65,817

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,004,737

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,365,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,369,737

NEW SECTION. Sec.
397. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Real Estate Repair,
Maintenance, and Tenant Improvements (02‑1‑005)

Appropriation:

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 146,923

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 911,220

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,065,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,123,143

NEW SECTION. Sec.
398. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Hazardous Waste Removal
(02‑1‑006)

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 25,000

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 25,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 50,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 107,110

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 200,000

TOTAL.................. ................. $ 357,110

NEW SECTION. Sec.
399. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Recreation Facilities
Preservation (02‑1‑011)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 340,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,360,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
400. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Area Facilities
Preservation (02‑1‑016)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 508,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,032,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,540,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Agricultural Asset
Preservation (02‑1‑017)

Appropriation:

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 53,041

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 154,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,620,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,827,041

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Communication Site
Repairs (02‑1‑024)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 230,000

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 169,730

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 399,730

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 202,750

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,220,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,822,480

NEW SECTION. Sec.
403. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Minor Works ‑
Programmatic (00‑2‑011)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 119,610

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 301,305

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 212,695

Agricultural College
Trust Management

Account‑‑State........................... $ 31,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation............. .... $ 664,610

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 631,480

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,296,090

NEW SECTION. Sec.
404. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Minor Works ‑
Programmatic (02‑2‑001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 136,620

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 181,161

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 242,880

Agricultural College
Trust Management

Account‑‑State........................... $ 37,950

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 598,611

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,289,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,887,611

NEW SECTION. Sec.
405. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Small Timber Landowner
Program (00‑5‑001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b) of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,500,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
406. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Small Timber Landowner
Program (02‑2‑003)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,000,000

TOTAL........ ........................... $ 19,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
407. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Right‑of‑Way
Acquisition (02‑2‑007)

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 321,400

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State ........ $ 124,009

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 445,409

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,355,480

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,248,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,048,889

NEW SECTION. Sec.
408. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Mineral Resource
Testing (02‑2‑008)

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 11,900

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 6,100

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 18,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 18,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 300,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 336,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
409. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Commercial
Development/Local Improvement Districts (02‑2‑009)

Appropriation:

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 90,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 245,120

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 450,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 785,120

NEW SECTION. Sec.
410. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Transfer
Program (02‑2‑010)

The state building
construction account appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(1) The total
appropriation is provided to the department solely to transfer from trust
status or enter into thirty-year timber harvest restrictive easements for
certain trust lands of state-wide significance deemed appropriate for state
park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, natural resources
conservation area, open space, or recreation purposes.

(2) Property
transferred under this section shall be appraised and transferred at fair
market value. The value of the timber transferred shall be deposited by the
department to the common school construction account in the same manner as
timber revenues from other common school trust lands. No deduction shall be
made for the resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The value
of the land transferred shall be deposited in the natural resources real
property replacement account. These funds shall be expended by the department
for the exclusive purpose of acquiring real property of equal value to be
managed as common school trust land.

(3) Property subject to
easement agreements under this section shall be appraised at fair market value
both with and without the imposition of the easement. The entire difference in
appraised value shall be deposited by the department to the common school
construction fund in the same manner as lease revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the resource management cost
account under RCW 79.64.040.

(4) All reasonable
costs incurred by the department to implement this section are authorized to be
paid out of this appropriation. Authorized costs include the actual cost of
appraisals, staff time, environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar
costs.

(5) Intergrant
exchanges between common school and other trust lands of equal value may occur
if the exchange is in the interest of each trust, as determined by the board of
natural resources.

(6) Prior to or
concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department, with full
cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall execute and record a real property
instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified
in subsection (1) of this section for a minimum period of thirty years. The
department of natural resources, in consultation with the receiving state
agencies, shall develop policy to address requests to replace transferred
properties subject to the recorded property instrument that are no longer
deemed appropriate for the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this
section.

(7) The department and
receiving agencies shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this
section. However, the department or receiving agencies may remove a property
from the transfer list based on new, substantive information, if it is
determined that transfer of the property is not in the statewide interest of
either the common school trust or the receiving agency.

(8) The department
shall execute trust land transfers and easements such that 80 percent of the
appropriation in this section is deposited in the common school construction
fund. To achieve the 80:20 ratio, the department may offset transfers of
property with low timber-to-land ratios with easements on other properties.

(9) On June 30, 2003,
the state treasurer shall transfer all remaining uncommitted funds from this
appropriation to the common school construction fund and the appropriation in
this section shall be reduced by an equivalent amount.

(10) The appropriation
in this section is provided for a list of projects in LEAP capital document No.
01-17, as developed on April 24, 2001.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 50,000,000

Natural Resources Real
Property Replacement

Account‑-State........................... $ 10,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 60,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 66,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 320,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 446,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
411. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Land Bank (02‑2‑013)

Appropriation:

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 4,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
412. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Community and Technical
College Trust Land Acquisition (02‑2‑014)

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Forest Reserve

Account‑‑State........................... $ 200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,500,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
413. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Legacy and
Wetlands Conservation Grants (00‑2‑020)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 2,270,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,517,480

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)....... ........ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,787,480

NEW SECTION. Sec.
414. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Legacy and
Wetlands Conservation Grants (02‑2‑015)

Appropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 21,500,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 26,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
415. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Marine Station Public
Access (02‑2‑019)

Appropriation:

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑‑State........ $ 175,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
416. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Commencement Bay
Freshwater Channel (02‑2‑020)

Appropriation:

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑‑State........ $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
417. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Mobile Radio System
Upgrade (02‑2‑022)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 240,300

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 398,000

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 500,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,138,300

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 783,500

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,273,700

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,195,500

NEW SECTION. Sec.
418. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Riparian Open Space
Program (02‑2‑023)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
419. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Grants (00‑2‑014)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑‑State........ $ 2,100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 10,422,070

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,522,070

NEW SECTION. Sec.
420. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Grants (02‑4‑018)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The appropriation in
this section is provided for a list of projects in LEAP capital document No.
01-13, as developed on April 25, 2001.

Appropriation:

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑‑State........ $ 5,532,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 22,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,532,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
421. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Blanchard Mountain
Asset Evaluation (01‑S‑002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
is provided solely for an evaluation of the social, ecological, and financial
values of forest board lands on Blanchard Mountain in Skagit county. The
department may contract for the conduct of the evaluation.

(2) The evaluation
shall be completed by June 30, 2002. The department shall provide a report to
the legislature on the evaluation.

(3) For the duration of
the study, the department shall defer timber sales in the project area that
prescribe clear cut harvest.

(4) If the
appropriation in this section is not matched equally by contributions of
nonstate funds, these funds shall lapse.

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State.. ............ $ 25,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
422. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Region Headquarters
Modernization (02‑2‑025)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 72,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 128,000

Agricultural College
Trust Management

Account‑-State.................................. $ 20,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 220,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,800,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,020,000

(End
of part)

PART
4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
501. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Seattle Crime
Laboratory - New Forensic Laboratory (00-2-008)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 9,100,000

Death Investigations
Account‑-State............. $ 2,500,000

County Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-

State.................................... $ 350,000

Municipal Criminal
Justice Assistance Account‑-

State.................................... $ 249,795

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 12,199,795

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 300,205

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
502. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL

Fire Training Academy -
Water System (00-2-009)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 652,211

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,192,789

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,845,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
503. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL

Boarding Home Fire
Safety Program (00-4-010)

The reappropriation in
this section is provided solely for grants for the installation or retrofit of
fire sprinklers in boarding homes. The reappropriation in this section is
subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The state fire
marshal, in consultation with the department of social and health services,
shall implement the grant program.

(2) To be eligible for
a grant under this section, the boarding home must be licensed with the
department of social and health services.

(3) Determination of
grant eligibility and the percentage of grant funding shall be determined by
the following formula:

(a) At the time of
application for a grant, a boarding home with a resident ratio of fifteen
percent or greater department of social and health services clients and/or
low-income residents is eligible for one hundred percent of the difference
between the cost of retrofitting and the cost of installing sprinklers during
original construction.

(b) At the time of
application for a grant, a boarding home with a resident ratio of less than
fifteen percent department of social and health services clients and/or
low-income residents is eligible for fifty percent of the difference between
the cost of retrofitting and the cost of installing sprinklers during original
construction.

(c) At the time of
application for a grant, a boarding home with a resident ratio of seventy-five
percent or greater department of social and health services clients and/or
low-income residents is eligible for one hundred percent of the cost of
installing fire sprinklers.

(4) Any boarding home
receiving this grant, or that has previously entered into a contract to receive
grant funding, shall complete the installation of the fire sprinklers by June
30, 2003.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
504. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL

Fire Training Academy -
Preservation (02-1-006)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
505. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL

Spokane Crime
Laboratory - New Crime Laboratory (02‑2‑013)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,950,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,350,000

(End
of part)

PART
5

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
601. FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Public School Building
Construction (00-2-001 and 00-2-002)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 37,000

Common School
Construction Account‑-State........ $ 150,000,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 150,037,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 588,570,973

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 738,607,973

NEW SECTION. Sec.
602. FOR THE STATE BOARD OF
EDUCATION

State School
Construction Assistance Grants (02-4-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $200,000 from this
appropriation is provided to fund up to two FTEs in the office of state fire
marshal to exclusively review K‑12 construction documents for fire and
life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the intent of
this appropriation to provide these services only to those districts that are
located in counties without qualified review capabilities.

(2) $80,000 from this
appropriation is provided solely for skills centers study and survey.

(3) $1,000,000 from
this appropriation is provided for skills centers capital improvements. Skills
centers shall submit a budget plan to the state board of education and the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature for proposed expenditures and
the proposed expenditures shall conform with state board of education rules and
procedures for reimbursement of capital items.

(4)(a) $38,530,000 of
this appropriation is provided solely to enhance the state contribution in the
2001-2003 biennium as follows:

(i) Up to $12,000,000
to allow the state board of education to not reduce the kindergarten headcount
by half when calculating eligible square feet provided that this calculation
does not double the eligible square feet for schools that have two half-day
kindergartens, and to increase the eligible square feet for grades 1-12; and

(ii) Up to $26,530,000
to increase the area cost allowance.

(b) If chapter
. . . (House Bill No. 2173), Laws of 2001 is not enacted by June 30,
2001, the appropriation in this subsection (4) shall lapse.

Appropriation:

Common School
Construction Account‑-State........ $ 434,486,729

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,831,522,031

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,266,008,760

NEW SECTION. Sec.
603. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION

State School
Construction Assistance Program Staff (02-4-001)

Appropriation:

Common School
Construction Account‑-State........ $ 1,930,989

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,457,312

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)... ............ $ 9,554,976

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,943,277

NEW SECTION. Sec.
604. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE
BLIND

Old Main and Alhsten
Buildings, HVAC: Upgrade (00-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 850,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,064,160

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,914,160

NEW SECTION. Sec.
605. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR
THE BLIND

Irwin, Old Main,
Kennedy, and Dry Building Preservation (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 1,981,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,981,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
606. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR
THE BLIND

School for the Blind:
Campus Preservation (02-1-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 600,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,060,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
607. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR
THE BLIND

Alsten Material Center
and Braille Production (02-2-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,341,278

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,341,278

NEW SECTION. Sec.
608. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR
THE BLIND

Distance Learning
Center (02-2-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,789,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,789,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
609. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE
DEAF

Clark Hall/Lloyd:
Upgrade (00-1-006)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 400,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
610. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR
THE DEAF

Clark Hall/Lloyd:
Seismic Stabilization (02-1-008)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 400,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
611. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR
THE DEAF

School for the Deaf:
Campus Preservation (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,760,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,759,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,519,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
612. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR
THE DEAF

School for the Deaf:
Phase 2B (02-2-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 17,616,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
613. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW CSE/EE Phase
(90-2-013)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under
sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the University of Washington obtaining sufficient
local funds to complete this project.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,300,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL................................ ... $ 10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
614. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Power Plant Boiler No.
7 (96-2-020)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 486,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,325,384

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,811,384

NEW SECTION. Sec.
615. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Minor Works: Safety
(98-1-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 905 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

University of
Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,174,684

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,671,684

NEW SECTION. Sec.
616. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Building
Communications: Upgrade (98-2-009)

Reappropriation:

University of
Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 285,855

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 685,855

NEW SECTION. Sec.
617. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Bothell/Cascadia
Community College Phase I (98-2-899)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 through 904 of this act. No money may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating
board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of
financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,486,336

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 43,126,889

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 44,613,225

NEW SECTION. Sec.
618. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Bothell/Cascadia
Community College Future Phase (98-2-999)

No money from the
reappropriation in this section may be expended that would be inconsistent with
the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the project
design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 273,645

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,085,268

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,358,913

NEW SECTION. Sec.
619. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Center
BB Tower Elevators (96-1-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 5,740,000

University of
Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 93,100

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 5,833,100

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 715,910

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,549,010

NEW SECTION. Sec.
620. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Nuclear Reactor
Decommissioning (99-1-009)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,147,874

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 303,885

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,450,759

NEW SECTION. Sec.
621. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Harborview Medical
Research Center (94-2-013)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 2,316,618

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,613,678

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 4,930,296

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,851,453

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,781,749

NEW SECTION. Sec.
622. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

New Law School Building
(94-2-017)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 44,801,500

Higher Education
Nonproprietary Local

Capital Account‑-Private/Local........... $ 24,186,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 68,987,500

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 68,987,500

NEW SECTION. Sec.
623. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Tacoma Branch Campus
(94-2-500)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 through 904 of this act. No money may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating
board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of
financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,456,934

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,472,660

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,929,594

NEW SECTION. Sec.
624. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Classroom Improvements
and Minor Works (00-1-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act. This reappropriation is a combination of section 616, chapter
379, Laws of 1999, and section 1036, chapter 1, Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,773,674

University of
Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 23,760,694

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 25,534,368

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,252,792

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 26,787,160

NEW SECTION. Sec.
625. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Bothell 2A/Cascadia
Community College (00-2-015)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
through 904 of this act. No money from this reappropriation may be expended
that would be inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the
office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 29,123,099

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 20,976,901

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
626. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Tacoma Branch Campus
Phase 2A (00-2-017)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902, 903,
904, and 906 of this act. No money may be expended that would be inconsistent
with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the
project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial
management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 16,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 21,635,933

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 37,635,933

NEW SECTION. Sec.
627. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Tacoma Branch Campus
Phase 3 (00-2-021)

No money from the
reappropriation in this section may be expended that would be inconsistent with
the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the project
design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 400,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 69,846,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 70,346,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
628. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Land
Acquisition (01-2-029)

Reappropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 2,500,000

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 3,450,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
629. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Wire Plant Upgrade
(02-1-011)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 10,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
630. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Special Projects - Code
Requirements (02-1-025)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
631. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Minor Repairs Programs
(02-1-026)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) The University of
Washington shall provide $19,000,000 in local nonappropriated funds for this
project.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)............ ... $ 4,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
632. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Deferred
Renewal/Modernization/Current Access (02-1-031)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

University of
Washington Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 7,300,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 2,700,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 10,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 48,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 58,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
633. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma - Technology
Institute (02-1-150)

This appropriation is
being made as part of an assumed $4,550,000 total equipment capitalization
plan. The state share will be released once at least $3,000,000 in nonstate
matching contributions have been raised.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 550,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
634. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Bothell Phase 2B
Offramp (02-2-014)

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under
sections 902 through 904 of this act. No money may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating
board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of
financial management.

(2) If funds are
appropriated in the 2001-03 omnibus transportation budget for this project, the
appropriation in this section shall lapse.

Appropriation:

University of
Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 9,650,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
635. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Phase 2B
(02-2-027)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902, 903,
and 904 of this act. No money may be expended that would be inconsistent with
the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the project
design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 32,899,000

University of
Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 9,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 41,899,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,450,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 45,349,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
636. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Bio-Sciences
Research (02-2-028)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the University of Washington providing sufficient
evidence to the office of financial management of local revenue to support
issuance of bonded debt and accompanying debt service associated with this
project.

Appropriation:

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 29,025,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 29,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
637. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Suzzallo Library
Renovation (94-1-015)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 24,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,563,375

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 17,415,445

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 45,978,820

NEW SECTION. Sec.
638. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Medical Center
Improvements (99-2-010)

Reappropriation:

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 30,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 50,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 80,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
639. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Minor
Works: Safety and Environmental Projects (00‑1‑001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,750,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
640. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Minor
Capital Safety/Environmental (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
641. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Minor
Works - Preservation (00‑1‑004)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 275,000

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,300,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,575,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,425,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
642. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Americans
with Disabilities Act Projects (00-1-011)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 25,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 72,374

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 97,374

NEW SECTION. Sec.
643. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Child
Care Facility: Renovation (00-1-039)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State....................... ... $ 2,100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
644. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Scholars
Hall/White Hall Renovation: Renovation (00‑1‑078)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State.. ... $ 1,750,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
645. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Branch Campuses -
Minor Works: Branch Campuses (00-1-901)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State ........................... $ 550,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 450,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
646. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Branch Campuses -
Minor Capital Projects (02-1-901)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
647. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Minor
Works Program (00‑2‑002)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,800,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,200,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
648. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Minor
Capital Improvements (02-2-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 6,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 28,000,000

TOTAL........ ........................... $ 34,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
649. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Equipment
Omnibus Acquisition (00‑2‑003)

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,400,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
650. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Equipment
Omnibus Appropriation (02-2-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
is provided solely for the purchase of equipment to improve, upgrade, or
replace necessary instructional and research apparatus throughout the
university.

(2) At least $1,000,000
of the appropriation shall be used by the college of veterinary medicine for
equipment.

Appropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 6,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 14,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
651. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Johnson
Hall Addition-Plant BioScience Building: New (00-2-007)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 96,500

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 203,500

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 45,200,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 49,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
652. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Shock
Physics Building: New Facility (00-2-080)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,540,000

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 7,100,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 10,640,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 760,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
653. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Vancouver -
Engineering and Life Sciences Building: New Facility (00-2-904)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 22,470,650

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 29,470,650

NEW SECTION. Sec.
654. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Vancouver - Student
Services Center: New Facility (00-2-905)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 55,213

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 194,787

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 14,001,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,751,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
655. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Minor
Capital Preservation/Renewal (02-1-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 905 of
this act.

Appropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,000,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 3,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 6,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 28,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 34,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
656. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Campus
Infrastructure: Preservation (98-1-073)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,044,984

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,505,016

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
657. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Campus
Infrastructure: Preservation (02-1-073)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 905 of
this act.

Appropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,019,300

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,460,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 11,479,300

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 24,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 35,479,300

NEW SECTION. Sec.
658. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Energy
Plant - Heat: Renovation (02-1-501)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902
and 903 of this act.

(2) The appropriation
in this section is provided solely for Washington State University to renovate
the existing energy plant on the Pullman campus.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 23,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 23,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
659. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - WSUnet
Infrastructure (98-2-074)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,975,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,075,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
660. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - WSUnet
Infrastructure (02-2-074)

Appropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 4,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
661. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Vancouver -
Multimedia/Electronic Communication Classroom Building: (02-2-907)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 12,900,000

Washington State
University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 3,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 15,900,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)................ ... $ 600,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
662. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Bohler
Renovation: Renovation (94-1-010)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 98,845

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,249,412

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,348,257

NEW SECTION. Sec.
663. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Kimbrough
Hall Renovation/Addition: Renovation (94‑2‑019)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 89,475

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 121,875

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 211,350

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 11,521,650

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,733,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
664. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman -
Infrastructure: Savings (94-1-999)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 496,542

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 214,924

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 711,466

NEW SECTION. Sec.
665. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Hazardous
Waste Facilities - Statewide: New (94‑2‑006)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,100,001

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,500,001

NEW SECTION. Sec.
666. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Cleveland
Hall Renovation/Addition (98-2-032)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 400,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 10,210,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
667. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Murrow
Hall Addition: New Facility (98-2-008)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,250,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,910,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 400,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
668. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Teaching
and Learning Center: New Facility (98‑2‑062)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 22,870,175

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 30,870,175

NEW SECTION. Sec.
669. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Spokane - Health
Sciences Building: New Facility (98-2-903)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Higher Education
Construction

Account‑-State........................... $ 13,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 22,800,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 36,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
670. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Vancouver - Phase 2
Construction (98-2-911)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 11,715,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,065,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
671. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Senior Hall Design
(00-1-003)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 43,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,211,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 57,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 13,999,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,310,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
672. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Minor Works
Programs (00-2-002)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,210,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 980,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
673. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Childcare Center
(00-2-003)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 47,000

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 546,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 593,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 546,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,139,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
674. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Cheney Hall -
Design (00-2-009)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 225,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,600,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 75,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 24,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
675. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

EWU Infrastructure
Preservation (98-1-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 725,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,831,879

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,556,879

NEW SECTION. Sec.
676. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Infrastructure
Preservation (02-1-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 905 of
this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 21,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 26,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
677. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works:
Preservation (00-1-004)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 74,000

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State......... ................. $ 1,375,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,449,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 926,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
678. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Minor Works
Preservation (02-1-003)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of section 905 of
this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 21,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 26,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
679. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Roof Replacement
(02-1-004)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,619,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,425,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 6,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,044,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
680. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU HVAC Systems
Upgrade (02-1-007)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,500,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
681. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Water System
Preservation and Expansion (02-1-008)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,236,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,500,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,736,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
682. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Property
Acquisition (02-2-001)

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 650,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
683. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Campus Network
Upgrade (02-2-004)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
684. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Classroom Renewal
(96-2-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 143,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 801,838

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 944,838

NEW SECTION. Sec.
685. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Classroom Renewal
(02-2-007)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 905 of
this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,566,000

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 800,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 2,366,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 13,400,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,766,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
686. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Minor Works
Programs (02-2-008)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 515,000

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,703,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 2,218,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 10,800,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,018,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
687. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Monroe Hall
Renovation (96-1-002)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 2,617,000

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 125,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 2,742,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,514,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,256,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
688. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Water System
Preservation and Expansion (98-1-002)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 615,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 265,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 880,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
689. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Boiler Plant
Expansion/Upgrade (98-1-011)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,695,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,327,844

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,022,844

NEW SECTION. Sec.
690. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Electrical Utility:
Upgrades (98-1-110)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902, 903, and 906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,842,824

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,042,824

NEW SECTION. Sec.
691. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Music Facility
(00-2-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,200,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 14,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,225,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 14,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 30,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
692. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Program
(00-2-110)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Central Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 850,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,150,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
693. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Fiber Optic Backbone
Upgrade (00-2-130)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Central Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
694. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works
Preservation (00-1-120)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Central Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 740,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,260,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
695. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Omnibus Preservation
(02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Central Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,775,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 17,471,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,246,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
696. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Savings
(02-1-002)

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 915 of this act may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects approved
by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW SECTION. Sec.
697. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Randall/Michaelsen Life
Safety and Mechanical System Improvements (02-1-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 3,800,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
698. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

McConnell Stage and
Classroom Remodel (02-1-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
699. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Omnibus - Program
(02-2-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Central Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,750,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 12,559,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,309,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
700. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Steam/Electric/Chilled
Water/Fiber Optic (98-1-120)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,000,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 2,000,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 8,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,500,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
701. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Lynnwood Higher
Education Center (98-2-080)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902, 903,
and 906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Central Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,000,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 875,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
702. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Minor Works: Safety
and Code (00-1-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 226,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,674,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 11,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
703. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (00-1-004)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 249,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 249,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
704. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Minor Works
Preservation (00-1-002)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

The Evergreen State
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 832,630

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,767,370

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
705. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Minor Works
Preservation (02-1-014)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 22,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
706. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Emergency Repairs
(02-1-003)

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 560,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,700,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,260,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
707. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Life Safety/Code
Compliance (02-1-013)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 13,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
708. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Minor Works Program
(02-2-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 450,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,800,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
709. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Seminar Building Phase
2 - Construction (02-2-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 37,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 15,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 52,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
710. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

COM Building Renovation
and Expansion (02-2-011)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to conduct a predesign of the project described in
this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of
financial management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to the
submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 15,750,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
711. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure
Projects: Savings (94-1-999)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 249,801

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 249,801

NEW SECTION. Sec.
712. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Savings
(02-1-999)

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 915 of this act may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW SECTION. Sec.
713. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works:
Preservation (00-1-068)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)....... ............ $ 3,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
714. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works:
Preservation - Infrastructure (02-1-070)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 3,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

TOTAL........ ........................... $ 23,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
715. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works:
Preservation - Safety (02-1-071)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 3,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 23,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
716. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Program
(00-2-069)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Western Washington
University Capital

Projects Account‑-State.................. $ 3,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,730,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,730,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
717. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Program
(02-2-072)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Western Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 6,831,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 40,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 46,831,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
718. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Campus Services
Facility (96-2-025)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,887,050

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,187,050

NEW SECTION. Sec.
719. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Integrated Signal
Distribution (96-2-056)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 11,548,250

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,248,250

NEW SECTION. Sec.
720. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Campus Infrastructure
Development (98-2-024)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,200,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 11,000,000

Western Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 669,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 11,669,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,250,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,780,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,899,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
721. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Communications Facility
(98-2-053)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 32,519,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,454,400

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 40,473,400

NEW SECTION. Sec.
722. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Carver Gymnasium
Renovation (01-H-006)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to conduct a predesign of the project described in
this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of
financial management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to the
submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

Western Washington
University Capital

Projects Account‑-State.................. $ 230,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 21,647,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
723. FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD

NSIS Consortium
Development (00-2-001)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
724. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage
Projects (98-2-004)

The reappropriation in
this section shall support the projects as listed in section 748, chapter 379,
Laws of 1999.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 8,978,904

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,178,904

NEW SECTION. Sec.
725. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Stadium Way Facility:
Seismic (96-1-102)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 120,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,545,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.... ................................ $ 4,665,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
726. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

State Capital Museum:
Preservation (98-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 69,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 415,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 484,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
727. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Olympia - State Capital
Museum Preservation (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 238,679

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 129,423

TOTAL.................................... $ 368,102

NEW SECTION. Sec.
728. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Tacoma - State History
Museum Preservation Projects (02-1-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 373,016

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,738,605

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,111,621

NEW SECTION. Sec.
729. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Tacoma - Stadium Way
Research Center Preservation Projects (02‑1‑004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 339,847

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 527,721

TOTAL.................................... $ 867,568

NEW SECTION. Sec.
730. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Lewis and Clark Trail
Interpretive Infrastructure Grant Program (02-4-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation in this section is provided for development of station camp 1805
as a national historic park in conjunction with the projected relocation of
highway 101 in Pacific county. If full capitalization of this project is not
accomplished by federal/state/local and private partners by June 30, 2002, the
Lewis and Clark bicentennial advisory committee may distribute this sum to
other priority projects along the trail using criteria they may establish.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
731. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage
Projects (02-4-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The appropriation
is provided for the following list of projects:

Total

Amount Project

Organization Recommended Cost

Jefferson
County Historical Society - Bell Tower $ 100,000 386,083

Spokane
Parks and Recreation - Corbin and Moore-

Turner
Heritage Gardens 54,437 266,831

Clallam
County Historical Society - Lincoln School 83,500 250,000

Orcas
Island Historical Society - Museum 54,136 167,604

Gig Harbor
Peninsula Historical Society - Heritage

and Arts
Center 400,000 7,301,518

Vashon-Maury
Island Historical Society - Heritage

Museum 175,000 526,879

Loon Lake
Historical Society - Old Schoolhouse 8,292 29,896

Northwest
School of Wooden Boatbuilding - Port Hadlock 97,500 463,832

Drayton
Harbor Maritime Group - Dock Restoration

and
Replacement 216,790 650,372

Historic
Seattle PDA - Dearborn House 200,000 2,131,227

Vancouver
National Historic Reserve - American

Red Cross
House 400,000 2,195,000

Maritime
Heritage Foundation - Historic Ship Wharf 400,000 2,031,000

Cowlitz
County Museum - Museum Expansion and Remodel 350,000 1,059,152

Mansfield
Museum and Historical Society - Museum

Renovation 10,916 35,750

Fox Island
Chapel - Chapel on Echo Bay 49,665 149,000

Kirkman
House Museum - Museum Repair and Stabilization 20,000 64,080

City of
Mount Vernon - Lincoln Theatre 250,000 1,535,082

Squaxin
Island Tribe - Tu Ha'Buts Cultural Center -

Phase 2 225,000 1,734,000

Western
Forest Industries Museum - Train Shed and

Baldwin
Locomotive 150,000 450,000

Ferry
County Fair Association - Carousel Restoration 60,000 190,500

White River
Valley Museum - Olson Farm 200,000 1,647,750

Alderwood
Manor Heritage Association - Superintendent's

Cottage 24,000 150,000

Kitsap
County Historical Society Museum - Storage

Systems
for Artifacts 70,000 516,422

Museum of
Flight 50,000 5,009,667

Friends of
Skamokawa 9,900 30,199

City of
Raymond 239,000 719,000

City
of Morton 100,000 301,230

Total $ 3,998,136 29,465,195

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,998,136

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 16,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,998,136

NEW SECTION. Sec.
732. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Cheney Cowles Museum:
Preservation (02-1-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
733. FOR THE EASTERN
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Cheney Cowles Museum:
Addition and Remodel (98-2-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,150,774

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 11,033,406

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,184,180

NEW SECTION. Sec.
734. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL
COLLEGE SYSTEM

Project Artwork
Consolidation Account (96-2-400)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 92,634

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 71,788

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 164,422

NEW SECTION. Sec.
735. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Community
College - Vocational/Child Care Building: Construction (96-2-651)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 877,226

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 7,016,077

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,893,303

NEW SECTION. Sec.
736. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett Community
College - Instructional Technical Center: Construction (96-2-652)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 931,266

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 941,435

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,872,701

NEW SECTION. Sec.
737. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle Community
College - Integrated Learning Assistance Resource Center: Construction
(96-2-653)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 520,099

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,928,519

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,448,618

NEW SECTION. Sec.
738. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic College -
Poulsbo Center: Construction (96-2-654)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 12,932,340

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 114,335

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,046,675

NEW SECTION. Sec.
739. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover Park -
Transportation Trade: Construction (96-2-662)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 955,049

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 16,784,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 306,351

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,045,400

NEW SECTION. Sec.
740. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover Park Technical
College - Aviation Trades Complex: Construction (96-2-998)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,497,614

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,338,879

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 3,836,493

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,021,159

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,857,652

NEW SECTION. Sec.
741. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Underground Storage
Tanks (98-1-003)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 132,055

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 77,950

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 210,005

NEW SECTION. Sec.
742. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates Technical
College: Renovation (98-1-190)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 78,915

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,815,502

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,894,417

NEW SECTION. Sec.
743. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic College -
Library: Replacement (98-2-500)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 89,666

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,480,944

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,570,610

NEW SECTION. Sec.
744. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline Community
College - Classroom/Laboratory Building: Construction (98-2-660)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,748,626

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 1,315,000

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 6,063,626

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,151,374

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,215,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
745. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Community
College - Allied Health Building: Addition (98‑2‑661)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,203,134

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,833,641

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,036,775

NEW SECTION. Sec.
746. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellingham Technical
College - Health/Business Building: New Facility (98-2-672)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 661,660

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,086,600

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 188,339

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,936,599

NEW SECTION. Sec.
747. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lake Washington - Phase
3: New Facility (98-2-673)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 642,251

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 15,840,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 522,749

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,005,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
748. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Renton Technical
College - Technology Resource Center (98-2-674)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 663,699

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,591,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 516,301

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,771,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
749. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Skagit Valley College -
Whidbey Higher Education Center (98-2-675)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 455,201

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 9,175,300

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 289,112

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,919,613

NEW SECTION. Sec.
750. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia Community
College/University of Washington Bothell: Construction (98-2-999)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 through 904 of this act. No money from the reappropriation in this section
may be expended that would be inconsistent with the recommendations of the
higher education coordinating board and the project design, scope, and schedule
approved by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,664,903

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 28,384,506

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 30,049,409

NEW SECTION. Sec.
751. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Centralia College -
Instructional Building: Replacement (99-2-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,262,736

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 7,137,264

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
752. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia Basin College
- Electrical Substation (99-H-004)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 770,134

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 229,866

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
753. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Repair and Minor
Improvements (98-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 367,779

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,037,224

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,405,003

NEW SECTION. Sec.
754. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

HVAC Repairs (98-1-040)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 289,513

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,178,354

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,467,867

NEW SECTION. Sec.
755. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Mechanical Repairs
(98-1-070)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 322,215

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 128,190

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 450,405

NEW SECTION. Sec.
756. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Electrical Repairs
(98-1-090)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 807,423

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)........... ........ $ 1,070,769

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,878,192

NEW SECTION. Sec.
757. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Exterior Repairs
(98-1-110)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,131,342

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,310,007

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,441,349

NEW SECTION. Sec.
758. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Interior Repairs
(98-1-130)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 592,634

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 256,037

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 848,671

NEW SECTION. Sec.
759. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Statewide Minor Works:
Preservation (00-1-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 5,060,145

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,639,855

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
760. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof Repairs (98-1-010)

The reappropriation in
this section is provided for Corbert hall at Centralia College, subject to the
conditions and limitations of section 906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,800,360

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,477,124

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,277,484

NEW SECTION. Sec.
761. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Statewide Roof
Repairs: Infrastructure Improvements (00-1-010)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,064,310

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,532,690

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,597,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
762. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Statewide Facility
Repairs (00-1-050)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 12,964,850

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,285,563

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 15,250,413

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 12,149,587

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
763. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Statewide Site Repairs
(00-1-090)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
is subject to the conditions and limitations set forth in section 753, chapter
379, Laws of 1999.

(2) The reappropriation
is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and 906 of this
act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,209,931

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,632,069

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,842,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
764. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Improvements
(98-2-200)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,278,167

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,025,487

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,303,654

NEW SECTION. Sec.
765. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Statewide Minor Works:
Program (00-1-130)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,285,830

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 531,792

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 5,817,622

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 11,032,378

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
766. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce College -
Portable Buildings: Replacement (00-1-223)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 5,327,170

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 312,830

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
767. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds Community
College - Relocatable Buildings: Replacement (00‑1‑236)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 5,371,732

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)........... ........ $ 1,028,268

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
768. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Puget Sound
Community College - Portable Buildings Replacement (00-1-237)

Reappropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 4,364,576

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 247,824

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,612,400

NEW SECTION. Sec.
769. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Puget Sound
Community College - General Education Complex (00‑2‑679)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 24,046

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,781,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 99,954

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 16,937,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,842,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
770. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic College -
Physical Plant Building: Replacement (00-2-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,086,600

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,029,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,115,600

NEW SECTION. Sec.
771. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue Community
College - Robinswood School: Replacement (00‑2‑005)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,197,017

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,609,583

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,806,600

NEW SECTION. Sec.
772. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline Community
College - Library/Technical Center: New Facility (00-2-319)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,708,051

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 541,949

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
773. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Green River Community
College - Drama/Music Class/Laboratories: Renovation (00-2-322)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,336,754

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 93,246

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL........ ........................... $ 3,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
774. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark Community College
- Applied Arts 4 Building Renovation (00‑2‑326)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 759,936

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,780,064

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,540,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
775. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark College/WSU
Vancouver - Classroom/Laboratories: Design (00‑2‑680)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 through 904 of this act. No money from the appropriations may be expended
that would be inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the
office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 11,997

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,644,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 108,003

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 17,712,900

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,476,900

NEW SECTION. Sec.
776. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee Valley
College - Sexton Hall Computer Laboratories: Renovation (00‑2‑327)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 104,395

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 595,605

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
777. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee Valley
College - Omak Science Laboratory: New Facility (00‑2‑952)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 59,366

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 840,634

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
778. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Community
College - Mechanics Complex: Renovation (00‑2‑328)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,425,106

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 289,894

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,715,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
779. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Community
College - Building 5: Renovation (00‑2‑335)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,492,736

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 7,264

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
780. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellingham Technical
College - Building B: Renovation (00‑2‑338)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 482,087

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,444,713

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,926,800

NEW SECTION. Sec.
781. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia Community
College: Development (00-2-501)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 through 904, and 906 of this act. No money may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board
and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial
management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 26,581,595

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 23,518,405

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)............ ... $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
782. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia Basin College
- Emergency Roof: Replacement (00-2-600)

Reappropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 92,792

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 907,208

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
783. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce College Puyallup
- Phase 3 Expansion: Design (00-2-676)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,743,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 217,200

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 19,917,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,877,200

NEW SECTION. Sec.
784. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Whatcom Community
College - Design Classroom/Laboratory Building: New Facility (00-2-677)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 13,117

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 891,900

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 10,653,200

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,558,217

NEW SECTION. Sec.
785. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline Community
College - Higher Education Center and Childcare (00-2-678)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,228,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 117,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,991,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 23,336,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
786. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Statewide Hazardous
Material Pool (00‑9‑031)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 256,373

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 281,286

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL....................... ............ $ 537,659

NEW SECTION. Sec.
787. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Statewide Americans
with Disabilities Pool (00‑9‑036)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 555,788

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 381,583

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 937,371

NEW SECTION. Sec.
788. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works ‑
Preservation (Emergency Funds) (02‑1‑001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 12,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 58,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
789. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof Repairs
"A" (02‑1‑010)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑‑State........... $ 7,473,077

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,473,077

NEW SECTION. Sec.
790. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Facility Repairs
"A" (02‑1‑050)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑‑State........... $ 21,660,328

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 100,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 121,660,328

NEW SECTION. Sec.
791. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site Repairs
"A" ‑ Community and Technical College System (02‑1‑090)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) $200,000 of the
appropriation from the state building construction account‑‑state
is provided solely to South Seattle Community College for the Seattle chinese
gardens. The appropriation shall be matched by $200,000 in additional
contributions toward the project from local government.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑‑State........... $ 8,343,232

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 200,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 8,543,232

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 24,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 32,543,232

NEW SECTION. Sec.
792. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works ‑
Program ‑ Community and Technical College System (02‑1‑130)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the requirements of sections 905 and 906 of this
act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 10,965,000

Education Construction
Account‑‑State........... $ 5,535,000

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 16,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 80,000,000

TOTAL.................................... $ 96,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
793. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Skagit Valley College ‑
Office Space: Replacement (02‑1‑213)

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 762,689

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 762,689

NEW SECTION. Sec.
794. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Seattle Central
Community College ‑ Portables: Replacement (02‑1‑215)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 6,897,400

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,897,400

NEW SECTION. Sec.
795. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Seattle Central
Community College ‑ Edison Hall: Renovation (02‑1‑315)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 5,809,200

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,809,200

NEW SECTION. Sec.
796. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle Community
College ‑ Building A: Replacement (02‑1‑217)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 5,477,400

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,477,400

NEW SECTION. Sec.
797. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee Valley
College ‑ Greenhouse: Replacement (02‑1‑220)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑‑State........... $ 441,360

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 441,360

NEW SECTION. Sec.
798. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee Valley
College ‑ Agriculture Program: Renovation (02‑1‑328)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 794,536

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 794,536

NEW SECTION. Sec.
799. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Green River Community
College ‑ International Program: Replacement (02‑1‑222)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 587,070

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 587,070

NEW SECTION. Sec.
800. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce College Fort
Steilacoom ‑ Portables: Replacement (02‑1‑223)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 2,452,100

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).. ................. $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,452,100

NEW SECTION. Sec.
801. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lower Columbia College ‑
Physical Science Portables: Replacement (02‑1‑226)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 1,959,800

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,959,800

NEW SECTION. Sec.
802. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lower Columbia College ‑
Vocational Building: Renovation/Addition (02‑1‑326)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,090,700

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,090,700

NEW SECTION. Sec.
803. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Community
College ‑ Child Care: Replacement (02‑1‑229)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 969,900

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)........... ........ $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 969,900

NEW SECTION. Sec.
804. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Community
College ‑ Sundquist Hall: Renovation (02‑1‑329)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,812,800

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,812,800

NEW SECTION. Sec.
805. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley College -
Higher Education Center (00-2-954)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 635,279

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,364,721

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
806. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls Community
College ‑ Fine Arts Building: Replacement (02‑1‑231)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 672,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)........... ........ $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 672,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
807. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls Community
College ‑ Library: Renovation (02‑1‑331)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 5,602,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
808. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellingham Technical
College ‑ Replacement: New Facility (02‑1‑239)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 4,357,900

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)............ ... $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,357,900

NEW SECTION. Sec.
809. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lake Washington
Community College ‑ Replacement: New Facility (02‑1‑240)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 6,915,300

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL................................ ... $ 6,915,300

NEW SECTION. Sec.
810. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Peninsula College ‑
Buildings D and E: Renovation (02‑1‑310)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,669,800

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,669,800

NEW SECTION. Sec.
811. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Grays Harbor Community
College ‑ Library: Renovation (02‑1‑311)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 4,579,500

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,579,500

NEW SECTION. Sec.
812. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline Community
College ‑ Building 800: Renovation (02‑1‑319)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 6,021,100

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,021,100

NEW SECTION. Sec.
813. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue Community
College ‑ "A" Building: Renovation (02‑1‑320)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 5,566,100

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,566,100

NEW SECTION. Sec.
814. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia Basin
Community College ‑ Building A: Renovation (02‑1‑333)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 6,434,100

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,434,100

NEW SECTION. Sec.
815. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover Park - Building
18 Machine Trades: New Facility (02-1-343)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,791,800

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,791,800

NEW SECTION. Sec.
816. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Community
College - Multicultural Student Service Center (02-2-230)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 235,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 235,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
817. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

University of
Washington - Bothell/Cascadia Phase 2B: Offramp (02-2-999)

(1) The appropriation
in this section is provided solely for the south campus access and is subject
to the review and allotment procedures under sections 902 through 904, and 906
of this act. No money from this appropriation may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating
board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of
financial management.

(2) If funds are
appropriated in the 2001-03 omnibus transportation budget for this project, the
appropriation in this section shall lapse.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 17,476,750

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,976,750

NEW SECTION. Sec.
818. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Big Bend Community
College - Library Replacement: New Facility (02-1-232)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 7,497,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,497,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
819. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Walla Walla Community
College - Parent/Child Center: Replacement (02-1-234)

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
Colleges Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 391,230

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 391,230

NEW SECTION. Sec.
820. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Community
College - Portable Buildings: Replacement (02-1-236)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 3,457,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,457,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
821. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Puget Sound
Community College - Family Education/Child Center (04-1-238)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,132,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,132,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
822. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Predesign Studies
(02-2-001)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to the following colleges to conduct predesign studies
in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of financial
management: South Seattle Community College for a new instructional technology
building; Green River Community College for a new computer laboratory; Tacoma
Community College for an information technology/vocational center; Bates
Technical College for phase III expansion; Edmonds Community College for a new
instructional lab; and Walla Walla Community College for a new basic skills
lab. Future appropriations for these projects are subject to the submittal of
completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 600,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
823. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Matching Funds
(01-H-007)

Funding is provided as
capital project matching funds to the following colleges: Olympic
College-Shelton, $500,000; Skagit Valley, $500,000; Seattle Central, $500,000;
South Seattle, $500,000; Yakima Valley, $500,000; Spokane Falls, $500,000;
Whatcom, $267,500; Tacoma, $500,000; Edmonds, $500,000; and Clover Park,
$500,000. State funds shall be matched by an equal or greater amount of
nonstate moneys.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,767,500

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,767,500

(End
of part)

PART
6

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
901. The estimated debt
service costs impacting future general fund expenditures related solely to new
capital appropriations within this act are $18,427,449 during the 2001-2003
fiscal period; $106,954,937 during the 2003-2005 fiscal period; $149,523,472
during the 2005-2007 fiscal period; $149,899,611 during the 2007-2009 fiscal
period; and $149,899,611 during the 2009-2011 fiscal period.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
902. To ensure that major
construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and
executive intent, appropriations in this act referencing this section or in
excess of $5,000,000 shall not be expended until the office of financial
management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign and other documents
and approved an allotment for the project. The predesign document shall
include but not be limited to program, site, and cost analysis in accordance
with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management. To
improve monitoring of major construction projects, progress reports shall be
submitted by the agency administering the project to the office of financial
management and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and
senate. Reports will be submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a
format to be developed by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
903. Allotments for
appropriations shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review
requirements adopted by the office of financial management. The office of
financial management shall notify the house of representatives capital budget
committee and the senate ways and means committee of allotment releases based
on review by the office of financial management. No expenditure may be
incurred or obligation entered into for appropriations referring to this
section until the office of financial management has approved the allotment of
the funds to be expended. Projects that will be employing alternative public
works construction procedures under chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the
allotment procedures defined in this section and RCW 43.88.110. Contracts
shall not be executed that call for expenditures in excess of the approved allotment,
and the total amount shown in such contracts for the cost of future work that
has not been appropriated shall not exceed the amount identified for such work
in the level of funding approved by the office of financial management at the
completion of predesign.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
904. Appropriations for design
and construction of facilities on higher education branch campuses shall be
expended only after funds are allotted to institutions of higher education on
the basis of: (1) Comparable unit cost standards, as determined by the office
of financial management in consultation with the higher education coordinating
board; (2) costs consistent with other higher education teaching facilities in
the state; and (3) student full-time equivalent enrollment levels as
established by the office of financial management in consultation with the
higher education coordinating board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
905. To ensure that minor
works appropriations are carried out in accordance with legislative intent,
funds shall not be allotted until project lists are on file at the office of
financial management. No expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered
into for appropriations referring to this section until the office of financial
management has approved the allotment of the funds to be expended.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
906. (1) Agencies shall
expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and appropriations in order to:
(a) Rehabilitate infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation
and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural
environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition and
construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional employment
opportunities associated with capital expenditures.

(2) In order to meet
the goals of this section, the following conditions apply to appropriations
that reference this section: (a) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed
to accelerate expenditure rates at the current level of permanent employees and
shall use contracted design and construction services wherever necessary to
meet the goals of this section; and (b) reappropriations that reference this
subsection (2)(b) shall lapse on June 30, 2003.

(3) The office of
financial management shall report the following to the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature by January 30, 2003: (a) A listing of
reappropriations in the governor's 2003-2005 capital budget recommendation that
have been reappropriated one or more times and have ten percent or more of the
original appropriation unexpended; and (b) an explanation of why the
appropriation remains unexpended.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
907. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES
AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter
into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or
nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal
amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall
use the most economical financial contract option available, including
long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to
purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of
participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated
purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract may be
reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract to the extent provided in
the financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

The director of general
administration shall ensure that the clustering of state facilities and the
collocation and consolidation of state agencies take place where such configurations
are economical and consistent with agency space needs. Agencies shall assist
the department of general administration with facility collocation and
consolidation efforts.

State agencies may
enter into agreements with the department of general administration and the
state treasurer's office to develop requests to the legislature for acquisition
of properties and facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may
include charges for services rendered.

(1) Secretary of state:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $13,582,200 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a
regional archives building in eastern Washington to be sited on the Eastern
Washington University campus in Cheney.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $653,800 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase technology
equipment and software for an electronic data archive, provided that authority
to expend funding for acquisition of technology equipment and software
associated with the electronic data archive is conditioned on compliance with
section 902 of the 2001-2003 operating budget bill (information services
projects).

(2) Department of general
administration:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $3,956,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to expand the existing
Isabella Bush records center in Tumwater for use by state agencies.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $35,656,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase two existing
office buildings and associated land in Tacoma for use by the department of
social and health services.

(c) Enter into a
financing contract for an amount approved by the office of financial management
for costs and financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to lease develop or lease purchase a state office building of 150,000
to 200,000 square feet on state-owned property in Tumwater according to the
terms of the agreement with the Port of Olympia when the property was acquired
or within the preferred development/leasing areas in Thurston county. The
building shall be constructed and financed so that agency occupancy costs will
not exceed comparable private market rental rates. The comparable general
office space rate shall be calculated based on the three latest Thurston county
leases of new space of at least 100,000 rentable square feet adjusted for
inflation as determined by the department of general administration. The
department of general administration shall coordinate with potential state
agency tenants whose current lease expire near the time of occupancy so that
buyout of current leases do not add to state expense. The office of financial
management shall certify to the state treasurer: (i) The project description
and dollar amount; and (ii) that all requirements of this subsection (2)(c)
have been met.

(3) Department of
corrections:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $4,588,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a
correctional industries transportation services warehouse.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $9,305,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct lethal fences at
either the Washington state penitentiary, or the Washington correction center,
or both.

(4) Department of
veterans affairs:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $12,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a skilled nursing
home in Retsil.

(b) Enter into a financing
contract in an amount not to exceed $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase a state veterans'
home in eastern Washington.

(5) State parks and
recreation: It is the intent of the legislature that the operating revenues of
the department provide the primary source of funds necessary to meet financing
contract obligations for the projects financed under this authority. In
addition, state parks and recreation is authorized to pledge to make payments
from appropriated funds pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW in order to:

(a) Enter into
financing contracts in the amount of $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase and install cabins
and yurts statewide.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct cabins at Cama
beach.

(c) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $750,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop additional campsites
statewide.

(d) Enter into a
financing contract in an amount not to exceed $2,000,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for development of
a multi-purpose dining and meeting facility at Fort Worden state park.

(6) Community and
technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community College in the amount of
$4,106,300 plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to renovate Lynnwood hall and Montlake Terrace hall.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community College in the amount of
$3,134,900 plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct an addition to the student center building.

(c) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Highline Community College in the amount of
$15,066,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to replace the student union building.

(d) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College in the amount of
$2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for up to $2,500,000 to purchase the maple terrace apartments.

(e) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Everett Community College in the amount of
$1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for remodeling of the fitness center.

(f) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College in the amount of
$500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to purchase two buildings and property contiguous to the college
campus.

(g) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Olympic College in the amount of $900,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for
development of off-street student parking.

(h) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Renton Technical College in the amount of
$1,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for the purchase of approximately ten acres within the district
boundary to support a future relocation of apprenticeship programs off the main
campus.

(7) University of
Washington:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $7,500,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for renovation of Sand Point
building 5.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $5,500,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for renovation of Sand Point
building 29.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
908. FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION‑-ART
WORK ALLOWANCE POOLING. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in
this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided
solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The Washington state arts
commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order to fund
larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and representatives of school district
boards.

(2) One-half of one
percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction or any
major renovation or remodel work exceeding two hundred thousand dollars by
colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW
28B.10.027. The Washington state arts commission may combine the proceeds from
individual projects in order to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays
in consultation with the board of regents or trustees.

(3) One-half of one
percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any
public building by a state agency as defined in RCW 43.17.020 is provided
solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200. The Washington state arts commission
may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order to fund larger works
of art or mobile art displays in consultation with the state agency.

(4) At least
eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission
during the 2001-2003 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027,
and 43.17.200 shall be spent solely for direct acquisition of works of art.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
909. The amounts shown under
the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and
"Total" in this act are for informational purposes only and do not
constitute legislative approval of these amounts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
910.
"Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless the
context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant conditions and
limitations applicable to appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to
the unexpended balances remaining on June 30, 2001, from the 1999-2001 biennial
appropriations for each project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
911. To carry out the
provisions of this act, the governor may assign responsibility for predesign,
design, construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
912. If any federal moneys
appropriated by this act for capital projects are not received by the state,
the department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the
federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No
replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of the
director of financial management in consultation with the senate committee on
ways and means and the house of representatives capital budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
913. (1) Unless otherwise
stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate
money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW
43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so that the
state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended state share of
total project costs.

(2) Provision of the
full amount of required matching funds is not required to permit the
expenditure of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if a
proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each
distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
914. Any capital improvements
or capital projects involving construction or major expansion of a state office
facility, including, but not limited to, district headquarters, detachment
offices, and off-campus faculty offices, shall be reviewed by the department of
general administration for possible consolidation, collocation, and compliance
with state office standards before allotment of funds. The intent of the
requirement imposed by this section is to eliminate duplication and reduce
total office space requirements where feasible, while ensuring proper service
to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
915. The governor, through the
office of financial management, may authorize a transfer of appropriation
authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount
required for the completion of such project to another capital project for
which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to
expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended by the legislature in
making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital
appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or institution of
higher education and only between capital projects that are funded from the
same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local
government agencies except where the grants are provided within a single
omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by
the implementing statutes which govern the grants.

For purposes of this
section, the governor may find that an amount is in excess of the amount
required for the completion of a project only if: (1) The project as defined
in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and there are
funds remaining; or (2) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a
substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget
document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount
appropriated in this act.

For the purposes of
this section, the legislature intends that each project be defined as proposed
to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears
from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope
of a project in a different way.

A report of any
transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer
under $250,000, shall be filed with the legislative fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives by the office of financial management at
least thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of
financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within
thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
916. NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE
BOND PROCEEDS. Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act
from the state building construction account may be transferred to the state
taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance
committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and
regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. The state
treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial
management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority from the
state building construction account to the state taxable building construction
account is necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
917. The joint legislative
audit and review committee shall study the following topics and shall submit a
preliminary report to the appropriate legislative committees by December 1,
2001, and a final report, including recommendations, by September 15, 2002:

(1) FTEs funded by the
capital budget. There appears to be over four hundred fifty FTEs funded in the
capital budget, many of these not directly related to specific capital
projects, and many funded with state general obligation bonds. The committee,
with assistance from the office of financial management, shall: (a) Estimate
the number of FTEs funded in the capital budget by agency, including those who
are partially funded by the capital budget, whether they are paid for through
bonds or other sources, what their function is related to capital projects, and
whether they work directly or indirectly on capital projects; and (b) estimate
the extent to which overhead and administrative costs are paid for through the
capital budget, and the extent to which other indirect costs such as rent are
funded through the capital budget. The committee shall make recommendations
regarding how these FTEs and indirect costs can be better accounted for in the
budgeting process, and regarding the policy implications of funding personnel
and indirect costs in the capital budget; and

(2) Deferred renewal in
higher education institutions. According to higher education institutions,
deferred renewal of their facilities, such as capital maintenance and minor
works preservation projects needed but not done, runs in the hundreds of
millions of dollars statewide. The committee shall: (a) Study the reasons for
this extensive deferred renewal of facilities; (b) estimate, with the
assistance of the office of financial management and the higher education
coordinating board, the deferred renewal for each four year institution and for
the community and technical college system, and to what extent this deferred
renewal poses a health and safety threat to persons using the campus; (c)
review how other states approach higher education facility capital maintenance;
(d) make recommendations regarding how this deferred renewal problem could be
addressed; and (e) develop options to better coordinate facility maintenance
with the operating budget and other options to increase the useful life of
these facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
918. (1) A joint select
committee on local jail facilities is established. The joint select committee
shall review alternatives to address capacity needs through local jails and
regional jails, review funding options to address construction of new
facilities and modernization of outdated and decaying jails, and review funding
options for the cost of operating jail facilities.

(2) The committee shall
consist of twelve members selected by the co-speakers of the house of
representatives and the president of the senate as follows: Two members each
from the house capital budget committee, house appropriations committee, and
house local government and housing committee, four members from the senate ways
and means committee, and two members from the senate state and local government
committee. The committee shall be staffed by the house office of program
research and senate committee services.

(3) The committee shall
report its findings and recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
919. (1) A joint select
committee on school construction funding is established. The joint committee
shall: Review the statutory provisions regarding the funding of school
construction projects; review the current funding process to identify areas in
need of modification in order to improve efficiency and streamline the current
process; identify additional funding mechanisms to increase stability of
available funding resources; and evaluate potential future demands on the system
and the flexibility needed in the system to address diverse district and
geographic needs.

(2) The joint select
committee on school construction funding shall consist of twelve members, two
members each, one from each major caucus, from the house of representatives
committees on capital budget, finance, and education, appointed by the
co-speakers of the house of representatives, and four members from the senate
committee on ways and means, two from each major caucus, and two members from
the senate committee on education, one from each major caucus, all appointed by
the president of the senate. The committee shall be staffed by the house
office of program research and senate committee services.

(3) The joint select
committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislature by
December 31, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
920. (1) A joint select
committee on the capital needs of higher education is established to review
forecasted higher education enrollment levels in the state and whether the
current approach to providing public higher education opportunities throughout
the state, including the six public four year institutions, their branch
campuses and education centers, and the thirty-four community colleges is the
most effective and cost efficient way to meet the anticipated enrollment demand
and students education needs. The committee shall also monitor the study in
section 917(2) of this act regarding deferred renewal backlogs.

(2) The joint select
committee consists of twelve members, two members each, one from each major
caucus, from the house of representatives committees on capital budget,
appropriations, and higher education, appointed by the co-speakers of the house
of representatives, and four members from the senate committee on ways and
means, two from each major caucus, and two members from the senate committee on
higher education, one from each major caucus, all appointed by the president of
the senate. The committee shall be staffed by the house office of program
research and senate committee services.

(3) The joint select
committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislature by
December 31, 2001.

Sec. 921. RCW 79.24.580 and 1999 c
309 s 919 are each amended to read as follows:

After deduction for
management costs as provided in RCW 79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW
79.92.110(2), all moneys received by the state from the sale or lease of
state-owned aquatic lands and from the sale of valuable material from
state-owned aquatic lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement
account which is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation,
these funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for the
purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public purposes; for
providing and improving access to such lands; and for volunteer cooperative
fish and game projects. During the fiscal biennium ending June 30, ((2001))
2003, the funds may be appropriated for boating safety, local park
projects, shellfish management, enforcement, and enhancement and for
developing and implementing plans for population monitoring and restoration of
native wild salmon stock.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
922. The office of financial
management, in consultation with the department of general administration,
shall identify capital projects that may benefit from an energy analysis to
determine whether there are alternate, more economical, and energy efficient
means of completing the work. The office of financial management shall hold
appropriations in allotment reserve on the following types of capital projects
until this analysis can be completed: Heating, ventilation, and air
conditioning modifications, chiller plants, steam plants, boilers, chilled
water or steam lines, building control systems, lighting improvements, or other
major energy using systems that may warrant additional analysis. Agencies
receiving appropriations for such projects are encouraged to utilize energy
performance contracts or alternative financing for equipment in lieu of state
appropriated funds. The office of financial management may transfer funds
remaining in allotment reserve to infrastructure savings projects within the
agency that has realized savings from energy efficiency alternatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
923. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 924. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End
of part)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY................................. 140

COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM........................ 155

CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION........................... 38

DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT........ 2

DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS...................................... 54

DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY.......................................... 64

DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE................................ 86

DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION........................... 21

DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH........................................... 49

DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES................................ 97

DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES....................... 38

DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' AFFAIRS................................ 52

EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY................... 155

EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 134

HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD........................... 151

INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION................... 79

MILITARY DEPARTMENT............................................ 31

OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT................................. 20

OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE................................ 1

STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION...................................... 111

STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION.................................. 84

STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER.............................. 36

STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION.......................... 71

STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND.................................... 112

STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF..................................... 114

SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION.......................... 112

THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE................................... 144

UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON...................................... 114

WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY........................... 151

WASHINGTON STATE PATROL....................................... 108

WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY................................... 124

WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 147

---
END ---