BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.74.010 and 1997 c
275 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
otherwise requires, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1) "Board"
means the board of physical therapy created by RCW 18.74.020.

(2)
"Department" means the department of health.

(3) "Physical
therapy" means the treatment of any bodily or mental condition of any
person by the use of the physical, chemical, and other properties of heat,
cold, air, light, water, electricity, sound, massage, and therapeutic exercise,
which includes posture and rehabilitation procedures; the performance of tests
and measurements of neuromuscular function as an aid to the diagnosis or
treatment of any human condition; performance of treatments on the basis of
test findings after consultation with and periodic review by an authorized
health care practitioner except as provided in RCW 18.74.012; supervision of
selective forms of treatment by trained supportive personnel; and provision of
consultative services for health, education, and community agencies. The use
of Roentgen rays and radium for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes, the use of
electricity for surgical purposes, including cauterization, and the use of
spinal manipulation or manipulative mobilization of the spine and its immediate
articulations, are not included under the term "physical therapy" as
used in this chapter.

(4) "Physical
therapist" means a person who practices physical therapy as defined in
this chapter but does not include massage operators as defined in RCW
18.108.010.

(5)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(6) Words importing the
masculine gender may be applied to females.

(7) "Authorized
health care practitioner" means and includes licensed physicians,
osteopathic physicians, chiropractors, naturopaths, podiatric physicians and
surgeons, dentists, and advanced registered nurse practitioners: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall be construed as altering the scope of
practice of such practitioners as defined in their respective licensure laws.

(8) "Physical
therapist assistant" means a person who meets the requirements of this
chapter for licensure as a physical therapist assistant and who performs
physical therapy procedures and related tasks that have been selected and
delegated only by the supervising physical therapist.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.74.020 and 1991 c
3 s 174 are each amended to read as follows:

The state board of
physical therapy is hereby created. The board shall consist of five members
who shall be appointed by the governor. Of the initial appointments, two shall
be appointed for a term of two years, two for a term of three years, and one
for a term of four years. Thereafter, all appointments shall be for terms of
four years. ((Four)) Three members of the board shall be
physical therapists licensed under this chapter and residing in this state, and
one member shall be a physical therapist assistant licensed under this chapter
and residing in this state. They shall have not less than five years'
experience in the practice of physical therapy, and shall be actively engaged
in practice within two years of appointment. The fifth member shall be
appointed from the public at large, shall have an interest in the rights of
consumers of health services, and shall not be or have been a member of any
other licensing board, a licensee of any health occupation board, an employee
of any health facility nor derive his or her primary livelihood from the provision
of health services at any level of responsibility. In the event that a member
of the board for any reason cannot complete his or her term of office, another
appointment shall be made by the governor in accordance with the procedure
stated above to fill the remainder of the term. No member may serve for more
than two successive four-year terms.

The secretary of health
shall furnish such secretarial, clerical and other assistance as the board may
require. Each member of the board shall, in addition to travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.240.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.74.040 and 1991 c
3 s 177 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
secretary of health shall license as a physical therapist, and shall furnish a
license to each applicant who successfully passes the examination for licensure
as a physical therapist.

(2) The secretary of
health shall license as a physical therapist assistant, and shall furnish a license
to each applicant who successfully passes, the examination for licensure as a
physical therapist assistant.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.74.060 and 1996 c
191 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the recommendation
of the board, the secretary shall license as a physical therapist or
physical therapist assistant and shall furnish a license to any person who
is a physical therapist registered or licensed under the laws of another state
or territory, or the District of Columbia, or any person who is a physical
therapist assistant licensed under the laws of another state or territory, or
the District of Columbia, if the qualifications for such registration or
license required of the applicant were substantially equal to the requirements
under this chapter. At the time of making application, the applicant shall
comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees
established pursuant to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.74.070 and 1996 c
191 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

Every licensed physical
therapist and physical therapist assistant shall apply to the secretary
for a renewal of the license and pay to the state treasurer a fee determined by
the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.74.090 and 1991 c
3 s 181 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who
is not licensed with the secretary of health as a physical therapist under the
requirements of this chapter shall not represent him or herself as being so
licensed and shall not use in connection with his or her name the words or
letters "P.T.", "R.P.T.", "L.P.T.",
"physical therapy", "physiotherapy", "physical
therapist" or "physiotherapist", or any other letters, words,
signs, numbers, or insignia indicating or implying that he or she is a physical
therapist. No person may practice physical therapy without first having a
valid license.

(2) No person may
use the title "physical therapist assistant," the letters
"PTA," or any other words, abbreviations, or insignia in connection
with his or her name to indicate or imply, directly or indirectly, that he or
she is a physical therapist assistant without being licensed in accordance with
this chapter as a physical therapist assistant.

(3)
Nothing in this chapter prohibits any person licensed in this state under any
other act from engaging in the practice for which he or she is licensed. It
shall be the duty of the prosecuting attorney of each county to prosecute all
cases involving a violation of this chapter arising within his or her county.
The attorney general may assist in such prosecution and shall appear at all
hearings when requested to do so by the board.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.74.120 and 1991 c
3 s 183 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of health
shall keep a record of proceedings under this chapter and a register of all
persons licensed under it. The register shall show the name of every living
licensed physical therapist and physical therapist assistant, his or her
last known place of residence, and the date and number of his or her license as
a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 18.74 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
waive the examination and grant a license to a person who is practicing as a
physical therapist assistant in this state on the effective date of this
section, if the board determines that the person meets commonly accepted
standards for practicing as a physical therapist assistant, as established by
rule.

(2) Persons eligible
for licensure as a physical therapist assistant under subsection (1) of this
section shall apply for a license under RCW 18.74.040 before December 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 18.74 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An applicant for a
license as a physical therapist assistant shall have the following minimum
qualifications:

(a) Be of good moral
character;

(b) Be a graduate of a
physical therapist assistant education program accredited by an agency approved
by the board; and

(c) Have successfully
passed the national examination approved by the board.

(2) The
applicant shall present proof of qualification to the board in the manner and
on the forms prescribed by the board.

---
END ---