BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 11.02.005 and 2000 c
130 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

When used in this
title, unless otherwise required from the context:

(1) "Personal representative"
includes executor, administrator, special administrator, and guardian or
limited guardian and special representative.

(2) "Net
estate" refers to the real and personal property of a decedent exclusive
of homestead rights, exempt property, the family allowance and enforceable
claims against, and debts of, the deceased or the estate.

(3)
"Representation" refers to a method of determining distribution in
which the takers are in unequal degrees of kinship with respect to the
intestate, and is accomplished as follows: After first determining who, of
those entitled to share in the estate, are in the nearest degree of kinship,
the estate is divided into equal shares, the number of shares being the sum of
the number of persons who survive the intestate who are in the nearest degree
of kinship and the number of persons in the same degree of kinship who died
before the intestate but who left issue surviving the intestate; each share of
a deceased person in the nearest degree shall be divided among those of the
deceased person's issue who survive the intestate and have no ancestor then
living who is in the line of relationship between them and the intestate, those
more remote in degree taking together the share which their ancestor would have
taken had he or she survived the intestate. Posthumous children are considered
as living at the death of their parent.

(4) "Issue"
includes all the lawful lineal descendants of the ancestor and all lawfully
adopted children.

(5) "Degree of
kinship" means the degree of kinship as computed according to the rules of
the civil law; that is, by counting upward from the intestate to the nearest
common ancestor and then downward to the relative, the degree of kinship being
the sum of these two counts.

(6) "Heirs"
denotes those persons, including the surviving spouse, who are entitled under
the statutes of intestate succession to the real and personal property of a
decedent on the decedent's death intestate.

(7) "Real
estate" includes, except as otherwise specifically provided herein, all
lands, tenements, and hereditaments, and all rights thereto, and all interest
therein possessed and claimed in fee simple, or for the life of a third person.

(8) "Will"
means an instrument validly executed as required by RCW 11.12.020.

(9) "Codicil"
means a will that modifies or partially revokes an existing earlier will. A
codicil need not refer to or be attached to the earlier will.

(10)
"Guardian" or "limited guardian" means a personal
representative of the person or estate of an incompetent or disabled person as
defined in RCW 11.88.010 and the term may be used in lieu of "personal
representative" wherever required by context.

(11)
"Administrator" means a personal representative of the estate of a
decedent and the term may be used in lieu of "personal
representative" wherever required by context.

(12)
"Executor" means a personal representative of the estate of a
decedent appointed by will and the term may be used in lieu of "personal
representative" wherever required by context.

(13) "Special
administrator" means a personal representative of the estate of a decedent
appointed for limited purposes and the term may be used in lieu of
"personal representative" wherever required by context.

(14)
"Trustee" means an original, added, or successor trustee and includes
the state, or any agency thereof, when it is acting as the trustee of a trust
to which chapter 11.98 RCW applies.

(15) "Nonprobate
asset" means those rights and interests of a person having beneficial
ownership of an asset that pass on the person's death under a written
instrument or arrangement other than the person's will. "Nonprobate
asset" includes, but is not limited to, a right or interest passing under
a joint tenancy with right of survivorship, joint bank account with right of
survivorship, payable on death or trust bank account, transfer on death
security or security account, deed or conveyance if possession has been
postponed until the death of the person, trust of which the person is grantor
and that becomes effective or irrevocable only upon the person's death,
community property agreement, individual retirement account or bond, or note or
other contract the payment or performance of which is affected by the death of
the person. "Nonprobate asset" does not include: A payable-on-death
provision of a life insurance policy, annuity, or other similar contract, or of
an employee benefit plan; a right or interest passing by descent and
distribution under chapter 11.04 RCW; a right or interest if, before death, the
person has irrevocably transferred the right or interest, the person has waived
the power to transfer it or, in the case of contractual arrangement, the person
has waived the unilateral right to rescind or modify the arrangement; or a
right or interest held by the person solely in a fiduciary capacity. For the
definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to revocation of a
provision for a former spouse upon dissolution of marriage or declaration of
invalidity of marriage, RCW 11.07.010(5) applies. For the definition of
"nonprobate asset" relating to revocation of a provision for a former
spouse upon dissolution of marriage or declaration of invalidity of marriage,
see RCW 11.07.010(5). For the definition of "nonprobate asset"
relating to testamentary disposition of nonprobate assets, see RCW
11.11.010(7).

(16) "Internal
Revenue Code" means the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended or renumbered ((on)) as of January 1, ((1999)) 2001.

(17) References to
"section 2033A" of the Internal Revenue Code in wills, trust
agreements, powers of appointment, beneficiary designations, and other
instruments governed by or subject to this title shall be deemed to refer to
the comparable or corresponding provisions of section 2057 of the Internal
Revenue Code, as added by section 6006(b) of the Internal Revenue Service
Restructuring Act of 1998 (H.R. 2676, P.L. 105-206); and references to the
section 2033A "exclusion" shall be deemed to mean the section 2057
deduction.

Words that import the
singular number may also be applied to the plural of persons and things.

Words importing the
masculine gender only may be extended to females also.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.2635 and 1998
c 308 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of environmental remedial action,
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of
the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate 0.471 percent.

(2) For purposes of this
chapter, "environmental remedial action" means:

(a) Those services
related to the identification, investigation, or cleanup arising out of the
release or threatened release of hazardous substances that are conducted under
contract with the department of ecology or under an enforcement order, agreed
order, or consent decree executed by the department of ecology, or those
services, when evaluated as a whole, that are the substantial equivalent of a
department of ecology-conducted or supervised remedial action under the model
toxics control act, chapter 70.105D RCW; or

(b) Those services
related to the identification, investigation, or cleanup of a facility that are
conducted under contract with the United States environmental protection agency
or under an order or consent decree executed by the United States environmental
protection agency, or that are consistent with the national contingency plan
adopted under the comprehensive environmental response compensation and
liability act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605 as it exists on July 1, 1998, and those
services are conducted at facilities that are included on the national
priorities list adopted under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605 as it exists on July 1, 1998,
or at facilities subject to a removal action authorized under 42 U.S.C. Sec.
9604 as it exists on July 1, 1998.

(3) A site is eligible
for environmental remedial action upon submittal, via certified mail to the
department of ecology and the department of revenue, of the following:

(a) A certification
from the owner, the department of ecology, or the United States environmental
protection agency, containing the following information:

(i) The location of the
site, shown on a map and identified by parcel number or numbers and street
address;

(ii) The name and
address and daytime phone number of a contact person;

(iii) A statement that
the proposed environmental remedial actions will be conducted by the department
of ecology or its authorized contractor under chapter 70.105D RCW or will be
substantially equivalent to a department of ecology-conducted or supervised
remedial action under the model toxics control act, chapter 70.105D RCW, or
will be conducted by the United States environmental protection agency or its
authorized contractor or will be consistent with the national contingency plan
under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605 as it exists on July 1, 1998; and

(iv) A description of
the proposed environmental remedial actions to be taken; and

(b)(i) A certification
from a certified underground storage tank service supervisor as authorized in
chapter 90.76 RCW, from a professional engineer licensed in the state of
Washington, or from an environmental professional who subscribes to a code of
professional responsibility administered by a recognized organization
representing such professions containing the following information:

(A) Confirmation that
an environmental remedial action as defined in this section is to be conducted
at the site;

(B) The location of the
site, shown on a map and identified by parcel number or numbers and street address,
and the approximate location of the proposed environmental remedial action; and

(C) The name, address,
telephone number, and uniform business identifier of the person providing the
certification; or

(ii) If applicable to
the site, a copy of an enforcement order, agreed order, or consent decree
executed by the department of ecology or the United States environmental
protection agency.

(4) The department of
revenue shall respond in writing to the owner within thirty days confirming
receipt of the certification, or certifications, of eligibility. Under RCW
82.32.330(3)(m), certification is subject to disclosure and copies may be
obtained from the department upon request. The request shall be in writing and
shall identify the site by county and parcel number or numbers.

(5) The owner shall
provide a copy of the confirmation from the department of revenue to each
person who renders environmental remedial action at the site. Each person who
renders such action shall separately state the charges for labor and services
associated with the environmental remedial action.

(6) Upon completion of
the environmental remedial action, the owner shall submit to the department of
ecology a report documenting the environmental remedial actions conducted at
the site and documenting compliance with the requirements of chapter 70.105D
RCW.

(7) In addition to any
other penalties, a person who files a certificate with the department of
ecology or the department of revenue that contains falsehoods or
misrepresentations are subject to penalties authorized under chapter 18.43 or
90.76 RCW or RCW 9A.76.175. Also, a person who improperly reports the person's
tax class shall be assessed a penalty of fifty percent of the tax due, in
addition to other taxes or penalties, together with interest. The department
of revenue shall waive the penalty imposed under this section if it finds that
the falsehoods or misrepresentations or improper reporting of the tax
classification was due to circumstances beyond the control of the person.

(8) This section
expires July 1, 2003.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.04.2907 and 1998
c 331 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of receiving income from royalties
or charges in the nature of royalties for the granting of intangible rights,
such as copyrights, licenses, patents, or franchise fees, the amount of tax
with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross income from royalties
or charges in the nature of royalties from the business multiplied by the rate
of 0.484 percent.

"Royalties"
means compensation for the use of intangible property, such as copyrights,
patents, licenses, franchises, trademarks, trade names, and similar items. It
does not include compensation for any natural resource or licensing of
canned software to the end user.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.08.0287 and 1996
c 244 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The tax imposed by this
chapter shall not apply to sales of passenger motor vehicles which are to be
used for commuter ride sharing or ride sharing for persons with special
transportation needs, as defined in RCW 46.74.010, if the vehicles are used
as ride-sharing vehicles ((are exempt under RCW 82.44.015)) for
thirty-six consecutive months beginning ((within thirty days of application
for exemption under this section. If used as a ride-sharing vehicle for less
than thirty-six consecutive months, the registered owner of one of these
vehicles shall notify the department of revenue upon termination of primary use
of the vehicle as a ride-sharing vehicle and is liable for the tax imposed by
this chapter)) from the date of purchase.

To qualify for the tax
exemption, those passenger motor vehicles with five or six passengers,
including the driver, used for commuter ride-sharing, must be operated either
within the state's eight largest counties that are required to develop commute
trip reduction plans as directed by chapter 70.94 RCW or in other counties, or
cities and towns within those counties, that elect to adopt and implement a
commute trip reduction plan. Additionally at least one of the following
conditions must apply: (1) The vehicle must be operated by a public
transportation agency for the general public; or (2) the vehicle must be used
by a major employer, as defined in RCW 70.94.524 as an element of its commute
trip reduction program for their employees; or (3) the vehicle must be owned
and operated by individual employees and must be registered either with the
employer as part of its commute trip reduction program or with a public
transportation agency serving the area where the employees live or work.
Individual employee owned and operated motor vehicles will require
certification that the vehicle is registered with a major employer or a public
transportation agency. Major employers who own and operate motor vehicles for
their employees must certify that the commuter ride-sharing arrangement
conforms to a carpool/vanpool element contained within their commute trip
reduction program.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.12.0282 and 1999
c 358 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The tax imposed by this
chapter shall not apply with respect to the use of passenger motor vehicles
used as ride-sharing vehicles by not less than five persons, including the
driver, with a gross vehicle weight not to exceed 10,000 pounds where the
primary usage is for commuter ride-sharing, as defined in RCW 46.74.010, by not
less than four persons including the driver when at least two of those persons
are confined to wheelchairs when riding, or passenger motor vehicles where the
primary usage is for ride-sharing for persons with special transportation
needs, as defined in RCW 46.74.010, if the vehicles are ((exempt under RCW
82.44.015)) used as ride-sharing vehicles for thirty-six consecutive
months beginning ((within thirty days of application for exemption under
this section. If used as a ride-sharing vehicle for less than thirty-six
consecutive months, the registered owner of one of these vehicles shall notify
the department of revenue upon termination of primary use of the vehicle as a
ride-sharing vehicle and is liable for the tax imposed by this chapter)) with
the date of first use.

To qualify for the tax
exemption, those passenger motor vehicles with five or six passengers,
including the driver, used for commuter ride-sharing, must be operated either
within the state's eight largest counties that are required to develop commute
trip reduction plans as directed by chapter 70.94 RCW or in other counties, or
cities and towns within those counties, that elect to adopt and implement a
commute trip reduction plan. Additionally at least one of the following
conditions must apply: (1) The vehicle must be operated by a public
transportation agency for the general public; or (2) the vehicle must be used
by a major employer, as defined in RCW 70.94.524 as an element of its commute
trip reduction program for their employees; or (3) the vehicle must be owned
and operated by individual employees and must be registered either with the
employer as part of its commute trip reduction program or with a public
transportation agency serving the area where the employees live or work.
Individual employee owned and operated motor vehicles will require
certification that the vehicle is registered with a major employer or a public
transportation agency. Major employers who own and operate motor vehicles for
their employees must certify that the commuter ride-sharing arrangement
conforms to a carpool/vanpool element contained within their commute trip
reduction program.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.12.834 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter does not apply
to the use of tangible personal property by a seller/lessee ((to a lessor))
under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW 81.112.300 in respect to tangible
personal property used by the seller/lessee, or to the ((purchase amount
paid by the lessee)) use of tangible personal property under an exercise
of an option to purchase at the end of the lease term, but only if the
seller/lessee previously paid any tax otherwise due under this chapter or
chapter 82.08 RCW at the time of acquisition of the tangible personal property.

Sec. 7. RCW 82.14.055 and 2000 c
104 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, a local sales and use tax
change shall take effect (a) no sooner than seventy-five days after the
department receives notice of the change and (b) only on the first day of
January, April, July, or October.

(2) In the case of a
local sales and use tax that is a credit against the state sales tax or use
tax, a local sales and use tax change shall take effect (a) no sooner than
thirty days after the department receives notice of the change and (b) only on
the first day of a month.

(3) For the
purposes of this section, "local sales and use tax change" means
enactment or revision of local sales and use taxes under this chapter or any
other statute, including changes resulting from referendum or annexation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

The
business of collection, receipt, transfer, including transportation between any
locations, storage, or disposal of solid waste is not subject to this chapter.
Any such business activities are subject to taxation under the classification
in RCW 82.04.280(2). "Solid waste" for purposes of this section is
defined in RCW 82.18.010.

Sec. 9. RCW 82.27.020 and 1999 c
126 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to all
other taxes, licenses, or fees provided by law there is established an excise
tax on the commercial possession of enhanced food fish as provided in this
chapter. The tax is levied upon and shall be collected from the owner of the
enhanced food fish whose possession constitutes the taxable event. The taxable
event is the first possession in Washington by an owner after the enhanced
food fish has been landed. Processing and handling of enhanced food fish
by a person who is not the owner is not a taxable event to the processor or
handler.

(2) A person in
possession of enhanced food fish and liable to this tax may deduct from the
price paid to the person from which the enhanced food fish (except oysters) are
purchased an amount equal to a tax at one-half the rate levied in this section
upon these products.

(3) The measure of the
tax is the value of the enhanced food fish at the point of landing.

(4) The tax shall be
equal to the measure of the tax multiplied by the rates for enhanced food fish
as follows:

(a) Chinook, coho, and
chum salmon and anadromous game fish: Five and twenty-five one-hundredths
percent;

(b) Pink and sockeye
salmon: Three and fifteen one-hundredths percent;

(c) Other food fish and
shellfish, except oysters, sea urchins, and sea cucumbers: Two and one-tenth
percent;

(d) Oysters: Eight
one-hundredths of one percent;

(e) Sea urchins: Four
and six-tenths percent through December 31, 2005, and two and one-tenth percent
thereafter; and

(f) Sea cucumbers:
Four and six-tenths percent through December 31, 2005, and two and one-tenth
percent thereafter.

(5) An additional tax
is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030 multiplied by the tax
payable under subsection (4) of this section.

Sec. 10. RCW 82.32.410 and 1997 c
409 s 211 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director may
designate certain written determinations as precedents.

(a) By rule adopted
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, the director shall adopt criteria which he or
she shall use to decide whether a determination is precedential. These
criteria shall include, but not be limited to, whether the determination clarifies
an unsettled interpretation of Title 82 RCW or where the determination modifies
or clarifies an earlier interpretation.

(b) Written
determinations designated as precedents by the director shall be ((indexed
by subject matter. The determinations and indexes shall be)) made
available for public inspection and shall be published by the department.

(c) The department
shall disclose any written determination upon which it relies to support any
assessment of tax, interest, or penalty against such taxpayer, after making the
deletions provided by subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Before making a
written determination available for public inspection under subsection (1) of
this section, the department shall delete:

(a) The names,
addresses, and other identifying details of the person to whom the written
determination pertains and of another person identified in the written
determination; and

(b) Information the
disclosure of which is specifically prohibited by any statute applicable to the
department of revenue, and the department may also delete other information
exempted from disclosure by chapter 42.17 RCW or any other statute applicable
to the department of revenue.

Sec. 11. RCW 82.32.430 and 2000 c
104 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A person who collects
and remits sales or use tax to the department and who calculates the tax using geographic
information system technology developed and provided by the department
shall be held harmless and is not liable for the difference in amount due nor
subject to penalties or interest in regards to rate calculation errors
resulting from the proper use of such technology.

Sec. 12. RCW 82.62.010 and 1999
sp.s. c 9 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of revenue.

(3) "Eligible
area" means an area as defined in RCW 82.60.020.

(4)(a) "Eligible
business project" means manufacturing or research and development
activities which are conducted by an applicant in an eligible area at a
specific facility, provided the applicant's average full-time qualified
employment positions at the specific facility will be at least fifteen percent
greater in the year for which the credit is being sought than the applicant's
average full-time qualified employment positions at the same facility in the
immediately preceding year.

(b) "Eligible
business project" does not include any portion of a business project
undertaken by a light and power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(5) or that
portion of a business project creating qualified full-time employment positions
outside an eligible area ((or those recipients of a sales tax deferral under
chapter 82.61 RCW)).

(5)
"Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the activities
performed by research and development laboratories and commercial testing
laboratories.

(6) "Person"
has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.

(7) "Qualified
employment position" means a permanent full-time employee employed in the
eligible business project during the entire tax year.

(8) "Tax
year" means the calendar year in which taxes are due.

(9)
"Recipient" means a person receiving tax credits under this chapter.

(10) "Research and
development" means the development, refinement, testing, marketing, and
commercialization of a product, service, or process before commercial sales
have begun. As used in this subsection, "commercial sales" excludes
sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total gross receipts
from such sales of the product, service, or process do not exceed one million
dollars.

Sec. 13. RCW 82.62.030 and 1999 c
164 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person shall be
allowed a credit against the tax due under chapter 82.04 RCW as provided in
this section. The credit shall equal: (a) Four thousand dollars for each
qualified employment position with wages and benefits greater than forty
thousand dollars annually that is directly created in an eligible business and
(b) two thousand dollars for each qualified employment position with wages and
benefits less than or equal to forty thousand dollars annually that is directly
created in an eligible business.

(2) The department
shall keep a running total of all credits ((granted)) allowed
under this chapter during each fiscal year. The department shall not allow any
credits which would cause the ((tabulation)) total to exceed
seven million five hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year. If all or part
of an application for credit is disallowed under this subsection, the
disallowed portion shall be carried over ((for approval)) to the
next fiscal year. However, the ((applicant's)) carryover into the next
fiscal year is only permitted ((if)) to the extent that the ((tabulation))
cap for the next fiscal year ((does)) is not ((exceed
the cap for that fiscal year as of the date on which the department has
disallowed the application)) exceeded.

(3) No recipient may
use the tax credits to decertify a union or to displace existing jobs in any
community in the state.

(4) ((No recipient
may receive a tax credit on taxes which have not been paid during the taxable
year)) The credit may be used against any tax due under chapter 82.04
RCW, and may be carried over until used. No refunds may be granted for credits
under this section.

Sec. 14. RCW 82.62.050 and 1986 c
116 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each recipient
shall submit a report to the department on ((December)) January
31st ((of each year)) following the year the application for credit
was allowed. The report shall contain information, as required by the
department, from which the department may determine whether the recipient is
meeting the requirements of this chapter. If the recipient fails to submit a
report or submits an inadequate report, the department may declare the amount
of taxes for which a credit has been used to be immediately assessed and
payable. The recipient must keep records, such as payroll records showing
the date of hire and employment security reports, to verify eligibility under
this section.

(2) If, on the basis of
a report under this section or other information, the department finds that a
business project is not eligible for tax credit under this chapter for reasons
other than failure to create the required number of qualified employment
positions, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been used for the project
shall be immediately due.

(3) If, on the basis of
a report under this section or other information, the department finds that a
business project has failed to create the specified number of qualified
employment positions, the department shall assess interest, but not penalties,
on the credited taxes for which a credit has been used for the project. The
interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes,
shall be assessed retroactively to the date of the tax credit, and shall accrue
until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.

Sec. 15. RCW 83.100.020 and 1999
c 358 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1)
"Decedent" means a deceased individual;

(2) "Department"
means the department of revenue, the director of that department, or any
employee of the department exercising authority lawfully delegated to him by
the director;

(3) "Federal
credit" means (a) for a transfer, the maximum amount of the credit for
state taxes allowed by section 2011 of the Internal Revenue Code; and (b) for a
generation-skipping transfer, the maximum amount of the credit for state taxes
allowed by section 2604 of the Internal Revenue Code;

(4) "Federal
return" means any tax return required by chapter 11 or 13 of the Internal
Revenue Code;

(5) "Federal
tax" means (a) for a transfer, a tax under chapter 11 of the Internal
Revenue Code; and (b) for a generation-skipping transfer, the tax under chapter
13 of the Internal Revenue Code;

(6)
"Generation-skipping transfer" means a "generation-skipping
transfer" as defined and used in section 2611 of the Internal Revenue
Code;

(7) "Gross
estate" means "gross estate" as defined and used in section 2031
of the Internal Revenue Code;

(8)
"Nonresident" means a decedent who was domiciled outside Washington
at his death;

(9) "Person"
means any individual, estate, trust, receiver, cooperative association, club, corporation,
company, firm, partnership, joint venture, syndicate, or other entity and, to
the extent permitted by law, any federal, state, or other governmental unit or
subdivision or agency, department, or instrumentality thereof;

(10) "Person
required to file the federal return" means any person required to file a
return required by chapter 11 or 13 of the Internal Revenue Code, such as the
personal representative of an estate; or a transferor, trustee, or beneficiary
of a generation-skipping transfer; or a qualified heir with respect to
qualified real property, as defined and used in section 2032A(c) of the
Internal Revenue Code;

(11)
"Property" means (a) for a transfer, property included in the gross
estate; and (b) for a generation-skipping transfer, all real and personal
property subject to the federal tax;

(12)
"Resident" means a decedent who was domiciled in Washington at time
of death;

(13)
"Transfer" means "transfer" as used in section 2001 of the
Internal Revenue Code, or a disposition or cessation of qualified use as
defined and used in section 2032A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;

(14) "Trust"
means "trust" under Washington law and any arrangement described in
section 2652 of the Internal Revenue Code; and

(15) "Internal
Revenue Code" means, for the purposes of this chapter and RCW 83.110.010,
the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended or renumbered ((on))
as of January 1, ((1999)) 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 84.33 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A purchaser of
privately owned timber in an amount in excess of two hundred thousand board
feet in a voluntary sale made in the ordinary course of business shall, on or
before the last day of the month following the purchase of the timber, report
the particulars of the purchase to the department.

(2) The report required
in subsection (1) of this section shall contain all information relevant to the
value of the timber purchased including, but not limited to, the following, as
applicable: Purchaser's name and address, sale date, termination date in sale
agreement, total sale price, total acreage involved in the sale, net volume of
timber purchased, legal description of the area involved in the sale, road
construction or improvements required or completed, timber cruise data, and
timber thinning data. A report may be submitted in any reasonable form or, at
the purchaser's option, by submitting relevant excerpts of the timber sales
contract. A purchaser may comply by submitting the information in the
following form:

Purchaser's name:................................................

Purchaser's address:.............................................

Sale date:.......................................................

Termination date:................................................

Total sale price:................................................

Total acreage involved:..........................................

Net volume of timber
purchased:..................................

Legal description of sale
area:..................................

Property improvements:...........................................

Timber cruise data:..............................................

Timber thinning data:............................................

(3) A purchaser of
privately owned timber involved in a purchase described in subsection (1) of
this section who fails to report a purchase as required may be liable for a
penalty of two hundred fifty dollars for each failure to report, as determined
by the department.

(4) This section
expires July 1, 2004.

Sec. 17. RCW 84.33.200 and 1998 c
245 s 170 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
shall review the system of distribution and allocation of all timber excise tax
revenues in January 1975 and each year thereafter to provide a uniform and
equitable distribution and allocation of such revenues to the state and local taxing
districts.

(2) In order to allow
legislative review of the rules to be adopted by the department of revenue
establishing the stumpage values provided for in RCW 84.33.091, such rules
shall be effective not less than ((sixty)) thirty days after
transmitting to the staffs of the senate and house ways and means committees
(or their successor committees) the same proposed rules as have been previously
filed with the office of the code reviser pursuant to RCW 34.05.320.

(3) The department of
revenue and the department of natural resources shall make available to the
revenue committees of the senate and house of representatives of the state
legislature information and data, as it may be available, pertaining to the
status of forest land grading throughout the state, the collection of timber
excise tax revenues, the distribution and allocation of timber excise tax
revenues to the state and local taxing districts, and any other information as
may be necessary for the proper legislative review and implementation of the
timber excise tax system, and in addition, the departments shall provide an
annual report of such matters in January of each year to such committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. The code reviser shall
place cross-reference sections to RCW 82.14.055 and 82.32.430 in chapters 67.28
and 67.40 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---