BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27.085 and 1989 c
256 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
created the building code council account in the state treasury. Moneys
deposited into the account shall be used by the building code council, after
appropriation, to perform the purposes of the council.

(2) All moneys
collected under subsection (3) of this section shall be deposited into the
building code council account. Every four years the state treasurer shall
report to the legislature on the balances in the account so that the
legislature may adjust the charges imposed under subsection (3) of this
section.

(3) There
is imposed a fee of ((four)) six dollars ((and fifty cents))
on each building permit issued by a county or a city, plus an additional
surcharge of two dollars for each residential unit, but not including the first
unit, on each building containing more than one residential unit. Quarterly
each county and city shall remit moneys collected under this section to the
state treasury; however, no remittance is required until a minimum of fifty
dollars has accumulated pursuant to this subsection.

--- END ---