BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each employee
benefit plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents that
provides coverage for hospital, medical, or ambulatory surgery center services
must cover hospital and general anesthesia services in conjunction with dental
procedures in a hospital or ambulatory surgical center if such hospitalization
is medically necessary because the covered person:

(a) Is under the age of
seven with a dental condition and the required procedure cannot be safely and
effectively performed in a dental office;

(b) Is physically or
developmentally disabled and cannot be safely and effectively treated in a
dental office; or

(c) Has at least one
medical condition that would create an undue medical risk if treatment is not
performed in a hospital or ambulatory surgery center as determined by the
patient's physician; such treatment must be approved by the patient's
physician.

(2) Each employee
benefit plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents that
provides coverage for dental services must cover general anesthesia services in
conjunction with covered dental procedures if such services are medically
necessary because the covered person is:

(a) Under the age of
seven and the required procedure can be safely and effectively performed in a
dental office; or

(b) Physically or
developmentally disabled and can be safely and effectively treated in a dental
office.

(3) This section does
not:

(a) Prevent the
application of standard cost-sharing requirements applicable to other covered
benefits;

(b) Limit the authority
in negotiating rates and contracts with specific providers;

(c) Apply to medicare
supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or
other limited benefits; or

(d) Prevent the
requirement that services be provided in a participating health care facility.

(4) Prior authorization
may be required in a manner similar for hospitalization of other covered
conditions.

(5) For the purpose of
this section, "general anesthesia" means a state of unconsciousness
accompanied by a loss of protective reflexes, including the ability to maintain
an airway independently and respond purposefully to physical stimulation or
verbal command.

(6) This section
applies to employee benefit plans issued or renewed on or after the effective
date of this section.

(7) An employee benefit
plan or health carrier that covers hospital or general anesthesia services
under this section is not responsible for, or liable with respect to, the
services of a dentist when those services are not covered by the carrier.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each health carrier
that provides group coverage for hospital, medical, or ambulatory surgery
center services must cover hospital and general anesthesia services in
conjunction with dental procedures in a hospital or ambulatory surgical center
if such hospitalization is medically necessary because the covered person:

(a) Is under the age of
seven with a dental condition and the required procedure cannot be safely and
effectively performed in a dental office;

(b) Is physically or
developmentally disabled and cannot be safely and effectively treated in a
dental office; or

(c) Has at least one
medical condition that would create an undue medical risk if treatment is not
performed in a hospital or ambulatory surgery center as determined by the
patient's physician; such treatment must be approved by the patient's
physician.

(2) Each health carrier
that provides group coverage for dental benefits must cover general anesthesia
services in conjunction with covered dental procedures if such services are
medically necessary because the covered person is:

(a) Under the age of
seven and the required procedure can be safely and effectively performed in the
dental office; or

(b) Physically or
developmentally disabled and can safely and effectively be treated in the
dental office.

(3) This section does
not:

(a) Prevent the
application of standard cost-sharing requirements applicable to other covered
benefits;

(b) Limit the health
carrier in negotiating rates and contracts with specific providers;

(c) Apply to medicare
supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or
other limited benefits; or

(d) Prevent the
requirement that services be provided in a participating health care facility.

(4) Prior authorization
may be required in a manner similar for hospitalization of other covered
conditions.

(5) For the purpose of
this section, "general anesthesia" means a state of unconsciousness
accompanied by a loss of protective reflexes, including the ability to maintain
an airway independently and respond purposefully to physical stimulation or
verbal command.

(6) This section
applies to health benefit plans and dental plans authorized under RCW 48.44.035
issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.

(7) Each
health carrier that covers hospital or general anesthesia services under this
section is not responsible for, or liable with respect to, the services of a
dentist when those services are not covered by the carrier.

---
END ---