BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that infants and children in Washington are injured, sometimes fatally, by
unsafe consumer products designed for use by infants and children.

(2) The legislature
finds that parents and other persons responsible for the care of infants and
children are often unaware that some of these consumer products have been
determined to be unsafe by the United States consumer products safety
commission.

(3) The legislature
intends to address this lack of awareness by establishing a statewide infant
and children product safety campaign across Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
authorizes the secretary to establish and maintain a product safety education
campaign to promote greater awareness of products designed to be used by
infants and children, excluding toys, that have been determined to be unsafe by
the United States consumer products safety commission.

(2) The department
shall assure that this infant and children product safety education campaign
reaches the target population. The target population for this campaign
includes, but is not limited to, parents, foster parents and other caregivers,
child care providers, consignment and resale stores selling infant and child
products, and charitable and governmental entities serving infants, children,
and families.

(3) The secretary may
utilize a combination of methods to achieve this outreach and education goal,
including but not limited to print and electronic media. The secretary may
operate the campaign or may contract with a vendor.

(4) The department
shall coordinate this infant and children product safety education campaign
with child-serving entities including, but not limited to, hospitals, birthing
centers, midwives, pediatricians, obstetricians, family practice physicians,
governmental and private entities serving infants, children, and families, and
relevant manufacturers.

(5) The department
shall coordinate with other agencies and entities to eliminate duplication of
effort in disseminating infant and children consumer product safety
information.

(6) The
department may receive funding for this infant and children product safety
education effort from federal, state, and local governmental entities,
child-serving foundations, or other private sources.

---
END ---