BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 31.12.005 and 1997 c
397 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, as used in this chapter:

(1) "Board"
means the board of directors of a credit union.

(2) "Board
officer" means an officer of the board elected under RCW 31.12.265(1).

(3) "Branch" of
a credit union, out-of-state credit union, or foreign credit union means
any facility that meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The facility is
a staffed physical facility ((where shares and deposits are taken. The
term does not include an automated teller machine or a machine permitting
members to communicate with credit union employees who are not located at the
site of the machine, unless employees of the credit union at the site of the
machine take shares and deposits on a regular basis. A facility is not deemed
to be a branch of a credit union, regardless of any affiliation, accommodation
arrangement, or other relationship between the organization owning or leasing
the facility and the credit union, unless the facility is));

(b) The facility is
owned or leased in whole or part((, directly or indirectly,)) by the
credit union or its credit union service organization; and

(c) Deposits and
withdrawals may be made, or shares purchased, through staff at the facility.

(4) (("Business
loan" means a loan for business, investment, commercial, or agricultural
purposes.

(5))) "Capital" means a credit union's
reserves, undivided earnings, and allowance((s)) for loan and lease
losses, and other items that may be included under section 16 of this act or
by rule of the director.

(((6) "Consumer
loan" means a loan for consumer, family, or household purposes.

(7))) (5) "Credit union" means a
credit union organized and operating under this chapter.

(((8))) (6)
"Credit union service organization" means an organization that a
credit union has invested in pursuant to RCW 31.12.436(8), or a credit union
service organization invested in by an out-of-state ((credit union or)),
federal, or foreign credit union.

(((9))) (7)
"Director" means the director of financial institutions.

(((10))) (8)
"Federal credit union" means a credit union organized and operating
under the laws of the United States.

(((11))) (9)
"Financial institution" means any commercial bank, trust company,
savings bank, or savings and loan association, whether state or federally
chartered, and any credit union, out-of-state credit union, or federal credit
union.

(((12))) (10)
"Foreign credit union" means a credit union organized and operating
under the laws of another country or other foreign jurisdiction.

(((13))) (11)
"Insolvency" means:

(a) If, under generally
accepted accounting principles, the recorded value of the credit union's assets
are less than its obligations to its share account holders, depositors,
creditors, and others; or

(b) If it is likely
that the credit union will be unable to pay its obligations or meet its share
account holders' and depositors' demands in the normal course of business.

(((14))) (12)
"Loan" means any loan, overdraft line of credit, extension of credit,
or lease, in whole or in part.

(((15))) (13)
"Material violation of law" means:

(a) If the credit union
or person has violated a material provision of:

(i) Law;

(ii) Any cease and
desist order issued by the director;

(iii) Any condition
imposed in writing by the director in connection with the approval of any
application or other request of the credit union; or

(iv) Any written
agreement entered into with the director;

(b) If the credit union
or person has concealed any of the credit union's books, papers, records, or
assets, or refused to submit the credit union's books, papers, records, or
affairs for inspection to any examiner of the state or, as appropriate, to any
examiner of the national credit union administration; or

(c) If the person has
breached his or her fiduciary duty to the credit union.

(((16))) (14)
"Membership share" means an initial share ((required to be
purchased)) that a credit union may require a person to purchase in
order to establish and maintain membership in a credit union.

(((17))) (15)
"Net ((capital)) worth" means a credit union's capital,
less the allowance for loan and lease losses.

(((18))) (16)
"Operating officer" means an ((officer)) employee of a
credit union designated ((under)) as an officer pursuant to RCW
31.12.265(2).

(((19))) (17)
"Organization" means a corporation, partnership, association, limited
liability company, trust, or other organization or entity.

(((20))) (18)
"Out-of-state credit union" means a credit union organized and
operating under the laws of another state or United States territory or
possession.

(((21))) (19)
"Person" means an organization or a natural person including, but not
limited to, a sole proprietorship.

(((22))) (20)
"Principally" or "primarily" means more than one-half.

(((23))) (21)
"Senior operating officer" includes:

(a) An operating
officer who is a vice-president or above; and

(b) Any employee who
has policy-making authority.

(22) "Small
credit union" means a credit union with up to ten million dollars in total
assets.

(23)
"Unsafe or unsound condition" means, but is not limited to:

(a) If the credit union
is insolvent;

(b) If the credit union
has incurred or is likely to incur losses that will deplete all or
substantially all of its ((capital)) net worth; or

(c) If the credit union
is in imminent danger of losing its share and deposit insurance or guarantee.

(24) "Unsafe or
unsound practice" means any action, or lack of action, which is contrary
to generally accepted standards of prudent operation, the likely consequences
of which, if continued, would be abnormal risk of loss or danger to a credit
union, its members, or an organization insuring or guaranteeing its shares and
deposits.

Sec. 2. RCW 31.12.065 and 1997 c
397 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Persons applying
for the organization of a credit union shall adopt bylaws that prescribe the
manner in which the business of the credit union shall be conducted. The
bylaws shall include:

(a) The name of the
credit union;

(b) The field of
membership of the credit union;

(c) Reasonable
qualifications for membership in the credit union, including, but not limited
to, the minimum number of shares, and the payment of a membership fee, if any,
required for membership, and the procedures for expelling a member;

(d) The number of
directors and supervisory committee members, and the length of terms they serve
and the permissible term length of any interim director or supervisory
committee member;

(e) Any qualification
for eligibility to serve on the credit union's board((,)) or supervisory
committee;

(f) The number of
credit union employees that may serve on the board, if any;

(g) The frequency of
regular meetings of the board and the supervisory committee, and the manner in
which members of the board or supervisory committee ((are to)) will
be notified of meetings;

(h) ((The powers and
duties of board officers;

(i))) The timing of the annual membership meeting;

(((j))) (i)
The manner in which members may call a special membership meeting;

(((k))) (j)
The manner in which members ((are to)) will be notified of
membership meetings;

(((l))) (k)
The number of members constituting a quorum at a membership meeting;

(((m))) (l)
Provisions, if any, for the indemnification of directors, supervisory committee
members, officers, employees, and others by the credit union, if not included
in the articles of incorporation; and

(((n))) (m)
Any other provision which is not inconsistent with this chapter.

(2) Applicants shall
submit the bylaws in duplicate to the director.

Sec. 3. RCW 31.12.085 and 1997 c
397 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon approval under
RCW 31.12.075(2), the director shall deliver a copy of the articles of
incorporation to the secretary of state for filing. Upon receipt of the
approved articles of incorporation and a twenty dollar filing fee provided by
the applicants, the secretary of state shall file the articles of
incorporation.

(2) Upon filing of
the approved articles of incorporation by the secretary of state, the persons
named in the articles of incorporation and their successors may conduct
business as a credit union, having the powers, duties, and obligations set
forth in this chapter. A credit union may not conduct business until the
articles have been filed by the secretary of state.

(3) A credit union
shall organize and begin conducting business within six months of the date that
its articles of incorporation are filed by the secretary of state or its
charter is void. However, the director may grant ((an)) extensions
of the six-month period. ((The director may not grant a single extension
exceeding three months, but may grant as many extensions to a credit union as
circumstances require.))

Sec. 4. RCW 31.12.105 and 1997 c
397 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

A credit union's
articles of incorporation may be amended by the board with the approval of the
director. Complete applications for amendments to the articles must be
approved or denied by the director within sixty days of receipt. Amendments
to a credit union's articles of incorporation must conform with RCW 31.12.055.

Upon approval, the
director shall promptly deliver the articles' amendments, including any
necessary filing fees paid by the applicant, to the secretary of state for
filing. ((Amendments to a credit union's articles of incorporation must
conform with RCW 31.12.055.)) The articles' amendments are effective
upon filing of the amendments by the secretary of state.

Sec. 5. RCW 31.12.115 and 1997 c
397 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A credit union's
field of membership bylaws may be amended by the board with approval of the
director. ((All)) Complete applications to amend a credit
union's field of membership bylaws must be approved or denied by the director
within sixty days of receipt.

(2) ((Bylaw
amendments, other than those requiring the approval of the director under
subsection (1) of this section, may be approved at any regular board meeting,
or any special board meeting called for the purpose of amending the credit
union's bylaws)) A credit union's other bylaws may be amended by the
board.

(3) Any amendments
to a credit union's bylaws must conform with RCW 31.12.065.

Sec. 6. RCW 31.12.225 and 1997 c
397 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The business and
affairs of a credit union shall be managed by a board of not less than five and
not greater than fifteen directors.

(2) The directors must
be elected at the credit union's annual membership meeting. They shall hold
their offices until their successors are qualified and elected or appointed.

(3) Directors shall be
elected to terms of between one and three years, as provided in the bylaws. If
the terms are longer than one year, the directors must be divided into classes,
and an equal number of directors, as ((near)) nearly as possible,
must be elected each year.

(4) Any ((vacancies))
vacancy on the board must be filled by an interim director((s))
appointed by the board, unless the interim director would serve a term of fewer
than ninety days. Interim directors appointed to fill vacancies created by
expansion of the board will serve until the next annual meeting of members.
Other interim directors will serve out the unexpired term of the former
director, unless provided otherwise in the credit union's bylaws.

(5) The board will ((meet
as often as necessary, but)) have regular meetings not less
frequently than once each month.

Sec. 7. RCW 31.12.235 and 1997 c
397 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A director must be
a natural person and a member of the credit union. If a director ceases to be
a member of the credit union, the director shall no longer serve as a director.

(2) ((Unless
reasonably excused by the board, a director shall no longer serve as a director
if the)) (a) If a director is absent from ((more than
thirty-three percent)) four of the regular board meetings in any
twelve-month period in a term without being reasonably excused by the board,
the director shall no longer serve as a director for the period remaining in
the term.

(b) The board
secretary shall promptly notify the director that he or she shall no longer
serve as a director. Failure to provide notice does not affect the termination
of the director's service under (a) of this subsection.

(3) A director must
meet any qualification requirements set forth in the credit union's bylaws. If
a director fails to meet these requirements, the director shall no longer serve
as a director.

(4) The operating
officers and employees of the credit union may serve as directors of the credit
union, but only as permitted by the credit union's bylaws. In no event may
the operating officers and employees of the credit union constitute a majority
of the board.

Sec. 8. RCW 31.12.255 and 1997 c
397 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The business and
affairs of a credit union shall be managed by the board of the credit union.
The duties of the board include, but are not limited to, the duties enumerated
in this section. The duties listed in subsection (1) of this section may not
be delegated by the credit union's board of directors. The duties listed in
subsection (2) of this section may be delegated to a committee, officer, or
employee, with appropriate reporting to the board.

(1) The board shall:

(a) Set the par value
of shares, if any, of the credit union;

(b) Set the minimum
number of shares, if any, required for membership;

(c) Establish the loan
policies under which loans may be approved((, including policies on any
automated loan approval programs));

(d) Establish the
conditions under which a member may be expelled for cause;

(e) Fill vacancies on
all committees except the supervisory committee;

(f) Approve an annual
operating budget ((or financial plan)) for the credit union;

(g) Designate those
persons or positions authorized to execute or certify documents or records on
behalf of the credit union;

(h) Review the
supervisory committee's annual report; and

(i) Perform such other
duties as the members may direct.

(2) In addition, unless
delegated, the board shall:

(a) Act upon
applications for membership in the credit union;

(b) Determine the
maximum amount of shares and deposits that a member may hold in the credit
union;

(c) Declare dividends
on shares and set the rate of interest on deposits;

(d) Set the fees, if
any, to be charged by the credit union to its members for the right to be a
member of the credit union and for services rendered by the credit union;

(e) Determine the
amount which may be loaned to a member together with the terms and conditions
of loans;

(f) Establish policies
under which the credit union may borrow and invest; and

(g) Approve the
charge-off of credit union losses.

Sec. 9. RCW 31.12.267 and 1997 c
397 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

Directors ((and)),
board officers, and senior operating officers are deemed to stand in a
fiduciary relationship to the credit union, and must discharge the duties of
their respective positions:

(1) In good faith;

(2) With the care an
ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar
circumstances; and

(3) In a manner the
director or ((board)) officer reasonably believes to be in the best
interests of the credit union.

Sec. 10. RCW 31.12.326 and 1997 c
397 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A supervisory committee
of at least three members must be elected at the annual membership meeting of
the credit union. Members of the supervisory committee shall serve a term of
three years, unless sooner removed under this chapter or until their successors
are qualified and elected or appointed. The members of the supervisory
committee shall be divided into classes so that as equal a number as is
possible is elected each year.

(2)(a) If a
supervisory committee member is absent from more than one-third of the committee
meetings in any twelve-month period in a term without being reasonably excused
by the committee, the member shall no longer serve as a member of the committee
for the period remaining in the term.

(b) The supervisory
committee shall promptly notify the member that he or she shall no longer serve
as a committee member. Failure to provide notice does not affect the
termination of the member's service under (a) of this subsection.

(3) A supervisory
committee member must be a natural person and a member of the credit union.
If a member of the supervisory committee ceases to be a member of the credit
union, the ((member's office becomes vacant)) member shall no longer
serve as a committee member. The chairperson of the supervisory committee may
not serve as a board officer.

(4) Any vacancy
on the committee must be filled by an interim member appointed by the
committee, unless the interim member would serve a term of fewer than ninety
days. Interim members appointed to fill vacancies created by expansion of
the committee will serve until the next annual meeting of members. Other interim
members may serve out the unexpired term of the former member, unless provided
otherwise by the credit union's bylaws. However, if all positions on the
committee are vacant at the same time, the board may appoint interim members to
serve until the next annual membership meeting.

(((3))) (5)
No operating officer or employee of a credit union may serve on the credit
union's supervisory committee. No more than one director may be a member of
the supervisory committee at the same time, unless provided otherwise by the
credit union's bylaws. No member of the supervisory committee may serve on the
credit committee or investment committee of the credit union while serving on
the supervisory committee.

Sec. 11. RCW 31.12.335 and 1997 c
397 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
supervisory committee of a credit union shall:

(((1))) (a)
Meet ((as often as necessary and)) at least quarterly;

(((2))) (b)
Keep fully informed as to the financial condition of the credit union and the
decisions of the credit union's board;

(((3) Annually))
(c) Perform or arrange for a complete annual audit of ((internal
controls, loans, investments, cash, general ledger accounts, including, but not
limited to, income and expense, and)) the credit union and a
verification of its members' ((share and deposit)) accounts; and

(((4))) (d)
Report its findings and recommendations to the board and make an annual report
to members at each annual membership meeting.

(2) At least one
supervisory committee member may attend each regular board meeting.

Sec. 12. RCW 31.12.365 and 1997 c
397 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Directors and
members of committees shall not receive compensation for their service as
directors and committee members. However, this subsection does not prohibit
directors or committee members from receiving:

(a) Gifts of minimal
value; and

(b) Insurance
coverage or incidental services, available to employees generally((,
and gifts of minimal value)).

(2) Directors and
members of committees may receive reimbursement for reasonable expenses incurred
on behalf of themselves and their spouses in the performance of the directors'
and committee members' duties.

(3) Loans to directors
and supervisory and credit committee members may not be made under more
favorable terms and conditions than those made to members generally.

Sec. 13. RCW 31.12.367 and 1997 c
397 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each credit
union must be adequately insured against risk. In addition, each director,
officer, committee member, and employee of a credit union must be adequately
bonded ((in an amount and in accordance with conditions established by the
director)).

(2) When ((the))
a credit union receives notice that its fidelity bond coverage ((under
subsection (1) of this section is)) will be suspended or terminated,
the ((board of the affected)) credit union shall notify the director in
writing ((within five days of receipt)) not less than thirty-five
days prior to the effective date of the notice of suspension or
termination.

Sec. 14. RCW 31.12.402 and 1997 c
397 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

A credit union may:

(1) Issue shares to and
receive deposits from its members in accordance with RCW 31.12.416;

(2) Make loans to its
members in accordance with RCW 31.12.426 and 31.12.428;

(3) Pay dividends ((or))
and interest to its members in accordance with RCW 31.12.418;

(4) Impose reasonable
charges for the services it provides to its members;

(5) Impose financing
charges and reasonable late charges in the event of default on loans, subject
to applicable law, and recover reasonable costs and expenses, including, but
not limited to, collection costs, and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred both
before and after judgment, incurred in the collection of sums due, if provided
for in the note or agreement signed by the borrower;

(6) Acquire, lease,
hold, assign, pledge, sell, or otherwise dispose of interests in personal
property and in real property in accordance with RCW 31.12.438;

(7) Deposit and invest
funds in accordance with RCW 31.12.436;

(8) Borrow money, up to
a maximum of fifty percent of its total shares, deposits, and net ((capital))
worth;

(9) Discount or sell
any of its assets, or purchase any or all of the assets of another credit
union, out-of-state credit union, or federal credit union. However, a credit
union may not discount or sell all, or substantially all, of its assets without
the approval of the director;

(10) Accept deposits of
deferred compensation of its members;

(11) Act as fiscal
agent for and receive payments on shares and deposits from the federal
government or this state, and any agency or political subdivision thereof;

(12) Engage in
activities and programs as requested by the federal government, this state, and
any agency or political subdivision thereof, when the activities or programs
are not inconsistent with this chapter;

(13) Hold membership in
credit unions, out-of-state credit unions, or federal credit unions and in organizations
controlled by or fostering the interests of credit unions, including, but not
limited to, a central liquidity facility organized under state or federal law;

(14) Pay additional
dividends ((or)) and interest to members, or an interest rate
refund to borrowers;

(15) Enter into lease
agreements, lease contracts, and lease‑purchase agreements with members;

(16) ((Procure for,
or sell to its members)) Act as insurance agent or broker for the sale
to members of:

(a) Group life,
accident, health, and credit life and disability insurance; and

(b) Other insurance
that other types of Washington state-chartered financial institutions are
permitted to sell, on the same terms and conditions that these institutions are
permitted to sell such insurance;

(17) Impose a
reasonable service charge for the administration and processing of accounts
that remain dormant for a period of time specified by the ((board)) credit
union;

(18) Establish and
operate on-premises or off-premises electronic facilities;

(19) Enter into formal
or informal agreements with another credit union for the purpose of fostering
the development of the other credit union;

(20) Work with
community leaders to develop and prioritize efforts to improve the areas where
their members reside by making investments in the community through
contributions to organizations that primarily serve either a charitable,
social, welfare, or educational purpose, or are exempt from taxation pursuant
to section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code;

(21) Limit the personal
liability of its directors in accordance with provisions of its articles of
incorporation that conform with RCW 23B.08.320;

(22) Indemnify its
directors, supervisory committee members, officers, employees, and others in
accordance with provisions of its articles of incorporation or bylaws that
conform with RCW 23B.08.500 through 23B.08.600; and

(23) Exercise such
incidental powers as are necessary or convenient to enable it to conduct the
business of a credit union.

Sec. 15. RCW 31.12.404 and 1997 c
397 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, and in addition to all powers and authorities,
express or implied, that a credit union has under the laws of this state, a
credit union ((may exercise any of)) has the powers and
authorities ((conferred as of)) that a federal credit union had on
December 31, 1993, ((upon federal credit unions)) or a subsequent
date not later than the effective date of this section.

(2) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, and in addition to the powers and authorities ((conferred)),
express or implied, that a credit union has under subsection (1) of this
section, ((the director may, by rule, authorize)) a credit union((s
to exercise any of)) has the powers and authorities ((conferred
at the time of the adoption of the rule upon federal credit unions)) that
a federal credit union has, and an out-of-state credit union operating a branch
in Washington has, subsequent to the effective date of this section, if the
director finds that the exercise of the power and authority serves the
convenience and advantage of members of credit unions, and maintains the
fairness of competition and parity between credit unions and federal or
out-of-state credit unions. However, a credit union:

(a) Must still
comply with RCW 31.12.408; and

(b) Is not granted
the field of membership powers or authorities of any out-of-state credit union
operating a branch in Washington.

(3) The restrictions,
limitations, and requirements applicable to specific powers or authorities of
federal or out-of-state credit unions apply to credit unions exercising
those powers or authorities permitted under this section but only insofar as
the restrictions, limitations, and requirements relate to the specific exercise
of the powers or authorities granted credit unions solely under this section.

(4) As used in this
section, "powers and authorities" include ((without limitation)),
but are not limited to, powers and authorities in corporate governance
matters.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 31.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A credit union may
apply in writing to the director for designation as a low-income credit union.
The criteria for approval of this designation are as follows:

(a) At least fifty
percent of a substantial and well-defined segment of the credit union's members
or potential primary members earn no more than eighty percent of the state or
national median income, whichever is higher;

(b) The credit union
must submit an acceptable written plan on marketing to and serving the
well-defined segment;

(c) The credit union
must agree to submit annual reports to the director on its service to the
well-defined segment; and

(d) The credit union
must submit other information and satisfy other criteria as may be required by
the director.

(2)(a) Among other
powers and authorities, a low-income credit union may:

(i) Issue secondary
capital accounts approved in advance by the director upon application of the
credit union; and

(ii) Accept shares and
deposits from nonmembers.

(b) A secondary capital
account is:

(i) Over one hundred
thousand dollars, or a higher amount as established by the director;

(ii) Nontransactional;

(iii) Owned by a
nonnatural person; and

(iv) Subordinate to
other creditors.

(3) The director may
adopt rules for the organization and operation of low-income credit unions
including, but not limited to, rules concerning secondary capital accounts and
requiring disclosures to the purchasers of the accounts.

Sec. 17. RCW 31.12.426 and 1997 c
397 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A credit union may
make secured and unsecured loans to its members under policies established by
the board, subject to the loans to one borrower limits provided for in RCW
31.12.428. Each loan must be evidenced by records adequate to support enforcement
or collection of the loan and any review of the loan by the director.
((Business)) Loans must be in compliance with rules adopted by
the director.

(2) A credit union may
obligate itself to purchase loans in accordance with RCW 31.12.436(1), if the
credit union's underwriting policies would have permitted it to originate the
loans.

(((3) Consumer loans
must be given preference, and in the event there are not sufficient funds
available to satisfy all approved consumer loan applications, further preference
must be given to small loans.))

Sec. 18. RCW 31.12.428 and 1997 c
397 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No loan may be made
to any borrower if the loan would cause the borrower to be indebted to the
credit union ((upon consumer and business loans)) on all types of
loans in an aggregated amount exceeding ten thousand dollars or twenty-five
percent of the capital of the credit union, whichever is greater, without the
approval of the director.

(2) The director by rule
may establish separate limits on business loans to one borrower.

Sec. 19. RCW 31.12.436 and 1997 c
397 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

A credit union may
invest its funds ((in excess of loans)) in any of the following, as long
as they are deemed prudent by the board:

(1) Loans held by
credit unions, out-of-state credit unions, or federal credit unions; loans to
members held by other lenders; and loans to nonmembers held by other lenders,
with the approval of the director;

(2) Bonds, securities,
or other investments that are fully guaranteed as to principal and interest by
the United States government, and general obligations of this state and its
political subdivisions;

(3) Obligations issued
by corporations designated under 31 U.S.C. Sec. 9101, or obligations,
participations or other instruments issued and guaranteed by the federal
national mortgage association, federal home loan mortgage corporation,
government national mortgage association, or other government-sponsored
enterprise;

(4) Participations or
obligations which have been subjected by one or more government agencies to a
trust or trusts for which an executive department, agency, or instrumentality
of the United States has been named to act as trustee;

(5) Share or deposit
accounts of other financial institutions, the accounts of which are federally
insured or insured or guaranteed by another insurer or guarantor approved by
the director. The shares and deposits made by a credit union under this subsection
may exceed the insurance or guarantee limits established by the organization
insuring or guaranteeing the institution into which the shares or deposits are
made;

(6) Common trust or
mutual funds whose investment portfolios consist of securities issued or
guaranteed by the federal government or an agency of the government;

(7) Up to five percent
of the capital of the credit union, in debt or equity issued by an organization
owned by the Washington credit union league;

(8) Shares, stocks,
loans, or other obligations of ((an)) organizations whose primary
purpose is to strengthen, advance, or provide services to the credit union
industry ((and)) or credit union members. ((Other than
investment in an organization that is wholly owned by the credit union and
whose activities are limited exclusively to those authorized by RCW 31.12.402,
an investment under this subsection shall be limited to one percent of the
assets of the credit union, but a credit union may, in addition to the
investment, lend to the organization an amount not exceeding an additional one
percent of the assets of the credit union)) A credit union may in the
aggregate invest an amount not to exceed one percent of its assets in
organizations under this subsection. In addition, a credit union may in the
aggregate lend an amount not to exceed one percent of its assets to
organizations under this subsection. These limits do not apply to investments
in, and loans to, an organization:

(a) That is wholly
owned by one or more credit unions or federal or out-of-state credit unions;
and

(b) Whose activities
are limited exclusively to those authorized by this chapter for a credit union;

(9) Loans to credit
unions, out-of-state credit unions, or federal credit unions. The aggregate of
loans issued under this subsection is limited to twenty-five percent of the
total shares and deposits of the lending credit union;

(10) Key person
insurance policies, the proceeds of which inure exclusively to the benefit of
the credit union; or

(11) Other investments
approved by the director upon written application.

Sec. 20. RCW 31.12.438 and 1997 c
397 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A credit union may
invest in real property or leasehold interests primarily for its own use in
conducting business, including, but not limited to, structures and fixtures
attached to real property, subject to the following limitations:

(a) The credit union's
net ((capital)) worth equals at least five percent of the total
of its share and deposit accounts;

(b) The board approves
the investment; and

(c) The aggregate of
all such investments does not exceed seven and one-half percent of the total of
its share and deposit accounts.

(2) If the real
property or leasehold interest is acquired for future expansion, the credit
union must satisfy the use requirement in subsection (1) of this section within
three years after the credit union makes the investment.

(3) The director may,
upon written application, waive any of the limitations listed in subsection (1)
or (2) of this section.

Sec. 21. RCW 31.12.461 and 1997 c
397 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of
this section, the merging credit union is the credit union whose charter ceases
to exist upon merger with the continuing credit union. The continuing credit
union is the credit union whose charter continues upon merger with the merging
credit union.

(2) A credit union may
be merged with another credit union with the approval of the director and in
accordance with requirements the director may prescribe. The merger must be
approved by a two-thirds majority vote of the board of each credit union and a
two‑thirds majority vote of those members of the merging credit union
voting on the merger at a membership meeting. The requirement of approval by
the members of the merging credit union may be waived by the director if the
merging credit union is in imminent danger of insolvency.

(3) The property,
rights, and interests of the merging credit union transfer to and vest in the
continuing credit union without deed, endorsement, or instrument of transfer,
although instruments of transfer may be used if their use is deemed
appropriate. The debts and obligations of the merging credit union that are
known or reasonably should be known are assumed by the continuing credit
union. The continuing credit union shall cause to be published notice of
merger once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county in which the principal place of business of the
merging credit union is located. The notice of merger must also inform
creditors of the merging credit union how to make a claim on the continuing
credit union, and that if a claim is not made upon the continuing credit union
within thirty days of the last date of publication, creditors' claims that are
not known by the continuing credit union may be barred. ((Unless a)) Except
for claims ((is)) filed as requested by the notice, or ((unless
the)) debts or obligations ((is)) that are
known or reasonably should be known by the continuing credit union, the debts
and obligations of the merging credit union are discharged. Upon merger, the
charter of the merging credit union ceases to exist.

(4) Mergers are
effective after the thirty-day notice period to creditors and all regulatory
waiting periods have expired, and upon filing of the credit union's articles of
merger by the secretary of state, or a later date stated in the articles, which
in no event may be later than ninety days after the articles are filed.

Sec. 22. RCW 31.12.464 and 1997 c
397 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A credit union may merge
or convert into a federal credit union as authorized by the federal credit
union act. The merger or conversion must be approved by a two-thirds
majority vote of those credit union members voting at a membership
meeting.

(2) If the merger or
conversion is approved by the members, a copy of the resolution certified by
the ((board)) secretary must be filed with the director within
ten days of approval. The board may effect the merger or conversion
upon terms agreed by the board and the federal regulator.

(3) A certified copy of
the federal credit union charter or authorization issued by the federal
regulator must be filed with the director and thereupon the credit union ceases
to exist except for the purpose of winding up its affairs and prosecuting or
defending any litigation by or against the credit union. For all other
purposes, the credit union is merged or converted into a federal credit
union and the credit union may execute, acknowledge, and deliver to the
successor federal credit union the instruments of transfer, conveyance, and
assignment that are necessary or desirable to complete the merger or
conversion, and the property, tangible or intangible, and all rights, titles,
and interests that are agreed to by the board and the federal regulator.

(4) Mergers and
conversions are effective after all applicable regulatory waiting periods have
expired and upon filing of the credit union's articles of merger or articles of
conversion, as appropriate, by the secretary of state, or a later date stated
in the articles, which in no event may be later than ninety days after the
articles are filed.

(5) Procedures,
similar to those contained in subsections (1) through (((3))) (4)
of this section, prescribed by the director must be followed when a credit
union merges or converts into an out-of-state or foreign credit union, or
other type of financial institution.

Sec. 23. RCW 31.12.467 and 1997 c
397 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A federal credit
union located and conducting business in this state may merge or convert
into a credit union organized and operating under this chapter.

(2) In the case of a
conversion, the board of the federal credit union shall file with the
director proposed articles of incorporation and bylaws, as provided by this
chapter for organizing a new credit union. If the conversion is
approved by the director, the federal credit union becomes a credit union under
the laws of this state((, and)).

(3) The assets
and liabilities of the federal credit union will vest in and become the
property of the successor credit union subject to all existing liabilities
against the federal credit union. Members of the federal credit union may
become members of the successor credit union.

(((3))) (4)
Mergers and conversions are effective after all applicable regulatory waiting
periods have expired and upon filing of the federal credit union's articles of
merger or articles of conversion, as appropriate, by the secretary of state, or
a later date stated in the articles, which in no event may be later than ninety
days after the articles are filed.

(5) Procedures,
similar to those contained in subsections (1) ((and (2))) through (4)
of this section, prescribed by the director must be followed when an
out-of-state or foreign credit union wishes to merge or convert into a credit
union organized and operating under this chapter.

Sec. 24. RCW 31.12.471 and 1997 c
397 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An out-of-state or
foreign credit union may not operate a branch in Washington unless:

(a) The director has
approved its application ((to do business)) in ((this state)) accordance
with this section;

(b) A credit union organized
and operating under this chapter is permitted to do business in the state
or foreign jurisdiction in which the ((applicant)) credit
union is organized;

(c) The interest rate
charged by the ((applicant)) credit union on loans made to
members residing in this state does not exceed the maximum interest rate
permitted in the state or jurisdiction in which the ((applicant)) credit
union is organized, or exceed the maximum interest rate that a credit union
organized and operating under this chapter is permitted to charge on similar
loans, whichever is lower;

(d) The ((applicant))
credit union has secured surety bond and fidelity bond coverages
satisfactory to the director;

(e) The ((applicant's))
credit union's share and deposit accounts are insured under the federal share
insurance program or an equivalent share insurance program in compliance with
RCW 31.12.408;

(f) The ((applicant))
credit union submits to the director an annual examination report of its
most recently completed fiscal year;

(g) The ((applicant))
credit union has not had its authority to ((operate)) do
business in another state or foreign jurisdiction suspended or
revoked;

(h) The credit union
complies with:

(i) The provisions
concerning field of membership in this chapter and rules adopted by the
director; and

(ii) Such other
provisions of this chapter and rules adopted by the director, as determined by
the director; and

(i) In addition, if
the ((applicant)) credit union is a foreign credit union:

(i) A treaty or
agreement between the United States and the jurisdiction where the ((applicant))
credit union is organized requires the director to permit the ((applicant))
credit union to operate a branch in Washington; and

(ii) The director
determines that the ((applicant)) credit union has substantially
the same characteristics as a credit union organized and operating under this
chapter((; and

(i) The applicant
complies with all other provisions of this chapter and rules adopted by the
director, except as otherwise permitted by this section)).

(2) The director shall
deny an application filed under this section or, upon notice and an opportunity
for hearing, suspend or revoke the approval of an application, if the director
finds that the standards of organization, operation, and regulation of the
applicant do not reasonably conform with the standards under this chapter. In
considering the standards of organization, operation, and regulation of the
applicant, the director may consider the laws of the state or foreign
jurisdiction in which the applicant is organized. A decision under this
subsection may be appealed under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) In implementing
this section, the director may cooperate with credit union regulators in other
states or jurisdictions and may share with the regulators the information
received in the administration of this chapter.

(4) The director may
enter into supervisory agreements with out‑of‑state and foreign
credit unions and their regulators to prescribe the applicable laws governing
the powers and authorities of Washington branches of the out-of-state or
foreign credit unions. The director may also enter into supervisory agreements
with the credit union regulators in other states or foreign
jurisdictions to prescribe the applicable laws governing the powers and
authorities of out-of-state or foreign branches and other facilities of credit
unions.

The agreements may
address, but are not limited to, corporate governance and operational matters.
The agreements may resolve any conflict of laws, and specify the manner in
which the examination, supervision, and application processes must be
coordinated with the regulators.

The director may adopt
rules for the periodic examination and investigation of the affairs of an
out-of-state or foreign credit union operating a branch in this state.
((The costs of examination and supervision must be fully borne by the
out-of-state or foreign credit union.))

Sec. 25. RCW 31.12.474 and 1997 c
397 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At a special ((board))
meeting called for the purpose of liquidation, and upon the recommendation of
at least two-thirds of the total members of the board of a credit union, the
members of a credit union may elect to liquidate the credit union by a
two-thirds majority vote of those members voting.

(2) Upon a vote to
liquidate under subsection (1) of this section, a three-person liquidating
committee must be elected to liquidate the assets of the credit union. The
committee shall act in accordance with any requirements of the director and may
be reasonably compensated by the board of the credit union. Each share account
holder and depositor at the credit union is entitled to his, her, or its
proportionate part of the assets in liquidation after all shares, deposits, and
debts have been paid. The proportionate allocation shall be based on account
balances as of a date determined by the board. For the purposes of
liquidation, shares and deposits are equivalent. The assets of the liquidating
credit union are not subject to contingent liabilities. Upon distribution of
the assets, the credit union ceases to exist except for the purpose of
discharging existing liabilities and obligations.

(3) Funds representing
unclaimed dividends in liquidation and remaining in the hands of the
liquidating committee for six months after the date of the final dividend must
be deposited, together with all the books and papers of the credit union, with
the director. The director may, one year after receipt, destroy such records,
books, and papers as, in the director's judgment, are obsolete or unnecessary
for future reference. The funds may be deposited in one or more financial
institutions to the credit of the director, in trust for the members of the
credit union entitled to the funds. The director may pay a portion of the
funds to a person upon receipt of satisfactory evidence that the person is
entitled to the funds. In case of doubt or conflicting claims, the director
may require an order of the superior court of the county in which the principal
place of business of the credit union was located, authorizing and directing
the payment of the funds. The director may apply the interest earned by the
funds toward defraying the expenses incurred in the holding and paying of the
funds. Five years after the receipt of the funds, the funds still remaining
with the director must be remitted to the state as unclaimed property.

Sec. 26. RCW 31.12.516 and 1997 c
397 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The powers of
supervision and examination of credit unions and other persons subject to this
chapter and chapter((s 31.12A and)) 31.13 RCW are vested in the
director. The director shall require each credit union to conduct business in
compliance with this chapter and may require each credit union to conduct
business in compliance with other state and federal laws that apply
to credit unions((, and)). The director has the power to
commence and prosecute actions and proceedings, to enjoin violations, and to
collect sums due the state of Washington from a credit union.

(2) The director may
adopt such rules as are reasonable or necessary to carry out the purposes of
this chapter and chapter((s 31.12A and)) 31.13 RCW. Chapter 34.05 RCW
will, whenever applicable, govern the rights, remedies, and procedures
respecting the administration of this chapter.

(3) The director may
by rule provide appropriate relief for small credit unions from requirements
under this chapter or rules of the director. However, small credit unions must
still comply with RCW 31.12.408.

(4) The director
shall have the power and broad administrative discretion to administer and
interpret the provisions of this chapter and chapter((s 31.12A and))
31.13 RCW, to facilitate the delivery of financial services to the members of a
credit union.

(((4))) (5)
Nonfederally insured credit unions, nonfederally insured out-of-state credit
unions, and nonfederally insured foreign credit unions operating in this state
as permitted by RCW 31.12.408 and 31.12.471, as applicable, must comply with
safety and soundness requirements established by the director.

(6) The director
may charge fees to credit unions and other persons subject to examination
and investigation under this chapter and chapter((s 31.12A and))
31.13 RCW, and to other parties where the division contracts out its
services, in order to cover the costs of the operation of the division of
credit unions, and to establish a reasonable reserve for the division. The
director may waive all or a portion of ((such)) the fees.

Sec. 27. RCW 31.12.545 and 1997 c
397 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
make an examination and investigation into the affairs of each credit union at
least once every eighteen months, unless the director determines with respect
to a credit union, that a less frequent examination schedule will
satisfactorily protect the financial stability of the credit union and will
satisfactorily assure compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

(2) In regard to
credit unions, and out-of-state and foreign credit unions permitted to operate
a branch in Washington pursuant to RCW 31.12.471, the director:

(a) Shall have full
access to the credit union's books and records and files, including but not
limited to computer files;

(b) May appraise and
revalue the credit union's investments; and

(c) May require the
credit union to charge off or set up a special reserve for loans and
investments.

(3) The director may
make an examination and investigation into the affairs of:

(a) An out-of-state
or foreign credit union permitted to operate a branch in Washington pursuant to
RCW 31.12.471;

(b) A nonpublicly
held organization in which a credit union has a material investment;

(c) A publicly held
organization the capital stock or equity of which is controlled by a credit
union;

(d) A credit union
service organization in which a credit union has an interest;

(e) An organization
that is not a credit union, out-of-state credit union, federal credit union, or
foreign credit union, and that has a majority interest in a credit union
service organization in which a credit union has an interest;

(f) A sole
proprietorship or organization primarily in the business of managing one or
more credit unions; and

(g) A person
providing electronic data processing services to a credit union.

The director shall
have full access to the books and records and files, including but not limited
to computer files, of persons described in this subsection.

(4) In connection
with examinations and investigations, the director may:

(a) Administer oaths
and examine under oath any person concerning the affairs of any credit union or
of any person described in subsection (3) of this section; and

(b) Issue subpoenas
to and require the attendance and testimony of any person at any place within
this state, and require witnesses to produce any books and records and files,
including but not limited to computer files, that are material to an
examination or investigation.

(5) The director
may accept in lieu of an examination under ((subsection (1) of)) this
section:

(a) The report
of an examiner authorized to examine a credit union or an out-of-state,
federal, or foreign credit union, or other financial institution; or

(b) The report
of an accountant, satisfactory to the director, who has made and submitted a
report of the condition of the affairs of a credit union or an out-of-state,
federal, or foreign credit union, or other financial institution.

The director may accept all
or part of such a report in lieu of all or part ((or all)) of
an examination. ((If)) The accepted((, the)) report or
accepted part of the report has the same force and effect as an examination
under ((subsection (1) of)) this section.

Sec. 28. RCW 31.12.565 and 1997 c
397 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following are
confidential and privileged and not subject to public disclosure under chapter
42.17 RCW:

(a) Examination reports
and information obtained by the director in conducting examinations and
investigations under this chapter and chapter((s 31.12A and)) 31.13 RCW;

(b) Examination reports
and related information from other financial institution regulators obtained by
the director; ((and))

(c) Reports or parts
of reports accepted in lieu of an examination under RCW 31.12.545; and

(d) Business
plans and other proprietary information obtained by the director in connection
with a credit union's application or notice to the director.

(2) Notwithstanding
subsection (1) of this section, the director may furnish examination reports
prepared by the director to:

(a) Federal agencies
empowered to examine credit unions or other financial institutions;

(b) Officials empowered
to investigate criminal charges. The director may furnish only that part of
the report which is necessary and pertinent to the investigation, and only
after notifying the affected credit union and members of the credit union who are
named in that part of the examination report, or other person examined, that
the report is being furnished to the officials, unless the officials requesting
the report obtain a waiver of the notice requirement for good cause from a
court of competent jurisdiction;

(c) The examined credit
union or other person examined, solely for its confidential use;

(d) The attorney
general in his or her role as legal advisor to the director;

(e) Prospective merger
partners or conservators, receivers, or liquidating agents of a distressed
credit union;

(f) Credit union
regulators in other states or foreign jurisdictions regarding an
out-of-state or foreign credit union conducting business in this state under
this chapter, or regarding a credit union conducting business in the other
state or jurisdiction;

(g) A person officially
connected with the credit union or other person examined, as officer, director,
supervisory committee member, attorney, auditor, accountant, independent
attorney, independent auditor, or independent accountant;

(h) Organizations that
have bonded the credit union to the extent that information is relevant to the
renewal of the bond coverage or to a claim under the bond coverage;

(i) Organizations
insuring or guaranteeing the shares of, or deposits in, the credit union; or

(j) Other persons as
the director may determine necessary to protect the public interest and
confidence.

(3) Examination reports
furnished under subsection (2) of this section remain the property of the
director and no person to whom reports are furnished or any officer, director,
or employee thereof may disclose or make public the reports or information contained
in the reports except in published statistical information that does not
disclose the affairs of a person, except that nothing prevents the use in a
criminal prosecution of reports furnished under subsection (2)(b) of this
section.

(4) In a civil action
in which the reports or information are sought to be discovered or used as
evidence, a party may, upon notice to the director, ((may))
petition the court for an in-camera review of the reports or information. The
court may permit discovery and introduction of only those portions of the
report or information which are relevant and otherwise unobtainable by the
requesting party. This subsection does not apply to an action brought or
defended by the director.

(5) This section does
not apply to investigation reports prepared by the director concerning an
application for a new credit union or a notice of intent to establish ((or
relocate)) a branch of a credit union, except that the director may adopt
rules making portions of the reports confidential, if in the director's opinion
the public disclosure of that portion of the report would impair the ability to
obtain information the director considers necessary to fully evaluate the
application.

(6) Any person who
knowingly violates a provision of this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec. 29. RCW 31.12.567 and 1997 c
397 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

A credit union shall ((make
at least two regular reports each year to the director showing the assets and liabilities
of the credit union)) file with the director any financial and
statistical report that it is required to file with the national credit union
administration. Each report must be certified by the principal operating
officer of the credit union. ((The director shall designate the form, the
due dates of, and the period covered by the reports.)) In addition, a
credit union shall file reports as may be required by the director.

Sec. 30. RCW 31.12.569 and 1997 c
397 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

Credit unions will
comply with the provisions of generally accepted accounting principles as ((identified
by)) required by federal law or rule of the director. In adopting
rules to implement this section, the director shall consider, among other
relevant factors, whether to transition small credit unions to generally
accepted accounting principles over a period of time.

Sec. 31. RCW 31.12.571 and 1997 c
397 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

A credit union desiring
to establish a branch in another state or a foreign jurisdiction shall
submit to the director a notice of intent to establish ((a)) the
branch at least thirty days before conducting business at the branch.

Sec. 32. RCW 31.12.575 and 1997 c
397 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) The
director may issue and serve a credit union director, supervisory
committee member, officer, or employee with written notice of ((the
director's)) intent to remove the person from office or employment
or to prohibit the person from participating in the conduct of the affairs of
the credit union or any credit union whenever, in the opinion of the
director:

(((a))) (1)
The person has committed a material violation of law or an unsafe or unsound
practice; and

(((b)(i))) (2)(a)
The credit union has suffered or is likely to suffer substantial financial loss
or other damage; or

(((ii))) (b)
The interests of the credit union's share account holders and depositors could
be seriously prejudiced by reason of the violation or practice; and

(((c))) (3)
The violation or practice involves personal dishonesty, recklessness, or
incompetence.

(((2) The notice
must contain a statement of the facts constituting the alleged violation or
practice and must fix a time and place at which a hearing will be held to
determine whether a removal or prohibition order should be issued against the
person. The hearing must be set not earlier than ten days nor later than
thirty days after service of the notice, unless a later date is set by the
director at the request of any of the parties.

Unless the person
appears at the hearing, the person will be deemed to have consented to the
issuance of the removal or prohibition order. In the event of this consent, or
if upon the record made at the hearing the director finds that any violation or
practice specified in the notice of intention has been established, the
director may issue and serve upon the person an order removing the person from
office at the credit union or an order prohibiting the person from
participating in the conduct of the affairs of the credit union.

(3) A removal order
or prohibition order becomes effective at the expiration of ten days after the
service of the order upon the person, except that a removal order or
prohibition order issued upon consent becomes effective at the time specified
in the order. An order remains effective unless it is stayed, modified,
terminated, or set aside by action of the director or a reviewing court.))

Sec. 33. RCW 31.12.585 and 1997 c
397 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) The
director may issue and serve a credit union with a written notice of
charges and intent to issue a cease and desist order if, in the opinion
of the director, the credit union has committed or is about to commit:

(((a))) (1)
A material violation of law; or

(((b))) (2)
An unsafe or unsound practice.

(((2) The notice
must contain a statement of the facts constituting the alleged violation or the
practice and must fix a time and place at which a hearing will be held to
determine whether an order to cease and desist should issue against the credit
union. The hearing must be set not earlier than ten days nor later than thirty
days after service of the notice, unless a later date is set by the director at
the request of any of the parties.

Unless the credit
union appears at the hearing by a duly authorized representative, it shall be
deemed to have consented to the issuance of the cease and desist order. In the
event of this consent, or if upon the record made at the hearing the director
finds that any violation or practice specified in the notice of charges has
been established, the director may issue and serve upon the credit union an
order to cease and desist from the violation or practice. The order may
require the credit union and its directors, supervisory committee members,
officers, employees, and agents to cease and desist from the violation or
practice and may require the credit union to take affirmative action to correct
the conditions resulting from the violation or practice.

(3) A cease and
desist order becomes effective at the expiration of ten days after the service
of the order upon the credit union, except that a cease and desist order issued
upon consent becomes effective at the time specified in the order. The order
remains effective unless it is stayed, modified, terminated, or set aside by
action of the director or a reviewing court.)) Upon taking effect, the order may require the credit union and
its directors, supervisory committee members, officers, employees, and agents
to cease and desist from the violation or practice and may require them to take
affirmative action to correct the conditions resulting from the violation or
practice.

Sec. 34. RCW 31.12.595 and 1997 c
397 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the
director determines that the violation or practice specified in RCW 31.12.585
is likely to cause an unsafe or unsound condition at the credit union, the director
may issue and serve a temporary cease and desist order ((requiring
the credit union to cease and desist from the violation or practice)). The
order may require the credit union and its directors, supervisory committee
members, officers, employees, and agents to cease and desist from the violation
or practice and may require them to take affirmative action to correct the
conditions resulting from the violation or practice.

(2) With the
temporary order, the director shall serve a notice of charges and intent to
issue a cease and desist order under RCW 31.12.585 in the matter.

(3) The temporary
order becomes effective upon service on the credit union and remains effective
((unless set aside, limited, or suspended by a court in proceedings under
RCW 31.12.605 pending the)) until completion of the administrative
proceedings under the notice((, and until the director dismisses the charges
specified in the notice or until the effective date of a cease and desist order
issued against the credit union under RCW 31.12.585)) issued under
subsection (2) of this section.

(4) Within ten days
after a credit union has been served with a temporary order, the credit union
may apply to the superior court in the county of its principal place of
business for an injunction setting aside, limiting, or suspending the order
pending the completion of the administrative proceedings under the notice
issued under subsection (2) of this section.

(5) In the case of a
violation or threatened violation of a temporary order, the director may apply
to the superior court of the county of the principal place of business of the
credit union for an injunction to enforce the order, and the court shall issue
an injunction if it determines that there has been a violation or threatened violation.

Sec. 35. RCW 31.12.625 and 1997 c
397 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) An
administrative hearing on the notice provided for in RCW 31.12.575 ((or))
and 31.12.585 must be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW;
provided that, to the extent the requirements of this chapter are inconsistent
with chapter 34.05 RCW, this chapter will govern. The hearing may be held
at such place as is designated by the director ((and must be conducted in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW)). The hearing shall be private unless
the director determines that a public hearing is necessary to protect the
public interest after fully considering the views of the party afforded the
hearing.

(((2) Within sixty
days after the hearing, the director shall render a decision which includes
findings of fact upon which the decision is based. The director shall issue
and serve upon each party to the proceeding an order or orders consistent with
RCW 31.12.575 or 31.12.585.

(3) Unless a
petition for review is timely filed in the superior court of the county in
which the principal place of business of the credit union is located, and until
the record in the proceeding has been filed as provided therein, the director
may at any time modify, terminate, or set aside any order upon such notice and
in such manner as the director may deem proper. Upon filing the record, the
director may modify, terminate, or set aside an order only with the permission
of the court or the party or parties to the proceeding.

The judicial review
provided in this section will be exclusive for orders issued under RCW
31.12.575 and 31.12.585.

(4) Any party to the
proceeding, or any person subject to an order, temporary order, or injunction
issued under RCW 31.12.575, 31.12.585, 31.12.595, or 31.12.615, may obtain a
review of any order issued and served under subsection (1) of this section,
other than an order issued upon consent, by filing a written petition
requesting that the order be modified, terminated, or set aside, in the
superior court of the county in which the principal place of business of the
affected credit union is located. The petition must be filed within ten days
after the date of service of the order. A copy of the petition must be
immediately served upon the director and the director must then file the record
of the proceeding in court. The court has jurisdiction, upon the filing of the
petition, to affirm, modify, terminate, or set aside, in whole or in part, the
order of the director. The jurisdiction of the court becomes exclusive upon
the filing of the record. However, the director may modify, terminate, or set
aside the order with the permission of the court. The judgment and decree of
the court is final subject to appellate review under the rules of the court.

(5) The commencement
of proceedings for judicial review under subsection (4) of this section may not
operate as a stay of any order issued by the director unless specifically
ordered by the court.

(6) Service of any notice
or order required to be served under RCW 31.12.575, 31.12.585, or 31.12.595,
must be accomplished in the same manner as required for the service of process
in civil actions in superior courts of this state.))

Sec. 36. RCW 31.13.010 and 1984 c
31 s 79 are each amended to read as follows:

((The terms)) As
used in this chapter ((shall have the following meanings)),
unless the context in which ((they are)) it is used clearly
indicates otherwise((.

(1)
"Members" shall mean any organization which meets the requirements of
chapter 31.12 RCW.

(2) "Member
credit union" shall mean any credit union which has been elected to
membership and subscribed for at least one share in the central credit union
and paid the initial installment thereon.

(3))), the term "corporate credit
union" ((shall)) or "corporate" means a ((corporation))
credit union organized under this chapter ((31.12 RCW or
chartered to do business as a credit union by the administrator of the national
credit union administration or the successor or successors of him.

(4)
"Funds" shall mean deposits and shares of the central credit union
members.

(5) For the purpose
of establishing required reserves all assets except the following are
"risk assets":

(a) Cash on hand;

(b) Deposits and
shares in banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, mutual savings
banks or credit unions;

(c) Assets which are
insured or guaranteed by, or due from, the federal government or any agency or
instrumentalities thereof)).

Sec. 37. RCW 31.13.020 and 1977
ex.s. c 207 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((A central)) (1)
Corporate credit unions may be organized and operated under this
chapter. ((The central)) A corporate credit union ((shall
have)) has all the ((rights and)) powers and authorities
granted in, and ((be)) is subject to, all of the
provisions of chapter 31.12 RCW which are not inconsistent with this chapter.
((Such credit union shall)) A corporate must use the term
"((central)) corporate" in its official name. ((Any
central credit union in existence on September 21, 1977 in the state of
Washington shall operate under the provisions of this chapter.)) The
director may adopt rules for the organization and operation of corporate credit
unions.

(2) Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, and in addition to all powers and authorities,
express or implied, that a corporate credit union has under the laws of this
state, a corporate has the powers and authorities that a federal or Kansas
state corporate credit union had on the effective date of this section.
However, a corporate must still comply with RCW 31.12.408.

(3) Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, and in addition to the powers and authorities,
express or implied, that a corporate has under subsection (2) of this section,
a corporate credit union has the powers and authorities that a federal or
Kansas state corporate credit union has subsequent to the effective date of
this section, if the director finds that the exercise of the power and
authority serves the convenience and advantage of members of credit unions, and
maintains the fairness of competition and parity between corporate credit
unions. However, a corporate must still comply with RCW 31.12.408.

(4) The
restrictions, limitations, and requirements applicable to specific powers or
authorities of federal or Kansas state corporate credit unions apply to
corporate credit unions exercising those powers or authorities permitted under
this section but only insofar as the restrictions, limitations, and
requirements relate to the specific exercise of the powers or authorities
granted corporate credit unions solely under this section.

(5) As used in this
section, "powers and authorities" include, but are not limited to,
powers and authorities in corporate governance matters.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
38. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 31.12.275 (Removal of board officers
by board--For cause) and 1997 c 397 s 20 & 1984 c 31 s 29;

(2) RCW 31.12.407 (Insurance required on or
before December 31, 1998) and 1996 c 5 s 5;

(3) RCW 31.12.445 (Reserve
requirements--Nonfederally insured credit unions) and 1997 c 397 s 38, 1994 c
92 s 199, & 1984 c 31 s 46;

(4) RCW 31.12.448 (Liquidity
reserve--Special reserve fund) and 1997 c 397 s 39, 1994 c 92 s 201, & 1984
c 31 s 48;

(5) RCW 31.12.555 (Examinations by
director--Consent--Frequency) and 1997 c 397 s 47;

(6) RCW 31.12.605 (Injunction setting aside,
limiting, or suspending temporary cease and desist order) and 1997 c 397 s 55
& 1984 c 31 s 62;

(7) RCW 31.12.615 (Injunction to enforce
temporary cease and desist order) and 1994 c 92 s 213 & 1984 c 31 s 63; and

(8) RCW 31.12.627 (Judicial enforcement of
orders) and 1997 c 397 s 57.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
39. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 31.13.030 (Bylaws) and 1994 c 92 s
234 & 1977 ex.s. c 207 s 2;

(2) RCW 31.13.040 (Additional rights and
powers) and 1977 ex.s. c 207 s 3; and

(3) RCW 31.13.050 (Reserve fund) and 1977
ex.s. c 207 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
40. RCW 31.13.900 is
decodified.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 41. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---