BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.24.035 and 1989 c
215 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

A nominating petition
submitted under this chapter shall clearly identify the name of the minor party
or independent candidate convention as it appears on the certificate of
nomination as required by RCW ((29.24.030(3))) 29.24.040(3). The
petition shall also contain a statement that the person signing the petition is
a registered voter of the state of Washington and shall have a space for the
voter to sign his or her name and to print his or her name and address. No
person may sign more than one nominating petition under this chapter for an
office for a primary or election.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

The reference to RCW 29.24.030(3) appears to be
erroneous. The section governing the certificate of nomination is RCW
29.24.040(3).

Sec. 2. RCW 34.05.660 and 1988 c
288 s 606 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the express
policy of the legislature that establishment of procedures for review of
administrative rules by the legislature and the notice of objection required by
RCW 34.05.630(((2))) (3) and 34.05.640(2) in no way serves to
establish a presumption as to the legality or constitutionality of a rule in
any subsequent judicial proceedings interpreting such rules.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 34.05.630 was amended by 1987 c 451 s 2,
changing subsection (2) to subsection (3).

Sec. 3. RCW 42.17.316 and 1994
sp.s. c 9 s 726 are each amended to read as follows:

The disclosure
requirements of this chapter shall not apply to records of the ((committee))
entity obtained in an action under RCW 18.71.300 through 18.71.340.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 18.71.300 was amended by 1998 c 132 s 3,
changing the definition of "committee" to "entity."

Sec. 4. RCW 46.16.065 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 118 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In lieu of the fees
provided in RCW ((46.16.060)) 46.16.0621, private passenger car
one or two-wheel trailers of two thousand pounds gross weight or less, may be
licensed upon the payment of a license fee in the sum of four dollars and fifty
cents or, if the vehicle was previously licensed in this state and has not been
registered in another jurisdiction in the intervening period, a renewal license
fee in the sum of three dollars and twenty-five cents, but only if such
trailers are to be operated upon the public highway by the owners thereof. It
is the intention of the legislature that this reduced license shall be issued
only as to trailers operated for personal use of the owners and not trailers
held for rental to the public.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 46.16.060 was repealed by 2000 1st sp.s. c 1
s 2. For later enactment, see RCW 46.16.0621.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.16.374 and 1996 c
139 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the eligible
applicant bears the entire cost of plate production, the department shall
provide for the issuance of special license plates, in lieu of regular motor
vehicle license plates, for passenger vehicles having manufacturers' rated
carrying capacities of one ton or less that are owned or leased by an officer
of the Taipei Economic and Cultural Office. The department shall issue the
special license plates in a distinguishing color, running in a separate
numerical series, and bearing the words "Foreign Organization." A
vehicle for which special license plates are issued under this section is
exempt from regular license fees under RCW ((46.16.060, excise tax under RCW
82.44.020,)) 46.16.0621 and any additional vehicle license fees
imposed under RCW 82.80.020.

(2) Whenever the owner
or lessee as provided in subsection (1) of this section transfers or assigns
the interest or title in the motor vehicle for which the special plates were
issued, the plates must be removed from the motor vehicle, and if another
qualified vehicle is acquired, attached to that vehicle, and the director must
be immediately notified of the transfer of the plates; otherwise the removed
plates must be immediately forwarded to the director to be destroyed. Whenever
the owner or lessee as provided in subsection (1) of this section is for any
reason relieved of his or her duties as a representative of a recognized
foreign organization, he or she shall immediately forward the special plates to
the director, who shall upon receipt dispose of the plates as otherwise
provided by law.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 46.16.060 and 82.44.020 were repealed by 2000
1st sp.s. c 1 s 2. For later enactment of RCW 46.16.060, see RCW 46.16.0621.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.20.285 and 1998 c
207 s 4 and 1998 c 41 s 3 are each reenacted to read as follows:

The department shall
forthwith revoke the license of any driver for the period of one calendar year
unless otherwise provided in this section, upon receiving a record of the
driver's conviction of any of the following offenses, when the conviction has
become final:

(1) For vehicular
homicide the period of revocation shall be two years. The revocation period
shall be tolled during any period of total confinement for the offense;

(2) Vehicular assault.
The revocation period shall be tolled during any period of total confinement
for the offense;

(3) Driving a motor
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a narcotic drug, or
under the influence of any other drug to a degree which renders the driver
incapable of safely driving a motor vehicle, for the period prescribed in RCW
46.61.5055;

(4) Any felony in the
commission of which a motor vehicle is used;

(5) Failure to stop and
give information or render aid as required under the laws of this state in the
event of a motor vehicle accident resulting in the death or personal injury of
another or resulting in damage to a vehicle that is driven or attended by
another;

(6) Perjury or the
making of a false affidavit or statement under oath to the department under
Title 46 RCW or under any other law relating to the ownership or operation of
motor vehicles;

(7) Reckless driving
upon a showing by the department's records that the conviction is the third
such conviction for the driver within a period of two years.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 46.20.285 was amended twice during the 1998
legislative session, each without reference to the other. This reenactment
merges the two versions to carry out the policy of the later, more inclusive
amendment.

Sec. 7. RCW 46.61.524 and 2000 c
28 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person convicted
under RCW 46.61.520(1)(a) or 46.61.522(1)(b) shall, as a condition of community
((supervision)) custody imposed under RCW 9.94A.383 or community
placement imposed under RCW 9.94A.660, complete a diagnostic evaluation by an
alcohol or drug dependency agency approved by the department of social and
health services or a qualified probation department, as defined under RCW
46.61.516 that has been approved by the department of social and health
services. This report shall be forwarded to the department of licensing. If
the person is found to have an alcohol or drug problem that requires treatment,
the person shall complete treatment in a program approved by the department of
social and health services under chapter 70.96A RCW. If the person is found
not to have an alcohol or drug problem that requires treatment, he or she shall
complete a course in an information school approved by the department of social
and health services under chapter 70.96A RCW. The convicted person shall pay
all costs for any evaluation, education, or treatment required by this section,
unless the person is eligible for an existing program offered or approved by
the department of social and health services. Nothing in chapter 348, Laws of
1991 requires the addition of new treatment or assessment facilities nor
affects the department of social and health services use of existing programs
and facilities authorized by law.

(2) As provided for
under RCW 46.20.285, the department shall revoke the license, permit to drive,
or a nonresident privilege of a person convicted of vehicular homicide under
RCW 46.61.520 or vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522. The department shall
determine the eligibility of a person convicted of vehicular homicide under RCW
46.61.520(1)(a) or vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522(1)(b) to receive a
license based upon the report provided by the designated alcoholism treatment
facility or probation department, and shall deny reinstatement until
satisfactory progress in an approved program has been established and the
person is otherwise qualified.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 9.94A.383 was amended by 1999 c 196 s 10,
changing the term "community supervision" to "community
custody."

Sec. 8. RCW 46.70.029 and 1990 c
250 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

Listing dealers shall
transact dealer business by obtaining a listing agreement for sale, and the
buyer's purchase of the mobile home shall be handled as dealer inventory. All
funds from the purchaser shall be placed in a trust account until the sale is
completed, except that the dealer shall pay any outstanding liens against the
mobile home from these funds. Where title has been delivered to the purchaser,
the listing dealer shall pay the amount due a seller within ten days after the
sale of a listed mobile home. A complete account of all funds received and
disbursed shall be given to the seller or consignor after the sale is
completed. The sale of listed mobile homes imposes the same duty under RCW ((46.12.120))
46.70.122 on the listing dealer as any other sale.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 46.12.120 was recodified as RCW 46.70.122
pursuant to 1993 c 307 s 18.

Sec. 9. RCW 46.70.180 and 1999 c
398 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Each of the following
acts or practices is unlawful:

(1) To cause or permit
to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, broadcasted,
televised, or disseminated in any manner whatsoever, any statement or
representation with regard to the sale or financing of a vehicle which is
false, deceptive, or misleading, including but not limited to the following:

(a) That no down
payment is required in connection with the sale of a vehicle when a down
payment is in fact required, or that a vehicle may be purchased for a smaller
down payment than is actually required;

(b) That a certain
percentage of the sale price of a vehicle may be financed when such financing
is not offered in a single document evidencing the entire security transaction;

(c) That a certain
percentage is the amount of the service charge to be charged for financing,
without stating whether this percentage charge is a monthly amount or an amount
to be charged per year;

(d) That a new vehicle
will be sold for a certain amount above or below cost without computing cost as
the exact amount of the factory invoice on the specific vehicle to be sold;

(e) That a vehicle will
be sold upon a monthly payment of a certain amount, without including in the
statement the number of payments of that same amount which are required to
liquidate the unpaid purchase price.

(2) To incorporate
within the terms of any purchase and sale agreement any statement or
representation with regard to the sale or financing of a vehicle which is
false, deceptive, or misleading, including but not limited to terms that
include as an added cost to the selling price of a vehicle an amount for
licensing or transfer of title of that vehicle which is not actually due to the
state, unless such amount has in fact been paid by the dealer prior to such
sale.

(3) To set up, promote,
or aid in the promotion of a plan by which vehicles are to be sold to a person
for a consideration and upon further consideration that the purchaser agrees to
secure one or more persons to participate in the plan by respectively making a
similar purchase and in turn agreeing to secure one or more persons likewise to
join in said plan, each purchaser being given the right to secure money,
credits, goods, or something of value, depending upon the number of persons
joining the plan.

(4) To commit, allow,
or ratify any act of "bushing" which is defined as follows: Taking
from a prospective buyer of a vehicle a written order or offer to purchase, or
a contract document signed by the buyer, which:

(a) Is subject to the
dealer's, or his or her authorized representative's future acceptance, and the
dealer fails or refuses within three calendar days, exclusive of Saturday,
Sunday, or legal holiday, and prior to any further negotiations with said
buyer, either (i) to deliver to the buyer the dealer's signed acceptance, or
(ii) to void the order, offer, or contract document and tender the return of
any initial payment or security made or given by the buyer, including but not
limited to money, check, promissory note, vehicle keys, a trade-in, or
certificate of title to a trade-in; or

(b) Permits the dealer
to renegotiate a dollar amount specified as trade-in allowance on a vehicle
delivered or to be delivered by the buyer as part of the purchase price, for
any reason except:

(i) Failure to disclose
that the vehicle's certificate of ownership has been branded for any reason,
including, but not limited to, status as a rebuilt vehicle as provided in RCW
46.12.050 and 46.12.075; or

(ii) Substantial
physical damage or latent mechanical defect occurring before the dealer took
possession of the vehicle and which could not have been reasonably discoverable
at the time of the taking of the order, offer, or contract; or

(iii) Excessive
additional miles or a discrepancy in the mileage. "Excessive additional
miles" means the addition of five hundred miles or more, as reflected on
the vehicle's odometer, between the time the vehicle was first valued by the
dealer for purposes of determining its trade-in value and the time of actual
delivery of the vehicle to the dealer. "A discrepancy in the mileage"
means (A) a discrepancy between the mileage reflected on the vehicle's odometer
and the stated mileage on the signed odometer statement; or (B) a discrepancy
between the mileage stated on the signed odometer statement and the actual
mileage on the vehicle; or

(c) Fails to comply
with the obligation of any written warranty or guarantee given by the dealer
requiring the furnishing of services or repairs within a reasonable time.

(5) To commit any
offense relating to odometers, as such offenses are defined in RCW 46.37.540,
46.37.550, 46.37.560, and 46.37.570. A violation of this subsection is a class
C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(6) For any vehicle
dealer or vehicle salesperson to refuse to furnish, upon request of a
prospective purchaser, for vehicles previously registered to a business or
governmental entity, the name and address of the business or governmental
entity.

(7) To commit any other
offense under RCW 46.37.423, 46.37.424, or 46.37.425.

(8) To commit any
offense relating to a dealer's temporary license permit, including but not
limited to failure to properly complete each such permit, or the issuance of
more than one such permit on any one vehicle. However, a dealer may issue a
second temporary permit on a vehicle if the following conditions are met:

(a) The lienholder
fails to deliver the vehicle title to the dealer within the required time
period;

(b) The dealer has
satisfied the lien; and

(c) The dealer has
proof that payment of the lien was made within two calendar days, exclusive of
Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, after the sales contract has been
executed by all parties and all conditions and contingencies in the sales
contract have been met or otherwise satisfied.

(9) For a dealer,
salesman, or mobile home manufacturer, having taken an instrument or cash
"on deposit" from a purchaser prior to the delivery of the
bargained-for vehicle, to commingle the "on deposit" funds with
assets of the dealer, salesman, or mobile home manufacturer instead of holding
the "on deposit" funds as trustee in a separate trust account until
the purchaser has taken delivery of the bargained-for vehicle. Delivery of a
manufactured home shall be deemed to occur in accordance with RCW
46.70.135(5). Failure, immediately upon receipt, to endorse "on
deposit" instruments to such a trust account, or to set aside "on
deposit" cash for deposit in such trust account, and failure to deposit
such instruments or cash in such trust account by the close of banking hours on
the day following receipt thereof, shall be evidence of intent to commit this
unlawful practice: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a motor vehicle dealer may keep a
separate trust account which equals his or her customary total customer
deposits for vehicles for future delivery. For purposes of this section,
"on deposit" funds received from a purchaser of a manufactured home
means those funds that a seller requires a purchaser to advance before ordering
the manufactured home, but does not include any loan proceeds or moneys that
might have been paid on an installment contract.

(10) For a dealer or
manufacturer to fail to comply with the obligations of any written warranty or
guarantee given by the dealer or manufacturer requiring the furnishing of goods
and services or repairs within a reasonable period of time, or to fail to
furnish to a purchaser, all parts which attach to the manufactured unit
including but not limited to the undercarriage, and all items specified in the
terms of a sales agreement signed by the seller and buyer.

(11) For a vehicle
dealer to pay to or receive from any person, firm, partnership, association, or
corporation acting, either directly or through a subsidiary, as a buyer's agent
for consumers, any compensation, fee, purchase moneys or funds that have been
deposited into or withdrawn out of any account controlled or used by any
buyer's agent, gratuity, or reward in connection with the purchase or sale of a
new motor vehicle.

(12) For a buyer's
agent, acting directly or through a subsidiary, to pay to or to receive from
any motor vehicle dealer any compensation, fee, gratuity, or reward in
connection with the purchase or sale of a new motor vehicle. In addition, it
is unlawful for any buyer's agent to engage in any of the following acts on
behalf of or in the name of the consumer:

(a) Receiving or paying
any purchase moneys or funds into or out of any account controlled or used by
any buyer's agent;

(b) Signing any vehicle
purchase orders, sales contract, odometer statements, or title documents, or
having the name of the buyer's agent appear on the vehicle purchase order,
sales contract, or title; or

(c) Signing any other
documentation relating to the purchase, sale, or transfer of any new motor
vehicle.

It is unlawful for a
buyer's agent to use a power of attorney obtained from the consumer to
accomplish or effect the purchase, sale, or transfer of ownership documents of
any new motor vehicle by any means which would otherwise be prohibited under
(a) through (c) of this subsection. However, the buyer's agent may use a power
of attorney for physical delivery of motor vehicle license plates to the
consumer.

Further, it is unlawful
for a buyer's agent to engage in any false, deceptive, or misleading
advertising, disseminated in any manner whatsoever, including but not limited
to making any claim or statement that the buyer's agent offers, obtains, or
guarantees the lowest price on any motor vehicle or words to similar effect.

(13) For a buyer's
agent to arrange for or to negotiate the purchase, or both, of a new motor
vehicle through an out-of-state dealer without disclosing in writing to the
customer that the new vehicle would not be subject to chapter 19.118 RCW. In
addition, it is unlawful for any buyer's agent to fail to have a written
agreement with the customer that: (a) Sets forth the terms of the parties'
agreement; (b) discloses to the customer the total amount of any fees or other
compensation being paid by the customer to the buyer's agent for the agent's services;
and (c) further discloses whether the fee or any portion of the fee is
refundable. The department of licensing shall by December 31, 1996, in rule,
adopt standard disclosure language for buyer's agent agreements under RCW
46.70.011, 46.70.070, and this section.

(14) Being a
manufacturer, other than a motorcycle manufacturer governed by chapter 46.94
RCW, to:

(a) Coerce or attempt
to coerce any vehicle dealer to order or accept delivery of any vehicle or
vehicles, parts or accessories, or any other commodities which have not been
voluntarily ordered by the vehicle dealer: PROVIDED, That recommendation,
endorsement, exposition, persuasion, urging, or argument are not deemed to
constitute coercion;

(b) Cancel or fail to
renew the franchise or selling agreement of any vehicle dealer doing business
in this state without fairly compensating the dealer at a fair going business
value for his or her capital investment which shall include but not be limited
to tools, equipment, and parts inventory possessed by the dealer on the day he
or she is notified of such cancellation or termination and which are still
within the dealer's possession on the day the cancellation or termination is
effective, if: (i) The capital investment has been entered into with reasonable
and prudent business judgment for the purpose of fulfilling the franchise; and
(ii) the cancellation or nonrenewal was not done in good faith. Good faith is
defined as the duty of each party to any franchise to act in a fair and
equitable manner towards each other, so as to guarantee one party freedom from
coercion, intimidation, or threats of coercion or intimidation from the other
party: PROVIDED, That recommendation, endorsement, exposition, persuasion,
urging, or argument are not deemed to constitute a lack of good faith.

(c) Encourage, aid,
abet, or teach a vehicle dealer to sell vehicles through any false, deceptive,
or misleading sales or financing practices including but not limited to those
practices declared unlawful in this section;

(d) Coerce or attempt
to coerce a vehicle dealer to engage in any practice forbidden in this section
by either threats of actual cancellation or failure to renew the dealer's
franchise agreement;

(e) Refuse to deliver
any vehicle publicly advertised for immediate delivery to any duly licensed
vehicle dealer having a franchise or contractual agreement for the retail sale
of new and unused vehicles sold or distributed by such manufacturer within
sixty days after such dealer's order has been received in writing unless caused
by inability to deliver because of shortage or curtailment of material, labor,
transportation, or utility services, or by any labor or production difficulty,
or by any cause beyond the reasonable control of the manufacturer;

(f) To provide under
the terms of any warranty that a purchaser of any new or unused vehicle that
has been sold, distributed for sale, or transferred into this state for resale
by the vehicle manufacturer may only make any warranty claim on any item
included as an integral part of the vehicle against the manufacturer of that
item.

Nothing in this section
may be construed to impair the obligations of a contract or to prevent a
manufacturer, distributor, representative, or any other person, whether or not
licensed under this chapter, from requiring performance of a written contract
entered into with any licensee hereunder, nor does the requirement of such
performance constitute a violation of any of the provisions of this section if
any such contract or the terms thereof requiring performance, have been freely
entered into and executed between the contracting parties. This paragraph and
subsection (14)(b) of this section do not apply to new motor vehicle
manufacturers governed by chapter 46.96 RCW.

(15) Unlawful transfer
of an ownership interest in a motor vehicle as defined in RCW 19.116.050.

(16) To knowingly and
intentionally engage in collusion with a registered owner of a vehicle to
repossess and return or resell the vehicle to the registered owner in an
attempt to avoid a suspended license impound under chapter 46.55 RCW. However,
compliance with chapter ((62A.9)) 62A.9A RCW in repossessing,
selling, leasing, or otherwise disposing of the vehicle, including providing
redemption rights to the debtor, is not a violation of this section.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Chapter 62A.9 RCW was repealed in its entirety by
2000 c 250 s 9A-901, effective July 1, 2001. For later enactment, see chapter
62A.9A RCW.

Sec. 10. RCW 46.79.010 and 1990 c
250 s 69 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions set
forth in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
indicates otherwise.

(1) "Junk
vehicle" means a motor vehicle certified under RCW 46.55.230 as meeting
all the following requirements:

(a) Is three years old
or older;

(b) Is extensively
damaged, such damage including but not limited to any of the following: A
broken window or windshield or missing wheels, tires, motor, or transmission;

(c) Is apparently inoperable;

(d) Is without a valid,
current registration plate;

(e) Has a fair market
value equal only to the value of the scrap in it.

(2) "Scrap
processor" means a licensed establishment that maintains a hydraulic baler
and shears, or a shredder for recycling salvage.

(3)
"Demolish" means to destroy completely by use of a hydraulic baler
and shears, or a shredder.

(4) "Hulk
hauler" means any person who deals in vehicles for the sole purpose of
transporting and/or selling them to a licensed ((motor)) vehicle wrecker
or scrap processor in substantially the same form in which they are obtained.
A hulk hauler may not sell second-hand motor vehicle parts to anyone other than
a licensed vehicle wrecker or scrap processor, except for those parts
specifically enumerated in RCW 46.79.020(2), as now or hereafter amended, which
may be sold to a licensed ((motor)) vehicle wrecker or disposed of at a
public facility for waste disposal.

(5)
"Director" means the director of licensing.

(6) "Major
component parts" include engines and short blocks, frames, transmissions
or transfer cases, cabs, doors, front or rear differentials, front or rear
clips, quarter panels or fenders, bumpers, truck beds or boxes, seats, and
hoods.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

"Motor vehicle wrecker" was
redesignated as "vehicle wrecker" by 1995 c 256.

Sec. 11. RCW 46.79.020 and 1990 c
250 s 70 are each amended to read as follows:

Any hulk hauler or
scrap processor licensed under the provisions of this chapter may:

(1) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, transport any flattened or junk vehicle whether such
vehicle is from in state or out of state, to a scrap processor upon obtaining
the certificate of title or release of interest from the owner or an affidavit
of sale from the landowner who has complied with RCW 46.55.230. The scrap
processor shall forward such document(s) to the department, together with a
monthly report of all vehicles acquired from other than a licensed automobile
wrecker, and no further identification shall be necessary.

(2) Prepare vehicles
and vehicle salvage for transportation and delivery to a scrap processor or
vehicle wrecker only by removing the following vehicle parts:

(a) Gas tanks;

(b) Vehicle seats
containing springs;

(c) Tires;

(d) Wheels;

(e) Scrap batteries;

(f) Scrap radiators.

Such parts may not be
removed if they will be accepted by a scrap processor or wrecker. Such parts
may be removed only at a properly zoned location, and all preparation activity,
vehicles, and vehicle parts shall be obscured from public view. Storage is limited
to two vehicles or the parts thereof which are authorized by this subsection,
and any such storage may take place only at a properly zoned location. Any
vehicle parts removed under the authority of this subsection shall be lawfully
disposed of at or through a public facility or service for waste disposal or by
sale to a licensed ((motor)) vehicle wrecker.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

"Motor vehicle wrecker" was
redesignated as "vehicle wrecker" by 1995 c 256.

Sec. 12. RCW 46.79.110 and 1983 c
142 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing contained in
this chapter shall be construed to prohibit any individual not engaged in
business as a hulk hauler or scrap processor from towing any vehicle owned by
him or her to any ((motor)) vehicle wrecker or scrap processor.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

"Motor vehicle wrecker" was
redesignated as "vehicle wrecker" by 1995 c 256.

Sec. 13. RCW 46.80.030 and 1990 c
250 s 72 are each amended to read as follows:

Application for a ((motor))
vehicle wrecker's license or renewal of a vehicle wrecker's license shall be
made on a form for this purpose, furnished by the department of licensing, and
shall be signed by the ((motor)) vehicle wrecker or his authorized agent
and shall include the following information:

(1) Name and address of
the person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation under which
name the business is to be conducted;

(2) Names and residence
address of all persons having an interest in the business or, if the owner is a
corporation, the names and addresses of the officers thereof;

(3) Certificate of
approval of the chief of police of any city or town having a population of over
five thousand persons and in all other instances a member of the Washington
state patrol certifying that:

(a) The applicant has
an established place of business at the address shown on the application, and;

(b) In the case of a
renewal of a vehicle wrecker's license, the applicant is in compliance with
this chapter and the provisions of Title 46 RCW, relating to registration and
certificates of title: PROVIDED, That the above certifications in any instance
can be made by an authorized representative of the department of licensing;

(4) Any other
information that the department may require.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

"Motor vehicle wrecker" was
redesignated as "vehicle wrecker" by 1995 c 256.

Sec. 14. RCW 47.46.040 and 1995
2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All projects
designed, constructed, and operated under this authority must comply with all
applicable rules and statutes in existence at the time the agreement is
executed, including but not limited to the following provisions: Chapter 39.12
RCW, this title, RCW 41.06.380, chapter 47.64 RCW, RCW 49.60.180, and 49 C.F.R.
Part 21.

(2) The secretary or a
designee shall consult with legal, financial, and other experts within and
outside state government in the negotiation and development of the agreements.

(3) Agreements shall
provide for private ownership of the projects during the construction period.
After completion and final acceptance of each project or discrete segment
thereof, the agreement shall provide for state ownership of the transportation
systems and facilities and lease to the private entity unless the state elects
to provide for ownership of the facility by the private entity during the term
of the agreement.

The state shall lease
each of the demonstration projects, or applicable project segments, to the
private entities for operating purposes for up to fifty years.

(4) The department may
exercise any power possessed by it to facilitate the development, construction,
financing operation, and maintenance of transportation projects under this
chapter. Agreements for maintenance services entered into under this section
shall provide for full reimbursement for services rendered by the department or
other state agencies. Agreements for police services for projects, involving
state highway routes, developed under agreements shall be entered into with the
Washington state patrol. The agreement for police services shall provide that
the state patrol will be reimbursed for costs on a comparable basis with the costs
incurred for comparable service on other state highway routes. The department
may provide services for which it is reimbursed, including but not limited to
preliminary planning, environmental certification, and preliminary design of
the demonstration projects.

(5) The plans and
specifications for each project constructed under this section shall comply
with the department's standards for state projects. A facility constructed by
and leased to a private entity is deemed to be a part of the state highway
system for purposes of identification, maintenance, and enforcement of traffic
laws and for the purposes of applicable sections of this title. Upon reversion
of the facility to the state, the project must meet all applicable state
standards. Agreements shall address responsibility for reconstruction or
renovations that are required in order for a facility to meet all applicable
state standards upon reversion of the facility to the state.

(6) For the purpose of
facilitating these projects and to assist the private entity in the financing,
development, construction, and operation of the transportation systems and
facilities, the agreements may include provisions for the department to
exercise its authority, including the lease of facilities, rights of way, and
airspace, exercise of the power of eminent domain, granting of development
rights and opportunities, granting of necessary easements and rights of access,
issuance of permits and other authorizations, protection from competition,
remedies in the event of default of either of the parties, granting of
contractual and real property rights, liability during construction and the
term of the lease, authority to negotiate acquisition of rights of way in
excess of appraised value, and any other provision deemed necessary by the
secretary.

(7) The agreements
entered into under this section may include provisions authorizing the state to
grant necessary easements and lease to a private entity existing rights of way
or rights of way subsequently acquired with public or private financing. The
agreements may also include provisions to lease to the entity airspace above or
below the right of way associated or to be associated with the private entity's
transportation facility. In consideration for the reversion rights in these
privately constructed facilities, the department may negotiate a charge for the
lease of airspace rights during the term of the agreement for a period not to
exceed fifty years. If, after the expiration of this period, the department
continues to lease these airspace rights to the private entity, it shall do so
only at fair market value. The agreement may also provide the private entity
the right of first refusal to undertake projects utilizing airspace owned by
the state in the vicinity of the public-private project.

(8) Agreements under
this section may include any contractual provision that is necessary to protect
the project revenues required to repay the costs incurred to study, plan,
design, finance, acquire, build, install, operate, enforce laws, and maintain
toll highways, bridges, and tunnels and which will not unreasonably inhibit or
prohibit the development of additional public transportation systems and
facilities. Agreements under this section must secure and maintain liability
insurance coverage in amounts appropriate to protect the project's viability
and may address state indemnification of the private entity for design and
construction liability where the state has approved relevant design and
construction plans.

(9) Agreements shall
include a process that provides for public involvement in decision making with
respect to the development of the projects.

(10)(a) In carrying out
the public involvement process required in subsection (9) of this section, the
private entity shall proactively seek public participation through a process
appropriate to the characteristics of the project that assesses and
demonstrates public support among: Users of the project, residents of
communities in the vicinity of the project, and residents of communities
impacted by the project.

(b) The private entity
shall conduct a comprehensive public involvement process that provides,
periodically throughout the development and implementation of the project,
users and residents of communities in the affected project area an opportunity
to comment upon key issues regarding the project including, but not limited
to: (i) Alternative sizes and scopes; (ii) design; (iii) environmental
assessment; (iv) right of way and access plans; (v) traffic impacts; (vi) tolling
or user fee strategies and tolling or user fee ranges; (vii) project cost;
(viii) construction impacts; (ix) facility operation; and (x) any other salient
characteristics.

(c) If the affected
project area has not been defined, the private entity shall define the affected
project area by conducting, at a minimum: (i) A comparison of the estimated
percentage of residents of communities in the vicinity of the project and in
other communities impacted by the project who could be subject to tolls or user
fees and the estimated percentage of other users and transient traffic that
could be subject to tolls or user fees; (ii) an analysis of the anticipated
traffic diversion patterns; (iii) an analysis of the potential economic impact
resulting from proposed toll rates or user fee rates imposed on residents,
commercial traffic, and commercial entities in communities in the vicinity of
and impacted by the project; (iv) an analysis of the economic impact of tolls
or user fees on the price of goods and services generally; and (v) an analysis
of the relationship of the project to state transportation needs and benefits.

The agreement may
require an advisory vote by users of and residents in the affected project
area.

(d) In seeking public
participation, the private entity shall establish a local involvement committee
or committees comprised of residents of the affected project area, individuals
who represent cities and counties in the affected project area, organizations
formed to support or oppose the project, if such organizations exist, and users
of the project. The private entity shall, at a minimum, establish a committee
as required under the specifications of RCW 47.46.030(((5))) (6)(b)
(ii) and (iii) and appointments to such committee shall be made no later than
thirty days after the project area is defined.

(e) Local involvement
committees shall act in an advisory capacity to the department and the private
entity on all issues related to the development and implementation of the
public involvement process established under this section.

(f) The department and
the private entity shall provide the legislative transportation committee and
local involvement committees with progress reports on the status of the public
involvement process including the results of an advisory vote, if any occurs.

(11) Nothing in this
chapter limits the right of the secretary and his or her agents to render such
advice and to make such recommendations as they deem to be in the best
interests of the state and the public.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 47.46.030 was amended by 1996 c 280 s 1,
changing subsection (5)(b)(ii) and (iii) to subsection (6)(b)(ii) and (iii).

Sec. 15. RCW 82.80.020 and 2000 c
103 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of a county, or subject to subsection (7) of this section, a
qualifying city or town located in a county that has not imposed a
fifteen-dollar fee under this section, may fix and impose an additional fee,
not to exceed fifteen dollars per vehicle, for each vehicle that is subject to
license fees under RCW ((46.16.060)) 46.16.0621 and for each
vehicle that is subject to RCW 46.16.070 with an unladen weight of six thousand
pounds or less, and that is determined by the department of licensing to be
registered within the boundaries of the county.

(2) The department of
licensing shall administer and collect the fee. The department shall deduct a
percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the
taxes collected, for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer
for monthly distribution under RCW 82.80.080.

(3) The proceeds of
this fee shall be used strictly for transportation purposes in accordance with
RCW 82.80.070.

(4) A county or
qualifying city or town imposing this fee or initiating an exemption process
shall delay the effective date at least six months from the date the ordinance
is enacted to allow the department of licensing to implement administration and
collection of or exemption from the fee.

(5) The legislative
authority of a county or qualifying city or town may develop and initiate an
exemption process of the fifteen dollar fee for the registered owners of
vehicles residing within the boundaries of the county or qualifying city or
town: (a) Who are sixty-one years old or older at the time payment of the fee
is due and whose household income for the previous calendar year is less than
an amount prescribed by the county or qualifying city or town legislative
authority; or (b) who have a physical disability.

(6) The legislative
authority of a county or qualifying city or town shall develop and initiate an
exemption process of the fifteen-dollar fee for vehicles registered within the
boundaries of the county that are licensed under RCW 46.16.374.

(7) For purposes of
this section, a "qualifying city or town" means a city or town
residing within a county having a population of greater than seventy-five
thousand in which is located all or part of a national monument. A qualifying
city or town may impose the fee authorized in subsection (1) of this section
subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The city or town
may impose the fee only if authorized to do so by a majority of voters voting
at a general or special election on a proposition for that purpose. At a
minimum, the ballot measure shall contain: (i) A description of the
transportation project proposed for funding, properly identified by mileposts
or other designations that specify the project parameters; (ii) the proposed
number of months or years necessary to fund the city or town's share of the
project cost; and (iii) the amount of fee to be imposed for the project.

(b) The city or town
may not impose a fee that, if combined with the county fee, exceeds fifteen
dollars. If a county imposes or increases a fee under this section that, if
combined with the fee imposed by a city or town, exceeds fifteen dollars, the
city or town fee shall be reduced or eliminated as needed so that in no city or
town does the combined fee exceed fifteen dollars. All revenues from
county-imposed fees shall be distributed as called for in RCW 82.80.080.

(c) Any fee imposed by
a city or town under this section shall expire at the end of the term of months
or years provided in the ballot measure, or when the city or town's bonded
indebtedness on the project is retired, whichever is sooner.

(8) The fee imposed
under subsection (7) of this section shall apply only to renewals and shall not
apply to ownership transfer transactions.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 46.16.060 was
repealed by 2000 1st sp.s. c 1 s 2. For later enactment, see RCW 46.16.0621.

--- END ---