BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.28.006 and 2000 c
238 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this subchapter.

(1)
"Administrator" means a person designated by an electrical contractor
to supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with the rules
adopted under this chapter.

(2) "Board"
means the electrical board under RCW ((19.28.065)) 19.28.311.

(3) "Chapter"
or "subchapter" means the subchapter, if no chapter number is
referenced.

(4)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(5)
"Director" means the director of the department or the director's
designee.

(6) "Electrical
construction trade" includes but is not limited to installing or
maintaining electrical wires and equipment that are used for light, heat, or
power and installing and maintaining remote control, signaling, power limited,
or communication circuits or systems.

(7) "Electrical
contractor" means a person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
that offers to undertake, undertakes, submits a bid for, or does the work of
installing or maintaining wires or equipment that convey electrical current.

(8)
"Equipment" means any equipment or apparatus that directly uses,
conducts, or is operated by electricity but does not mean plug-in household
appliances.

(9) "Industrial
control panel" means a factory-wired or user-wired assembly of industrial
control equipment such as motor controllers, switches, relays, power supplies,
computers, cathode ray tubes, transducers, and auxiliary devices. The panel
may include disconnect means and motor branch circuit protective devices.

(10) "Journeyman
electrician" means a person who has been issued a journeyman electrician
certificate of competency by the department.

(11) "Specialty
electrician" means a person who has been issued a specialty electrician
certificate of competency by the department.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 19.28.065 was recodified as RCW 19.28.311
pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 2.

Sec. 2. RCW 19.28.010 and 1993 c
275 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All wires and
equipment, and installations thereof, that convey electric current and
installations of equipment to be operated by electric current, in, on, or about
buildings or structures, except for telephone, telegraph, radio, and television
wires and equipment, and television antenna installations, signal strength
amplifiers, and coaxial installations pertaining thereto shall be in strict
conformity with this chapter, the statutes of the state of Washington, and the
rules issued by the department, and shall be in conformity with approved
methods of construction for safety to life and property. All wires and
equipment that fall within section 90.2(b)(5) of the National Electrical Code,
1981 edition, are exempt from the requirements of this chapter. The
regulations and articles in the National Electrical Code, the national
electrical safety code, and other installation and safety regulations approved by
the national fire protection association, as modified or supplemented by rules
issued by the department in furtherance of safety to life and property under
authority hereby granted, shall be prima facie evidence of the approved methods
of construction. All materials, devices, appliances, and equipment used in
such installations shall be of a type that conforms to applicable standards or
be indicated as acceptable by the established standards of any electrical
product testing laboratory which is accredited by the department. Industrial
control panels, utilization equipment, and their components do not need to be
listed, labeled, or otherwise indicated as acceptable by an accredited
electrical product testing laboratory unless specifically required by the
National Electrical Code, 1993 edition.

(2) Residential
buildings or structures moved into or within a county, city, or town are not
required to comply with all of the requirements of this chapter, if the
original occupancy classification of the building or structure is not changed
as a result of the move. This subsection shall not apply to residential
buildings or structures that are substantially remodeled or rehabilitated.

(3) This chapter shall
not limit the authority or power of any city or town to enact and enforce under
authority given by law, any ordinance, rule, or regulation requiring an equal,
higher, or better standard of construction and an equal, higher, or better
standard of materials, devices, appliances, and equipment than that required by
this chapter. A city or town shall require that its electrical inspectors meet
the qualifications provided for state electrical inspectors in accordance with
RCW ((19.28.070)) 19.28.321. In a city or town having an equal,
higher, or better standard the installations, materials, devices, appliances,
and equipment shall be in accordance with the ordinance, rule, or regulation of
the city or town. Electrical equipment associated with spas, hot tubs,
swimming pools, and hydromassage bathtubs shall not be offered for sale or
exchange unless the electrical equipment is certified as being in compliance
with the applicable product safety standard by bearing the certification mark
of an approved electrical products testing laboratory.

(4) Nothing in this
chapter may be construed as permitting the connection of any conductor of any
electric circuit with a pipe that is connected with or designed to be connected
with a waterworks piping system, without the consent of the person or persons
legally responsible for the operation and maintenance of the waterworks piping
system.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 19.28.070 was recodified as RCW 19.28.321
pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 2.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.28.041 and 1998 c
279 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for
any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity to engage in,
conduct, or carry on the business of installing or maintaining wires or
equipment to convey electric current, or installing or maintaining equipment to
be operated by electric current as it pertains to the electrical industry,
without having an unrevoked, unsuspended, and unexpired electrical contractor
license, issued by the department in accordance with this chapter. All
electrical contractor licenses expire twenty-four calendar months following the
day of their issue. The department may issue an electrical contractors license
for a period of less than twenty-four months only for the purpose of equalizing
the number of electrical contractor licenses that expire each month.
Application for an electrical contractor license shall be made in writing to
the department, accompanied by the required fee. The application shall state:

(a) The name and
address of the applicant; in case of firms or partnerships, the names of the
individuals composing the firm or partnership; in case of corporations, the
names of the managing officials thereof;

(b) The location of the
place of business of the applicant and the name under which the business is
conducted;

(c) Employer social
security number;

(d) Evidence of
workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's employees working in
Washington, as follows:

(i) The applicant's
industrial insurance account number issued by the department;

(ii) The applicant's
self-insurer number issued by the department; or

(iii) For applicants
domiciled in a state or province of Canada subject to an agreement entered into
under RCW 51.12.120(7), as permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of
coverage issued by the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in
the applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant has
secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or province's
workers' compensation law;

(e) Employment security
department number;

(f) State excise tax
registration number;

(g) Unified business
identifier (UBI) account number may be substituted for the information required
by (d) of this subsection if the applicant will not employ employees in
Washington, and by (e) and (f) of this subsection; and

(h) Whether a general
or specialty electrical contractor license is sought and, if the latter, the
type of specialty. Electrical contractor specialties include, but are not
limited to: Residential, domestic appliances, pump and irrigation, limited
energy system, signs, nonresidential maintenance, and a combination specialty.
A general electrical contractor license shall grant to the holder the right to
engage in, conduct, or carry on the business of installing or maintaining wires
or equipment to carry electric current, and installing or maintaining
equipment, or installing or maintaining material to fasten or insulate such
wires or equipment to be operated by electric current, in the state of
Washington. A specialty electrical contractor license shall grant to the
holder a limited right to engage in, conduct, or carry on the business of
installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry electrical current, and
installing or maintaining equipment; or installing or maintaining material to
fasten or insulate such wires or equipment to be operated by electric current
in the state of Washington as expressly allowed by the license.

(2) The department may
verify the workers' compensation coverage information provided by the applicant
under subsection (1)(d) of this section, including but not limited to
information regarding the coverage of an individual employee of the applicant.
If coverage is provided under the laws of another state, the department may
notify the other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.

(3) The application for
a contractor license shall be accompanied by a bond in the sum of four thousand
dollars with the state of Washington named as obligee in the bond, with good
and sufficient surety, to be approved by the department. The bond shall at all
times be kept in full force and effect, and any cancellation or revocation
thereof, or withdrawal of the surety therefrom, suspends the license issued to
the principal until a new bond has been filed and approved as provided in this
section. Upon approval of a bond, the department shall on the next business
day deposit the fee accompanying the application in the electrical license fund
and shall file the bond in the office. The department shall upon request
furnish to any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity a
certified copy of the bond upon the payment of a fee that the department shall
set by rule. The fee shall cover but not exceed the cost of furnishing the
certified copy. The bond shall be conditioned that in any installation or
maintenance of wires or equipment to convey electrical current, and equipment
to be operated by electrical current, the principal will comply with the
provisions of this chapter and with any electrical ordinance, building code, or
regulation of a city or town adopted pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3) that is in
effect at the time of entering into a contract. The bond shall be conditioned
further that the principal will pay for all labor, including employee benefits,
and material furnished or used upon the work, taxes and contributions to the
state of Washington, and all damages that may be sustained by any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity due to a failure of the principal to
make the installation or maintenance in accordance with this chapter or any
applicable ordinance, building code, or regulation of a city or town adopted
pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3). In lieu of the surety bond required by this
section the license applicant may file with the department a cash deposit or
other negotiable security acceptable to the department. If the license
applicant has filed a cash deposit, the department shall deposit the funds in a
special trust savings account in a commercial bank, mutual savings bank, or
savings and loan association and shall pay annually to the depositor the
interest derived from the account.

(4) The department
shall issue general or specialty electrical contractor licenses to applicants
meeting all of the requirements of this chapter. The provisions of this
chapter relating to the licensing of any person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity including the requirement of a bond with the state
of Washington named as obligee therein and the collection of a fee therefor,
are exclusive, and no political subdivision of the state of Washington may
require or issue any licenses or bonds or charge any fee for the same or a
similar purpose. No person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
holding more than one specialty contractor license under this chapter may be
required to pay an annual fee for more than one such license or to post more
than one four thousand dollar bond, equivalent cash deposit, or other
negotiable security.

(5) To obtain a general
or specialty electrical contractor license the applicant must designate an
individual who currently possesses an administrator's certificate as a general
electrical contractor administrator or as a specialty electrical contractor
administrator in the specialty for which application has been made.
Administrator certificate specialties include but are not limited to:
Residential, domestic, appliance, pump and irrigation, limited energy system, signs,
nonresidential maintenance, and combination specialty. To obtain an
administrator's certificate an individual must pass an examination as set forth
in RCW ((19.28.123)) 19.28.051 unless the applicant was a
licensed electrical contractor at any time during 1974. Applicants who were
electrical contractors licensed by the state of Washington at any time during
1974 are entitled to receive a general electrical contractor administrator's
certificate without examination if the applicants apply prior to January 1,
1984. The board of electrical examiners shall certify to the department the
names of all persons who are entitled to either a general or specialty
electrical contractor administrator's certificate.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 19.28.123 was recodified as RCW 19.28.051
pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

Sec. 4. RCW 19.28.051 and 1996 c
147 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the purpose
and function of the board to establish, in addition to a general electrical
contractors' license, such classifications of specialty electrical contractors'
licenses as it deems appropriate with regard to individual sections pertaining
to state adopted codes in this chapter. In addition, it shall be the purpose
and function of the board to establish and administer written examinations for
general electrical administrators' certificates and the various specialty
electrical administrators' certificates. Examinations shall be designed to
reasonably insure that general and specialty electrical administrators'
certificate holders are competent to engage in and supervise the work covered
by this statute and their respective licenses. The examinations shall include
questions from the following categories to assure proper safety and protection
for the general public: (1) Safety, (2) state electrical code, and (3)
electrical theory. The department with the consent of the board shall be
permitted to enter into a contract with a professional testing agency to develop,
administer, and score these examinations. The fee for the examination may be
set by the department in its contract with the professional testing agency.
The department may direct that the applicant pay the fee to the professional
testing agency. The fee shall cover but not exceed the costs of preparing and
administering the examination. It shall be the further purpose and function of
this board to advise the director as to the need of additional electrical
inspectors and compliance officers to be utilized by the director on either a
full-time or part-time employment basis and to carry out the duties enumerated
in RCW ((19.28.510 through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271
as well as generally advise the department on all matters relative to RCW ((19.28.510
through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 19.28.510 through 19.28.620 were recodified
as RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

Sec. 5. RCW 19.28.071 and 1986 c
156 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person, firm, or
corporation sustaining any damage or injury by reason of the principal's breach
of the conditions of the bond required under RCW ((19.28.120)) 19.28.041
may bring an action against the surety named therein, joining in the action the
principal named in the bond; the action shall be brought in the superior court
of any county in which the principal on the bond resides or transacts business,
or in the county in which the work was performed as a result of which the
breach is alleged to have occurred; the action shall be maintained and
prosecuted as other civil actions. Claims or actions against the surety on the
bond shall be paid in full in the following order of priority: (1) Labor,
including employee benefits, (2) materials and equipment used upon such work,
(3) taxes and contributions due to the state, (4) damages sustained by any
person, firm or corporation due to the failure of the principal to make the
installation in accordance with the provisions of chapter 19.28 RCW, or any
ordinance, building code, or regulation applicable thereto: PROVIDED, That the
total liability of the surety on any bond shall not exceed the sum of four
thousand dollars and the surety on the bond shall not be liable for monetary
penalties; and any action shall be brought within one year from the completion
of the work in the performance of which the breach is alleged to have
occurred. The surety shall mail a conformed copy of the judgment against the
bond to the department within seven days.

In the event that a
cash or securities deposit has been made in lieu of the surety bond, and in the
event of a judgment being entered against such depositor and deposit, the
director shall upon receipt of a certified copy of a final judgment, pay said
judgment from such deposit.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 19.28.120 was recodified as RCW 19.28.041
pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

Sec. 6. RCW 19.28.091 and 1998 c
98 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No license under
the provision of this chapter shall be required from any utility or any person,
firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity employed by a utility because
of work in connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of lines,
wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by or under the control of a utility and
used for transmission or distribution of electricity from the source of supply
to the point of contact at the premises and/or property to be supplied and
service connections and meters and other apparatus or appliances used in the
measurement of the consumption of electricity by the customer.

(2) No license under
the provisions of this chapter shall be required from any utility because of work
in connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of the following:

(a) Lines, wires,
apparatus, or equipment used in the lighting of streets, alleys, ways, or
public areas or squares;

(b) Lines, wires,
apparatus, or equipment owned by a commercial, industrial, or public
institution customer that are an integral part of a transmission or
distribution system, either overhead or underground, providing service to such
customer and located outside the building or structure: PROVIDED, That a
utility does not initiate the sale of services to perform such work;

(c) Lines and wires,
together with ancillary apparatus, and equipment, owned by a customer that is
an independent power producer who has entered into an agreement for the sale of
electricity to a utility and that are used in transmitting electricity from an
electrical generating unit located on premises used by such customer to the
point of interconnection with the utility's system.

(3) Any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity licensed under RCW ((19.28.120))
19.28.041 may enter into a contract with a utility for the performance
of work under subsection (2) of this section.

(4) No license under
the provisions of this chapter shall be required from any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity because of the work of installing and
repairing ignition or lighting systems for motor vehicles.

(5) No license under
the provisions of this chapter shall be required from any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity because of work in connection with
the installation, repair, or maintenance of wires and equipment, and
installations thereof, exempted in RCW 19.28.010.

(6) The department may
by rule exempt from licensing requirements under this chapter work performed on
premanufactured electric power generation equipment assemblies and control gear
involving the testing, repair, modification, maintenance, or installation of
components internal to the power generation equipment, the control gear, or the
transfer switch.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 19.28.120 was recodified as RCW 19.28.041
pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

Sec. 7. RCW 19.28.121 and 1988 c
81 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity desiring a decision of the board
pursuant to RCW ((19.28.260)) 19.28.111 shall, in writing, notify
the director of such desire and shall accompany the notice with a certified
check payable to the department in the sum of two hundred dollars. The notice
shall specify the ruling or interpretation desired and the contention of the
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity as to the proper
interpretation or application on the question on which a decision is desired.
If the board determines that the contention of the applicant for a decision was
proper, the two hundred dollars shall be returned to the applicant; otherwise
it shall be used in paying the expenses and per diem of the members of the
board in connection with the matter. Any portion of the two hundred dollars
not used in paying the per diem and expenses of the board in the case shall be
paid into the electrical license fund.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 19.28.260 was recodified as RCW 19.28.111
pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

Sec. 8. RCW 19.28.131 and 1996 c
147 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the provisions of
RCW 19.28.010 through ((19.28.360)) 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through
19.28.361 shall be assessed a penalty of not less than fifty dollars or more
than ten thousand dollars. The department shall set by rule a schedule of
penalties for violating RCW 19.28.010 through ((19.28.360)) 19.28.141
and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361. The department shall notify the person,
firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the provisions
of RCW 19.28.010 through ((19.28.360)) 19.28.141 and 19.28.311
through 19.28.361 of the amount of the penalty and of the specific
violation by certified mail, return receipt requested, sent to the last known
address of the assessed party. Any penalty is subject to review by an appeal
to the board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of the penalty until
the board makes its decision. The appeal shall be filed within twenty days
after notice of the penalty is given to the assessed party by certified mail,
return receipt requested, sent to the last known address of the assessed party
and shall be made by filing a written notice of appeal with the department.
The notice shall be accompanied by a certified check for two hundred dollars,
which shall be returned to the assessed party if the decision of the department
is not sustained by the board. If the board sustains the decision of the
department, the two hundred dollars shall be applied by the department to the
payment of the per diem and expenses of the members of the board incurred in
the matter, and any balance remaining after payment of per diem and expenses
shall be paid into the electrical license fund. The hearing and review
procedures shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The board
shall assign its hearings to an administrative law judge to conduct the hearing
and issue a proposed decision and order. The board shall be allowed a minimum
of twenty days to review a proposed decision and shall issue its decision no
later than the next regularly scheduled board meeting.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Chapter 19.28 RCW was substantially recodified by
2000 c 238. The updated string citations accurately reflect the sections
previously cited.

Sec. 9. RCW 19.28.141 and 1986 c
156 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of RCW
((19.28.210)) 19.28.101 shall not apply:

(1) Within the
corporate limits of any incorporated city or town which has heretofore adopted
and enforced or subsequently adopts and enforces an ordinance requiring an
equal, higher or better standard of construction and of materials, devices,
appliances and equipment than is required by this chapter.

(2) Within the service
area of an electricity supply agency owned and operated by a city or town which
is supplying electricity and enforcing a standard of construction and materials
outside its corporate limits at the time this act takes effect: PROVIDED, That
such city, town or agency shall henceforth enforce by inspection within its
service area outside its corporate limits the same standards of construction
and of materials, devices, appliances and equipment as is enforced by the
department of labor and industries under the authority of this chapter:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That fees charged henceforth in connection with such
enforcement shall not exceed those established in RCW ((19.28.210)) 19.28.101.

(3) Within the rights
of way of state highways, provided the state department of transportation
maintains and enforces an equal, higher or better standard of construction and
of materials, devices, appliances and equipment than is required by RCW
19.28.010 through ((19.28.360)) 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through
19.28.361.

EXPLANATORY NOTES

(1) RCW 19.28.210 was
recodified as RCW 19.28.101 pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

(2) Chapter 19.28 RCW was substantially
recodified by 2000 c 238. The updated string citations accurately reflect the
sections previously cited.

Sec. 10. RCW 19.28.151 and 2000 c
171 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of RCW
19.28.010 through ((19.28.360)) 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through
19.28.361 shall not apply to the work of installing, maintaining or
repairing any and all electrical wires, apparatus, installations or equipment
used or to be used by a telegraph company or a telephone company in the
exercise of its functions and located outdoors or in a building or buildings
used exclusively for that purpose.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Chapter 19.28 RCW was substantially recodified by
2000 c 238. The updated string citations accurately reflect the sections
previously cited.

Sec. 11. RCW 19.28.171 and 1996 c
241 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may
audit the records of an electrical contractor that has verified the hours of
experience submitted by an electrical trainee to the department under RCW ((19.28.510(2)))
19.28.161(2) in the following circumstances: Excessive hours were reported;
hours reported outside the normal course of the contractor's business; the type
of hours reported do not reasonably match the type of permits purchased; or for
other similar circumstances in which the department demonstrates a likelihood
of excessive hours being reported. The department shall limit the audit to
records necessary to verify hours. The department shall adopt rules
implementing audit procedures. Information obtained from an electrical
contractor under the provisions of this section is confidential and is not open
to public inspection under chapter 42.17 RCW.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 19.28.510 was recodified as RCW 19.28.161
pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

Sec. 12. RCW 19.28.181 and 1997 c
309 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person desiring to
be issued a certificate of competency as provided in this chapter shall deliver
evidence in a form prescribed by the department affirming that said person has
met the qualifications required under RCW ((19.28.530)) 19.28.191.
An electrician from another jurisdiction applying for a certificate of
competency must provide evidence in a form prescribed by the department
affirming that the person has the equivalent qualifications to those required
under RCW ((19.28.530)) 19.28.191.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 19.28.530 was recodified as RCW 19.28.191
pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

Sec. 13. RCW 19.28.201 and 1996 c
147 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The department, in
coordination with the board, shall prepare an examination to be administered to
applicants for journeyman and specialty certificates of competency. The
examination shall be constructed to determine:

(1) Whether the
applicant possesses varied general knowledge of the technical information and
practical procedures that are identified with the status of journeyman
electrician or specialty electrician; and

(2) Whether the
applicant is sufficiently familiar with the applicable electrical codes and the
rules of the department pertaining to electrical installations and
electricians.

The department shall,
at least four times annually, administer the examination to persons eligible to
take it under RCW ((19.28.530)) 19.28.191. A person may take the
journeyman or specialty test as many times as necessary without limit. All
applicants shall, before taking the examination, pay the required examination
fee to the agency administering the examination. The fee shall cover but not
exceed the costs of preparing and administering the examination.

The department shall
certify the results of the examination upon such terms and after such a period
of time as the department, in cooperation with the board, deems necessary and
proper.

(3) The department upon
the consent of the board may enter into a contract with a professional testing
agency to develop, administer, and score journeyman and/or specialty
electrician certification examinations. The department may set the examination
fee by contract with the professional testing agency.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 19.28.530 was recodified as RCW 19.28.191
pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

Sec. 14. RCW 19.28.211 and 1996 c
241 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall issue a certificate of competency to all applicants who have passed the
examination provided in RCW ((19.28.540)) 19.28.201, and who have
complied with RCW ((19.28.510 through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through
19.28.271 and the rules adopted under this chapter. The certificate shall
bear the date of issuance, and shall expire on the holder's birthday. The
certificate shall be renewed every three years, upon application, on or before
the holder's birthdate. A fee shall be assessed for each certificate and for
each annual renewal.

(2) If the certificate
holder demonstrates to the department that he or she has satisfactorily
completed an annual eight-hour continuing education course, the certificate may
be renewed without examination by appropriate application unless the
certificate has been revoked, suspended, or not renewed within ninety days
after the expiration date.

(a) The contents and
requirements for satisfactory completion of the continuing education course
shall be determined by the director and approved by the board.

(b) The department
shall accept proof of a certificate holder's satisfactory completion of a
continuing education course offered in another state as meeting the
requirements for maintaining a current Washington state certificate of
competency if the department is satisfied the course is comparable in nature to
that required in Washington state for maintaining a current certificate of
competency.

(3) If the certificate
is not renewed before the expiration date, the individual shall pay twice the
usual fee. The department shall set the fees by rule for issuance and renewal
of a certificate of competency. The fees shall cover but not exceed the costs
of issuing the certificates and of administering and enforcing the electrician
certification requirements of this chapter.

(4) The certificates of
competency and temporary permits provided for in this chapter grant the holder
the right to work in the electrical construction trade as a journeyman
electrician or specialty electrician in accordance with their provisions
throughout the state and within any of its political subdivisions without
additional proof of competency or any other license, permit, or fee to engage
in such work.

EXPLANATORY NOTES

(1) RCW 19.28.540 was
recodified as RCW 19.28.201 pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

(2) RCW 19.28.510 through 19.28.620 were
recodified as RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

Sec. 15. RCW 19.28.221 and 1980 c
30 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

No examination shall be
required of any applicant for a certificate of competency who, on July 16,
1973, was engaged in a bona fide business or trade as a journeyman electrician
in the state of Washington. Applicants qualifying under this section shall be
issued a certificate by the department upon making an application as provided
in RCW ((19.28.520)) 19.28.181 and paying the fee required under
RCW ((19.28.540)) 19.28.201: PROVIDED, That no applicant under
this section shall be required to furnish such evidence as required by RCW ((19.28.520))
19.28.181.

EXPLANATORY NOTES

(1) RCW 19.28.520 was
recodified as RCW 19.28.181 pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

(2) RCW 19.28.540 was recodified as RCW 19.28.201
pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

Sec. 16. RCW 19.28.231 and 1986 c
156 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is
authorized to grant and issue temporary permits in lieu of certificates of
competency whenever an electrician coming into the state of Washington from
another state requests the department for a temporary permit to engage in the
electrical construction trade as an electrician during the period of time
between filing of an application for a certificate as provided in RCW ((19.28.520))
19.28.181 and the date the results of taking the examination provided
for in RCW ((19.28.540)) 19.28.201 are furnished to the
applicant. The department is authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements
with other states providing for the acceptance of such states' journeyman and
speciality electrician certificate of competency or its equivalent when such
states requirements are equal to the standards set by this chapter. No
temporary permit shall be issued to:

(1) Any person who has
failed to pass the examination for a certificate of competency, except that any
person who has failed the examination for competency under this section shall
be entitled to continue to work under a temporary permit for ninety days if the
person is enrolled in a journeyman electrician refresher course and shows
evidence to the department that he or she has not missed any classes. The
person, after completing the journeyman electrician refresher course, shall be
eligible to retake the examination for competency at the next scheduled time.

(2) Any applicant under
this section who has not furnished the department with such evidence required
under RCW ((19.28.520)) 19.28.181.

(3) To any apprentice
electrician.

EXPLANATORY NOTES

(1) RCW 19.28.520 was
recodified as RCW 19.28.181 pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

(2) RCW 19.28.540 was recodified as RCW 19.28.201
pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

Sec. 17. RCW 19.28.241 and 1997 c
58 s 845 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
revoke any certificate of competency upon the following grounds:

(a) The certificate was
obtained through error or fraud;

(b) The holder thereof
is judged to be incompetent to work in the electrical construction trade as a
journeyman electrician or specialty electrician;

(c) The holder thereof
has violated any of the provisions of RCW ((19.28.510 through 19.28.620))
19.28.161 through 19.28.271 or any rule adopted under this chapter.

(2) Before any
certificate of competency shall be revoked, the holder shall be given written
notice of the department's intention to do so, mailed by registered mail,
return receipt requested, to the holder's last known address. The notice shall
enumerate the allegations against the holder, and shall give the holder the
opportunity to request a hearing before the board. At the hearing, the
department and the holder may produce witnesses and give testimony. The
hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The board
shall render its decision based upon the testimony and evidence presented, and
shall notify the parties immediately upon reaching its decision. A majority of
the board shall be necessary to render a decision.

(3) The department
shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been
certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order ((or a residential
or visitation order)). If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license
or certificate shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a release
issued by the department of social and health services stating that the
licensee is in compliance with the order.

EXPLANATORY NOTES

(1) RCW 19.28.510
through 19.28.620 were recodified as RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 pursuant
to 2000 c 238 s 102.

(2) 1997 c 58 s 887 requiring a court to order
certification of noncompliance with residential provisions of a court-ordered
parenting plan was vetoed. Provisions ordering the department of social and
health services to certify a responsible parent based on a court order to
certify for noncompliance with residential provisions of a parenting plan were
vetoed.

Sec. 18. RCW 19.28.251 and 1983 c
206 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

The director may
promulgate rules, make specific decisions, orders, and rulings, including
demands and findings, and take other necessary action for the implementation
and enforcement of RCW ((19.28.510 through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161
through 19.28.271. In the administration of RCW ((19.28.510 through
19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 the department shall not
enter any controversy arising over work assignments with respect to the trades
involved in the construction industry.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 19.28.510 through 19.28.620 were recodified
as RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

Sec. 19. RCW 19.28.261 and 1998 c
98 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in RCW ((19.28.510
through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed
to require that a person obtain a license or a certified electrician in order
to do electrical work at his or her residence or farm or place of business or
on other property owned by him or her unless the electrical work is on the
construction of a new building intended for rent, sale, or lease. However, if
the construction is of a new residential building with up to four units
intended for rent, sale, or lease, the owner may receive an exemption from the
requirement to obtain a license or use a certified electrician if he or she
provides a signed affidavit to the department stating that he or she will be
performing the work and will occupy one of the units as his or her principal
residence. The owner shall apply to the department for this exemption and may
only receive an exemption once every twenty-four months. It is intended that
the owner receiving this exemption shall occupy the unit as his or her
principal residence for twenty-four months after completion of the units.
Nothing in RCW ((19.28.510 through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through
19.28.271 shall be intended to derogate from or dispense with the
requirements of any valid electrical code enacted by a city or town pursuant to
RCW 19.28.010(3), except that no code shall require the holder of a certificate
of competency to demonstrate any additional proof of competency or obtain any
other license or pay any fee in order to engage in the electrical construction
trade. RCW ((19.28.510 through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through
19.28.271 shall not apply to common carriers subject to Part I of the
Interstate Commerce Act, nor to their officers and employees. Nothing in RCW
((19.28.510 through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall
be deemed to apply to the installation or maintenance of telephone, telegraph,
radio, or television wires and equipment; nor to any electrical utility or its
employees in the installation, repair, and maintenance of electrical wiring,
circuits, and equipment by or for the utility, or comprising a part of its
plants, lines or systems. The licensing provisions of RCW ((19.28.510
through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply to:

(1) Persons making
electrical installations on their own property or to regularly employed
employees working on the premises of their employer, unless the electrical work
is on the construction of a new building intended for rent, sale, or lease;

(2) Employees of an
employer while the employer is performing utility type work of the nature
described in RCW ((19.28.200)) 19.28.091 so long as such
employees have registered in the state of Washington with or graduated from a
state-approved outside lineman apprenticeship course that is recognized by the
department and that qualifies a person to perform such work; or

(3) Any work exempted
under RCW ((19.28.200(6))) 19.28.091(6).

Nothing in RCW ((19.28.510
through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed
to restrict the right of any householder to assist or receive assistance from a
friend, neighbor, relative or other person when none of the individuals doing
the electrical installation hold themselves out as engaged in the trade or
business of electrical installations. Nothing precludes any person who is
exempt from the licensing requirements of this chapter under this section from
obtaining a journeyman or specialty certificate of competency if they otherwise
meet the requirements of this chapter.

EXPLANATORY NOTES

(1) RCW 19.28.510
through 19.28.620 were recodified as RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 pursuant
to 2000 c 238 s 102.

(2) RCW 19.28.200 was recodified as RCW 19.28.091
pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

Sec. 20. RCW 19.28.271 and 1996 c
147 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for
any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity to employ an
individual for purposes of RCW ((19.28.510 through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161
through 19.28.271 who has not been issued a certificate of competency or a
training certificate. It is unlawful for any individual to engage in the
electrical construction trade or to maintain or install any electrical
equipment or conductors without having in his or her possession a certificate
of competency or a training certificate under RCW ((19.28.510 through
19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271. Any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity found in violation of RCW ((19.28.510
through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be assessed a
penalty of not less than fifty dollars or more than five hundred dollars. The
department shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for violating RCW ((19.28.510
through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271. An appeal may be
made to the board as is provided in RCW ((19.28.350)) 19.28.131.
The appeal shall be filed within twenty days after the notice of the penalty is
given to the assessed party by certified mail, return receipt requested, sent
to the last known address of the assessed party and shall be made by filing a
written notice of appeal with the department. Any equipment maintained or
installed by any person who does not possess a certificate of competency under
RCW ((19.28.510 through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271
shall not receive an electrical work permit and electrical service shall not be
connected or maintained to operate the equipment. Each day that a person,
firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violates RCW ((19.28.510
through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 is a separate
violation.

(2) A civil penalty
shall be collected in a civil action brought by the attorney general in the
county wherein the alleged violation arose at the request of the department if
any of RCW ((19.28.510 through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through
19.28.271 or any rules adopted under RCW ((19.28.510 through 19.28.620))
19.28.161 through 19.28.271 are violated.

EXPLANATORY NOTES

(1) RCW 19.28.510
through 19.28.620 were recodified as RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 pursuant
to 2000 c 238 s 102.

(2) RCW 19.28.350 was recodified as RCW 19.28.131
pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

Sec. 21. RCW 19.28.321 and 1997 c
309 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of labor
and industries of the state of Washington and the officials of all incorporated
cities and towns where electrical inspections are required by local ordinances
shall have power and it shall be their duty to enforce the provisions of this
chapter in their respective jurisdictions. The director of labor and
industries shall appoint a chief electrical inspector and may appoint other
electrical inspectors as the director deems necessary to assist the director in
the performance of the director's duties. The chief electrical inspector,
subject to the review of the director, shall be responsible for providing the
final interpretation of adopted state electrical standards, rules, and policies
for the department and its inspectors, assistant inspectors, electrical plan
examiners, and other individuals supervising electrical program personnel. If
a dispute arises within the department regarding the interpretation of adopted
state electrical standards, rules, or policies, the chief electrical inspector,
subject to the review of the director, shall provide the final interpretation
of the disputed standard, rule, or policy. All electrical inspectors appointed
by the director of labor and industries shall have not less than: Four years
experience as journeyman electricians in the electrical construction trade
installing and maintaining electrical wiring and equipment, or two years
electrical training in a college of electrical engineering of recognized
standing and four years continuous practical electrical experience in
installation work, or four years of electrical training in a college of
electrical engineering of recognized standing and two years continuous
practical electrical experience in electrical installation work; or four years
experience as a journeyman electrician performing the duties of an electrical
inspector employed by the department or a city or town with an approved
inspection program under RCW ((19.28.360)) 19.28.141, except that
for work performed in accordance with the national electrical safety code and
covered by this chapter, such inspections may be performed by a person
certified as an outside journeyman lineman, under RCW ((19.28.610(2))) 19.28.261(2),
with four years experience or a person with four years experience as a certified
outside journeyman lineman performing the duties of an electrical inspector
employed by an electrical utility. Such state inspectors shall be paid such
salary as the director of labor and industries shall determine, together with
their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now
existing or hereafter amended. As a condition of employment, inspectors hired
exclusively to perform inspections in accordance with the national electrical
safety code must possess and maintain certification as an outside journeyman
lineman. The expenses of the director of labor and industries and the salaries
and expenses of state inspectors incurred in carrying out the provisions of
this chapter shall be paid entirely out of the electrical license fund, upon
vouchers approved by the director of labor and industries.

EXPLANATORY NOTES

(1) RCW 19.28.360 was
recodified as RCW 19.28.141 pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

(2) RCW 19.28.610
was recodified as RCW 19.28.261 pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.

--- END ---