BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.05.011 and 2000 c
230 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.

(2) "State
purchased health care" or "health care" means medical and health
care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with state and federal
funds by the department of social and health services, the department of
health, the basic health plan, the state health care authority, the department
of labor and industries, the department of corrections, the department of
veterans affairs, and local school districts.

(3)
"Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4) "Insuring
entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01 RCW, a health care
service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.

(5) "Flexible
benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows employees to choose the
level of health care coverage provided and the amount of employee contributions
from among a range of choices offered by the authority.

(6)
"Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees of
the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and appointed
officials of the executive branch of government, including full-time members of
boards, commissions, or committees; and includes any or all part-time and
temporary employees under the terms and conditions established under this
chapter by the authority; justices of the supreme court and judges of the court
of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state legislature or of
the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to
office after February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees
of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if the
legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other political
subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of the authority to
provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as
provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee organizations representing
state civil service employees, at the option of each such employee
organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of employee organizations
currently pooled with employees of school districts for the purpose of
purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such employee
organization; and (c) employees of a school district if the authority agrees to
provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by contract with the
authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350.

(7) "Board"
means the public employees' benefits board established under RCW 41.05.055.

(8) "Retired or
disabled school employee" means:

(a) Persons who
separated from employment with a school district or educational service
district and are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40
RCW as of September 30, 1993;

(b) Persons who
separate from employment with a school district or educational service district
on or after October 1, 1993, and immediately upon separation receive a
retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;

(c) Persons who
separate from employment with a school district or educational service district
due to a total and permanent disability, and are eligible to receive a deferred
retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.

(9) "Benefits
contribution plan" means a premium only contribution plan, a medical
flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan whereby state and public
employees may agree to a contribution to benefit costs which will allow the
employee to participate in benefits offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.

(10) "Salary"
means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.

(11)
"Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility and
enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.

(12) "Plan
year" means the time period established by the authority.

(13) "Separated
employees" means persons who separate from employment with an employer as
defined in:

(a) RCW 41.32.010(11)
on or after July 1, 1996; or

(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or
after September 1, 2000;

and who are at least age
fifty-five and have at least ten years of service under the teachers'
retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.32.010(40) or the Washington
school employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010.

(14) "Emergency
service personnel killed in the line of duty" means law enforcement
officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030, and reserve officers
and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.24.010 who die as a result of injuries
sustained in the course of employment as determined consistent with Title 51
RCW by the department of labor and industries.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.05.011 and 2000 c
247 s 604 and 2000 c 230 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.

(2) "State
purchased health care" or "health care" means medical and health
care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with state and federal
funds by the department of social and health services, the department of
health, the basic health plan, the state health care authority, the department
of labor and industries, the department of corrections, the department of
veterans affairs, and local school districts.

(3)
"Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4) "Insuring
entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01 RCW, a health care
service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.

(5) "Flexible
benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows employees to choose the
level of health care coverage provided and the amount of employee contributions
from among a range of choices offered by the authority.

(6)
"Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees of
the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and appointed
officials of the executive branch of government, including full-time members of
boards, commissions, or committees; and includes any or all part-time and
temporary employees under the terms and conditions established under this
chapter by the authority; justices of the supreme court and judges of the court
of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state legislature or of
the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to
office after February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees
of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if the
legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other political
subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of the authority to
provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as
provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee organizations representing
state civil service employees, at the option of each such employee
organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of employee organizations
currently pooled with employees of school districts for the purpose of
purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such employee
organization; and (c) employees of a school district if the authority agrees to
provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by contract with the
authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350.

(7) "Board"
means the public employees' benefits board established under RCW 41.05.055.

(8) "Retired or
disabled school employee" means:

(a) Persons who
separated from employment with a school district or educational service
district and are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40
RCW as of September 30, 1993;

(b) Persons who
separate from employment with a school district or educational service district
on or after October 1, 1993, and immediately upon separation receive a
retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;

(c) Persons who
separate from employment with a school district or educational service district
due to a total and permanent disability, and are eligible to receive a deferred
retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.

(9) "Benefits
contribution plan" means a premium only contribution plan, a medical
flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan whereby state and public
employees may agree to a contribution to benefit costs which will allow the
employee to participate in benefits offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.

(10) "Salary"
means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.

(11)
"Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility and
enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.

(12) "Plan
year" means the time period established by the authority.

(13) "Separated
employees" means persons who separate from employment with an employer as
defined in:

(a) RCW 41.32.010(11)
on or after July 1, 1996; or

(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or
after September 1, 2000; or

(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or
after March 1, 2002;

and who are at least age
fifty-five and have at least ten years of service under the teachers'
retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.32.010(40), the Washington school
employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public
employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.

(14) "Emergency
service personnel killed in the line of duty" means law enforcement
officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030, and reserve officers
and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.24.010 who die as a result of injuries
sustained in the course of employment as determined consistent with Title 51
RCW by the department of labor and industries.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.05.080 and 1996 c
39 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Under the
qualifications, terms, conditions, and benefits set by the board:

(a) Retired or disabled
state employees, retired or disabled school employees, or employees of county,
municipal, or other political subdivisions covered by this chapter who are
retired may continue their participation in insurance plans and contracts after
retirement or disablement;

(b) Separated employees
may continue their participation in insurance plans and contracts if
participation is selected immediately upon separation from employment;

(c) Surviving
spouses and dependent children of emergency service personnel killed in the
line of duty may participate in insurance plans and contracts.

(2) Rates charged surviving
spouses of emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty, retired
or disabled employees, separated employees, spouses, or dependent children who
are not eligible for parts A and B of medicare shall be based on the experience
of the community rated risk pool established under RCW 41.05.022.

(3) Rates charged to surviving
spouses of emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty, retired
or disabled employees, separated employees, spouses, or children who are
eligible for parts A and B of medicare shall be calculated from a separate
experience risk pool comprised only of individuals eligible for parts A and B
of medicare; however, the premiums charged to medicare-eligible retirees and
disabled employees shall be reduced by the amount of the subsidy provided under
RCW 41.05.085.

(4) Surviving
spouses and dependent children of emergency service personnel killed in the
line of duty and retired or disabled and separated employees shall be
responsible for payment of premium rates developed by the authority which shall
include the cost to the authority of providing insurance coverage including any
amounts necessary for reserves and administration in accordance with this
chapter. These self pay rates will be established based on a separate rate for
the employee, the spouse, and the children.

(5) The term
"retired state employees" for the purpose of this section shall
include but not be limited to members of the legislature whether voluntarily or
involuntarily leaving state office.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Section 1 of this act
expires March 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Section 2 of this act
takes effect March 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and except for
section 2 of this act takes effect immediately. This act applies to surviving
spouses and dependent children of emergency service personnel killed in the
line of duty on or after January 1, 2001.

---
END ---