BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that recent studies show a powerful relationship between postsecondary
education and an increase in lifetime earned income. Even just two years of
college can equate to a quarter of a million dollar increase in lifetime
income. A bachelor's degree can boost annual income seventy-three percent, compared
to a high school degree. In addition, studies indicate that for individuals
attending college, there is a correlation with improved health status,
increased civic participation, improved savings rates, less reliance on
government assistance, and improved quality of life for their children.
Additionally, this correlates to increased tax revenues and reduced crime rates
for society. The legislature finds that some welfare recipients could qualify
for college admission and benefit from completion of their higher education at
a community, trade, or technical college, or other institute of higher
education.

The federal government
has specifically encouraged creative approaches to higher education for welfare
recipients, and several other states have enacted legislation to this end. In
Washington state, there is currently a shortage of skilled workers, with sixty‑four
percent of Washington employers reporting difficulty in finding qualified
applicants in 2000. The scarcity of workers with postsecondary training
affects many businesses, and has severe implications for the state's economy.
Skill requirements are expected to continue to increase. In order to close the
postsecondary skills gap, Washington will need significantly more advanced
workers in the coming months and years, and enabling welfare clients to achieve
their educational goals will help solve this problem.

In 1999, the federal
government adopted final regulations for temporary assistance for needy
families, allowing expanded use of block grant and maintenance of effort
funds. These funds can be used creatively for a variety of special approaches,
to help poor families achieve true financial independence.

The legislature intends
to provide access to postsecondary education for qualified adult recipients of
temporary assistance for needy families, while maintaining the emphasis on
employment that is the hallmark of the WorkFirst program. The legislature
intends to provide temporary assistance for needy families grants, including
working connections child care and tuition assistance, to college-qualified
individuals, with the goal of providing a means for highly motivated welfare
recipients to successfully complete college, exit assistance, and secure
careers to benefit themselves, their families, and society.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The department shall
establish the HELP program. The goal of the program is to help
college-qualified parents who have dependent children in need and are eligible
for temporary assistance for needy families receive up to two years of
undergraduate education or training. Annually the department shall provide
parents accepted into or enrolled at an institution of higher education in
Washington state with assistance that includes their temporary assistance for
needy families cash grants, as well as the other support services provided to
recipients of temporary assistance for needy families, including but not
limited to medical assistance, working connections child care, food stamps, tuition
assistance based upon actual tuition or public higher education tuition rates,
whichever is less, and other support services. The department may facilitate
access to Pell grants and state need grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
sections 2 through 10 of this act.

(1) "HELP
program" means the higher education for lifelong progress program.

(2) "Institution
of higher education" means the state research universities, the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, the community colleges, the
technical colleges, and private career schools, colleges, and universities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) Families that qualify
for temporary assistance for needy families under this chapter may participate
in the HELP program as a countable work activity of the temporary assistance
for needy families program. Eligibility for assistance, and the amount of
assistance, shall be determined under criteria used in the temporary assistance
for needy families program. Because participation in the HELP program
satisfies the countable work activity requirement, the department shall not
impose an additional work requirement upon HELP participants.

(2) The department
shall assess the educational program to determine whether the completion of the
program is likely to result in employment that provides the wages and benefits
necessary for the applicant to support the applicant's family without public
assistance.

(3) To the extent that
funds are available, enrollment in the program shall be granted if the
department determines that:

(a) The applicant
intends to pursue higher education in a field with a high probability of wage progression
and likely to enable the applicant to exit assistance; and

(b) Considering
potential employment opportunities and local labor market conditions, the
undergraduate education sought by the individual is likely to improve the
ability of the family to be self-supporting.

The applicant shall
meet the requirements for the state need grant under RCW 28B.10.800 through
28B.10.820 and qualify for acceptance at and be admitted to an institution of
higher education in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The department shall
recommend that applicants obtain career planning and counseling services from
their educational institutions to assist them in choosing an educational plan
that is likely to lead to self-sufficiency, and provide to students who have
begun an educational program assistance to overcome barriers to completing the
program and becoming employed. The department may work with other state,
local, and private entities to provide the planning and counseling services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Students receiving
assistance under sections 2 through 10 of this act shall meet the following
requirements:

(1) They must be
accepted into a postsecondary program; and

(2) They must be
enrolled full-time, with the expectation that they make satisfactory progress
toward a degree, certificate, or license in a field likely to create a high
probability of employment and wage progression. Satisfactory progress may be
evidenced by earning at least a 2.5 grade point average.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The department shall
inform all persons applying for or participating in the temporary assistance
for needy families program of the option to apply for the HELP program and the
criteria for acceptance. Recipients of temporary assistance for needy families
who have already partially completed their postsecondary education will be
encouraged to apply and be given priority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. To the extent permitted
by federal law, assistance received under sections 2 through 10 of this act
must be disregarded as income and excluded as a resource or asset to the same
extent as assistance under the temporary assistance for needy families program,
under this chapter, for the purposes of any state, federal, tribal, or
municipal assistance program. Assistance received under sections 2 through 10
of this act must be treated in the same manner as assistance received under the
temporary assistance for needy families program under this chapter for all tax
purposes. Furthermore, the department shall implement the program so
participants qualify for food stamps until completion of their degree or
certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) The department shall
contract with the Washington state institute for public policy for the
performance of an outcome study of program participants. The study shall, at a
minimum:

(a) Track degree or
certificate completion by participants;

(b) Report on wage
progression of participants;

(c) Report on the
program's dropout rate, including temporary assistance for needy families'
recidivism;

(d) Quantify the
projected increase in lifetime earnings of program graduates; and

(e) Report on
self-identified enhancers and barriers to success in postsecondary education
experience by the study population.

(2) The results of the
outcome study shall be reported annually, no later than January 15th, beginning
in 2003, to the governor and to appropriate committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Participation in the HELP
program shall be incorporated in the recipient's individual personal
responsibility plan, in a manner that clearly indicates that satisfactory
progress in college is the recipient's temporary assistance for needy families
work activity and responsibility.

Sec. 11. RCW 74.08A.250 and 2000
c 10 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, as used in this chapter, "work activity"
means:

(1) Unsubsidized paid
employment in the private or public sector;

(2) Subsidized paid
employment in the private or public sector, including employment through the
state or federal work-study program for a period not to exceed twenty-four
months;

(3) Work experience,
including:

(a) An internship or
practicum, that is paid or unpaid and is required to complete a course of
vocational training or to obtain a license or certificate in a high demand
field, as determined by the employment security department. No internship or
practicum shall exceed twelve months; or

(b) Work associated
with the refurbishing of publicly assisted housing, if sufficient paid
employment is not available;

(4) On-the-job
training;

(5) Job search and job
readiness assistance;

(6) Community service
programs;

(7) Vocational
educational training, not to exceed twelve months with respect to any
individual;

(8) Job skills training
directly related to employment;

(9) Education directly
related to employment, in the case of a recipient who has not received a high
school diploma or a GED;

(10) Satisfactory
attendance at secondary school or in a course of study leading to a GED, in the
case of a recipient who has not completed secondary school or received such a
certificate;

(11) The provision of
child care services to an individual who is participating in a community
service program;

(12) Internships, that
shall be paid or unpaid work experience performed by an intern in a business,
industry, or government or nongovernmental agency setting;

(13) Practicums, which
include any educational program in which a student is working under the close
supervision of a professional in an agency, clinic, or other professional
practice setting for purposes of advancing their skills and knowledge; ((and))

(14) Services required
by the recipient under RCW 74.08.025(3) and 74.08A.010(3) to become employable;
and

(15) Participation
in the higher education for lifelong progress program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. The department shall
adopt rules to implement sections 2 through 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. Sections 2 through 10 and
12 of this act are each added to chapter 74.08A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part
of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies
concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that
are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

---
END ---