BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
19.28.161 and 1997 c 309 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) No person may engage in the electrical
construction trade

_7 without having a current journeyman electrician
certificate of

_8 competency or a current specialty electrician
certificate of

_9 competency issued by the department in accordance with
this

10 chapter. Electrician certificate of competency
specialties include,

11 but are not limited to: Residential, domestic
appliances, pump

12 and irrigation, limited energy system, signs, and
nonresidential

13 maintenance.

14 (2) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship
program

15 approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the electrical
construction

16 trade or who is learning the electrical construction
trade may

17 work in the electrical construction trade if supervised
by a

18 certified journeyman electrician or a certified
specialty

p. 1 HB
1373

_1 electrician in that electrician's specialty. All
apprentices and

_2 individuals learning the electrical construction trade
shall

_3 obtain an electrical training certificate from the
department. The

_4 certificate shall authorize the holder to learn the electrical

_5 construction trade while under the direct supervision of
a

_6 journeyman electrician or a specialty electrician
working in his

_7 or her specialty. The holder of the electrical training
certificate

_8 shall renew the certificate annually. At the time of
renewal, the

_9 holder shall provide the department with an accurate
list of the

10 holder's employers in the electrical construction
industry for the

11 previous year and the number of hours worked for each
employer. An

12 annual fee shall be charged for the issuance or renewal
of the

13 certificate. The department shall set the fee by rule.
The fee shall

14 cover but not exceed the cost of administering and
enforcing the

15 trainee certification and supervision requirements of
this

16 chapter. Apprentices and individuals learning the
electrical

17 construction trade shall have their electrical training

18 certificates in their possession at all times that they
are

19 performing electrical work. They shall show their
certificates to

20 an authorized representative of the department at the

21 representative's request.

22 (3) Any person who has been issued an electrical
training

23 certificate under this chapter may work if that person
is under

24 supervision. Supervision shall consist of a person
being on the

25 same job site and under the control of either a
journeyman

26 electrician or an appropriate specialty electrician who
has an

27 applicable certificate of competency issued under this
chapter.

28 Either a journeyman electrician or an appropriate
specialty

29 electrician shall be on the same job site as the
noncertified

30 individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each
working

31 day unless otherwise provided in this chapter.

32 (4) The ratio of noncertified individuals to
certified

33 journeymen or specialty electricians working on a job
site shall

34 be:

35 (a) Not more than two noncertified individuals
working on any

36 one job site for every specialty electrician or
journeyman

37 electrician working as a specialty electrician,
except that the

38 ratio requirements shall be one certified specialty
electrician or

HB 1373 p. 2

_1 journeyman electrician working as a specialty
electrician to no

_2 more than four students enrolled in and working as
part of an

_3 appropriate specialty training program at public
community or

_4 technical colleges, nationally accredited technical
or trade

_5 schools, or technical or trade schools licensed by
the work force

_6 training and education coordinating board under
chapter 28C.10

_7 RCW. In meeting the ratio requirements for students
enrolled in an

_8 appropriate specialty training program at a trade
school, a trade

_9 school may receive input and advice from the electrical
board; and

10 (b) Not more than one noncertified individual
working on any

11 one job site for every certified journeyman electrician,
except

12 that the ratio requirements shall be one certified
journeyman

13 electrician to no more than four students enrolled in
and working

14 as part of an electrical construction program at public
community

15 or technical colleges, ((or not-for-profit))
nationally accredited

16 ((trade or)) technical or trade schools,
or technical or trade

17 schools licensed by the work force training and
education

18 coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW. In meeting
the ratio

19 requirements for students enrolled in an electrical
construction

20 program at a trade school, a trade school may receive
input and

21 advice from the electrical board.

22 (5) An individual who has a current training
certificate and

23 who has successfully completed or is currently enrolled
in an

24 approved apprenticeship program ((or)), in
an electrical

25 construction program, or in an appropriate specialty
training

26 program at public community or technical
colleges, ((or not-for-

27 profit)) nationally accredited technical or trade
schools, or

28 technical or trade schools licensed by the work
force training and

29 education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW((,))
may

30 work without direct on-site supervision during the last
six months

31 of meeting the practical experience requirements of this
chapter.

32 (((5))) (6) The electrical contractor
shall accurately verify

33 and attest to the electrical trainee hours worked by
electrical

34 trainees on behalf of the electrical contractor.

35 Sec. 2. RCW
19.28.191 and 1997 c 309 s 3 are each amended to read

36 as follows:

37 (1) Upon receipt of the application, the department
shall

p. 3 HB
1373

_1 review the application and determine whether the
applicant is

_2 eligible to take an examination for the journeyman or
specialty

_3 certificate of competency.

_4 (a) To be eligible to take the examination for a
journeyman

_5 certificate the applicant must have:

_6 (i) Worked in the electrical construction trade for
a minimum

_7 of four years employed full time, of which two years
shall be in

_8 industrial or commercial electrical installation under
the

_9 supervision of a journeyman electrician and not more
than a total

10 of two years in all specialties under the supervision of
a

11 journeyman electrician or an appropriate specialty
electrician; or

12 (ii) Successfully completed an apprenticeship
program approved

13 under chapter 49.04 RCW for the electrical construction
trade.

14 (b) To be eligible to take the examination to become
a

15 specialty electrician the applicant shall have:

16 (i) Worked in that specialty of the electrical
construction

17 trade, under the supervision of a journeyman electrician
or an

18 appropriate specialty electrician, for a minimum of two
years

19 employed full time; or

20 (ii) Successfully completed an approved apprenticeship
program

21 under chapter 49.04 RCW for the applicant's specialty in
the

22 electrical construction trade.

23 (c) Any applicant for a journeyman certificate
who has

24 successfully completed a two-year program in the
electrical

25 construction trade at public community or technical
colleges, or

26 not-for-profit nationally accredited technical or trade
schools

27 licensed by the work force training and education
coordinating

28 board under chapter 28C.10 RCW may substitute up to two
years of

29 the technical or trade school program for up to
two years of work

30 experience under a journeyman electrician. The
applicant shall

31 obtain the additional two years of work experience
required in

32 industrial or commercial electrical installation prior
to the

33 beginning, or after the completion, of the technical
school

34 program. Any applicant who has received training in the
electrical

35 construction trade in the armed service of the United
States may

36 be eligible to take the examination for the certificate
of

37 competency.

38 (d) Any applicant for a specialty certificate who
has

HB 1373 p. 4

_1 successfully completed an appropriate specialty
training program

_2 at public community or technical colleges, nationally
accredited

_3 technical or trade schools, or technical or trade
schools licensed

_4 by the work force training and education coordinating
board under

_5 chapter 28C.10 RCW may substitute up to two thousand
hours of the

_6 technical or trade school program for up to two
thousand hours of

_7 work experience under an electrician certified in the
appropriate

_8 specialty. The applicant shall obtain the additional
work

_9 experience required in the appropriate specialty
prior to the

10 beginning, or after the completion, of the technical
school

11 program.

12 (e) No other requirement for eligibility may
be imposed.

13 (2) The department shall establish reasonable rules
for the

14 examinations to be given applicants for certificates of

15 competency. In establishing the rules, the department
shall consult

16 with the board. Upon determination that the applicant
is eligible

17 to take the examination, the department shall so notify
the

18 applicant, indicating the time and place for taking the

19 examination.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 HB
1373