BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 90.58

_7 RCW to read as follows:

_8 The department shall repeal the guidelines adopted
during

_9 November 2000 and reinstate the guidelines that were in
effect

10 prior to the adoption of these guidelines. The
department shall

11 adopt the guidelines in effect prior to the adoption of
the

12 November 2000 guidelines as emergency rules and then as
permanent

13 rules according to the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW
and this

14 chapter.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary
for the immediate

16 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

p. 1 HB
1374

_1 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

_2 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1374 p. 2