BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.06.077 and
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 115 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this
chapter shall not apply in the department of veterans affairs to the director,
the deputy director, ((and to)) no more than two ((assistants)) assistant
directors, a confidential secretary for the deputy director, and a confidential
secretary for each assistant director.

--- END ---