BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature
finds that:

_7 (a) The overall goal of the state=s
economic development

_8 strategy is to raise the standard of living for all
residents by

_9 enhancing income and employment opportunities;

10 (b) The effectiveness of any regional or local
economic

11 development strategy depends on a partnership between
the

12 community, business, and government;

13 (c) The need to nurture entrepreneurs and
entrepreneurship is

14 vital to the growth of Washington=s
economy; and

15 (d) The need to improve access to capital is vital
to the

16 development or expansion of these smaller
community-based

17 businesses.

18 (2) It is the intent of the legislature to create
incentives to

p. 1 HB
1377

_1 increase access to capital by providing a tax credit to
businesses

_2 that make interest-free deposits into approved community

_3 development financial institutions that will use the
deposits to

_4 make reduced interest rate loans to qualified
community-based

_5 businesses.

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 82.04

_7 RCW to read as follows:

_8 (1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter,
a credit

_9 is allowed for each qualified deposit made by a person
or company

10 during the taxable year into a community development
financial

11 institution. The credit is equal to twenty-five percent
of each

12 qualified deposit and must be taken, in equal
installments, over

13 the calendar year each qualified deposit is made, plus
the four

14 subsequent consecutive years.

15 (2) No credit shall be allowed under this section
unless the

16 department of financial institutions certifies that the
deposit

17 described in this section qualifies for the credit under
this

18 section and certifies the total amount of the credit
allocated to

19 the person or company. The person or company must
provide

20 information on the proposed qualified deposit that
includes, but

21 is not limited to a description of terms and conditions
of the

22 deposit or equity investment.

23 (3)(a) If a qualified deposit is withdrawn before
the end of

24 the sixty-month period and not redeposited or reinvested
in

25 another community development financial institution
within thirty

26 days, the entire amount of the tax credit allowed under
this

27 section shall be due and payable to the department of
revenue

28 within thirty days of the withdrawal.

29 (b) If the qualified deposit is reduced before the
end of the

30 sixty-month period, but not below fifty thousand
dollars, the

31 amount of the tax credit attributed to the portion
withdrawn shall

32 be due and payable to the department of revenue within
thirty days

33 of the withdrawal.

34 (c) If the qualified deposit is reduced before the
end of the

35 sixty-month period, below fifty thousand dollars, the
entire

36 amount of the tax credit allowed under this section
shall be due

HB 1377 p. 2

_1 and payable to the department of revenue within thirty
days of the

_2 withdrawal.

_3 (4) The credit allowed under this section shall be
limited to

_4 the amount of tax imposed by this chapter. The
department of

_5 revenue shall not approve any qualified deposit that
causes the

_6 total credits allowed under this section and section 3
of this act

_7 to exceed two million dollars per calendar year.

_8 (5) This section applies only to qualified deposits
in

_9 community development financial institutions that are
approved by

10 the department of revenue after July 1, 2001.

11 (6) For the purposes of this section:

12 (a) "Community development financial
institution" means a

13 private financial institution located in the state of
Washington

14 that is certified by the department of financial
institutions,

15 that has community development as its primary mission,
and that

16 lends in a designated area in the state. A community
development

17 financial institution may include a community
development bank, a

18 community development loan fund, a community development
credit

19 union, a microenterprise fund, a community development
corporation-

20 based lender, and a community development venture fund;

21 (b) "Designated area" means:

22 (i) A community empowerment zone under chapter
43.31C RCW; or

23 (ii) A rural county under RCW 43.14.370; and

24 (c) "Qualified deposit" means a deposit
that does not earn

25 interest, or an equity investment, that is equal to or
greater

26 than fifty thousand dollars and is made for a minimum
duration of

27 sixty months.

28 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 48.14

29 RCW to read as follows:

30 (1) In computing the tax imposed by RCW 48.14.020, a
credit is

31 allowed for each qualified deposit made by a person or
company

32 during the taxable year into a community development
financial

33 institution. The credit is equal to twenty-five percent
of each

34 qualified deposit and must be taken, in equal
installments, over

35 the calendar year each qualified deposit is made, plus
the four

36 subsequent consecutive years.

37 (2) No credit shall be allowed under this section
unless the

p. 3 HB
1377

_1 department of financial institutions certifies that the
deposit

_2 described in this section qualifies for the credit under
this

_3 section and certifies the total amount of the credit
allocated to

_4 the person or company. The person or company must
provide

_5 information on the proposed qualified deposit that
includes, but

_6 is not limited to a description of terms and conditions
of the

_7 deposit or equity investment.

_8 (3)(a) If a qualified deposit is withdrawn before
the end of

_9 the sixty-month period and not redeposited or reinvested
in

10 another community development financial institution
within thirty

11 days, the entire amount of the tax credit allowed under
this

12 section shall be due and payable to the department of
revenue

13 within thirty days of the withdrawal.

14 (b) If the qualified deposit is reduced before the
end of the

15 sixty-month period, but not below fifty thousand
dollars, the

16 amount of the tax credit attributed to the portion
withdrawn shall

17 be due and payable to the department of revenue within
thirty days

18 of the withdrawal.

19 (c) If the qualified deposit is reduced before the
end of the

20 sixty-month period, below fifty thousand dollars, the
entire

21 amount of the tax credit allowed under this section
shall be due

22 and payable to the department of revenue within thirty
days of the

23 withdrawal.

24 (4) The credit allowed under this section shall be
limited to

25 the amount of tax imposed by this chapter. The
department of

26 revenue shall not approve any qualified deposit that
causes the

27 total credits allowed under this section and section 2
of this act

28 to exceed two million dollars per calendar year.

29 (5) This section applies only to qualified deposits
in

30 community development financial institutions that are
approved by

31 the department of revenue after July 1, 2001.

32 (6) For the purposes of this section:

33 (a) "Community development financial institution"
has the same

34 meaning as in section 2 of this act;

35 (b) "Designated area" has the same meaning
as in section 2 of

36 this act; and

37 (c) "Qualified deposit" has the same
meaning as in section 2 of

38 this act.

HB 1377 p. 4

_1

_2 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act expires July
1, 2005.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 HB
1377