BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that:

(a) Strong parental and
community involvement in schools is of vital importance to the state's efforts
to improve student learning;

(b) When parents are
involved in schools, student achievement improves, regardless of factors such
as socioeconomic status, ethnic or racial backgrounds, or the education level
of parents;

(c) When parents become
active partners in their children's education, grades and test scores increase,
attendance and graduation rates improve, and students complete homework more
consistently;

(d) In programs that
are designed to involve parents in full partnership with schools, student
achievement for disadvantaged students not only improves, but it can reach
levels that are standard for children from middle-income families, with students
who are the farthest behind making the greatest gains; and

(e) When schools and
communities work together, both are strengthened and make gains that outpace
those that each could accomplish on its own.

(2) The legislature
intends to help parents, schools, and communities form partnerships to help
improve student learning and strengthen the role of parents and the community
in the educational process.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The parental and
community involvement grant pilot program is established. The purposes of the
program include:

(a) Helping parents and
educators establish effective two-way communication;

(b) Helping parents and
educators devise ways to support each other's efforts to help children succeed
in school;

(c) Helping parents,
educators, and community members design and implement school volunteer programs
that provide volunteers with an opportunity to contribute to the educational process
in meaningful ways;

(d) Helping parents and
educators devise ways to involve parents in collaborative decision-making and
advocacy processes in a child's education; and

(e) Helping schools and
communities form partnerships to support children and their families.

(2) The parental and
community involvement grant pilot program shall be administered by the office
of the superintendent of public instruction, with the assistance of an advisory
committee that may include, but need not be limited to interested individuals
and representatives of parents and educational and community organizations.
When selecting schools and school districts for the pilots, the office shall
adhere to the following principles:

(a) The application
process shall be simple and shall use as its sole requirement of the applicant
a statement of commitment to participate in the program from a group of
parents, community members, and representatives of the school or school
district;

(b) Any reporting
requirements of the participants shall be as minimal as feasible and, to the
extent possible, shall be designed to permit applicants to provide information
in a simple, standardized format;

(c) School and
districts selected for participation shall, to the extent feasible, represent a
balance of some of the different characteristics of the state's public schools,
including geography, student demographics, urban and rural locations, and
district or school size;

(d) The office shall
give priority to elementary schools; and

(e) A local match of
thirty percent from an applicant school or district is encouraged; but the
match may be in the form of in-kind contributions from the school or district
or from private sources.

(3) One hundred schools
or school districts shall be selected to participate in the pilot program.

(4) Grants shall be
awarded solely to schools that do not have a paid coordinator for parent and
community involvement and do not have a program to recruit or coordinate the
efforts of parents and community members.

(5) The maximum state
grant is eight thousand dollars per school per year and sixteen thousand
dollars per school over the grant period.

(6) By September 2003,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the
governor and the education committees of the house of representatives and the
senate on the results of the program. The report shall include any
recommendations from the office of the superintendent of public instruction or
the participants for the expansion, continuation, modification, or elimination
of the program.

(7) This
section expires June 30, 2004.

---
END ---