BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds that
the occurrences of identity theft are increasing. The legislature also finds
that widespread use of the federally issued social security numbers has made
identity theft more likely to occur.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Institutions of
higher education shall not use students' social security numbers for
identification, except for the purposes of employment, financial aid, research,
assessment, accountability, transcripts, or as otherwise required by state or
federal law.

(2) Each institution of
higher education shall develop a system of personal identifiers for students to
be used for grading and other administrative purposes. The personal
identifiers may not be social security numbers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The institutions of
higher education, in conjunction with the higher education coordinating board
and the state board for community and technical colleges, shall submit a report
to the legislature by December 1, 2001, outlining the institution's personal
identifier system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act
takes effect July 1, 2002.

---
END ---