BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
80.50.020 and 1995 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) "Applicant" means any person who makes
application for a

_7 site certification pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter;

_8 (2) "Application" means any request for
approval of a

_9 particular site or sites filed in accordance with the
procedures

10 established pursuant to this chapter, unless the context
otherwise

11 requires;

12 (3) "Person" means an individual,
partnership, joint venture,

13 private or public corporation, association, firm, public
service

14 company, political subdivision, municipal corporation,
government

15 agency, public utility district, or any other entity,
public or

16 private, however organized;

17 (4) "Site" means any proposed or approved
location of an energy

18 facility;

p. 1 HB
1382

_1 (5) "Certification" means a binding
agreement between an

_2 applicant and the state which shall embody compliance to
the

_3 siting guidelines, in effect as of the date of
certification,

_4 which have been adopted pursuant to RCW 80.50.040 as now
or

_5 hereafter amended as conditions to be met prior to or
concurrent

_6 with the construction or operation of any energy
facility;

_7 (6) "Associated facilities" means storage,
transmission,

_8 handling, or other related and supporting facilities
connecting an

_9 energy plant with the existing energy supply,
processing, or

10 distribution system, including, but not limited to,

11 communications, controls, mobilizing or maintenance
equipment,

12 instrumentation, and other types of ancillary
transmission

13 equipment, off-line storage or venting required for
efficient

14 operation or safety of the transmission system and
overhead, and

15 surface or subsurface lines of physical access for the
inspection,

16 maintenance, and safe operations of the transmission
facility and

17 new transmission lines constructed to operate at nominal
voltages

18 in excess of 200,000 volts to connect a thermal power
plant to the

19 northwest power grid: PROVIDED, That common carrier
railroads or

20 motor vehicles shall not be included;

21 (7) "Transmission facility" means any of
the following together

22 with their associated facilities:

23 (a) Crude or refined petroleum or liquid petroleum
product

24 transmission pipeline of the following dimensions: A
pipeline

25 larger than six inches minimum inside diameter between
valves for

26 the transmission of these products with a total length
of at least

27 fifteen miles;

28 (b) Natural gas, synthetic fuel gas, or liquified
petroleum gas

29 transmission pipeline of the following dimensions: A
pipeline

30 larger than fourteen inches minimum inside diameter
between

31 valves, for the transmission of these products, with a
total

32 length of at least fifteen miles for the purpose of
delivering gas

33 to a distribution facility, except an interstate natural
gas

34 pipeline regulated by the United States federal power
commission;

35 (8) "Independent consultants" means those
persons who have no

36 financial interest in the applicant's proposals and who
are

37 retained by the council to evaluate the applicant's
proposals,

38 supporting studies, or to conduct additional studies;

HB 1382 p. 2

_1 (9) "Thermal power plant" means, for the
purpose of

_2 certification, any electrical generating facility using
any fuel,

_3 including nuclear materials, for distribution of
electricity by

_4 electric utilities;

_5 (10) "Energy facility" means an energy
plant or transmission

_6 facilities: PROVIDED, That the following are excluded
from the

_7 provisions of this chapter:

_8 (a) Facilities for the extraction, conversion,
transmission or

_9 storage of water, other than water specifically consumed
or

10 discharged by energy production or conversion for energy
purposes;

11 and

12 (b) Facilities operated by and for the armed services
for

13 military purposes or by other federal authority for the
national

14 defense;

15 (11) "Council" means the energy facility
site evaluation

16 council created by RCW 80.50.030;

17 (12) "Counsel for the environment" means
an assistant attorney

18 general or a special assistant attorney general who
shall

19 represent the public in accordance with RCW 80.50.080;

20 (13) "Construction" means on-site
improvements, excluding

21 exploratory work, which cost in excess of two hundred
fifty

22 thousand dollars;

23 (14) "Energy plant" means the following
facilities together

24 with their associated facilities:

25 (a) Any stationary thermal power plant with
generating capacity

26 of ((two hundred fifty)) one hundred
thousand kilowatts or more,

27 measured using maximum continuous electric generating
capacity,

28 less minimum auxiliary load, at average ambient
temperature and

29 pressure, and floating thermal power plants of fifty
thousand

30 kilowatts or more, including associated facilities;

31 (b) Facilities which will have the capacity to
receive

32 liquified natural gas in the equivalent of more than one
hundred

33 million standard cubic feet of natural gas per day,
which has been

34 transported over marine waters;

35 (c) Facilities which will have the capacity to
receive more

36 than an average of fifty thousand barrels per day of
crude or

37 refined petroleum or liquified petroleum gas which has
been or

p. 3 HB
1382

_1 will be transported over marine waters, except that the
provisions

_2 of this chapter shall not apply to storage facilities
unless

_3 occasioned by such new facility construction;

_4 (d) Any underground reservoir for receipt and
storage of

_5 natural gas as defined in RCW 80.40.010 capable of
delivering an

_6 average of more than one hundred million standard cubic
feet of

_7 natural gas per day; and

_8 (e) Facilities capable of processing more than
twenty-five

_9 thousand barrels per day of petroleum into refined
products;

10 (15) "Land use plan" means a comprehensive
plan or land use

11 element thereof adopted by a unit of local government
pursuant to

12 chapters 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW;

13 (16) "Zoning ordinance" means an ordinance
of a unit of local

14 government regulating the use of land and adopted
pursuant to

15 chapters 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW or Article XI of
the state

16 Constitution.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1382 p. 4