BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Administrator"s or "third party administrator" means a
person who directly or indirectly underwrites, collects charges or premiums, or
adjusts or settles claims, in connection with life, annuity, or health
insurance coverage offered by an insurer, except any of the following:

(a) An employer, or an
affiliate or subsidiary of an employer, on behalf of its employees or the
employees of one or more subsidiaries or affiliated corporations of such
employer;

(b) A union on behalf
of its members;

(c) An insurer which is
authorized to transact insurance in this state pursuant to chapter 48.05 RCW;

(d) An insurance
producer licensed to sell life, annuities, or health insurance in this state,
whose activities are limited exclusively to the sale of insurance;

(e) A creditor on
behalf of its debtors with respect to insurance covering a debt between the
creditor and its debtors;

(f) A trust and its
trustees, agents, and employees acting pursuant to such trust established in
conformity with 29 U.S.C. Sec. 186;

(g) A trust exempt from
taxation under section 501(a) of the internal revenue code, its trustees and
employees acting pursuant to such trust, or a custodian and the custodian's
agents or employees acting pursuant to a custodian account which meets the
requirements of section 401(f) of the internal revenue code;

(h) A credit union or a
financial institution which is subject to supervision or examination by federal
or state banking authorities, or a mortgage lender, to the extent they collect
and remit premiums to licensed insurance producers or to limited lines
producers or authorized insurers in connection with loan payments;

(i) A credit card
issuing company which advances for and collects insurance premiums or charges
from its credit card holders who have authorized collection;

(j) A person who
adjusts or settles claims in the normal course of that person's practice or
employment as an attorney at law and who does not collect charges or premiums
in connection with life, annuity, or health insurance coverage;

(k) An adjuster
licensed by this state whose activities are limited to adjustment of claims;

(l) A person who acts
solely as an administrator or trustee of one or more bona fide employee benefit
plans established by an employer or an employee organization, or both, for
which the insurance laws of this state are preempted pursuant to the employee
retirement income security act of 1974. Such a person shall comply with the
requirements of section 11(7) of this act;

(m) A person licensed
as a managing general agent in this state under chapter 48.98 RCW, whose
activities are limited exclusively to the scope of activities conveyed under
such a license; or

(n) An association or a
wholly owned subsidiary of an association whose sole business purpose is to be
the administrator of the association's life, annuity, or health insurance
coverage programs.

(2)
"Commissioner" means the Washington state insurance commissioner.

(3) "Generally
accepted accounting principles" means United States generally accepted
accounting principles, consistently applied.

(4) "Home
state" means the District of Columbia and any state or territory of the
United States in which an administrator is incorporated, or maintains its
principal place of business. If neither the state in which the administrator
is incorporated, nor the state in which it maintains its principal place of
business has adopted a substantially similar law governing administrators, the
administrator may declare another state, in which it conducts business, to be
its "home state."

(5)
"Insurance" or "insurance coverage" means any coverage
offered or provided by an insurer licensed in this state.

(6) "Insurance
producer" is any person who sells, solicits, or negotiates a contract of
insurance or is involved in an insurance transaction as defined in RCW
48.01.060.

(7) "Insurer"
means a person undertaking to provide life, annuity, or health insurance
coverage in this state. For the purposes of this chapter, insurer includes a
licensed insurance company, a prepaid hospital or medical care plan, a health
maintenance organization, a multiple employer welfare arrangement, a school
district or municipality providing a plan of insurance subject to state
insurance regulation, or any other person providing a plan of insurance subject
to state insurance regulation. "Insurer" does not include a bona
fide employee benefit plan established by an employer or an employee
organization, or both, for which the insurance laws of this state are preempted
pursuant to the employee retirement income security act of 1974.

(8)
"Negotiate" means the act of conferring directly with or offering
advice directly to a purchaser or prospective purchaser of a particular
contract of insurance concerning any of the substantive benefits, terms, or
conditions of the contract, provided that the person engaged in that act either
sells insurance or obtains insurance from insurers for purchasers.

(9) "Nonresident
administrator" means a person who is applying for licensure or is licensed
in any state other than the administrator's home state.

(10) "Person"
means an individual or a business entity.

(11) "Sell"
means to exchange a contract of insurance by any means, for money or its
equivalent, on behalf of an insurance company.

(12)
"Solicit" means attempting to sell insurance or asking or urging a
person to apply for a particular kind of insurance from a particular company.

(13)
"Underwrites" or "underwriting" includes, but is not
limited to, the acceptance of employer or individual applications for coverage
of individuals in accordance with the written rules of the insurer; the overall
planning and coordinating of an insurance program; and the ability to procure
bonds and excess insurance.

(14) "Uniform
nonresident application" means the current version of the national
association of insurance commissioners uniform nonresident application for
third party administrators.

(15) "Uniform
resident application" means the current version of the national
association of insurance commissioners uniform application for resident third
party administrators.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) No administrator
shall act as such without a written agreement between the administrator and the
insurer, and the written agreement shall be retained as part of the official
records of both the insurer and the administrator for the duration of the
agreement and for five years thereafter. The agreement shall contain all
provisions required by this chapter, except insofar as those requirements do
not apply to the functions performed by the administrator.

(2) The written
agreement shall include a statement of duties which the administrator is
expected to perform on behalf of the insurer and the lines, classes, or types
of insurance for which the administrator is to be authorized to administer.
The agreement shall make provision with respect to underwriting or other
standards pertaining to the business underwritten by the insurer.

(3) The insurer or
administrator may, with written notice, terminate the written agreement for
cause as provided in the agreement. The insurer may suspend the underwriting
authority of the administrator during the pendency of any dispute regarding the
cause for termination of the written agreement. The insurer shall fulfill any
lawful obligations with respect to policies affected by the written agreement,
regardless of any dispute between the insurer and the administrator.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. If an insurer utilizes
the services of an administrator, the payment to the administrator of any
premiums or charges for insurance by or on behalf of the insured party shall be
deemed to have been received by the insurer, and the payment of return premiums
or claim payments forwarded by the insurer to the administrator shall not be
deemed to have been paid to the insured party or claimant until such payments
are received by the insured party or claimant. Nothing in this section limits
any right of the insurer against the administrator resulting from the failure
of the administrator to make payments to the insurer, insured parties, or
claimants.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) Every administrator
shall maintain and make available to the insurer complete books and records of
all transactions performed on behalf of the insurer. The books and records
shall be maintained in accordance with prudent standards of insurance
recordkeeping and must be maintained for a period of not less than five years
from the date of their creation.

(2) The commissioner
shall have access to books and records maintained by an administrator for the
purposes of examination, audit, and inspection. Any documents, materials, or
other information in the possession or control of the commissioner that are
furnished by an administrator, insurer, insurance producer, or an employee or
agent thereof acting on behalf of the administrator, insurer, or insurance
producer, or obtained by the commissioner in an investigation shall be
confidential by law and privileged, shall not be subject to the records
inspection provisions of RCW 42.17.250 through 42.17.348, shall not be subject
to subpoena, and shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in
any private civil action. However, the commissioner is authorized to use such
documents, materials, or other information in the furtherance of any regulatory
or legal action brought as a part of the commissioner's official duties.

(3) Neither the
commissioner nor any person who received documents, materials, or other
information while acting under the authority of the commissioner shall be
permitted or required to testify in any private civil action concerning any
confidential documents, materials, or information subject to subsection (2) of
this section.

(4) In order to assist
in the performance of his or her duties, the commissioner:

(a) May share
documents, materials, or other information, including the confidential and
privileged documents, materials or information subject to subsection (2) of
this section, with other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies,
with the national association of insurance commissioners, its affiliates or
subsidiaries, and with state, federal, and international law enforcement
authorities, provided that the recipient agrees to maintain the confidentiality
and privileged status of the document, material, or other information;

(b) May receive
documents, materials, or information, including otherwise confidential and
privileged documents, materials, or information, from the national association
of insurance commissioners, its affiliates or subsidiaries, and from regulatory
and law enforcement officials of other foreign or domestic jurisdictions, and
shall maintain as confidential or privileged any document, material, or
information received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential
or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the
document, material, or information; and

(c) May enter into
agreements governing sharing and use of information consistent with this
subsection.

(5) No waiver of any
applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in the documents, materials,
or information shall occur as a result of disclosure to the commissioner under
this section or as a result of sharing as authorized in subsection (4) of this
section.

(6) Nothing in this
chapter prohibits the commissioner from releasing final, adjudicated actions
including for cause terminations that are open to public inspection pursuant to
chapter 42.17 RCW to a data base or other clearinghouse service maintained by
the national association of insurance commissioners, its affiliates, or
subsidiaries.

(7) The insurer shall
own the records generated by the administrator pertaining to the insurer.
However, the administrator shall retain the right to continuing access to books
and records to permit the administrator to fulfill all of its contractual
obligations to insured parties, claimants, and the insurer.

(8) In the event the
insurer and the administrator cancel their agreement, notwithstanding the
provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the administrator may, by written
agreement with the insurer, transfer all records to a new administrator rather
than retain them for five years. In such cases, the new administrator shall
acknowledge, in writing, that it is responsible for retaining the records of
the prior administrator as required in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. An administrator may use
only advertising pertaining to the business underwritten by an insurer that has
been approved in writing by the insurer in advance of its use.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) If an insurer
utilizes the services of an administrator, the insurer is responsible for
determining the benefits, premium rates, underwriting criteria, and claims
payment procedures applicable to the coverage and for securing reinsurance, if
any. The rules pertaining to these matters must be provided, in writing, by
the insurer to the administrator. The responsibilities of the administrator as
to any of these matters shall be set forth in the written agreement between the
administrator and the insurer.

(2) It is the sole
responsibility of the insurer to provide for competent administration of its
programs.

(3) In cases where an
administrator administers benefits for more than one hundred certificate
holders on behalf of an insurer, the insurer shall, at least semiannually,
conduct a review of the operations of the administrator. At least one such
review shall be an on-site audit of the operations of the administrator.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) All insurance charges
or premium collected by an administrator on behalf of or for an insurer or
insurers, and the return of premium received from that insurer or insurers,
shall be held by the administrator in a fiduciary capacity. The funds shall be
immediately remitted to the person or persons entitled to them or shall be
deposited promptly in a fiduciary account established and maintained by the
administrator in a federally or state insured financial institution. The
written agreement between the administrator and the insurer shall provide for
the administrator to periodically render an accounting to the insurer detailing
all transactions performed by the administrator pertaining to the business
underwritten by the insurer.

(2) If charges or
premium deposited in a fiduciary account have been collected on behalf of or
for one or more insurers, the administrator shall keep records clearly
recording the deposits in and withdrawals from the account on behalf of each
insurer. The administrator shall keep copies of all the records and, upon
request of an insurer, shall furnish the insurer with copies of the records
pertaining to the deposits and withdrawals.

(3) The administrator
shall not pay any claim by withdrawals from a fiduciary account in which
premium or charges are deposited. Withdrawals from the account shall be made
as provided in the written agreement between the administrator and the
insurer. The written agreement shall address, but not be limited to, the
following:

(a) Remittance to an
insurer entitled to remittance;

(b) Deposit in an
account maintained in the name of the insurer;

(c) Transfer to and
deposit in a claims-paying account, with claims to be paid as provided for in
subsection (4) of this section;

(d) Payment to a group
policyholder for remittance to the insurer entitled to such remittance;

(e) Payment to the
administrator of its commissions, fees, or charges; and

(f) Remittance of
return premium to the person or persons entitled to such return premium.

(4) All claims paid by
the administrator from funds collected on behalf of or for an insurer shall be
paid only on drafts or checks of and as authorized by the insurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) An administrator
shall not enter into an agreement or understanding with an insurer in which the
effect is to make the amount of the administrator's commissions, fees, or
charges contingent upon savings effected in the adjustment, settlement, and payment
of losses covered by the insurer's obligations. This provision shall not
prohibit an administrator from receiving performance-based compensation for
providing hospital or other auditing services.

(2) This section shall
not prevent the compensation of an administrator from being based on premiums
or charges collected or the number of claims paid or processed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) When the services of
an administrator are utilized, the administrator shall provide a written notice
approved by the insurer to covered individuals advising them of the identity
of, and relationship among, the administrator, the policyholder, and the
insurer.

(2) When an
administrator collects funds, the reason for collection of each item must be
identified to the insured party and each item must be shown separately from any
premium. Additional charges may not be made for services to the extent the
services have been paid for by the insurer.

(3) The administrator
shall disclose to the insurer all charges, fees, and commissions received from
all services in connection with the provision of administrative services for
the insurer, including any fees or commissions paid by insurers providing
reinsurance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Any policies,
certificates, booklets, termination notices, or other written communications
delivered by the insurer to the administrator for delivery to insured parties
or covered individuals shall be delivered by the administrator promptly after
receipt of instructions from the insurer to deliver them.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. (1) A person shall apply
to be an administrator in its home state, upon the uniform resident application
and shall receive a certificate of authority or license from the commissioner
of its home state, prior to performing any function of an administrator in this
state.

(2) The uniform
resident application shall include or be accompanied by the following
information and documents:

(a) All basic
organizational documents of the applicant, including any articles of
incorporation, articles of association, partnership agreement, trade name
certificate, trust agreement, shareholder agreement, and other applicable
documents and all amendments to such documents;

(b) The bylaws, rules,
regulations, or similar documents regulating the internal affairs of the
applicant;

(c) The names,
addresses, official positions, and professional qualifications of the
individuals who are responsible for the conduct of affairs of the applicant,
including all members of the board of directors, board of trustees, executive
committee, or other governing board or committee; the principal officers in the
case of a corporation or the partners or members in the case of a partnership,
association, or limited liability company; any shareholder or member holding
directly or indirectly ten percent or more of the voting stock, voting
securities, or voting interest of the applicant; and any other person who
exercises control or influence over the affairs of the applicant;

(d) Annual financial
statements or reports, certified by an officer of the applicant and prepared in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, for the two most
recent fiscal years which prove that the applicant has a positive net worth.
If the applicant has been in existence for less than two fiscal years, the
uniform resident application shall include financial statements or reports,
certified by an officer of the applicant and prepared in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, for any completed fiscal years, and
for any month during the current fiscal year for which such financial
statements or reports have been completed. The applicant shall also include
such other information as the commissioner may require in order to review the
current financial condition of the applicant;

(e) A statement
describing the business plan including information on staffing levels and
activities proposed in this state and nationwide. The plan must provide
details setting forth the applicant's capability for providing a sufficient
number of experienced and qualified personnel in the areas of claims
processing, recordkeeping, and underwriting; and

(f) Such other
pertinent information as may be required by the commissioner.

(3) An administrator
licensed or applying for licensure under this section shall make available for
inspection by the commissioner copies of all contracts with insurers or other
persons utilizing the services of the administrator.

(4) An administrator
licensed or applying for licensure under this section shall produce its
accounts, records, and files for examination, and make its officers available
to give information with respect to its affairs, as often as reasonably
required by the commissioner.

(5) The commissioner
may refuse to issue a certificate of authority or license if the commissioner
determines that the administrator, or any individual responsible for the
conduct of affairs of the administrator is not competent, trustworthy,
financially responsible, or of good personal and business reputation, or has
had an insurance or an administrator certificate of authority or license denied
or revoked for cause by any jurisdiction, or if the commissioner determines
that any of the grounds set forth in section 14 of this act exists with respect
to the administrator.

(6) A certificate of
authority or license issued under this section shall remain valid, unless
surrendered, suspended, or revoked by the commissioner, for so long as the
administrator remains in compliance with this chapter.

(7) A person is not
required to hold either a home state or nonresident certificate of authority or
license as an administrator in this state if the person exclusively provides
services to one or more bona fide employee benefit plans each of which is
established by an employer or an employee organization, or both, and for which
the insurance laws of this state are preempted pursuant to the employee
retirement income security act of 1974. These persons shall register with the
commissioner annually, verifying their status as herein described.

(8) An administrator
licensed or applying for licensure under this section shall immediately notify
the commissioner of any material change in its ownership, control, or other
fact or circumstance affecting its qualification for a certificate of authority
or license in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. (1) Unless an
administrator has obtained a home state certificate of authority or license in
this state under section 11 of this act, any administrator who performs
administrator duties in this state shall obtain a nonresident administrator
certificate of authority or license in accordance with this section by filing
with the commissioner the uniform nonresident application, accompanied by a
letter of certification. In lieu of requiring an administrator to file a
letter of certification with the uniform nonresident application, the
commissioner may verify the nonresident administrator's home state certificate
of authority or license status through an electronic data base maintained by
the national association of insurance commissioners, its affiliates, or
subsidiaries.

(2) An administrator
shall not be eligible for a nonresident administrator certificate of authority
or license under this section if it does not hold a certificate of authority as
a resident in a home state that has adopted this chapter or a substantially
similar law governing administrators.

(3) Except as provided
in subsections (2) and (8) of this section, the commissioner shall issue to the
administrator a nonresident administrator certificate of authority or license
promptly upon receipt of a complete application.

(4) Unless notified by
the commissioner that the commissioner is able to verify the nonresident
administrator's home state certificate of authority or license status through
an electronic data base maintained by the national association of insurance
commissioners, its affiliates, or subsidiaries, each nonresident administrator
shall annually file a statement that its home state administrator certificate
of authority or license remains in force and has not been revoked or suspended
by its home state during the preceding year.

(5) At the time of
filing the statement required under subsection (4) of this section or, if the
commissioner has notified the nonresident administrator that the commissioner
is able to verify the nonresident administrator's home state certificate of
authority or license status through an electronic data base, on an annual date
determined by the commissioner, the nonresident administrator shall pay a
filing fee as required by the commissioner.

(6) An administrator
licensed or applying for licensure under this section shall produce its accounts,
records, and files for examination, and make its officers available to give
information with respect to its affairs, as often as reasonably required by the
commissioner.

(7) A nonresident
administrator is not required to hold a nonresident administrator certificate
of authority or license in this state if the administrator's duties in this
state are limited to the administration of a group policy or plan of insurance
and the lesser of five percent or one hundred certificate holders under the group
policy or plan of insurance reside in this state.

(8) The commissioner
may refuse to issue a nonresident administrator certificate of authority or
license, or delay the issuance of a nonresident administrator certificate of
authority or license, if the commissioner determines that, due to events or
information obtained subsequent to the home state's licensure of the
administrator, the nonresident administrator cannot satisfy the requirements of
this chapter, or that grounds exist for the home state's revocation or
suspension of the administrator's home state certificate of authority or
license. In such an event, the commissioner shall give written notice of its
determination to the commissioner of the home state, and the commissioner may
delay the issuance of a nonresident administrator certificate of authority to
the nonresident administrator until such time, if at all, the commissioner
determines that the administrator can satisfy the requirements of this chapter
and that no grounds exist for the home state's revocation or suspension of the
administrator's home state certificate of authority or license.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. (1) Each administrator
licensed under section 11 of this act shall file an annual report for the preceding
calendar year with the commissioner on or before July 1st of each year, or
within such extension of time therefor as the commissioner for good cause may
grant. The report shall be in the form and contain such matters as the
commissioner prescribes and shall be verified by at least two officers of the
administrator.

(2) The annual report
shall include the complete names and addresses of all insurers with which the
administrator had an agreement during the preceding fiscal year.

(3) At the time of filing
its annual report, the administrator shall pay a filing fee as required by the
commissioner.

(4) The commissioner
shall review the most recently filed annual report of each administrator, on or
before September 1st of each year. Upon completion of its review, the
commissioner shall either:

(a) Issue a
certification to the administrator that the annual report shows that the
administrator is solvent and in compliance with existing law, or noting any
deficiencies found in such annual report; or

(b) Update any
electronic data base maintained by the national association of insurance
commissioners, its affiliates, or subsidiaries, indicating that the annual
report shows that the administrator is solvent and in compliance with existing
law, or noting any deficiencies found in such annual report.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. (1) The certificate of
authority or license of an administrator shall be denied, suspended, or revoked
if the commissioner finds that the administrator:

(a) Is in an unsound
financial condition;

(b) Is using such
methods or practices in the conduct of its business so as to render its further
transaction of business in this state hazardous or injurious to insured persons
or the public; or

(c) Has failed to pay any
judgment rendered against it in this state within sixty days after the judgment
has become final.

(2) The commissioner
may, in his or her discretion, deny, suspend, or revoke the certificate of
authority or license of an administrator if the commissioner finds that the
administrator:

(a) Has violated any
lawful rule or order of the commissioner or any provision of the insurance laws
of this state;

(b) Has refused to be
examined or to produce its accounts, records, and files for examination, or if
any of its officers has refused to give information with respect to its affairs
or has refused to perform any other legal obligation as to an examination, when
required by the commissioner;

(c) Has, without just
cause, refused to pay proper claims or perform services arising under its
contracts or has, without just cause, caused covered individuals to accept less
than the amount due them or caused covered individuals to employ attorneys or
bring suit against the administrator to secure full payment or settlement of
such claims;

(d) At any time fails
to meet any qualification for which issuance of the certificate could have been
refused had such failure then existed and been known to the commissioner;

(e) Has had any of its
principal directors or officers convicted of, or has entered a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere to, a felony without regard to whether adjudication was
withheld;

(f) Is under suspension
or revocation in another state; or

(g) Has failed to
timely file its annual report pursuant to section 13 of this act, if a resident
administrator, or its statement and filing fee, as applicable, pursuant to
section 12 (4) and (5) of this act, if a nonresident administrator.

(3) The commissioner may,
in his or her discretion and without advance notice or hearing, immediately
suspend the certificate of authority or license of an administrator if the
commissioner finds that one or more of the following circumstances exist:

(a) The administrator
is insolvent or impaired;

(b) A proceeding for
receivership, conservatorship, rehabilitation, or other delinquency proceeding
regarding the administrator has been commenced in any state; or

(c) The financial
condition or business practices of the administrator otherwise pose an imminent
threat to the public health, safety, or welfare of the residents of this state.

(4) If the commissioner
finds that one or more grounds exist for the suspension or revocation of a
certificate of authority or license issued under this section, the commissioner
may, in lieu of suspension or revocation, impose a fine upon the administrator.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. Sections 1 through 14 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

---
END ---