BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
35.57.010 and 1999 c 165 s 1 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) The legislative authority of any town or city
located in a

_8 county with a population of less than one million may
create a

_9 public facilities district. The legislative authorities
of any

10 contiguous group of towns or cities located in a county
or

11 counties each with a population of less than one million
may enter

12 an agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW for the creation
and joint

13 operation of a public facilities district. The
legislative

14 authority of any town or city, or any contiguous
group of towns or

15 cities, located in a county with a population of less
than one

16 million and the legislative authority of the county
or counties in

17 which the towns or cities are located may enter into
an agreement

18 under chapter 39.34 RCW for the creation and joint
operation of a

p. 1 HB
1387

_1 public facilities district.

_2 (2) A public facilities district shall be
coextensive with the

_3 boundaries of the city or town or contiguous group of
cities or

_4 towns that created the district. A public facilities
district

_5 created by an agreement between a town or city, or a
contiguous

_6 group of towns or cities, and the county in which
they are located

_7 shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the towns
or cities,

_8 and the boundaries of the county or counties as to
the

_9 unincorporated areas of the county or counties. The
boundaries

10 shall not include incorporated towns or cities that
are not

11 parties to the agreement for the creation and joint
operation of

12 the district.

13 (3)(a) A public facilities district created by a
single city or

14 town shall be governed by a board of directors
consisting of five

15 members selected as follows: (i) Two members appointed
by the

16 legislative authority of the city or town; and (ii)
three members

17 appointed by legislative authority based on
recommendations from

18 local organizations. The members appointed under (a)(i)
of this

19 subsection, shall not be members of the legislative
authority of

20 the city or town. The members appointed under (a)(ii)
of this

21 subsection, shall be based on recommendations received
from local

22 organizations that may include, but are not limited to
the local

23 chamber of commerce, local economic development council,
and local

24 labor council. The members shall serve four-year
terms. Of the

25 initial members, one must be appointed for a one-year
term, one

26 must be appointed for a two-year term, one must be
appointed for a

27 three-year term, and the remainder must be appointed for
four-year

28 terms.

29 (b) A public facilities district created by (([a]))
a

30 contiguous group of cities and towns shall be governed
by a board

31 of directors consisting of seven members selected as
follows: (i)

32 Three members appointed by the legislative authorities
of the

33 cities and towns; and (ii) four members appointed by the

34 legislative authority based on recommendations from
local

35 organizations. The members appointed under (b)(i) of
this

36 subsection shall not be members of the legislative
authorities of

37 the cities and towns. The members appointed under
(b)(ii) of this

38 subsection, shall be based on recommendations received
from local

HB 1387 p. 2

_1 organizations that include, but are not limited to the
local

_2 chamber of commerce, local economic development council,
local

_3 labor council, and a neighborhood organization that is directly

_4 affected by the location of the regional center in their
area. The

_5 members of the board of directors shall be appointed in
accordance

_6 with the terms of the agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW
for the

_7 joint operation of the district and shall serve
four-year terms. Of

_8 the initial members, one must be appointed for a one-
year term,

_9 one must be appointed for a two-year term, one must be
appointed

10 for a three-year term, and the remainder must be
appointed for

11 four-year terms.

12 (c) A public facilities district created by a
town or city, or

13 a contiguous group of towns or cities, and the county
or counties

14 in which they are located shall be governed by a
board of

15 directors consisting of seven members selected as
follows: (i)

16 Three members appointed by the legislative
authorities of the

17 cities, towns, and county; and (ii) four members
appointed by the

18 legislative authority based on recommendations from
local

19 organizations. The members appointed under (c)(i) of
this

20 subsection shall not be members of the legislative
authorities of

21 the cities, towns, or county. The members appointed
under (c)(ii)

22 of this subsection shall be based on recommendations
received from

23 local organizations that include, but are not limited
to, the

24 local chamber of commerce, local economic development
council,

25 local labor council, and a neighborhood organization
that is

26 directly affected by the location of the regional
center in their

27 area. The members of the board of directors shall be
appointed in

28 accordance with the terms of the agreement under
chapter 39.34 RCW

29 for the joint operation of the district and shall
serve four-year

30 terms. Of the initial members, one must be appointed
for a one-year

31 term, one must be appointed for a two-year term, one
must be

32 appointed for a three-year term, and the remainder
must be

33 appointed for four-year terms.

34 (4) A public facilities district is a municipal
corporation, an

35 independent taxing "authority" within the
meaning of Article VII,

36 section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing
district"

37 within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the
state

38 Constitution.

p. 3 HB
1387

_1 (5) A public facilities district shall constitute a
body

_2 corporate and shall possess all the usual powers of a
corporation

_3 for public purposes as well as all other powers that may
now or

_4 hereafter be specifically conferred by statute,
including, but not

_5 limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff, and
services,

_6 to enter into contracts, and to sue and be sued.

_7 (6) A public facilities district may acquire and
transfer real

_8 and personal property by lease, sublease, purchase, or
sale. No

_9 direct or collateral attack on any ((metropolitan))
public

10 facilities district purported to be authorized or
created in

11 conformance with this chapter may be commenced more than
thirty

12 days after creation by the city and/or county
legislative

13 authority.

14 Sec. 2. RCW
35.57.020 and 1999 c 165 s 2 are each amended to read

15 as follows:

16 (1) A public facilities district is authorized to
acquire,

17 construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip,
repair,

18 finance, and operate one or more regional centers. For
purposes of

19 this chapter, "regional center" means a
convention, conference, or

20 special events center, or any combination of facilities,
and

21 related parking facilities, serving a regional population

22 constructed, improved, or rehabilitated after July 25,
1999, at a

23 cost of at least ten million dollars, including debt
service. A

24 "special events center" is a facility or
combination of

25 facilities, the primary purpose of which is the presentation
of

26 events, activities, performances, or exhibits for the
enjoyment of

27 the general public. "Regional center"
also includes an existing

28 convention, conference, or special events center, and
related

29 parking facilities, serving a regional population, that
is

30 improved or rehabilitated after July 25, 1999, where the
costs of

31 improvement or rehabilitation are at least ten million
dollars,

32 including debt service. A regional center is
conclusively presumed

33 to serve a regional population if state and local
government

34 investment in the construction, improvement, or
rehabilitation of

35 the regional center is equal to or greater than ten
million

36 dollars.

HB 1387 p. 4

_1 (2) A public facilities district may impose charges
and fees

_2 for the use of its facilities, and may accept and expend
or use

_3 gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of a
regional center.

_4 (3) A public facilities district may impose charges,
fees, and

_5 taxes authorized in RCW 35.57.040, and use revenues
derived

_6 therefrom for the purpose of paying principal and
interest

_7 payments on bonds issued by the public facilities
district to

_8 construct a regional center.

_9 (4) Notwithstanding the establishment of a career,
civil, or

10 merit service system, a public facilities district may
contract

11 with a public or private entity for the operation or
management of

12 its public facilities.

13 (5) A public facilities district is authorized to
use the

14 supplemental alternative public works contracting
procedures set

15 forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the
design,

16 construction, reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of
any

17 regional center.

18 Sec. 3. RCW 82.14.390
and 1999 c 165 s 13 are each amended to read

19 as follows:

20 (1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this
section, the

21 governing body of a public facilities district created
under

22 chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences construction
of a new

23 regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation of an
existing

24 new regional center, before January 1, ((2003)) 2004,
may impose a

25 sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this
chapter. The

26 tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and
shall be

27 collected from those persons who are taxable by the
state under

28 chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable

29 event within the public facilities district. The rate
of tax shall

30 not exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the
case of a

31 sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a
use tax.

32 (2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this
section shall

33 be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to
be

34 collected or paid over to the department of revenue
under chapter

35 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the

36 collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no
cost to the

37 public facilities district.

p. 5 HB
1387

_1 (3) No tax may be collected under this section
before August 1,

_2 2000. The tax imposed in this section shall expire when
the bonds

_3 issued for the construction of the regional center and
related

_4 parking facilities are retired, but not more than
twenty-five

_5 years after the tax is first collected.

_6 (4) Moneys collected under this section shall only
be used for

_7 the purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be
matched with

_8 an amount from other public or private sources equal to
thirty-

_9 three percent of the amount collected under this
section, provided

10 that amounts generated from nonvoter approved taxes
authorized

11 under chapter 35.57 RCW or nonvoter approved taxes
authorized

12 under chapter 36.100 RCW shall not constitute a public
or private

13 source. For the purpose of this section, public or
private sources

14 includes, but is not limited to cash or in-kind
contributions used

15 in all phases of the development or improvement of the
regional

16 center, land that is donated and used for the siting of
the

17 regional center, cash or in-kind contributions from
public or

18 private foundations, or amounts attributed to private
sector

19 partners as part of a public and private partnership
agreement

20 negotiated by the public facilities district.

21 (5) The combined total tax levied under this section
shall not

22 be greater than 0.033 percent. If both a public
facilities district

23 created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public facilities
district

24 created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this
section,

25 the tax imposed by a public facilities district created
under

26 chapter 35.57 RCW shall be credited against the tax
imposed by a

27 public facilities district created under chapter 36.100
RCW.

28 (6) A public facilities district created under
chapter 36.100

29 RCW is not eligible to impose the tax under this section
if the

30 legislative authority of the county where the public
facilities

31 district is located has imposed a sales and use tax
under RCW

32 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

33 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is
added to chapter 36.100

34 RCW to read as follows:

35 (1) A public facilities district may apply for
deferral of

36 taxes on site preparation, construction of buildings or
other

37 structures, and acquisition of related machinery and
equipment,

HB 1387 p. 6

_1 for a regional center. Application shall be made to the
department

_2 of revenue in a form and manner prescribed by the
department of

_3 revenue. The application shall contain information
regarding the

_4 location of the regional center, estimated or actual
costs, time

_5 schedules for completion and operation, and other
information

_6 required by the department of revenue. The department
of revenue

_7 shall approve the application within sixty days if it
meets the

_8 requirements of this section.

_9 (2) The department of revenue shall issue a sales
and use tax

10 deferral certificate for state and local sales and use
taxes due

11 under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on the public

12 facility. The use of the certificate shall be governed
by rules

13 established by the department of revenue.

14 (3) The public facilities district shall begin
paying the

15 deferred taxes in the fifth year after the date
certified by the

16 department of revenue as the date on which the regional
center is

17 operationally complete. The first payment is due on
December 31st

18 of the fifth calendar year after such certified date,
with

19 subsequent annual payments due on December 31st of the
following

20 nine years. Each payment shall equal ten percent of the
deferred

21 tax.

22 (4) The department of revenue may authorize an
accelerated

23 repayment schedule upon request of the public facilities
district.

24 (5) Interest shall not be charged on any taxes
deferred under

25 this section for the period of deferral, although all
other

26 penalties and interest applicable to delinquent excise
taxes may

27 be assessed and imposed for delinquent payments under
this

28 section. The debt for deferred taxes is not
extinguished by

29 insolvency or other failure of the public facilities
district.

30 (6) Applications and any other information received
by the

31 department of revenue under this section are not
confidential and

32 are subject to disclosure. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to
the

33 administration of this section.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 7 HB
1387