BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that good teachers are the foundation of the state's education system.
Effective teachers are essential if students are to achieve the state's high
academic standards. In fact, recent studies have shown that the most important
factor in student achievement is effective teaching. The legislature also
finds that teachers who have obtained certification from the national board for
professional teaching standards have proven that they have the knowledge and
skills necessary to increase student achievement. Since the board's
certification process is the most rigorous process in the teaching profession,
these excellent teachers have earned state recognition as well.

Research has shown that
teachers with national board certification possess the characteristics of
expert teaching that have emerged from the body of research on teaching and
learning. To a far greater extent than noncertificated teachers, these
teachers possess pedagogical content knowledge that is flexibly and
innovatively employed in instruction. They are also more able than
noncertificated teachers to improvise and alter instruction in response to
student needs and they understand at a deeper level the reasons for student
success and failure on any given academic task. In addition, these expert
teachers are able to provide developmentally appropriate tasks that engage,
challenge, and intrigue students but that do not bore or overwhelm them, and
they are able to anticipate and plan for difficulties and can improvise when
things do not run smoothly. The evaluation of student responses to teacher
assignments provides compelling and consistent evidence that the learning
experiences of students who are taught by nationally certificated teachers
differ in profound and important ways from the experiences of students taught
by less proficient teachers.

The legislature further
finds that the dedicated and talented teachers who have obtained national board
certification are an important resource for children and for other teachers.
Nationally certified teachers who mentor beginning teachers and other interested
colleagues could accelerate the rate at which those teachers become good and
great educators. Yet, a sample of forty teachers certificated by the national
board found that, with rare exceptions, those teachers had not noticed an
increase in the use of their expertise by their school or district since the
teachers had obtained certification.

Therefore, the
legislature intends to provide recognition awards to teachers who have obtained
national certification. The legislature further intends that the amount of
these awards be continued for the duration of the certification and that those
recipients who are selected to mentor their colleagues while continuing to
teach children in the public schools receive an additional stipend for their
mentoring duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.405 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to funding
provided for this specific purpose, the superintendent of public instruction
may provide the following types of recognition to Washington's public school
teachers who have attained certification from the national board for
professional teaching standards:

(1) Beginning with the
2001-02 school year, for the duration of the national certification, a five
thousand dollar annual salary bonus which shall be paid in a lump sum and shall
not be included in the definition of "earnable compensation" under
RCW 41.32.010(10); and

(2) For the duration of
the national certification, a five thousand dollar supplemental contract in any
year in which a teacher is selected by his or her school district to mentor
other teachers while continuing to teach in the classroom. The money shall not
be included in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW
41.32.010(10). However, the funds in this section may not be used to provide
mentor stipends to more than one teacher for every three hundred full-time
equivalent students in a school.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.405 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By August 1, 2004,
and periodically thereafter, the Washington professional educator standards
board shall review the national board certification standards to determine
whether the standards are sufficiently rigorous and aligned to student
achievement. The board shall also determine whether additional requirements
are needed to ensure that the national standards meet the needs of Washington's
students.

(2) By October 15,
2010, the Washington professional educator standards board shall report to the
appropriate house of representatives and senate committees on the results and
accomplishments of the salary bonuses and supplemental contracts. The report
may include recommendations for the continuation, modification, or elimination
of the bonuses and contracts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of
this act expire July 1, 2012.

---
END ---