BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.36.383 and 1999 c
358 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in RCW
84.36.381 through 84.36.389, except where the context clearly indicates a
different meaning:

(1) The term
"residence" means a single family dwelling unit whether such unit be
separate or part of a multiunit dwelling, including the land on which such
dwelling stands not to exceed one acre. The term shall also include a share
ownership in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership if
the person claiming exemption can establish that his or her share represents
the specific unit or portion of such structure in which he or she resides. The
term shall also include a single family dwelling situated upon lands the fee of
which is vested in the United States or any instrumentality thereof including
an Indian tribe or in the state of Washington, and notwithstanding the provisions
of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a residence shall be deemed real property.

(2) The term "real
property" shall also include a mobile home which has substantially lost
its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being fixed in location upon land
owned or leased by the owner of the mobile home and placed on a foundation
(posts or blocks) with fixed pipe, connections with sewer, water, or other
utilities. A mobile home located on land leased by the owner of the mobile
home is subject, for tax billing, payment, and collection purposes, only to the
personal property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.

(3)
"Department" means the state department of revenue.

(4) "Combined
disposable income" means the disposable income of the person claiming the
exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her spouse, and the disposable
income of each cotenant occupying the residence for the assessment year, less
amounts paid by the person claiming the exemption or his or her spouse during
the assessment year for:

(a) Drugs supplied by
prescription of a medical practitioner authorized by the laws of this state or
another jurisdiction to issue prescriptions; and

(b) The treatment or
care of either person received in the home or in a nursing home.

(5) "Disposable
income" means adjusted gross income as defined in the federal internal
revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989, or such subsequent date as
the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose of this section, plus
all of the following items to the extent they are not included in or have been
deducted from adjusted gross income:

(a) Capital gains,
other than gain excluded from income under section 121 of the federal internal
revenue code to the extent it is reinvested in a new principal residence;

(b) ((Amounts
deducted for loss;

(c))) Amounts deducted for depreciation;

(((d))) (c)
Pension and annuity receipts;

(((e))) (d)
Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(((f))) (e)
Veterans benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(((g))) (f)
Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;

(((h))) (g)
Dividend receipts; and

(((i))) (h)
Interest received on state and municipal bonds.

(6)
"Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming the
exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act
applies to taxes levied for collection in 2002 and thereafter.

---
END ---