BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that projects that remove impediments to fish passage can greatly
increase access to spawning and rearing habitat for depressed, threatened, and
endangered fish stocks. Although counties are authorized to use county road
funds to replace culverts and other barriers to fish passage, and may conduct
streambed and stream bank restoration and stabilization work in conjunction
with removal of these fish barriers, counties are reluctant to spend county
road funds beyond the county right-of-way because it is unclear whether the use
of road funds for this purpose is authorized. The purpose of this act is to
clarify that streambed and stream bank restoration and stabilization activities
conducted in conjunction with removal of barriers to fish passage constitute a
county road purpose even if this work extends beyond the county right-of-way.
The legislature intends this act to be permissive legislation. Nothing in this
act is intended to create or impose a legal duty upon counties for salmon
recovery work beyond the county right-of-way.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.79.140 and 1997 c
81 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

At the time the board
reviews the six-year program of each county each even-numbered year, it shall
consider and shall approve for inclusion in its recommended budget, as required
by RCW 36.79.130, the portion of the rural arterial construction program
scheduled to be performed during the biennial period beginning the following
July 1st. Subject to the appropriations actually approved by the legislature,
the board shall as soon as feasible approve rural arterial trust account funds
to be spent during the ensuing biennium for preliminary proposals in priority
sequence as established pursuant to RCW 36.79.090. Only those counties that
during the preceding twelve months have spent all revenues collected for road
purposes only for such purposes, including removal of barriers to fish
passage and accompanying streambed and stream bank repair as specified in RCW
36.82.070, and including traffic law enforcement, as are allowed to the
state by Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution are eligible to
receive funds from the rural arterial trust account: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That
counties with a population of less than eight thousand are exempt from this
eligibility restriction: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That counties expending
revenues collected for road purposes only on other governmental services after
authorization from the voters of that county under RCW 84.55.050 are also
exempt from this eligibility restriction. The board shall authorize rural
arterial trust account funds for the construction project portion of a project
previously authorized for a preliminary proposal in the sequence in which the
preliminary proposal has been completed and the construction project is to be
placed under contract. At such time the board may reserve rural arterial trust
account funds for expenditure in future years as may be necessary for
completion of preliminary proposals and construction projects to be commenced
in the ensuing biennium.

The board may, within
the constraints of available rural arterial trust funds, consider additional
projects for authorization upon a clear and conclusive showing by the
submitting county that the proposed project is of an emergent nature and that
its need was unable to be anticipated at the time the six-year program of the
county was developed. The proposed projects shall be evaluated on the basis of
the priority rating factors specified in RCW 36.79.080.

Sec. 3. RCW 36.82.070 and 1997 c
189 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any money
paid to any county road fund may be used for the construction, alteration,
repair, improvement, or maintenance of county roads and bridges thereon and for
wharves necessary for ferriage of motor vehicle traffic, and for ferries, and
for the acquiring, operating, and maintaining of machinery, equipment,
quarries, or pits for the extraction of materials, and for the cost of
establishing county roads, acquiring rights-of-way therefor, and
expenses for the operation of the county engineering office, and for any of the
following programs when directly related to county road purposes: (1)
Insurance; (2) self-insurance programs; and (3) risk management programs; and
for any other proper county road purpose. Such expenditure may be made either
independently or in conjunction with the state or any city, town, or tax
district within the county. County road purposes also include the removal
of barriers to fish passage related to county roads, and include but are not
limited to the following activities associated with the removal of these
barriers: Engineering and technical services; stream bank stabilization;
streambed restoration; the placement of weirs, rock, or woody debris; planting;
and channel modification. County road funds may be used beyond the county
right-of-way for activities associated with removal of fish barriers if the
culvert or other fish barrier caused the denigration of the stream bank or
streambed beyond the county right-of-way. The use of county road funds beyond
the county right-of-way for activities associated with the removal of fish
barriers is permissive, and wholly within the discretion of the county
legislative authority. The use of county road funds beyond the county right-of-way
for such activities does not create or impose a legal duty upon a county for
salmon recovery work beyond the county right-of-way.

---
END ---