BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.58.065 and 1989 c
380 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In submitting data
required by this chapter, the applicant may:

(a) Mark clearly any
portions which in the applicant's opinion are trade secrets or commercial or
financial information; and

(b) Submit such marked
material separately from other material required to be submitted under this
chapter.

(2) Except as
provided in subsection (4) of this section and notwithstanding any other
provision of this chapter or other law, the director shall not make public
information which in the director's judgment should be privileged or
confidential because it contains or relates to trade secrets or commercial or
financial information except that, when necessary to carry out the provisions
of this chapter, information relating to unpublished formulas of products acquired
by authorization of this chapter may be revealed to any state or federal agency
consulted and may be revealed at a public hearing or in findings of fact issued
by the director when necessary under this chapter.

(3) If the director
proposes to release for inspection information which the applicant or
registrant believes to be protected from disclosure under subsection (2) of
this section, the director shall notify the applicant or registrant in writing,
by certified mail. The director shall not thereafter make available for
inspection such data until thirty days after receipt of the notice by the
applicant or registrant. During this period, the applicant or registrant may
institute an action in the superior court of Thurston county for a declaratory judgment
as to whether such information is subject to protection under subsection (2) of
this section.

(4) No agency or
entity of state government and no unit of local government or agency of such a
local government may purchase or otherwise acquire directly or indirectly a
pesticide for an aerial application of the pesticide to any part of an
incorporated area within this state unless the formula of the product to be
used, including both active and inert ingredients, is available for public
inspection and the person for whom the pesticide is registered voluntarily
agrees to disclose the formula to the public for the purpose of the aerial
application. No agency or entity of state government and no unit of local
government or agency of such a local government may make directly or indirectly
an aerial application of a pesticide to any part of an incorporated area within
this state unless the formula of the product to be used, including both active
and inert ingredients, is available for public inspection and the person for
whom the pesticide is registered voluntarily agrees to disclose the formula to
the public for the purpose of the aerial application.

The disclosure of
information to the public required by this subsection shall be made, as a
minimum, by providing the formula to any person who requests it. The
information shall be made available for disclosure beginning not more than five
days after the purchase or acquisition of the pesticide for such an aerial
application and in no case less than twenty days before the aerial application
is to be made.

For the purposes of
this subsection, an "aerial application" of a pesticide is one in
which an aircraft is used to make the application.

(5) Subsections (2)
and (3) of this section do not apply to disclosures voluntarily agreed to under
subsection (4) of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 15.58.060 and 1989 c
380 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The applicant for
registration shall file a statement with the department which shall include:

(a) The name and
address of the applicant and the name and address of the person whose name will
appear on the label, if other than the applicant's;

(b) The name of the
pesticide;

(c) The complete
formula of the pesticide, including the active and inert ingredients:
PROVIDED, That, except as provided in RCW 15.58.065(4), confidential
business information of a proprietary nature is not made available to any other
person and is exempt from disclosure as a public record, as provided by RCW
42.17.260;

(d) Other necessary
information required for completion of the department's application for
registration form; and

(e) A complete copy of
the labeling accompanying the pesticide and a statement of all claims to be
made for it, including the directions and precautions for use.

(2) The director may
require a full description of the tests made and the results thereof upon which
the claims are based.

(3) The director may
prescribe other necessary information by rule.

Sec. 3. RCW 15.58.150 and 2000 c
96 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for
any person to distribute within the state or deliver for transportation or
transport in intrastate commerce or between points within this state through
any point outside this state any of the following:

(a) Any pesticide which
has not been registered pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(b) Any pesticide if
any of the claims made for it or any of the directions for its use or other
labeling differs from the representations made in connection with its
registration, or if the composition of a pesticide differs from its composition
as represented in connection with its registration: PROVIDED, That at the
discretion of the director, a change in the labeling or formula of a pesticide
may be made within a registration period without requiring reregistration of
the product;

(c) Any pesticide
unless it is in the registrant's or the manufacturer's unbroken immediate
container and there is affixed to such container, and to the outside container
or wrapper of the retail package, if there is one through which the required
information on the immediate container cannot be clearly read, a label bearing
the information required in this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter;

(d) Any pesticide
including arsenicals, fluorides, fluosilicates, and/or any other white powdered
pesticides unless they have been distinctly denatured as to color, taste, odor,
or form if so required by rule;

(e) Any pesticide which
is adulterated or misbranded, or any device which is misbranded;

(f) Any pesticide in
containers, violating rules adopted pursuant to RCW 15.58.040(2)(f) or
pesticides found in containers which are unsafe due to damage.

(2) It shall be
unlawful:

(a) To sell or deliver
any pesticide to any person who is required by law or rules promulgated under
such law to be certified, licensed, or have a permit to use or purchase the
pesticide unless such person or the person's agent, to whom sale or delivery is
made, has a valid certification, license, or permit to use or purchase the kind
and quantity of such pesticide sold or delivered: PROVIDED, That, subject to
conditions established by the director, such permit may be obtained immediately
prior to sale or delivery from any person designated by the director;

(b) For any person to
detach, alter, deface or destroy, wholly or in part, any label or labeling
provided for in this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, or to add any
substance to, or take any substance from, a pesticide in a manner that may
defeat the purpose of this chapter or the rules adopted thereunder;

(c) For any person to
use or cause to be used any pesticide contrary to label directions or to
regulations of the director if those regulations differ from or further
restrict the label directions: PROVIDED, The compliance to the term
"contrary to label directions" is enforced by the director consistent
with the intent of this chapter;

(d) For any person to
use for his or her own advantage or to reveal, other than to the director or
proper officials or employees of the state, or to the courts of the state in
response to a subpoena, or to physicians, or in emergencies to pharmacists and
other qualified persons for use in the preparation of antidotes, or as
provided in RCW 15.58.065(4), any information relative to formulas of
products acquired by authority of RCW 15.58.060;

(e) For any person to
make false, misleading, or erroneous statements or reports concerning any pest
during or after a pest inspection or to fail to comply with criteria
established by rule for structural pest inspections;

(f) For any person to
make false, misleading, or erroneous statements or reports in connection with
any pesticide complaint or investigation;

(g) For
any person to advertise that the person is a licensed structural pest inspector
without having a valid pest control consultant license in the category of
structural pest inspector.

---
END ---