BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.390 and 2000 c
28 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The court may impose a
sentence outside the standard sentence range for an offense if it finds,
considering the purpose of this chapter, that there are substantial and
compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence. Whenever a sentence
outside the standard sentence range is imposed, the court shall set forth the
reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions of law. A
sentence outside the standard sentence range shall be a determinate sentence.

If the sentencing court
finds that an exceptional sentence outside the standard sentence range should
be imposed, the sentence is subject to review only as provided for in RCW
9.94A.210(4).

A departure from the
standards in RCW 9.94A.400 (1) and (2) governing whether sentences are to be
served consecutively or concurrently is an exceptional sentence subject to the
limitations in this section, and may be appealed by the offender or the state
as set forth in RCW 9.94A.210 (2) through (6).

The following are
illustrative factors which the court may consider in the exercise of its
discretion to impose an exceptional sentence. The following are illustrative
only and are not intended to be exclusive reasons for exceptional sentences.

(1) Mitigating
Circumstances

(a) To a significant
degree, the victim was an initiator, willing participant, aggressor, or
provoker of the incident.

(b) Before detection,
the defendant compensated, or made a good faith effort to compensate, the
victim of the criminal conduct for any damage or injury sustained.

(c) The defendant
committed the crime under duress, coercion, threat, or compulsion insufficient
to constitute a complete defense but which significantly affected his or her
conduct.

(d) The defendant, with
no apparent predisposition to do so, was induced by others to participate in
the crime.

(e) The defendant's
capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his or her conduct, or to conform
his or her conduct to the requirements of the law, was significantly impaired.
Voluntary use of drugs or alcohol is excluded.

(f) The offense was
principally accomplished by another person and the defendant manifested extreme
caution or sincere concern for the safety or well-being of the victim.

(g) The operation of
the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.400 results in a presumptive sentence
that is clearly excessive in light of the purpose of this chapter, as expressed
in RCW 9.94A.010.

(h) The defendant or
the defendant's children suffered a continuing pattern of physical or sexual
abuse by the victim of the offense and the offense is a response to that abuse.

(2) Aggravating
Circumstances

(a) The defendant's
conduct during the commission of the current offense manifested deliberate
cruelty to the victim.

(b) The defendant knew
or should have known that the victim of the current offense was particularly
vulnerable or incapable of resistance due to extreme youth, advanced age,
disability, or ill health.

(c) The defendant
knew that the victim of the current offense was a law enforcement officer as
defined in RCW 9.41.010, and the defendant committed the offense to retaliate
against the victim for an act the victim performed during a previous contact
with the defendant while the victim was performing his or her official duties.

(d) The current
offense was a violent offense, and the defendant knew that the victim of the
current offense was pregnant.

(((d))) (e)
The current offense was a major economic offense or series of offenses, so
identified by a consideration of any of the following factors:

(i) The current offense
involved multiple victims or multiple incidents per victim;

(ii) The current
offense involved attempted or actual monetary loss substantially greater than
typical for the offense;

(iii) The current
offense involved a high degree of sophistication or planning or occurred over a
lengthy period of time; or

(iv) The defendant used
his or her position of trust, confidence, or fiduciary responsibility to
facilitate the commission of the current offense.

(((e))) (f)
The current offense was a major violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, chapter 69.50 RCW (VUCSA), related to trafficking in controlled
substances, which was more onerous than the typical offense of its statutory
definition: The presence of ANY of the following may identify a current
offense as a major VUCSA:

(i) The current offense
involved at least three separate transactions in which controlled substances
were sold, transferred, or possessed with intent to do so;

(ii) The current
offense involved an attempted or actual sale or transfer of controlled substances
in quantities substantially larger than for personal use;

(iii) The current
offense involved the manufacture of controlled substances for use by other
parties;

(iv) The circumstances
of the current offense reveal the offender to have occupied a high position in
the drug distribution hierarchy;

(v) The current offense
involved a high degree of sophistication or planning, occurred over a lengthy
period of time, or involved a broad geographic area of disbursement; or

(vi) The offender used
his or her position or status to facilitate the commission of the current
offense, including positions of trust, confidence or fiduciary responsibility
(e.g., pharmacist, physician, or other medical professional).

(((f))) (g)
The current offense included a finding of sexual motivation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.127.

(((g))) (h)
The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of sexual abuse of the same victim
under the age of eighteen years manifested by multiple incidents over a
prolonged period of time.

(((h))) (i)
The current offense involved domestic violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020,
and one or more of the following was present:

(i) The offense was
part of an ongoing pattern of psychological, physical, or sexual abuse of the
victim manifested by multiple incidents over a prolonged period of time;

(ii) The offense
occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or the offender's minor children
under the age of eighteen years; or

(iii) The offender's
conduct during the commission of the current offense manifested deliberate
cruelty or intimidation of the victim.

(((i))) (j)
The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.400 results in a
presumptive sentence that is clearly too lenient in light of the purpose of
this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(((j))) (k)
The defendant's prior unscored misdemeanor or prior unscored foreign criminal
history results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too lenient in light
of the purpose of this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(((k))) (l)
The offense resulted in the pregnancy of a child victim of rape.

(((l))) (m)
The defendant knew that the victim of the current offense was a youth who was
not residing with a legal custodian and the defendant established or promoted
the relationship for the primary purpose of victimization.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.36.031 and 1999 c
328 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of assault in the third degree if he or she, under circumstances not amounting
to assault in the first or second degree:

(a) With intent to
prevent or resist the execution of any lawful process or mandate of any court
officer or the lawful apprehension or detention of himself, herself, or
another person, assaults another; or

(b) Assaults a person
employed as a transit operator or driver, the immediate supervisor of a transit
operator or driver, a mechanic, or a security officer, by a public or private
transit company or a contracted transit service provider, while that person is
performing his or her official duties at the time of the assault; or

(c) Assaults a school
bus driver, the immediate supervisor of a driver, a mechanic, or a security
officer, employed by a school district transportation service or a private
company under contract for transportation services with a school district,
while the person is performing his or her official duties at the time of the
assault; or

(d) With criminal
negligence, causes bodily harm to another person by means of a weapon or other
instrument or thing likely to produce bodily harm; or

(e) Assaults a fire
fighter or other employee of a fire department, county fire marshal's office,
county fire prevention bureau, or fire protection district who was performing
his or her official duties at the time of the assault; or

(f) With criminal
negligence, causes bodily harm accompanied by substantial pain that extends for
a period sufficient to cause considerable suffering; or

(g) Assaults a law
enforcement officer or other employee of a law enforcement agency who was
performing his or her official duties at the time of the assault; or

(h) Assaults a
person knowing the person is a law enforcement officer as defined in RCW
9.41.010, and the defendant committed the assault to retaliate against the
victim for an act the victim performed during a previous contact with the
defendant while the victim was performing his or her official duties; or

(i) Assaults a
nurse, physician, or health care provider who was performing his or her nursing
or health care duties at the time of the assault. For purposes of this
subsection: "Nurse" means a person licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;
"physician" means a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW;
and "health care provider" means a person certified under chapter
18.71 or 18.73 RCW who performs emergency medical services or a person
regulated under Title 18 RCW and employed by, or contracting with, a hospital
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.

(2) Assault in the
third degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 3. RCW 9A.48.070 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of malicious mischief in the first degree if he or she knowingly and
maliciously:

(a)(i) Causes
physical damage to the property of another in an amount exceeding one thousand
five hundred dollars, except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection; or

(ii) Causes physical
damage to the property of another person, knowing the person is a law
enforcement officer as defined in RCW 9.41.010, and the defendant caused the
damage to retaliate against the victim for an act the victim performed during a
previous contact with the defendant while the victim was performing his or her
official duties, in an amount exceeding two hundred fifty dollars;

(b) Causes an
interruption or impairment of service rendered to the public by physically
damaging or tampering with an emergency vehicle or property of the state, a
political subdivision thereof, or a public utility or mode of public
transportation, power, or communication; or

(c) Causes an
impairment of the safety, efficiency, or operation of an aircraft by physically
damaging or tampering with the aircraft or aircraft equipment, fuel, lubricant,
or parts.

(2) Malicious mischief
in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 4. RCW 9A.48.080 and 1994 c
261 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of malicious mischief in the second degree if he or she knowingly and
maliciously:

(a)(i) Causes
physical damage to the property of another in an amount exceeding two hundred
fifty dollars, except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection; or

(ii) Causes physical
damage to the property of another person, knowing the person is a law
enforcement officer as defined in RCW 9.41.010, and the defendant caused the
damage to retaliate against the victim for an act the victim performed during a
previous contact with the defendant while the victim was performing his or her
official duties, in an amount less than or equal to two hundred fifty dollars;
or

(b) Creates a
substantial risk of interruption or impairment of service rendered to the
public, by physically damaging or tampering with an emergency vehicle or
property of the state, a political subdivision thereof, or a public utility or
mode of public transportation, power, or communication.

(2)
Malicious mischief in the second degree is a class C felony.

---
END ---