BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.102 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Through the future
teachers conditional scholarship program, the board may grant a conditional
scholarship to a student who meets the following requirements:

(a) Meets state
residency requirements as defined by RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013; and

(b) Either has a
declared intention to complete an approved preparation program leading to
teacher certification with an endorsement in bilingual education or English as
a second language or is a teacher who is seeking an additional endorsement in
bilingual education or English as a second language.

(2) In any year, the
amount of the conditional scholarship may not exceed the amount of tuition and
fees at the institution of higher education attended by the student or resident
undergraduate tuition and fees at the University of Washington, whichever is
lower.

(3) When selecting
scholarship recipients, the board shall give priority to students who are
bilingual and who are able to demonstrate their dual language proficiency by
meeting a standard established by the board. The board shall establish the
standard in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public
instruction's bilingual education advisory committee.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.102.020 and 1996
c 53 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Conditional
scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part if the
recipient renders service as a teacher in an approved education program in this
state.

(2) "Institution
of higher education" or "institution" means a college or university
in the state of Washington which is accredited by an accrediting association
recognized as such by rule of the higher education coordinating board.

(3) "Board"
means the higher education coordinating board.

(4) "Eligible
student" means: (a) A student who is registered for at least ten
credit hours or the equivalent, demonstrates achievement of at least a 3.30
grade point average for students entering an institution of higher education
directly from high school or maintains at least a 3.00 grade point average or
the equivalent for each academic year in an institution of higher education, is
a resident student as defined by RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013, and has a
declared intention to complete an approved preparation program leading to
initial teacher certification or required for earning an additional
endorsement, or a college or university graduate who meets the same credit hour
requirements and is seeking an additional teaching endorsement or initial
teacher certification; or (b) a student who meets the requirements of
section 1 of this act. Resident students defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2)(((e)))
(f) are not eligible students under this chapter.

(5) "Public
school" means an elementary school, a middle school, junior high school,
or high school within the public school system referred to in Article IX of the
state Constitution.

(6)
"Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means
to render service as a teacher in an approved education program in the state of
Washington in lieu of monetary repayment.

(7)
"Satisfied" means paid-in-full.

(8)
"Participant" means an eligible student who has received a
conditional scholarship under this chapter.

(9) "Targeted
ethnic minority" means a group of Americans with a common ethnic or racial
heritage selected by the board for program consideration due to societal
concerns such as high dropout rates or low rates of college participation by
members of the group.

(10) "Approved
education program" means an education program in the state of Washington
for knowledge and skills generally learned in preschool through twelfth grade.
Approved education programs may include but are not limited to:

(a) K-12 schools under
Title 28A RCW;

(b) Early childhood
education and assistance programs under RCW 28A.215.100 through 28A.215.200 or
the federal head start program;

(c) An approved school
under chapter 28A.195 RCW;

(d) Education centers
under chapter 28A.205 RCW;

(e) English as a second
language programs and programs leading to high school graduation or the
equivalency operated by community or technical colleges; and

(f) Tribal schools in
Washington approved by the federal bureau of Indian affairs.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.102.050 and 1987
c 437 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The board
may award conditional scholarships to eligible students from the funds
appropriated to the board for this purpose, or from any private donations, or
any other funds given to the board for this program. With the exception of
awards to participants under section 1 of this act, the amount of the
conditional scholarship awarded an individual shall not exceed three thousand
dollars per academic year. Students are eligible to receive conditional
scholarships for a maximum of five years.

---
END ---