BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 26.44 RCW to read as follows:

If a court, during a
judicial proceeding under this title relating to a parenting plan or child
custody, finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a person has
intentionally made a false allegation of child abuse or neglect or has induced
another person to make a false allegation of child abuse or neglect during the
judicial proceeding, the court may impose a monetary penalty not to exceed one
thousand dollars against the person making or inducing another to make the
accusation. The monetary penalty shall be awarded to the person against whom
the false allegation is made. When the court imposes the monetary penalty, the
court may also provide that reasonable attorneys' fees may be imposed if the
person entitled to the monetary penalty incurs attorneys' fees to recover the
penalty. The award may be enforced in the same manner as other civil
judgments. A "person" means a witness, a party, or a party's
attorney.

The remedy provided by
this section is in addition to any other remedy provided by law.

This section does not
apply to unemancipated minors.

Sec. 2. RCW 26.09.191 and 1996 c
303 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The permanent
parenting plan shall not require mutual decision-making or designation of a
dispute resolution process other than court action if it is found that a parent
has engaged in any of the following conduct: (a) Willful abandonment that
continues for an extended period of time or substantial refusal to perform
parenting functions; (b) physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of a
child; or (c) a history of acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW
26.50.010(1) or an assault or sexual assault which causes grievous bodily harm
or the fear of such harm.

(2)(a) The parent's
residential time with the child shall be limited if it is found that the parent
has engaged in any of the following conduct: (i) Willful abandonment that
continues for an extended period of time or substantial refusal to perform
parenting functions; (ii) physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of
a child; (iii) a history of acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW
26.50.010(1) or an assault or sexual assault which causes grievous bodily harm
or the fear of such harm; or (iv) the parent has been convicted as an adult of
a sex offense under:

(A) RCW 9A.44.076 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(B) RCW 9A.44.079 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(C) RCW 9A.44.086 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(D) RCW 9A.44.089;

(E) RCW 9A.44.093;

(F) RCW 9A.44.096;

(G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1)
or (2) if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;

(I) Any predecessor or
antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of this
subsection;

(J) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of this subsection.

This subsection (2)(a)
shall not apply when (c) or (d) of this subsection applies.

(b) The parent's
residential time with the child shall be limited if it is found that the parent
resides with a person who has engaged in any of the following conduct: (i)
Physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of a child; (ii) a history of
acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an assault or
sexual assault that causes grievous bodily harm or the fear of such harm; or
(iii) the person has been convicted as an adult or as a juvenile has been
adjudicated of a sex offense under:

(A) RCW 9A.44.076 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(B) RCW 9A.44.079 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no rebuttable
presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(C) RCW 9A.44.086 if,
because of the difference in age between the offender and the victim, no
rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(D) RCW 9A.44.089;

(E) RCW 9A.44.093;

(F) RCW 9A.44.096;

(G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1)
or (2) if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;

(I) Any predecessor or
antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this
subsection;

(J) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this subsection.

This subsection (2)(b)
shall not apply when (c) or (e) of this subsection applies.

(c) If a parent has
been found to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or under an
analogous statute of any other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the
parent from contact with a child that would otherwise be allowed under this
chapter. If a parent resides with an adult or a juvenile who has been found
to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or under an analogous statute
of any other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the parent from contact
with the parent's child except contact that occurs outside that person's
presence.

(d) There is a
rebuttable presumption that a parent who has been convicted as an adult of a
sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of this subsection poses a present
danger to a child. Unless the parent rebuts this presumption, the court shall
restrain the parent from contact with a child that would otherwise be allowed
under this chapter:

(i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1)
or (2), provided that the person convicted was at least five years older than
the other person;

(ii) RCW 9A.44.073;

(iii) RCW 9A.44.076,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(iv) RCW 9A.44.079,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(v) RCW 9A.44.083;

(vi) RCW 9A.44.086,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(vii) RCW 9A.44.100;

(viii) Any predecessor
or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of this
subsection;

(ix) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of this subsection.

(e) There is a
rebuttable presumption that a parent who resides with a person who, as an
adult, has been convicted, or as a juvenile has been adjudicated, of the sex
offenses listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection places a child at
risk of abuse or harm when that parent exercises residential time in the
presence of the convicted or adjudicated person. Unless the parent rebuts the
presumption, the court shall restrain the parent from contact with the parent's
child except for contact that occurs outside of the convicted or adjudicated
person's presence:

(i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1)
or (2), provided that the person convicted was at least five years older than
the other person;

(ii) RCW 9A.44.073;

(iii) RCW 9A.44.076,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(iv) RCW 9A.44.079,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(v) RCW 9A.44.083;

(vi) RCW 9A.44.086,
provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older than the
victim;

(vii) RCW 9A.44.100;

(viii) Any predecessor
or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of this
subsection;

(ix) Any statute from
any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to the offenses
listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of this subsection.

(f) The presumption
established in (d) of this subsection may be rebutted only after a written
finding that:

(i) If the child was
not the victim of the sex offense committed by the parent requesting
residential time, (A) contact between the child and the offending parent is
appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, and (B) the offending parent
has successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and
making progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment
provider believes such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the
child; or

(ii) If the child was
the victim of the sex offense committed by the parent requesting residential
time, (A) contact between the child and the offending parent is appropriate and
poses minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is in or has been in therapy
for victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes such contact
between the child and the offending parent is in the child's best interest, and
(C) the offending parent has successfully engaged in treatment for sex
offenders or is engaged in and making progress in such treatment, if any was
ordered by a court, and the treatment provider believes such contact is
appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.

(g) The presumption
established in (e) of this subsection may be rebutted only after a written
finding that:

(i) If the child was
not the victim of the sex offense committed by the person who is residing with
the parent requesting residential time, (A) contact between the child and the
parent residing with the convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate and
that parent is able to protect the child in the presence of the convicted or
adjudicated person, and (B) the convicted or adjudicated person has
successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and making
progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment
provider believes such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the
child; or

(ii) If the child was
the victim of the sex offense committed by the person who is residing with the
parent requesting residential time, (A) contact between the child and the
parent in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate
and poses minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is in or has been in
therapy for victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes such
contact between the child and the parent residing with the convicted or
adjudicated person in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is in
the child's best interest, and (C) the convicted or adjudicated person has
successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and making
progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment
provider believes contact between the parent and child in the presence of the
convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the
child.

(h) If the court finds
that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the presumption under (f) of
this subsection, the court may allow a parent who has been convicted as an adult
of a sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of this subsection to have
residential time with the child supervised by a neutral and independent adult
and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such residential time. The
court shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between the child and the
parent unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor is
willing and capable of protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke
court approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence, that the
supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or capable
of protecting the child.

(i) If the court finds
that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the presumption under (g) of
this subsection, the court may allow a parent residing with a person who has
been adjudicated as a juvenile of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through (ix)
of this subsection to have residential time with the child in the presence of
the person adjudicated as a juvenile, supervised by a neutral and independent
adult and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such residential
time. The court shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between the
child and the parent unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that the
supervisor is willing and capable of protecting the child from harm. The court
shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the
evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer
willing or capable of protecting the child.

(j) If the court finds
that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the presumption under (g) of
this subsection, the court may allow a parent residing with a person who, as an
adult, has been convicted of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of
this subsection to have residential time with the child in the presence of the
convicted person supervised by a neutral and independent adult and pursuant to
an adequate plan for supervision of such residential time. The court shall not
approve of a supervisor for contact between the child and the parent unless the
court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor is willing and capable
of protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke court approval of
the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence, that the supervisor has
failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or capable of protecting
the child.

(k) A court shall not
order unsupervised contact between the offending parent and a child of the offending
parent who was sexually abused by that parent. A court may order unsupervised
contact between the offending parent and a child who was not sexually abused by
the parent after the presumption under (d) of this subsection has been rebutted
and supervised residential time has occurred for at least two years with no
further arrests or convictions of sex offenses involving children under chapter
9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW and (i) the sex offense of the
offending parent was not committed against a child of the offending parent, and
(ii) the court finds that unsupervised contact between the child and the
offending parent is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, after
consideration of the testimony of a state-certified therapist, mental health
counselor, or social worker with expertise in treating child sexual abuse
victims who has supervised at least one period of residential time between the
parent and the child, and after consideration of evidence of the offending
parent's compliance with community supervision requirements, if any. If the
offending parent was not ordered by a court to participate in treatment for sex
offenders, then the parent shall obtain a psychosexual evaluation conducted by
a state-certified sex offender treatment provider indicating that the offender
has the lowest likelihood of risk to reoffend before the court grants
unsupervised contact between the parent and a child.

(l) A court may order
unsupervised contact between the parent and a child which may occur in the
presence of a juvenile adjudicated of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through
(ix) of this subsection who resides with the parent after the presumption under
(e) of this subsection has been rebutted and supervised residential time has
occurred for at least two years during which time the adjudicated juvenile has
had no further arrests, adjudications, or convictions of sex offenses involving
children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW, and (i)
the court finds that unsupervised contact between the child and the parent that
may occur in the presence of the adjudicated juvenile is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child, after consideration of the testimony of a
state-certified therapist, mental health counselor, or social worker with
expertise in treatment of child sexual abuse victims who has supervised at
least one period of residential time between the parent and the child in the
presence of the adjudicated juvenile, and after consideration of evidence of
the adjudicated juvenile's compliance with community supervision or parole
requirements, if any. If the adjudicated juvenile was not ordered by a court
to participate in treatment for sex offenders, then the adjudicated juvenile
shall obtain a psychosexual evaluation conducted by a state-certified sex
offender treatment provider indicating that the adjudicated juvenile has the
lowest likelihood of risk to reoffend before the court grants unsupervised
contact between the parent and a child which may occur in the presence of the
adjudicated juvenile who is residing with the parent.

(m)(i) The limitations
imposed by the court under (a) or (b) of this subsection shall be reasonably
calculated to protect the child from the physical, sexual, or emotional abuse
or harm that could result if the child has contact with the parent requesting
residential time. If the court expressly finds based on the evidence that
limitations on the residential time with the child will not adequately protect
the child from the harm or abuse that could result if the child has contact
with the parent requesting residential time, the court shall restrain the
parent requesting residential time from all contact with the child.

(ii) The court shall
not enter an order under (a) of this subsection allowing a parent to have
contact with a child if the parent has been found by clear and convincing
evidence in a civil action or by a preponderance of the evidence in a
dependency action to have sexually abused the child, except upon recommendation
by an evaluator or therapist for the child that the child is ready for contact
with the parent and will not be harmed by the contact. The court shall not
enter an order allowing a parent to have contact with the child in the
offender's presence if the parent resides with a person who has been found by
clear and convincing evidence in a civil action or by a preponderance of the
evidence in a dependency action to have sexually abused a child, unless the
court finds that the parent accepts that the person engaged in the harmful
conduct and the parent is willing to and capable of protecting the child from
harm from the person.

(iii) If the court
limits residential time under (a) or (b) of this subsection to require
supervised contact between the child and the parent, the court shall not
approve of a supervisor for contact between a child and a parent who has
engaged in physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of the child
unless the court finds based upon the evidence that the supervisor accepts that
the harmful conduct occurred and is willing to and capable of protecting the
child from harm. The court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon
finding, based on the evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the
child or is no longer willing to or capable of protecting the child.

(n) If the court
expressly finds based on the evidence that contact between the parent and the
child will not cause physical, sexual, or emotional abuse or harm to the child
and that the probability that the parent's or other person's harmful or abusive
conduct will recur is so remote that it would not be in the child's best
interests to apply the limitations of (a), (b), and (m)(i) and (iii) of this
subsection, or if the court expressly finds that the parent's conduct did not
have an impact on the child, then the court need not apply the limitations of
(a), (b), and (m)(i) and (iii) of this subsection. The weight given to the
existence of a protection order issued under chapter 26.50 RCW as to domestic
violence is within the discretion of the court. This subsection shall not
apply when (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), (l), and (m)(ii) of
this subsection apply.

(3) There is a
presumption that the parent's residential time with the child should be limited
if it is found that the parent has made false accusations of child abuse or
neglect during the course of the proceedings, and the parent knew the
accusations to be false at the time of making the accusations.

(4) A parent's
involvement or conduct may have an adverse effect on the child's best
interests, and the court may preclude or limit any provisions of the parenting
plan, if any of the following factors exist:

(a) A parent's neglect
or substantial nonperformance of parenting functions;

(b) A long-term
emotional or physical impairment which interferes with the parent's performance
of parenting functions as defined in RCW 26.09.004;

(c) A long-term
impairment resulting from drug, alcohol, or other substance abuse that
interferes with the performance of parenting functions;

(d) The absence or
substantial impairment of emotional ties between the parent and the child;

(e) The abusive use of
conflict by the parent which creates the danger of serious damage to the
child's psychological development;

(f) A parent has
withheld from the other parent access to the child for a protracted period
without good cause; or

(g) Such other factors
or conduct as the court expressly finds adverse to the best interests of the
child.

(((4))) (5)
In entering a permanent parenting plan, the court shall not draw any
presumptions from the provisions of the temporary parenting plan.

(((5))) (6)
In determining whether any of the conduct described in this section has
occurred, the court shall apply the civil rules of evidence, proof, and
procedure.

(((6))) (7)
For the purposes of this section, a parent's child means that parent's natural
child, adopted child, or stepchild.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 26.44 RCW to read as follows:

A person
is guilty of a class C felony punishable in accordance with chapter 9A.20 RCW
if the person intentionally: (1) Makes a false accusation of child abuse or
neglect during a judicial proceeding under this title relating to a parenting
plan or child custody, or (2) induces another person to make a false allegation
of child abuse or neglect during a judicial proceeding under this title
relating to a parenting plan or child custody.

---
END ---