BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART I

INTENT

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature
hereby finds that:

(a) The economy of the
state and the health, safety, and welfare of its citizens are threatened by the
current energy supply and price instabilities;

(b) Many energy efficiency
programs for public buildings launched during the 1970s and 1980s were not
maintained during the subsequent sustained period of low energy costs and
abundant supply; and

(c) Conservation
programs originally established in the 1970s and 1980s can be improved or
updated. New programs drawing on recently developed technologies, including
demand-side energy management systems, can materially increase the efficiency
of energy use by the public sector.

(2) It is the policy of
the state of Washington that:

(a) State government is
committed to achieving significant gains in energy efficiency. Conventional
conservation programs will be reviewed and updated in light of experience
gained since their commencement;

(b) State government
must play a leading role in demonstrating updated and new energy efficiency
technologies. New programs or measures made possible by technological
advances, such as demand-side response measures and energy management systems,
shall be treated in the same manner as conventional conservation programs and
will be integrated into the state's energy efficiency programs.

PART
II

ENERGY CONSERVATION IN DESIGN OF PUBLIC
FACILITIES

Sec. 2. RCW 39.35.010 and 1982 c
159 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby
finds:

(1) That major publicly
owned or leased facilities have a significant impact on our state's consumption
of energy;

(2) That energy
conservation practices including energy management systems and renewable
energy systems adopted for the design, construction, and utilization of such
facilities will have a beneficial effect on our overall supply of energy;

(3) That the cost of
the energy consumed by such facilities over the life of the facilities shall be
considered in addition to the initial cost of constructing such facilities;

(4) That the cost of
energy is significant and major facility designs shall be based on the total
life-cycle cost, including the initial construction cost, and the cost, over
the economic life of a major facility, of the energy consumed, and of the
operation and maintenance of a major facility as they affect energy
consumption; and

(5) That the use of
energy systems in these facilities which utilize renewable resources such as
solar energy, wood or wood waste, or other nonconventional fuels ((should)),
and which incorporate energy management systems, shall be considered in the
design of all publicly owned or leased facilities.

Sec. 3. RCW 39.35.030 and 1996 c
186 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Public
agency" means every state office, officer, board, commission, committee,
bureau, department, and all political subdivisions of the state.

(2)
"Department" means the state department of general administration.

(3) "Major
facility" means any publicly owned or leased building having twenty-five
thousand square feet or more of usable floor space.

(4) "Initial
cost" means the moneys required for the capital construction or renovation
of a major facility.

(5) "Renovation"
means additions, alterations, or repairs within any twelve-month period which
exceed fifty percent of the value of a major facility and which will affect any
energy system.

(6) "Economic
life" means the projected or anticipated useful life of a major facility
as expressed by a term of years.

(7) "Energy
management system" means a program, energy efficiency equipment,
technology, device, or other measure including, but not limited to, a
management, educational, or promotional program, smart appliance, meter reading
system that provides real-time pricing capability, computer software or
hardware, communications equipment or hardware, thermostat or other control
equipment, together with related administrative or operational programs, that
allows identification and management of opportunities for improvement in the
efficiency of energy use, including but not limited to a measure that allows:

(a) Public agencies
to obtain information about the cost of energy before the time of consumption;

(b) Two-way interactive
communication between public agencies and their energy suppliers;

(c) Public agencies
to respond to price signals and to manage their purchase and use of
electricity; or

(d) For other kinds
of demand-side energy management.

(8)
"Life-cycle cost" means the initial cost and cost of operation of a
major facility over its economic life. This shall be calculated as the initial
cost plus the operation, maintenance, and energy costs over its economic life,
reflecting anticipated increases in these costs discounted to present value at
the current rate for borrowing public funds, as determined by the office of
financial management. The energy cost projections used shall be those provided
by the department. The department shall update these projections at least
every two years.

(((8))) (9)
"Life-cycle cost analysis" includes, but is not limited to, the
following elements:

(a) The coordination
and positioning of a major facility on its physical site;

(b) The amount and type
of fenestration employed in a major facility;

(c) The amount of
insulation incorporated into the design of a major facility;

(d) The variable
occupancy and operating conditions of a major facility; and

(e) An
energy-consumption analysis of a major facility.

(((9))) (10)
"Energy systems" means all utilities, including, but not limited to,
heating, air-conditioning, ventilating, lighting, and the supplying of domestic
hot water.

(((10))) (11)
"Energy-consumption analysis" means the evaluation of all energy
systems and components by demand and type of energy including the internal
energy load imposed on a major facility by its occupants, equipment, and
components, and the external energy load imposed on a major facility by the
climatic conditions of its location. An energy-consumption analysis of the
operation of energy systems of a major facility shall include, but not be
limited to, the following elements:

(a) The comparison of
three or more system alternatives, at least one of which shall include
renewable energy systems, and one of which shall comply at a minimum with
the sustainable design guidelines of the United States green building council
leadership in energy and environmental design silver standard or similar design
standard as may be adopted by rule by the department;

(b) The simulation of
each system over the entire range of operation of such facility for a year's
operating period; and

(c) The evaluation of
the energy consumption of component equipment in each system considering the
operation of such components at other than full or rated outputs.

The energy-consumption
analysis shall be prepared by a professional engineer or licensed architect who
may use computers or such other methods as are capable of producing predictable
results.

(((11))) (12)
"Renewable energy systems" means methods of facility design and
construction and types of equipment for the utilization of renewable energy
sources including, but not limited to, hydroelectric power, active or passive
solar space heating or cooling, domestic solar water heating, windmills, waste
heat, biomass and/or refuse-derived fuels, photovoltaic devices, and geothermal
energy.

(((12))) (13)
"Cogeneration" means the sequential generation of two or more forms
of energy from a common fuel or energy source. Where these forms are
electricity and thermal energy, then the operating and efficiency standards
established by 18 C.F.R. Sec. 292.205 and the definitions established by 18
C.F.R. 292.202 (c) through (m) as of July 28, 1991, shall apply.

(((13))) (14)
"Selected buildings" means educational, office, residential care, and
correctional facilities that are designed to comply with the design standards
analyzed and recommended by the department.

(((14))) (15)
"Design standards" means the heating, air-conditioning, ventilating,
and renewable resource systems identified, analyzed, and recommended by the
department as providing an efficient energy system or systems based on the
economic life of the selected buildings.

Sec. 4. RCW 39.35.050 and 1996 c
186 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

The department, in
consultation with affected public agencies, shall develop and issue guidelines
for administering this chapter. The purpose of the guidelines is to define a
procedure and method for performance of life-cycle cost analysis to promote the
selection of low-life-cycle cost alternatives. At a minimum, the guidelines
must contain provisions that:

(1) Address energy
considerations during the planning phase of the project;

(2) Identify energy
components and system alternatives including energy management systems,
renewable energy systems, and cogeneration applications prior to
commencing the energy consumption analysis;

(3) Identify simplified
methods to assure the lowest life-cycle cost alternatives for selected
buildings with between twenty-five thousand and one hundred thousand square
feet of usable floor area;

(4) Establish times
during the design process for preparation, review, and approval or disapproval
of the life-cycle cost analysis;

(5) Specify the
assumptions to be used for escalation and inflation rates, equipment service
lives, economic building lives, and maintenance costs;

(6) Determine
life-cycle cost analysis format and submittal requirements to meet the
provisions of chapter 201, Laws of 1991;

(7) Provide for review
and approval of life-cycle cost analysis.

PART
III

PERFORMANCE-BASED CONTRACTING BY
MUNICIPALITIES

Sec. 5. RCW 39.35A.020 and 1985
c 169 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise, the definitions in this section shall apply
throughout this chapter.

(1) "Energy
equipment and services" means energy management systems and any
equipment, materials, or supplies that are expected, upon installation, to
reduce the energy use or energy cost of an existing building or facility, and
the services associated with the equipment, materials, or supplies, including
but not limited to design, engineering, financing, installation, project
management, guarantees, operations, and maintenance.

(2) "Energy
management system" has the definition provided in RCW 39.35.030.

(3)
"Municipality" has the definition provided in RCW 39.04.010.

(((3))) (4)
"Performance-based contract" means one or more contracts for energy
equipment and services between a municipality and any other persons or
entities, if the payment obligation for each year under the contract, including
the year of installation, is either: (a) Set as a percentage of the annual
energy cost savings attributable under the contract to the energy equipment and
services; or (b) guaranteed by the other persons or entities to be less than
the annual energy cost savings attributable under the contract to the energy
equipment and services. Such guarantee shall be, at the option of the
municipality, a bond or insurance policy, or some other guarantee determined
sufficient by the municipality to provide a level of assurance similar to the
level provided by a bond or insurance policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 39.35A RCW to read as follows:

The state department of
general administration shall maintain a registry of energy service contractors
and provide assistance to municipalities in identifying available
performance-based contracting services.

PART
IV

ENERGY CONSERVATION PROJECTS

Sec. 7. RCW 39.35C.010 and 1996
c 186 s 405 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Cogeneration" means the sequential generation of two or more forms
of energy from a common fuel or energy source. If these forms are electricity
and thermal energy, then the operating and efficiency standards established by
18 C.F.R. Sec. 292.205 and the definitions established by 18 C.F.R. Sec.
292.202 (c) through (m) apply.

(2)
"Conservation" means reduced energy consumption or energy cost, or
increased efficiency in the use of energy, and activities, measures, or
equipment designed to achieve such results, but does not include thermal or
electric energy production from cogeneration.

(3)
"Cost-effective" means that the present value to a state agency or
school district of the energy reasonably expected to be saved or produced by a
facility, activity, measure, or piece of equipment over its useful life,
including any compensation received from a utility or the Bonneville power
administration, is greater than the net present value of the costs of
implementing, maintaining, and operating such facility, activity, measure, or
piece of equipment over its useful life, when discounted at the cost of public
borrowing.

(4) "Energy"
means energy as defined in RCW 43.21F.025(1).

(5) "Energy
audit" has the definition provided in RCW 43.19.670.

(6) "Energy
efficiency project" means a conservation or cogeneration project.

(((6))) (7)
"Energy efficiency services" means assistance furnished by the
department to state agencies and school districts in identifying, evaluating,
and implementing energy efficiency projects.

(((7))) (8)
"Department" means the state department of general administration.

(((8))) (9)
"Performance-based contracting" means contracts for which payment is
conditional on achieving contractually specified energy savings.

(((9))) (10)
"Public agency" means every state office, officer, board, commission,
committee, bureau, department, and all political subdivisions of the state.

(((10))) (11)
"Public facility" means a building or structure, or a group of
buildings or structures at a single site, owned by a state agency or school
district.

(((11))) (12)
"State agency" means every state office or department, whether
elective or appointive, state institutions of higher education, and all boards,
commissions, or divisions of state government, however designated.

(((12))) (13)
"State facility" means a building or structure, or a group of
buildings or structures at a single site, owned by a state agency.

(((13))) (14)
"Utility" means privately or publicly owned electric and gas
utilities, electric cooperatives and mutuals, whether located within or without
Washington state.

(((14))) (15)
"Local utility" means the utility or utilities in whose service
territory a public facility is located.

Sec. 8. RCW 39.35C.020 and 1996
c 186 s 406 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each state agency
and school district shall implement cost-effective conservation improvements
and maintain efficient operation of its facilities in order to minimize energy
consumption and related environmental impacts and reduce operating costs. Each
state agency and school district shall undertake an energy audit and implement
energy conservation measures pursuant to the time schedules set forth in
chapter 43.19 RCW. Performance-based contracting shall be the preferred method
for implementing and completing energy audits.

(2) The department
shall assist state agencies and school districts in identifying, evaluating,
and implementing cost-effective conservation projects at their facilities. The
assistance shall include the following:

(a) Notifying state
agencies and school districts of their responsibilities under this chapter;

(b) Apprising state
agencies and school districts of opportunities to develop and finance such
projects;

(c) Providing technical
and analytical support, including procurement of performance-based contracting
services;

(d) Reviewing
verification procedures for energy savings; and

(e) Assisting in the
structuring and arranging of financing for cost-effective conservation
projects.

(3) Conservation
projects implemented under this chapter shall have appropriate levels of
monitoring to verify the performance and measure the energy savings over the
life of the project. The department shall solicit involvement in program
planning and implementation from utilities and other energy conservation
suppliers, especially those that have demonstrated experience in
performance-based energy programs.

(4) The department
shall comply with the requirements of chapter 39.80 RCW when contracting for
architectural or engineering services.

(5) The department
shall recover any costs and expenses it incurs in providing assistance pursuant
to this section, including reimbursement from third parties participating in
conservation projects. The department shall enter into a written agreement
with the public agency for the recovery of costs.

PART
V

DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION

Sec. 9. RCW 43.19.668 and 1993 c
204 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds and declares that the buildings, facilities, equipment, and
vehicles owned or leased by state government consume significant amounts of
energy and that energy conservation actions, including energy management
systems, to provide for efficient energy use in these buildings,
facilities, equipment, and vehicles will reduce the costs of state government.
In order for the operations of state government to provide the citizens of this
state an example of energy use efficiency, the legislature further finds and
declares that state government should undertake an aggressive program designed
to reduce energy use in state buildings, facilities, equipment, and vehicles
within a reasonable period of time. The use of appropriate tree plantings for
energy conservation is encouraged as part of this program.

Sec. 10. RCW 43.19.669 and 1980 c
172 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the purpose of
RCW 43.19.670 through 43.19.685 to require energy audits in state-owned
buildings, to require energy audits as a lease condition in all new, renewed,
and renegotiated leases of buildings by the state, to undertake such
modifications and installations as are necessary to maximize the efficient use
of energy in these buildings, including but not limited to energy management
systems, and to establish a policy for the purchase of state vehicles,
equipment, and materials which results in efficient energy use by the state.

Sec. 11. RCW 43.19.670 and 1982 c
48 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in RCW
43.19.670 through 43.19.685, the following terms have the meanings indicated
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Energy
audit" means a determination of the energy consumption characteristics of
a facility which consists of the following elements:

(a) An energy
consumption survey which identifies the type, amount, and rate of energy consumption
of the facility and its major energy systems. This survey shall be made by the
agency responsible for the facility.

(b) A walk-through
survey which determines appropriate energy conservation maintenance and
operating procedures and indicates the need, if any, for the acquisition and
installation of energy conservation measures and energy management systems.
This survey shall be made by the agency responsible for the facility if it has
technically qualified personnel available. The director of general
administration shall provide technically qualified personnel to the responsible
agency if necessary.

(c) ((A technical
assistance study)) An investment grade audit, which is an intensive
engineering analysis of energy conservation and management measures for
the facility, net energy savings, and a cost-effectiveness determination. This
element is required only for those facilities designated in the ((technical
assistance study)) schedule adopted under RCW 43.19.680(((3))) (2).

(2) "Cost-effective
energy conservation measures" means energy conservation measures that the
investment grade audit concludes will generate savings sufficient to finance
project loans of not more than ten years.

(3) "Energy
conservation measure" means an installation or modification of an
installation in a facility which is primarily intended to reduce energy
consumption or allow the use of an alternative energy source, including:

(a) Insulation of the
facility structure and systems within the facility;

(b) Storm windows and
doors, multiglazed windows and doors, heat absorbing or heat reflective glazed
and coated windows and door systems, additional glazing, reductions in glass
area, and other window and door system modifications;

(c) Automatic energy
control systems;

(d) Equipment required
to operate variable steam, hydraulic, and ventilating systems adjusted by
automatic energy control systems;

(e) Solar space heating
or cooling systems, solar electric generating systems, or any combination
thereof;

(f) Solar water heating
systems;

(g) Furnace or utility
plant and distribution system modifications including replacement burners,
furnaces, and boilers which substantially increase the energy efficiency of the
heating system; devices for modifying flue openings which will increase the
energy efficiency of the heating system; electrical or mechanical furnace
ignitions systems which replace standing gas pilot lights; and utility plant
system conversion measures including conversion of existing oil- and gas-fired
boiler installations to alternative energy sources;

(h) Caulking and
weatherstripping;

(i) Replacement or
modification of lighting fixtures which increase the energy efficiency of the
lighting system;

(j) Energy recovery
systems; ((and))

(k) Energy
management systems; and

(l) Such other
measures as the director finds will save a substantial amount of energy.

(((3))) (4)
"Energy conservation maintenance and operating procedure" means
modification or modifications in the maintenance and operations of a facility,
and any installations within the facility, which are designed to reduce energy
consumption in the facility and which require no significant expenditure of
funds.

(((4))) (5)
"Energy management system" has the definition contained in RCW
39.35.030.

(6) "Energy
savings performance contracting" means the process authorized by chapter
39.35C RCW by which a company contracts with a state agency to conduct no-cost
energy audits, guarantee savings from energy efficiency, provide financing for
energy efficiency improvements, install or implement energy efficiency
improvements, and agree to be paid for its investment solely from savings
resulting from the energy efficiency improvements installed or implemented.

(7) "Energy
service company" means a company or contractor providing energy savings
performance contracting services.

(8)
"Facility" means a building, a group of buildings served by a central
energy distribution system, or components of a central energy distribution
system.

(((5))) (9)
"Implementation plan" means the annual tasks and budget required to
complete all acquisitions and installations necessary to satisfy the
recommendations of the energy audit.

Sec. 12. RCW 43.19.675 and 1982 c
48 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For each state-owned
facility, the director of general administration, ((in cooperation with
the director of the state energy office)) or the agency responsible for
the facility if other than the department of general administration, shall
conduct((, by contract or other arrangement,)) an energy audit ((for
each state-owned)) of that facility. ((All energy audits shall
be coordinated with and complement other governmental energy audit programs.
The energy audit for each state-owned facility located on the capitol campus
shall be completed no later than July 1, 1981, and the results and findings of
each energy audit shall be compiled and transmitted to the governor and the
legislature no later than October 1, 1981.)) This energy audit may be
conducted by contract or by other arrangement, including appropriate agency staff.
Performance-based contracting shall be the preferred method for implementing
and completing energy audits. For ((every other)) each
state-owned facility, the energy consumption surveys shall be completed no
later than October 1, ((1982)) 2001, and the walk-through surveys
shall be completed no later than July 1, ((1983)) 2002.

Sec. 13. RCW 43.19.680 and 1996 c
186 s 506 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon completion of
each walk-through survey required by RCW 43.19.675, the director of general
administration or the agency responsible for the facility if other than the
department of general administration shall implement energy conservation
maintenance and operation procedures that may be identified for any state-owned
facility. These procedures shall be implemented as soon as possible but not
later than twelve months after the walk-through survey.

(2) ((By December
31, 1981, for the capitol campus the director of general administration shall
prepare and transmit to the governor and the legislature an implementation
plan.)) If a walk-through survey has identified potentially
cost-effective energy conservation measures, the agency responsible for the
facility shall undertake an investment grade audit of the facility. Investment
grade audits shall be completed no later than December 1, 2002. Installation
of cost-effective energy conservation measures recommended in the investment
grade audit shall be completed no later than June 30, 2004.

(3) ((By December
31, 1983, for all other state-owned facilities, the director of general
administration shall prepare and transmit to the governor and the legislature
the results of the energy consumption and walk-through surveys and a schedule
for the conduct of technical assistance studies. This submission shall contain
the energy conservation measures planned for installation during the ensuing
biennium. Priority considerations for scheduling technical assistance studies
shall include but not be limited to a facility's energy efficiency, responsible
agency participation, comparative cost and type of fuels, possibility of
outside funding, logistical considerations such as possible need to vacate the
facility for installation of energy conservation measures, coordination with
other planned facility modifications, and the total cost of a facility
modification, including other work which would have to be done as a result of
installing energy conservation measures. Energy conservation measure
acquisitions and installations shall be scheduled to be twenty-five percent
complete by June 30, 1985, or at the end of the capital budget biennium which
includes that date, whichever is later, fifty-five percent complete by June 30,
1989, or at the end of the capital budget biennium which includes that date,
whichever is later, eighty-five percent complete by June 30, 1993, or at the
end of the capital budget biennium which includes that date, whichever is
later, and fully complete by June 30, 1995, or at the end of the capital budget
biennium which includes that date, whichever is later. Each state agency shall
implement energy conservation measures with a payback period of twenty-four
months or less that have a positive cash flow in the same biennium.))

For each biennium until
all measures are installed, the director of general administration shall report
to the governor and legislature installation progress, measures planned for
installation during the ensuing biennium((, and changes, if any, to the
technical assistance study schedule)). This report shall be submitted by
December 31, ((1984)) 2004, or at the end of the following year
whichever immediately precedes the capital budget adoption, and every two years
thereafter until all measures are installed.

(4) ((The director
of general administration shall adopt rules to facilitate private investment in
energy conservation measures for state-owned buildings consistent with state
law.)) Agencies may contract with energy service companies as authorized
by chapter 39.35C RCW for energy audits and implementation of cost-effective
energy conservation measures. The department shall provide technically
qualified personnel to the responsible agency upon request. The department
shall recover a fee for this service.

(5) Agencies that
completed energy audits and implemented cost-effective energy conservation
measures after December 31, 1996, and agencies that have contracted with energy
service companies for energy audits and conservation measures after December
31, 1996, are deemed to have fulfilled the requirements of this chapter.

PART
VI

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. Part headings used in
this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---