BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) In computing tax
under this chapter there shall be deducted from the gross income an amount
equal to the cost of production at the plant for consumption within the state
of Washington of electrical energy produced or generated from cogeneration at
new or expanded cogeneration facilities.

(b) For the purposes of
this section, the following definitions apply:

(i)
"Cogeneration" means the sequential generation, in either order, of
electrical energy and useful thermal energy, such as heat or steam, from the
same primary energy source or fuel in which the useful thermal energy is used:

(A) In a manufacturing
process;

(B) To improve the
operating efficiency of a facility that produces electrical energy through
biomass generation as defined in RCW 19.29A.010; or

(C) In space heating or
cooling.

(ii) "Cogeneration
facility" means any machinery, equipment, structure, process, or property,
or any part thereof, installed or acquired by a person or corporation for the
purpose of cogeneration.

(2)(a) This section
applies only to the amount of electrical energy produced at a new or expanded
cogeneration facility on which construction or installation begins after June
30, 2001, and before January 1, 2011. In the case of a cogeneration facility producing
electrical energy on or before the effective date of this act, this section
applies to the amount of electrical energy produced for sale from that facility
that exceeds the amount of electrical energy sold from that location on an
average annual basis in the three years prior to June 30, 2001.

(b) This section does
not apply to:

(i) A cogeneration
facility fueled by diesel; or

(ii) A cogeneration
facility that has a combined fuel conversion efficiency of less than sixty
percent, unless the cogeneration facility is used to improve the operating
efficiency of a facility that produces electrical energy through biomass
generation as defined in RCW 19.29A.010, in which case this section applies
unless the cogeneration facility has a combined fuel conversion efficiency of
less than forty percent.

(3) By August 25th of
each fiscal year in which a taxpayer intends to claim the deduction under this
section, the taxpayer shall file with the department, on a form and in a manner
prescribed by the department, information concerning production at the
cogeneration facility during the previous fiscal year, including but not
limited to the following:

(a) The amount of fuel
consumed;

(b) The energy content
of the fuel measured in British thermal units per unit of fuel;

(c) The amount of
electricity produced measured in kilowatt hours;

(d) The gallons of hot
water or pounds of steam produced;

(e) The temperature of
the hot water, or temperature and pressure of the steam, produced; and

(f) The temperature of
the hot water or condensate returned to the boiler.

(4) The department may
disclose information received under subsection (3)(a) through (f) of this
section to energy policy staff of the department of community, trade, and
economic development or the Washington State University cooperative extension
solely for the purpose of determining a taxpayer's eligibility for a deduction
under this section. In addition, prior to the time a cogeneration facility has
operated for a full fiscal year, the department may require any information
that it finds necessary to determining a taxpayer's eligibility under this
section, and may disclose the information received to energy policy staff of
the department of community, trade, and economic development or the Washington
State University cooperative extension solely for the purpose of determining
the taxpayer's eligibility for a deduction under this section.

(5) Deductions under
this section shall be allowed for a period not to exceed thirty years after the
project is placed in operation.

(6) Measures or
projects encouraged under this section shall at the time they are placed in
service be reasonably expected to save, produce, or generate energy at a total
incremental system cost per unit of energy delivered to end use which is less
than or equal to the incremental system cost per unit of energy delivered to
end use from similarly available conventional energy resources which utilize
nuclear energy or fossil fuels and which the gas or electric utility could
acquire to meet energy demand in the same time period.

(7) The
department of revenue, after consultation with the utilities and transportation
commission in the case of investor-owned utilities and the governing bodies of
locally regulated utilities, shall determine the eligibility of individual
projects and measures for deductions under this section.

--- END ---