BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that millions of dollars are spent each year to discourage the youth of this
state from using tobacco products. The legislature also finds that tobacco use
causes Washington state citizens to pay billions of dollars in health care
costs. However, the legislature finds that there are policies at the public
institutions of higher education that enable students to use tobacco products
in publicly owned residence halls.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

No person
may smoke, including carrying or smoking any kind of lighted pipe, cigar,
cigarette, or any other lighted smoking equipment, in a publicly owned
residence hall at a public institution of higher education.

---
END ---