BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Cigarette" means any roll for smoking made wholly or in part of
tobacco or of any other substance, regardless of size or shape and whether or
not the tobacco or substance is flavored, adulterated, or mixed with any other
ingredient, the wrapper or cover of which is made of paper or any other
substance or material except tobacco.

(2) "Sell"
includes a sale, an offer to sell, or an agreement to sell.

(3) "Person"
includes a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability
partnership, partnership, sole proprietor, limited partnership, or association.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) No person may sell
cigarettes in this state unless the manufacturer of the cigarettes certifies in
writing to the liquor control board that the cigarettes meet fire safety standards
adopted by the Washington state patrol under section 3 of this act. Certifying
manufacturers must provide copies of the written certification for fire-safe
cigarettes to all wholesale dealers licensed under chapter 82.24 RCW.

(2) Nothing in subsection
(1) of this section shall be construed to prohibit the wholesale sale of
cigarettes that have not been certified by the manufacturer if the cigarettes
will not be sold or resold within the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The Washington state
patrol, in consultation with the department of health, shall adopt fire safety
standards for cigarettes sold in this state. Standards must ensure either of
the following:

(a) That cigarettes, if
ignited, will stop burning within a specified time period if the cigarette is
not smoked during that time period; or

(b) That cigarettes
meet performance standards that limit the risk of the cigarette igniting
upholstered furniture, mattresses, or other household furnishings.

(2) In adopting
standards, consideration must be given to any increased health risk to
consumers from fire-safe cigarettes.

(3) Standards under
subsection (1) of this section shall be adopted by July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) Any wholesaler
defined under RCW 82.24.010 who knowingly sells cigarettes in violation of
section 2 of this act is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand
dollars per sale.

(2) Any retailer
defined under RCW 82.24.010 who knowingly sells cigarettes in violation of
section 2 of this act is subject to the following:

(a) A civil penalty not
to exceed five hundred dollars per each sale of cigarettes provided that the
total number of cigarettes sold per each sale does not exceed one thousand; or

(b) A civil penalty not
to exceed one thousand dollars per each sale of cigarettes provided that the
total number of cigarettes sold per each sale exceeds one thousand.

(3) Any person engaged
in the manufacture of cigarettes who knowingly makes a false certification
under section 2 of this act shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed
ten thousand dollars for each false certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The cigarette fire safety
act account is created in the state treasury. All moneys recovered as civil
penalties assessed under section 4 of this act must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for fire prevention and safety
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The liquor control board
and the department of revenue shall enforce this chapter. The attorney general
may bring an action to enjoin acts in violation of this chapter and may recover
civil penalties authorized under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Sections 2, 5, and 6 of
this act take effect July 1, 2003, unless federal fire safety standards for
cigarettes are adopted before July 1, 2003, and the federal standards adopted
specifically preempt any standards adopted by individual states including
standards adopted under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. This act is null and void
if federal fire safety standards for cigarettes that preempt this act are
adopted on or after July 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. Sections 1 through 8 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

---
END ---