BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.105D.010 and 1994
c 254 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each person has a
fundamental and inalienable right to a healthful environment, and each person
has a responsibility to preserve and enhance that right. The beneficial
stewardship of the land, air, and waters of the state is a solemn obligation of
the present generation for the benefit of future generations.

(2) A healthful
environment is now threatened by the irresponsible use and disposal of
hazardous substances. There are hundreds of hazardous waste sites in this
state, and more will be created if current waste practices continue. Hazardous
waste sites threaten the state's water resources, including those used for
public drinking water. Many of our municipal landfills are current or
potential hazardous waste sites and present serious threats to human health and
environment. The costs of eliminating these threats in many cases are beyond
the financial means of our local governments and ratepayers. The main purpose
of chapter 2, Laws of 1989 is to raise sufficient funds to clean up all
hazardous waste sites and to prevent the creation of future hazards due to
improper disposal of toxic wastes into the state's land and waters.

(3) Many farmers and
small business owners who have followed the law with respect to their uses of
pesticides and other chemicals nonetheless may face devastating economic
consequences because their uses have contaminated the environment or the water
supplies of their neighbors. With a source of funds, the state may assist
these farmers and business owners, as well as those persons who sustain
damages, such as the loss of their drinking water supplies, as a result of the
contamination.

(4) It is in the
public's interest to efficiently use our finite land base, to integrate our
land use planning policies with our clean-up policies, and to clean up and
reuse contaminated industrial properties in order to minimize industrial
development pressures on undeveloped land and to make clean land available for
future social use.

(5) Because it is often
difficult or impossible to allocate responsibility among persons liable for
hazardous waste sites and because it is essential that sites be cleaned up well
and expeditiously, each responsible person should be liable jointly and
severally.

(6) Because releases
of hazardous substances can adversely affect the health and welfare of the
public, the environment, and property values, it is in the public interest that
affected communities be notified of where releases of hazardous substances have
occurred and what is being done to clean them up.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 70.105D RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (5) of this section, any owner or operator of a facility that is
actively transitioning from operating under federal laws to operating under the
provisions of this chapter, who has information that a hazardous substance has
been released to the environment at the owner or operator's facility that may
be a threat to human health or the environment, shall issue a notice to the
department within ninety days. The notice shall include a description of any
remedial actions planned, completed, or underway.

(2) The notice must be
posted in a visible, publicly accessible location on the facility, to remain in
place until all remedial actions except confirmational monitoring are complete.

(3) After receiving the
notice from the facility, the department must review the notice and mail a
summary of its contents, along with any additional information deemed
appropriate by the department, to:

(a) Each residence and
landowner of a residence whose property boundary is within three hundred feet
of the boundary of the property where the release occurred or if the release
occurred from a pipeline or other facility that does not have a property
boundary, within three hundred feet of the actual release;

(b) Each business and
landowner of a business whose property boundary is within three hundred feet of
the boundary of the property where the release occurred;

(c) Each residence,
landowner of a residence, and business with a property boundary within the area
where hazardous substances have come to be located as a result of the release;

(d) Neighborhood
associations and community organizations representing an area within one mile
of the facility and recognized by the city or county with jurisdiction within
this area;

(e) The city, county, and
local health district with jurisdiction within the areas described in (a), (b),
and (c) of this subsection; and

(f) The department of
health.

(4) A notice produced
by a facility shall provide the following information:

(a) The common name of
any hazardous substances released and, if available, the chemical abstract
service registry number of these substances;

(b) The address of the
facility where the release occurred;

(c) The date the
release was discovered;

(d) The cause and date
of the release, if known;

(e) The remedial
actions being taken or planned to address the release;

(f) The potential
health and environmental effects of the hazardous substances released; and

(g) The name, address,
and telephone number of a contact person at the facility where the release
occurred.

(5) The following
releases are exempt from the notification requirements in this section:

(a) Application of
pesticides and fertilizers for their intended purposes and according to label
instructions;

(b) The lawful and
nonnegligent use of hazardous household substances by a natural person for
personal or domestic purposes;

(c) The discharge of
hazardous substances in compliance with permits issued under chapter 70.94,
90.48, or 90.56 RCW;

(d) De minimis amounts
of any hazardous substance leaked or discharged onto the ground;

(e) The discharge of
hazardous substances to a permitted waste water treatment facility or from a
permitted waste water collection system or treatment facility as allowed by a
facility's discharge permit;

(f) Any releases
originating from a single-family or multifamily residence, including but not
limited to the discharge of oil from a residential home heating oil tank with
the capacity of five hundred gallons or less;

(g) Any spill on a
public road, street, or highway or to surface waters of the state that has
previously been reported to the United States coast guard and the state
division of emergency management under chapter 90.56 RCW;

(h) Any release of
hazardous substances to the air;

(i) Any release that
occurs on agricultural land, including land used to grow trees for the
commercial production of wood or wood fiber, that is at least five acres in
size, when the effects of the release do not come within three hundred feet of
any property boundary. For the purposes of this subsection, agricultural land
includes incidental uses that are compatible with agricultural or silvicultural
purposes, including, but not limited to, land used for the housing of the
owner, operator, or employees, structures used for the storage or repair of
equipment, machinery, and chemicals, and any paths or roads on the land; and

(j) Releases that,
before the effective date of this section, have been previously reported to the
department, or remediated in compliance with a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) or enforcement order or agreed order issued under this chapter
or have been the subject of an opinion from the department under RCW
70.105D.030(1)(i) that no further remedial action is required.

An exemption from the
notification requirements of this section does not exempt the owner or operator
of a facility from any other notification or reporting requirements, or imply a
release from liability under this chapter.

(6) If a significant
segment of the community to be notified speaks a language other than English,
an appropriate translation of the notice must also be posted and mailed to the
department in accordance with the requirements of this section.

(7) The facility where the
release occurred is responsible for reimbursing the department within thirty
days for the actual costs associated with the production and mailing of the
notices under this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.105D.030 and 2001
c 291 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
exercise the following powers in addition to any other powers granted by law:

(a) Investigate,
provide for investigating, or require potentially liable persons to investigate
any releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances, including but not
limited to inspecting, sampling, or testing to determine the nature or extent of
any release or threatened release. If there is a reasonable basis to believe
that a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance may exist, the
department's authorized employees, agents, or contractors may enter upon any
property and conduct investigations. The department shall give reasonable
notice before entering property unless an emergency prevents such notice. The
department may by subpoena require the attendance or testimony of witnesses and
the production of documents or other information that the department deems
necessary;

(b) Conduct, provide
for conducting, or require potentially liable persons to conduct remedial
actions (including investigations under (a) of this subsection) to remedy
releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances. In carrying out such
powers, the department's authorized employees, agents, or contractors may enter
upon property. The department shall give reasonable notice before entering
property unless an emergency prevents such notice. In conducting, providing
for, or requiring remedial action, the department shall give preference to
permanent solutions to the maximum extent practicable and shall provide for or
require adequate monitoring to ensure the effectiveness of the remedial action;

(c) Indemnify
contractors retained by the department for carrying out investigations and
remedial actions, but not for any contractor's reckless or wilful misconduct;

(d) Carry out all state
programs authorized under the federal cleanup law and the federal resource,
conservation, and recovery act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq., as amended;

(e) Classify substances
as hazardous substances for purposes of RCW 70.105D.020(7) and classify
substances and products as hazardous substances for purposes of RCW
82.21.020(1);

(f) Issue orders or
enter into consent decrees or agreed orders that include, or issue written
opinions under (i) of this subsection that may be conditioned upon, deed
restrictions where necessary to protect human health and the environment from a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance from a facility. Prior
to establishing a deed restriction under this subsection, the department shall
notify and seek comment from a city or county department with land use planning
authority for real property subject to a deed restriction;

(g) Enforce the
application of permanent and effective institutional controls that are
necessary for a remedial action to be protective of human health and the
environment and the notification requirements established in section 2 of
this act, and impose penalties for violations of that section consistent with
RCW 70.105D.050;

(h) Require holders to
conduct remedial actions necessary to abate an imminent or substantial
endangerment pursuant to RCW 70.105D.020(12)(b)(ii)(C);

(i) Provide informal
advice and assistance to persons regarding the administrative and technical
requirements of this chapter. This may include site-specific advice to persons
who are conducting or otherwise interested in independent remedial actions. Any
such advice or assistance shall be advisory only, and shall not be binding on
the department. As a part of providing this advice and assistance for
independent remedial actions, the department may prepare written opinions
regarding whether the independent remedial actions or proposals for those
actions meet the substantive requirements of this chapter or whether the
department believes further remedial action is necessary at the facility. The
department may collect, from persons requesting advice and assistance, the
costs incurred by the department in providing such advice and assistance;
however, the department shall, where appropriate, waive collection of costs in
order to provide an appropriate level of technical assistance in support of
public participation. The state, the department, and officers and employees of
the state are immune from all liability, and no cause of action of any nature
may arise from any act or omission in providing, or failing to provide,
informal advice and assistance; and

(j) Take any other
actions necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including the
power to adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The department
shall immediately implement all provisions of this chapter to the maximum
extent practicable, including investigative and remedial actions where
appropriate. The department shall adopt, and thereafter enforce, rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW to:

(a) Provide for public
participation, including at least (i) public notice of the development of
investigative plans or remedial plans for releases or threatened releases and
(ii) concurrent public notice of all compliance orders, agreed orders,
enforcement orders, or notices of violation;

(b) Establish a hazard
ranking system for hazardous waste sites;

(c) Provide for
requiring the reporting by an owner or operator of releases of hazardous
substances to the environment that may be a threat to human health or the
environment within ninety days of discovery, including such exemptions from
reporting as the department deems appropriate, however this requirement shall
not modify any existing requirements provided for under other laws;

(d) Establish
reasonable deadlines not to exceed ninety days for initiating an investigation
of a hazardous waste site after the department receives notice or otherwise
receives information that the site may pose a threat to human health or the
environment and other reasonable deadlines for remedying releases or threatened
releases at the site;

(e) Publish and
periodically update minimum cleanup standards for remedial actions at least as
stringent as the cleanup standards under section 121 of the federal cleanup
law, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9621, and at least as stringent as all applicable state and
federal laws, including health-based standards under state and federal law; and

(f) Apply industrial
clean-up standards at industrial properties. Rules adopted under this
subsection shall ensure that industrial properties cleaned up to industrial
standards cannot be converted to nonindustrial uses without approval from the
department. The department may require that a property cleaned up to
industrial standards is cleaned up to a more stringent applicable standard as a
condition of conversion to a nonindustrial use. Industrial clean-up standards
may not be applied to industrial properties where hazardous substances
remaining at the property after remedial action pose a threat to human health
or the environment in adjacent nonindustrial areas.

(3) Before November 1st
of each even-numbered year, the department shall develop, with public notice
and hearing, and submit to the ways and means and appropriate standing
environmental committees of the senate and house of representatives a ranked
list of projects and expenditures recommended for appropriation from both the
state and local toxics control accounts. The department shall also provide the
legislature and the public each year with an accounting of the department's
activities supported by appropriations from the state toxics control account, including
a list of known hazardous waste sites and their hazard rankings, actions taken
and planned at each site, how the department is meeting its top two management
priorities under RCW 70.105.150, and all funds expended under this chapter.

(4) The department
shall establish a scientific advisory board to render advice to the department
with respect to the hazard ranking system, cleanup standards, remedial actions,
deadlines for remedial actions, monitoring, the classification of substances as
hazardous substances for purposes of RCW 70.105D.020(7) and the classification
of substances or products as hazardous substances for purposes of RCW
82.21.020(1). The board shall consist of five independent members to serve
staggered three-year terms. No members may be employees of the department.
Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.

(5) The department
shall establish a program to identify potential hazardous waste sites and to
encourage persons to provide information about hazardous waste sites.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.105D.050 and 1994
c 257 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) With respect to any
release, or threatened release, for which the department does not conduct or
contract for conducting remedial action and for which the department believes
remedial action is in the public interest, the director shall issue orders or
agreed orders requiring potentially liable persons to provide the remedial
action. Any liable person who refuses, without sufficient cause, to comply
with an order or agreed order of the director is liable in an action brought by
the attorney general for:

(a) Up to three times
the amount of any costs incurred by the state as a result of the party's
refusal to comply; and

(b) A civil penalty of
up to twenty-five thousand dollars for each day the party refuses to comply.

The treble damages and
civil penalty under this subsection apply to all recovery actions filed on or
after March 1, 1989.

(2) Any person who
incurs costs complying with an order issued under subsection (1) of this
section may petition the department for reimbursement of those costs. If the
department refuses to grant reimbursement, the person may within thirty days
thereafter file suit and recover costs by proving that he or she was not a
liable person under RCW 70.105D.040 and that the costs incurred were
reasonable.

(3) The attorney
general shall seek, by filing an action if necessary, to recover the amounts
spent by the department for investigative and remedial actions and orders, and
agreed orders, including amounts spent prior to March 1, 1989.

(4) The attorney
general may bring an action to secure such relief as is necessary to protect
human health and the environment under this chapter.

(5)(a) Any person may
commence a civil action to compel the department to perform any
nondiscretionary duty under this chapter. At least thirty days before
commencing the action, the person must give notice of intent to sue, unless a substantial
endangerment exists. The court may award attorneys' fees and other costs to
the prevailing party in the action.

(b) Civil actions under
this section and RCW 70.105D.060 may be brought in the superior court of
Thurston county or of the county in which the release or threatened release
exists.

(6) Any person who
fails to provide notification of releases consistent with section 2 of this act
or who submits false information is liable in an action brought by the attorney
general for a civil penalty of up to five thousand dollars per day for each day
the party refuses to comply.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 2 through 4 of
this act take effect January 1, 2003.

---
END ---