BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.310 and 2000 c
132 s 2 and 2000 c 28 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) TABLE
1

Sentencing
Grid

SERIOUSNESS

LEVEL OFFENDER
SCORE

9
or

0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 more

XVI Life Sentence
without Parole/Death Penalty

XV 23y4m 24y4m 25y4m 26y4m 27y4m 28y4m 30y4m 32y10m 36y 40y

240- 250- 261- 271- 281- 291- 312- 338- 370- 411-

320 333 347 361
374 388 416 450 493 548

XIV 14y4m 15y4m 16y2m 17y 17y11m 18y9m 20y5m 22y2m 25y7m 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

220 234 244 254 265 275 295 316 357 397

XIII 12y 13y 14y 15y 16y 17y 19y 21y 25y 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

164 178 192 205 219 233 260 288 342 397

XII 9y 9y11m 10y9m 11y8m 12y6m 13y5m 15y9m 17y3m 20y3m 23y3m

93- 102- 111- 120- 129- 138- 162- 178- 209- 240-

123 136 147 160
171 184 216 236 277 318

XI 7y6m 8y4m 9y2m 9y11m 10y9m 11y7m 14y2m 15y5m 17y11m 20y5m

78- 86-
95- 102- 111- 120- 146- 159- 185- 210-

102 114 125 136
147 158 194 211 245 280

X 5y 5y6m 6y 6y6m 7y 7y6m 9y6m 10y6m 12y6m 14y6m

51- 57- 62- 67- 72- 77- 98- 108- 129- 149-

68 75 82 89 96 102 130 144 171 198

IX 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 5y 5y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m 12y6m

31- 36- 41- 46- 51- 57- 77- 87- 108- 129-

41 48 54 61 68 75 102 116 144 171

VIII 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m

21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 46- 67- 77- 87- 108-

27 34 41 48 54 61 89 102 116 144

VII 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m

15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 57- 67- 77- 87-

20 27 34 41 48 54 75 89 102 116

VI 13m 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y6m 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m

12+- 15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 46- 57- 67- 77-

14 20 27 34 41 48 61 75 89 102

V 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y 5y 6y 7y

6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 41- 51- 62- 72-

12 14 17 20 29 43 54 68 82 96

IV 6m 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y2m 6y2m

3- 6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 43- 53- 63-

9 12 14 17 20 29 43 57 70 84

III 2m 5m 8m 11m 14m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y

1- 3- 4- 9- 12+- 17- 22- 33- 43- 51-

3 8 12 12 16 22 29 43 57 68

II 4m 6m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m

0-90 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22- 33- 43-

Days 6 9 12 14 18 22 29 43 57

I 3m 4m 5m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m

0-60 0-90 2- 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22-

Days Days 5
6 8 12 14 18 22 29

Numbers in the first
horizontal row of each seriousness category represent sentencing midpoints in
years(y) and months(m). Numbers in the second and third rows represent
standard sentence ranges in months, or in days if so designated. 12+ equals
one year and one day.

(2) For persons
convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the standard sentence range is determined
by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate
offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and
multiplying the range by 75 percent.

(3) The following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony
crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being
sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony
crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the
firearm enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject
to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an
anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed
in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements, the following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under
subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as
classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a) Five years for any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(b) Three years for
any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory
maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(c) Eighteen months
for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory
maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(d) If the offender is
being sentenced for any firearm enhancements under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this
subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon
enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection
or subsection (4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement
listed.

(e) Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, all firearm enhancements under this section are
mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to
all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon
enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether
or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement when
authorized under RCW 9.94A.150(4).

(f) The firearm
enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the
following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by
shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and
second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g) If the standard
sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for
the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence
unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm
enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may
not be reduced.

(4) The following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony
crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and
the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection
as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of
the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than
one offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to the
total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying
offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the offender or an
accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in
RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense
under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection
as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements, the following additional times
shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2)
of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:

(a) Two years for any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(b) One year for any
felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection.

(c) Six months for any
felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum
sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection.

(d) If the offender is
being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection for any deadly
weapon enhancements and the offender has previously been sentenced for any
deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of
this subsection or subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both,
all deadly weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount
of the enhancement listed.

(e) Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, all deadly weapon enhancements under this section
are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run
consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or
deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.
However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender
serving a sentence under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary
medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.150(4).

(f) The deadly weapon
enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the
following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by
shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and
second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g) If the standard
sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for
the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence
unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly
weapon enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory
maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.

(5) The following
additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range if the offender
or an accomplice committed the offense while in a county jail or state
correctional facility and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection. If the offender or an accomplice committed one of
the crimes listed in this subsection while in a county jail or state
correctional facility, and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection,
the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range
determined under subsection (2) of this section:

(a) Eighteen months
for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii) or 69.50.410;

(b) Fifteen months for
offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii), (iv), and (v);

(c) Twelve months for
offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(d).

For the purposes of
this subsection, all of the real property of a state correctional facility or
county jail shall be deemed to be part of that facility or county jail.

(6) An additional
twenty-four months shall be added to the standard sentence range for any ranked
offense involving a violation of chapter 69.50 RCW if the offense was also a
violation of RCW 69.50.435 or 9.94A.128.

(7) An additional two
years shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined
by RCW 46.61.502 for each prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.

(8) An additional
two years shall be added to the standard sentence range for the following
felony crimes committed on or after July 1, 2001, with a finding of sexual
motivation:

(a) Murder in the
first degree;

(b) Murder in the
second degree;

(c) Kidnapping in
the first degree;

(d) Kidnapping in
the second degree;

(e) Assault in the
first degree;

(f) Assault in the
second degree; and

(g) Burglary in the
first degree.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. This act shall be known
as the sex offender safety act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---