BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The secretary of
state shall establish and maintain an automated data base containing the name,
residential address, date of birth, county of residence, legislative district,
congressional district, date of registration, last two dates voted, signature
image, and any other information deemed necessary by the secretary of state for
each person registered to vote in the state.

(2) The secretary of
state shall, at a minimum, update the data base on a biannual basis.

(3) The secretary of
state shall prohibit the public inspection and copying of portions of the data
base containing information exempt from public inspection and copying under
chapter 42.17 RCW.

(4) The secretary of
state shall establish the data base by July 1, 2003.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.10.185 and 1999 c
100 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition
to the case-by-case cancellation procedure required in RCW 29.10.040, the
county auditor, in conjunction with the office of the secretary of state, shall
participate in an annual list maintenance program designed to detect:

(a) Persons excluded
from elective franchise due to a conviction for an infamous crime under Article
VI, section 3 of the state Constitution who are housed in a state correctional
facility;

(b) Persons declared
incompetent for purposes of rationally exercising the right to vote in
guardianship proceedings under chapter 11.88 RCW;

(c) Persons who have
legally changed their names under RCW 4.24.130;

(d) Persons
registered in more than one county; and

(e) Persons voting
in more than one county.

((This)) (2)
The program must be applied uniformly throughout the county and must be
nondiscriminatory in its application. The program must be completed not later
than thirty days before the date of a primary or general election.

(3) The office
of the secretary of state shall cause to be created a list of registered voters:

(a) Who are excluded
from elective franchise due to a conviction for an infamous crime under Article
VI, section 3 of the state Constitution and are housed in a state correctional
facility;

(b) Who have been
declared incompetent for purposes of rationally exercising the right to vote in
guardianship proceedings under chapter 11.88 RCW;

(c) Who have legally
changed their names under RCW 4.24.130;

(d) With the
same date of birth and similar names who appear on two or more county lists of
registered voters; or

(e) Who have voted
in more than one county at the same election.

(4) The office
of the secretary of state shall forward ((this)) the list required
by subsection (3) of this section to each county auditor so that they may
properly cancel the ((previous)) registration of voters who ((have
subsequently)) are improperly registered in ((a different)) the
county.

(5)(a) For a voter
who is registered in more than one county, the county auditor of the county
where the previous registration was made shall cancel the registration of the
voter if it appears that the signatures in the registration and the signature
provided to the new county on the voter's new registration were made by the
same person. (b) For a voter who is ineligible to vote due to
conviction of an infamous crime or incompetence, the county auditor shall
cancel the registration of the voter if the voter's name appears on the list
required by subsection (3) of this section, and it appears that the voter on
the list and the voter whose registration is being canceled are the same
person.

(c) For a voter who
has legally changed his or her name, but not changed his or her voter
registration, the county auditor shall send the voter instructions on how to
change his or her name for registration purposes under RCW 29.10.051.

(6)
The office of the secretary of state shall adopt rules to facilitate this
process.

Sec. 3. RCW 29.10.180 and 1999 c
100 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
case-by-case maintenance required under RCW 29.10.071 and 29.10.075 and the
canceling of registrations under RCW 29.10.090, the county auditor shall
establish a general program of voter registration list maintenance. This
program must be a thorough review that is applied uniformly throughout the
county and must be nondiscriminatory in its application. Any program
established must be completed at least once every two years and not later than
ninety days before the date of a primary or general election for federal
office. The county auditor may substitute the results of any address
screening program conducted by the secretary of state in lieu of other methods.
The county may fulfill its obligations under this section in one of the
following ways:

(1) The county auditor
may enter into one or more contracts with the United States postal service, or
its licensee, which permit the auditor to use postal service change-of-address
information. If the auditor receives change of address information from the United
States postal service that indicates that a voter has changed his or her
residence address within the county, the auditor shall transfer the
registration of that voter and send a confirmation notice informing the voter
of the transfer to the new address. If the auditor receives postal change of
address information indicating that the voter has moved out of the county, the
auditor shall send a confirmation notice to the voter and advise the voter of
the need to reregister in the new county. The auditor shall place the voter's
registration on inactive status;

(2) A direct,
nonforwardable, nonprofit or first-class mailing to every registered voter
within the county bearing the postal endorsement "Return Service
Requested." If address correction information for a voter is received by
the county auditor after this mailing, the auditor shall place that voter on
inactive status and shall send to the voter a confirmation notice;

(3) Any other method
approved by the secretary of state.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.04.150 and 1993 c
441 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No later than June
15th or November 15th, any political party organization or any other individual
may request in writing from the secretary of state to receive a copy of the
subsequent statewide computer file of registered voters compiled under
subsection (2) of this section. At the time it makes this request, the
political party or individual shall deposit sufficient funds with the secretary
of state to pay for the cost of assembling, compiling, and distributing the
computer file of registered voters and shall agree to the statutory
restrictions regarding the commercial use of this data.

(2) Not earlier than
January 1st or July 1st subsequent to the receipt of a request and deposit
under subsection (1) of this section, or at the request of the secretary of
state, each county auditor shall provide to the secretary of state, or a
data processing agency designated by the secretary of state, a duplicate
computer tape or data file of the records of the registered voters in that
county, containing the information specified in ((RCW 29.07.220. The
secretary of state shall reimburse each county for the actual cost of
reproduction and mailing of the duplicate computer tape or data file)) section
1 of this act.

Sec. 5. RCW 11.88.010 and 1991 c
289 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superior court
of each county shall have power to appoint guardians for the persons and/or
estates of incapacitated persons, and guardians for the estates of nonresidents
of the state who have property in the county needing care and attention.

(a) For purposes of
this chapter, a person may be deemed incapacitated as to person when the
superior court determines the individual has a significant risk of personal
harm based upon a demonstrated inability to adequately provide for nutrition,
health, housing, or physical safety.

(b) For purposes of
this chapter, a person may be deemed incapacitated as to the person's estate
when the superior court determines the individual is at significant risk of
financial harm based upon a demonstrated inability to adequately manage
property or financial affairs.

(c) A determination of
incapacity is a legal not a medical decision, based upon a demonstration of
management insufficiencies over time in the area of person or estate. Age,
eccentricity, poverty, or medical diagnosis alone shall not be sufficient to
justify a finding of incapacity.

(d) A person may also
be determined incapacitated if he or she is under the age of majority as
defined in RCW 26.28.010.

(e) For purposes of
giving informed consent for health care pursuant to RCW 7.70.050 and 7.70.065,
an "incompetent" person is any person who is (i) incompetent by reason
of mental illness, developmental disability, senility, habitual drunkenness,
excessive use of drugs, or other mental incapacity, of either managing his or
her property or caring for himself or herself, or both, or (ii) incapacitated
as defined in (a), (b), or (d) of this subsection.

(f) For purposes of the
terms "incompetent," "disabled," or "not legally
competent," as those terms are used in the Revised Code of Washington to
apply to persons incapacitated under this chapter, those terms shall be interpreted
to mean "incapacitated" persons for purposes of this chapter.

(2) The superior court
for each county shall have power to appoint limited guardians for the persons
and estates, or either thereof, of incapacitated persons, who by reason of
their incapacity have need for protection and assistance, but who are capable
of managing some of their personal and financial affairs. After considering
all evidence presented as a result of such investigation, the court shall
impose, by order, only such specific limitations and restrictions on an
incapacitated person to be placed under a limited guardianship as the court
finds necessary for such person's protection and assistance. A person shall
not be presumed to be incapacitated nor shall a person lose any legal rights or
suffer any legal disabilities as the result of being placed under a limited
guardianship, except as to those rights and disabilities specifically set forth
in the court order establishing such a limited guardianship. In addition, the
court order shall state the period of time for which it shall be applicable.

(3) Venue for petitions
for guardianship or limited guardianship shall lie in the county wherein the
alleged incapacitated person is domiciled, or if such person resides in a
facility supported in whole or in part by local, state, or federal funding
sources, in either the county where the facility is located, the county of
domicile prior to residence in the supported facility, or the county where a
parent or spouse of the alleged incapacitated person is domiciled.

If the alleged
incapacitated person's residency has changed within one year of the filing of
the petition, any interested person may move for a change of venue for any
proceedings seeking the appointment of a guardian or a limited guardian under
this chapter to the county of the alleged incapacitated person's last place of
residence of one year or more. The motion shall be granted when it appears to
the court that such venue would be in the best interests of the alleged
incapacitated person and would promote more complete consideration of all
relevant matters.

(4) Under RCW
11.94.010, a principal may nominate, by a durable power of attorney, the
guardian or limited guardian of his or her estate or person for consideration
by the court if guardianship proceedings for the principal's person or estate
are thereafter commenced. The court shall make its appointment in accordance
with the principal's most recent nomination in a durable power of attorney
except for good cause or disqualification.

(5) When a court
imposes a full guardianship for an incapacitated person, the person shall be
considered incompetent for purposes of rationally exercising the right to vote
and shall lose the right to vote, unless the court specifically finds that the
person is rationally capable of exercising the franchise. Imposition of a
limited guardianship for an incapacitated person shall not result in the loss
of the right to vote unless the court determines that the person is incompetent
for purposes of rationally exercising the franchise. A court imposing a
full or limited guardianship that results in the incapacitated person losing
his or her right to vote shall, within fourteen days of the establishment of
the guardianship, submit to the secretary of state the name, date of birth, and
residential address of the incompetent person.

Sec. 6. RCW 36.22.200 and 1992 c
30 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon receipt of the fee
and the name change order from the district court as provided in RCW 4.24.130,
the county auditor shall file and record the name change order and send a
copy of the order to the secretary of state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

By June 1,
2002, and each month thereafter, the secretary of corrections shall submit to
the secretary of state, a list of persons convicted of infamous crimes under
Article VI, section 3 of the state Constitution and housed in state
correctional facilities. The list must include each person's complete name,
last known address before incarceration, and date of birth.

---
END ---