BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
39.12.070 and 1993 c 404 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 The department of labor and industries may charge
fees to

_7 awarding agencies on public works for the approval of
statements

_8 of intent to pay prevailing wages and the certification
of

_9 affidavits of wages paid. The department may also
charge fees to

10 persons or organizations requesting the arbitration of
disputes

11 under RCW 39.12.060. The amount of the fees shall be
established

12 by rules adopted by the department under the procedures
in the

13 administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. The
fees shall

14 apply to all approvals, certifications, and arbitration
requests

15 made after the effective date of the rules. All fees
shall be

16 deposited in the public works administration account.
((On the

17 fifteenth day of the first month of each quarterly
period, an

18 amount equalling thirty percent of the revenues
received into the

p. 1 HB
1416

_1 public works adminis­tration account shall be
transferred into the

_2 general fund.)) The department may refuse to
arbitrate for

_3 contractors, subcontractors, persons, or organizations
which have

_4 not paid the proper fees. The department may, if
necessary,

_5 request the attorney general to take legal action to
collect

_6 delinquent fees.

_7 The department shall set the fees permitted by this
section at

_8 a level that generates revenue that is as near as
practicable to

_9 the amount of the appropriation to administer this
chapter,

10 including, but not limited to, the performance of
adequate wage

11 surveys, and to investigate and enforce all alleged
violations of

12 this chapter, including, but not limited to, incorrect
statements

13 of intent to pay prevailing wage, incorrect certificates
of

14 affidavits of wages paid, and wage claims, as provided
for in this

15 chapter and chapters 49.48 and 49.52 RCW. However, the
fees

16 charged for the approval of statements of intent to pay
prevailing

17 wages and the certification of affidavits of wages paid
shall be

18 no greater than twenty-five dollars.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1416 p. 2