BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) It is declared to be
the public policy of the state of Washington to promote and facilitate the
orderly development and economic stability of its communities. Local
governments need the ability to raise revenue to finance public improvements
that are designed to encourage economic growth and development in geographic
areas characterized by high levels of unemployment and stagnate employment and
income growth. The construction of necessary public improvements in accordance
with local economic development plans will encourage investment in
job-producing private development and expand the public tax base.

(2) It is the purpose of this
chapter:

(a) To encourage taxing
districts to cooperate in the allocation of future tax revenues that are used
to finance public improvements designed to encourage private development in
selected areas, in particular in those local governments that are located
adjacent to another state or international border;

(b) To assist those
local governments that have a competitive disadvantage in its ability to
attract business, private investment, or commercial development due to its
location near a state or international border; and

(c) To prevent or
arrest the decay of selected areas due to the inability of existing financial
methods to provide needed public improvements, and to encourage private
investment designed to promote and facilitate the orderly redevelopment of
selected areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Assessed
value of real property" means the valuation of real property as placed on
the last completed assessment roll.

(2) "Local
government" means any city, town, county, metropolitan park district, port
district, or any combination of local governments.

(3)
"Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative action
by a local government.

(4) "Public
improvements" means:

(a) Infrastructure improvements
within the increment area that include, but are not limited to:

(i) Street and road
construction and maintenance;

(ii) Water and sewer
system construction and improvements;

(iii) Sidewalks and
streetlights;

(iv) Parking, terminal,
and dock facilities;

(v) Public
transportation facilities; and

(vi) Park facilities
and recreational areas;

(b) Publicly owned or
leased facilities within the jurisdiction of a local government which the
sponsor has authority to provide; and

(c) Expenditures for
any of the following purposes:

(i) Providing
environmental analysis, professional management, planning, and promotion within
the increment area, including the management and promotion of retail trade
activities in the increment area;

(ii) Providing maintenance
and security for common or public areas in the increment area; or

(iii) Historic
preservation activities authorized under RCW 35.21.395.

(5) "Public
improvement costs" means the costs of: (a) Design, planning, acquisition,
site preparation, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement,
and installation of public improvements; (b) relocating, maintaining, and
operating property pending construction of public improvements; (c) relocating
utilities as a result of public improvements; (d) financing public
improvements, including interest during construction, legal and other
professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs on
general indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any necessary
reserves for general indebtedness; (e) assessments incurred in revaluing real
property for the purpose of determining the tax allocation base value that are
in excess of costs incurred by the assessor in accordance with the revaluation
plan under chapter 84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and
complying with this chapter and other applicable law; and (f) administrative
expenses and feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to these
costs, including related costs that may have been incurred before adoption of
the ordinance authorizing the public improvements and the use of community
revitalization financing to fund the costs of the public improvements.

(6) "Regular
property taxes" means regular property taxes as defined in RCW 84.04.140,
except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by port districts or public utility
districts specifically for the purpose of making required payments of principal
and interest on general indebtedness; and (b) regular property taxes levied by
the state for the support of the common schools under RCW 84.52.065.

(7) "Tax
allocation base value" means the true and fair value of real property
located within an increment area for taxes imposed in the year in which the
increment area is created, plus seventy-five percent of any increase in the
true and fair value of real property located within an increment area that is
placed on the assessment rolls after the increment area is created.

(8) "Tax
allocation revenues" means those tax revenues derived from the imposition
of regular property taxes on the increment value and distributed to finance
public improvements.

(9) "Increment
area" means the geographic area from which taxes are to be appropriated to
finance public improvements authorized under this chapter.

(10) "Increment
value" means seventy-five percent of any increase in the true and fair
value of real property in an increment area that is placed on the tax rolls
after the increment area is created.

(11) "Taxing
districts" means a governmental entity that levies or has levied for it
regular property taxes upon real property located within a proposed or approved
increment area.

(12) "Value of
taxable property" means the value of the taxable property as defined in
RCW 39.36.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A local government may
finance public improvements using community revitalization financing subject to
the following conditions:

(1) The local
government adopts an ordinance designating an increment area within its
boundaries and specifying the public improvements proposed to be financed in
whole or in part with the use of community revitalization financing;

(2) The public
improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using community
revitalization financing are expected to encourage private development within
the increment area and to increase the fair market value of real property
within the increment area;

(3) Private development
that is anticipated to occur within the increment area, as a result of the
public improvements, will be consistent with the countywide planning policy
adopted by the county under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's
comprehensive plan and development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A
RCW;

(4) Taxing districts,
in the aggregate, that levy at least sixty percent of the regular property tax
within which the increment area is located approves the community
revitalization financing of the project under section 5(1) of this act; and

(5) In an increment
area that includes any portion of a fire protection district as defined in
Title 52 RCW, the fire protection district must approve their participation in
the community revitalization financing of the project under this act. Approval
by the fire protection district shall be considered as part of the required
participation by taxing districts under subsection (4) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Public improvements that
are financed with community revitalization financing may be undertaken and
coordinated with other programs or efforts undertaken by the local government
and other taxing districts and may be funded in part from revenue sources other
than community revitalization financing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Before adopting an
ordinance creating the increment area, a local government must:

(1) Obtain written
agreement for the use of community revitalization financing to finance all or a
portion of the costs of the designated public improvements from taxing
districts that, in the aggregate, levy at least sixty percent of the regular property
tax on property within the increment area. A signed, written agreement from
taxing districts that in the aggregate levy at least sixty percent of the
regular property tax within the increment area, constitutes concurrence by all
taxing districts in the increment area in the public improvement and
participation in the public improvement to the extent of providing limited
funding under community revitalization financing authorized under this
chapter. The agreement must be authorized by the governing body of taxing
districts that in the aggregate levy at least sixty percent of the regular
property tax on property within the increment area;

(2) Hold a public
hearing on the proposed financing of the public improvement in whole or in part
with community revitalization financing. Notice of the public hearing must be
published in the official local government newspaper at least ten days before
the public hearing and posted in at least six conspicuous public places located
in the proposed increment area. Notices must describe the contemplated public
improvements, estimate the costs of the public improvements, describe the
portion of the costs of the public improvements to be borne by community
revitalization financing, describe any other sources of revenue to finance the
public improvements, describe the boundaries of the proposed increment area,
and estimate the period during which community revitalization financing is
contemplated to be used. The public hearing may be held by either the
governing body of the local government, or a committee of the governing body
that includes at least a majority of the whole governing body; and

(3) Adopt an ordinance
establishing the increment area that describes the public improvements,
describes the boundaries of the increment area, estimates the cost of the
public improvements and the portion of these costs to be financed by community
revitalization financing, estimates the time during which regular property
taxes are to be apportioned, provides the date when the apportionment of the
regular property taxes will commence, and finds that the conditions of section
3 of this act are met.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. An increment area may
only be created if voters of the local government creating the increment area
approve a ballot proposition authorizing the creation of the increment area.
The ballot proposition shall be submitted to these voters at a special election
called under RCW 29.13.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Within twenty-five days
after voters of the local government approve a ballot proposition authorizing
creation of the increment area, the local government shall:

(1) Publish notice in a
legal newspaper circulated within the increment area that describes the public
improvement, describes the boundaries of the increment area, and identifies the
location and times where the ordinance and other public information concerning
the public improvement may be inspected; and

(2) Deliver a certified
copy of the ordinance to the county treasurer, the county assessor, and the
governing body of each taxing district within which the increment area is
located.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) Commencing on the
later of either the date established in the ordinance creating the increment
area, or the first day of the calendar year following the passage of the
ordinance, the county treasurer shall distribute receipts from regular taxes
imposed on real property located in the increment area as follows:

(a) Each taxing
district shall receive that portion of its regular property taxes produced by
the rate of tax levied by or for the taxing district on the tax allocation base
value for that community revitalization financing project in the taxing
district, or upon the total assessed value of real property in the taxing
district, whichever is smaller; and

(b) The local
government that created the increment area shall receive an additional portion
of the regular property taxes levied by or for each taxing district upon the
increment value within the increment area. However, the local government that
created the increment area may agree to receive less than the full amount of
this portion as long as bond debt service, reserve, and other bond covenant
requirements are satisfied, in which case the balance of these tax receipts
shall be allocated to the taxing districts that imposed regular property taxes,
or have regular property taxes imposed for them, in the increment area for
collection that year in proportion to their regular tax levy rates for
collection that year. The local government may request that the treasurer
transfer this additional portion of the property taxes to its designated
agent. The portion of the tax receipts distributed to the local government or
its agent under this subsection (1)(b) may only be expended to finance public
improvement costs associated with the public improvements financed in whole or
in part by community revitalization financing.

(2) The county assessor
shall allocate twenty-five percent of any increased real property value
occurring in the increment area to the tax allocation base value and
seventy-five percent to the increment value. This section does not authorize
revaluations of real property by the assessor for property taxation that are
not made in accordance with the assessor's revaluation plan under chapter 84.41
RCW or under other authorized revaluation procedures.

(3) The apportionment
of increases in assessed valuation in an increment area, and the associated
distribution to the local government of receipts from regular property taxes
that are imposed on the increment value, must cease when tax allocation
revenues are no longer necessary or obligated to pay the costs of the public
improvements. Any excess tax allocation revenues and earnings on the tax
allocation revenues remaining at the time the apportionment of tax receipts
terminates must be returned to the county treasurer and distributed to the
taxing districts that imposed regular property taxes, or had regular property
taxes imposed for it, in the increment area for collection that year, in
proportion to the rates of their regular property tax levies for collection
that year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) A local government
designating an increment area and authorizing the use of community
revitalization financing may incur general indebtedness, and issue general
obligation bonds, to finance the public improvements and retire the
indebtedness in whole or in part from tax allocation revenues it receives,
subject to the following requirements:

(a) The ordinance
adopted by the local government creating the increment area and authorizing the
use of community revitalization financing indicates an intent to incur this
indebtedness and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated;
and

(b) The local
government includes this statement of the intent in all notices required by
section 5 of this act.

(2) The general
indebtedness incurred under subsection (1) of this section may be payable from
other tax revenues, the full faith and credit of the local government, and
nontax income, revenues, fees, and rents from the public improvements, as well
as contributions, grants, and nontax money available to the local government
for payment of costs of the public improvements or associated debt service on
the general indebtedness.

(3) In addition to the
requirements in subsection (1) of this section, a local government designating
an increment area and authorizing the use of community revitalization financing
may require the nonpublic participant to provide adequate security to protect
the public investment in the public improvement within the increment area.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A direct or collateral
attack on a public improvement, public improvement ordinance, or increment area
purported to be authorized or created in conformance with applicable legal
requirements, including this chapter, may not be commenced more than thirty
days after publication of notice as required by section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. This chapter supplements
and neither restricts nor limits any powers which the state or any local
government might otherwise have under any laws of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 27.12 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a rural county library district or intercounty rural library district
possesses, a rural county library district or an intercounty rural library
district may provide any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this
act, but this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing
of the public improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a rural county library district or intercounty rural
library district to otherwise participate in the public improvements if that
authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 35.61 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a metropolitan park district possesses, a metropolitan park
district may provide any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this
act, but this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing
of the public improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a metropolitan park district to otherwise participate in
the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 36.32 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a county possesses, a county may provide any public improvement
as defined under section 2 of this act, but this additional authority is
limited to participating in the financing of the public improvements as
provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a county to otherwise participate in the public
improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 36.68 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a park and recreation service area possesses, a park and
recreation service area may provide any public improvement as defined under
section 2 of this act, but this additional authority is limited to
participating in the financing of the public improvements as provided under
section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a park and recreation service area to otherwise
participate in the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 36.69 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a park and recreation district possesses, a park and recreation
district may provide any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this
act, but this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing
of the public improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a park and recreation district to otherwise participate
in the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. A new section is added
to chapter 36.75 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a road district possesses, a road district may provide any
public improvement as defined under section 2 of this act, but this additional
authority is limited to participating in the financing of the public
improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a road district to otherwise participate in the public
improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 52.12 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a fire protection district possesses, a fire protection district
may provide any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this act, but
this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the
public improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a fire protection district to otherwise participate in
the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. A new section is added
to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a port district possesses, a port district may provide any
public improvement as defined under section 2 of this act, but this additional
authority is limited to participating in the financing of the public
improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a port district to otherwise participate in the public
improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. A new section is added
to chapter 54.16 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a public utility district possesses, a public utility district
may provide any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this act, but
this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the public
improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a public utility district to otherwise participate in
the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. A new section is added
to chapter 67.38 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a cultural arts, stadium, and convention center district
possesses, a cultural arts, stadium, and convention center district may provide
any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this act, but this
additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the public
improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a cultural arts, stadium, and convention center district
to otherwise participate in the public improvements if that authority exists
elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. A new section is added
to chapter 68.52 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a cemetery district possesses, a cemetery district may provide
any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this act, but this
additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the public
improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a cemetery district to otherwise participate in the
public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. A new section is added
to chapter 70.44 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a public hospital district possesses, a public hospital district
may provide any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this act, but
this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the
public improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a public hospital district to otherwise participate in
the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. A new section is added
to chapter 86.15 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a flood control zone district possesses, a flood control zone
district may provide any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this
act, but this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing
of the public improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a flood control zone district to otherwise participate
in the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. A new section is added
to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

Limitations on regular
property taxes that are provided in this chapter shall continue in a taxing
district whether or not an increment area exists within the taxing district as
provided under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 and 30 of this act).

Sec. 26. RCW 36.33.220 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 195 s 142 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative
authority of any county may budget, in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 36.40 RCW, and expend any portion of the county road property tax
revenues for any service to be provided in the unincorporated area of the
county notwithstanding any other provision of law, including chapter 36.82 RCW
and RCW 84.52.050 and 84.52.043. County road property tax revenues that are
diverted under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 and 30 of this act) may
be expended as provided under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 and 30
of this act).

Sec. 27. RCW 36.79.140 and 1997 c
81 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

At the time the board
reviews the six-year program of each county each even-numbered year, it shall
consider and shall approve for inclusion in its recommended budget, as required
by RCW 36.79.130, the portion of the rural arterial construction program
scheduled to be performed during the biennial period beginning the following
July 1st. Subject to the appropriations actually approved by the legislature,
the board shall as soon as feasible approve rural arterial trust account funds
to be spent during the ensuing biennium for preliminary proposals in priority
sequence as established pursuant to RCW 36.79.090. Only those counties that
during the preceding twelve months have spent all revenues collected for road
purposes only for such purposes, including traffic law enforcement, as are
allowed to the state by Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution are
eligible to receive funds from the rural arterial trust account((: PROVIDED
HOWEVER)), except that: (1) Counties with a population of
less than eight thousand are exempt from this eligibility restriction((:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)); (2) counties expending revenues
collected for road purposes only on other governmental services after
authorization from the voters of that county under RCW 84.55.050 are also
exempt from this eligibility restriction; and (3) this restriction shall not
apply to any moneys diverted from the road district levy under chapter 39.--
RCW (sections 1 through 11 and 30 of this act). The board shall authorize
rural arterial trust account funds for the construction project portion of a
project previously authorized for a preliminary proposal in the sequence in
which the preliminary proposal has been completed and the construction project
is to be placed under contract. At such time the board may reserve rural
arterial trust account funds for expenditure in future years as may be
necessary for completion of preliminary proposals and construction projects to be
commenced in the ensuing biennium.

The board may, within
the constraints of available rural arterial trust funds, consider additional
projects for authorization upon a clear and conclusive showing by the
submitting county that the proposed project is of an emergent nature and that
its need was unable to be anticipated at the time the six-year program of the
county was developed. The proposed projects shall be evaluated on the basis of
the priority rating factors specified in RCW 36.79.080.

Sec. 28. RCW 36.82.040 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 195 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of
raising revenue for establishing, laying out, constructing, altering,
repairing, improving, and maintaining county roads, bridges, and wharves
necessary for vehicle ferriage and for other proper county purposes, the board
shall annually at the time of making the levy for general purposes make a
uniform tax levy throughout the county, or any road district thereof, of not to
exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value
of the last assessed valuation of the taxable property in the county, or road
district thereof, unless other law of the state requires a lower maximum levy,
in which event such lower maximum levy shall control. All funds accruing from
such levy shall be credited to and deposited in the county road fund except
that revenue diverted under RCW 36.33.220 shall be placed in a separate and
identifiable account within the county current expense fund and except that
revenue diverted under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 and 30 of this
act) shall be expended as provided under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through
11 and 30 of this act).

Sec. 29. RCW 46.68.124 and 1990 c
33 s 586 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The equivalent
population for each county shall be computed as the sum of the population
residing in the county's unincorporated area plus twenty-five percent of the
population residing in the county's incorporated area. Population figures
required for the computations in this subsection shall be certified by the
director of the office of financial management on or before July 1st of each
odd-numbered year.

(2) The total annual
road cost for each county shall be computed as the sum of one twenty-fifth of
the total estimated county road replacement cost, plus the total estimated
annual maintenance cost. Appropriate costs for bridges and ferries shall be
included. The county road administration board shall be responsible for
establishing a uniform system of roadway categories for both maintenance and
construction and also for establishing a single statewide cost per mile rate
for each roadway category. The total annual cost for each county will be based
on the established statewide cost per mile and associated mileage for each
category. The mileage to be used for these computations shall be as shown in
the county road log as maintained by the county road administration board as of
July 1, 1985, and each two years thereafter. Each county shall be responsible
for submitting changes, corrections, and deletions as regards the county road
log to the county road administration board. Such changes, corrections, and
deletions shall be subject to verification and approval by the county road
administration board prior to inclusion in the county road log.

(3) The money need
factor for each county shall be the county's total annual road cost less the
following four amounts:

(a) One-half the sum of
the actual county road tax levied upon the valuation of all taxable property
within the county road districts pursuant to RCW 36.82.040, including any
amount of such tax diverted under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 and
30 of this act), for the two calendar years next preceding the year of
computation of the allocation amounts as certified by the department of
revenue;

(b) One-half the sum of
all funds received by the county road fund from the federal forest reserve fund
pursuant to RCW 28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020 during the two calendar years next
preceding the year of computation of the allocation amounts as certified by the
state treasurer;

(c) One-half the sum of
timber excise taxes received by the county road fund pursuant to chapter 84.33
RCW in the two calendar years next preceding the year of computation of the
allocation amounts as certified by the state treasurer;

(d) One-half the sum of
motor vehicle license fees and motor vehicle and special fuel taxes refunded to
the county, pursuant to RCW 46.68.080 during the two calendar years next
preceding the year of computation of the allocation amounts as certified by the
state treasurer.

(4) The state treasurer
and the department of revenue shall furnish to the county road administration
board the information required by subsection (3) of this section on or before
July 1st of each odd-numbered year.

(5) The county road
administration board, shall compute and provide to the counties the allocation
factors of the several counties on or before September 1st of each year based
solely upon the sources of information herein before required: PROVIDED, That
the allocation factor shall be held to a level not more than five percent above
or five percent below the allocation factor in use during the previous calendar
year. Upon computation of the actual allocation factors of the several
counties, the county road administration board shall provide such factors to
the state treasurer to be used in the computation of the counties' fuel tax
allocation for the succeeding calendar year. The state treasurer shall adjust
the fuel tax allocation of each county on January 1st of every year based
solely upon the information provided by the county road administration board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
30. Sections 1 through 11 of
this act expire July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
31. Sections 1 through 11 and
30 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 32. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---