BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
46.20.740 and 1997 c 229 s 10 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) The department shall attach or imprint a
notation on the

_8 ((driver's license)) driving record of any
person restricted under

_9 RCW 46.20.720 stating that the person may operate only a
motor

10 vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock or other
biological or

11 technical device.

12 (2) It is a misdemeanor for a person with such a
notation on

13 his or her ((driver's license)) driving record
to operate a motor

14 vehicle that is not so equipped.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 HB
1419