BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.400.285 and 1997
c 267 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a school
district or educational service district enters into a contract for services
that had been previously performed by classified school employees, the contract
shall contain a specific clause requiring the contractor to provide for persons
performing such services under the contract, health and retirement
benefits that are ((similar to)) at least the same value as those
provided for school employees who would otherwise perform the work, but in no
case are such health benefits required to be greater than the benefits provided
for basic health care services under chapter 70.47 RCW. The contract shall
also contain a specific clause requiring the contractor to provide to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction the same employee
information that a school district or educational service district is required
to provide.

(2) Decisions to enter
into contracts for services by a school district or educational service
district may only be made: (a) After the affected district has conducted a
feasibility study determining the potential costs and benefits, including the
impact on district employees who would otherwise perform the work, that would
result from contracting for the services; (b) after the decision to contract
for the services has been reviewed and approved by the superintendent of public
instruction; and (c) subject to any applicable requirements for collective
bargaining. The factors to be considered in the feasibility study shall be
developed in consultation with representatives of the affected employees and
may include both long-term and short-term effects of the proposal to contract
for services.

(3) This section
applies only if a contract is for services performed by classified school
employees on or after July 25, 1993.

(4) This section does
not apply to:

(a) Temporary,
nonongoing, or nonrecurring service contracts; or

(b) Contracts for
services previously performed by employees in director/supervisor,
professional, and technical positions.

(5) For the purposes of
subsection (4) of this section:

(a)
"Director/supervisor position" means a position in which an employee
directs staff members and manages a function, a program, or a support service.

(b) "Professional
position" means a position for which an employee is required to have a
high degree of knowledge and skills acquired through a baccalaureate degree or
its equivalent.

(c)
"Technical position" means a position for which an employee is
required to have a combination of knowledge and skills that can be obtained
through approximately two years of posthigh school education, such as from a
community or technical college, or by on-the-job training.

--- END ---