BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.210.260 and 2000
c 63 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Public school districts
and private schools which conduct any of grades kindergarten through the
twelfth grade may provide for the administration of oral medication of any
nature to students who are in the custody of the school district or school at
the time of administration, but are not required to do so by this section,
subject to the following conditions:

(1) The board of
directors of the public school district or the governing board of the private
school or, if none, the chief administrator of the private school shall adopt
policies which address the designation and written agreement of
employees who may administer oral medications to students, the acquisition of
parent requests and instructions, and the acquisition of requests from licensed
health professionals prescribing within the scope of their prescriptive
authority and instructions regarding students who require medication for more
than fifteen consecutive school days, the identification of the medication to
be administered, the means of safekeeping medications with special attention
given to the safeguarding of legend drugs as defined in chapter 69.41 RCW, and
the means of maintaining a record of the administration of such medication and
written agreement of employees;

(2) The board of
directors shall seek advice from one or more licensed physicians or nurses in
the course of developing the foregoing policies;

(3) The public school
district or private school is in receipt of a written, current and unexpired
request from a parent, or a legal guardian, or other person having legal
control over the student to administer the medication to the student;

(4) The public school
district or the private school is in receipt of (a) a written, current and
unexpired request from a licensed health professional prescribing within the
scope of his or her prescriptive authority for administration of the
medication, as there exists a valid health reason which makes administration of
such medication advisable during the hours when school is in session or the
hours in which the student is under the supervision of school officials, and
(b) written, current and unexpired instructions from such licensed health professional
prescribing within the scope of his or her prescriptive authority regarding the
administration of prescribed medication to students who require medication for
more than fifteen consecutive work days;

(5) The medication is
administered by an employee designated by or pursuant to the policies adopted
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and in substantial compliance with
the prescription of a licensed health professional prescribing within the scope
of his or her prescriptive authority or the written instructions provided
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section;

(6) The medication is
first examined by the employee administering the same to determine in his or
her judgment that it appears to be in the original container and to be properly
labeled; ((and))

(7) The board of
directors shall designate a professional person licensed pursuant to chapter
18.71 RCW or chapter 18.79 RCW as it applies to registered nurses and advanced
registered nurse practitioners, to train and supervise the designated school
district personnel in proper medication procedures; and

(8) School district
employees, not licensed under chapter 18.79 or 18.88A RCW, if student safety is
involved, may file a written letter of refusal to administer oral medications
to students with the school district. This written letter of refusal may not
serve as grounds for employee dismissal or termination of employment, however,
the letter of refusal may result in a reduction of the employees' work hours if
the refusal results in a need to hire additional personnel to administer oral
medications.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.210.280 and 1994
sp.s. c 9 s 721 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Public school
districts and private schools that offer classes for any of grades kindergarten
through twelve may provide for clean, intermittent bladder catheterization of
students, or assisted self-catheterization of students pursuant to RCW
18.79.290, if the catheterization is provided for in substantial compliance
with:

(a) Rules adopted by
the state nursing care quality assurance commission and the instructions of a
registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner issued under such
rules; and

(b) Written policies of
the school district or private school which shall be adopted in order to
implement this section and shall be developed in accordance with such
requirements of chapters 41.56 and 41.59 RCW as may be applicable.

(2) School district
employees, not licensed under chapter 18.79 or 18.88A RCW, if student safety is
involved, may file a written letter of refusal to perform clean, intermittent
bladder catheterization of students. This written letter of refusal may not
serve as grounds for employee dismissal or termination of employment, however,
the letter of refusal may result in a reduction of the employees' work hours if
the refusal results in a need to hire additional personnel to administer clean
intermittent bladder catheterizations.

(3)
This section does not require school districts to provide intermittent bladder
catheterization of students.

---
END ---