BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that the number of

_5 vulnerable adults is growing because of demographics and
longer

_6 life expectancies. Crimes against vulnerable adults,
and neglect,

_7 exploitation, abuse, and sexual abuse of vulnerable
adults are

_8 increasing. The state has a compelling interest in making
it

_9 possible for the courts to adequately and fairly conduct
cases

10 involving vulnerable adult victims.

11 The legislature further finds that court proceedings
involving

12 vulnerable adults may be hindered or precluded by memory
problems

13 associated with the length of time between the act or
crime and

14 the related court proceedings, even though the
vulnerable adult

15 made a reliable statement about the crime or event
shortly after

16 it occurred. Court proceedings involving vulnerable
adults may also

17 be hindered or precluded by the unavailability of the
vulnerable

18 adults as witnesses because of their shorter life
expectancy,

p. 1 HB
1425

_1 their physical or mental condition, or because their
participation

_2 in the trial or proceeding has a substantial likelihood
of

_3 resulting in significant emotional, mental, or physical
harm.

_4 The legislature intends that this chapter make
admissible as

_5 evidence the reliable hearsay of vulnerable adults
beyond what is

_6 currently admissible, while respecting the
constitutional rights

_7 of other parties. The legislature recognizes that the
courts have

_8 implemented the child hearsay statute, RCW 9A.44.120, to
balance

_9 concerns about the reliability of children's hearsay
statements

10 with the public interest in facilitating court cases
involving the

11 protection of children. The legislature recognizes
similar issues

12 are present in proceedings involving vulnerable adult
victims. For

13 that reason, courts may find guidance in State v.
Ryan, 103 Wn.2d

14 165 (1984), while recognizing the different factors set
forth in

15 this chapter as well as other factors that may apply to
vulnerable

16 adults. The legislature intends this chapter to
facilitate fair and

17 just adjudication of criminal, juvenile, and civil cases
involving

18 vulnerable adults in this state.

19 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in
this section apply

20 throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires

21 otherwise.

22 (1) "Abuse" means willfully or negligently
causing any bodily

23 injury, pain, or mental anguish to a vulnerable adult.

24 (2) "Exploitation" means:

25 (a) Obtaining, using, or attempting to obtain or
use, the

26 property or services of a vulnerable adult for the
benefit of

27 someone other than the vulnerable adult, by:

28 (i) Deception, intimidation, or the use of undue
influence; or

29 (ii) A person who knows or reasonably should know
that the

30 vulnerable adult lacks the capacity to consent; or

31 (b) Forcing, compelling, or exerting undue influence
over a

32 vulnerable adult causing the vulnerable adult to perform
a service

33 or act, or to refrain from acting, in a way that benefits
someone

34 other than the vulnerable adult.

35 (3) "Neglect" means the failure by one
having a duty of care to

36 a vulnerable adult to provide the goods or services
necessary to

37 maintain the physical or mental health of a vulnerable

HB 1425 p. 2

_1 adult. Neglect may be based on either repeated conduct,
or on a

_2 single incident or omission that demonstrates a serious
disregard

_3 for the safety or welfare of a vulnerable adult.

_4 (4) "Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual
sexual

_5 contact, including but not limited to indecent
liberties, rape,

_6 sexual coercion, sexually explicit photographing, and
sexual

_7 harassment. Sexual abuse also means any sexual contact,
whether or

_8 not it is consensual, between:

_9 (a) Any person and a mentally incapacitated person
or

10 physically helpless person, as both terms are defined in
RCW

11 9A.44.010; or

12 (b) A vulnerable adult living in a facility or
receiving

13 service from a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW,
and a

14 staff person of the facility or employee of the program,
unless

15 the staff person is also a resident or client of the
facility or

16 program.

17 (5) "Sexual contact" means any touching of
the sexual or other

18 intimate parts of a person done for the purpose of
gratifying the

19 sexual desire of either party or a third party.

20 (6) "Unavailable" means the vulnerable
adult is unavailable

21 under ER 804 in the Washington state court rules of
evidence.

22 (7) "Vulnerable adult" means a person:

23 (a) Sixty years of age or older who has the
functional, mental,

24 or physical inability to care for himself or herself, or
his or

25 her finances; or

26 (b) Who is eighteen years of age or older and has
been found by

27 a court to be incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW; or

28 (c) Who is eighteen years of age or older and has a

29 developmental disability as defined under RCW
71A.10.020; or

30 (d) Who is eighteen years of age or older and a
resident of a

31 facility for adults licensed or required to be licensed
by the

32 department of social and health services, including but
not

33 limited to nursing homes, adult family homes, and
boarding homes;

34 or

35 (e) Who is eighteen years of age or older and
receives services

36 from a home health, hospice, or home care agency as
defined in

37 chapter 70.127 RCW, or receives similar services from an

38 individual.

p. 3 HB
1425

_1

_2 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. An out-of-court
statement made by a

_3 vulnerable adult describing a crime committed against,
or neglect,

_4 exploitation, abuse, or sexual abuse of a vulnerable
adult

_5 declarant, is admissible in evidence in a civil,
criminal, or

_6 juvenile offense adjudication proceeding if:

_7 (1) The court finds in a hearing conducted outside
the presence

_8 of the jury, if any, that the time, content, and
circumstances of

_9 the statement provide sufficient indicia of
reliability. In making

10 its determination, the court may consider: (a) The
reliability of

11 the declarant; (b) the timing of the declaration; (c)
whether the

12 declarant had an apparent motive to lie; (d) the
relationship of

13 the declarant to the witness; (e) the relationship of
the

14 declarant to the actor; (f) whether the declarant made
the

15 statement to more than one person; (g) the mental and
physical

16 condition and cognitive ability of the vulnerable adult;
(h) the

17 nature and duration of the crime, neglect, abuse, sexual
abuse, or

18 exploitation; and (i) any other factor deemed
appropriate; and

19 (2) The vulnerable adult either:

20 (a) Testifies; or

21 (b) The court finds the vulnerable adult is
unavailable as a

22 witness, but when the vulnerable adult is unavailable as
a

23 witness, the statement may be admitted only if there is

24 corroborative evidence of the act.

25 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A statement may not
be admitted under this

26 chapter unless the proponent of the statement gives
notice to the

27 adverse party of his or her intention to offer the
statement and

28 the particulars of the statement sufficiently in advance
of the

29 proceedings to provide the adverse party with a fair
opportunity

30 to challenge the admissibility of the statement at a
hearing. The

31 court shall state the basis for its ruling by making
specific

32 findings of fact on the record.

33 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4
of this act

34 constitute a new chapter in Title 74 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

HB 1425 p. 4