BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.20.020 and 2000 c
47 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Aged
person" means a person of the age sixty-five years or more, or a person of
less than sixty-five years who by reason of infirmity requires domiciliary
care.

(2) "Boarding
home" means any home or other institution, however named, which is
advertised, announced, or maintained for the express or implied purpose of
providing board and domiciliary care to seven or more aged persons not related
by blood or marriage to the operator. However, a boarding home that is
licensed to provide board and domiciliary care to three to six persons on July
1, 2000, may maintain its boarding home license as long as it is continually
licensed as a boarding home. "Boarding home" shall not include
facilities certified as group training homes pursuant to RCW 71A.22.040, nor
any home, institution or section thereof which is otherwise licensed and
regulated under the provisions of state law providing specifically for the
licensing and regulation of such home, institution or section thereof. Nor
shall it include any independent senior housing, independent living units in
continuing care retirement communities, or other similar living situations
including those subsidized by the department of housing and urban development.

(3) "Person"
means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, or
joint stock association, and the legal successor thereof.

(4)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

(5)
"Department" means the state department of social and health
services.

(6)
"Serious" means a violation of a licensing requirement contained in
or adopted under this chapter, or a contract requirement contained in or
adopted under chapter 74.39A RCW, as applicable, that: (a) Causes actual harm
to a resident and the level of harm is more than minimal; or (b) indicates
there are systemic factors underlying the violation which, if uncorrected, will
with reasonable certainty cause significant harm to a resident or residents.

(7)
"Recurring" means a violation of the same regulation on three consecutive
licensing inspections or complaint investigations, or any combination thereof.

(8) "Imminent
danger" means a violation of a licensing requirement contained in or
adopted under this chapter, or a contract requirement contained in or adopted
under chapter 74.39A RCW, as applicable, that causes significant physical harm
to or death of a resident, or creates a significant and immediate threat to a
resident's life, health, or safety.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.20.110 and 2000 c
47 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
make or cause to be made at least a yearly inspection and investigation of all
boarding homes. Every inspection shall focus primarily on actual or potential
resident outcomes, and may include an inspection of every part of the premises
and an examination of all records (other than financial records), methods of
administration, the general and special dietary, and the stores and methods of
supply.

(1) Inspections
should be outcome based and responsive to resident complaints and a clear set
of health, quality of care, and safety standards that are easily understandable
and have been made available to boarding homes. This includes that when
conducting licensing inspections, the department shall interview an appropriate
percentage of residents, family members, and advocates in addition to
interviewing appropriate staff.

(2) Prompt and
specific enforcement remedies shall also be implemented without delay,
consistent with RCW 18.20.190, for boarding homes found to have delivered care
or failed to deliver care resulting in problems that are serious, recurring, or
uncorrected, or that create imminent danger to one or more residents. These
enforcement remedies may also include, when appropriate, reasonable conditions
on a license. In the selection of remedies, the safety, health, and well-being
of residents shall be of paramount importance and consistent with RCW
18.20.190. Whenever appropriate, the department shall provide technical
assistance to the facility.

(3) To the extent
funding is available, the licensee, administrator, and their staff should be
screened through background checks in a uniform and timely manner to ensure
that they do not have a criminal history that would disqualify them from
working with vulnerable adults. Employees may be provisionally hired pending
the results of the background check if they have been given three positive
references.

(4) No licensee,
administrator, or staff, or prospective licensee, administrator, or staff, with
a stipulated finding of fact, conclusion of law, and agreed order, or finding
of fact, conclusion of law, or final order issued by a disciplining authority,
a court of law, or entered into the state registry finding him or her guilty of
abuse, neglect, exploitation, or abandonment of a minor or a vulnerable adult
as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW shall be employed in the care of and have
unsupervised access to vulnerable adults.

Following such an
inspection or inspections, written notice of any violation of this law or the
rules adopted hereunder shall be given to the applicant or licensee and the
department. The department may prescribe by rule that any licensee or
applicant desiring to make specified types of alterations or additions to its
facilities or to construct new facilities shall, before commencing such
alteration, addition, or new construction, submit plans and specifications
therefor to the agencies responsible for plan reviews for preliminary
inspection and approval or recommendations with respect to compliance with the
rules and standards herein authorized.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.20.185 and 1997 c
392 s 214 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish and maintain a toll-free telephone number for receiving
complaints regarding a ((facility)) boarding home that the
department licenses.

(2) All ((facilities))
boarding homes that are licensed under this chapter shall post in a
place and manner clearly visible to residents and visitors the department's
toll-free complaint telephone number and the toll-free number and program
description of the long-term care ombudsman as provided by RCW 43.190.050.

(3) The department
shall investigate complaints if the subject of the complaint is within its
authority unless the department determines that: (a) The complaint is intended
to willfully harass a licensee or employee of the licensee; or (b) there is no
reasonable basis for investigation; or (c) corrective action has been taken as
determined by the ombudsman or the department.

(4) The department
shall refer complaints to appropriate state agencies, law enforcement agencies,
the attorney general, the long-term care ombudsman, or other entities if the
department lacks authority to investigate or if its investigation reveals that
a follow-up referral to one or more of these entities is appropriate.

(5) The department
shall adopt rules that include the following complaint investigation protocols:

(a) Upon receipt of a
complaint, the department shall make a preliminary review of the complaint,
assess the severity of the complaint, and assign an appropriate response time.
Complaints involving imminent danger to the health, safety, or well-being of a
resident must be responded to within two days. When appropriate, the
department shall make an on-site investigation within a reasonable time after
receipt of the complaint or otherwise ensure that complaints are responded to.

(b) The complainant
must be: Promptly contacted by the department, unless anonymous or unavailable
despite several attempts by the department, and informed of the right to
discuss alleged violations with the inspector and to provide other information
the complainant believes will assist the inspector; informed of the
department's course of action; and informed of the right to receive a written
copy of the investigation report.

(c) In conducting the
investigation, the department shall interview the complainant, unless
anonymous, and shall use its best efforts to interview the resident or
residents allegedly harmed by the violations, and, in addition to ((facility))
boarding home staff, any available independent sources of relevant
information, including if appropriate the family members of the resident.

(d) Substantiated
complaints involving harm to a resident, if an applicable law or regulation has
been violated, shall be subject to one or more of the actions provided in RCW
18.20.190. Whenever appropriate, the department shall also give consultation
and technical assistance to the facility.

(e) ((In the best
practices of total quality management and continuous quality improvement,))
After a department finding of a violation that is serious or causes
or creates imminent danger to one or more residents, ((recurring, or
uncorrected following a previous citation,)) the department shall make an
on-site revisit of the ((facility)) boarding home, within five
working days from the date of the request for revisit, to ensure correction
of the violation. For other violations that are not serious or do not cause
or create imminent changer to one or more residents, the department may make an
on-site revisit to ensure correction of the violation, or accept the licensee's
written statement demonstrating correction of the violation or violations if
the department finds the written statement credible. This subsection does
not prevent the department from enforcing license suspensions or revocations.

(f) Substantiated
complaints of neglect, abuse, exploitation, or abandonment of residents, or
suspected criminal violations, shall also be referred by the department to the
appropriate law enforcement agencies, the attorney general, and appropriate
professional disciplining authority.

(6) The department may
provide the substance of the complaint to the licensee before the completion of
the investigation by the department unless such disclosure would reveal the
identity of a complainant, witness, or resident who chooses to remain
anonymous. Neither the substance of the complaint provided to the licensee or
contractor nor any copy of the complaint or related report published, released,
or made otherwise available shall disclose, or reasonably lead to the
disclosure of, the name, title, or identity of any complainant, or other person
mentioned in the complaint, except that the name of the provider and the name
or names of any officer, employee, or agent of the department conducting the
investigation shall be disclosed after the investigation has been closed and
the complaint has been substantiated. The department may disclose the identity
of the complainant if such disclosure is requested in writing by the
complainant. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to interfere with
the obligation of the long-term care ombudsman program to monitor the
department's licensing, contract, and complaint investigation files for
long-term care facilities.

(7) The resident has
the right to be free of interference, coercion, discrimination, and reprisal
from a ((facility)) boarding home in exercising his or her
rights, including the right to voice grievances about treatment furnished or
not furnished. A ((facility)) boarding home licensed under this
chapter shall not discriminate or retaliate in any manner against a resident,
employee, or any other person on the basis or for the reason that such resident
or any other person made a complaint to the department, the attorney general,
law enforcement agencies, or the long-term care ombudsman, provided
information, or otherwise cooperated with the investigation of such a
complaint. Any attempt to discharge a resident against the resident's wishes,
or any type of retaliatory treatment of a resident by whom or upon whose behalf
a complaint substantiated by the department has been made to the department,
the attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the long-term care
ombudsman, within one year of the filing of the complaint, raises a rebuttable
presumption that such action was in retaliation for the filing of the
complaint. "Retaliatory treatment" means, but is not limited to,
monitoring a resident's phone, mail, or visits; involuntary seclusion or
isolation; transferring a resident to a different room unless requested or
based upon legitimate management reasons; withholding or threatening to
withhold food or treatment unless authorized by a terminally ill resident or
his or her representative pursuant to law; or persistently delaying responses
to a resident's request for service or assistance. A ((facility)) boarding
home licensed under this chapter shall not willfully interfere with the
performance of official duties by a long-term care ombudsman. The department
shall sanction and may impose a civil penalty of not more than three thousand
dollars for a violation of this subsection.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.20.190 and 2000 c
47 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
social and health services is authorized to take one or more of the actions
listed in subsection (2) of this section in any case in which the department
finds that a boarding home provider has:

(a) Failed or refused
to comply with the requirements of this chapter or the rules adopted under this
chapter or chapter 74.39A RCW, as applicable, except for one or more
violations that (i) are not serious or do not cause or create imminent danger
to one or more residents, unless such violations are recurring, and (ii) are
corrected prior to the last day of the department's on-site visit;

(b) Operated a boarding
home without a license or under a revoked license;

(c) Knowingly, or with
reason to know, made a false statement of material fact on his or her
application for license or any data attached thereto, or in any matter under
investigation by the department; or

(d) Willfully prevented
or interfered with any inspection or investigation by the department.

(2) When authorized by
subsection (1) of this section, the department may take one or more of the
following actions:

(a) Refuse to issue a
license under this chapter or a contract under chapter 74.39A RCW;

(b) Impose reasonable
conditions on a license or a contract, as applicable, such as correction
within a specified time, training, and limits on the type of clients the
provider may admit or serve;

(c) Impose civil
penalties of not more than one hundred dollars per day per violation;

(d) Suspend, revoke, or
refuse to renew a license under this chapter, or a contract under chapter
74.39A RCW, for one or more violations that are serious and recurring or that
cause or create imminent danger to one or more residents, and the licensee
either refuses to correct the violation or violations or is unable to
demonstrate good faith progress to correct; or

(e) Suspend admissions
to the boarding home by imposing stop placement for one or more violations
that are serious, whether or not they are also recurring, or for a violation
that causes or creates imminent danger to one or more residents.

(3) When the department
orders stop placement, the facility shall not admit any new resident until the
stop placement order is terminated. The department may approve readmission of
a resident to the facility from a hospital or nursing home during the stop
placement. The department shall terminate the stop placement when: (a) The
violations necessitating the stop placement have been corrected; and (b) the
provider exhibits the capacity to maintain ((adequate care and service))
compliance with the particular law or regulation which necessitated the stop
placement.

(4) After a
department finding of a violation that is serious or causes or creates imminent
danger to one or more residents, the department shall make an on-site revisit
of the boarding home, within five working days from the date of the request for
revisit, to ensure correction of the violation. For other violations that are
not serious or do not cause or create imminent danger to one or more residents,
the department may make an on-site revisit to ensure correction of the
violation, or accept the licensee's written statement demonstrating correction
of the violation or violations, if the department finds the written statement
is credible.

(5) RCW
43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial, revocation, suspension, or
modification. Chapter 34.05 RCW ((applies)) and section 5 of this
act apply to department actions under this section, except that orders of
the department imposing license suspension, stop placement, or conditions for
continuation of a license are effective immediately upon notice and shall
continue pending any hearing.

(6) In addition to
the rights granted under subsection (5) of this section, the licensee shall
have the right to contest any department finding of noncompliance with any laws
and regulations that govern boarding homes, using the informal dispute
resolution process described in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 18.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall develop, to the extent necessary, and make available to a boarding home
licensee or its designee at least two optional processes from which the
licensee or designee may choose to dispute any violation found or enforcement
remedy imposed by the department during a licensing inspection or complaint
investigation. The purpose of each of the informal dispute resolution processes
is to give the licensee, or its designee, an opportunity to present information
that may lead to the modification, deletion, or removal of a violation, or
parts of a violation, or enforcement remedy imposed.

(2) The two processes
from which the licensee, or its designee, may choose to informally dispute any
violation found during, or enforcement remedy imposed as a result of, a
complaint or licensing inspection must, at a minimum, include the following
options:

(a) Review by a field
manager or regional administrator, or however they may later be designated, to
determine the validity or appropriateness, in whole or in part, of the
violation or violations, or enforcement remedy or remedies. The field manager
or regional manager who reviews the validity or appropriateness of any disputed
violation cited or enforcement remedy imposed must be selected by the licensee,
or its designee.

(b) Review by a person
who acts as a mediator to assist in determining the validity or
appropriateness, in whole or in part, of the violation or violations or
enforcement remedy or remedies. The mediator must be chosen through mutual agreement
by the boarding home licensee, or its designee, and the department. The
licensee shall bear the cost, if any, of obtaining the services of the
mediator.

(3) The licensee's
field manager shall review and send to the licensee, within ten working days,
commencing from the completion date of the licensing inspection or complaint
investigation, a written description of the violations found and a written
notice of any enforcement remedy or remedies that may be imposed under RCW
18.20.190. At the same time, the department shall, in writing, inform the
licensee of the informal dispute resolution processes that are available to it,
under subsection (2) of this section, to contest any violation cited or
enforcement remedy imposed.

(4) The licensee, or
its designee, shall, within ten working days of the date on which the statement
of violations and any enforcement notice is mailed, send its written request
for informal dispute resolution. In the written request for informal dispute
resolution, the licensee, or its designee, shall identify the process chosen
and identify the violation or violations or enforcement remedy or remedies that
are being disputed. The written request for informal dispute resolution must
be sent to the department. Within this same time period, the licensee, or its
designee, shall submit to the department a plan of correction to address the
undisputed violations.

(5) If the licensee, or
its designee, requests the informal dispute resolution process described under
subsection (2)(a) of this section, the department shall convene the meeting
within ten working days of the receipt of the request for informal dispute
resolution, unless a later date is agreed upon by both the licensee, or its
designee, and the department.

(6) If the licensee, or
its designee, requests the informal dispute resolution process described under
subsection (2)(b) of this section, the department and the licensee, or its
designee, shall, within five working days of the receipt of the request for
informal dispute resolution, mutually agree upon a person to serve as a
mediator. The meeting must be scheduled as soon as possible and at a time that
is mutually agreed to by the department, the mediator, and the licensee, or its
designee.

(7) The licensee, or
its designee, shall submit to the department or the mediator documents or other
material that the licensee, or its designee, believes will support its
contention that the violation or violations or enforcement remedy or remedies
should not have been cited or imposed. The documents or other material that
the licensee chooses to submit must be submitted in advance of the scheduled
meeting date and must be considered by the department or the mediator prior to
a determination being rendered.

(8) When the informal
dispute resolution under subsection (2) of this section has been requested by
the licensee, or its designee, the field manager or the regional administrator,
whoever participated in the informal dispute resolution meeting, shall submit a
written decision to the licensee, or its designee, within ten working days
following the conclusion of the informal dispute resolution meeting.

(9) If the field
manager or the regional administrator determines that a violation or
enforcement remedy should not be cited or imposed, the field manager or
regional administrator shall mark the violation deleted, make the necessary
change, or immediately rescind or modify the enforcement remedy imposed. The
document must be signed and dated by the field manager or the regional administrator.

(a) If the violation or
enforcement remedy is modified, deleted, or rescinded, the licensee, or its
designee, may request from the department a clean copy of the revised report or
notice of enforcement action.

(b) If the licensee, or
its designee, requests a clean copy of the report, the licensee, or its
designee, shall complete a plan of correction, if required by the department,
based on the clean or revised report and submit it to the department within
five days of receipt of the revised or clean report. The plan of correction,
if required by the department, must address all violations that still remain
following informal dispute resolution even though the licensee, or its
designee, may wish to seek redress under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(10) If, after the
informal dispute meeting, the licensee, or its designee, still disagrees with
the violation cited or enforcement remedy imposed, the licensee, or its
designee, may request a formal hearing pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, within
twenty‑eight calendar days following receipt of the notice of the written
decision under subsection (8) of this section.

(11) The request for
informal dispute resolution under this chapter, or the request for a formal
hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW, does not delay the effective date of any
enforcement remedy imposed against the licensee, except that civil monetary
fines are not payable until the licensee exhausts his or her appeal rights
provided under this chapter.

Sec. 6. RCW 74.39A.060 and 1999
c 176 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The aging and adult
services administration of the department shall establish and maintain a
toll-free telephone number for receiving complaints regarding a facility that
the administration licenses or with which it contracts for long-term care
services.

(2) All facilities that
are licensed by, or that contract with the aging and adult services
administration to provide chronic long-term care services shall post in a place
and manner clearly visible to residents and visitors the department's toll-free
complaint telephone number and the toll-free number and program description of
the long-term care ombudsman as provided by RCW 43.190.050.

(3) The aging and adult
services administration shall investigate complaints if the subject of the
complaint is within its authority unless the department determines that: (a)
The complaint is intended to willfully harass a licensee or employee of the
licensee; or (b) there is no reasonable basis for investigation; or (c)
corrective action has been taken as determined by the ombudsman or the
department.

(4) The aging and adult
services administration shall refer complaints to appropriate state agencies,
law enforcement agencies, the attorney general, the long-term care ombudsman,
or other entities if the department lacks authority to investigate or if its
investigation reveals that a follow-up referral to one or more of these
entities is appropriate.

(5) The department
shall adopt rules that include the following complaint investigation protocols:

(a) Upon receipt of a
complaint, the department shall make a preliminary review of the complaint,
assess the severity of the complaint, and assign an appropriate response time.
Complaints involving imminent danger to the health, safety, or well-being of a
resident must be responded to within two days. When appropriate, the
department shall make an on-site investigation within a reasonable time after
receipt of the complaint or otherwise ensure that complaints are responded to.

(b) The complainant
must be: Promptly contacted by the department, unless anonymous or unavailable
despite several attempts by the department, and informed of the right to
discuss the alleged violations with the inspector and to provide other
information the complainant believes will assist the inspector; informed of the
department's course of action; and informed of the right to receive a written
copy of the investigation report.

(c) In conducting the
investigation, the department shall interview the complainant, unless
anonymous, and shall use its best efforts to interview the vulnerable adult or
adults allegedly harmed, and, consistent with the protection of the vulnerable
adult shall interview facility staff, any available independent sources of
relevant information, including if appropriate the family members of the
vulnerable adult.

(d) Substantiated
complaints involving harm to a resident, if an applicable law or rule has been
violated, shall be subject to one or more of the actions provided in RCW ((74.39A.080
or)) 70.128.160. Whenever appropriate, the department shall also give
consultation and technical assistance to the provider.

(e) In the best
practices of total quality management and continuous quality improvement, after
a department finding of a violation that is serious, recurring, or uncorrected
following a previous citation, the department shall make an on-site revisit of
the facility to ensure correction of the violation, except for license or contract
suspensions or revocations.

(f) Substantiated
complaints of neglect, abuse, exploitation, or abandonment of residents, or
suspected criminal violations, shall also be referred by the department to the
appropriate law enforcement agencies, the attorney general, and appropriate
professional disciplining authority.

(6) The department may
provide the substance of the complaint to the licensee or contractor before the
completion of the investigation by the department unless such disclosure would
reveal the identity of a complainant, witness, or resident who chooses to
remain anonymous. Neither the substance of the complaint provided to the
licensee or contractor nor any copy of the complaint or related report
published, released, or made otherwise available shall disclose, or reasonably
lead to the disclosure of, the name, title, or identity of any complainant, or
other person mentioned in the complaint, except that the name of the provider
and the name or names of any officer, employee, or agent of the department
conducting the investigation shall be disclosed after the investigation has
been closed and the complaint has been substantiated. The department may
disclose the identity of the complainant if such disclosure is requested in
writing by the complainant. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
interfere with the obligation of the long-term care ombudsman program or
department staff to monitor the department's licensing, contract, and complaint
investigation files for long-term care facilities.

(7) The resident has
the right to be free of interference, coercion, discrimination, and reprisal
from a facility in exercising his or her rights, including the right to voice
grievances about treatment furnished or not furnished. A facility that provides
long-term care services shall not discriminate or retaliate in any manner
against a resident, employee, or any other person on the basis or for the
reason that such resident or any other person made a complaint to the
department, the attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the long-term
care ombudsman, provided information, or otherwise cooperated with the
investigation of such a complaint. Any attempt to discharge a resident against
the resident's wishes, or any type of retaliatory treatment of a resident by
whom or upon whose behalf a complaint substantiated by the department has been
made to the department, the attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the
long-term care ombudsman, within one year of the filing of the complaint, raises
a rebuttable presumption that such action was in retaliation for the filing of
the complaint. "Retaliatory treatment" means, but is not limited to,
monitoring a resident's phone, mail, or visits; involuntary seclusion or
isolation; transferring a resident to a different room unless requested or
based upon legitimate management reasons; withholding or threatening to
withhold food or treatment unless authorized by a terminally ill resident or
his or her representative pursuant to law; or persistently delaying responses
to a resident's request for service or assistance. A facility that provides
long-term care services shall not willfully interfere with the performance of
official duties by a long-term care ombudsman. The department shall sanction
and may impose a civil penalty of not more than three thousand dollars for a
violation of this subsection.

(8) This section
does not apply to boarding homes. Complaints against boarding homes must be
investigated pursuant to the procedures and protocols specified in chapter
18.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. RCW 74.39A.080 (Department authority to
take actions in response to noncompliance or violations) and 1996 c 193 s 1
& 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 17 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---