BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 18.20

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 A licensee has the right to contest, under chapter
34.05 RCW

_7 and the informal dispute resolution process made
available to

_8 boarding homes, any department finding of noncompliance
with any

_9 laws and rules that govern boarding homes, regardless of
whether

10 the department takes action against the licensee.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary
for the immediate

12 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

13 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

14 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 HB
1428