BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.12.370 and 1997 c
432 s 6 and 1997 c 33 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other authority which it may have, the department of licensing may furnish
lists of registered and legal owners of motor vehicles only for the purposes
specified in this section to:

(1) The manufacturers
of motor vehicles, or their authorized agents, to be used to enable those
manufacturers to carry out the provisions of the National Traffic and Motor
Vehicle Safety Act of 1966 (15 U.S.C. sec. 1382-1418), including amendments or
additions thereto, respecting safety-related defects in motor vehicles;

(2) Any governmental
agency of the United States or Canada, or political subdivisions thereof or
within, to be used by it or by its authorized commercial agents or
contractors only in connection with the enforcement of motor vehicle or traffic
laws by, or programs related to traffic safety of, that government agency.
Only such parts of the list as are required for completion of the work required
of the agent or contractor shall be provided to such agent or contractor;

(3) A commercial
parking company requiring the names and addresses of registered owners to
notify them of outstanding parking violations. Subject to the disclosure
agreement provisions of RCW 46.12.380 and the requirements of Executive Order
97-01, the department may provide only the parts of the list that are required
for completion of the work required of the company;

(4) An authorized agent
or contractor of the department, to be used only in connection with providing
motor vehicle excise tax, licensing, title, and registration information to
motor vehicle dealers; ((or))

(5) Any business
regularly making loans to other persons to finance the purchase of motor
vehicles, to be used to assist the person requesting the list to determine
ownership of specific vehicles for the purpose of determining whether or not to
provide such financing; or

(6) Any company or
its agents operating a toll facility under chapter 47.46 RCW requiring the
names, addresses, and vehicle information of motor vehicle registered owners to
identify toll violators.

In the event a list of
registered and legal owners of motor vehicles is used for any purpose other
than that authorized in this section, the manufacturer, governmental agency,
commercial parking company, authorized agent, contractor, financial
institution, toll facility operator, or their authorized agents or contractors
responsible for the unauthorized disclosure or use will be denied further
access to such information by the department of licensing.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.61.690 and 1983 c
247 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person
who uses a toll bridge, toll tunnel, toll road, or toll ferry, and the
approaches thereto, operated by the state of Washington, the department of
transportation, ((or any)) a political subdivision or municipal
corporation empowered to operate toll facilities, or a company operating a
toll facility under chapter 47.46 RCW, at the entrance to which appropriate
signs have been erected to notify both pedestrian and vehicular traffic that it
is entering a toll facility or its approaches and is subject to the payment of
tolls at the designated station for collecting tolls, commits a traffic
infraction if:

(((1))) (a)
Such person does not pay, refuses to pay, evades, or attempts to evade
the payment of such tolls, or uses or attempts to use any spurious ((or)),
counterfeit, or stolen tickets, coupons, ((or)) tokens, or
electronic devices for payment of any such tolls, or

(((2))) (b)
Such person turns, or attempts to turn, the vehicle around in the bridge,
tunnel, loading terminal, approach, or toll plaza where signs have been erected
forbidding such turns, or

(((3))) (c)
Such person refuses to move a vehicle through the toll ((gates)) facility
after having come within the area where signs have been erected notifying
traffic that it is entering the area where toll is collectible or where
vehicles may not turn around and where vehicles are required to pass through
the toll ((gates)) facility for the purpose of collecting tolls.

(2) A law
enforcement officer may issue a notice of traffic infraction, or a notice of
traffic infraction may be mailed to the registered owner or person renting a
vehicle for violation of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 46.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The use of
electronic tolling systems is subject to the following regulations:

(a) Electronic tolling
systems may take pictures of the vehicle and vehicle license plate only.

(b) A notice of
infraction must be mailed to the registered owner of the vehicle.

(c) A person receiving
a notice of an infraction based on evidence detected by an electronic tolling
system may respond to the notice by mail.

(2) Infractions
detected through the use of electronic tolling systems will be recorded as are
stopping, standing, or parking violations under RCW 46.61.560, but are not part
of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120.

(3) If a notice of
traffic infraction is sent to the registered owner under RCW 46.63.030(2) and
the registered owner is a rental car business, the infraction will be dismissed
against the business if it mails to the issuing law enforcement agency, within
fourteen days of receiving the notice, the name and known mailing address of
the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the infraction occurred. If
the business is unable to determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at
the time the infraction occurred, the business must sign an affidavit making
this declaration. The affidavit must be mailed to the issuing law enforcement
agency within fourteen days of receiving the notice of traffic infraction.
Timely mailing of this affidavit to the issuing law enforcement agency relieves
a rental car business of any liability under this chapter for the notice of
infraction. An affidavit form suitable for this purpose must be included with
each infraction issued, along with instructions for its completion and use.

(4) A developer under
chapter 47.46 RCW shall work with the department of transportation to ensure
that the developer's automatic vehicle identification transponders are
compatible with other electronic payment devices or transponders from the
Washington state ferry system and other public transportation systems or are
able to use other automatic vehicle identification transponders in conjunction
with the developers without establishing a separate toll account.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.63.030 and 1995 c
219 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A law enforcement
officer has the authority to issue a notice of traffic infraction:

(a) When the infraction
is committed in the officer's presence;

(b) When the officer is
acting upon the request of a law enforcement officer in whose presence the
traffic infraction was committed; ((or))

(c) If an officer
investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle accident has reasonable cause to
believe that the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the accident has
committed a traffic infraction; or

(d) When the
infraction is mailed to the registered owner or the person renting a vehicle as
authorized under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) When an
electronic tolling system is used in compliance with section 3 of this act, a
law enforcement officer, whether present or not during the commission of the
infraction, or other law enforcement agency with jurisdiction may issue a
notice of traffic infraction by mail to the registered owner of the vehicle, or
to the person renting the vehicle. The registered owner of the vehicle or the
person renting the vehicle is responsible for the infraction.

(3) The owner of a
vehicle is responsible for a violation unless within fifteen days after
notification of the violation, furnishes the officials or agents of the
municipality that issued the citation with:

(a) An affidavit
made under oath, stating that the vehicle involved was, at the time, stolen or
in the care, custody, or control of some person other than the registered
owner; or

(b) Testimony in
open court under oath that the person was not the operator of the vehicle at
the time of the alleged violation.

(4) A court may
issue a notice of traffic infraction upon receipt of a written statement of the
officer that there is reasonable cause to believe that an infraction was
committed.

(((3))) (5)
If any motor vehicle without a driver is found parked, standing, or stopped in
violation of this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or local law,
ordinance, regulation, or resolution, the officer finding the vehicle shall
take its registration number and may take any other information displayed on
the vehicle which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to the
vehicle a notice of traffic infraction.

(((4))) (6)
In the case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle under RCW 46.55.120, upon
receiving a complaint by a registered tow truck operator that has incurred
costs in removing, storing, and disposing of an abandoned vehicle, an officer
of the law enforcement agency responsible for directing the removal of the
vehicle shall send a notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known
address of the registered owner of the vehicle. The officer shall append to
the notice of infraction, on a form prescribed by the department of licensing,
a notice indicating the amount of costs incurred as a result of removing,
storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at
auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction will not be
considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty payable under this
chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied that the person has made
restitution in the amount of the deficiency remaining after disposal of the
vehicle.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.63.140 and 1980 c
128 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In any traffic
infraction case involving a violation of this title or equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution
relating to the stopping, standing, or parking of a vehicle, proof that the
particular vehicle described in the notice of traffic infraction was stopping,
standing, or parking in violation of any such provision of this title or an
equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution, together with proof that the person named in the notice of traffic
infraction was at the time of the violation the registered owner of the
vehicle, ((shall)) constitutes in evidence a prima facie
presumption that the registered owner of the vehicle was the person who parked
or placed the vehicle at the point where, and for the time during which, the
violation occurred.

(2) The foregoing
stated presumption ((shall apply)) applies only when the
procedure prescribed in RCW 46.63.030(((3))) (5) has been
followed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The legislature
respectfully request the Washington state supreme court to amend the Infraction
Rules for Courts of Limited Jurisdiction to conform to this act. Furthermore,
the legislature respectfully asks the court to create a notice of infraction
that is consistent with this act.

---
END ---