BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
limits in this section, an eligible person is allowed a credit against the tax
due under this chapter. The credit is based on qualified employment positions
that are filled by recipients of temporary assistance for needy families under
chapter 74.12 RCW. The credit is available to persons who are engaged in the
provision of business services as defined in this section.

(2)(a) The credit
equals two thousand dollars for each qualified employment position created
after July 1, 2001. A credit is earned for the calendar year the person is
hired to fill the position, plus the two subsequent consecutive years, if the
position is maintained for those two years.

(b) Credit may not be
taken for hiring of persons into positions that exist on July 1, 2001. Credit
is authorized for new employees hired for new positions created after July 1,
2001.

(c) When a position is
newly created, if it is filled before July 1st, this position is eligible for
the full yearly credit. If it is filled after June 30th, this position is
eligible for half of the credit.

(d) Credit may be
accrued and carried over until it is used. No refunds will be granted for
credits under this section.

(3) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Eligible
person" means a person, as defined in RCW 82.04.030, who is engaged in the
business of providing business services;

(b)(i) "Business
services" means the provision of a service, as defined under (b)(ii) of
this subsection, that is subject to tax under RCW 82.04.290(2);

(ii) Business services
are: Computer; data processing; information; legal; accounting and tax
preparation; architectural; business consulting; business management; public
relations and advertising; surveying; real estate appraisal; or financial
services. For the purposes of this section these services mean the following:

(A) "Computer
services" are services such as computer programming, custom software
modification, customization of canned software, custom software installation,
custom software maintenance, custom software repair, training in the use of
software, computer systems design, and custom software update services;

(B) "Data
processing services" are services such as word processing, data entry,
data retrieval, data search, information compilation, payroll processing,
business accounts processing, data production, and other computerized data and
information storage or manipulation. "Data processing services" also
includes the use of a computer or computer time for data processing whether the
processing is performed by the provider of the computer or by the purchaser or
other beneficiary of the service;

(C) "Information
services" are services such as electronic data retrieval or research that
entails furnishing financial or legal information, data or research, internet
service as defined in RCW 82.04.297, general or specialized news, or current
information;

(D) "Legal
services" are services such as representation by an attorney, or other
person when permitted, in an administrative or legal proceeding, legal
drafting, paralegal services, legal research services, and court reporting
services, arbitration, and mediation services;

(E) "Accounting
and tax preparation services" are services such as accounting, auditing,
actuarial, bookkeeping, or tax preparation services;

(F) "Architectural
services" are services such as structural or landscape design or
architecture, interior design, building design, building program management,
and space planning services;

(G) "Business
consulting services" are services such as primarily providing operating
counsel, advice, or assistance to the management or owner of any business,
private, nonprofit, or public organization, including but not limited to those
in the following areas: Administrative management consulting; general
management consulting; human resource consulting or training; management
engineering consulting; management information systems consulting;
manufacturing management consulting; marketing consulting; operations research
consulting; personnel management consulting; physical distribution consulting;
site location consulting; economic consulting; motel, hotel, and resort
consulting; restaurant consulting; government affairs consulting; and lobbying;

(H) "Business
management services" are services such as administrative management,
business management, and office management. "Business management
services" does not include property management or property leasing, motel,
hotel, and resort management, or automobile parking management;

(I) "Public
relations and advertising services" are services such as layout, art direction,
graphic design, copy writing, mechanical preparation, opinion research,
marketing research, marketing, or production supervision;

(J) "Surveying
services" are services such as land surveying;

(K) "Real estate
appraisal services" are services such as market appraisal and other real
estate valuation; and

(L) "Financial
services" are services such as banking, loan, security, investment
management, investment advisory, mortgage servicing, contract collection, and
finance leasing services, engaged in by financial businesses, or businesses
similar to or in competition with financial businesses; and

(c) "Qualified
employment position" means a permanent full-time position to provide
business services. If an employee is either voluntarily or involuntarily
separated from employment, the employment position is considered filled on a
full-time basis if the employer is either training or actively recruiting a
replacement employee that is a recipient of temporary assistance for needy
families under chapter 74.12 RCW.

(4) No application is
necessary for the tax credit. The person must keep records necessary for the
department to verify eligibility under this section. This information
includes:

(a) Employment records
for the previous six years;

(b) Information
relating to description of business service activity engaged in by the person;
and

(c) Information
relating to customers of business service activity engaged in by the person.

(5) If at any time the
department finds that a person is not eligible for tax credit under this
section, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been used is immediately due.
The department will assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited taxes
for which the person is not eligible. The interest will be assessed at the
rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, assessed
retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken, and accrue until the taxes
for which a credit has been used are repaid.

(6) The department of
social and health services will provide to the department of revenue any
information needed by the department of revenue to verify eligibility of
recipients of temporary assistance for needy families under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
limits in this section, an eligible person is allowed a credit against the tax
due under RCW 48.14.020. The credit is based on qualified employment positions
that are filled by recipients of temporary assistance for needy families under
chapter 74.12 RCW. The credit is available to persons who are engaged in
insurance services as defined in this section.

(2)(a) The credit
equals two thousand dollars for each qualified employment position created
after July 1, 2001. A credit is earned for the calendar year the person is
hired to fill the position, plus the two subsequent consecutive years, if the
position is maintained for those two years.

(b) Credit may not be
taken for hiring of persons into positions that exist on July 1, 2001. Credit
is authorized for new employees hired for new positions created after July 1,
2001.

(c) When a position is
newly created, if it is filled before July 1st, this position is eligible for
the full yearly credit. If it is filled after June 30th, this position is
eligible for half of the credit.

(d) Credit may be
accrued and carried over until it is used. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.

(3) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Eligible
person" means a person, as defined in RCW 82.04.030, who is engaged in the
business of providing insurance services;

(b) "Insurance
services" means a business that provides insurance services related
directly to the delivery of the service within the United States or on behalf
of persons residing within the United States; and

(c) "Qualified employment
position" means a permanent full-time position to provide insurance
services. If an employee is either voluntarily or involuntarily separated from
employment, the employment position is considered filled on a full-time basis
if the employer is either training or actively recruiting a replacement
employee that is a recipient of temporary assistance for needy families under
chapter 74.12 RCW.

(4) No application is
necessary for the tax credit. The person must keep records necessary for the
department to verify eligibility under this section. This information
includes:

(a) Employment records
for the previous six years;

(b) Information
relating to description of insurance services activity engaged in by the
person; and

(c) Information
relating to customers of insurance services activity engaged in by the person.

(5) If at any time the
department finds that a person is not eligible for tax credit under this
section, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been used is immediately
due. The department will assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited
taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest will be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, assessed
retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken, and accrue until the taxes
for which a credit has been used are repaid.

(6) The
department of social and health services will provide to the department of
revenue any information needed by the department of revenue to verify
eligibility of recipients of temporary assistance for needy families under this
section.

---
END ---