BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
community, trade, and economic development shall establish the Washington jobs
initiative program. The department shall provide grants to local governments
for the purpose of creating local or regional programs designed to achieve
livable wage jobs, promote retention and upward mobility for low-income job
seekers by supplying regional employers with qualified workers, and by working
on job and job-related system improvements.

(2) Grants awarded
under this section must be used to develop strategies that:

(a) Assist unemployed
and underemployed residents obtain livable wage jobs in targeted sectors in the
regional economy;

(b) Help low-income
residents access job opportunities with businesses that benefit from local
government led economic development efforts by establishing first-source and
voluntary hiring agreements with those businesses;

(c) Create pathways to
employment that are longer-term and more intensive for residents that are
harder to serve due to chronic unemployment or lack of work experience; and

(d) Coordinate services
of the public and private sector, and community organizations to provide
outreach, recruitment, and job readiness services to low-income job seekers.

(3) The department
shall develop, by rule, guidelines regarding the amount of funds awarded to
local governments, performance evaluation standards, and other guidelines the
department deems necessary for the administration of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The sum of five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to the department
of community, trade, and economic development for the purposes of section 1 of
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The sum of five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the department
of community, trade, and economic development for the purposes of section 1 of
this act.

---
END ---