BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.26.160 and 1999 c
134 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the event of the
duty connected death of any member who is in active service, or who has vested
under the provisions of RCW 41.26.090 with twenty or more service credit years
of service, or who is on duty connected disability leave or retired for duty
connected disability, the surviving spouse shall become entitled to receive a
monthly allowance equal to fifty percent of the final average salary at the
date of death if active, or the amount of retirement allowance the vested
member would have received at age fifty, or the amount of the retirement
allowance such retired member was receiving at the time of death if retired for
duty connected disability. The amount of this allowance will be increased five
percent of final average salary for each child as defined in RCW 41.26.030(7),
subject to a maximum combined allowance of sixty percent of final average
salary: PROVIDED, That if the child or children is or are in the care of a
legal guardian, payment of the increase attributable to each child will be made
to the child's legal guardian or, in the absence of a legal guardian and if the
member has created a trust for the benefit of the child or children, payment of
the increase attributable to each child will be made to the trust.

(2) If at the time of the
duty connected death of a vested member with twenty or more service credit
years of service as provided in subsection (1) of this section or a member
retired for duty connected disability, the surviving spouse has not been
lawfully married to such member for one year prior to retirement or separation
from service if a vested member, the surviving spouse shall not be eligible to
receive the benefits under this section. However, if the surviving spouse
has been lawfully married to such member for five years prior to the member's
death, the surviving spouse, when at least age fifty-five, is eligible to
receive the benefits under this section: PROVIDED, That if a member dies
as a result of a disability incurred in the line of duty, then if he or she was
married at the time he or she was disabled, the surviving spouse shall be
eligible to receive the benefits under this section.

(3) If there be no
surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits at the time of such member's duty
connected death, then the child or children of such member shall receive a
monthly allowance equal to thirty percent of final average salary for one child
and an additional ten percent for each additional child subject to a maximum
combined payment, under this subsection, of sixty percent of final average
salary. When there cease to be any eligible children as defined in RCW
41.26.030(7), there shall be paid to the legal heirs of the member the excess,
if any, of accumulated contributions of the member at the time of death over
all payments made to survivors on his or her behalf under this chapter:
PROVIDED, That payments under this subsection to children shall be prorated
equally among the children, if more than one. If the member has created a
trust for the benefit of the child or children, the payment shall be made to
the trust.

(4) In the event that
there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits under this section,
and that there be no child or children eligible to receive benefits under this
section, then the accumulated contributions shall be paid to the estate of the
member.

(5) If a surviving
spouse receiving benefits under the provisions of this section thereafter dies
and there are children as defined in RCW 41.26.030(7), payment to the spouse
shall cease and the child or children shall receive the benefits as provided in
subsection (3) of this section.

(6) The payment
provided by this section shall become due the day following the date of death
and payments shall be retroactive to that date.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.26.161 and 1999 c
134 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the event of the
nonduty connected death of any member who is in active service, or who has
vested under the provisions of RCW 41.26.090 with twenty or more service credit
years of service, or who is on disability leave or retired, whether for nonduty
connected disability or service, the surviving spouse shall become entitled to
receive a monthly allowance equal to fifty percent of the final average salary
at the date of death if active, or the amount of retirement allowance the
vested member would have received at age fifty, or the amount of the retirement
allowance such retired member was receiving at the time of death if retired for
service or nonduty connected disability. The amount of this allowance will be
increased five percent of final average salary for each child as defined in RCW
41.26.030(7), subject to a maximum combined allowance of sixty percent of final
average salary: PROVIDED, That if the child or children is or are in the care
of a legal guardian, payment of the increase attributable to each child will be
made to the child's legal guardian or, in the absence of a legal guardian and
if the member has created a trust for the benefit of the child or children,
payment of the increase attributable to each child will be made to the trust.

(2) If at the time of
the death of a vested member with twenty or more service credit years of
service as provided in subsection (1) of this section or a member retired for
service or disability, the surviving spouse has not been lawfully married to
such member for one year prior to retirement or separation from service if a
vested member, the surviving spouse shall not be eligible to receive the
benefits under this section. However, if the surviving spouse has been
lawfully married to such member for five years prior to the member's death, the
surviving spouse, when at least age fifty-five, is eligible to receive the
benefits under this section.

(3) If there be no surviving
spouse eligible to receive benefits at the time of such member's death, then
the child or children of such member shall receive a monthly allowance equal to
thirty percent of final average salary for one child and an additional ten
percent for each additional child subject to a maximum combined payment, under
this subsection, of sixty percent of final average salary. When there cease to
be any eligible children as defined in RCW 41.26.030(7), there shall be paid to
the legal heirs of the member the excess, if any, of accumulated contributions
of the member at the time of death over all payments made to survivors on his
or her behalf under this chapter: PROVIDED, That payments under this
subsection to children shall be prorated equally among the children, if more
than one. If the member has created a trust for the benefit of the child or
children, the payment shall be made to the trust.

(4) In the event that
there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits under this section,
and that there be no child or children eligible to receive benefits under this
section, then the accumulated contributions shall be paid to the estate of said
member.

(5) If a surviving
spouse receiving benefits under the provisions of this section thereafter dies
and there are children as defined in RCW 41.26.030(7), payment to the spouse
shall cease and the child or children shall receive the benefits as provided in
subsection (3) of this section.

(6) The
payment provided by this section shall become due the day following the date of
death and payments shall be retroactive to that date.

---
END ---