BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27.015 and 1996 c
157 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "City"
means a city or town;

(2) "Multifamily
residential building" means common wall residential buildings that consist
of ((four)) five or fewer units, that do not exceed two stories
in height, that are less than five thousand square feet in area, and that have
a one-hour fire-resistive occupancy separation between units; and

(3) "Temporary
growing structure" means a structure that has the sides and roof covered
with polyethylene, polyvinyl, or similar flexible synthetic material and is
used to provide plants with either frost protection or increased heat retention.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The building code
council shall adopt rules by December 1, 2001, requiring that automatic
sprinkler systems be installed throughout any building classified as a group R,
division 1 occupancy, as defined in the state building code that contains five
or more units, that is constructed after December 1, 2001, and is less than
three stories in height or contains less than sixteen dwelling units.

(2) As
used in this section, "automatic sprinkler system" means an approved
system of devices and equipment that automatically detects a fire and
discharges an approved fire-extinguishing agent onto or in the area of a fire.

---
END ---