BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The building code
council shall adopt rules by December 1, 2001, requiring that an automatic
sprinkler system be installed throughout any existing building classified as a
group R, division 1 occupancy, as defined in the state building code, by
December 1, 2008.

(2) As
used in this section, "automatic sprinkler system" means an approved
system of devices and equipment that automatically detects a fire and
discharges an approved fire-extinguishing agent onto or in the area of a fire.

--- END ---