BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 81.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No person operating
or controlling a freight railroad may allow the operation of a freight railroad
train or locomotive in this state unless the train or locomotive has a crew of
at least two employees. At least one of the employees on the crew must be a
railroad locomotive engineer, and at least one of the employees on the crew
must be a railroad trainman. The railroad locomotive engineer shall be present
in the cab and shall operate the lead control locomotive at all times that the
train is in motion. The railroad trainman shall be present in the cab of the
lead locomotive at all times that the train is in motion, but may dismount the
train or locomotive when necessary to perform switching activities and other
duties in the course of his or her job.

(2) By rule the
commission may grant an exception to subsection (1) of this section if the
commission determines that the exception will not endanger the life or property
of any person.

(3) Subsection (1) of
this section does not apply to the extent that it is contrary to, or
inconsistent with, a regulation or order of the Federal Railroad
Administration.

(4) The commission may
require a person who violates subsection (1) of this section to forfeit not
less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars for a first
offense, not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars
for a second offense committed within three years, and not less than five hundred
dollars nor more than one thousand dollars for a third offense committed within
three years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 81.40.035 (Freight train crews) and
1967 c 2 s 2 are each repealed.

---
END ---