BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.69.090 and 1996 c
324 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A park and recreation
district shall be governed by a board of five commissioners. Except for the
initial commissioners, all commissioners shall be elected to staggered
four-year terms of office and shall serve until their successors are elected
and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW 29.04.170. Candidates
shall run for specific commissioner positions.

Elections
for park and recreation district commissioners shall be held biennially in
conjunction with the general election in each odd-numbered year. Elections
shall be held in accordance with the provisions of Title 29 RCW dealing with primary
and general elections((, except that there shall be no primary to
nominate candidates. All persons filing and qualifying shall appear on the
general election ballot and the person receiving the largest number of votes
for each position shall be elected)).

--- END ---