BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 82.16

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,
the

_8 definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.

_9 (a) "Base credit" means the maximum amount
of credit against

10 the tax imposed by this chapter that each light and
power business

11 or gas distribution business may take each fiscal year
as

12 calculated by the department. The base credit is equal
to the

13 proportionate share that the total grants received by
each light

14 and power business or gas distribution business in the
prior

15 fiscal year bears to the total grants received by all
light and

16 power businesses and gas distribution businesses in the
prior

17 fiscal year multiplied by two million five hundred
thousand

18 dollars.

p. 1 2SHB
1443

_1 (b) "Billing discount" means a reduction
in the amount charged

_2 for providing service to qualifying persons in
Washington made by

_3 a light and power business or a gas distribution
business. Billing

_4 discount does not include grants received by the light
and power

_5 business or a gas distribution business.

_6 (c) "Grant" means funds provided to a
light and power business

_7 or gas distribution business by the department of
community,

_8 trade, and economic development or by a qualifying
organization.

_9 (d) "Low-income home energy assistance
program" means energy

10 assistance programs for low-income households as defined
on

11 December 31, 2000, in the low-income home energy
assistance act of

12 1981 as amended August 1, 1999, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 8623 et
seq.

13 (e) "Qualifying person" means a Washington
resident who applies

14 for assistance and qualifies for a grant regardless of
whether

15 that person receives a grant.

16 (f) "Qualifying contribution" means money
given by a light and

17 power business or a gas distribution business to a
qualifying

18 organization, exclusive of money received in the prior
fiscal year

19 from its customers for the purpose of assisting other
customers.

20 (g) "Qualifying organization" means an
entity that has a

21 contractual agreement with the department of community,
trade, and

22 economic development to administer in a specified
service area low-

23 income home energy assistance funds received from the
federal

24 government and such other funds that may be received by
the

25 entity.

26 (2) Subject to the limitations in this section, a
light and

27 power business or a gas distribution business may take a
credit

28 each fiscal year against the tax imposed under this
chapter for

29 qualifying contributions and for billing discounts that
are equal

30 to or greater than one hundred twenty-five percent of
the billing

31 discounts given in fiscal year 2000. If no billing
discounts were

32 given in fiscal year 2000 a credit shall be allowed on
any billing

33 discounts given in any subsequent fiscal year.
Thereafter, credit

34 shall be allowed on billing discounts given that are
equal to or

35 greater than one hundred twenty-five percent of the
billing

36 discounts given in the first fiscal year such billing
discounts

37 are given. The amount of credit shall be fifty percent
of the total

2SHB 1443 p. 2

_1 billing discounts and qualifying contributions, limited
to the

_2 base credit for the same fiscal year.

_3 (3) The total amount of credit, statewide, that may
be taken in

_4 any fiscal year shall not exceed two million five
hundred thousand

_5 dollars. By May 1st of each year starting in 2002, the
department

_6 of community, trade, and economic development shall
notify the

_7 department of revenue in writing of the grants received
in the

_8 current fiscal year by each light and power business and
gas

_9 distribution business.

10 (4)(a) Not later than June 1st of each year
beginning in 2002,

11 the department shall publish the base credit for each
light and

12 power business and gas distribution business for the
next fiscal

13 year.

14 (b) Not later than July 1st of each year beginning
in 2002,

15 application for credit must by made to the department
including

16 but not limited to the following information: Billing
discounts

17 given by the applicant in fiscal year 2000; qualifying

18 contributions given by the applicant in the prior fiscal
year; the

19 amount of money received in the prior fiscal year from
customers

20 for the purpose of assisting other customers; the base
credit for

21 the next fiscal year for the applicant; the qualifying

22 contributions anticipated to be given in the next fiscal
year; and

23 billing discounts anticipated to be given in the next
fiscal

24 year. No credit under this section will be allowed to a
light and

25 power business or gas distribution business that does
not file the

26 application by July 1st.

27 (c) Not later than August 1st of each year beginning
in 2002,

28 the department shall notify each applicant of the amount
of credit

29 that may be taken in that fiscal year.

30 (d) The balance of base credits not used by other
light and

31 power businesses and gas distribution businesses shall
be ratably

32 distributed to applicants under the formula in
subsection (1)(a)

33 of this section. The total amount of credit that may be
taken by an

34 applicant is the base credit plus any ratable portion of
unused

35 base credit.

36 (5) The credit taken under this section is limited
to the

37 amount of tax imposed under this chapter for the fiscal
year. The

p. 3 2SHB
1443

_1 credit must be claimed in the fiscal year in which the
billing

_2 reduction is made. Any unused credit expires. Refunds
shall not be

_3 given in place of credits.

_4 (6) No credit may be taken for billing discounts made
before

_5 July 1, 2001. Within two weeks of the effective date of
this

_6 section, the department of community, trade, and
economic

_7 development shall notify the department of revenue in
writing of

_8 the grants received in fiscal year 2001 by each light
and power

_9 business and gas distribution business. Within four
weeks of the

10 effective date of this section, the department of
revenue shall

11 publish the base credit for each light and power
business and gas

12 distribution business for fiscal year 2002. Within
eight weeks of

13 the effective date of this section, application to the
department

14 must be made showing the information required in
subsection (4)(b)

15 of this section. Within twelve weeks of the effective
date of this

16 section, the department shall notify each applicant of
the amount

17 of credit that may be taken in fiscal year 2002.

18 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 82.16

19 RCW to read as follows:

20 (1) In computing tax imposed under this chapter,
subject to the

21 limitations in this section, a credit may be taken by an
eligible

22 light and power business or gas distribution business
for the

23 purposes of providing energy assistance to low-income
households.

24 (a) A light and power business or gas distribution
business is

25 eligible under this section if, due to higher wholesale

26 electricity or natural or manufactured gas costs
incurred within

27 six months of the effective date of this section or during
the

28 twenty-four month period following the effective date of
this

29 section, the business has raised its retail rates,
through general

30 rate increases or surcharges, to residential customers
effective

31 January 1, 2001, or later by no less than thirty percent
in

32 aggregate.

33 (b) The credit provided under this section is equal
to twenty-

34 five percent of the additional taxes owed for a
reporting period

35 due solely to the residential rate increase as described
in (a) of

36 this subsection.

37 (c) Credit may be taken under this section only if
the business

2SHB 1443 p. 4

_1 uses the tax savings attributable to the credit for the
purpose of

_2 providing billing discounts or another means of
assistance to low-

_3 income households to lower costs of paying for
electricity or

_4 natural or manufactured gas.

_5 (2)(a) The department, after consulting with the
utilities and

_6 transportation commission in the case of investor-owned
utilities

_7 and the governing bodies of locally regulated utilities,
shall

_8 determine the eligibility of and the application and
reporting

_9 requirements for individual utilities under this
section.

10 (b) Credit under this section is limited to the
amount of tax

11 imposed under this chapter. Refunds shall not be given
in the place

12 of credits and credits may not be carried over to
subsequent

13 calendar years.

14 (3) No credit may be taken under this section before
July 1,

15 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 2SHB
1443