BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature declares
that a safe and civil environment in school is necessary for students to learn
and achieve high academic standards. The legislature finds that harassment,
intimidation, or bullying, like other disruptive or violent behavior, is
conduct that disrupts both a student's ability to learn and a school's ability
to educate its students in a safe environment.

Furthermore, the
legislature finds that students learn by example. The legislature commends
school administrators, faculty, staff, and volunteers for demonstrating
appropriate behavior, treating others with civility and respect, and refusing
to tolerate harassment, intimidation, or bullying.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) By August 1, 2003,
each school district shall adopt or amend if necessary a policy, within the
scope of its authority, that prohibits the harassment, intimidation, or
bullying of any student. It is the responsibility of each school district to
share this policy with parents or guardians, students, volunteers, and school
employees.

(2) "Harassment,
intimidation, or bullying" means any intentional written, verbal, or
physical act, including, but not limited to those that are reasonably perceived
as being motivated either by any actual or perceived characteristic in RCW
9A.36.080(3), or other distinguishing characteristics, when the intentional
written, verbal, or physical act:

(a) Physically harms a
student or damages the student's property; or

(b) Has the effect of
substantially interfering with a student's education; or

(c) Is so severe,
persistent, or pervasive that it creates an intimidating or threatening
educational environment; or

(d) Has the effect of
substantially disrupting the orderly operation of the school.

(3) It is recommended
that the policy be adopted or amended through a process that includes
representation of parents or guardians, school employees, volunteers, students,
administrators, and community representatives. It is recommended that each
such policy emphasize positive character traits and values, including the
importance of civil and respectful speech and conduct, and the responsibility
of students to comply with the district's policy prohibiting harassment,
intimidation, or bullying.

(4) By August 1, 2002,
the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with representatives
of parents, school personnel, and other interested parties, shall provide to
school districts and educational service districts a model harassment,
intimidation, and bullying prevention policy and training materials on the
components that should be included in any district policy. Training materials
shall be disseminated in a variety of ways, including workshops and other staff
developmental activities, and through the office of the superintendent of
public instruction's web site, with a link to the safety center web page. On
the web site:

(a) The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall post its model policy, recommended
training materials, and instructional materials;

(b) The office of the
superintendent of public instruction has the authority to update with new
technologies access to this information in the safety center, to the extent
resources are made available; and

(c) Individual school
districts shall have direct access to the safety center web site to post a
brief summary of their policies, programs, partnerships, vendors, and
instructional and training materials, and to provide a link to the school
district's web site for further information.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No school employee,
student, or volunteer may engage in reprisal, retaliation, or false accusation
against a victim, witness, or one with reliable information about an act of
harassment, intimidation, or bullying.

(2) A school employee,
student, or volunteer who has witnessed, or has reliable information that a
student has been subjected to, harassment, intimidation, or bullying, whether
verbal or physical, is encouraged to report such incident to an appropriate
school official.

(3) A
school employee who promptly reports an incident of harassment, intimidation,
or bullying to an appropriate school official, and who makes this report in
compliance with the procedures in the district's policy prohibiting bullying,
harassment, or intimidation, is immune from a cause of action for damages
arising from any failure to remedy the reported incident.

---
END ---