BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.0205 and 1987 c
4 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Bingo," as used in this chapter, means a game conducted only in the
county within which the organization is principally located in which prizes are
awarded on the basis of designated numbers or symbols on a card conforming to
numbers or symbols selected at random and in which no cards are sold except at
the time and place of said game, when said game is conducted by a bona fide
charitable or nonprofit organization which does not conduct or allow its
premises to be used for conducting bingo on more than three occasions per week
and which does not conduct bingo in any location which is used for conducting
bingo on more than three occasions per week, or if an agricultural fair
authorized under chapters 15.76 and 36.37 RCW, which does not conduct bingo on
more than twelve consecutive days in any calendar year, and except in the case
of any agricultural fair as authorized under chapters 15.76 and 36.37 RCW, no
person other than a bona fide member or an employee of said organization takes
any part in the management or operation of said game, and no person who takes
any part in the management or operation of said game takes any part in the
management or operation of any game conducted by any other organization or any
other branch of the same organization, unless approved by the commission, and
no part of the proceeds thereof inure to the benefit of any person other than
the organization conducting said game. For the purposes of this section, the
organization shall be deemed to be principally located in the county within
which it has its primary business office. If the organization has no business office,
the organization shall be deemed to be located in the county of principal
residence of its chief executive officer: PROVIDED, That any organization
which is conducting any licensed and established bingo game in any locale as of
January 1, 1981, shall be exempt from the requirement that such game be
conducted in the county in which the organization is principally located.

(2)
"Bingo" includes games conducted through an approved system of linked
electronic bingo terminals located at one or more licensed bingo locations with
the numbers or symbols selected at a single licensed location as of January 1,
2001, for all terminals on the system. The commission shall adopt rules for
the testing, regulation, approval, and licensing of bingo games conducted through
any system of linked electronic bingo terminals. Licensees are limited to no
more than fifty linked bingo terminals per location. Notwithstanding
subsection (1) of this section, bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations
may allow their premises to be used five days per week to conduct bingo games
using linked electronic bingo terminals.

It is
the intent of the legislature in authorizing systems of linked electronic bingo
terminals that games played on such systems shall only include bingo games with
electronic facsimiles of bingo displayed on the screen and with all players on
the system competing against each other to match the numbers or symbols drawn
in the game. Nothing in this section authorizes any form of slot machine or
any other type of electronic gaming device wherein a player competes directly
against the device.

--- END ---