BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
47.12.330 and 1998 c 181 s 2 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 For the purpose of environmental mitigation of
transportation

_7 projects, the department may acquire or develop, or both
acquire

_8 and develop, environmental mitigation sites in advance
of the

_9 construction of programmed projects, or in response
to

10 programmatic agreements with resource agencies that
include but

11 are not limited to chronic repair obligations,
emergency

12 maintenance practices, and retrofit projects.
The term "advanced

13 environmental mitigation" means mitigation of
adverse impacts upon

14 the environment from transportation projects before
their design

15 and construction. Advanced environmental mitigation
consists of the

16 acquisition of property; the acquisition of property,
water, or

17 air rights; the development of property for the purposes
of

18 improved environmental management; engineering costs
necessary for

p. 1 HB
1447

_1 such purchase and development; and the use of advanced

_2 environmental mitigation sites to fulfill project
environmental

_3 permit requirements. Advanced environmental mitigation
must be

_4 conducted in a manner that is consistent with the
definition of

_5 mitigation found in the council of environmental quality

_6 regulations (40 C.F.R. Sec. 1508.20) ((and)),
the governor's

_7 executive order on wetlands (EO 90-04), and the
alternative

_8 mitigation policy guidance interagency implementation
agreement,

_9 as signed on February 10, 2000, by the Washington
state

10 departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and

11 transportation. Advanced environmental
mitigation is for projects

12 approved by the transportation commission as part of the
state's

13 six-year plan or included in the state highway system

14 plan. Advanced environmental mitigation must give
consideration to

15 activities related to fish passage, fish habitat,
wetlands, and

16 flood management. Advanced environmental mitigation may
also be

17 conducted in partnership with federal, state, or local
government

18 agencies, tribal governments, interest groups, or
private

19 parties. Partnership arrangements may include joint
acquisition and

20 development of mitigation sites, purchasing and selling
mitigation

21 bank credits among participants, and transfer of mitigation
site

22 title from one party to another. Specific conditions of
partnership

23 arrangements will be developed in written agreements for
each

24 applicable environmental mitigation site. Advanced
mitigation

25 opportunities can be identified in programmatic
agreements between

26 the department of transportation and other state
agencies. For the

27 purposes of this section, programmatic agreements are
regulatory

28 instruments that respond to the need to streamline
permitting

29 processes, conduct required mitigation and address
permit

30 conditions on a watershed-ecosystem function basis,
and optimize

31 environmental benefits. Specific conditions of a
programmatic

32 agreement will be developed in written agreement for
applicable

33 mitigation sites. All regulating state agencies are
to work

34 cooperatively with the department of transportation
to develop and

35 implement programmatic agreements to reduce
mitigation costs of

36 projects and improve permit streamline activities to
achieve

HB 1447 p. 2

_1 delivery of the state transportation system in the
most effective

_2 and efficient manner possible.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1447