BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.160.080 and 1985
c 236 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Local fire
departments or fire districts and local health departments may adopt regulations
as required to implement this chapter.

(2)
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prevent a city, town, or county
from adopting ordinances more restrictive than regulations adopted under this
chapter that restrict or prohibit smoking in public places, including but not
limited to restaurants, skating rinks, and bowling alleys, situated within its
jurisdiction.

--- END ---