BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
28A.400.200 and 1997 c 141 s 2 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 (1) Every school district board of directors shall
fix, alter,

_7 allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all
district

_8 employees in conformance with this section.

_9 (2)(a) Salaries for certificated instructional staff
shall not

10 be less than the salary provided in the appropriations
act in the

11 statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee
with a

12 baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and

13 (b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff
with a

14 masters degree shall not be less than the salary
provided in the

15 appropriations act in the statewide salary allocation
schedule for

16 an employee with a masters degree and zero years of
service;

17 (3)(a) The actual average salary paid to basic
education and

18 special education certificated instructional staff shall
not

p. 1 HB
1449

_1 exceed the district's average basic education and
special

_2 education program certificated instructional staff
salary used for

_3 the state basic education allocations for that school
year as

_4 determined pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410.

_5 (b) Fringe benefit contributions for basic education
and

_6 special education certificated instructional staff shall
be

_7 included as salary under (a) of this subsection only to
the extent

_8 that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds

_9 the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided
per

10 certificated instructional staff unit in the state
operating

11 appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation
is

12 payable. For purposes of this section, fringe benefits
shall not

13 include payment for unused leave for illness or injury
under RCW

14 28A.400.210; employer contributions for old age
survivors

15 insurance, workers' compensation, unemployment
compensation, and

16 retirement benefits under the Washington state
retirement system;

17 or employer contributions for health benefits in excess
of the

18 insurance benefits allocation provided per certificated

19 instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act

20 in effect at the time the compensation is payable. A
school

21 district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions

22 for such excess health benefits.

23 (c) Salary and benefits for certificated
instructional staff in

24 programs other than basic education and special
education shall be

25 consistent with the salary and benefits paid to
certificated

26 instructional staff in the basic education and special
education

27 programs.

28 (4) Salaries and benefits for certificated
instructional staff

29 may exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this
section only

30 by separate contract for additional time, additional

31 responsibilities, or incentives that include but are not
limited

32 to retaining or recruiting certificated instructional

33 staff. Supplemental contracts shall not cause
the state to incur

34 any present or future funding obligation. Supplemental
contracts

35 shall be subject to the collective bargaining provisions
of

36 chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240,
shall not

37 exceed one year, and if not renewed shall not constitute
adverse

38 change in accordance with RCW 28A.405.300 through
28A.405.380. No

HB 1449 p. 2

_1 district may enter into a supplemental contract under
this

_2 subsection for the provision of services which are a
part of the

_3 basic education program required by Article IX, section
3 of the

_4 state Constitution.

_5 (5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district
shall comply

_6 with RCW 28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 HB
1449