BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 17.21.020 and 1994 c
283 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Agricultural
commodity" means any plant or part of a plant, or animal, or animal
product, produced by a person (including farmers, ranchers, vineyardists, plant
propagators, Christmas tree growers, aquaculturists, floriculturists,
orchardists, foresters, or other comparable persons) primarily for sale,
consumption, propagation, or other use by people or animals.

(2) "Agricultural
land" means land on which an agricultural commodity is produced or land
that is in a government-recognized conservation reserve program. This
definition does not apply to private gardens where agricultural commodities are
produced for personal consumption.

(3) "Antimicrobial
pesticide" means a pesticide that is used for the control of microbial
pests, including but not limited to viruses, bacteria, algae, and protozoa, and
is intended for use as a disinfectant or sanitizer.

(4)
"Apparatus" means any type of ground, water, or aerial equipment,
device, or contrivance using motorized, mechanical, or pressurized power and
used to apply any pesticide on land and anything that may be growing,
habitating, or stored on or in such land, but shall not include any pressurized
handsized household device used to apply any pesticide, or any equipment,
device, or contrivance of which the person who is applying the pesticide is the
source of power or energy in making such pesticide application, or any other
small equipment, device, or contrivance that is transported in a piece of
equipment licensed under this chapter as an apparatus.

(((4))) (5)
"Arthropod" means any invertebrate animal that belongs to the phylum
arthropoda, which in addition to insects, includes allied classes whose members
are wingless and usually have more than six legs; for example, spiders, mites,
ticks, centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.

(((5))) (6)
"Certified applicator" means any individual who is licensed as a
commercial pesticide applicator, commercial pesticide operator, public
operator, private-commercial applicator, demonstration and research applicator,
or certified private applicator, or any other individual who is certified by
the director to use or supervise the use of any pesticide which is classified
by the EPA or the director as a restricted use pesticide.

(((6))) (7)
"Commercial pesticide applicator" means any person who engages in the
business of applying pesticides to the land of another.

(((7))) (8)
"Commercial pesticide operator" means any employee of a commercial
pesticide applicator who uses or supervises the use of any pesticide and who is
required to be licensed under provisions of this chapter.

(((8))) (9)
"Defoliant" means any substance or mixture of substances intended to
cause the leaves or foliage to drop from a plant with or without causing
abscission.

(((9))) (10)
"Department" means the Washington state department of agriculture.

(((10))) (11)
"Desiccant" means any substance or mixture of substances intended to
artificially accelerate the drying of plant tissues.

(((11))) (12)
"Device" means any instrument or contrivance intended to trap,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate pests, but not including equipment used
for the application of pesticides when sold separately from the pesticides.

(((12))) (13)
"Direct supervision" by certified private applicators shall mean that
the designated restricted use pesticide shall be applied for purposes of
producing any agricultural commodity on land owned or rented by the applicator
or the applicator's employer, by a competent person acting under the
instructions and control of a certified private applicator who is available if
and when needed, even though such certified private applicator is not
physically present at the time and place the pesticide is applied. The
certified private applicator shall have direct management responsibility and
familiarity of the pesticide, manner of application, pest, and land to which
the pesticide is being applied. Direct supervision by all other certified applicators
and licensed school facility applicators means direct on-the-job
supervision and shall require that the certified applicator or licensed
school facility applicator be physically present at the application site
and that the person making the application be in voice and visual contact with
the certified applicator or licensed school facility applicator at all
times during the application. Direct supervision of an aerial apparatus means
the pilot of the aircraft must be appropriately certified.

(((13))) (14)
"Director" means the director of the department or a duly authorized
representative.

(((14))) (15)
"Engage in business" means any application of pesticides by any
person upon lands or crops of another.

(((15))) (16)
"EPA" means the United States environmental protection agency.

(((16))) (17)
"EPA restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide classified for
restricted use by the administrator, EPA.

(((17))) (18)
"FIFRA" means the federal insecticide, fungicide and rodenticide act
as amended (61 Stat. 163, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.).

(((18))) (19)
"Fumigant" means any pesticide product or combination of products
that is a vapor or gas or forms a vapor or gas on application and whose method
of pesticidal action is through the gaseous state.

(((19))) (20)
"Fungi" means all nonchlorophyll-bearing thallophytes (all
nonchlorophyll-bearing plants of lower order than mosses and liverworts); for
example, rusts, smuts, mildews, molds, and yeasts, except those on or in a
living person or other animals.

(((20))) (21)
"Fungicide" means any substance or mixture of substances intended to
prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any fungi.

(((21))) (22)
"Herbicide" means any substance or mixture of substances intended to
prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any weed or other higher plant.

(((22))) (23)
"Immediate service call" means a landscape application to satisfy an
emergency customer request for service, or a treatment to control a pest to
landscape plants.

(((23))) (24)
"Insect" means any small invertebrate animal, in any life stage,
whose adult form is segmented and which generally belongs to the class insecta,
comprised of six-legged, usually winged forms, as, for example, beetles, bugs,
bees, and flies. The term insect shall also apply to other allied classes of
arthropods whose members are wingless and usually have more than six legs, for
example, spiders, mites, ticks, centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.

(((24))) (25)
"Insecticide" means any substance or mixture of substances intended
to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any insect.

(((25))) (26)
"Land" means all land and water areas, including airspace and all
plants, animals, structures, buildings, devices, and contrivances, appurtenant
to or situated on, fixed or mobile, including any used for transportation.

(((26))) (27)
"Landscape application" means an application ((by a certified
applicator)) of any EPA registered pesticide to any exterior landscape ((plants
found)) area around residential property, commercial properties such
as apartments or shopping centers, parks, golf courses, schools including
nursery schools and licensed day cares, or cemeteries or similar areas. This
definition shall not apply to: (a) Applications made by certified private
applicators; (b) mosquito abatement, gypsy moth eradication, or similar
wide-area pest control programs sponsored by governmental entities; and (c)
commercial pesticide applicators making structural applications.

(((27))) (28)
"Nematocide" means any substance or mixture of substances intended to
prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate nematodes.

(((28))) (29)
"Nematode" means any invertebrate animal of the phylum
nemathelminthes and class nematoda, that is, unsegmented round worms with
elongated, fusiform, or saclike bodies covered with cuticle, and inhabiting
soil, water, plants or plant parts. Nematodes may also be called nemas or
eelworms.

(((29))) (30)
"Person" means any individual, partnership, association, corporation,
or organized group of persons whether or not incorporated.

(((30))) (31)
"Pest" means, but is not limited to, any insect, rodent, nematode,
snail, slug, weed, and any form of plant or animal life or virus, except virus,
bacteria, or other microorganisms on or in a living person or other animal or
in or on processed food or beverages or pharmaceuticals, which is normally
considered to be a pest, or which the director may declare to be a pest.

(((31))) (32)
"Pesticide" means, but is not limited to:

(a) Any substance or
mixture of substances intended to prevent, destroy, control, repel, or mitigate
any pest;

(b) Any substance or
mixture of substances intended to be used as a plant regulator, defoliant or
desiccant; and

(c) Any spray adjuvant,
such as a wetting agent, spreading agent, deposit builder, adhesive,
emulsifying agent, deflocculating agent, water modifier, or similar agent with
or without toxic properties of its own intended to be used with any pesticide
as an aid to the application or effect thereof, and sold in a package or
container separate from that of the pesticide with which it is to be used.

(((32))) (33)
"Pesticide advisory board" means the pesticide advisory board as
provided for in this chapter.

(((33))) (34)
"Plant regulator" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended through physiological action, to accelerate or retard the rate of
growth or maturation, or to otherwise alter the behavior of ornamental or crop
plants or their produce, but shall not include substances insofar as they are
intended to be used as plant nutrients, trace elements, nutritional chemicals,
plant inoculants, or soil amendments.

(((34))) (35)
"Private applicator" means a certified applicator who uses or is in
direct supervision of the use of any pesticide classified by the EPA or the
director as a restricted use pesticide, for the purposes of producing any
agricultural commodity and for any associated noncrop application on land owned
or rented by the applicator or the applicator's employer or if applied without
compensation other than trading of personal services between producers of
agricultural commodities on the land of another person.

(((35))) (36)
"Private-commercial applicator" means a certified applicator who uses
or supervises the use of any pesticide classified by the EPA or the director as
a restricted use pesticide for purposes other than the production of any
agricultural commodity on lands owned or rented by the applicator or the
applicator's employer.

(((36))) (37)
"Residential property" includes property less than one acre in size
zoned as residential by a city, town, or county, but does not include property
zoned as agricultural or agricultural homesites.

(((37))) (38)
"Restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide or device which, when
used as directed or in accordance with a widespread and commonly recognized
practice, the director determines, subsequent to a hearing, requires additional
restrictions for that use to prevent unreasonable adverse effects on the
environment including people, lands, beneficial insects, animals, crops, and
wildlife, other than pests.

(((38))) (39)
"Rodenticide" means any substance or mixture of substances intended
to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate rodents, or any other vertebrate animal
which the director may declare by rule to be a pest.

(((39))) (40)
"School facility" means any facility used for licensed day care
center, kindergarten, or elementary or secondary school purposes. School
facility includes the buildings or structures, playgrounds, landscape areas,
athletic fields, school vehicles, or any other area of school property.

(41) "School
facility applicator" means a licensed applicator that uses or supervises
the use of any nonrestricted use pesticide, except an antimicrobial pesticide,
on any school facility. A school facility applicator may not apply any
pesticide by means of an apparatus as defined in this section.

(42)
"Snails or slugs" include all harmful mollusks.

(((40))) (43)
"Unreasonable adverse effects on the environment" means any
unreasonable risk to people or the environment taking into account the
economic, social, and environmental costs and benefits of the use of any
pesticide, or as otherwise determined by the director.

(((41))) (44)
"Weed" means any plant which grows where it is not wanted.

Sec. 2. RCW 17.21.100 and 1994 c
283 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Certified
applicators and school facility applicators licensed under the
provisions of this chapter, persons required to be licensed under this chapter,
all persons applying pesticides to more than one acre of agricultural land in a
calendar year, including public entities engaged in roadside spraying of pesticides,
and all other persons making landscape applications of pesticides to types of
property listed in RCW 17.21.410(1) (b), (c), (d), and (e), shall keep records
for each application which shall include the following information:

(a) The location of the
land where the pesticide was applied;

(b) The year, month,
day and beginning and ending time of the application of the pesticide each day
the pesticide was applied;

(c) The product name
used on the registered label and the United States environmental protection
agency registration number, if applicable, of the pesticide which was applied;

(d) The crop or site to
which the pesticide was applied;

(e) The amount of
pesticide applied per acre or other appropriate measure;

(f) The concentration
of pesticide that was applied;

(g) The number of
acres, or other appropriate measure, to which the pesticide was applied;

(h) The licensed
applicator's name, address, and telephone number and the name of the individual
or individuals making the application and their license number, if applicable;

(i) The direction and
estimated velocity of the wind during the time the pesticide was applied. This
subsection (1)(i) shall not apply to applications of baits in bait
stations and pesticide applications within structures; and

(j) Any other
reasonable information required by the director in rule.

(2)(a) The required
information shall be recorded on the same day that a pesticide is applied.

(b) A commercial
pesticide applicator who applies a pesticide to an agricultural crop or
agricultural lands shall provide a copy of the records required under
subsection (1) of this section for the application to the owner, or to the
lessee if applied on behalf of the lessee, of the lands to which the pesticide
is applied. Records provided by a commercial pesticide applicator to the owner
or lessee of agricultural lands under this subsection need not be provided on a
form adopted by the department.

(c) A commercial
pesticide applicator who applies a pesticide to a school facility shall provide
a copy of the records required under subsection (1) of this section to the
school within twenty-four hours of when the pesticide is applied.

(3) The records
required under this section shall be maintained and preserved by the licensed
pesticide applicator or such other person or entity applying the pesticides for
no less than seven years from the date of the application of the pesticide to
which such records refer. If the pesticide was applied by a commercial
pesticide applicator to the agricultural crop or agricultural lands of a person
who employs one or more employees, as "employee" is defined in RCW
49.70.020, the records shall also be kept by the employer for a period of seven
years from the date of the application of the pesticide to which the records
refer.

(4)(a) The pesticide
records shall be readily accessible to the department for inspection. Copies
of the records shall be provided on request to: The department; the department
of labor and industries; treating health care personnel initiating diagnostic
testing or therapy for a patient with a suspected case of pesticide poisoning;
the department of health; the pesticide incident reporting and tracking review
panel; and, in the case of an industrial insurance claim filed under Title 51
RCW with the department of labor and industries, the employee or the employee's
designated representative. In addition, the director may require the
submission of the records on a routine basis within thirty days of the
application of any restricted use pesticide in prescribed areas controlling the
use of the restricted use pesticide. When a request for records is made under
this subsection by treating health care personnel and the record is required
for determining treatment, copies of the record shall be provided immediately.
For all other requests, copies of the record shall be provided within
seventy-two hours.

(b) Copies of records
provided to a person or entity under this subsection (4) shall, if so
requested, be provided on a form adopted under subsection (7) of this section.
Information for treating health care personnel shall be made immediately
available by telephone, if requested, with a copy of the records provided
within twenty-four hours.

(5) If a request for a
copy of the record is made under this section from an applicator referred to in
subsection (1) of this section and the applicator refuses to provide a copy,
the requester may notify the department of the request and the applicator's
refusal. Within seven working days, the department shall request that the
applicator provide the department with all pertinent copies of the records,
except that in a medical emergency the request shall be made within two working
days. The applicator shall provide copies of the records to the department
within twenty-four hours after the department's request.

(6) The department
shall include inspection of the records required under this section as part of
any on-site inspection conducted under this chapter on agricultural lands. The
inspection shall determine whether the records are readily transferable to a
form adopted by the department and are readily accessible to employees.
However, no person subject to a department inspection may be inspected under
this subsection (6) more than once in any calendar year, unless a previous
inspection has found recordkeeping violations. If recordkeeping violations are
found, the department may conduct reasonable multiple inspections, pursuant to
rules adopted by the department. Nothing in this subsection (6) limits the
department's inspection of records pertaining to pesticide-related injuries,
illnesses, fatalities, accidents, or complaints.

(7) The department of
agriculture and the department of labor and industries shall jointly adopt, by
rule, forms that satisfy the information requirements of this section.

(8) The
recordkeeping requirements of this section do not apply to applications of
antimicrobial pesticides to school facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 17.21 RCW, to be codified between RCW 17.21.126 and 17.21.128, to
read as follows:

It is unlawful for any
person to act as a school facility applicator without having obtained a school
facility applicator license from the director. Application for a school
facility applicator license must be accompanied by a fee of twenty-five
dollars. Private commercial applicators and public operators are exempt from
the requirements of this section when acting under the authority of their
existing license.

Sec. 4. RCW 17.21.126 and 1997 c
242 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be unlawful
for any person to act as a private pesticide applicator without first complying
with requirements determined by the director as necessary to prevent
unreasonable adverse effects on the environment, including injury to the
pesticide applicator or other persons, for each specific pesticide use.

(1) Certification
standards to determine the individual's competency with respect to the use and
handling of the pesticide or class of pesticides for which the private
pesticide applicator is certified shall be relative to hazards of the
particular type of application, class of pesticides, or handling procedure. In
determining these standards the director shall take into consideration
standards of the EPA and is authorized to adopt these standards by rule.

(2) Application for a
private pesticide applicator license shall be accompanied by a fee of
twenty-five dollars. Individuals with a valid certified applicator license, school
facility applicator license, pest control consultant license, or dealer
manager license who qualify in the appropriate statewide or agricultural
license categories are exempt from the private applicator fee requirement.
However, licensed public pesticide operators, otherwise exempted from the
public pesticide operator license fee requirement, are not also exempted from
the private pesticide applicator fee requirement.

Sec. 5. RCW 17.21.128 and 1994 c
283 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director may
renew any certification or license issued under authority of this chapter
subject to the recertification standards identified in subsection (2) of this
section or an examination requiring new knowledge that may be required to apply
pesticides.

(2) Except as provided
in subsection (3) of this section, all individuals licensed under this chapter
shall meet the recertification standards identified in (a) or (b) of this
subsection, every five years, in order to qualify for continuing licensure.

(a) Licensed pesticide
applicators may qualify for continued licensure through accumulation of
recertification credits.

(i) Private pesticide
applicators and school facility applicators shall accumulate a minimum
of twenty department-approved credits every five years with no more than eight
credits allowed per year provided that school facility applicators must
obtain a minimum of four credits on integrated pest management in schools as
designated by the department;

(ii) All other license
types established under this chapter shall accumulate a minimum of forty
department-approved credits every five years with no more than fifteen credits
allowed per year.

(b) Certified pesticide
applicators may qualify for continued licensure through meeting the examination
requirements necessary to become licensed in those areas in which the licensee
operates.

(3) At the
termination of a licensee's five-year recertification period, the director may
waive the requirements identified in subsection (2) of this section if the
licensee can demonstrate that he or she is meeting comparable recertification
standards through another state or jurisdiction or through a federal
environmental protection agency approved government agency plan.

Sec. 6. RCW 17.21.150 and 1994 c
283 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

A person who has
committed any of the following acts is declared to be in violation of this
chapter:

(1) Made false or
fraudulent claims through any media, misrepresenting the effect of materials or
methods to be utilized;

(2) Applied worthless
or improper pesticides;

(3) Operated a faulty
or unsafe apparatus;

(4) Operated in a
faulty, careless, or negligent manner;

(5) Refused or
neglected to comply with the provisions of this chapter, the rules adopted
hereunder, or of any lawful order of the director including a final order of
the director directing payment of a civil penalty. In an adjudicative
proceeding arising from the department's denial of a license for failure to pay
a civil penalty the subject shall be limited to whether the payment was made
and the proceeding may not be used to collaterally attack the final order;

(6) Refused or
neglected to keep and maintain the pesticide application records required by
rule, or to make reports when and as required;

(7) Made false or
fraudulent records, invoices, or reports;

(8) Acted as a
certified applicator or school facility applicator without having
provided direct supervision to an unlicensed person as defined in RCW
17.21.020(12);

(9) Operated an
unlicensed apparatus or an apparatus without a license plate issued for that
particular apparatus;

(10) Used fraud or
misrepresentation in making an application for a license or renewal of a
license;

(11) Is not qualified
to perform the type of pest control under the conditions and in the locality in
which he or she operates or has operated, regardless of whether or not he or
she has previously passed a pesticide license examination;

(12) Aided or abetted a
licensed or an unlicensed person to evade the provisions of this chapter,
combined or conspired with such a licensed or an unlicensed person to evade the
provisions of this chapter, or allowed one's license to be used by an
unlicensed person;

(13) Knowingly made
false, misleading or erroneous statements or reports during or after an
inspection concerning any infestation or infection of pests found on land or in
connection with any pesticide complaint or investigation;

(14) Impersonated any
state, county or city inspector or official;

(15) Applied a
restricted use pesticide without having a certified applicator in direct
supervision;

(16) Operated a
commercial pesticide application business: (a) Without an individual licensed
as a commercial pesticide applicator or (b) with a licensed commercial
pesticide applicator not licensed in the classification or classifications in
which the business operates; or

(17)
Operated as a commercial pesticide applicator without meeting the financial
responsibility requirements including not having a properly executed financial
responsibility insurance certificate or surety bond form on file with the
department.

Sec. 7. RCW 17.21.410 and 1994 c
283 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A certified
applicator making a landscape application to:

(a) Residential
property shall at the time of the application place a marker at the usual point
of entry to the property. If the application is made to an isolated spot that
is not a substantial portion of the property, the applicator shall only be required
to place a marker at the application site. If the application is in a fenced
or otherwise isolated backyard, no marker is required.

(b) Commercial
properties such as apartments or shopping centers shall at the time of
application place a marker in a conspicuous location at or near each site being
treated.

(c) A golf course shall
at the time of the application place a marker at the first tee and tenth tee or
post the information in a conspicuous location such as on a central message
board.

(d) A school, nursery
school, or licensed day care shall at the time of the application place a
marker at each primary point of entry to the school grounds. A school
employee making an application to a school facility shall comply with the
posting requirements in section 8 of this act.

(e) A park, cemetery,
rest stop, or similar property as may be defined in rule shall at the time of
the application place a marker at each primary point of entry.

(2) An individual
making a landscape application to a school grounds, nursery school, or licensed
day care, and not otherwise covered by subsection (1) of this section, shall ((be
required to comply with the posting requirements in subsection (1)(d) of this
section)) at the time of the application place a marker at each primary
point of entry to the school grounds.

(3) The marker shall be
a minimum of four inches by five inches. It shall have the words: "THIS
LANDSCAPE HAS BEEN TREATED BY" as the headline and "FOR MORE
INFORMATION PLEASE CALL" as the footer. Larger size requirements for
markers may be established in rule for specific applications. The company name
and service mark ((with the applicator's telephone number where information
can be obtained)) shall be included between the headline and the footer on
((the marker. The letters and service marks)) a marker placed by a
commercial applicator. The applicator's telephone number where information can
be obtained about the application shall be included in the footer of the
marker. Markers shall be printed in colors contrasting to the background.

(4) The property owner
or tenant shall remove the marker according to the schedule established in
rule. A ((commercial)) certified applicator or individual who
complies with this section is not liable for the removal of markers by
unauthorized persons or removal outside the designated removal time.

(5) A certified
applicator or individual who complies with this section cannot be held
liable for personal property damage or bodily injury resulting from markers
that are placed as required.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 17.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) As used in this
section, "school" means a licensed day care center, kindergarten, and
elementary or secondary school.

(2) A school shall
provide written notification annually or upon enrollment to parents or
guardians of students and employees describing the school's pest control
policies and methods, including the posting and notification requirements of
this section.

(3) A school shall
establish a notification system that, as a minimum, notifies interested parents
or guardians of students and employees at least forty-eight hours before a
pesticide application to a school facility. The notification system shall
include posting of the notification in a prominent place in the main office of
the school.

(4) All notifications
to parents, guardians, and employees shall include the heading "Notice:
Pesticide Application" and, at a minimum, shall state:

(a) The product name of
the pesticide to be applied;

(b) The intended date
and time of application;

(c) The location to
which the pesticide is to be applied;

(d) The pest to be
controlled; and

(e) The name and phone
number of a contact person at the school.

(5) A school facility
application must be made within forty‑eight hours following the intended
date and time stated in the notification or the notification process shall be
repeated.

(6) A school shall, at
the time of application, post notification signs for all pesticide applications
made to school facilities unless the application is otherwise required to be
posted by a certified applicator under the provisions of RCW 17.21.410(1)(d).

(a) Notification signs
for applications made to school grounds by school employees shall be placed at
the location of the application and at each primary point of entry to the
school grounds. The signs shall be a minimum of four inches by five inches and
shall include the words: "THIS LANDSCAPE HAS BEEN TREATED BY YOUR SCHOOL"
as the headline and "FOR MORE INFORMATION PLEASE CALL" as the
footer. The footer shall provide the name and telephone number of a contact
person at the school.

(b) Notification signs
for applications made to school facilities other than school grounds shall be posted
at the location of the application. The signs shall be a minimum of eight and
one‑half by eleven inches and shall include the heading "Notice:
Pesticide Application" and, at a minimum, shall state:

(i) The product name of
the pesticide applied;

(ii) The date and time
of application;

(iii) The location to
which the pesticide was applied;

(iv) The pest to be
controlled; and

(v) The name and phone
number of a contact person at the school.

(c) Notification signs
shall be printed in colors contrasting to the background.

(d) Notification signs
shall remain in place for at least twenty‑four hours from the time the
application is completed. In the event the pesticide label requires a
restricted entry interval greater than twenty‑four hours, the notification
sign shall remain in place consistent with the restricted entry interval time
as required by the label.

(7) A school facility
application does not include the application of antimicrobial pesticides or the
placement of insect or rodent baits that are not accessible to children.

(8) The prenotification
requirements of this section do not apply if the school facility application is
made when the school is not occupied by students for at least two consecutive
days after the application.

(9) The prenotification
requirements of this section do not apply to any emergency school facility
application for control of any pest that poses an immediate human health or
safety threat, such as an application to control stinging insects. When an
emergency school facility application is made, notification consistent with the
school's notification system shall occur as soon as possible after the
application. The notification shall include information consistent with
subsection (6)(b) of this section.

(10) A school shall
make the records of all pesticide applications to school facilities required
under this chapter, including an annual summary of the records, readily
accessible to interested persons.

(11) A school is not
liable for the removal of signs by unauthorized persons. A school that
complies with this section may not be held liable for personal property damage
or bodily injury resulting from signs that are placed as required.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

Schools as defined in
section 8 of this act shall provide notice of pesticide use to parents or
guardians of students and employees pursuant to chapter 17.21 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.195 RCW to read as follows:

Schools as defined in
section 8 of this act shall provide notice of pesticide use to parents or
guardians of students and employees pursuant to chapter 17.21 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

Licensed day care
centers shall provide notice of pesticide use to parents or guardians of
students and employees pursuant to chapter 17.21 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. (1) Sections 1 and 3
through 6 of this act take effect January 1, 2002.

(2) Sections 2 and 7
through 11 of this act take effect September 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---