BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The intent of this act
is to ensure a sustainable, comprehensive, pipeline safety program, to protect
the health and safety of the citizens of the state of Washington, and maintain
the quality of the state's environment. The legislature finds that public
safety and the environment are best protected by securing permanent funding for
this program through establishment of a regulatory fee imposed on hazardous
liquids and gas pipelines.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 80.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every gas company
and every interstate gas pipeline company subject to inspection or enforcement
by the commission shall pay an annual pipeline safety fee to the commission.
The aggregate amount of fees set shall be sufficient to recover the reasonable
costs of administering the pipeline safety program, taking into account federal
funds used to offset the costs. At a minimum, the fees established under this
section shall be sufficient to adequately fund pipeline inspection personnel,
the timely review of pipeline safety and integrity plans, the timely
development of spill response plans, the timely development of accurate maps of
pipeline locations, participation in federal pipeline safety efforts to the
extent allowed by law as now or hereafter amended, and the staffing of the citizens
committee on pipeline safety at levels the committee determines needed to
provide oversight. Increases in the aggregate amount of fees over the
immediately preceding fiscal year are subject to the requirements of RCW
43.135.055.

(2) The commission
shall by rule establish the methodology it will use to set the appropriate fee
for each entity subject to this section. The methodology shall provide for an
equitable distribution of program costs among all entities subject to the fee. In
establishing the methodology, the commission shall create an incentive program
for allocating fees for pipeline safety in collaboration with the citizens
committee. The fee methodology shall provide for:

(a) Direct assignment
of average costs associated with annual standard inspections, including the
average number of inspection days per year. In establishing these directly
assignable costs, the commission shall consider the requirements and guidelines
of the federal government, state safety standards, and good engineering
practice; and

(b) A uniform and
equitable means of estimating and allocating costs of other duties relating to
inspecting pipelines for safety that are not directly assignable, including but
not limited to design review and construction inspections, specialized
inspections, incident investigations, geographic mapping system design and
maintenance, and administrative support.

(3) The commission
shall require reports from those entities subject to this section in the form
and at such time as necessary to set the fees. After considering the reports
supplied by the entities, the commission shall set the amount of the fee
payable by each entity by general order entered before July 1st of each year.

(4) The commission
shall collect the pipeline safety fee as part of the fee specified in RCW
80.24.010. The commission shall allocate the moneys collected under RCW
80.24.010 between the pipeline safety program and for other regulatory
purposes. The commission shall adopt rules that assure that fee moneys related
to the pipeline safety program are maintained separately from other moneys
collected by the commission under this chapter.

(5) Any payment of the
fee imposed by this section made after its due date must include a late fee of
two percent of the amount due. Delinquent fees accrue interest at the rate of
one percent per month.

(6) The commission
shall keep accurate records of the costs incurred in administering its gas
pipeline safety program, and the records are open to inspection by interested
parties. The records and data upon which the commission's determination is
made shall be prima facie correct in any proceeding to challenge the
reasonableness or correctness of any order of the commission fixing fees and
distributing regulatory expenses.

(7) If any entity
seeks to contest the imposition of a fee imposed under this section, that
entity shall pay the fee and request a refund within six months of the due date
for the payment by filing a petition for a refund with the commission. The
commission shall establish by rule procedures for handling refund petitions and
may delegate the decisions on refund petitions to the secretary of the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 81.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every hazardous
liquid pipeline company as defined in RCW 81.88.010 shall pay an annual
pipeline safety fee to the commission. The aggregate amount of fees set shall
be sufficient to recover the reasonable costs of administering the pipeline
safety program, taking into account federal funds used to offset the costs. At
a minimum, the fees established under this section shall be sufficient to
adequately fund pipeline inspection personnel, the timely review of pipeline safety
and integrity plans, the timely development of spill response plans, the timely
development of accurate maps of pipeline locations, participation in federal
pipeline safety efforts to the extent allowed by law as now or hereafter
amended, and the staffing of the citizens committee on pipeline safety at
levels the committee determines needed to provide oversight. Increases in the
aggregate amount of fees over the immediately preceding fiscal year are subject
to the requirements of RCW 43.135.055.

(2) The commission
shall by rule establish the methodology it will use to set the appropriate fee
for each entity subject to this section. The methodology shall provide for an
equitable distribution of program costs among all entities subject to the fee.
In establishing the methodology, the commission shall create an incentive
program for allocating fees for pipeline safety in collaboration with the
citizens committee. The fee methodology shall provide for:

(a) Direct assignment
of average costs associated with annual standard inspections, including the
average number of inspection days per year. In establishing these directly
assignable costs, the commission shall consider the requirements and guidelines
of the federal government, state safety standards, and good engineering
practice; and

(b) A uniform and
equitable means of estimating and allocating costs of other duties relating to
inspecting pipelines for safety that are not directly assignable, including but
not limited to design review and construction inspections, specialized
inspections, incident investigations, geographic mapping system design and
maintenance, and administrative support.

(3) The commission
shall require reports from those entities subject to this section in the form
and at such time as necessary to set the fees. After considering the reports
supplied by the entities, the commission shall set the amount of the fee
payable by each entity by general order entered before July 1st of each year.

(4) The commission
shall collect the pipeline safety fee as part of the fee specified in RCW
81.24.010. The commission shall allocate the moneys collected under RCW
81.24.010 between the pipeline safety program and for other regulatory
purposes. The commission shall adopt rules that assure that fee moneys related
to the pipeline safety program are maintained separately from other moneys
collected by the commission under this chapter.

(5) Any payment of the
fee imposed by this section made after its due date must include a late fee of
two percent of the amount due. Delinquent fees accrue interest at the rate of
one percent per month.

(6) The commission
shall keep accurate records of the costs incurred in administering its
hazardous liquid pipeline safety program, and the records are open to inspection
by interested parties. The records and data upon which the commission's
determination is made shall be prima facie correct in any proceeding to
challenge the reasonableness or correctness of any order of the commission
fixing fees and distributing regulatory expenses.

(7) If any entity
seeks to contest the imposition of a fee imposed under this section, that
entity shall pay the fee and request a refund within six months of the due date
for the payment by filing a petition for a refund with the commission. The
commission shall establish by rule procedures for handling refund petitions and
may delegate the decisions on refund petitions to the secretary of the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 81.88 RCW to read as follows:

The commission shall
review staff utilization, inspection activity, fee methodology, and costs of
the interstate pipeline safety program and report to the appropriate
legislative committees by November 15, 2002.

Sec. 5. RCW 19.122.055 and 2000
c 191 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who
fails to notify the one-number locator service and causes damage to a hazardous
liquid or gas pipeline is subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten
thousand dollars for each violation.

(2) All civil
penalties recovered under this section ((relating to hazardous liquid
pipelines)) shall be deposited into the ((hazardous liquid pipeline
safety account created in RCW 81.88.050. All civil penalties recovered under
this section relating to gas pipelines shall be deposited in the general fund
and expended for the purpose of enforcement of gas pipeline safety laws)) general
fund.

Sec. 6. RCW 81.88.010 and 2000 c
191 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.

(2) (("Department"
means the department of ecology.

(3))) "Failsafe" means a design feature
that will maintain or result in a safe condition in the event of malfunction or
failure of a power supply, component, or control device.

(((4))) (3)
"Gas" means natural gas, flammable gas, or toxic or corrosive gas.

(((5))) (4)
"Gas pipeline" means all parts of a pipeline facility through which
gas moves in transportation, including, but not limited to, line pipe, valves,
and other appurtenances connected to line pipe, pumping units, fabricated
assemblies associated with pumping units, metering and delivery stations and
fabricated assemblies therein, and breakout tanks. "Gas pipeline"
does not include process or transfer pipelines.

(((6))) (5)
"Gas pipeline company" means a person or entity constructing, owning,
or operating a gas pipeline for transporting gas. A "gas pipeline
company" does not include: (a) Distribution systems owned and operated
under franchise for the sale, delivery, or distribution of natural gas at retail;
or (b) excavation contractors or other contractors that contract with a gas
pipeline company.

(((7))) (6)
"Hazardous liquid" means: (a) Petroleum, petroleum products, or
anhydrous ammonia as those terms are defined in 49 C.F.R. Part 195 in effect March
1, 1998; and (b) carbon dioxide.

(((8))) (7)
"Local government" means a political subdivision of the state or a
city or town.

(((9))) (8)
"Person" means an individual, partnership, franchise holder,
association, corporation, a state, a city, a county, or any political
subdivision or instrumentality of a state, and its employees, agents, or legal
representatives.

(((10))) (9)
"Pipeline," "pipeline system," or "hazardous liquid
pipeline" means all parts of a pipeline facility through which a hazardous
liquid moves in transportation, including, but not limited to, line pipe,
valves, and other appurtenances connected to line pipe, pumping units,
fabricated assemblies associated with pumping units, metering and delivery
stations and fabricated assemblies therein, and breakout tanks.
"Pipeline" or "pipeline system" does not include process or
transfer pipelines.

(((11))) (10)
"Pipeline company" or "hazardous liquid pipeline company"
means a person or entity constructing, owning, or operating a pipeline for
transporting hazardous liquid. A "pipeline company" does not
include: (a) Distribution systems owned and operated under franchise for the
sale, delivery, or distribution of natural gas at retail; or (b) excavation
contractors or other contractors that contract with a pipeline company.

(((12))) (11)
"Reportable release" means a spilling, leaking, pouring, emitting,
discharging, or any other uncontrolled escape of a hazardous liquid in excess
of one barrel, or forty-two gallons.

(((13))) (12)
"Safety management systems" means management systems that include
coordinated and interdisciplinary evaluations of the effect of significant
changes to a pipeline system before such changes are implemented.

(((14))) (13)
"Transfer pipeline" means a buried or aboveground pipeline used to
carry oil between a tank vessel or transmission pipeline and the first valve
inside secondary containment at the facility provided that any discharge on the
facility side of that first valve will not directly impact waters of the
state. A transfer pipeline includes valves, and other appurtenances connected
to the pipeline, pumping units, and fabricated assemblies associated with
pumping units. A transfer pipeline does not include process pipelines,
pipelines carrying ballast or bilge water, transmission pipelines, or tank
vessel or storage tanks.

(((15))) (14)
"Transmission pipeline" means a gas pipeline that transports gas
within a storage field, or transports gas from an interstate pipeline or
storage facility to a distribution main or a large volume gas user, or operates
at a hoop stress of twenty percent or more of the specified minimum yield
strength.

Sec. 7. RCW 81.88.060 and 2000 c
191 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A comprehensive
program of hazardous liquid pipeline safety is authorized by RCW 81.88.010,
81.88.040, ((81.88.050,)) 81.88.090, 81.88.100, ((81.88.130,))
48.48.160, and this section to be developed and implemented consistent with
federal law. ((Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section,)) The
commission shall administer and enforce all laws related to hazardous liquid
pipeline safety.

(2) The commission
shall adopt rules for pipeline safety standards for hazardous liquid pipeline
transportation that:

(a) Require pipeline
companies to design, construct, operate, and maintain their pipeline facilities
so they are safe and efficient;

(b) Require pipeline
companies to rapidly locate and isolate all reportable releases from pipelines,
that may include:

(i) Installation of
remote control shut-off valves; and

(ii) Installation of
remotely monitored pressure gauges and meters;

(c) Require the
training and certification of personnel who operate pipelines and the
associated systems;

(d) Require reporting
of emergency situations, including emergency shutdowns and material defects or
physical damage that impair the serviceability of a pipeline; and

(e) Require pipeline
companies to submit operations safety plans to the commission once every five
years, as well as any amendments to the plan made necessary by changes to the
pipeline system or its operation. The safety plan shall include emergency
response procedures.

(3) The commission
shall approve operations safety plans if they have been deemed fit for
service. A plan shall be deemed fit for service when it provides for pipelines
that are designed, developed, constructed, operated, and periodically modified
to provide for protection of public safety and the environment. Pipeline
operations safety plans shall, at a minimum, include:

(a) A schedule of
inspection and testing within the pipeline distribution system of:

(i) All mechanical
components;

(ii) All electronic
components; and

(iii) The structural
integrity of all pipelines as determined through pressure testing, internal
inspection tool surveys, or another appropriate technique;

(b) Failsafe systems;

(c) Safety management
systems; and

(d) Emergency
management training for pipeline operators.

(4) The commission
shall coordinate information related to pipeline safety by providing technical
assistance to local planning and siting authorities.

(5) The commission
shall evaluate, and consider adopting, proposals developed by the federal
office of pipeline safety, the national transportation safety board, and other
agencies and organizations related to methods and technologies for testing the
integrity of pipeline structure, leak detection, and other elements of pipeline
operation.

(((6) The
authorities of RCW 81.88.010, 81.88.040, 81.88.050, 81.88.090, 81.88.100,
81.88.130, 48.48.160, and this section relating to hazardous liquid pipeline
safety shall be transferred from the commission to the department pursuant to
RCW 81.88.130 upon the occurrence of either:

(a) Amendments to
federal pipeline safety laws to eliminate preemption of state authority to
regulate safety requirements for such pipelines; or

(b) The granting of
federal authority to the state to enforce or adopt any safety requirements for
interstate hazardous liquid pipelines.))

Sec. 8. RCW 81.88.090 and 2000 c
191 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission ((and
the department)) shall apply for federal delegation for the state's program
for the purposes of enforcement of federal hazardous liquid pipeline safety
requirements. If the secretary of transportation delegates inspection
authority to the state as provided in this subsection, the ((department))
commission, at a minimum, shall do the following:

(a) Inspect hazardous
liquid pipelines periodically as specified in the inspection program;

(b) Collect fees;

(c) Order and oversee
the testing of hazardous liquid pipelines as authorized by federal law and
regulation; and

(d) File reports with
the United States secretary of transportation as required to maintain the
delegated authority.

(2) The commission ((and
the department)) shall also seek federal authority to adopt safety
standards related to the monitoring and testing of interstate hazardous liquid
pipelines.

(3) Upon delegation
under subsection (1) of this section or under a grant of authority under
subsection (2) of this section, to the extent authorized by federal law, the ((department))
commission shall adopt rules for interstate pipelines that are no less
stringent than the state's laws and rules for intrastate hazardous liquid
pipelines.

Sec. 9. RCW 81.88.140 and 2000 c
191 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The citizens
committee on pipeline safety is established to advise the state agencies and
other appropriate federal and local government agencies and officials on matters
relating to hazardous liquid and gas pipeline safety, routing, construction,
operation, and maintenance. The committee shall serve as an advisory
committee for the commission on matters relating to the commission's pipeline
safety programs and activities. The commission shall consult with and provide
periodic reports to the committee on matters related to the commission's
pipeline safety programs and activities, including but not limited to the
development and regular review of funding elements for pipeline safety programs
and activities.

(2) The
committee shall have thirteen total members who shall be appointed by the
governor to staggered three-year terms and shall consist of: (a) Nine members
representing local government, including elected officials and the public; and
(b) four nonvoting members, representing owners and operators of hazardous
liquid and gas pipelines. All members of the committee, voting and
nonvoting, may participate fully in the committee's meetings, activities, and
deliberations and shall timely receive all notices and information related to
committee business and decisions.

(3) The
committee shall review and comment on proposed rules and the operation of the
state pipeline safety programs.

(((2))) (4)
The committee may create one or more technical advisory committees comprised of
gas and hazardous liquid pipeline owners or operators, agency representatives,
natural resource and environmental interests, or other interested parties.

(((3))) (5)
The committee established in ((subsection (1) of)) this section
constitutes a class one group under RCW 43.03.220. Expenses for this group, as
well as staff support, shall be provided by the utilities and transportation
commission ((and, if additional pipeline authority is transferred to it, the
department of ecology)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 81.88.050 (Hazardous liquid
pipeline safety account) and 2000 c 191 s 4; and

(2) RCW 81.88.130 (Transfer of powers,
duties, and functions of commission to department--Delegation of federal
authority--Determination by office of financial management) and 2000 c 191 s
13.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. This act is necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect July 1, 2001.

---
END ---