BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.52.010 and 1985 c
289 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((following))
definitions in this section apply ((in)) throughout this
chapter((:)) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Premises" includes any building, dwelling, structure used for
commercial aquaculture, or any real property((;)).

(2) "Enter(("))."
The word "enter" when constituting an element or part of a crime, shall
include the entrance of the person, or the insertion of any part of his or
her body, or any instrument or weapon held in his or her hand and
used or intended to be used to threaten or intimidate a person or to detach or
remove property((;)).

(3) "Enters or
remains unlawfully(("))." A person "enters or
remains unlawfully" in or upon premises when he or she is not then
licensed, invited, or otherwise privileged to so enter or remain.

A license or privilege
to enter or remain in a building ((which)) that is only partly
open to the public is not a license or privilege to enter or remain in that
part of a building ((which)) that is not open to the public. A
person who enters or remains upon unimproved and apparently unused land, which
is neither fenced nor otherwise enclosed in a manner designed to exclude
intruders, does so with license and privilege unless notice against trespass is
personally communicated to him or her by the owner of the land or some
other authorized person, or unless notice is given by posting in a conspicuous
manner. Land that is used for commercial aquaculture or for growing an
agricultural crop or crops, other than timber, is not unimproved and apparently
unused land if a crop or any other sign of cultivation is clearly visible or if
notice is given by posting in a conspicuous manner. Similarly, a field fenced
in any manner ((is)) or a railroad right of way on which rails exist
are not unimproved and apparently unused lands((;)).

(4) "Data"
means a representation of information, knowledge, facts, concepts, or
instructions that are being prepared or have been prepared in a formalized
manner and are intended for use in a computer((;)).

(5) "Computer
program" means an ordered set of data representing coded instructions or
statements that when executed by a computer cause the computer to process
data((;)).

(6) "Access"
means to approach, instruct, communicate with, store data in, retrieve data
from, or otherwise make use of any resources of a computer, directly or by
electronic means.

(7)
"Railroad" means any form of nonhighway ground transportation that
runs on rails.

(8) "Railroad
carrier" means a person providing railroad transportation.

(9) "Railroad
right of way" means the rails over which a railroad can operate,
structures that support the rails, the land within ten feet of a rail, and the
land outside that area that is owned, leased, or operated by a railroad carrier
and that is readily recognizable to a reasonable person as being railroad
property or is reasonably identified as such by fencing or appropriate signs.
"Railroad right of way" does not include formerly used rights of way
that have been abandoned or converted to a nonrailroad use under orders of the
United States Surface Transportation Board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 9A.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every person who
enters or remains unlawfully upon a railroad right of way is guilty of a
misdemeanor. The only circumstances in which a person may lawfully enter a
railroad right of way are specified in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section. RCW 9A.52.090 does not apply to this section.

(2) The following
persons have lawful authority to enter a railroad right of way while engaged in
the performance of their official duties: Employees of a railroad carrier,
police officers, fire fighters, peace officers, emergency response personnel,
representatives of the state department of transportation, representatives of
the state utilities and transportation commission, representatives of the
federal railroad administration, representatives of the national transportation
safety board, and union representatives of the railroad who are present on the
railroad's right of way for official union or railroad business.

(3) A person may enter
railroad rights of way under the following circumstances:

(a) When a person
enters the right of way at a public crossing for the purpose of crossing the
right of way at that location;

(b) When a person has
the consent or written permission of the railroad carrier to enter or remain on
the right of way in question. This includes passengers, who are persons
traveling by rail with the express consent of the railroad carrier, and have
consent to be on the train and in areas designated by the railroad carrier.
The public has consent to be on the grounds of a railroad station in those
areas and at those times designated by the railroad carrier;

(c) When a person or
the person's family, invitee, employee, or independent contractor enters the
right of way at a private crossing site approved by the railroad carrier for
the purpose of crossing the right of way at the approved crossing to obtain
access to land that the person owns, leases, or operates; or

(d) When a
person enters or remains on the right of way in an emergency to rescue a person
or animal or to remove an object that the person reasonably believes to pose an
imminent threat to life or limb.

---
END ---