BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature that this act clarify certain authorities of employees of the
Washington utilities and transportation commission. The legislature further
finds that this act is necessary to ensure the continuance of existing safety inspection
programs. Further, this act does not create a new program or authorize new
authority, and will not result in the expansion of the existing program.

Sec. 2. RCW 81.44.065 and 1961 c
14 s 81.44.065 are each amended to read as follows:

The utilities and
transportation commission shall exercise all powers and duties in relation to
the inspection of tracks, bridges, structures, equipment, apparatus, and
appliances of railroads with respect to the safety of employees and the public
and the administration and enforcement of all laws providing for the protection
of the public and employees of railroads ((which)) that prior to
April 1, 1955, were vested in and required to be performed by the
director of labor and industries.

A
commission employee certified by the federal railroad administration to perform
hazardous materials inspections may enter the property of any business that
receives, ships, or offers for shipment hazardous materials by rail, or that
manufactures, marks, maintains, reconditions, repairs, or tests containers that
are represented, marked, certified, or sold for use in the transportation of
hazardous materials by rail. Entry shall be at a reasonable time and in a
reasonable manner. The purpose of such entry is limited to performing
inspections, investigations, or surveillance of facilities, equipment, records,
and operations relating to the packaging, loading, or transportation of
hazardous materials by rail, pursuant only to the state participation program
outlined in Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The term
"business" is all inclusive and is not limited to common carriers or
public service companies.

---
END ---