BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 51.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The claim of a
worker who is exposed to a hazardous chemical in the course of his or her
employment is presumed to be covered by this title if the worker establishes
that: (a) He or she suffered harm or pain; and (b) an accident occurred or
working conditions existed which could have caused that harm or pain. This
presumption may be rebutted only by substantial evidence showing that the
worker has no physiological symptoms or that the worker's physiological
symptoms are not caused or aggravated, in any part, by the exposure.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "hazardous chemical" means a chemical for which there
is statistically significant evidence based on at least one study conducted in
accordance with established scientific principles that acute or chronic health
effects may occur in exposed individuals. "Hazardous chemical" does
not include a consumer product when the product is used by a worker in
substantially the same manner, form, and concentration as the product is used
by a noncommercial consumer and when the product exposure is not substantially
greater to the worker than to the noncommercial consumer during normal and
accepted use of that product.

(3) This section
applies only to claims for chemical exposure when the exposure occurs on or
after the effective date of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---