BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_7 Sec. 1. RCW
51.32.110 and 1997 c 325 s 3 are each amended to read

_8 as follows:

_9 (1) Any worker entitled to receive any benefits or
claiming

10 such under this title shall, if requested by the
department or

11 self-insurer, submit himself or herself for medical
examination((,

12 at a time and from time to time, at a place
reasonably convenient

13 for the worker and as may be provided by the rules of
the

14 department. An injured worker, whether an alien or
other injured

15 worker, who is not residing in the United States at
the time that

16 a medical examination is requested may be required to
submit to an

17 examination at any location in the United States
determined by the

18 department or self-insurer)) as authorized in
RCW 51.36.070.

p. 1 HB
1457

_1 (2) If the worker refuses to submit to medical
examination, or

_2 obstructs the same, or, if any injured worker shall
persist in

_3 unsanitary or injurious practices which tend to imperil
or retard

_4 his or her recovery, or shall refuse to submit to such
medical or

_5 surgical treatment as is reasonably essential to his or
her

_6 recovery or refuse or obstruct evaluation or examination
for the

_7 purpose of vocational rehabilitation or does not
cooperate in

_8 reasonable efforts at such rehabilitation, the
department or the

_9 self-insurer upon approval by the department, with
notice to the

10 worker may suspend any further action on any claim of
such worker

11 so long as such refusal, obstruction, noncooperation, or
practice

12 continues and reduce, suspend, or deny any compensation
for such

13 period: PROVIDED, That the department or the
self-insurer shall not

14 suspend any further action on any claim of a worker or
reduce,

15 suspend, or deny any compensation if a worker has good
cause for

16 refusing to submit to or to obstruct any examination,
evaluation,

17 treatment or practice requested by the department or
required

18 under this section.

19 (3) If the worker necessarily incurs traveling
expenses in

20 attending the examination pursuant to the request of the

21 department, such traveling expenses shall be repaid to
him or her

22 out of the accident fund upon proper voucher and audit
or shall be

23 repaid by the self-insurer, as the case may be.

24 (4)(a) If the medical examination required by this
section

25 causes the worker to be absent from his or her work
without pay:

26 (i) In the case of a worker insured by the
department, the

27 worker shall be paid compensation out of the accident
fund in an

28 amount equal to his or her usual wages for the time lost
from work

29 while attending the medical examination; or

30 (ii) In the case of a worker of a self-insurer, the
self-

31 insurer shall pay the worker an amount equal to his or
her usual

32 wages for the time lost from work while attending the
medical

33 examination.

34 (b) This subsection (4) shall apply prospectively to
all claims

35 regardless of the date of injury.

36 Sec. 2. RCW 51.36.070
and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 60 are each amended

37 to read as follows:

HB 1457 p. 2

_1 (1) When a medical examination is conducted under
this title:

_2 (a) The examination must be conducted at a
medical facility

_3 suitable for the examination and reasonably
convenient for the

_4 worker;

_5 (b) The examination must be conducted with due
regard and

_6 respect for the privacy and dignity of the injured
worker and for

_7 the safety and convenient access of the worker; and

_8 (c) The worker may be accompanied by an
uncompensated person

_9 who may observe the examination but not interfere
with or obstruct

10 the examination. The worker or person accompanying
the worker may,

11 at the worker's expense, make an audio or video recording
of the

12 examination, if the recording is made in an
unobtrusive

13 manner. This section does not limit the department
or self-

14 insurer's obligation to provide necessary interpreter
services.

15 (2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, whenever
the

16 director or the self-insurer deems it necessary in order
to

17 resolve any medical issue, the department or
self-insurer may, at

18 a time and from time to time and as may be provided
by department

19 rules, order a worker ((shall)) to
submit to examination by ((a

20 physician or physicians selected)) a provider
or providers

21 approved by the director((, with the rendition
of a report to the

22 person ordering the examination)) and
competent to examine the

23 worker and evaluate the injury or disease from which
the worker

24 suffers. An injured worker who is not residing in
the United States

25 at the time that a medical examination is ordered may
be required

26 to submit to an examination at any suitable medical
facility in

27 the United States as determined by the department or
self-insurer.

28 (3)(a) When ordering a medical examination, the
department or

29 self-insurer must first request in writing, with a
copy of the

30 request submitted to the worker and the worker's
representative,

31 if any, that the worker's attending physician or
other treating

32 provider conduct an examination and make a report on
the medical

33 issue in question. The attending physician or
treating provider

34 may, without prior authorization from the department
or self-

35 insurer, make a consultation referral to a provider
approved by

36 the director and licensed to practice in the same
field or

37 specialty as the attending physician or treating
provider, as

p. 3 HB
1457

_1 relevant. The consultant shall conduct the
examination and make a

_2 report to the provider requesting the examination.

_3 (b) If the medical issue is not resolved by the
requested

_4 examination and report, the department or
self-insurer may request

_5 the attending physician or treating provider to make
a

_6 consultation referral to a provider approved by the
director and

_7 licensed to practice in the same field or specialty
as the

_8 worker's attending physician or treating provider, as
relevant.

_9 (c) If the worker's attending physician or
treating provider is

10 unwilling or unable to conduct the examination or
make a

11 consultation referral, as requested by the department
or self-

12 insurer, the department or self-insurer may order a
medical

13 examination by a provider or providers agreed upon by
the worker

14 and the department or self-insurer.

15 (d) To resolve a material dispute regarding
treatment or

16 diagnosis between the attending physician or treating
provider and

17 a consulting provider, the department or self-insurer
may order a

18 medical examination to be conducted by a provider
that the injured

19 worker chooses from a list of at least five providers
submitted by

20 the department or self-insurer to the worker.

21 (4)(a) A provider conducting a medical
examination ordered

22 under this section must submit a report to the
department or self-

23 insurer as the case may be and, on the same day that
the report is

24 submitted, submit a copy of the report to the worker,
the worker's

25 representative, if any, the worker's attending
physician, and the

26 worker's employer.

27 (b) If the department or self-insurer relies on
the examination

28 report to deny, limit, or terminate benefits to a
worker, the

29 department or self-insurer must give the worker's
attending

30 physician no less than thirty days from the
physician's receipt of

31 the report to provide a written response to the
report.

32 (5) In resolving a medical issue under this
title, the

33 department or self-insurer must:

34 (a) Base the decision only on medical opinion
that is founded

35 on factual data supported by the evidence; and

36 (b) Give more weight to the medical opinion of
the worker's

37 attending physician or treating provider than to the
opinion of a

38 provider who has examined, but not treated, the
worker.

HB 1457 p. 4

_1 (6) The director, in his or her discretion,
may charge the cost

_2 of ((such)) a medical examination or
examinations ordered under

_3 this title to the self-insurer or to the medical
aid fund as the

_4 case may be. The cost of ((said)) the
examination shall include

_5 payment to the worker of reasonable expenses connected

_6 ((therewith)) with the examination as provided
in RCW 51.32.110.

_7 (7) For the purposes of this section,
"medical issue" includes

_8 all questions within the expertise of the provider,
including but

_9 not limited to, cause of the injury or disease,
establishment of

10 diagnoses, the course of or need for treatment, the
condition of

11 the worker and whether the condition is fixed and
stable,

12 limitations on return-to-work activities, review of
job analyses,

13 and assessment of permanent disability.

14 Sec. 3. RCW
51.32.112 and 1993 c 515 s 4 are each amended to read

15 as follows:

16 (1) The department shall ((develop standards for))
adopt rules

17 governing the conduct of ((special))
medical examinations ((to

18 determine permanent disabilities)) ordered
under this title,

19 including, but not limited to:

20 (a) The qualifications of persons conducting the
examinations.

21 To conduct an examination, a provider must, at a
minimum, be

22 licensed to practice at the time of the examination:

23 (i) In the same field or specialty as the
worker's attending

24 physician or treating provider, as relevant, with an
active

25 practice involving direct patient care at least
weekly in that

26 field or specialty. This requirement may be waived
by mutual

27 agreement between the worker and the department or
self-insurer;

28 and

29 (ii) Medicine or surgery under chapter 18.71 RCW,
osteopathic

30 medicine and surgery under chapter 18.57 RCW,
podiatric medicine

31 and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW, dentistry under
chapter 18.30

32 RCW, chiropractic under chapter 18.25 RCW, or
psychology under

33 chapter 18.83 RCW;

34 (b) The criteria for removing examiners from the
list of

35 approved examiners, including but not limited to the
department

36 determining after reasonable investigation that the
provider:

p. 5 HB
1457

_1 (i) Committed professional or other misconduct,
including a

_2 violation of RCW 51.48.280, or demonstrated
incompetency in

_3 connection with providing medical examinations under
this title;

_4 (ii) Exceeded the limits of his or her
professional competence

_5 in conducting medical examinations or made materially
false

_6 statements regarding his or her qualifications in his
or her

_7 application as an examiner;

_8 (iii) Failed to transmit copies of medical
reports, or failed

_9 to submit full and truthful medical reports of his or
her

10 findings, as required by this title;

11 (iv) Knowingly made a false statement or
representation as to a

12 material fact in any medical report made under this
title or in

13 testifying or otherwise providing information for the
purposes of

14 this title; or

15 (v) Refused to appear before, testify, submit to
deposition, or

16 answer a material question of the department, or
board of

17 industrial insurance appeals, or produce a material
document

18 concerning his or her provision of services under
this title;

19 (((b))) (c) The criteria for
conducting the examinations,

20 including guidelines for the appropriate treatment of
injured

21 workers during the examination; and

22 (((c))) (d) The content of examination
reports, including a

23 requirement that examination reports contain a signed
statement

24 certifying that the report is a full and truthful
representation

25 of the examiner's professional opinion with respect
to the injured

26 worker's condition.

27 (2) Within the appropriate scope of practice,
chiropractors

28 licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW may conduct special
medical

29 examinations to determine permanent disabilities under
RCW

30 51.32.055 in consultation with physicians
licensed under chapter

31 18.57 or 18.71 RCW. The depart­ment, in its discretion,
may request

32 that a special medical examination be conducted by a
single

33 chiroprac­tor if the department determines that the sole
issues

34 involved in the examination are within the scope of
practice under

35 chapter 18.25 RCW. However, nothing in this section
authorizes the

36 use as evidence before the board of a chiropractor's
determination

37 of the extent of a worker's permanent disability if the

38 determination is not requested by the department.

HB 1457 p. 6

_1 (3) The department must examine the credentials
of providers

_2 conducting medical examinations ordered under this
title and must

_3 monitor the quality and objectivity of the
examinations and

_4 examination reports obtained by the department and
self-insured

_5 employers. The department's rules must ensure that
examinations

_6 ordered under this title are performed only by
qualified providers

_7 meeting department standards.

_8 (4) The department shall investigate the
amount of examination

_9 fees received by persons conducting ((special))
medical

10 examinations ((to determine permanent disabili­ties))
ordered under

11 this title, including total compensation received
for examina­tions

12 of department and self-insured claimants, and establish

13 compensation guidelines and compensation reporting
criteria.

14 (((4))) (5) The department shall
investigate the level of

15 compliance of self-insurers with the require­ment of
full reporting

16 of claims information to the department, particularly
with respect

17 to medical examinations, and develop effective
enforcement

18 proce­dures or recommendations for legislation if
needed.

19 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW 51.32.112 is
recodified as a new

20 section in chapter 51.36 RCW.

21 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. RCW
51.32.114 (Medical examination‑-

22 Department to monitor quality and objectivity) and 1988
c 114 s 3

23 are each repealed.

24 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act applies to
all medical

25 examinations ordered under Title 51 RCW on or after the
effective

26 date of this act.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 7 HB
1457