BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW 36.70B.070
and 1995 c 347 s 408 are each amended to

_6 read as follows:

_7 (1) Within twenty-eight days after receiving a project
permit

_8 application, a local government planning pursuant to RCW

_9 36.70A.040 shall mail or provide in person a written
determination

10 to the applicant, stating either:

11 (a) That the application is complete; or

12 (b) That the application is incomplete and listing
in detail

13 exactly what information is necessary to make
the application

14 complete.

15 To the extent known by the local government, the local

16 government shall identify and inform the applicant of
other

17 agencies of local, state, or federal governments that may
have

18 jurisdiction over some aspect of the application.

p. 1 ESHB
1458

_1 (2) A project permit application is complete for
purposes of

_2 this section when it meets the procedural submission
requirements

_3 ((of)) identified in the local ((government))
government's

_4 development regulations required by RCW 36.70B.080
and is

_5 sufficient for continued processing even though
additional

_6 information may be required or project modifications may
be

_7 undertaken subsequently. The determination of
completeness shall

_8 not preclude the local government from requesting
additional

_9 information or studies either at the time of the notice
of

10 completeness or subsequently if new information is
required or

11 substantial changes in the proposed action occur.

12 (3) The determination of completeness may include the
following

13 as optional information:

14 (a) A preliminary determination of those development

15 regulations that will be used for project mitigation;

16 (b) A preliminary determination of consistency, as
provided

17 under RCW 36.70B.040; or

18 (c) Other information the local government chooses
to include.

19 (4)(a) An application shall be deemed complete under
this

20 section if the local government does not provide a
written

21 determination to the applicant that the application is
incomplete

22 as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

23 (b) Within fourteen days after an applicant has
submitted to a

24 local government additional information identified by
the local

25 government as being necessary for a complete
application, the

26 local government shall notify the applicant whether the

27 application is complete or list in detail exactly
what additional

28 information is necessary.

29 Sec. 2. RCW 36.70B.080
and 1995 c 347 s 410 are each amended to

30 read as follows:

31 (1) Development regulations adopted pursuant to
RCW 36.70A.040

32 shall establish time periods for local government actions
on

33 specific project permit applications, with deadlines for
issuing

34 final decisions on specific project permit applications,
and

35 provide timely and predictable procedures to determine
whether a

36 completed project permit application meets the requirements
of

37 those development regulations.

ESHB 1458 p. 2

_1 ((Such)) (2) The development
regulations identified in

_2 subsection (1) of this section shall specify the
contents of a

_3 completed project permit application necessary for the
application

_4 of such time periods and procedures. The contents of
a completed

_5 project permit application may include, but are not
limited to,

_6 the following:

_7 (a) The legal description or the tax parcel
number assigned

_8 pursuant to RCW 84.40.160 and the street address if
available;

_9 (b) The property owner's name, address, and
telephone number;

10 (c) The business name, address, telephone number
of any

11 contractors, and current state contractor
registration number;

12 (d) The business name, address, and telephone
number of the

13 project permit applicants;

14 (e) Scaled drawings of the site of the proposed
project permit;

15 (f) Scaled and dimensional drawings of existing
and proposed

16 structures on the site of the proposed project
permit;

17 (g) A fully completed environmental checklist,
except for

18 project permit applications that either are exempt
from the state

19 environmental policy act or for which an
environmental checklist

20 under chapter 197-11 WAC is not required; and

21 (h) Any other studies, reports, plans, drawings,
or

22 calculations identified by the local government as
necessary for

23 continued processing of the specific project permit
application.

24 (3) The deadlines for issuing final decisions on
specific

25 project permit applications should not exceed one
hundred twenty

26 days, unless the local government makes written
findings that a

27 specified amount of additional time is needed for
complete

28 processing of specific project permit applications.

29 (4)(a) Counties subject to the requirements of
RCW 36.70A.215

30 and the cities within those counties that have
populations of at

31 least twenty thousand shall identify the types of
project permit

32 applications for which decisions are issued according
to the

33 provisions of this chapter. For each type of project
permit

34 application identified, these counties and cities
shall establish

35 a deadline for issuing a notice of final decision as
required by

36 subsection (1) of this section and minimum
requirements for

37 applications to be deemed complete under RCW
36.70B.070 as

38 required by subsection (2) of this section. Counties
and cities

p. 3 ESHB
1458

_1 subject to the requirements of this subsection also
shall prepare

_2 quarterly performance reports that include, at a
minimum, the

_3 following information for each type of project permit
application:

_4 (i) Total number of complete applications
received during the

_5 quarter;

_6 (ii) Number of complete applications received
during the

_7 quarter for which a notice of final decision was
issued before the

_8 deadline established under subsection (1) of this
section;

_9 (iii) Number of applications received during the
quarter for

10 which a notice of final decision was issued after the
deadline

11 established under subsection (1) of this section;

12 (iv) Number of applications received during the
quarter for

13 which an extension of time was mutually agreed upon
by the

14 applicant and the county or city; and

15 (v) Variance of actual performance, excluding
applications for

16 which mutually agreed time extensions have occurred,
to the

17 deadline established under subsection (1) of this
section during

18 the quarter.

19 (b) On a quarterly basis, counties and cities
subject to the

20 requirements of this subsection shall provide notice
of and access

21 to the quarterly performance reports required by this
subsection

22 through the county's or city's web site. If a county
or city

23 subject to the requirements of this subsection does
not maintain a

24 web site, notice of the report shall be given by
reasonable

25 methods, including but not limited to those methods
specified in

26 RCW 36.70B.110(4).

27 (5) Nothing in this section prohibits a county or
city from

28 extending a deadline for issuing a decision for a
specific project

29 permit application for any reasonable period of time
mutually

30 agreed upon by the applicant and the local
government.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

ESHB 1458 p. 4