BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

The
transportation commission shall report annually to the legislature on the
extent to which ferry tariff revenue pays for ferry operating costs. In
calculating operating costs, the commission shall exclude maintenance costs.

--- END ---