BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) This section is
intended to establish how state and local laws, including statutes, ordinances,
regulations, and rules that impose a tax, fee, charge, surcharge, license,
permit, or other cost, whether public or private, should be interpreted with respect
to:

(a) Property, real or
personal, tangible or intangible;

(b) Income;

(c) Service; or

(d) The ownership,
possession, manufacture, use, sale, purchase, or transfer of property, real or
personal, tangible or intangible, income, or service, including goods or labor.

(2) Property, real or
personal, tangible or intangible, income, or service, or the ownership,
possession, manufacture, use, sale, purchase, or transfer of any property, real
or personal, tangible or intangible, income, or service, including any goods or
labor, located in, derived in, operated in, or occurring in Washington is not
subject to taxation, except where clearly and expressly imposed by law.

(3) The following
principles govern the construction of laws that impose any tax:

(a) Property, real and
personal, tangible and intangible, income, and service, and the ownership,
possession, manufacture, use, sale, purchase, and transfer of property, real
and personal, tangible and intangible, income, and service, including goods and
labor, will not be taxed unless a governmental entity has imposed a tax by
clear and explicit language;

(b) There is no need to
construe a law when the law's language is plain;

(c) Laws imposing the
tax must be strictly construed, though fairly and in keeping with the ordinary
meaning of the language employed;

(d) If there is any
doubt regarding the exact meaning of a law imposing the tax, the law must be
construed in favor of the person who is disputing the tax obligation and
against the governmental entity claiming the person has a tax obligation
because nontaxation is the rule and taxation is the exception;

(e) The burden of
proving that a valid tax obligation exists rests upon the governmental entity
claiming that a tax obligation exists;

(f) If a governmental
entity has imposed the tax, the tax must not be enlarged by construction since
it is reasonable to presume that the governmental entity has stated in express
terms all that it intended to tax; and

(g) A tax must be
limited to the very terms of the law enacted. If not so limited, the tax would
be enlarged beyond what the governmental entity intended to tax.

(4) This section does
not change the burden of showing that any exemption, deduction, or credit
applies.

(5)(a) Upon request,
governmental entities seeking to collect a disputed tax obligation must make
available to the person disputing the tax obligation all records, documents, or
facts necessary for the person to determine the historical background, intent,
construction, interpretation, application, or implementation of the law
imposing the tax.

(b) Failure to fully
cooperate with the person may result in a determination that the property,
income, or service, or the ownership, possession, manufacture, use, sale,
purchase, or transfer is not taxable for the current year.

(6)(a) Upon request,
persons who are disputing a tax obligation must make available at reasonable
times to the governmental entity claiming the tax obligation exists for
inspection, investigation, or examination all property, records, documents, or
facts necessary for the governmental entity to determine the taxable status of
the obligation in dispute.

(b) Failure to fully
cooperate with the governmental entity may result in a determination that the
property, income, or service, or the ownership, possession, manufacture, use,
sale, purchase, or transfer is taxable for the current year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act
constitutes a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

---
END ---