BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.56 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This section
applies to employees of the University of Washington who are enrolled in an
academic program and are in a classification in (a) through (e) of this
subsection on any University of Washington campus, including a branch campus.
A group of all of the employees in each of (a) through (e) of this subsection
constitutes an appropriate bargaining unit:

(a) Predoctoral
instructor;

(b) Predoctoral
lecturer;

(c) Predoctoral
teaching assistant;

(d) Predoctoral
teaching associates I and II; and

(e) Tutors, readers,
and graders in all academic and tutoring centers and all employees enrolled in
an academic program whose duties and responsibilities are substantially
equivalent to these titles.

(2) The exclusive
bargaining representative of the classifications in subsection (1) of this
section covered by this section may engage in collective bargaining with the
University of Washington, however, the scope of bargaining may not include:

(a) Consideration of
the merits, necessity, or organization of any program, activity, or service
established by the University of Washington, including, but not limited to, any
decision to establish, modify, or discontinue any such program, activity, or
service;

(b) The amount of any
student fees, including tuition, although the waiver and remission of such fees
may be the subject of bargaining;

(c) Admission
requirements for students, conditions for the award of certificates and degrees
to students, class size, academic criteria for selection of teaching
assistants, initial appointment, the academic calendar, and the content,
conduct, and supervision of courses, curricula, grading requirements, and
research programs;

(d) The ability of the
University of Washington to terminate the employment of any individual in a classification
included under this section based on the university's determination that the
employee has not met academic requirements.

(3) This section shall
not be construed to restrict, limit, or prohibit the full exercise of the
functions of the faculty in any shared governance mechanisms or practices,
including the faculty senate, faculty councils, and faculty codes of the
University of Washington and the divisions of the university. This section
recognizes the historic role the graduate and professional student senate and
the associated students of the University of Washington have played in the life
of the university. This section shall not be construed to restrict, limit, or
prohibit the full exercise of the functions of the graduate and professional
student senate and associated students of the University of Washington, or its
successor, in subject matter outside the scope of representation as defined in
this section. It is a violation of this section to engage in discussions with
any entity other than the exclusive representative for those employees covered
by this section on matters within the scope of representation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---