BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to strengthen the link between postsecondary education and K-12 education by
creating the Washington promise scholarship program for academically successful
high school graduates from low and middle-income families. The legislature
finds that, increasingly, an individual's economic viability is contingent on
postsecondary educational opportunities, yet the state's full financial
obligation is eliminated after the twelfth grade. Students who work hard in
kindergarten through twelfth grade and successfully complete high school with
high academic marks may not have the financial ability to attend college
because they cannot obtain financial aid or the financial aid is insufficient.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The higher education
coordinating board shall design the Washington promise scholarship program
based on the following parameters:

(1) Scholarships shall
be awarded to students graduating from public and approved private high schools
under chapter 28A.195 RCW and students participating in home-based instruction
as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW who meet both an academic and a financial
eligibility criteria.

(a) Academic
eligibility criteria shall be defined as follows:

(i) Students graduating
from public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW must be
in the top fifteen percent of their graduating class, as identified by each
respective high school at the completion of the first term of the student's
senior year; or

(ii) Students
graduating from public high schools, approved private high schools under chapter
28A.195 RCW, and students participating in home-based instruction as provided
in chapter 28A.200 RCW must equal or exceed a cumulative scholastic aptitude
test score of twelve hundred on their first attempt.

(b) To meet the
financial eligibility criteria, a student's family income shall not exceed one
hundred thirty-five percent of the state median family income adjusted for
family size, as determined by the higher education coordinating board for each
graduating class. Students not meeting the eligibility requirements for the
first year of scholarship benefits may reapply for the second year of benefits,
but must still meet the income standard set by the board for the student's
graduating class.

(2) Promise
scholarships are not intended to supplant any grant, scholarship, or tax
program related to postsecondary education. If the board finds that promise
scholarships supplant or reduce any grant, scholarship, or tax program for
categories of students, then the board shall adjust the financial eligibility
criteria or the amount of scholarship to the level necessary to avoid
supplanting.

(3) Within available
funds, each qualifying student shall receive two consecutive annual awards, the
value of each not to exceed the full-time annual resident tuition rates charged
by Washington's community colleges. The higher education coordinating board
shall award scholarships to as many students as possible from among those
qualifying under this section.

(4) By October 15th of
each year, the board shall determine the award amount of the scholarships,
after taking into consideration the availability of funds.

(5) The scholarships
may only be used for undergraduate coursework at accredited institutions of
higher education in the state of Washington.

(6) The scholarships
may be used for college-related expenses, including but not limited to,
tuition, room and board, books, and materials.

(7) The scholarships
may not be awarded to any student who is pursuing a degree in theology.

(8) The higher
education coordinating board may establish satisfactory progress standards for
the continued receipt of the promise scholarship.

(9) The higher
education coordinating board shall establish the time frame within which the
student must use the scholarship.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The higher education
coordinating board, with the assistance of the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, shall implement and administer the Washington promise
scholarship program described in section 2 of this act as follows:

(1) The first
scholarships shall be awarded to eligible students enrolling in postsecondary
education in the 2001-02 academic year.

(2) The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide information to the higher
education coordinating board that is necessary for implementation of the
program. The higher education coordinating board and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall jointly establish a timeline and
procedures necessary for accurate and timely data reporting.

(a) For students
meeting the academic eligibility criteria as provided in section 2(1)(a) of
this act, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide
the higher education coordinating board with student names, addresses, birth
dates, and unique numeric identifiers.

(b) Public and approved
private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW shall provide requested
information necessary for implementation of the program to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction within the established timeline.

(c) All student data is
confidential and may be used solely for the purposes of providing scholarships
to eligible students.

(3) The higher
education coordinating board may adopt rules to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The Washington promise
scholarship program shall not be funded at the expense of the state need grant
program as defined in RCW 28B.10.800 through 28B.10.824. In administering the
state need grant and promise scholarship programs, the higher education
coordinating board shall first ensure that eligibility for state need grant
recipients is at least sixty-five percent of state median family income.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. This chapter shall not be
construed to change current state requirements for students who received home‑based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) The Washington
promise scholarship account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
The account shall be a nontreasury account retaining its interest earnings in
accordance with RCW 43.79A.040.

(2) The higher
education coordinating board shall deposit in the account all money received
for the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds
appropriated by the legislature for the Washington promise scholarship program,
private contributions to the program, and refunds of Washington promise
scholarships.

(3) Expenditures from
the account shall be used for scholarships to eligible students.

(4) With the exception
of the operating costs associated with the management of the account by the
treasurer's office as authorized in chapter 43.79A RCW, the account shall be
credited with all investment income earned by the account.

(5) Disbursements from
the account are exempt from appropriations and the allotment provisions of
chapter 43.88 RCW.

(6) Disbursements from
the account shall be made only on the authorization of the higher education coordinating
board.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2000
c 79 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the
treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state
treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same
extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2) All income received
from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set aside in an account
in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment
income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on
behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected
state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial
institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the
state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the investment income
account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The Washington
promise scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian
scholarship endowment fund, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve
account, the Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair
fund, the game farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund,
the juvenile accountability incentive account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility
((grant)) account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, and the children's trust fund. However, the earnings to be
distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's
service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the advanced environmental
mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account,
the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account,
and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---