BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79.01.132 and 1999 c
51 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

When any timber, fallen
timber, stone, gravel, or other valuable material on state lands is sold
separate from the land, it may be sold as a lump sum sale or as a scale sale.
Lump sum sales under five thousand dollars appraised value shall be paid for in
cash. The initial deposits required in RCW 79.01.204, not to exceed
twenty-five percent of the actual or projected purchase price, but in the case
of lump sum sales over five thousand dollars not less than five thousand
dollars, shall be made on the day of the sale, and in the case of those sales
appraised below the amount specified in RCW 79.01.200, the department of
natural resources may require full cash payment on the day of sale. The
purchaser shall notify the department of natural resources before any timber is
cut and before removal or processing of any valuable materials on the sale
area, at which time the department of natural resources may require, in the
amount determined by the department, advance payment for the removal,
processing, and/or cutting of timber or other valuable materials, or bank
letters of credit, payment bonds, or assignments of savings accounts acceptable
to the department as adequate security. The amount of such advance payments
and/or security shall at all times equal or exceed the value of timber cut and
other valuable materials processed or removed until paid for. The initial
deposit shall be maintained until all contract obligations of the purchaser are
satisfied: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That all or a portion of said initial deposit may
be applied as the final payment for said materials in the event the department
of natural resources determines that adequate security exists for the
performance or fulfillment of any remaining obligations of the purchaser under
the sale contract.

In all cases where
timber, fallen timber, stone, gravel, or other valuable material is sold
separate from the land, the same shall revert to the state if not removed from
the land within the period specified in the sale contract. Said specified
period shall not exceed five years from the date of the purchase thereof:
PROVIDED, That the specified periods in the sale contract for stone, sand, fill
material, or building stone shall not exceed twenty years: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That in all cases where, in the judgment of the department of natural
resources, the purchaser is acting in good faith and endeavoring to remove such
materials, the department of natural resources may extend the time for the
removal thereof for any period not exceeding twenty years from the date of
purchase for the stone, sand, fill material or building stone or for a total of
ten years beyond the normal termination date specified in the original sale
contract for all other material, upon payment to the state of a sum to be fixed
by the department of natural resources, based on the estimated loss of income
per acre to the state resulting from the granting of the extension but in no
event less than fifty dollars per extension, plus interest on the unpaid
portion of the contract. The interest rate shall be fixed, from time to time,
by rule adopted by the board of natural resources and shall not be less than
six percent per annum. The applicable rate of interest as fixed at the date of
sale and the maximum extension payment shall be set forth in the contract. The
method for calculating the unpaid portion of the contract upon which such interest
shall be paid by the purchaser shall be set forth in the contract. The
department of natural resources shall pay into the state treasury all sums
received for such extension and the same shall be credited to the fund to which
was credited the original purchase price of the material so sold. However, a
direct sale of valuable materials may be sold to the applicant for cash at full
appraised value without notice or advertising. The board of natural resources
shall, by resolution, establish the value amount of a direct sale not to exceed
twenty thousand dollars in appraised sale value, and establish procedures to
assure that competitive market prices and accountability will be guaranteed.

Any time that the
department of natural resources sells timber by contract that includes a
performance bond, the department shall require the purchaser to present proof
of any and all property taxes paid prior to the release of the
performance bond. Within thirty days of payment of taxes due by the timber
purchaser, the county treasurer shall provide certified evidence of property
taxes paid, clearly disclosing the sale contract number.

The provisions of this
section apply unless otherwise provided by statute.

The board of natural
resources shall establish procedures to protect against cedar theft and to
ensure adequate notice is given for persons interested in purchasing cedar.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.04.030 and 1997 c
3 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

"Assessed value of
property" shall be held and construed to mean the aggregate valuation of
the property subject to taxation by any taxing district as ((determined
under RCW 84.40.0305, reduced by the value of any applicable exemptions under
RCW 84.36.381 or other law, and)) placed on the last completed and balanced
tax rolls of the county preceding the date of any tax levy.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.12.270 and 1997 c
3 s 113 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
revenue shall annually make an assessment of the operating property of all
companies; and between the fifteenth day of March and the first day of July of
each ((of said)) year((s)) shall prepare an assessment roll upon
which it shall enter ((the assessed)) and assess the true and fair
value of all the operating property of each of such companies as of the first
day of January of the year in which the assessment is made. For the purpose of
determining the ((assessed)) true and fair value of such property
the department of revenue may inspect the property belonging to said companies
and may take into consideration any information or knowledge obtained by it
from such examination and inspection of such property, or of the books, records,
and accounts of such companies, the statements filed as required by this
chapter, the reports, statements, or returns of such companies filed in
the office of any board, office, or commission of this state or any
county thereof, the earnings and earning power of such companies, the franchises
owned or used by such companies, the ((assessed)) true and fair
valuation of any and all property of such companies, whether operating or
nonoperating property, and whether situated within or outside the state, and
any other facts, evidence, or information that may be obtainable bearing
upon the value of the operating property: PROVIDED, That in no event shall any
statement or report required from any company by this chapter be conclusive
upon the department of revenue in determining the amount, character, and
((assessed)) true and fair value of the operating property of
such company.

Sec. 4. RCW 84.12.280 and 1998 c
335 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) In
making the assessment of the operating property of any railroad or logging
railroad company and in the apportionment of the values and the taxation
thereof, all land occupied and claimed exclusively as the right-of-way for
railroads, with all the tracks and substructures and superstructures which
support the same, together with all side tracks, second tracks, turn-outs,
station houses, depots, round houses, machine shops, or other buildings
belonging to the company, used in the operation thereof, without separating the
same into land and improvements, shall be assessed as real property. And the
rolling stock and other movable property belonging to any railroad or logging
railroad company shall be considered as personal property and taxed as such:
PROVIDED, That all of the operating property of street railway companies shall
be assessed and taxed as personal property.

(((2))) All of
the operating property of airplane companies, telegraph companies, pipe line
companies, and all of the operating property other than lands and buildings of
electric light and power companies, telephone companies, and gas companies
shall be assessed and taxed as personal property.

(((3)
Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the limit provided
under RCW 84.40.0305 shall be applied in the assessment of property under this
section to the same extent as that limit is generally applied to property not
assessed under this chapter.))

Sec. 5. RCW 84.12.310 and 1997 c
3 s 115 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of
determining the system value of the operating property of any such company, the
department of revenue shall deduct from the ((assessed)) true and
fair value of the total assets of such company, the ((assessed)) actual
cash value of all nonoperating property owned by such company. For such
purpose the department of revenue may require of the assessors of the various
counties within this state a detailed list of such company's properties
assessed by them, together with the assessable or assessed value thereof:
PROVIDED, That such assessed or assessable value shall be advisory only and not
conclusive on the department of revenue as to the value thereof.

Sec. 6. RCW 84.12.330 and 1998 c
335 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the assessment
roll shall be placed after the name of each company a general description of
the operating property of the company, which shall be considered sufficient if
described in the language of RCW 84.12.200(12), as applied to the company, following
which shall be entered the ((assessed)) true and fair value of
the operating property as determined by the department of revenue. No
assessment shall be invalidated by reason of a mistake in the name of the
company assessed, or the omission of the name of the owner or by the entry as
owner of a name other than that of the true owner. When the department of
revenue shall have prepared the assessment roll and entered thereon the ((assessed))
true and fair value of the operating property of the company, as herein
required, it shall notify the company by mail of the valuation determined by it
and entered upon the roll.

Sec. 7. RCW 84.12.350 and 1997 c
3 s 117 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon determination by
the department of revenue of the ((assessed)) true and fair value
of the property appearing on such rolls it shall apportion such value to the
respective counties entitled thereto, as hereinafter provided, and shall
determine the equalized assessed valuation of such property in each such county
and in the several taxing districts therein, by applying to such actual
apportioned value the same ratio as the ratio of assessed to ((the correct
assessed)) actual value of the general property in such county:
PROVIDED, That, whenever the amount of the true and ((correct assessed))
fair value of the operating property of any company otherwise
apportionable to any county or other taxing district shall be less than two
hundred fifty dollars, such amount need not be apportioned to such county or
taxing district but may be added to the amount apportioned to an adjacent
county or taxing district.

Sec. 8. RCW 84.12.360 and 1998 c
335 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The true and fair
value of the operating property assessed to a company, as fixed and determined
by the department of revenue, shall be apportioned by the department of revenue
to the respective counties and to the taxing districts thereof wherein such
property is located in the following manner:

(1) Property of all
railroad companies other than street railroad companies, telegraph companies
and pipe line companies‑-upon the basis of that proportion of the value
of the total operating property within the state which the mileage of track, as
classified by the department of revenue (in case of railroads), mileage of wire
(in the case of telegraph companies), and mileage of pipe line (in the case of
pipe line companies) within each county or taxing district bears to the total
mileage thereof within the state, at the end of the calendar year last past.
For the purpose of such apportionment the department may classify railroad
track.

(2) Property of street
railroad companies, telephone companies, electric light and power companies,
and gas companies‑-upon the basis of relative value of the operating
property within each county and taxing district to the value of the total
operating property within the state to be determined by such factors as the
department of revenue shall deem proper.

(3) Planes or other
aircraft of airplane companies‑-upon the basis of such factor or factors
of allocation, to be determined by the department of revenue, as will secure a
substantially fair and equitable division between counties and other taxing districts.

All other property of
airplane companies‑-upon the basis set forth in subsection (2) of this
section.

The basis of
apportionment with reference to all public utility companies above prescribed
shall not be deemed exclusive and the department of revenue in apportioning
values of such companies may also take into consideration such other
information, facts, circumstances, or allocation factors as will enable it to
make a substantially just and correct valuation of the operating property of
such companies within the state and within each county thereof.

Sec. 9. RCW 84.16.040 and 1997 c
3 s 119 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
revenue shall annually make an assessment of the operating property of each
private car company; and between the first day of May and the first day of July
of each ((of said)) year((s)) shall prepare an assessment roll
upon which it shall enter and assess the ((assessed)) true and
fair value of all the operating property of each of such companies as of
the first day of January of the year in which the assessment is made. For the
purpose of determining the ((assessed)) true and fair value of
such property the department of revenue may take into consideration any
information or knowledge obtained by it from an examination and inspection of
such property, or of the books, records, and accounts of such companies,
the statements filed as required by this chapter, the reports, statements,
or returns of such companies filed in the office of any board, office,
or commission of this state or any county thereof, the earnings and earning
power of such companies, the franchises owned or used by such companies, the ((assessed))
true and fair valuation of any and all property of such companies,
whether operating property or nonoperating property, and whether situated
within or without the state, and any other facts, evidences, or
information that may be obtainable bearing upon the value of the operating
property: PROVIDED, That in no event shall any statement or report required
from any company by this chapter be conclusive upon the department of revenue
in determining the amount, character, and ((assessed)) true
and fair value of the operating property of such company.

Sec. 10. RCW 84.16.050 and 1997 c
3 s 120 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
revenue may, in determining the ((assessed)) true and fair value
of the operating property to be placed on the assessment roll value the entire
property as a unit. If the company owns, leases, operates or uses property
partly within and partly without the state, the department of revenue may
determine the value of the operating property within this state by the
proportion that the value of such property bears to the value of the entire
operating property of the company, both within and without this state. In determining
the operating property which is located within this state the department of
revenue may consider and base such determination on the proportion which the
number of car miles of the various classes of cars made in this state bears to
the total number of car miles made by the same cars within and without this
state, or to the total number of car miles made by all cars of the various
classes within and without this state. If the value of the operating property
of the company cannot be fairly determined in such manner the department of
revenue may use any other reasonable and fair method to determine the value of
the operating property of the company within this state.

Sec. 11. RCW 84.16.090 and 1997 c
3 s 121 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the assessment
roll shall be placed after the name of each company a general description of
the operating property of the company, which shall be considered sufficient if
described in the language of RCW 84.16.010(3) or otherwise, following which
shall be entered the ((assessed)) true and fair value of the
operating property as determined by the department of revenue. No assessment
shall be invalid by a mistake in the name of the company assessed, by omission
of the name of the owner or by the entry of a name other than that of the true
owner. When the department of revenue shall have prepared the assessment roll
and entered thereon the ((assessed)) true and fair value of the
operating property of the company, as required, it shall notify the company by
mail of the valuation determined by it and entered upon the roll; and thereupon
such ((assessed)) valuation shall become the ((assessed)) true
and fair value of the operating property of the company, subject to
revision or correction by the department of revenue as hereinafter provided;
and shall be the valuation upon which, after equalization by the department of
revenue as hereinafter provided, the taxes of such company shall be based and
computed.

Sec. 12. RCW 84.16.110 and 1997 c
3 s 122 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon determination by
the department of revenue of the true and ((correct assessed)) fair
value of the property appearing on such rolls the department shall apportion
such value to the respective counties entitled thereto as hereinafter provided,
and shall determine the equalized or assessed valuation of such property in
such counties by applying to such actual apportioned value the same ratio as
the ratio of assessed to ((the correct assessed)) actual value of
the general property of the respective counties: PROVIDED, That, whenever the
amount of the true and ((correct assessed)) fair value of the
operating property of any company otherwise apportionable to any county shall be
less than two hundred fifty dollars, such amount need not be apportioned to
such county but may be added to the amount apportioned to an adjacent county.

Sec. 13. RCW 84.16.120 and 1997 c
3 s 123 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((assessed))
true and fair value of the property of each company as fixed and
determined by the department of revenue as herein provided shall be apportioned
to the respective counties in the following manner:

(1) If all the
operating property of the company is situated entirely within a county and none
of such property is located within, extends into, or through or is operated
into or through any other county, the entire value thereof shall be apportioned
to the county within which such property is situated, located, and operated.

(2) If the operating
property of any company is situated or located within, extends into or is
operated into or through more than one county, the value thereof shall be
apportioned to the respective counties into or through which its cars are
operated in the proportion that the length of main line track of the respective
railroads moving such cars in such counties bears to the total length of main
line track of such respective railroads in this state.

(3) If the property of
any company is of such character that it will not be reasonable, feasible or
fair to apportion the value as hereinabove provided, the value thereof shall be
apportioned between the respective counties into or through which such property
extends or is operated or in which the same is located in such manner as may be
reasonable, feasible and fair.

Sec. 14. RCW 84.36.041 and 1999 c
358 s 16 and 1999 c 356 s 1 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) All real and
personal property used by a nonprofit home for the aging that is reasonably
necessary for the purposes of the home is exempt from taxation if the benefit
of the exemption inures to the home and:

(a) At least fifty
percent of the occupied dwelling units in the home are occupied by eligible
residents; or

(b) The home is
subsidized under a federal department of housing and urban development
program. The department of revenue shall provide by rule a definition of homes
eligible for exemption under this subsection (1)(b), consistent with the
purposes of this section.

(2) All real and
personal property used by a nonprofit home for the aging that is reasonably
necessary for the purposes of the home is exempt from taxation if the benefit
of the exemption inures to the home and the construction, rehabilitation,
acquisition, or refinancing of the home is financed under a program using bonds
exempt from federal income tax if at least seventy-five percent of the total
amount financed uses the tax exempt bonds and the financing program requires
the home to reserve a percentage of all dwelling units so financed for
low-income residents. The initial term of the exemption under this subsection
shall equal the term of the tax exempt bond used in connection with the
financing program, or the term of the requirement to reserve dwelling units for
low-income residents, whichever is shorter. If the financing program involves
less than the entire home, only those dwelling units included in the financing
program are eligible for total exemption. The department of revenue shall
provide by rule the requirements for monitoring compliance with the provisions
of this subsection and the requirements for exemption including:

(a) The number or
percentage of dwelling units required to be occupied by low-income residents,
and a definition of low income;

(b) The type and
character of the dwelling units, whether independent units or otherwise; and

(c) Any particular
requirements for continuing care retirement communities.

(3) A home for the
aging is eligible for a partial exemption on the real property and a total
exemption for the home's personal property if the home does not meet the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section because fewer than fifty percent
of the occupied dwelling units are occupied by eligible residents, as follows:

(a) A partial exemption
shall be allowed for each dwelling unit in a home occupied by a resident
requiring assistance with activities of daily living.

(b) A partial exemption
shall be allowed for each dwelling unit in a home occupied by an eligible
resident.

(c) A partial exemption
shall be allowed for an area jointly used by a home for the aging and by a
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation currently exempt from
property taxation under one of the other provisions of this chapter. The
shared area must be reasonably necessary for the purposes of the nonprofit
organization, association, or corporation exempt from property taxation under
one of the other provisions of this chapter, such as kitchen, dining, and
laundry areas.

(d) The amount of
exemption shall be calculated by multiplying the assessed value of the property
reasonably necessary for the purposes of the home, less the assessed value of
any area exempt under (c) of this subsection, by a fraction. The numerator of
the fraction is the number of dwelling units occupied by eligible residents and
by residents requiring assistance with activities of daily living. The denominator
of the fraction is the total number of occupied dwelling units as of December
31st of the first assessment year the home becomes operational for which
exemption is claimed and January 1st of each subsequent assessment year for
which exemption is claimed.

(4) To be exempt under
this section, the property must be used exclusively for the purposes for which
the exemption is granted, except as provided in RCW 84.36.805.

(5) A home for the
aging is exempt from taxation only if the organization operating the home is
exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue
code as existing on January 1, 1989, or such subsequent date as the director
may provide by rule consistent with the purposes of this section.

(6) In order for the
home to be eligible for exemption under subsections (1)(a) and (3)(b) of this
section, each eligible resident of a home for the aging shall submit an income
verification form to the county assessor by July 1st of the assessment year for
which exemption is claimed. However, during the first year a home becomes
operational, the county assessor shall accept income verification forms from
eligible residents up to December 31st of the assessment year. The income
verification form shall be prescribed and furnished by the department of
revenue. An eligible resident who has filed a form for a previous year need
not file a new form until there is a change in status affecting the person's
eligibility.

(7) In determining the
true and fair value of a home for the aging for purposes of the partial
exemption provided by subsection (3) of this section, the assessor shall apply
the computation method provided by RCW 84.34.060 and shall consider only the
use to which such property is applied during the years for which such partial
exemptions are available and shall not consider potential uses of such
property.

(8) As used in this
section:

(a) "Eligible
resident" means a person who:

(i) Occupied the
dwelling unit as a principal place of residence as of December 31st of the first
assessment year the home becomes operational. In each subsequent year, the
eligible resident must occupy the dwelling unit as a principal place of
residence as of January 1st of the assessment year for which the exemption is
claimed. Confinement of the person to a hospital or nursing home does not
disqualify the claim of exemption if the dwelling unit is temporarily
unoccupied or if the dwelling unit is occupied by a spouse, a person
financially dependent on the claimant for support, or both; and

(ii) Is sixty-one years
of age or older on December 31st of the year in which the exemption claim is
filed, or is, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by
reason of physical disability. Any surviving spouse of a person who was receiving
an exemption at the time of the person's death shall qualify if the surviving
spouse is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the
requirements of this subsection; and

(iii) Has a combined
disposable income of no more than the greater of twenty-two thousand dollars or
eighty percent of the median income adjusted for family size as most recently
determined by the federal department of housing and urban development for the
county in which the person resides. For the purposes of determining
eligibility under this section, a "cotenant" means a person who
resides with an eligible resident and who shares personal financial resources
with the eligible resident.

(b) "Combined
disposable income" means the disposable income of the person submitting
the income verification form, plus the disposable income of his or her spouse,
and the disposable income of each cotenant occupying the dwelling unit for the
preceding calendar year, less amounts paid by the person submitting the income
verification form or his or her spouse or cotenant during the previous year for
the treatment or care of either person received in the dwelling unit or in a
nursing home. If the person submitting the income verification form was
retired for two months or more of the preceding year, the combined disposable
income of such person shall be calculated by multiplying the average monthly
combined disposable income of such person during the months such person was
retired by twelve. If the income of the person submitting the income
verification form is reduced for two or more months of the preceding year by
reason of the death of the person's spouse, the combined disposable income of
such person shall be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined
disposable income of such person after the death of the spouse by twelve.

(c) "Disposable
income" means adjusted gross income as defined in the federal internal
revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989, or such subsequent date as
the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose of this section,
plus all of the following items to the extent they are not included in or have
been deducted from adjusted gross income:

(i) Capital gains,
other than gain excluded from income under section 121 of the federal internal
revenue code to the extent it is reinvested in a new principal residence;

(ii) Amounts deducted
for loss;

(iii) Amounts deducted
for depreciation;

(iv) Pension and
annuity receipts;

(v) Military pay and
benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(vi) Veterans benefits
other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(vii) Federal social
security act and railroad retirement benefits;

(viii) Dividend
receipts; and

(ix) Interest received
on state and municipal bonds.

(d) "Resident
requiring assistance with activities of daily living" means a person who
requires significant assistance with the activities of daily living and who
would be at risk of nursing home placement without this assistance.

(e) "Home for the
aging" means a residential housing facility that (i) provides a housing
arrangement chosen voluntarily by the resident, the resident's guardian or
conservator, or another responsible person; (ii) has only residents who are at
least sixty-one years of age or who have needs for care generally compatible
with persons who are at least sixty-one years of age; and (iii) provides
varying levels of care and supervision, as agreed to at the time of admission
or as determined necessary at subsequent times of reappraisal.

(9) A for-profit home
for the aging that converts to nonprofit status after June 11, 1992, and would
otherwise be eligible for tax exemption under this section may not receive the
tax exemption until five years have elapsed since the conversion. The exemption
shall then be ratably granted over the next five years.

Sec. 15. RCW 84.36.477 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 62 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Business
inventories ((as defined in RCW 84.36.473)) are exempt from property
taxation.

(2) As used in this
section:

(a)(i)
"Business inventories" means all livestock, inventories of finished
goods and work in process, and personal property not under lease or rental,
acquired, or produced solely for the purpose of sale or lease or for the
purpose of consuming the property in producing for sale or lease a new article
of tangible personal property of which the property becomes an ingredient or
component.

(ii) "Business
inventories" also includes:

(A) All grains and
flour, fruit and fruit products, unprocessed timber, vegetables and vegetable
products, and fish and fish products, while being transported to or held in
storage in a public or private warehouse or storage area if actually shipped to
points outside the state on or before April 30th of the first year for which
they would otherwise be taxable;

(B) All finished
plywood, hardboard, and particleboard panels shipped from outside this state to
any processing plant within this state, if the panels are moving under a
through freight rate to final destination outside this state and the carrier
grants the shipper the privilege of stopping the shipment in transit for the
purpose of storing, milling, manufacturing, or other processing, while the
panels are in the process of being treated or shaped into flat component parts
to be incorporated into finished products outside this state and for thirty
days after completion of the processing or treatment;

(C) All ore or metal
shipped from outside this state to any smelter or refining works within this
state, while in process of reduction or refinement and for thirty days after
completion of the reduction or refinement; and

(D) All metals
refined by electrolytic process into cathode or bar form while in this form and
held under negotiable warehouse receipt in a public or private warehouse
recognized by an established incorporated commodity exchange and for sale
through the exchange.

(iii) "Business
inventories" does not include personal property acquired or produced for
the purpose of lease or rental if the property was leased or rented at any time
during the calendar year immediately preceding the year of assessment and was
not thereafter remanufactured, nor does it include property held within the
normal course of business for lease or rental for periods of less than thirty
days.

(iv) "Business
inventories" does not include agricultural or horticultural property fully
or partially exempt under RCW 84.36.470.

(v) "Business
inventories" does not include timber that is standing on public land and
that is sold under a contract entered into after August 1, 1982;

(b) "Fish and
fish products" means all fish and fish products suitable and designed for
human consumption, excluding all others;

(c) "Fruit and
fruit products" means all raw edible fruits, berries, and hops and all
processed products of fruits, berries, or hops, suitable and designed for human
consumption, while in the hands of the first processor;

(d)
"Processed" means canning, barreling, bottling, preserving, refining,
freezing, packing, milling, or any other method employed to keep any grain,
fruit, vegetable, or fish in an edible condition or to put it into more
suitable or convenient form for consuming, storing, shipping, or marketing;

(e)
"Remanufactured" means the restoration of property to essentially its
original condition, but does not mean normal maintenance or repairs; and

(f) "Vegetables
and vegetable products" means all raw edible vegetables such as peas,
beans, beets, sugar beets, and other vegetables, and all processed products of
vegetables, suitable and designed for human consumption, while in the hands of
the first processor.

Sec. 16. RCW 84.40.020 and 1997 c
239 s 2 and 1997 c 3 s 103 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

All real property in
this state subject to taxation shall be listed and assessed every year, with
reference to its ((appraised and assessed)) value((s)) on the
first day of January of the year in which it is assessed. Such listing and all
supporting documents and records shall be open to public inspection during the
regular office hours of the assessor's office: PROVIDED, That confidential
income data is hereby exempted from public inspection as noted in RCW 42.17.260
and 42.17.310. All personal property in this state subject to taxation shall
be listed and assessed every year, with reference to its value and ownership on
the first day of January of the year in which it is assessed: PROVIDED, That
if the stock of goods, wares, merchandise or material, whether in a raw or
finished state or in process of manufacture, owned or held by any taxpayer on
January 1 of any year does not fairly represent the average stock carried by
such taxpayer, such stock shall be listed and assessed upon the basis of the
monthly average of stock owned or held by such taxpayer during the preceding
calendar year or during such portion thereof as the taxpayer was engaged in business.

Sec. 17. RCW 84.40.030 and 1998 c
320 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

All ((personal))
property shall be valued at one hundred percent of its true and fair value in
money and assessed on the same basis unless specifically provided otherwise by
law.

((All real property
shall be appraised at one hundred percent of its true and fair value in money
and assessed as provided in RCW 84.40.0305 unless specifically provided
otherwise by law.))

Taxable leasehold
estates shall be valued at such price as they would bring at a fair, voluntary
sale for cash without any deductions for any indebtedness owed including
rentals to be paid.

The true and fair value
of real property for taxation purposes (including property upon which there is
a coal or other mine, or stone or other quarry) shall be based upon the
following criteria:

(1) Any sales of the
property being appraised or similar properties with respect to sales made
within the past five years. The appraisal shall be consistent with the
comprehensive land use plan, development regulations under chapter 36.70A RCW,
zoning, and any other governmental policies or practices in effect at the time
of appraisal that affect the use of property, as well as physical and environmental
influences. An assessment may not be determined by a method that assumes a
land usage not permitted, for that property being appraised, under existing
zoning or land use planning ordinances or statutes. The appraisal shall also
take into account: (a) In the use of sales by real estate contract as similar
sales, the extent, if any, to which the stated selling price has been increased
by reason of the down payment, interest rate, or other financing terms; and (b)
the extent to which the sale of a similar property actually represents the
general effective market demand for property of such type, in the geographical
area in which such property is located. Sales involving deed releases or
similar seller-developer financing arrangements shall not be used as sales of
similar property.

(2) In addition to
sales as defined in subsection (1) of this section, consideration may be given
to cost, cost less depreciation, reconstruction cost less depreciation, or
capitalization of income that would be derived from prudent use of the
property. In the case of property of a complex nature, or being used under
terms of a franchise from a public agency, or operating as a public utility, or
property not having a record of sale within five years and not having a
significant number of sales of similar property in the general area, the
provisions of this subsection shall be the dominant factors in valuation. When
provisions of this subsection are relied upon for establishing values the
property owner shall be advised upon request of the factors used in arriving at
such value.

(3) In valuing any
tract or parcel of real property, the true and fair value of the land,
exclusive of structures thereon shall be determined; also the true and fair
value of structures thereon, but the ((appraised)) valuation shall not
exceed the true and fair value of the total property as it exists. In valuing
agricultural land, growing crops shall be excluded.

Sec. 18. RCW 84.40.040 and 1997 c
3 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

The assessor shall
begin the preliminary work for each assessment not later than the first day of
December of each year in all counties in the state. The assessor shall also
complete the duties of listing and placing valuations on all property by May
31st of each year, except that the listing and valuation of construction and
mobile homes under RCW 36.21.080 and 36.21.090 shall be completed by August
31st of each year, and in the following manner, to wit:

The assessor shall
actually determine as nearly as practicable the true and fair value of each
tract or lot of land listed for taxation and of each improvement located
thereon and shall enter ((as the appraised value)) one hundred percent
of the true and fair value of such land and ((of the total true and fair))
value of such improvements, together with the total of such one hundred percent
valuations, opposite each description of property on the assessment list and
tax roll.

((The assessor shall
determine the assessed value, under RCW 84.40.0305, for each tract or lot of
land listed for taxation, including improvements located thereon, and shall
also enter this value opposite each description of property on the assessment
list and tax roll.))

The assessor shall make
an alphabetical list of the names of all persons in the county liable to
assessment of personal property, and require each person to make a correct list
and statement of such property according to the standard form prescribed by the
department of revenue, which statement and list shall include, if required by
the form, the year of acquisition and total original cost of personal property
in each category of the prescribed form, and shall be signed and verified under
penalty of perjury by the person listing the property: PROVIDED, That the
assessor may list and value improvements on publicly owned land in the same
manner as real property is listed and valued, including conformance with the
revaluation program required under chapter 84.41 RCW. Such list and statement
shall be filed on or before the last day of April. The assessor shall on or
before the 1st day of January of each year mail a notice to all such persons at
their last known address that such statement and list is required, such notice
to be accompanied by the form on which the statement or list is to be made:
PROVIDED, That the notice mailed by the assessor to each taxpayer each year
shall, if practicable, include the statement and list of personal property of
the taxpayer for the preceding year. Upon receipt of such statement and list
the assessor shall thereupon determine the true and fair value of the property
included in such statement and enter one hundred percent of the same on the
assessment roll opposite the name of the party assessed; and in making such entry
in the assessment list, the assessor shall give the name and post office
address of the party listing the property, and if the party resides in a city
the assessor shall give the street and number or other brief description of the
party's residence or place of business. The assessor may, after giving written
notice of the action to the person to be assessed, add to the assessment list
any taxable property which should be included in such list.

Sec. 19. RCW 84.40.045 and 1997 c
3 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

The assessor shall give
notice of any change in the ((assessed)) true and fair value of
real property for the tract or lot of land and any improvements thereon no
later than thirty days after appraisal: PROVIDED, That no such notice shall be
mailed during the period from January 15 to February 15 of each year: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That no notice need be sent with respect to changes in valuation of
forest land made pursuant to chapter 84.33 RCW.

The notice shall
contain a statement of both the prior and the new ((appraised and assessed
values)) true and fair value, stating separately land and
improvement ((appraised)) values, and a brief statement of the procedure
for appeal to the board of equalization and the time, date, and place of the
meetings of the board.

The notice shall be
mailed by the assessor to the taxpayer.

If any
taxpayer, as shown by the tax rolls, holds solely a security interest in the
real property which is the subject of the notice, pursuant to a mortgage,
contract of sale, or deed of trust, such taxpayer shall, upon written request
of the assessor, supply, within thirty days of receipt of such request, to the
assessor the name and address of the person making payments pursuant to the mortgage,
contract of sale, or deed of trust, and thereafter such person shall also
receive a copy of the notice provided for in this section. Willful failure to
comply with such request within the time limitation provided for herein shall
make such taxpayer subject to a maximum civil penalty of five thousand
dollars. The penalties provided for herein shall be recoverable in an action
by the county prosecutor, and when recovered shall be deposited in the county
current expense fund. The assessor shall make the request provided for by this
section during the month of January.

Sec. 20. RCW 84.40.405 and 2000 c
103 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
revenue shall promulgate such rules and regulations, and prescribe such
procedures as it deems necessary to carry out RCW 84.36.470((, 84.36.473,))
and 84.36.477((, and this section)).

Sec. 21. RCW 84.41.041 and 1997 c
3 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

Each county assessor
shall cause taxable real property to be physically inspected and valued at
least once every six years in accordance with RCW 84.41.030, and in accordance
with a plan filed with and approved by the department of revenue. Such
revaluation plan shall provide that a reasonable portion of all taxable real
property within a county shall be revalued and these newly-determined values
placed on the assessment rolls each year. The department may approve a plan
that provides that all property in the county be revalued every two years. If
the revaluation plan provides for physical inspection at least once each four
years, during the intervals between each physical inspection of real property,
the ((appraised)) valuation of such property may be adjusted to its
current true and fair value, such adjustments to be based upon appropriate
statistical data. If the revaluation plan provides for physical inspection
less frequently than once each four years, during the intervals between each
physical inspection of real property, the ((appraised)) valuation of
such property shall be adjusted to its current true and fair value, such
adjustments to be made once each year and to be based upon appropriate statistical
data. ((If the appraised valuation is changed, the assessed value shall be
recalculated under RCW 84.40.0305.))

The assessor may
require property owners to submit pertinent data respecting taxable property in
their control including data respecting any sale or purchase of said property
within the past five years, the cost and characteristics of any improvement on
the property and other facts necessary for appraisal of the property.

Sec. 22. RCW 84.48.010 and 1997 c
3 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

Prior to July 15th, the
county legislative authority shall form a board for the equalization of the
assessment of the property of the county. The members of said board shall
receive a per diem amount as set by the county legislative authority for each
day of actual attendance of the meeting of the board of equalization to be paid
out of the current expense fund of the county: PROVIDED, That when the county
legislative authority constitute the board they shall only receive their
compensation as members of the county legislative authority. The board of
equalization shall meet in open session for this purpose annually on the 15th
day of July and, having each taken an oath fairly and impartially to perform
their duties as members of such board, they shall examine and compare the
returns of the assessment of the property of the county and proceed to equalize
the same, so that ((the appraised value of)) each tract or lot of real
property and each article or class of personal property shall be entered on the
assessment list at its true and fair value, according to the measure of value
used by the county assessor in such assessment year, ((and so that the
assessed value of each tract or lot of real property is entered on the
assessment list at its correct amount)) which is presumed to be correct
under RCW 84.40.0301, and subject to the following rules:

First. They shall
raise the ((appraised)) valuation of each tract or lot or item of real
property which is returned below its true and fair value to such price or sum
as to be the true and fair value thereof, ((and raise the assessed valuation
of each tract or lot or item of real property which is returned below its
correct amount to the correct amount)) after at least five days' notice
shall have been given in writing to the owner or agent.

Second. They shall
reduce the ((appraised)) valuation of each tract or lot or item which is
returned above its true and fair value to such price or sum as to be the true
and fair value thereof ((and reduce the assessed valuation of each tract or
lot or item of real property which is returned above its correct amount to the
correct amount)).

Third. They shall
raise the valuation of each class of personal property which is returned below
its true and fair value to such price or sum as to be the true and fair value
thereof, and they shall raise the aggregate value of the personal property of
each individual whenever the aggregate value is less than the true valuation of
the taxable personal property possessed by such individual, to such sum or
amount as to be the true value thereof, after at least five days' notice shall
have been given in writing to the owner or agent thereof.

Fourth. They shall
reduce the valuation of each class of personal property enumerated on the
detail and assessment list of the current year, which is returned above its
true and fair value, to such price or sum as to be the true and fair value
thereof; and they shall reduce the aggregate valuation of the personal property
of such individual who has been assessed at too large a sum to such sum or
amount as was the true and fair value of the personal property.

Fifth. The board may
review all claims for either real or personal property tax exemption as
determined by the county assessor, and shall consider any taxpayer appeals from
the decision of the assessor thereon to determine (1) if the taxpayer is
entitled to an exemption, and (2) if so, the amount thereof.

The clerk of the board
shall keep an accurate journal or record of the proceedings and orders of said
board showing the facts and evidence upon which their action is based, and the
said record shall be published the same as other proceedings of county
legislative authority, and shall make a true record of the changes of the
descriptions and ((appraised)) assessed values ordered by the
county board of equalization. The assessor shall ((recalculate assessed
values and)) correct the real and personal assessment rolls in accordance
with the changes made by the said county board of equalization, and the
assessor shall make duplicate abstracts of such corrected values, one copy of
which shall be retained in the office, and one copy forwarded to the department
of revenue on or before the eighteenth day of August next following the meeting
of the county board of equalization.

The county board of
equalization shall meet on the 15th day of July and may continue in session and
adjourn from time to time during a period not to exceed four weeks, but shall
remain in session not less than three days: PROVIDED, That the county board of
equalization with the approval of the county legislative authority may convene
at any time when petitions filed exceed twenty-five, or ten percent of the
number of appeals filed in the preceding year, whichever is greater.

No taxes, except
special taxes, shall be extended upon the tax rolls until the property
valuations are equalized by the department of revenue for the purpose of
raising the state revenue.

County legislative
authorities as such shall at no time have any authority to change the valuation
of the property of any person or to release or commute in whole or in part the
taxes due on the property of any person.

Sec. 23. RCW 84.48.065 and 1997 c
3 s 110 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county assessor
or treasurer may cancel or correct assessments on the assessment or tax rolls
which are erroneous due to manifest errors in description, double assessments,
clerical errors in extending the rolls, ((clerical errors in calculating the
assessed value under RCW 84.40.0305,)) and such manifest errors in the
listing of the property which do not involve a revaluation of property, except
in the case that a taxpayer produces proof that an authorized land use
authority has made a definitive change in the property's land use designation.
In such a case, correction of the assessment or tax rolls may be made
notwithstanding the fact that the action involves a revaluation of property.
Manifest errors that do not involve a revaluation of property include the
assessment of property exempted by law from taxation or the failure to deduct
the exemption allowed by law to the head of a family. When the county assessor
cancels or corrects an assessment, the assessor shall send a notice to the
taxpayer in accordance with RCW 84.40.045, advising the taxpayer that the
action has been taken and notifying the taxpayer of the right to appeal the
cancellation or correction to the county board of equalization, in accordance
with RCW 84.40.038. When the county assessor or treasurer cancels or corrects
an assessment, a record of such action shall be prepared, setting forth therein
the facts relating to the error. The record shall also set forth by legal description
all property belonging exclusively to the state, any county, or any municipal
corporation whose property is exempt from taxation, upon which there remains,
according to the tax roll, any unpaid taxes. No manifest error cancellation or
correction, including a cancellation or correction made due to a definitive
change of land use designation, shall be made for any period more than three
years preceding the year in which the error is discovered.

(2)(a) In the case of a
definitive change of land use designation, an assessor shall make corrections
that involve a revaluation of property to the assessment roll when:

(i) The assessor and
taxpayer have signed an agreement as to the true and fair value of the
taxpayer's property setting forth in the agreement the valuation information
upon which the agreement is based; and

(ii) The assessment
roll has previously been certified in accordance with RCW 84.40.320.

(b) In all other cases,
an assessor shall make corrections that involve a revaluation of property to
the assessment roll when:

(i) The assessor and
taxpayer have signed an agreement as to the true and fair value of the
taxpayer's property setting forth in the agreement the valuation information
upon which the agreement is based; and

(ii) The following
conditions are met:

(A) The assessment roll
has previously been certified in accordance with RCW 84.40.320;

(B) The taxpayer has
timely filed a petition with the county board of equalization pursuant to RCW
84.40.038 for the current assessment year;

(C) The county board of
equalization has not yet held a hearing on the merits of the taxpayer's
petition.

(3) The assessor shall
issue a supplementary roll or rolls including such cancellations and
corrections, and the assessment and levy shall have the same force and effect
as if made in the first instance, and the county treasurer shall proceed to
collect the taxes due on the rolls as modified.

Sec. 24. RCW 84.48.075 and 1997 c
3 s 111 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
revenue shall annually, prior to the first Monday in September, determine and
submit to each assessor a preliminary indicated ratio for each county:
PROVIDED, That the department shall establish rules and regulations pertinent
to the determination of the indicated ratio, the indicated real property ratio
and the indicated personal property ratio: PROVIDED FURTHER, That these rules
and regulations may provide that data, as is necessary for said determination,
which is available from the county assessor of any county and which has been
audited as to its validity by the department, shall be utilized by the
department in determining the indicated ratio.

(2) To such extent as
is reasonable, the department may define use classes of property for the
purposes of determination of the indicated ratio. Such use classes may be
defined with respect to property use and may include agricultural, open space,
timber and forest lands.

(3) The department
shall review each county's preliminary ratio with the assessor, a landowner, or
an owner of an intercounty public utility or private car company of that
county, if requested by the assessor, a landowner, or an owner of an
intercounty public utility or private car company of that county, respectively,
between the first and third Mondays of September. Prior to equalization of
assessments pursuant to RCW 84.48.080 and after the third Monday of September,
the department shall certify to each county assessor the real and personal
property ratio for that county.

(4) The department of
revenue shall also examine procedures used by the assessor to assess real and
personal property in the county, including calculations, use of prescribed
value schedules, and efforts to locate all taxable property in the county. If
any examination by the department discloses other than market value is being
listed ((as appraised value)) on the county assessment rolls of the
county by the assessor and, after due notification by the department, is not
corrected, the department of revenue shall, in accordance with rules adopted by
the department, adjust the ratio of that type of property, which adjustment
shall be used for determining the county's indicated ratio.

Sec. 25. RCW 84.52.063 and 1997 c
3 s 125 are each amended to read as follows:

A rural library
district may impose a regular property tax levy in an amount equal to that
which would be produced by a levy of fifty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value multiplied by an ((equalized)) assessed valuation equal
to one hundred percent of the true and fair value of the taxable property in
the rural library district, as determined by the department of revenue's
indicated county ratio: PROVIDED, That when any county assessor shall find
that the aggregate rate of levy on any property will exceed the limitation set
forth in RCW 84.52.043 and 84.52.050, as now or hereafter amended, before
recomputing and establishing a consolidated levy in the manner set forth in RCW
84.52.010, the assessor shall first reduce the levy of any rural library
district, by such amount as may be necessary, but the levy of any rural library
district shall not be reduced to less than fifty cents per thousand dollars
against the value of the taxable property, as determined by the county, prior
to any further adjustments pursuant to RCW 84.52.010. For purposes of this
section "regular property tax levy" shall mean a levy subject to the
limitations provided for in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution
and/or by statute.

Sec. 26. RCW 84.70.010 and 1999
sp.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If, on or before
December 31 in any calendar year, any real or personal property placed upon the
assessment roll of that year is destroyed in whole or in part, or is in an area
that has been declared a disaster area by the governor and has been reduced in
value by more than twenty percent as a result of a natural disaster, the ((assessed))
true and fair value of such property shall be reduced for that
assessment year by an amount determined by taking the ((assessed)) true
and fair value of such taxable property before destruction or reduction in
value and deduct therefrom the true and fair value of the remaining property
after destruction or reduction in value.

(2) Taxes levied for
collection in the year in which the ((assessed)) true and fair
value has been reduced under subsection (1) of this section shall be abated in
whole or in part as provided in this subsection. The amount of taxes to be
abated shall be determined by first multiplying the amount deducted from ((assessed))
the true and fair value under subsection (1) of this section by the rate
of levy applicable to the property in the tax year. Then divide the product by
the number of days in the year and multiply the quotient by the number of days
remaining in the calendar year after the date of the destruction or reduction
in value of the property. If taxes abated under this section have been paid,
the amount paid shall be refunded under RCW 84.69.020. For taxes levied for
collection in 1998 and 1999, this subsection (2) applies to property that is
destroyed in whole or in part, or is in an area that has been declared a
disaster area by the governor and has been reduced in value by more than twenty
percent as a result of a natural disaster. For taxes levied for collection in
2000 through 2004, this subsection (2) applies to property that is destroyed in
whole or in part, or is in an area that has been declared a federal disaster
area and has been reduced in value by more than twenty percent as a result of a
natural disaster. This subsection (2) does not apply to taxes levied for
collection in 2005 and thereafter.

(3) No reduction in the
((assessed)) true and fair value or abatements shall be made more
than three years after the date of destruction or reduction in value.

(4) The assessor shall
make such reduction on his or her own motion; however, the taxpayer may make
application for reduction on forms prepared by the department and provided by
the assessor. The assessor shall notify the taxpayer of the amount of
reduction.

(5) If destroyed property
is replaced prior to the valuation dates contained in RCW 36.21.080 and
36.21.090, the total taxable value for that assessment year shall not exceed
the value as of the appropriate valuation date in RCW 36.21.080 or 36.21.090,
whichever is appropriate.

(6) The taxpayer may
appeal the amount of reduction to the county board of equalization ((within
thirty days of notification or July 1st of the year of reduction, whichever is
later)) in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. The
board shall reconvene, if necessary, to hear the appeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
27. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 84.04.018 ("Appraised value of
property") and 1997 c 3 s 101;

(2) RCW 84.36.140 (Exemption of grains,
flour, fruit, vegetables, fish, and unprocessed timber--Limitation--Proof of
shipment) and 1972 ex.s. c 30 s 2 & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.140;

(3) RCW 84.36.150 (Exemption of grains,
flour, fruit, vegetables, fish, and unprocessed timber--Listing and subsequent
cancellation--Proof) and 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 32 & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.150;

(4) RCW 84.36.160 (Exemption of grains,
flour, fruit, vegetables, fish, and unprocessed timber--Definitions) and 1972
ex.s. c 30 s 1, 1971 ex.s. c 137 s 1, & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.160;

(5) RCW 84.36.161 (Exemption of grains,
flour, fruit, vegetables, fish, and unprocessed timber--Construction of RCW
84.36.140, 84.36.150, 84.36.160 and 84.36.162--Effect on other acts) and 1998 c
311 s 21 & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.161;

(6) RCW 84.36.162 (Exemption of grains,
flour, fruit, vegetables, fish, and unprocessed timber--Purpose) and 1961 c 15
s 84.36.162;

(7) RCW 84.36.176 (Plywood, hardboard and
particle board panels in transit) and 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 34;

(8) RCW 84.36.181 (Ores, metals from
out-of-state in process of reduction or refinement) and 1961 c 168 s 2;

(9) RCW 84.36.190 (Metals in cathode or bar
form for sale and held under negotiable warehouse receipt) and 1961 c 15 s
84.36.190;

(10) RCW 84.36.191 (Metals in cathode or bar
form for sale and held under negotiable warehouse receipt--Purpose and
construction) and 1961 c 15 s 84.36.191;

(11) RCW 84.36.270 (Real property beneath air
space dedicated to public body for stadium facilities) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195
s 95 & 1967 ex.s. c 117 s 1;

(12) RCW 84.36.280 (Real property beneath air
space dedicated to public body for stadium facilities--Exemption effective only
on completion of construction of facility) and 1967 ex.s. c 117 s 2;

(13) RCW 84.36.290 (Real property beneath air
space dedicated to public body for stadium facilities--Taxes for school purposes
not affected) and 1967 ex.s. c 117 s 3;

(14) RCW 84.36.473 ("Business
inventories" and "successor" defined) and 1998 c 311 s 23, 1983
1st ex.s. c 62 s 2, 1982 c 174 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 291 s 8, & 1974 ex.s.
c 169 s 4;

(15) RCW 84.36.490 (Land, buildings,
machinery, etc., used to manufacture alcohol
fuel--Exceptions--Limitations--Claims--Administrative rules) and 1985 c 371 s 7
& 1980 c 157 s 1; and

(16) RCW 84.40.0305 (Assessed
value--Determination--Limited value) and 1997 c 3 s 105.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
28. The repeals in section 27
of this act do not affect any existing right acquired or liability or
obligation incurred under the sections repealed or under any rule or order
adopted under those sections, nor do they affect any proceeding instituted
under those sections.

Sec. 29. RCW 84.70.010 and 1999
sp.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If, on or before
December 31 in any calendar year, any real or personal property placed upon the
assessment roll of that year is destroyed in whole or in part, or is in an area
that has been declared a disaster area by the governor and has been reduced in
value by more than twenty percent as a result of a natural disaster, the
assessed value of such property shall be reduced for that assessment year by an
amount determined by taking the assessed value of such taxable property before
destruction or reduction in value and deduct therefrom the true and fair value
of the remaining property after destruction or reduction in value.

(2) Taxes levied for
collection in the year in which the assessed value has been reduced under
subsection (1) of this section shall be abated in whole or in part as provided
in this subsection. The amount of taxes to be abated shall be determined by
first multiplying the amount deducted from assessed value under subsection (1)
of this section by the rate of levy applicable to the property in the tax
year. Then divide the product by the number of days in the year and multiply
the quotient by the number of days remaining in the calendar year after the
date of the destruction or reduction in value of the property. If taxes abated
under this section have been paid, the amount paid shall be refunded under RCW
84.69.020. For taxes levied for collection in 1998 and 1999, this subsection
(2) applies to property that is destroyed in whole or in part, or is in an area
that has been declared a disaster area by the governor and has been reduced in
value by more than twenty percent as a result of a natural disaster. For taxes
levied for collection in 2000 through 2004, this subsection (2) applies to
property that is destroyed in whole or in part, or is in an area that has been
declared a federal disaster area and has been reduced in value by more than
twenty percent as a result of a natural disaster. This subsection (2) does not
apply to taxes levied for collection in 2005 and thereafter.

(3) No reduction in the
assessed value or abatements shall be made more than three years after the date
of destruction or reduction in value.

(4) The assessor shall
make such reduction on his or her own motion; however, the taxpayer may make
application for reduction on forms prepared by the department and provided by
the assessor. The assessor shall notify the taxpayer of the amount of
reduction.

(5) If destroyed
property is replaced prior to the valuation dates contained in RCW 36.21.080
and 36.21.090, the total taxable value for that assessment year shall not
exceed the value as of the appropriate valuation date in RCW 36.21.080 or
36.21.090, whichever is appropriate.

(6) The taxpayer may
appeal the amount of reduction to the county board of equalization ((within
thirty days of notification or July 1st of the year of reduction, whichever is
later)) in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. The
board shall reconvene, if necessary, to hear the appeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
30. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 84.36.140 (Exemption of grains,
flour, fruit, vegetables, fish, and unprocessed timber--Limitation--Proof of
shipment) and 1972 ex.s. c 30 s 2 & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.140;

(2) RCW 84.36.150 (Exemption of grains,
flour, fruit, vegetables, fish, and unprocessed timber--Listing and subsequent
cancellation--Proof) and 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 32 & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.150;

(3) RCW 84.36.160 (Exemption of grains,
flour, fruit, vegetables, fish, and unprocessed timber--Definitions) and 1972
ex.s. c 30 s 1, 1971 ex.s. c 137 s 1, & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.160;

(4) RCW 84.36.161 (Exemption of grains, flour,
fruit, vegetables, fish, and unprocessed timber--Construction of RCW 84.36.140,
84.36.150, 84.36.160 and 84.36.162--Effect on other acts) and 1998 c 311 s 21
& 1961 c 15 s 84.36.161;

(5) RCW 84.36.162 (Exemption of grains, flour,
fruit, vegetables, fish, and unprocessed timber--Purpose) and 1961 c 15 s
84.36.162;

(6) RCW 84.36.176 (Plywood, hardboard and
particle board panels in transit) and 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 34;

(7) RCW 84.36.181 (Ores, metals from
out-of-state in process of reduction or refinement) and 1961 c 168 s 2;

(8) RCW 84.36.190 (Metals in cathode or bar
form for sale and held under negotiable warehouse receipt) and 1961 c 15 s
84.36.190;

(9) RCW 84.36.191 (Metals in cathode or bar
form for sale and held under negotiable warehouse receipt--Purpose and
construction) and 1961 c 15 s 84.36.191;

(10) RCW 84.36.270 (Real property beneath air
space dedicated to public body for stadium facilities) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195
s 95 & 1967 ex.s. c 117 s 1;

(11) RCW 84.36.280 (Real property beneath air
space dedicated to public body for stadium facilities--Exemption effective only
on completion of construction of facility) and 1967 ex.s. c 117 s 2;

(12) RCW 84.36.290 (Real property beneath air
space dedicated to public body for stadium facilities--Taxes for school purposes
not affected) and 1967 ex.s. c 117 s 3;

(13) RCW 84.36.473 ("Business
inventories" and "successor" defined) and 1998 c 311 s 23, 1983
1st ex.s. c 62 s 2, 1982 c 174 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 291 s 8, & 1974 ex.s.
c 169 s 4; and

(14) RCW 84.36.490 (Land, buildings,
machinery, etc., used to manufacture alcohol
fuel--Exceptions--Limitations--Claims--Administrative rules) and 1985 c 371 s 7
& 1980 c 157 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
31. The repeals in section 30
of this act do not affect any existing right acquired or liability or
obligation incurred under the sections repealed or under any rule or order
adopted under those sections, nor do they affect any proceeding instituted
under those sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
32. Sections 29, 30, and 31
of this act take effect for taxes levied in 2001 for collection in 2002 and
thereafter if the proposed amendment to Article VII, section 1 of the state
Constitution providing for valuation increases to be phased in over a period of
four years is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by voters at
the next general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and
ratified, sections 29, 30, and 31 of this act are null and void. If such
proposed amendment is approved and ratified, sections 2 through 13, 16 through
19, and 21 through 28 of this act are null and void.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 33. This act applies for
taxes levied in 2001 for collection in 2002 and thereafter.

---
END ---