BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.308 and 1993 c
187 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(a) A controlled
substance may be dispensed only as provided in this section.

(b) Except when
dispensed directly by a practitioner authorized to prescribe or administer a
controlled substance, other than a pharmacy, to an ultimate user, a substance
included in Schedule II may not be dispensed without the written prescription
of a practitioner. However, in accordance with federal law or rule,
Schedule II substances may be dispensed by a pharmacy pursuant to a facsimile,
transmitted by the practitioner or the practitioner's agent for patients in a
long-term care facility, hospice agency, or hospice care center, licensed by
the state. The practitioner or agent shall note on the prescription that the
patient is a long-term care or hospice patient. Facsimiles may also be used to
transmit prescriptions for injectable Schedule II substances. The facsimile
shall serve as the original prescription and shall be maintained in the same
manner as other Schedule II prescriptions.

(c) In emergency
situations, as defined by rule of the state board of pharmacy, a substance
included in Schedule II may be dispensed upon oral prescription of a
practitioner, reduced promptly to writing and filed by the pharmacy.
Prescriptions shall be retained in conformity with the requirements of RCW
69.50.306. A prescription for a substance included in Schedule II may not be
refilled.

(d) Except when
dispensed directly by a practitioner authorized to prescribe or administer a
controlled substance, other than a pharmacy, to an ultimate user, a substance
included in Schedule III or IV, which is a prescription drug as determined
under RCW 69.04.560, may not be dispensed without a written or oral
prescription of a practitioner. Any oral prescription must be promptly reduced
to writing. The prescription shall not be filled or refilled more than six
months after the date thereof or be refilled more than five times, unless
renewed by the practitioner.

(e) A valid prescription
or lawful order of a practitioner, in order to be effective in legalizing the
possession of controlled substances, must be issued in good faith for a
legitimate medical purpose by one authorized to prescribe the use of such
controlled substance. An order purporting to be a prescription not in the
course of professional treatment is not a valid prescription or lawful order of
a practitioner within the meaning and intent of this chapter; and the person
who knows or should know that the person is filling such an order, as well as
the person issuing it, can be charged with a violation of this chapter.

(f) A substance
included in Schedule V must be distributed or dispensed only for a medical
purpose.

(g) A practitioner may
dispense or deliver a controlled substance to or for an individual or animal
only for medical treatment or authorized research in the ordinary course of
that practitioner's profession. Medical treatment includes dispensing or
administering a narcotic drug for pain, including intractable pain.

(h) No administrative
sanction, or civil or criminal liability, authorized or created by this chapter
may be imposed on a pharmacist for action taken in reliance on a reasonable
belief that an order purporting to be a prescription was issued by a
practitioner in the usual course of professional treatment or in authorized
research.

(i) An individual
practitioner may not dispense a substance included in Schedule II, III, or IV
for that individual practitioner's personal use.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.307 (Order forms) and 1971
ex.s. c 308 s 69.50.307 are each repealed.

---
END ---