BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.50.050 and 1999 c
198 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section
governs records relating to the commission of juvenile offenses, including
records relating to diversions.

(2) The official
juvenile court file of any alleged or proven juvenile offender shall be open to
public inspection, unless sealed pursuant to subsection (12) of this section.

(3) All records other
than the official juvenile court file are confidential and may be released only
as provided in this section, RCW 13.50.010, 13.40.215, and 4.24.550.

(4) Except as otherwise
provided in this section and RCW 13.50.010, records retained or produced by any
juvenile justice or care agency may be released to other participants in the
juvenile justice or care system only when an investigation or case involving
the juvenile in question is being pursued by the other participant or when that
other participant is assigned the responsibility for supervising the juvenile.

(5) Except as provided
in RCW 4.24.550, information not in an official juvenile court file concerning
a juvenile or a juvenile's family may be released to the public only when that
information could not reasonably be expected to identify the juvenile or the
juvenile's family.

(6) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, the release, to the juvenile or his or her
attorney, of law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys' records pertaining to
investigation, diversion, and prosecution of juvenile offenses shall be
governed by the rules of discovery and other rules of law applicable in adult criminal
investigations and prosecutions.

(7) Upon the decision
to arrest or the arrest, law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may
cooperate with schools in releasing information to a school pertaining to the
investigation, diversion, and prosecution of a juvenile attending the school.
Upon the decision to arrest or the arrest, incident reports may be released
unless releasing the records would jeopardize the investigation or prosecution
or endanger witnesses. If release of incident reports would jeopardize the
investigation or prosecution or endanger witnesses, law enforcement and
prosecuting attorneys may release information to the maximum extent possible to
assist schools in protecting other students, staff, and school property.

(8) The juvenile court
and the prosecutor may set up and maintain a central record-keeping system
which may receive information on all alleged juvenile offenders against whom a
complaint has been filed pursuant to RCW 13.40.070 whether or not their cases
are currently pending before the court. The central record-keeping system may
be computerized. If a complaint has been referred to a diversion unit, the
diversion unit shall promptly report to the juvenile court or the prosecuting
attorney when the juvenile has agreed to diversion. An offense shall not be
reported as criminal history in any central record-keeping system without
notification by the diversion unit of the date on which the offender agreed to
diversion.

(9) Upon request of the
victim of a crime or the victim's immediate family, the identity of an alleged
or proven juvenile offender alleged or found to have committed a crime against
the victim and the identity of the alleged or proven juvenile offender's
parent, guardian, or custodian and the circumstance of the alleged or proven
crime shall be released to the victim of the crime or the victim's immediate
family.

(10) Subject to the
rules of discovery applicable in adult criminal prosecutions, the juvenile
offense records of an adult criminal defendant or witness in an adult criminal
proceeding shall be released upon request to prosecution and defense counsel
after a charge has actually been filed. The juvenile offense records of any
adult convicted of a crime and placed under the supervision of the adult corrections
system shall be released upon request to the adult corrections system.

(11) In any case in
which an information has been filed pursuant to RCW 13.40.100 or a complaint
has been filed with the prosecutor and referred for diversion pursuant to RCW
13.40.070, the person the subject of the information or complaint may file a
motion with the court to have the court vacate its order and findings, if any,
and, subject to subsection (23) of this section, order the sealing of the
official juvenile court file, the social file, and records of the court and of
any other agency in the case.

(12) The court shall
grant the motion to seal records made pursuant to subsection (11) of this
section if it finds that:

(a) For class B
offenses other than sex offenses, since the last date of release from
confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry of
disposition, the person has spent ten consecutive years in the community
without committing any offense or crime that subsequently results in conviction.
For class C offenses other than sex offenses, since the last date of release
from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry
of disposition, the person has spent five consecutive years in the community
without committing any offense or crime that subsequently results in conviction.
For diversions, since completion of the diversion agreement, the person has
spent two consecutive years in the community without committing any offense or
crime that subsequently results in conviction or diversion and the person is at
least eighteen years old;

(b) No proceeding is
pending against the moving party seeking the conviction of a juvenile offense
or a criminal offense;

(c) No proceeding is
pending seeking the formation of a diversion agreement with that person;

(d) The person has not
been convicted of a class A or sex offense; and

(e) Full restitution
has been paid.

(13) The person making
a motion pursuant to subsection (11) of this section shall give reasonable
notice of the motion to the prosecution and to any person or agency whose files
are sought to be sealed.

(14) If the court
grants the motion to seal made pursuant to subsection (11) of this section, it
shall, subject to subsection (23) of this section, order sealed the official
juvenile court file, the social file, and other records relating to the case as
are named in the order. Thereafter, the proceedings in the case shall be
treated as if they never occurred, and the subject of the records may reply
accordingly to any inquiry about the events, records of which are sealed. Any
agency shall reply to any inquiry concerning confidential or sealed records
that records are confidential, and no information can be given about the
existence or nonexistence of records concerning an individual.

(15) Inspection of the
files and records included in the order to seal may thereafter be permitted
only by order of the court upon motion made by the person who is the subject of
the information or complaint, except as otherwise provided in RCW 13.50.010(8)
and subsection (23) of this section.

(16) Any adjudication
of a juvenile offense or a crime subsequent to sealing has the effect of
nullifying the sealing order. Any charging of an adult felony subsequent to
the sealing has the effect of nullifying the sealing order for the purposes of
chapter 9.94A RCW.

(17)(a) A person
eighteen years of age or older whose criminal history consists of only one
referral for diversion may request that the court order the records in that
case destroyed. The request shall be granted, subject to subsection (23) of
this section, if the court finds that two years have elapsed since completion
of the diversion agreement.

(b) A person
twenty-three years of age or older whose criminal history consists of only
referrals for diversion may request that the court order the records in those
cases destroyed. The request shall be granted, subject to subsection (23) of
this section, if the court finds that all diversion agreements have been
successfully completed and no proceeding is pending against the person seeking
the conviction of a criminal offense.

(18) If the court
grants the motion to destroy records made pursuant to subsection (17) of this
section, it shall, subject to subsection (23) of this section, order the
official juvenile court file, the social file, and any other records named in
the order to be destroyed.

(19) The person making
the motion pursuant to subsection (17) of this section shall give reasonable
notice of the motion to the prosecuting attorney and to any agency whose
records are sought to be destroyed.

(20) Any juvenile to
whom the provisions of this section may apply shall be given written notice of
his or her rights under this section at the time of his or her disposition
hearing or during the diversion process.

(21) Nothing in this
section may be construed to prevent a crime victim or a member of the victim's
family from divulging the identity of the alleged or proven juvenile offender
or his or her family when necessary in a civil proceeding.

(22) Any juvenile
justice or care agency may, subject to the limitations in subsection (23) of
this section and (a) and (b) of this subsection, develop procedures for the
routine destruction of records relating to juvenile offenses and diversions.

(a) Records may be
routinely destroyed only when the person the subject of the information or
complaint has attained twenty-three years of age or older, or is eighteen years
of age or older and his or her criminal history consists entirely of one
diversion agreement and two years have passed since completion of the
agreement.

(b) The court may not
routinely destroy the official juvenile court file or recordings or transcripts
of any proceedings.

(23) No identifying
information held by the Washington state patrol in accordance with chapter
43.43 RCW is subject to destruction or sealing under this section. For the
purposes of this subsection, identifying information includes photographs,
fingerprints, palmprints, soleprints, toeprints and any other data that
identifies a person by physical characteristics, name, birthdate or address,
but does not include information regarding criminal activity, arrest, charging,
diversion, conviction or other information about a person's treatment by the
criminal justice system or about the person's behavior.

(24) Information
identifying child victims under age eighteen who are victims of sexual assaults
by juvenile offenders is confidential and not subject to release to the press
or public without the permission of the child victim or the child's legal
guardian. Identifying information includes the child victim's name, addresses,
location, photographs, and in cases in which the child victim is a relative of
the alleged perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child
and the alleged perpetrator. Information identifying a child victim of sexual
assault may be released to law enforcement, prosecutors, judges, defense
attorneys, or private or governmental agencies that provide services to the
child victim of sexual assault.

Sec. 2. RCW 13.40.070 and 1997 c
338 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Complaints referred
to the juvenile court alleging the commission of an offense shall be referred
directly to the prosecutor. The prosecutor, upon receipt of a complaint, shall
screen the complaint to determine whether:

(a) The alleged facts
bring the case within the jurisdiction of the court; and

(b) On a basis of
available evidence there is probable cause to believe that the juvenile did
commit the offense.

(2) If the identical
alleged acts constitute an offense under both the law of this state and an
ordinance of any city or county of this state, state law shall govern the
prosecutor's screening and charging decision for both filed and diverted cases.

(3) If the requirements
of subsections (1)(a) and (b) of this section are met, the prosecutor shall
either file an information in juvenile court or divert the case, as set forth
in subsections (5), (6), and (7) of this section. If the prosecutor finds that
the requirements of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section are not met, the
prosecutor shall maintain a record, for one year, of such decision and the
reasons therefor. In lieu of filing an information or diverting an offense a
prosecutor may file a motion to modify community supervision where such offense
constitutes a violation of community supervision.

(4) An information
shall be a plain, concise, and definite written statement of the essential
facts constituting the offense charged. It shall be signed by the prosecuting
attorney and conform to chapter 10.37 RCW.

(5) Where a case is
legally sufficient, the prosecutor shall file an information with the juvenile
court if:

(a) An alleged offender
is accused of a class A felony, a class B felony, an attempt to commit a class
B felony, a class C felony listed in RCW 9.94A.440(2) as a crime against
persons or listed in RCW 9A.46.060 as a crime of harassment, or a class C
felony that is a violation of RCW 9.41.080 or 9.41.040(1)(b)(iii); or

(b) An alleged offender
is accused of a felony and has a criminal history of any felony, or at least
two gross misdemeanors, or at least two misdemeanors; or

(c) An alleged offender
has previously been committed to the department; or

(d) An alleged offender
has been referred by a diversion unit for prosecution or desires prosecution
instead of diversion; or

(e) An alleged offender
has ((two)) three or more diversion ((contracts)) agreements
on the alleged offender's criminal history; or

(f) A special
allegation has been filed that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
firearm when the offense was committed.

(6) Where a case is
legally sufficient the prosecutor shall divert the case if the alleged offense
is a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor or violation and the alleged offense is
the offender's first offense or violation. If the alleged offender is charged
with a related offense that must or may be filed under subsections (5) and (7)
of this section, a case under this subsection may also be filed.

(7) Where a case is
legally sufficient and falls into neither subsection (5) nor (6) of this
section, it may be filed or diverted. In deciding whether to file or divert an
offense under this section the prosecutor shall be guided only by the length,
seriousness, and recency of the alleged offender's criminal history and the
circumstances surrounding the commission of the alleged offense.

(8) Whenever a juvenile
is placed in custody or, where not placed in custody, referred to a diversion
interview, the parent or legal guardian of the juvenile shall be notified as
soon as possible concerning the allegation made against the juvenile and the
current status of the juvenile. Where a case involves victims of crimes
against persons or victims whose property has not been recovered at the time a
juvenile is referred to a diversion unit, the victim shall be notified of the
referral and informed how to contact the unit.

(9) The
responsibilities of the prosecutor under subsections (1) through (8) of this
section may be performed by a juvenile court probation counselor for any
complaint referred to the court alleging the commission of an offense which
would not be a felony if committed by an adult, if the prosecutor has given
sufficient written notice to the juvenile court that the prosecutor will not
review such complaints.

(10) The prosecutor,
juvenile court probation counselor, or diversion unit may, in exercising their
authority under this section or RCW 13.40.080, refer juveniles to mediation or
victim offender reconciliation programs. Such mediation or victim offender
reconciliation programs shall be voluntary for victims.

Sec. 3. RCW 13.40.127 and 1997 c
338 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A juvenile is
eligible for deferred disposition unless he or she:

(a) Is charged with a
sex or violent offense;

(b) Has a criminal
history which includes any felony;

(c) Has a prior
deferred disposition or deferred adjudication; or

(d) Has two or more ((diversions))
adjudications.

(2) The juvenile court
may, upon motion at least fourteen days before commencement of trial and, after
consulting the juvenile's custodial parent or parents or guardian and with the
consent of the juvenile, continue the case for disposition for a period not to
exceed one year from the date the juvenile is found guilty. The court shall
consider whether the offender and the community will benefit from a deferred
disposition before deferring the disposition.

(3) Any juvenile who
agrees to a deferral of disposition shall:

(a) Stipulate to the
admissibility of the facts contained in the written police report;

(b) Acknowledge that
the report will be entered and used to support a finding of guilt and to impose
a disposition if the juvenile fails to comply with terms of supervision; and

(c) Waive the following
rights to: (i) A speedy disposition; and (ii) call and confront witnesses.

The adjudicatory hearing
shall be limited to a reading of the court's record.

(4) Following the
stipulation, acknowledgment, waiver, and entry of a finding or plea of guilt,
the court shall defer entry of an order of disposition of the juvenile.

(5) Any juvenile
granted a deferral of disposition under this section shall be placed under
community supervision. The court may impose any conditions of supervision that
it deems appropriate including posting a probation bond. Payment of
restitution under RCW 13.40.190 shall be a condition of community supervision
under this section.

(6) A parent who signed
for a probation bond has the right to notify the counselor if the juvenile
fails to comply with the bond or conditions of supervision. The counselor
shall notify the court and surety of any failure to comply. A surety shall
notify the court of the juvenile's failure to comply with the probation bond.
The state shall bear the burden to prove, by a preponderance of the evidence,
that the juvenile has failed to comply with the terms of community supervision.

(7) A juvenile's lack
of compliance shall be determined by the judge upon written motion by the
prosecutor or the juvenile's juvenile court community supervision counselor.
If a juvenile fails to comply with terms of supervision, the court shall enter
an order of disposition.

(8) At any time
following deferral of disposition the court may, following a hearing, continue
the case for an additional one-year period for good cause.

(9) At the
conclusion of the period set forth in the order of deferral and upon a finding
by the court of full compliance with conditions of supervision and payment of
full restitution, the respondent's conviction shall be vacated and the court
shall dismiss the case with prejudice.

---
END ---