BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that equipment funds have been statutorily authorized and successfully
implemented for the department of natural resources, the department of transportation,
cities, and counties. The legislature recognizes that a recent management
review of the department of fish and wildlife recommended the establishment of
a fleet management system for the department in order to capture the total cost
of individual vehicle operation, provide appropriate chargebacks to program
users, and alert managers when a vehicle became too costly to maintain. The
legislature finds that the establishment of an equipment fund by the department
of fish and wildlife for the maintenance and replacement of equipment,
including vehicles, will allow the department to increase the efficiency of its
operations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

A revolving fund to be
known as the fish and wildlife equipment fund is created in the custody of the
state treasurer, to be expended by the department without appropriation for
salaries, wages, and operations required for the purchase, repair, replacement,
and operation of equipment for the purposes authorized in this section. The
equipment may be used for the administration, maintenance, and construction of
fish and wildlife lands and facilities; administration, maintenance, and
construction of lands under department control; administration, maintenance,
and construction of projects that will enhance fish and wildlife, including but
not limited to volunteer cooperative projects, regional fisheries enhancement
group projects, and salmon recovery projects; and administration, biological
assessment, and enforcement necessary to carry out the duties under this title
and rules of the commission and director. The department may purchase and sell
equipment, materials, and supplies by use of the fund, subject to any laws governing
the purchase and sale of property.

All existing and
hereafter-acquired equipment of the department shall be deemed to have been
purchased from the fish and wildlife equipment fund. The department may, from
time to time, transfer equipment purchased with appropriations from the general
fund to the fish and wildlife equipment fund with or without charging the fish
and wildlife equipment fund.

Equipment may be
provided to any federal, state, county, or city political subdivision or
governmental agency, volunteer cooperatives, regional fisheries enhancement
groups, and entities engaged in salmon recovery. The department may collect a
reasonable charge for providing the equipment. The terms and charges for such
rentals shall be solely within the discretion of the department, and the
determination of the terms and charges shall be considered reasonable. Any
entity renting equipment shall make payment for such rental charges directly to
the fish and wildlife equipment fund and the office of the department in
Olympia. The fish and wildlife equipment fund shall be credited with the
proceeds received from the payment of the rental charges.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 77.95 RCW to read as follows:

Existing
and hereafter acquired equipment and materials purchased by regional fisheries
enhancement groups with funding from the regional fisheries enhancement group
account established under RCW 77.95.090 or the regional fisheries enhancement
salmonid recovery account established under RCW 77.95.130, shall be considered
the property of the regional fisheries enhancement group making the purchase
when the cost of the equipment or materials is less than five thousand
dollars. No chargeback shall be made on these equipment and materials to the
fish and wildlife equipment fund established in section 2 of this act. The
regional fisheries enhancement group advisory board and the department shall
develop guidelines for implementing this section.

---
END ---