BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_8 Sec. 1. RCW
36.70A.140 and 1995 c 347 s 107 are each amended to

_9 read as follows:

10 Each county and city that is required or chooses to
plan under

11 RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish and broadly disseminate
to the

12 public a public participation program identifying
procedures

13 providing for early and continuous public participation
in the

14 development and amendment of comprehensive land use
plans and

15 development regulations implementing such plans. The
procedures

16 shall provide for broad dissemination of proposals and

17 alternatives, opportunity for written comments, public
meetings

18 after effective notice, provision for open discussion,

p. 1 HB
1473

_1 communication programs, information services, and
consideration of

_2 and response to public comments. ((In enacting
legislation in

_3 response to the board's decision pursuant to RCW
36.70A.300

_4 declaring part or all of a comprehensive plan or
development

_5 regulation invalid, the county or city shall provide
for public

_6 participation that is appropriate and effective under
the

_7 circumstances presented by the board's order.))
Errors in exact

_8 compliance with the established program and procedures
shall not

_9 render the comprehensive land use plan or development
regulations

10 invalid if the spirit of the program and procedures is
observed.

11 Sec. 2. RCW
36.70A.300 and 1997 c 429 s 14 are each amended to

12 read as follows:

13 (1) The board shall issue a final order that shall
be based

14 exclusively on whether or not a state agency, county, or
city is

15 in compliance with the requirements of this chapter,
chapter 90.58

16 RCW as it relates to adoption or amendment of shoreline
master

17 programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to
adoption of

18 plans, development regulations, and amendments thereto,
under RCW

19 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW.

20 (2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection,
the final

21 order shall be issued within one hundred eighty days of
receipt of

22 the petition for review, or, if multiple petitions are
filed,

23 within one hundred eighty days of receipt of the last
petition

24 that is consolidated.

25 (b) The board may extend the period of time for
issuing a

26 decision to enable the parties to settle the dispute if
additional

27 time is necessary to achieve a settlement, and (i) an
extension is

28 requested by all parties, or (ii) an extension is
requested by the

29 petitioner and respondent and the board determines that
a

30 negotiated settlement between the remaining parties
could resolve

31 significant issues in dispute. The request must be
filed with the

32 board not later than seven days before the date
scheduled for the

33 hearing on the merits of the petition. The board may
authorize one

34 or more extensions for up to ninety days each, subject
to the

35 requirements of this section.

36 (3) In the final order, the board shall either:

37 (a) Find that the state agency, county, or city is
in

HB 1473 p. 2

_1 compliance with the requirements of this chapter,
chapter 90.58

_2 RCW as it relates to the adoption or amendment of
shoreline master

_3 programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to
adoption of

_4 plans, development regulations, and amendments thereto,
under RCW

_5 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; or

_6 (b) Find that the state agency, county, or city is
not in

_7 compliance with the requirements of this chapter,
chapter 90.58

_8 RCW as it relates to the adoption or amendment of
shoreline master

_9 programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to
adoption of

10 plans, development regulations, and amendments thereto,
under RCW

11 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW, in which case the board
shall

12 remand the matter to the affected state agency, county,
or city.

13 The board shall specify a reasonable time not in excess
of one

14 hundred eighty days, or such longer period as determined
by the

15 board in cases of unusual scope or complexity, within
which the

16 state agency, county, or city shall comply with the
requirements

17 of this chapter. The board may require periodic reports
to the

18 board on the progress the jurisdiction is making towards

19 compliance.

20 (4) ((Unless the board makes a determination of
invalidity as

21 provided in RCW 36.70A.302,)) A finding of
noncompliance and an

22 order of remand shall not affect the validity of
comprehensive

23 plans and development regulations during the period of
remand.

24 (5) Any party aggrieved by a final decision of the
hearings

25 board may appeal the decision to superior court as
provided in RCW

26 34.05.514 or 36.01.050 within thirty days of the final
order of

27 the board.

28 Sec. 3. RCW
36.70A.320 and 1997 c 429 s 20 are each amended to

29 read as follows:

30 (1) Except as provided in subsection (((5))) (4)
of this

31 section, comprehensive plans and development
regulations, and

32 amendments thereto, adopted under this chapter are
presumed valid

33 upon adoption.

34 (2) ((Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(4) of this

35 section,)) The burden is on the petitioner
to demonstrate that any

36 action taken by a state agency, county, or city under
this chapter

37 is not in compliance with the requirements of this
chapter.

p. 3 HB
1473

_1 (3) In any petition under this chapter, the board,
after full

_2 consideration of the petition, shall determine whether
there is

_3 compliance with the requirements of this chapter. In
making its

_4 determination, the board shall consider the criteria
adopted by

_5 the department under RCW 36.70A.190(4). The board shall
find

_6 compliance unless it determines that the action by the
state

_7 agency, county, or city is clearly erroneous in view of
the entire

_8 record before the board and in light of the goals and
requirements

_9 of this chapter.

10 (4) ((A county or city subject to a determination
of invalidity

11 made under RCW 36.70A.300 or 36.70A.302 has the
burden of

12 demonstrating that the ordinance or resolution it has
enacted in

13 response to the determination of invalidity will no
longer

14 substantially interfere with the fulfillment of the
goals of this

15 chapter under the standard in RCW 36.70A.302(1).

16 (5))) The shoreline element of a
comprehensive plan and the

17 applicable development regulations adopted by a county
or city

18 shall take effect as provided in chapter 90.58 RCW.

19 Sec. 4. RCW
36.70A.330 and 1997 c 429 s 21 are each amended to

20 read as follows:

21 (1) After the time set for complying with the requirements
of

22 this chapter under RCW 36.70A.300(3)(b) has expired, ((or
at an

23 earlier time upon the motion of a county or city
subject to a

24 determination of invalidity under RCW 36.70A.300,))
the board

25 shall set a hearing for the purpose of determining
whether the

26 state agency, county, or city is in compliance with the

27 requirements of this chapter.

28 (2) The board shall conduct a hearing and issue a
finding of

29 compliance or noncompliance with the requirements of
this chapter

30 and with any compliance schedule established by the
board in its

31 final order. A person with standing to challenge the
legislation

32 enacted in response to the board's final order may
participate in

33 the hearing along with the petitioner and the state
agency,

34 county, or city. A hearing under this subsection shall
be given the

35 highest priority of business to be conducted by the
board, and a

36 finding shall be issued within forty-five days of the
filing of

37 the motion under subsection (1) of this section with the
board.

HB 1473 p. 4

_1 The board shall issue any order necessary to make
adjustments to

_2 the compliance schedule and set additional hearings as
provided in

_3 subsection (((5))) (4) of this section.

_4 (3) If the board after a compliance hearing finds
that the

_5 state agency, county, or city is not in compliance, the
board

_6 shall transmit its finding to the governor. The board
may recommend

_7 to the governor that the sanctions authorized by this
chapter be

_8 imposed. The board shall take into consideration the
county's or

_9 city's efforts to meet its compliance schedule in making
the

10 decision to recommend sanctions to the governor.

11 (4) ((In a compliance hearing upon petition of a
party, the

12 board shall also reconsider its final order and
decide, if no

13 determination of invalidity has been made, whether
one now should

14 be made under RCW 36.70A.302.

15 (5))) The board shall schedule additional
hearings as

16 appropriate pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.

17 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The
following acts or parts of acts are each

18 repealed:

19 (1) RCW 36.70A.302 (Determination
of invalidity‑-Vesting of

20 development permits‑-Interim controls) and 1997 c
429 s 16;

21 (2) RCW 36.70A.305 (Expedited
review) and 1996 c 325 s 4; and

22 (3) RCW 36.70A.335 (Order of
invalidity issued before July 27,

23 1997) and 1997 c 429 s 22.

24 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act applies to
all petitions for

25 review filed with the growth management hearings boards
on or

26 after July 1, 2001.

27 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary
for the immediate

28 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

29 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

30 takes effect July 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 HB
1473