BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 Sec. 1. RCW
41.32.570 and 1999 c 387 s 1 are each amended to read

_7 as follows:

_8 (((1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an
employer sooner

_9 than one calendar month after his or her accrual
date, the

10 retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be
reduced by five and

11 one-half percent for every seven hours worked during
that month.

12 This reduction will be applied each month until the
retiree

13 remains absent from employment with an employer for
one full

14 calendar month.

15 (b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this
subsection

16 will accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours
per month.

17 Any monthly benefit reduction over one hundred
percent will be

p. 1 HB
1475

_1 applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to
receive in

_2 subsequent months.

_3 (2))) Any retired teacher or retired
administrator who enters

_4 service in any public educational institution in
Washington state

_5 ((and who has satisfied the break in employment
requirement of

_6 subsection (1) of this section)) shall ((cease))
continue to

_7 receive pension payments while engaged in such service((:
PROVIDED,

_8 That service may be rendered up to five hundred
twenty- five hours

_9 per school year)) without reduction of pension.

10 (((3) In addition to the five hundred twenty-five
hours of

11 service permitted under subsection (2) of this
section, a retired

12 teacher or retired administrator may also serve only
as a

13 substitute teacher for up to an additional three
hundred fifteen

14 hours per school year without reduction of pension
if:

15 (a) A school district, which is not a member of a
multidistrict

16 substitute cooperative, determines that it has
exhausted or can

17 reasonably anticipate that it will exhaust its list
of qualified

18 and available substitutes and the school board of the
district

19 adopts a resolution to make its substitute teachers
who are

20 retired teachers or retired administrators eligible
for the

21 extended service once the list of qualified and
available

22 substitutes has been exhausted. The resolution by
the school

23 district shall state that the services of retired
teachers and

24 retired administrators are necessary to address the
shortage of

25 qualified and available substitutes. The resolution
shall be valid

26 only for the school year in which it is adopted. The
district shall

27 forward a copy of the resolution with a list of
retired teachers

28 and retired administrators who have been employed as
substitute

29 teachers to the department and may notify the retired
teachers and

30 retired administrators included on the list of their
right to take

31 advantage of the provisions of this subsection; or

32 (b) A multidistrict substitute cooperative
determines that the

33 school districts have exhausted or can reasonably
anticipate that

34 they will exhaust their list of qualified and
available

35 substitutes and each of the school boards adopts a
resolution to

36 make their substitute teachers who are retired
teachers or retired

37 administrators eligible for the extended service once
the list of

38 qualified and available substitutes has been
exhausted. The

HB 1475 p. 2

_1 resolutions by each of the school districts shall
state that the

_2 services of retired teachers and retired
administrators are

_3 necessary to address the shortage of qualified and
available

_4 substitutes. The resolutions shall be valid only for
the school

_5 year in which they are adopted. The cooperative
shall forward a

_6 copy of the resolutions with a list of retired
teachers and

_7 retired administrators who have been employed as
substitute

_8 teachers to the department and may notify the retired
teachers and

_9 retired administrators included on the list of their
right to take

10 advantage of the provisions of this subsection.

11 (4) In addition to the five hundred twenty-five
hours of

12 service permitted under subsection (2) of this
section, a retired

13 administrator or retired teacher may also serve as a
substitute

14 administrator up to an additional one hundred five
hours per

15 school year without reduction of pension if a school
district

16 board of directors adopts a resolution declaring that
the services

17 of a retired administrator or retired teacher are
necessary

18 because it cannot find a replacement administrator to
fill a

19 vacancy. The resolution shall be valid only for the
school year in

20 which it is adopted. The district shall forward a
copy of the

21 resolution with the name of the retired administrator
or retired

22 teacher who has been employed as a substitute
administrator to the

23 department.

24 (5) In addition to the five hundred twenty-five
hours of

25 service permitted under subsection (2) of this
section and the one

26 hundred five hours permitted under subsection (4) of
this section,

27 a retired principal may also serve as a substitute
principal up to

28 an additional two hundred ten hours per school year
without a

29 reduction of pension if a school district board of
directors

30 adopts a resolution declaring that the services of a
retired

31 principal are necessary because it cannot find a
replacement

32 principal to fill a vacancy. The resolution shall be
valid only for

33 the school year in which it is adopted. The district
shall forward

34 a copy of the resolution with the name of the retired
principal

35 who has been employed as a substitute principal to
the department.

36 (6) Subsection (2) of this section shall apply to
all persons

37 governed by the provisions of plan 1, regardless of
the date of

p. 3 HB
1475

_1 their retirement, but shall apply only to benefits
payable after

_2 June 11, 1986.

_3 (7) Subsection (3) of this section shall apply to
all persons

_4 governed by the provisions of plan 1, regardless of
the date of

_5 their retirement, but shall only apply to benefits
payable after

_6 September 1, 1994.))

_7 Sec. 2. RCW
41.40.037 and 1997 c 254 s 14 are each amended to read

_8 as follows:

_9 (1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an
employer sooner

10 than one calendar month after his or her accrual date,
the

11 retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced
by five and

12 one-half percent for every eight hours worked during
that month.

13 This reduction will be applied each month until the
retiree

14 remains absent from employment with an employer for one
full

15 calendar month.

16 (b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this
subsection

17 will accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per
month.

18 Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be
applied to

19 the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in
subsequent

20 months.

21 (2)(a) A retiree from plan 1 who enters
employment with an

22 employer shall continue to receive pension payments
while engaged

23 in such service without reduction of pension.

24 (b) A retiree from plan 2 or plan 3 who has
satisfied the break

25 in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this
section((,))

26 may work up to five months per calendar year in an
eligible

27 position without suspension of his or her benefit.

28 (3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership
under RCW

29 41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or her
retirement status

30 and becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not
accrue during

31 the period of membership and the individual shall make

32 contributions and receive membership credit. Such a
member shall

33 have the right to again retire if eligible in accordance
with RCW

34 41.40.180. However, if the right to retire is exercised
to become

35 effective before the member has rendered two uninterrupted
years

36 of service, the retirement formula and survivor options
the member

HB 1475 p. 4

_1 had at the time of the member's previous retirement
shall be

_2 reinstated.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 HB
1475